BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS AND INTENT. The legislature finds
that King county has grown in population to exceed that of twelve
states, and that as a result of its size can no longer be effectively
managed as a single county. The resulting management problems in King
county have had an adverse impact throughout the state. Furthermore,
the size of King county permits it to have influence over state issues
to the detriment of other counties throughout the state. It is
therefore a compelling interest of the entire state to divide King
county into smaller, more manageable portions. Such a division would
enable each of the smaller portions of the county to better serve the
needs of its citizens.
The legislature further finds that Article II, section 28 of the
state Constitution permits the legislature to enact special legislation
creating new counties, subject to the requirements in Article XI,
section 3 establishing minimum populations for both the new county and
the territory remaining in the counties from which territory is
stricken, and requiring that a majority of the registered voters in the
area to be stricken sign a petition therefor. In fact, this process of
enacting special legislation along with a petition to strike territory
from an existing county is the mechanism by which all new counties have
been created since statehood, because the legislature has yet to enact
a general law applicable to the whole state that would permit the
people to strike areas from existing counties and create new counties
by petition alone. The Constitution, however, does not require the
petition to be received prior to the enacting of such special
legislation; it requires only that the territory not actually be
stricken from the county until after the petition is received.
Furthermore, the Constitution does not require that the petition be
initiated by the voters in the area to be stricken, but only that they
sign the petition. The Constitution does not bar the legislature from
initiating the petition to strike territory from an existing county,
nor does it bar the use of state resources to develop, circulate, and
promote such a petition.
The legislature further finds that the population of King county
within the boundaries of the city of Seattle is greater than four
thousand; that the population of King county outside the boundaries of
the city of Seattle is greater than two thousand; and that the
territory of King county outside the boundaries of the city of Seattle
is a single, contiguous area.
The legislature further finds that Article XI, section 16 of the
state Constitution provides for the establishment of combined city-county governments, and that if a city and county were to share
boundaries, operational efficiencies could be obtained by combining the
governments thereof.
Accordingly, it is the intent of the legislature to strike from
King county the territory which is outside the existing corporate
limits of the city of Seattle, and to create therefrom a new county to
be known as Cascade county; to circulate a petition amongst the
registered voters residing in the area to be stricken to seek their
consent to the striking of such territory; to provide for an equitable
apportionment of the debts, liabilities, and assets of King county
between Cascade county and the remaining portion of King county; and to
encourage the residents remaining in King county and the city of
Seattle to obtain operational efficiencies by seeking to form a
combined city-county government, to be known as the city and county of
Seattle, according to the provisions of Article XI, section 16 of the
state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Cascade county" means the county that will be created by
striking from King county all territory that is outside the corporate
limits of the city of Seattle as of the effective date of this act, in
accordance with Article XI, section 3 of the state Constitution, upon
certification of a petition signed by a majority of the registered
voters residing in the territory to be stricken.
(2) "Assets" means all: (a) Real estate and leasehold interests in
real estate owned by King county; (b) tangible personal property owned
or leased by King county; and (c) intangible personal property owned by
King county including cash, securities, commercial paper, notes,
accounts receivable, and contract rights. Assets are determined as of
the first day of the interim period.
(3) "Interim period" means the period during which the Cascade
county government is established, the apportionment of debts,
liabilities, and assets is implemented, and the transfer of all records
from King county to Cascade county is completed. The period begins on
January 1st of the second year after the certification of a petition
signed by a majority of registered voters in the area to be stricken
from King county, and the period ends on December 31st of the same
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 APPOINTMENT OF SPECIAL MASTER. The chief
judge of division I of the court of appeals shall, within thirty days
of the effective date of this act, appoint a special master to gather
facts, conduct hearings, review evidence, and make recommendations to
the court regarding the division of assets and liabilities between King
county and Cascade county in accordance with sections 4 through 7 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 DUTIES OF SPECIAL MASTER. (1) The special
master shall determine the formal legal description of the territory to
be included in Cascade county, consistent with section 2 of this act.
(2) The special master shall recommend the boundaries of three
initial county commissioner districts for Cascade county.
(3) The special master may employ appraisers, accountants,
actuaries, engineers, attorneys, or other experts, and consult with
state and local agencies, to assemble and evaluate evidence and
exercise all other powers otherwise granted to the court that are
necessary for the efficient and just resolution of issues.
(4) The court of appeals may award payment of fees and costs to any
special master and any experts that the special master is authorized to
retain. Such fees and costs shall be paid from the general funds of
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 EQUITABLE APPORTIONMENT. Cascade county is
liable for an equitable proportion of the debts and liabilities of King
county and must receive an equitable proportion of the assets of King
county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 APPORTIONMENT. (1) In apportioning the
debts and liabilities under section 5 of this act, the court shall not
charge either county with any share of debts or liabilities then
existing incurred in the purchase of county property, or in the
purchase or construction of public buildings then in use or under
construction, or roads or bridges then in use or under construction,
that are located within the other county except where the repayment of
the debt or liability is being made or is to be made from bonds
originally authorized by a vote of the qualified electors in the other
county.
(2) The remaining debts and liabilities of King county must be
apportioned so that Cascade county is assigned an amount of debts and
liabilities that is in the same proportion as the assessed valuation of
Cascade county to the total assessed valuation in King county before
the creation of Cascade county. The assessed valuations must be those
used for taxes imposed in the year before the effective date of this
act.
(3) This section may not be construed to affect the rights of
creditors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 APPORTIONMENT OF REAL PROPERTY AND
EQUIPMENT. (1) In apportioning the assets of King county, King county
retains ownership of real property it owns that remains in its
boundaries after the creation of Cascade county. At the effective date
of the creation of Cascade county, Cascade county acquires ownership of
real property that was owned by King county that is located in Cascade
county. No valuation of or compensation for real property is required.
(2) All equipment owned by King county that is used in the
construction or maintenance of roads or bridges must be apportioned
based on total appraised value of the equipment between Cascade county
and King county so that Cascade county receives a portion of this
equipment that is in the same proportion as the number of miles of
county roads in Cascade county is to the total number of miles of
county roads in King county before the creation of Cascade county.
(3) All other assets of King county, the apportionment of which is
not otherwise provided for, must be apportioned between King county and
Cascade county based on total appraised value of the assets so that
Cascade county receives a portion of these assets that is in the same
proportion as the assessed valuation of Cascade county is to the total
assessed valuation of King county before the creation of Cascade
county. The assessed valuations must be those used for taxes imposed
in the year before the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 ENTRY OF ORDER BY THE COURT. (1) Within six
months of the effective date of this act, the court of appeals shall
enter an order defining the formal legal description of Cascade county
for purposes of petitioning, the boundaries of initial county
commission districts, apportioning all debts, liabilities, and assets
of King county between King county and Cascade county, and providing
for the method of transfer or payment, subject to the creation of
Cascade county under section 14 of this act. The order of the court of
appeals is final.
(2) RCW 2.06.040 applies to a proceeding under this section, except
that a decision rendered under this section does not have precedential
value and need not be published as an opinion of the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 CREATION OF PETITIONS. (1) Within thirty
days after entry of the order required by section 8 of this act, the
secretary of state shall prepare petitions for the formation of Cascade
county. Petitions must be substantially in the following form:

WARNING
Every person who signs this petition with any other than his or her
true name, knowingly signs more than one petition for the formation of
Cascade County, signs this petition when he or she is not a registered
voter, or makes any false statement on this petition may be punished by
fine or imprisonment or both.

PETITION FOR THE FORMATION OF CASCADE COUNTY
To the Honorable. . . . . . . . , Secretary of State of the State of
Washington:
We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the state of
Washington, respectfully direct that this petition for the formation of
Cascade County, a full, true, and correct copy of the legal description
of which is included with this petition, be transmitted to the
legislature of the state of Washington, at its next ensuing regular
session. We respectfully petition the legislature to create this new
county as provided by law and in accordance with Article XI, section 3
of the state Constitution. Each of us for himself or herself declares
that: I have personally signed this petition, I am a legal voter of
the state of Washington, my residence address is correctly stated and
is within the boundaries of Cascade county, and I have not knowingly
signed any other petition for the formation of this county.

Petitioner's
signature Print name
for positive
identification Residence address,
street, and number,
if any City
or
Town

County

(Here follow up to 20 numbered lines divided into columns as below.)

1

2

3

etc.

The complete legal description of the proposed county as ordered by
the court must be printed on the petition sheet; the description may
appear on the front side of the sheet if space permits, or on the
reverse side otherwise. A map of the proposed new county may be
printed on the front or back of the petition. Petition forms shall be
formatted so that they may be printed on letter-size paper, eight and
one-half inches in width and eleven inches in length.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 DISTRIBUTION OF PETITIONS. Within forty-five days after entry of the order required in section 8 of this act,
the secretary of state shall mail a copy of the petition form to each
and every registered voter household in Cascade county. The secretary
of state shall also cause an electronic copy of the petition to be
posted on his or her internet web site in a form which cannot be easily
modified by a person of ordinary skill, so that voters desiring to
print and circulate copies of the petition may easily obtain the same
by downloading and printing the petition forms. Both the mailed and
electronic versions of the petition form shall be accompanied by a
brochure, to be developed by the secretary of state in a manner similar
to general election voter guide statements for initiatives, indicating
the purpose and effect of the petition, providing information regarding
the boundaries of Cascade county and the apportionment debts,
liabilities, and assets, and providing instructions for the
circulation, signing, and submission of the petition. The brochure
shall also indicate that individual petition forms, or any number of
petition forms, may be returned directly to the secretary of state by
mail or personal delivery without being collected and bound with all
other petition forms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 SUBMISSION OF PETITIONS. Petitions for the
formation of a new county may be submitted to the secretary of state at
any time up to two years after entry of the order of the court required
in section 8 of this act. Signed petition forms may be individually or
collectively delivered or mailed without requiring that they be bound
and presented in a single submittal. A variation between the signature
on the petition and that on the registration record due to the
substitution of initials or the use of common nicknames is permitted so
long as the surname and handwriting are clearly the same. During the
two-year period of signature collection, the secretary of state shall
total the number of valid signatures received during each calendar
month and publish the monthly and cumulative total of valid signatures
received on his or her internet web site, along with the total number
of valid signatures needed for certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 CERTIFICATION OF PETITIONS. (1) When the
number of valid signatures received by the secretary of state reaches
or exceeds a majority of the registered voters in Cascade county, the
petition shall be deemed complete, and the secretary of state shall
certify the sufficiency thereof to the legislature. If the number of
valid signatures received by the secretary of state prior to the
expiration of the two-year petitioning period is less than a majority
of the number of registered voters in Cascade county, and any appeal of
such insufficiency under subsection (2) of this section fails, the
petition fails and this act shall be null and void and Cascade county
shall not be created.
(2) Any proponent or opponent of the new county, dissatisfied with
the determination of the secretary of state under this section, may
appeal that determination to the superior court of Thurston county.
The review by the superior court will proceed in the same manner as for
initiatives under RCW 29A.72.240.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 PENALTIES FOR FALSE SIGNING OF PETITIONS.
(1) Every person who signs a petition requesting the creation of
Cascade county with any other than his or her true name is guilty of a
class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2) Every person who: (a) Knowingly signs more than one petition
for the creation of Cascade county; (b) signs a petition requesting the
creation of Cascade county knowing that he or she is not a legal voter;
or (c) makes a false statement as to his or her residence on any
petition requesting the creation of Cascade county, is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 CREATION OF CASCADE COUNTY. Upon
certification of the secretary of state of the sufficiency of the
petition as required in section 12 of this act, Cascade county is
established, with an interim organization period commencing on January
1st of the second year after the certification of the petition. The
interim period expires on December 31st of the year in which it starts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 COUNTY OFFICERS; ELECTION OF INTERIM
OFFICERS. Cascade county shall have the elected county officers
enumerated in RCW 36.16.030. Elections for interim officers of Cascade
county shall be held during the year prior to the interim period.
(1) A primary must be held under RCW 29A.04.311 for the
qualification of candidates for the various Cascade county elected
offices, and elections for those offices must be held in conjunction
with the state general election in the year prior to the interim
period. Except as provided in this section, primaries and elections
must be held as provided by the general election laws for partisan
county offices.
(2) Declarations of candidacy for the initial terms of office for
the elected county offices in Cascade county must be filed with the
county auditor of King county.
(3) Candidates for the office of Cascade county commissioner shall
file for one of three separate county commissioner positions. The
filing officer shall designate one position for each district, and the
voters in each district shall qualify the candidates for county
commissioner for that district.
(4) If King county does not provide a local voters' pamphlet for
the primary or the general election under RCW 29A.32.210 through
29A.32.280, the secretary of state shall provide a pamphlet for the
jurisdiction of Cascade county only.
(5) The King county auditor shall conduct and canvass the election
and certify the results to the secretary of state, who shall canvass
and certify the results of the primary and the election.
(6) Cascade county shall, after the expiration of the interim
period, reimburse King county for its share of the primary and election
costs under RCW 29A.04.410.
(7) The newly elected Cascade county officials shall assume office
immediately upon the certification of the election with limited powers
during the interim period as provided in this chapter and full powers
after the expiration of the interim period.
(8) The newly elected Cascade county officials shall each be paid
an annual salary in the amount of eighty thousand dollars until the
Cascade county board of commissioners adopts a schedule of salaries in
accordance with RCW 36.17.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 TERMS OF OFFICE. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, the terms of office for all of the
initial county officials are from the date of the certification of
their election until their successors are elected and qualified at the
next general election that is one year before the year in which the
governor is elected.
(2) No regular or unexpired term elections may be held during the
interim period. Vacancies in elected county offices will be filled by
appointment.
(3) After the expiration of the first set of unexpired terms, the
terms of all officers will be four years and until their successors are
elected and qualified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 SELECTION OF COUNTY SEAT. The interim seat
for Cascade county shall be the city of Kent, with county offices at or
near the existing King county regional justice center. The seat of
Cascade county shall be selected in accordance with this section,
notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 36.12 RCW.
(1) No later than the last day of April in the interim period, the
Cascade county board of commissioners, in consultation with the other
elected county officers, shall adopt provisional requirements for
physical facilities for the county government, and provide copies of
the same to each city within the county.
(2) No later than the last day of July in the interim period, the
legislative authorities of cities in Cascade county desiring to be
considered as the seat of Cascade county shall adopt by majority vote
a resolution petitioning the Cascade county board of commissioners for
such consideration, proposing where the county offices could be located
and how the requirements adopted by the county commission could be met,
and setting forth such other information as may be of value to the
people of Cascade county in making an informed choice for the location
of the county seat.
(3) The board of commissioners shall cause the question of the
location of the county seat to be referred to the voters of Cascade
county at the general election during the interim period. The ballot
shall allow the voter to select from among the cities that petitioned
for consideration under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The city receiving the greatest number of votes shall become
the seat of Cascade county on January 1st of the year following the
interim period. Interim county offices shall be relocated to the
county seat as soon as practical consistent with lease obligations for
interim offices and availability of offices in the new seat.
(5) Following selection of the county seat in accordance with this
section, future removal of the county seat to other locations shall be
effected according to chapter 36.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 RELATED LEGISLATION. During the regular
legislative session during the interim period, the legislature shall:
(1) Amend chapter 36.04 RCW and such other titles and chapters as
necessary to reflect the establishment of Cascade county consistent
with the boundaries established by the court in section 8 of this act;
(2) Amend chapters 2.08 and 3.34 RCW, and such other titles and
chapters as necessary to provide for a superior court and district
courts for Cascade county, so that Cascade county is assigned a number
of judges in the same proportion as the population of Cascade county to
the population of King county before the creation of Cascade county;
(3) Amend such other laws as shall be necessary and proper to fully
implement the establishment of Cascade county consistent with this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 AFFECT ON OTHER DISTRICTS. Except as
provided in this section, the creation of Cascade county shall not
affect the boundaries of a city, town, or special district of any kind.
(1) Unless the initial board of county commissioners provides
otherwise, a single road district must exist in Cascade county composed
of all the unincorporated area within the county. Territory that is
stricken from King county to create Cascade county shall also be
stricken from the road district of King county effective as of the
final day of the interim period.
(2) An area in Cascade county that was included in a county rural
library district must remain part of that county rural library
district. The trustees of such a library district must be appointed by
joint action of the members of the county legislative authorities of
King county and Cascade county, with the vote on each appointment
distributed among the members of the county legislative authorities so
that the combined total vote of all the members of a single county
legislative authority is in direct proportion to the percentage of
population within the library district residing in that county and each
member of that county legislative authority receiving an equal portion
of that vote.
(3) Effective on the first day after the interim period for the
creation of Cascade county, a public transportation benefit area that
includes territory located in both the remaining area of King county
and Cascade county will have its boundaries reduced to eliminate any
territory located in Cascade county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 COURT JURISDICTION. The superior court and
district court for Cascade county shall obtain jurisdiction over all
new matters filed on or after the interim period expires, over which
those courts otherwise have jurisdiction under the state Constitution
and state law. The superior court and district court of King county
shall retain jurisdiction of any matters pending before them or on
appeal from them on December 31st at the close of the interim period
unless all parties to the matter stipulate to a change of venue to the
superior or district court of Cascade county.
All pleadings, process, documents, and files in the office of the
county clerk and in the offices of officers of the superior or district
court of King county pertaining to actions and proceedings transferred
to the superior or district court of Cascade county must be certified
and transferred to the county clerk or to officers of the superior or
district court of Cascade county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 TRANSFER OF RECORDS. Within ten months of
the beginning of the interim period for Cascade county, all records,
documents, and papers in the offices of county auditor, county
assessor, county treasurer, and other county officers of King county,
affecting the title or possession of real property in Cascade county,
assessed valuation of property located in Cascade county, registration
of voters residing in Cascade county, or other appropriate matters,
must be certified by the appropriate King county official and must be
transferred to the appropriate county officials and officers of Cascade
county. If original records, documents, or papers are not transferred,
certified copies must be provided. The appropriate county officials of
King county and Cascade county may agree to these transfers through
electronic, mechanical, or other methods that adequately ensure the
accuracy of the transferred information. Cascade county shall pay all
costs incurred with regard to the transfer of records, documents, and
papers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 POWERS DURING INTERIM PERIOD. During the
interim period for Cascade county, the initial county officials have
the following powers:
(1) The initial board of county commissioners may adopt ordinances
and adopt resolutions necessary to implement the general powers
provided by this section. The initial board of county commissioners
may also adopt ordinances on any matter within the authority of a
noncharter county. The ordinances become effective on the expiration
of the interim period.
(2) The initial county officials, subject to state law governing
counties in general, may purchase or lease land, buildings, equipment,
and supplies; contract for services; and employ staff as necessary to
implement the powers provided by this section and to assure the
establishment of the necessary infrastructure and staffing for the full
operation of county government on the expiration of the interim period.
(3) The initial Cascade county officials may enter interlocal
agreements with King county to facilitate the establishment of Cascade
county government and for services to be rendered following the interim
period.
(4) The initial board of county commissioners may:
(a) Cause tax anticipation or revenue anticipation notes or
warrants or other short-term obligations to be issued as provided in
chapter 39.50 RCW;
(b) Authorize the borrowing of money from state or federal agencies
to the same extent as is authorized for a nonhome-rule county;
(c) Submit ballot propositions to the voters of Cascade county
authorizing a single-year excess levy to be imposed, as provided by RCW
84.52.052;
(d) Submit ballot propositions to the voters of Cascade county
authorizing both voter-approved general indebtedness and bond
retirement excess levies, as provided by RCW 84.52.056 and 39.36.050;
(e) Impose property taxes as authorized for counties, to be
collected after the interim period; and
(f) Impose excise taxes as authorized for counties effective on
January 1st after the interim period, including, but not limited to,
sales and use taxes authorized in chapter 82.14 RCW and real estate
excise taxes authorized in chapter 82.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 AUTHORITY AND OBLIGATIONS DURING INTERIM
PERIOD. The initial county officers of Cascade county during the
interim period are subject to all state laws limiting the authority of
or imposing obligations on such offices as if Cascade county were fully
established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 APPLICABILITY OF KING COUNTY ORDINANCES
DURING INTERIM PERIOD. All ordinances, rules, and regulations of King
county that are in effect at the beginning of the interim period and
that are adopted by King county during the interim period have their
full force and effect within the portion of King county that is
stricken to form Cascade county until the end of the interim period,
unless repealed by King county before that date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 PROVISION OF SERVICES DURING INTERIM
PERIOD. During the interim period, King county remains responsible for
providing all county services previously provided by it in the portion
of King county that is stricken to form Cascade county at the current
level of service, unless otherwise agreed to between King county and
the initial officers of Cascade county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 BUDGET DURING INTERIM PERIOD. (1) The
budget for the interim period for Cascade county must be adopted as
provided in this section. The budget for the first budget cycle of
Cascade county after the interim period must be adopted as provided in
chapter 36.40 RCW.
(2) The initial board of county commissioners shall adopt a budget
for the interim period and make any subsequent amendments in
consultation with the state auditor and the department of community,
trade, and economic development. The department of community, trade,
and economic development shall provide to the initial officers of
Cascade county, at the earliest date feasible after the certification
of the petition authorizing formation of Cascade county, a report
detailing the potential revenues and expenses of the new county. The
interim period budget may initially authorize expenditure of moneys by
general category without specific detail. The budget may be amended
periodically during the interim period to reflect actual revenues or
expenditure requirements as they become known.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 BORROWING DURING INTERIM PERIOD. During
the interim period, the initial board of county commissioners may
borrow money from the state treasurer in amounts and on terms deemed
prudent and reasonable by the state treasurer.
Any loan obtained under this section must be repaid within three
years of the initial disbursement. The state treasurer may withhold
moneys from the funds otherwise payable to Cascade county to assure
repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 TAXATION DURING INTERIM PERIOD. King
county shall continue imposing sales and use taxes throughout its
entire boundaries until the end of the interim period. Before the end
of the interim period, King county will continue receiving federal and
state moneys allocated to it as if Cascade county did not exist. State
moneys must be allocated to Cascade county on whatever basis these
moneys are distributed commencing on the first day after the interim
period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 AUTHORITY TO BE LIBERALLY CONSTRUED. The
rule of strict construction does not apply to this chapter. The
authority granted to the initial county commissioners of Cascade county
must be liberally interpreted to provide for a transition to Cascade
county during the interim period so that, to the greatest extent
possible, Cascade county will be able to fully function as a complete
county government at the end of the interim period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 ALLOCATION OF TRANSPORTATION FUNDS.
Beginning on January 1st following the interim period for Cascade
county, the department of transportation shall adjust the allocations
of transportation moneys made to counties to include Cascade county on
the same bases as apply to previously existing counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 INITIAL REDISTRICTING. The provisions of
RCW 36.32.020 notwithstanding, the Cascade county board of
commissioners shall have power to change the lines of the county
commission districts once within the first four years of existence of
the new county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 CREATION OF THE CITY AND COUNTY OF SEATTLE.
If Cascade county is created, the legislature encourages the residents
remaining in King county and the city of Seattle to seek, according to
the provisions of Article XI, section 16 of the state Constitution, to
form a combined city-county government, which may be known as the city
and county of Seattle, and to commence such action immediately upon the
completion of the interim period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this chapter
are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 EFFECTIVE DATE. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 CODIFICATION. Sections 1 through 35 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

--- END ---