BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected as provided
by this chapter, an additional tax upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes in an amount equal
to the rate of fifty-three and seventy-five one-hundredths mills per
cigarette.
(2) The money collected under this section during any month shall
be deposited by the twenty-fifth day of the following month as follows:
(a) 83.26 percent into the health services account created in RCW
43.72.900; and
(b) The remainder into the youth tobacco prevention account created
in RCW 70.155.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2005.

--- END ---