BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.172 and 1995 c 347 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In designating and protecting critical areas under this
chapter, counties and cities shall include the best available science
in developing policies and development regulations to protect the
functions and values of critical areas. In addition, counties and
cities shall give special consideration to conservation or protection
measures necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous fisheries.
(2) In fulfilling some or all of the requirements of this section
and RCW 36.70A.060, a city or county may adopt example critical areas
policies or regulations prepared by the department of community, trade,
and economic development, the department of fish and wildlife, or the
department of ecology, or their successor state agencies, that comply
with the requirements of this section.
(a) The example policies or regulations must comply with this
section and RCW 36.70A.020 (8) through (11) and 36.70A.060.
(b) In preparing and approving the example policies or regulations,
the state agency shall broadly involve the public and interested groups
and organizations. The public involvement must be equivalent to that
required by RCW 36.70A.020(11), 36.70A.035, 36.70A.130, and 36.70A.140.
Opportunities for public involvement must be provided for state
agencies with expertise, federal agencies with expertise, and Indian
tribes and nations.
(c) The proposed example policies or regulations must be peer
reviewed by scientists and other professionals with expertise in the
fields covered by the policies or regulations. Some of the scientists
or professionals conducting the peer review may not be employees of the
department proposing the example policies or regulations. The results
of the peer review must be summarized in writing and be distributed
through the state agency's web site.
(d) After the state agency gives final approval to the example
policies or regulations, the state agency shall publish a notice of
adoption in the state register and on the state agency's web site. The
notice must include the date the example policy or regulation was given
final approval by the state agency, how to obtain a copy, and the date
of publication, and may include other information as the agency decides
to include. A copy of this notice must be mailed to any person or
organization who requested a copy of the notice within five days of the
publication of the notice in the state register. With the approval of
the person or agency who requested a copy, the notice may be delivered
by electronic mail.
(e) Example policies or regulations that otherwise comply with this
section but were given final approval before the effective date of this
section, may be reapproved by the state agency and the notice required
in (d) of this subsection given. Alternatively, the state agency may
readopt the example policies or regulations following the full
requirements of this subsection (2).
(f) At least once every seven years, the state agency that gave
final approval to example policies or regulations shall review and, if
necessary to incorporate best available science that became available
after it prepared the example policies or requirements or to otherwise
comply with this section, update them. If the state agency decides to
update the example policies or regulations, it shall comply with this
subsection (2) including giving the notice required by (d) of this
subsection. The state agency shall publish a notice of its decision
not to update the example policies or regulations in the state register
and on the agency web site. The notice must include the date the
example policy or regulation was given final approval by the state
agency, how to obtain a copy, and the date of publication, and may
include other information as the agency decides to include. A copy of
this notice must be mailed to any person or organization who requested
a copy of the notice when the policy or regulation was last adopted
within five days of the publication of the notice in the state
register. With the approval of the person or agency who requested a
copy, the notice may be delivered by electronic mail.
(g) A policy or regulation is not considered best available science
solely because it is included in a policy or regulation adopted under
this subsection (2).
(3) If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts
is necessary or will be of substantial assistance in reaching its
decision, a growth management hearings board may retain scientific or
other expert advice to assist in reviewing a petition under RCW
36.70A.290 that involves critical areas.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.280 and 2003 c 332 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A growth management hearings board shall hear and determine
only those petitions alleging either:
(a) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, that a
state agency, county, or city planning under this chapter is not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as
it relates to the adoption of shoreline master programs or amendments
thereto, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to plans, development
regulations, or amendments, adopted under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter
90.58 RCW; ((or))
(b) That the twenty-year growth management planning population
projections adopted by the office of financial management pursuant to
RCW 43.62.035 should be adjusted; or
(c) That an example policy or regulation given final approval by a
state agency under RCW 36.70A.172(2) complies with RCW 36.70A.172(2) or
chapter 43.21C RCW. Any appeal under this subsection (1)(c) must be
filed with the growth management hearings board that has jurisdiction
over Thurston county.
(2) A petition may be filed only by: (a) The state, or a county or
city that plans under this chapter; (b) a person who has participated
orally or in writing before the county or city regarding the matter on
which a review is being requested; (c) a person who is certified by the
governor within sixty days of filing the request with the board; or (d)
a person qualified pursuant to RCW 34.05.530.
(3) For purposes of this section "person" means any individual,
partnership, corporation, association, state agency, governmental
subdivision or unit thereof, or public or private organization or
entity of any character.
(4) To establish participation standing under subsection (2)(b) of
this section, a person must show that his or her participation before
the county or city was reasonably related to the person's issue as
presented to the board.
(5) When considering a possible adjustment to a growth management
planning population projection prepared by the office of financial
management, a board shall consider the implications of any such
adjustment to the population forecast for the entire state.
The rationale for any adjustment that is adopted by a board must be
documented and filed with the office of financial management within ten
working days after adoption.
If adjusted by a board, a county growth management planning
population projection shall only be used for the planning purposes set
forth in this chapter and shall be known as a "board adjusted
population projection". None of these changes shall affect the
official state and county population forecasts prepared by the office
of financial management, which shall continue to be used for state
budget and planning purposes.
(6) If adopted more than ninety days after the state agency gives
notice as required by RCW 36.70A.172(2) and no appeals are filed or
after a growth management hearings board, either originally or on
remand from the highest court to which it is appealed, decides the
example policy or regulation complies with RCW 36.70A.172(2) and
chapter 43.21C RCW, whichever date is later, then the adoption by a
city or county of an example policy or regulation given final approval
by a state agency under RCW 36.70A.172(2) may only be appealed to
determine compliance by the city or county with RCW 36.70A.020(11),
36.70A.035, 36.70A.130, and 36.70A.140.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.290 and 1997 c 429 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All requests for review to a growth management hearings board
shall be initiated by filing a petition that includes a detailed
statement of issues presented for resolution by the board. The board
shall render written decisions articulating the basis for its holdings.
The board shall not issue advisory opinions on issues not presented to
the board in the statement of issues, as modified by any prehearing
order.
(2) All petitions relating to whether or not an adopted
comprehensive plan, development regulation, or permanent amendment
thereto, is in compliance with the goals and requirements of this
chapter or chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must be filed within sixty days
after publication by the legislative bodies of the county or city.
(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the date of
publication for a city shall be the date the city publishes the
ordinance, or summary of the ordinance, adopting the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto, as is required to be
published.
(b) Promptly after adoption, a county shall publish a notice that
it has adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or
amendment thereto.
Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, for purposes of this
section the date of publication for a county shall be the date the
county publishes the notice that it has adopted the comprehensive plan
or development regulations, or amendment thereto.
(c) For local governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040, promptly
after approval or disapproval of a local government's shoreline master
program or amendment thereto by the department of ecology as provided
in RCW 90.58.090, the local government shall publish a notice that the
shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been approved or
disapproved by the department of ecology. For purposes of this
section, the date of publication for the adoption or amendment of a
shoreline master program is the date the local government publishes
notice that the shoreline master program or amendment thereto has been
approved or disapproved by the department of ecology.
(3) Unless the board dismisses the petition as frivolous or finds
that the person filing the petition lacks standing, or the parties have
filed an agreement to have the case heard in superior court as provided
in RCW 36.70A.295, the board shall, within ten days of receipt of the
petition, set a time for hearing the matter.
(4) The board shall base its decision on the record developed by
the city, county, or the state and supplemented with additional
evidence if the board determines that such additional evidence would be
necessary or of substantial assistance to the board in reaching its
decision.
(5) The board, shall consolidate, when appropriate, all petitions
involving the review of the same comprehensive plan or the same
development regulation or regulations.
(6) All petitions relating to whether or not an example policy or
regulation adopted by a state agency complies with RCW 36.70A.172(2) or
chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must be filed within ninety days after
publication of the public notice required by RCW 36.70A.172(2) (d)
through (f).

--- END ---