BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.130 and 2002 c 320 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
shall be subject to ((continuing)) review and evaluation by the county
or city that adopted them. Except as otherwise provided, a county or
city shall take legislative action to review and, if needed, revise its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure the
plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter
according to the time periods specified in subsection (4) of this
section.
(b) Except as otherwise provided, a county or city not planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if needed, revise
its policies and development regulations regarding critical areas and
natural resource lands adopted according to this chapter to ensure
these policies and regulations comply with the requirements of this
chapter according to the time periods specified in subsection (4) of
this section. Legislative action means the adoption of a resolution or
ordinance following notice and a public hearing indicating at a
minimum, a finding that a review and evaluation has occurred and
identifying the revisions made, or that a revision was not needed and
the reasons therefore. The review and evaluation required by this
subsection may be combined with the review required by subsection (3)
of this section.
(c) The review and evaluation required by this subsection shall
include, but is not limited to, consideration of critical area
ordinances and, if planning under RCW 36.70A.040, an analysis of the
population allocated to a city or county from the most recent ten-year
population forecast by the office of financial management.
(((b))) (d) Any amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land
use plan shall conform to this chapter. Any amendment of or revision
to development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan.
(2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate
to the public a public participation program consistent with RCW
36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140 that identifies procedures and schedules
whereby updates, proposed amendments, or revisions of the comprehensive
plan are considered by the governing body of the county or city no more
frequently than once every year. "Updates" means to review and revise,
if needed, according to subsection (1) of this section, and the time
periods specified in subsection (4) of this section or in accordance
with the provisions of subsection (5) of this section. Amendments may
be considered more frequently than once per year under the following
circumstances:
(i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan that does not modify the
comprehensive plan policies and designations applicable to the subarea;
(ii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under
the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW; and
(iii) The amendment of the capital facilities element of a
comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the adoption or
amendment of a county or city budget.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all
proposals shall be considered by the governing body concurrently so the
cumulative effect of the various proposals can be ascertained.
However, after appropriate public participation a county or city may
adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform
with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board
or with the court.
(3)(a) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW
36.70A.110 shall review, at least every ten years, its designated urban
growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the
incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In
conjunction with this review by the county, each city located within an
urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within its
boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within
the county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions
of the urban growth areas.
(b) The county comprehensive plan designating urban growth areas,
and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by the
comprehensive plans of the county and each city located within the
urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth
projected to occur in the county for the succeeding twenty-year period.
(c) The review required by this subsection may be combined with the
review and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.
(4) The department shall establish a schedule for counties and
cities to take action to review and, if needed, revise their
comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and
regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter. Except as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, the schedule established by
the department shall provide for the reviews and evaluations to be
completed as follows:
(a) On or before December 1, 2004, and every ((seven)) ten years
thereafter, for Clallam, Clark, Jefferson, King, Kitsap, Pierce,
Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those
counties;
(b) On or before December 1, 2005, and every ((seven)) ten years
thereafter, for Cowlitz, Island, Lewis, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and
Skamania counties and the cities within those counties;
(c) On or before December 1, 2006, and every ((seven)) ten years
thereafter, for Benton, Chelan, Douglas, Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and
Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and
(d) On or before December 1, 2007, and every ((seven)) ten years
thereafter, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield,
Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille,
Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the cities
within those counties.
(5)(a) A county or city not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may defer
its review and revision requirements pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section if the county or city is in compliance with the provisions of
this chapter regarding critical areas and natural resource lands on the
earliest applicable date specified in subsection (4) of this section.
(b) A county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may defer its review and
revision requirements pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if:
(i) The county has a population of fewer than seventy-five thousand
two years before the applicable date specified in subsection (4) of
this section;
(ii) The population of the county has increased by seventeen
percent or fewer during the ten-year period concluding two years before
the applicable date provided in subsection (4) of this section; and
(iii) The county is in compliance with the provisions of this
chapter regarding critical areas and natural resource lands on the
earliest applicable date specified in subsection (4) of this section.
(c) A city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 within a county that is
not subject to the provisions of RCW 36.70A.215 may defer its review
and revision requirements pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
if:
(i) The city has fewer than five thousand people two years before
the applicable date specified in subsection (4) of this section;
(ii) The population of the city has increased by seventeen percent
or fewer during the ten-year period concluding two years before the
applicable date specified in subsection (4) of this section;
(iii) The urban growth area established under RCW 36.70A.110 within
which the city is located has not been enlarged since its adoption or
the last update required by this chapter; and
(iv) The city is in compliance with the provisions of this chapter
regarding critical areas and natural resource lands on the earliest
applicable date specified in subsection (4) of this section.
(d) A city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 within a county that is
subject to the provisions of RCW 36.70A.215 may defer its review and
revision requirements pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if:
(i) The city has fewer than fifteen hundred people two years before
the applicable date specified in subsection (4) of this section;
(ii) The population of the city has increased by seventeen percent
or fewer during the ten-year period concluding two years before the
applicable date specified in subsection (4) of this section;
(iii) The urban growth area established under RCW 36.70A.110 within
which the city is located has not been enlarged since its adoption or
the last update required by this chapter; and
(iv) The city is in compliance with the provisions of this chapter
regarding critical areas and natural resource lands on the earliest
applicable date specified in subsection (4) of this section.
(e)(i) As used in this section, "defer" or "deferral" means the
jurisdiction may satisfy the review and revision requirements pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section twenty years after the applicable
dates specified in subsection (4) of this section. An option to defer
may not be invoked consecutively.
(ii) Counties and cities that are not in compliance with the
provisions of this chapter or chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW as provided
by RCW 36.70A.300(3)(b) or 36.70A.330 are not eligible for a deferral
under this subsection (5).
(iii) Counties and cities eligible for a deferral as provided by
this subsection (5), unless providing written notice of the contrary to
the department, are presumed to be invoking the option to defer. These
counties and cities, however, must notify the department of their
deferral intentions on or before the earliest applicable date specified
in subsection (4) of this section.
(iv) The department shall keep and maintain a file of jurisdictions
meeting the deferral criteria provided in this subsection (5).
(f) Population determinations under this subsection (5) shall be
made using population determinations produced by the office of
financial management as required by chapter 43.62 RCW.
(6)(a) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from
conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before
the time limits established in subsection (4) of this section.
Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be eligible
for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.
(b) State agencies are encouraged to provide technical assistance
to the counties and cities in the review of critical area ordinances,
comprehensive plans, and development regulations.
(((6))) (c)(i) The department shall, in coordination with the
department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife, compile
sample policies and regulations that provide guidance to cities
invoking the option to defer under subsection (5) of this section. The
policies and regulations shall provide guidance to these cities
pertaining to compliance with the provisions of this chapter regarding
critical areas and natural resource lands.
(ii) The policies and regulations shall be distributed by the
department to requesting cities by September 1, 2005, and, as
appropriate, each subsequent year.
(iii) Cities adhering to the provisions of these policies and
regulations may request defense assistance from the applicable
department or departments when a substantive challenge to a
comprehensive plan or development regulation adopted in accordance with
the provisions of these policies and regulations is filed pursuant to
RCW 36.70A.280. The applicable department or departments shall honor
these defense assistance requests.
(7) A county or city subject to the time periods in subsection
(4)(a) of this section that, pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the
county or city establishing a schedule for periodic review of its
comprehensive plan and development regulations, has conducted a review
and evaluation of its comprehensive plan and development regulations
and, on or after January 1, 2001, has taken action in response to that
review and evaluation shall be deemed to have conducted the first
review required by subsection (4)(a) of this section. Subsequent
review and evaluation by the county or city of its comprehensive plan
and development regulations shall be conducted in accordance with the
time periods established under subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(((7))) (8)(a) The requirements imposed on counties and cities
under this section shall be considered "requirements of this chapter"
under the terms of RCW 36.70A.040(1).
(b) Only those counties and cities in compliance with the schedules
in this section shall have the requisite authority to receive grants,
loans, pledges, or financial guarantees from those accounts established
in RCW 43.155.050 and 70.146.030.
(c) Counties and cities that received grants, loans, pledges, or
financial guarantees from the department to complete the requirements
imposed under this section and that invoke the option to defer under
subsection (5) of this section must refund grants, loans, pledges, or
financial guarantees to the department provided for responsibilities
that are being deferred. All refunds from a deferring county or city
must be returned to the department before the earliest applicable date
specified in subsection (4) of this section.
(d) Only those counties and cities in compliance with the schedules
in this section shall receive preference for grants or loans subject to
the provisions of RCW 43.17.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---