BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Hood Canal is
a precious aquatic resource of our state. The legislature finds that
Hood Canal is a rich source of recreation, fishing, aquaculture, and
aesthetic enjoyment for the citizens of this state. The legislature
also finds that Hood Canal has great cultural significance for the
tribes in the Hood Canal area. The legislature therefore recognizes
Hood Canal's substantial environmental, cultural, economic,
recreational, and aesthetic importance in this state.
(2) The legislature finds that Hood Canal is a marine water of the
state at significant risk. The legislature finds that Hood Canal has
a "dead zone" related to low-dissolved oxygen concentrations, a
condition that has recurred for many years. The legislature also finds
that this problem and various contributors to the problem were
documented in the May 2004 Preliminary Assessment and Corrective Action
Plan published by the state Puget Sound action team and the Hood Canal
coordinating council.
(3) The legislature further finds that significant research,
monitoring, and study efforts are currently occurring regarding Hood
Canal's low-dissolved oxygen concentrations. The legislature also
finds numerous public, private, and community organizations are working
to provide public education and identify potential solutions. The
legislature recognizes that, while some information and research is now
available and some potential solutions have been identified, more
research and analysis is needed to fully develop a program to resolve
Hood Canal's low-dissolved oxygen concentrations.
(4) The legislature finds a need exists for the state to take
action to address Hood Canal's low-dissolved oxygen concentrations.
The legislature also finds establishing an aquatic rehabilitation zone
for Hood Canal will serve as a statutory framework for future
regulations and programs directed at recovery of this important aquatic
resource.
(5) The legislature therefore intends to establish an aquatic
rehabilitation zone for Hood Canal as the framework to address Hood
Canal's low-dissolved oxygen concentrations. The legislature also
intends to incorporate provisions in the new statutory chapter creating
the designation as solutions are identified regarding this problem.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Aquatic rehabilitation zones may be
designated by the legislature for areas whose surrounding marine water
bodies pose serious environmental or public health concerns.
(2) Aquatic rehabilitation zone one is established. Aquatic
rehabilitation zone one includes all watersheds that drain to Hood
Canal south of a line projected from Tala Point in Jefferson county to
Foulweather Bluff in Kitsap county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This chapter does not apply to forest
practices regulated under chapter 76.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This chapter does not alter, diminish, or
expand the jurisdictional authorities in other statutes or affect the
application of other statutory requirements or programs that do not
specifically refer to aquatic rehabilitation zones. If this chapter
conflicts with other statutory provisions, however, this chapter
governs aquatic rehabilitation zones.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---