BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a need
for clear, consistent regulations and delineation of roles among
agencies responsible for the routine disposal of animal carcasses. The
legislature finds that conflicting and overlapping regulations as well
as gaps between local, state, and federal authorities can create
confusion and frustration for the agricultural industry and the general
public. The legislature finds that the need for clarity has become
even more compelling with the introduction of new federal rules
requiring concentrated animal feeding operations to have carcass
disposal plans in place by 2006. The legislature intends that the
department of agriculture work cooperatively and immediately with
appropriate agencies at the state, federal, and local level to clarify
and make consistent the routine disposal of animal carcasses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By August 30, 2005, the department of
agriculture shall adopt emergency rules that govern all routine,
nonemergency animal carcass disposals in the state. The department
shall develop these rules in collaboration with the state departments
of health and ecology and other appropriate regulatory agencies at the
state, local, and federal levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 16.68.020 (Duty to bury carcass of
diseased animal -- Dead animal presumed diseased) and 1949 c 100 s 2 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---