BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I - OMBUDSPROGRAM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The workers' compensation ombudsprogram is created to
facilitate the early and successful resolution of industrial insurance
claims in an informal and cooperative environment which benefits the
injured worker, the employer, and the department. To carry out its
purpose, the ombudsprogram shall:
(a) Provide accurate, timely, and objective information without
charge to injured workers and employers covered under this title,
including providing counseling on workers' and employers' rights and
responsibilities and individual counseling on specific claims under
this title. At the request of an injured worker, the ombudsprogram
shall assist the injured worker in every phase of the industrial
insurance process, from claim filing to claim closure, but shall not
assist an injured worker before the board of industrial insurance
appeals or the courts. The assistance that may be offered shall
include intervention on behalf of injured workers with the department
and/or the employer. Such intervention shall include filing protest
letters, providing voluntary mediation, advising workers of rights and
entitlements under this title, and assisting the worker in every phase
of an industrial insurance claim;
(b) Work with the department to develop and implement solutions to
common, recurring problems identified in the course of providing
individual counseling under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Provide workshops and education programs for workers'
compensation practitioners, worker representatives, employers, and
other interested parties, covering issues such as proper claims filing
procedures, workers' and employers' rights and responsibilities, and
return-to-work requirements;
(d) As requested by labor or management, encourage and facilitate
labor/management cooperation that promotes higher safety awareness,
expedites return to work options, and reduces barriers between labor
and management;
(e) Support department initiatives and programs designed to
facilitate effective communication and conflict resolution for workers
and employers;
(f) Maintain a tracking system, approved by the director or
director's designee, that records the number and geographic location of
claimants served, the issues encountered, and any other data identified
by the ombudsperson;
(g) Develop and provide the director and the ombudsprogram advisory
committee with an annual plan for completing the program's activities;
(h) Make reports on the program's activities to the director and
the ombudsprogram advisory committee, as requested; and
(i) Make recommendations to the governor and director based on the
program's activities and findings that address systemic and pervasive
problems within the industrial insurance system. The department must
review and report its response to the recommendations to the governor,
legislature, ombudsprogram advisory committee, and workers'
compensation advisory committee.
(2)(a) The governor shall appoint an ombudsperson responsible for
administering the ombudsprogram from a list of at least three
nominations submitted by an organization, statewide in scope, which
through its affiliates represents a cross section and a majority of the
organized labor of this state. The person appointed as ombudsperson
shall hold office for a term of five years and shall continue to hold
office until reappointed or until his or her successor is appointed.
The governor may remove the ombudsperson only for neglect of duty,
misconduct, or inability to perform his or her duties. Any vacancy
must be filled by similar appointment for the remainder of the
unexpired term.
(b)(i) The ombudsperson may hire such staff as he or she deems
necessary to carry out the mission of the ombudsprogram, including
hiring qualified claims adjudicators, hiring or contracting for access
to legal counsel, and hiring support staff to respond to inquiries and
claim specific issues.
(ii) In any fiscal year, the level of full-time equivalent
employees authorized for the ombudsprogram must be at a level that
permits the ombudsprogram to maintain staffing levels that are, on a
per claim basis, no less than the staffing levels generally found in
the organizations that provide claims management functions for self-insurers. The director shall make determinations of the full-time
equivalent levels required by this subsection and report such
determinations to the office of financial management in department
budget submittals.
(3) The director shall appoint an ombudsprogram advisory committee
composed of members representing the following: Three members
representing the department; two members representing labor; and two
members representing business. The advisory committee must meet at
least quarterly. The advisory committee will review the program's
performance and advise the department and the program on issues that
may arise regarding the program or program performance.
(4) The department shall maintain at least two department staff
liaisons to the ombudsprogram, one a senior level claims adjudicator
and one from the self-insurance section.
(5) The ombudsprogram shall be funded equally from the medical aid
fund and the accident fund, with an assessment imposed on and collected
from self-insurers to pay their pro rata share of the program's
administrative costs.

PART II - SELF-INSURER CLAIMS ADMINISTRATION AUTHORITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A self-insurer is authorized to issue the following orders
subject to the requirements of this section:
(a) Claims allowance orders. Any order denying a claim or
regarding segregation of conditions unrelated to the industrial injury
or occupational disease may be issued only by the department;
(b) Claims closure orders as authorized in RCW 51.32.055. If the
self-insurer issues a closing order that includes an award for
permanent partial disability, the self-insurer must pay the permanent
partial disability award within fourteen days after the date on which
the order was communicated to the worker;
(c) Wage orders pursuant to RCW 51.08.178; and
(d) Orders terminating temporary total disability benefits or
denying medical treatment. A self-insurer is not authorized to
terminate temporary total disability payments or deny medical treatment
until the self-insurer issues an order complying with this section.
(2)(a) When a self-insurer issues an order under subsection (1)(a),
(c), or (d) of this section, the order must be communicated to both the
claimant and the department self-insurance section. Copies of all
documents, including any calculations, used or relied on by the self-insurer in issuing the order must be enclosed with the order. The
claimant must also receive a standardized pamphlet approved by the
department that sets forth the claimant's protest and appeals rights
under this title, with a detachable postcard addressed to the
department which may be used by the claimant to file a protest.
(b) If the claimant files a protest with the department under this
section:
(i) Within five days after the protest is filed, the department
must notify the self-insurer and, within ten days after the date on
which the notice was communicated to the self-insurer, the self-insurer
must forward a complete copy of the claimant's claim file to the
department;
(ii) The self-insurer's order must be held in abeyance. The
department shall review the order and, within forty-five days after the
date the protest was filed, enter a further determinative order as
provided for in RCW 51.52.050. However, this forty-five day limitation
on the review period may be waived by the claimant, and, if waived, the
department must enter the further determinative order within seventy-five days after the date that the protest was filed; and
(iii) If the department vacates or modifies the self-insurer's
order, the self-insurer must comply with the department's order within
ten days after the date on which the vacation or modification order was
communicated to the self-insurer. If a self-insurer files an appeal of
the department order with the board of industrial insurance appeals,
the appeal shall not act as a stay, and the self-insurer must pay all
benefits ordered by the department pending a final determination by the
board or a court. If the self-insurer prevails in its appeal, the
benefits paid may be recouped pursuant to RCW 51.32.240.
(c) If no protest or appeal to the self-insurer's order is timely
filed under this title, the order becomes final and has the same force
and effect as a department order that has become final under RCW
51.52.050.
(3)(a) If a self-insurer is assessed two or more penalties under
section 10 of this act in any individual claim under this title, the
self-insurer shall lose its right to adjudicate that claim, and the
department must promptly intervene and administer the claim.
(b) If a self-insurer is assessed a penalty for a level two
violation or, within one year, penalties for two level one violations
under section 10 of this act, the self-insurer may not issue orders
under this section for a period of twenty-four consecutive months
beginning on the date the department determines, and the department
must promptly intervene and administer the claims during that period.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.14.120 and 2001 c 152 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The self-insurer shall provide, when authorized under RCW
51.28.070, a copy of the employee's claim file at no cost within
fifteen days of receipt of a request by the employee or the employee's
representative, and shall provide the physician performing an
examination with all relevant medical records from the worker's claim
file, but only to the extent required of the department under RCW
51.36.070. If the self-insured employer determines that release of the
claim file to an unrepresented worker in whole or in part, may not be
in the worker's best interests, the employer must submit a request for
denial with an explanation along with a copy of that portion of the
claim file not previously provided within twenty days after the request
from the worker. In the case of second or subsequent requests, a
reasonable charge for copying may be made. The self-insurer shall
provide the entire contents of the claim file unless the request is for
only a particular portion of the file. Any new material added to the
claim file after the initial request shall be provided under the same
terms and conditions as the initial request.
(2) The self-insurer shall transmit notice to the department of any
protest or appeal by an employee relating to the administration of an
industrial injury or occupational disease claim under this chapter
within five working days of receipt. The date that the protest or
appeal is received by the self-insurer shall be deemed to be the date
the protest is received by the department for the purpose of RCW
51.52.050.
(3) The self-insurer shall submit a medical report with the request
for closure of a claim, if the self-insurer makes a request for claim
closure under this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.14.130 and 1993 c 122 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The self-insurer shall request allowance, or issue an order
allowing a claim, or request denial of a claim within ((sixty)) thirty
days from the date that the claim is filed. If the self-insurer fails
to act within ((sixty)) thirty days, the department shall promptly
intervene and adjudicate the claim.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.32.055 and 2004 c 65 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) One purpose of this title is to restore the injured worker as
nearly as possible to the condition of self-support as an able-bodied
worker. Benefits for permanent disability shall be determined under
the director's supervision, except as otherwise authorized in
subsection (9) or (10) of this section, only after the injured worker's
condition becomes fixed.
(2) All determinations of permanent disabilities shall be made by
the department, except as otherwise authorized in subsection (9) or
(10) of this section. Either the worker, employer, or self-insurer may
make a request or the inquiry may be initiated by the director or, as
authorized in subsection (9) or (10) of this section, by the self-insurer on the director or the self-insurer's own motion.
Determinations shall be required in every instance where permanent
disability is likely to be present. All medical reports and other
pertinent information in the possession of or under the control of the
employer or, if the self-insurer has made a request to the department,
in the possession of or under the control of the self-insurer shall be
forwarded to the director with the request.
(3) A request for determination of permanent disability shall be
examined by the department or, if authorized in subsection (9) or (10)
of this section, the self-insurer, and the department shall issue an
order in accordance with RCW 51.52.050 or, in the case of a self-insured employer, the self-insurer may: (a) Enter a written order,
communicated to the worker and the department self-insurance section in
accordance with subsection (9) or (10) of this section, as applicable;
or (b) request the department to issue an order in accordance with RCW
51.52.050.
(4) The department or, in cases authorized in subsection (9) or
(10) of this section, the self-insurer may require that the worker
present himself or herself for a special medical examination by a
physician or physicians selected by the department, and the department
or, in cases authorized in subsection (9) or (10) of this section, the
self-insurer may require that the worker present himself or herself for
a personal interview. The costs of the examination or interview,
including payment of any reasonable travel expenses, shall be paid by
the department or self-insurer, as the case may be.
(5) The director may establish a medical bureau within the
department to perform medical examinations under this section.
Physicians hired or retained for this purpose shall be grounded in
industrial medicine and in the assessment of industrial physical
impairment. Self-insurers shall bear a proportionate share of the cost
of the medical bureau in a manner to be determined by the department.
(6) Where a dispute arises from the handling of any claim before
the condition of the injured worker becomes fixed, the worker,
employer, or self-insurer may request the department to resolve the
dispute or the director may initiate an inquiry on his or her own
motion. In these cases, the department shall proceed as provided in
this section and an order shall issue in accordance with RCW 51.52.050.
(7)(a) If a claim (i) is accepted by a self-insurer after June 30,
1986, and before August 1, 1997, (ii) involves only medical treatment
and the payment of temporary disability compensation under RCW
51.32.090 or only the payment of temporary disability compensation
under RCW 51.32.090, (iii) at the time medical treatment is concluded
does not involve permanent disability, (iv) is one with respect to
which the department has not intervened under subsection (6) of this
section, and (v) the injured worker has returned to work with the self-insured employer of record, whether at the worker's previous job or at
a job that has comparable wages and benefits, the claim may be closed
by the self-insurer, subject to reporting of claims to the department
in a manner prescribed by department rules adopted under chapter 34.05
RCW.
(b) All determinations of permanent disability for claims accepted
under this subsection (7) by self-insurers shall be made by the self-insured section of the department under subsections (1) through (4) of
this section.
(c) Upon closure of a claim under (a) of this subsection, the self-insurer shall enter a written order, communicated to the worker and the
department self-insurance section, which contains the following
statement clearly set forth in bold face type: "This order constitutes
notification that your claim is being closed with medical benefits and
temporary disability compensation only as provided, and with the
condition you have returned to work with the self-insured employer. If
for any reason you disagree with the conditions or duration of your
return to work or the medical benefits or the temporary disability
compensation that has been provided, you must protest in writing to the
department of labor and industries, self-insurance section, within
sixty days of the date you received this order."
(8)(a) If a claim (i) is accepted by a self-insurer after June 30,
1990, and before August 1, 1997, (ii) involves only medical treatment,
(iii) does not involve payment of temporary disability compensation
under RCW 51.32.090, and (iv) at the time medical treatment is
concluded does not involve permanent disability, the claim may be
closed by the self-insurer, subject to reporting of claims to the
department in a manner prescribed by department rules adopted under
chapter 34.05 RCW. Upon closure of a claim, the self-insurer shall
enter a written order, communicated to the worker, which contains the
following statement clearly set forth in bold-face type: "This order
constitutes notification that your claim is being closed with medical
benefits only, as provided. If for any reason you disagree with this
closure, you must protest in writing to the Department of Labor and
Industries, Olympia, within 60 days of the date you received this
order. The department will then review your claim and enter a further
determinative order."
(b) All determinations of permanent disability for claims accepted
under this subsection (8) by self-insurers shall be made by the self-insured section of the department under subsections (1) through (4) of
this section.
(9)(a) If a claim: (i) Is accepted by a self-insurer after July
31, 1997, and before the effective date of this section; (ii)(A)
involves only medical treatment, or medical treatment and the payment
of temporary disability compensation under RCW 51.32.090, and a
determination of permanent partial disability, if applicable, has been
made by the self-insurer as authorized in this subsection; or (B)
involves only the payment of temporary disability compensation under
RCW 51.32.090 and a determination of permanent partial disability, if
applicable, has been made by the self-insurer as authorized in this
subsection; (iii) is one with respect to which the department has not
intervened under subsection (6) of this section; and (iv) concerns an
injured worker who has returned to work with the self-insured employer
of record, whether at the worker's previous job or at a job that has
comparable wages and benefits, the claim may be closed by the self-insurer, subject to reporting of claims to the department in a manner
prescribed by department rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(b) If a physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner submits a report to the self-insurer that concludes that
the worker's condition is fixed and stable and supports payment of a
permanent partial disability award, and if within fourteen days from
the date the self-insurer mailed the report to the attending or
treating physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner,
the worker's attending or treating physician or licensed advanced
registered nurse practitioner disagrees in writing that the worker's
condition is fixed and stable, the self-insurer must get a supplemental
medical opinion from a provider on the department's approved examiner's
list before closing the claim. In the alternative, the self-insurer
may forward the claim to the department, which must review the claim
and enter a final order as provided for in RCW 51.52.050.
(c) Upon closure of a claim under this subsection (9), the self-insurer shall enter a written order, communicated to the worker and the
department self-insurance section, which contains the following
statement clearly set forth in bold-face type: "This order constitutes
notification that your claim is being closed with such medical benefits
and temporary disability compensation as provided to date and with such
award for permanent partial disability, if any, as set forth below, and
with the condition that you have returned to work with the self-insured
employer. If for any reason you disagree with the conditions or
duration of your return to work or the medical benefits, temporary
disability compensation provided, or permanent partial disability that
has been awarded, you must protest in writing to the Department of
Labor and Industries, Self-Insurance Section, within sixty days of the
date you received this order. If you do not protest this order to the
department, this order will become final."
(d) All determinations of permanent partial disability for claims
accepted by self-insurers under this subsection (9) may be made by the
self-insurer or the self-insurer may request a determination by the
self-insured section of the department. All determinations shall be
made under subsections (1) through (4) of this section.
(10)(a) A claim that is accepted by a self-insurer on or after the
effective date of this section may be closed by the self-insurer,
subject to reporting of claims to the department in a manner prescribed
by department rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(b)(i) Upon closure of a claim under this subsection (10), the
self-insurer shall enter a written order, communicated to the worker
and the department self-insurance section, that contains the following
statement clearly set forth in bold-face type: "This order constitutes
notification that your claim is being closed with such medical benefits
and temporary disability compensation as provided to date and with such
award for permanent partial disability, if any, as set forth below. If
for any reason you disagree with the medical benefits or temporary
disability compensation provided, or permanent partial disability that
has been awarded, you must protest in writing to the Department of
Labor and Industries, Self-Insurance Section, within sixty days of the
date you received this order. If you do not protest this order to the
department, this order will become final."
(ii) Copies of all documents, including any calculations, used or
relied on by the self-insurer in issuing the order must be enclosed
with the order. The claimant must also receive a standardized pamphlet
approved by the department that sets forth the claimant's protest and
appeals rights under this title, with a detachable postcard addressed
to the department that may be used by the claimant to file a protest.
(c) All determinations of permanent partial disability for claims
accepted by self-insurers under this subsection (10) may be made by the
self-insurer, or the self-insurer may request a determination by the
self-insured section of the department. All determinations shall be
made under subsections (1) through (4) of this section.
(11)(a)(i) If the department receives a protest of an order issued
by a self-insurer under subsections (7) through (((9))) (10) of this
section, the self-insurer's closure order must be held in abeyance.
The department shall review the claim closure action and, within forty-five days after the date the protest was filed, enter a further
determinative order as provided for in RCW 51.52.050. However, this
forty-five day limitation on the review period may be waived by the
claimant, and, if waived, the department must enter the further
determinative order within seventy-five days after the date that the
protest was filed.
(ii) If the department vacates or modifies the self-insurer's
order, the self-insurer must comply with the department's order within
ten days after the date on which the vacation or modification order was
communicated to the self-insurer. If a self-insurer files an appeal of
the department's order with the board of industrial insurance appeals,
the appeal shall not act as a stay, and the self-insurer must pay all
benefits ordered by the department pending a final determination by the
board or a court. If the self-insurer prevails in its appeal, the
benefits paid may be recouped pursuant to RCW 51.32.240.
(b) If no protest is timely filed, the closing order issued by the
self-insurer shall become final and shall have the same force and
effect as a department order that has become final under RCW 51.52.050.
(((11))) (12) If within two years of claim closure under
subsections (7) through (((9))) (10) of this section, the department
determines that the self-insurer has made payment of benefits because
of clerical error, mistake of identity, or innocent misrepresentation
or the department discovers a violation of the conditions of claim
closure, the department may require the self-insurer to correct the
benefits paid or payable. This subsection (((11))) does not limit in
any way the application of RCW 51.32.240.
(((12))) (13) For the purposes of this section, "comparable wages
and benefits" means wages and benefits that are at least ninety-five
percent of the wages and benefits received by the worker at the time of
injury.

Sec. 6 RCW 51.32.055 and 1997 c 416 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) One purpose of this title is to restore the injured worker as
nearly as possible to the condition of self-support as an able-bodied
worker. Benefits for permanent disability shall be determined under
the director's supervision, except as otherwise authorized in
subsection (9) or (10) of this section, only after the injured worker's
condition becomes fixed.
(2) All determinations of permanent disabilities shall be made by
the department, except as otherwise authorized in subsection (9) or
(10) of this section. Either the worker, employer, or self-insurer may
make a request or the inquiry may be initiated by the director or, as
authorized in subsection (9) or (10) of this section, by the self-insurer on the director or the self-insurer's own motion.
Determinations shall be required in every instance where permanent
disability is likely to be present. All medical reports and other
pertinent information in the possession of or under the control of the
employer or, if the self-insurer has made a request to the department,
in the possession of or under the control of the self-insurer shall be
forwarded to the director with the request.
(3) A request for determination of permanent disability shall be
examined by the department or, if authorized in subsection (9) or (10)
of this section, the self-insurer, and the department shall issue an
order in accordance with RCW 51.52.050 or, in the case of a self-insured employer, the self-insurer may: (a) Enter a written order,
communicated to the worker and the department self-insurance section in
accordance with subsection (9) or (10) of this section, as applicable;
or (b) request the department to issue an order in accordance with RCW
51.52.050.
(4) The department or, in cases authorized in subsection (9) or
(10) of this section, the self-insurer may require that the worker
present himself or herself for a special medical examination by a
physician or physicians selected by the department, and the department
or, in cases authorized in subsection (9) or (10) of this section, the
self-insurer may require that the worker present himself or herself for
a personal interview. The costs of the examination or interview,
including payment of any reasonable travel expenses, shall be paid by
the department or self-insurer, as the case may be.
(5) The director may establish a medical bureau within the
department to perform medical examinations under this section.
Physicians hired or retained for this purpose shall be grounded in
industrial medicine and in the assessment of industrial physical
impairment. Self-insurers shall bear a proportionate share of the cost
of the medical bureau in a manner to be determined by the department.
(6) Where a dispute arises from the handling of any claim before
the condition of the injured worker becomes fixed, the worker,
employer, or self-insurer may request the department to resolve the
dispute or the director may initiate an inquiry on his or her own
motion. In these cases, the department shall proceed as provided in
this section and an order shall issue in accordance with RCW 51.52.050.
(7)(a) If a claim (i) is accepted by a self-insurer after June 30,
1986, and before August 1, 1997, (ii) involves only medical treatment
and the payment of temporary disability compensation under RCW
51.32.090 or only the payment of temporary disability compensation
under RCW 51.32.090, (iii) at the time medical treatment is concluded
does not involve permanent disability, (iv) is one with respect to
which the department has not intervened under subsection (6) of this
section, and (v) the injured worker has returned to work with the self-insured employer of record, whether at the worker's previous job or at
a job that has comparable wages and benefits, the claim may be closed
by the self-insurer, subject to reporting of claims to the department
in a manner prescribed by department rules adopted under chapter 34.05
RCW.
(b) All determinations of permanent disability for claims accepted
under this subsection (7) by self-insurers shall be made by the self-insured section of the department under subsections (1) through (4) of
this section.
(c) Upon closure of a claim under (a) of this subsection, the self-insurer shall enter a written order, communicated to the worker and the
department self-insurance section, which contains the following
statement clearly set forth in bold face type: "This order constitutes
notification that your claim is being closed with medical benefits and
temporary disability compensation only as provided, and with the
condition you have returned to work with the self-insured employer. If
for any reason you disagree with the conditions or duration of your
return to work or the medical benefits or the temporary disability
compensation that has been provided, you must protest in writing to the
department of labor and industries, self-insurance section, within
sixty days of the date you received this order."
(8)(a) If a claim (i) is accepted by a self-insurer after June 30,
1990, and before August 1, 1997, (ii) involves only medical treatment,
(iii) does not involve payment of temporary disability compensation
under RCW 51.32.090, and (iv) at the time medical treatment is
concluded does not involve permanent disability, the claim may be
closed by the self-insurer, subject to reporting of claims to the
department in a manner prescribed by department rules adopted under
chapter 34.05 RCW. Upon closure of a claim, the self-insurer shall
enter a written order, communicated to the worker, which contains the
following statement clearly set forth in bold-face type: "This order
constitutes notification that your claim is being closed with medical
benefits only, as provided. If for any reason you disagree with this
closure, you must protest in writing to the Department of Labor and
Industries, Olympia, within 60 days of the date you received this
order. The department will then review your claim and enter a further
determinative order."
(b) All determinations of permanent disability for claims accepted
under this subsection (8) by self-insurers shall be made by the self-insured section of the department under subsections (1) through (4) of
this section.
(9)(a) If a claim: (i) Is accepted by a self-insurer after July
31, 1997, and before the effective date of this section; (ii)(A)
involves only medical treatment, or medical treatment and the payment
of temporary disability compensation under RCW 51.32.090, and a
determination of permanent partial disability, if applicable, has been
made by the self-insurer as authorized in this subsection; or (B)
involves only the payment of temporary disability compensation under
RCW 51.32.090 and a determination of permanent partial disability, if
applicable, has been made by the self-insurer as authorized in this
subsection; (iii) is one with respect to which the department has not
intervened under subsection (6) of this section; and (iv) concerns an
injured worker who has returned to work with the self-insured employer
of record, whether at the worker's previous job or at a job that has
comparable wages and benefits, the claim may be closed by the self-insurer, subject to reporting of claims to the department in a manner
prescribed by department rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(b) If a physician submits a report to the self-insurer that
concludes that the worker's condition is fixed and stable and supports
payment of a permanent partial disability award, and if within fourteen
days from the date the self-insurer mailed the report to the attending
or treating physician, the worker's attending or treating physician
disagrees in writing that the worker's condition is fixed and stable,
the self-insurer must get a supplemental medical opinion from a
provider on the department's approved examiner's list before closing
the claim. In the alternative, the self-insurer may forward the claim
to the department, which must review the claim and enter a final order
as provided for in RCW 51.52.050.
(c) Upon closure of a claim under this subsection (9), the self-insurer shall enter a written order, communicated to the worker and the
department self-insurance section, which contains the following
statement clearly set forth in bold-face type: "This order constitutes
notification that your claim is being closed with such medical benefits
and temporary disability compensation as provided to date and with such
award for permanent partial disability, if any, as set forth below, and
with the condition that you have returned to work with the self-insured
employer. If for any reason you disagree with the conditions or
duration of your return to work or the medical benefits, temporary
disability compensation provided, or permanent partial disability that
has been awarded, you must protest in writing to the Department of
Labor and Industries, Self-Insurance Section, within sixty days of the
date you received this order. If you do not protest this order to the
department, this order will become final."
(d) All determinations of permanent partial disability for claims
accepted by self-insurers under this subsection (9) may be made by the
self-insurer or the self-insurer may request a determination by the
self-insured section of the department. All determinations shall be
made under subsections (1) through (4) of this section.
(10)(a) A claim that is accepted by a self-insurer on or after the
effective date of this section may be closed by the self-insurer,
subject to reporting of claims to the department in a manner prescribed
by department rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(b)(i) Upon closure of a claim under this subsection (10), the
self-insurer shall enter a written order, communicated to the worker
and the department self-insurance section, that contains the following
statement clearly set forth in bold-face type: "This order constitutes
notification that your claim is being closed with such medical benefits
and temporary disability compensation as provided to date and with such
award for permanent partial disability, if any, as set forth below. If
for any reason you disagree with the medical benefits or temporary
disability compensation provided, or permanent partial disability that
has been awarded, you must protest in writing to the Department of
Labor and Industries, Self-Insurance Section, within sixty days of the
date you received this order. If you do not protest this order to the
department, this order will become final."
(ii) Copies of all documents, including any calculations, used or
relied on by the self-insurer in issuing the order must be enclosed
with the order. The claimant must also receive a standardized pamphlet
approved by the department that sets forth the claimant's protest and
appeals rights under this title, with a detachable postcard addressed
to the department that may be used by the claimant to file a protest.
(c) All determinations of permanent partial disability for claims
accepted by self-insurers under this subsection (10) may be made by the
self-insurer, or the self-insurer may request a determination by the
self-insured section of the department. All determinations shall be
made under subsections (1) through (4) of this section.
(11)(a)(i) If the department receives a protest of an order issued
by a self-insurer under subsections (7) through (((9))) (10) of this
section, the self-insurer's closure order must be held in abeyance.
The department shall review the claim closure action and, within forty-five days after the date the protest was filed, enter a further
determinative order as provided for in RCW 51.52.050. However, this
forty-five day limitation on the review period may be waived by the
claimant, and, if waived, the department must enter the further
determinative order within seventy-five days after the date that the
protest was filed.
(ii) If the department vacates or modifies the self-insurer's
order, the self-insurer must comply with the department's order within
ten days after the date on which the vacation or modification order was
communicated to the self-insurer. If a self-insurer files an appeal of
the department's order with the board of industrial insurance appeals,
the appeal shall not act as a stay, and the self-insurer must pay all
benefits ordered by the department pending a final determination by the
board or a court. If the self-insurer prevails in its appeal, the
benefits paid may be recouped pursuant to RCW 51.32.240.
(b) If no protest is timely filed, the closing order issued by the
self-insurer shall become final and shall have the same force and
effect as a department order that has become final under RCW 51.52.050.
(((11))) (12) If within two years of claim closure under
subsections (7) through (((9))) (10) of this section, the department
determines that the self-insurer has made payment of benefits because
of clerical error, mistake of identity, or innocent misrepresentation
or the department discovers a violation of the conditions of claim
closure, the department may require the self-insurer to correct the
benefits paid or payable. This subsection (((11))) does not limit in
any way the application of RCW 51.32.240.
(((12))) (13) For the purposes of this section, "comparable wages
and benefits" means wages and benefits that are at least ninety-five
percent of the wages and benefits received by the worker at the time of
injury.

PART III - PENALTIES
Sec. 7 RCW 51.14.080 and 1986 c 57 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Certification of a self-insurer shall be withdrawn for the minimum
period required under RCW 51.14.020 by the director upon one or more of
the following grounds:
(1) The employer no longer meets the requirements of a self-insurer; ((or))
(2) The self-insurer's deposit is insufficient; ((or))
(3) The self-insurer intentionally or repeatedly induces employees
to fail to report injuries, induces claimants to treat injuries in the
course of employment as off-the-job injuries, persuades claimants to
accept less than the compensation due, or unreasonably makes it
necessary for claimants to resort to proceedings against the employer
to obtain compensation; ((or))
(4) The self-insurer habitually fails to comply with rules and
regulations of the director regarding reports or other requirements
necessary to carry out the purposes of this title; ((or))
(5) The self-insurer habitually engages in a practice of
arbitrarily or unreasonably refusing employment to applicants for
employment or discharging employees because of nondisabling bodily
conditions; ((or))
(6) The self-insurer fails to pay an insolvency assessment under
the procedures established pursuant to RCW 51.14.077; or
(7) The self-insurer has been assessed penalties for the following:
(a) A level three violation under section 10 of this act;
(b) Two or more level two violations under section 10 of this act
within one year;
(c) Three or more level three violations under section 10 of this
act within one year; or
(d) Violations under this title that resulted in penalties assessed
against the self-insurer of more than twenty-five thousand dollars
within one year.

Sec. 8 RCW 51.14.140 and 1993 c 122 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Failure of a self-insurer to comply with RCW 51.14.120 ((and)),
51.14.130, 51.14.130, 51.32.055 (7) through (10), 51.32.195 (as
recodified by this act), or section 2 of this act shall subject the
self-insurer to a penalty under RCW 51.48.080, which shall accrue for
the benefit of the employee. Each day of failure to comply with RCW
51.14.120, 51.32.055 (7) through (10), 51.32.195 (as recodified by this
act), or section 2 of this act is a separate violation.
(2) The director shall issue an order conforming with RCW 51.52.050
determining whether a violation has occurred under this section within
thirty days of a request by an employee.

Sec. 9 RCW 51.28.070 and 1990 c 209 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, information contained
in the claim files and records of injured workers, under the provisions
of this title, shall be deemed confidential and shall not be open to
public inspection (other than to public employees in the performance of
their official duties)((, but)).
(b) Representatives of a claimant, be it an individual or an
organization, may review a claim file or receive specific information
therefrom upon the presentation of the signed authorization of the
claimant. A claimant may review his or her claim file if the director
determines, pursuant to criteria adopted by rule, that the review is in
the claimant's interest.
(c) Employers or their duly authorized representatives may review
any files of their own injured workers in connection with any pending
claims.
(d) Physicians treating or examining workers claiming benefits
under this title, or physicians giving medical advice to the department
regarding any claim may, at the discretion of the department, inspect
the claim files and records of injured workers((, and other persons may
make such inspection, at the department's discretion, when such)).
(e) Persons who are rendering assistance to the department at any
stage of the proceedings on any matter pertaining to the administration
of this title may, in the department's discretion, inspect the claim
files and records of injured workers.
(f) The ombudsperson appointed under section 2 of this act may
inspect the claim files and records of an injured worker when rendering
assistance to the injured worker pursuant to section 2 of this act.
(2) It is a violation of this section if a self-insured employer
obtains or discloses information unrelated to the claim of its injured
worker or, in violation of department rules, discloses information in
a claim file or record of its injured worker. Such violation is
subject to a penalty as provided in section 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 51.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this title, a
self-insurer is subject to the following penalties for each day that a
violation occurs:
(a) For a level one violation, a penalty of five hundred dollars;
(b) For a level two violation, a penalty of one thousand dollars;
or
(c) For a level three violation, a penalty of five thousand
dollars.
(2)(a) The director shall issue an order determining whether there
was a violation within thirty days after the request of the claimant.
Such an order shall conform to the requirements of RCW 51.52.050.
(b) Penalties assessed under this section shall accrue for the
benefit of the claimant and shall be paid to him or her. The director
may not waive or reduce a penalty assessed under this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Level one violation" means:
(i) Failing to comply with RCW 51.14.120, 51.14.130, 51.32.055 (7)
through (10), 51.32.195 (as recodified by this act), or section 2 of
this act;
(ii) Inducing an employee to fail to report an injury or
occupational disease when the failure does not result in the claim
being denied under RCW 51.28.050 or 51.28.055; or
(iii) Obtaining or disclosing claim files or records in violation
of RCW 51.28.070.
(b) "Level two violation" means:
(i) Unreasonably or negligently failing to comply with RCW
51.14.120, 51.14.130, 51.32.055 (7) through (10), 51.32.195 (as
recodified by this act), or section 2 of this act;
(ii) Unreasonably or negligently inducing an employee to fail to
report an injury or occupational disease when the failure does not
result in the claim being denied under RCW 51.28.050 or 51.28.055;
(iii) Willfully making it unreasonably necessary for a claimant to
resort to proceedings against the employer to obtain any right,
benefit, or privilege under this title; or
(iv) Unreasonably or negligently disclosing claim files or records
in violation of RCW 51.28.070.
(c) "Level three violation" means:
(i) Willfully inducing an employee to fail to report an injury or
occupational disease when the failure results in the claim being denied
under RCW 51.28.050 or 51.28.055;
(ii) Willfully inducing a claimant to treat an injury or
occupational disease in the course of employment as an off-the-job
injury or disease; or
(iii) Willfully persuading a claimant to accept less than the
compensation due under this title.
(d) "Willful" means a conscious or deliberate false statement,
misrepresentation, omission, or concealment of a material fact with the
specific intent of preventing or reducing the award of benefits under
this title.
(4) The department must track the penalties that are assessed under
this section and report at least annually on the types and amount of
penalties to the workers' compensation advisory committee.

Sec. 11 RCW 51.48.017 and 1985 c 347 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a self-insurer unreasonably delays or refuses to pay
benefits as they become due there shall be paid by the self-insurer
upon order of the director an additional amount equal to five hundred
dollars for each day of delay or refusal or twenty-five percent of the
amount then due, whichever is greater, which shall accrue for the
benefit of the claimant and shall be paid to him or her with the
benefits which may be assessed under this title.
(2) The director shall issue an order determining whether there was
an unreasonable delay or refusal to pay benefits within thirty days
upon the request of the claimant. Such an order shall conform to the
requirements of RCW 51.52.050.
(3) The director may not waive or reduce a penalty assessed under
this section.

Sec. 12 RCW 51.48.025 and 1985 c 347 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No employer may discharge or in any manner discriminate against
any employee because such employee: (a) Has filed or communicated to
the employer an intent to file a claim for compensation; (b) makes a
complaint against a self-insured employer that could result in
subjecting the employer to penalties under this title; or (c) exercises
any rights provided under this title. However, nothing in this section
prevents an employer from taking any action against a worker for other
reasons including, but not limited to, the worker's failure to observe
health or safety standards adopted by the employer, or the frequency or
nature of the worker's job-related accidents.
(2) Any employee who believes that he or she has been discharged or
otherwise discriminated against by an employer in violation of this
section may file a complaint with the director alleging discrimination
within ninety days of the date of the alleged violation. Upon receipt
of such complaint, the director shall cause an investigation to be made
as the director deems appropriate. Within ninety days of the receipt
of a complaint filed under this section, the director shall notify the
complainant of his or her determination. If upon such investigation,
it is determined that this section has been violated, the director
shall bring an action in the superior court of the county in which the
violation is alleged to have occurred.
(3) If the director determines that this section has not been
violated, the employee may institute the action on his or her own
behalf.
(4) In any action brought under this section, the superior court
shall have jurisdiction, for cause shown, to restrain violations of
subsection (1) of this section and to order all appropriate relief
including rehiring or reinstatement of the employee with back pay.

Sec. 13 RCW 51.48.080 and 1985 c 347 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person, firm, or corporation, other than a self-insurer
under this title, who violates or fails to obey, observe, or comply
with any rule of the department ((promulgated)) adopted under
((authority of)) this title((, shall be)) is subject to a penalty
((of)) not to exceed five hundred dollars.
(2) A self-insurer who violates or fails to obey, observe, or
comply with any rule of the department adopted under this title is
subject to a penalty of five hundred dollars. This penalty applies in
addition to any other penalty imposed under this title, and the
director may not waive or reduce a penalty assessed under this
subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 51.48 RCW
to read as follows:
In an action to collect penalties assessed against a self-insurer
under this title, the court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees and
reasonable costs of litigation to the prevailing plaintiff.

PART IV - MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 15 RCW 51.44.150 and 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 59 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall impose and collect assessments each fiscal
year upon all self-insurers in the amount of the estimated costs of
administering their portion of this title during such fiscal year. The
time and manner of imposing and collecting assessments due to the
department shall be set forth in ((regulations promulgated)) rules
adopted by the director in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2)(a) In any fiscal year, the level of full-time equivalent claims
adjudication employees authorized for the department's self-insurance
section must be at a level that results in an average case load per
claims adjudicator that is no less than the average case load per
employee adjudicating claims on behalf of self-insured employers. With
respect to the department's self-insurance section employees engaged in
auditing functions, the level of full-time equivalent employees for
this position must be at a level that permits the department to
complete an audit of each self-insurer at least every three years.
(b) The director shall make determinations of the full-time
equivalent levels required by subsection (1) of this section and report
such determinations to the office of financial management in department
budget submittals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The director of labor and industries may adopt such rules as are
necessary to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 RCW 51.32.190, 51.32.195, and 51.32.200 are
each recodified as sections in chapter 51.14 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) Section 5 of this act expires June 30,
2007.
(2) Section 6 of this act takes effect June 30, 2007.

--- END ---