BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the board of
natural resources has set expectations as to how the department of
natural resources will implement the sustainable yield harvest plan
adopted in 2004 pursuant to RCW 79.10.320. These expectations include
the following:
(a) Completion of evaluations of the cumulative effects on the
harvest plan on a landscape basis;
(b) Completion of actions to address forest health issues;
(c) Aggressive implementation of scientific research and monitoring
related to the habitat conservation program, including the rapid
implementation of the long-term recovery plan for the marbled murrelet;
(d) The development of management strategies that include
consideration of additional ecosystem issues, such as water quality,
through the identification and protection of unstable slopes;
(e) Active conversion of riparian areas from predominantly hardwood
composition to a mixture of conifer and hardwood species, which is
intended to result in enhanced habitat for wildlife and fish.
(2) The department of natural resources shall submit a report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature outlining the success of
the department in meeting the expectations of the board of natural
resources outlined in this section.
(3) As part of the report required by this section, the department
of natural resources must detail any barriers to completing the
expectations of the board of natural resources that arise because of
funding inadequacies.

--- END ---