BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that discarded tires
in unauthorized dump sites pose a health and safety risk to the public.
Many of these tire piles have been in existence for a significant
amount of time and are a continuing challenge to state and local
officials responsible for cleaning up unauthorized dump sites and
preventing further accumulation of waste tires. Therefore it is the
intent of the legislature to document the extent of the problem, create
and fund an effective program to eliminate unauthorized tire piles, and
minimize potential future problems and costs.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95.510 and 1989 c 431 s 92 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied a one dollar per tire fee on the retail sale of
new replacement vehicle tires for a period of five years, beginning
((October 1, 1989)) July 1, 2005. The fee imposed in this section
shall be paid by the buyer to the seller, and each seller shall collect
from the buyer the full amount of the fee. The fee collected from the
buyer by the seller less the ten percent amount retained by the seller
as provided in RCW 70.95.535 shall be paid to the department of revenue
in accordance with RCW 82.32.045.
(2) The department of revenue shall incorporate into the agency's
regular audit cycle a reconciliation of the number of tires sold and
the amount of revenue collected by the businesses selling new
replacement vehicle tires at retail. The department of revenue shall
collect on the business excise tax return from the businesses selling
new replacement vehicle tires at retail:
(a) The number of tires sold; and
(b) The fee levied in this section.
(3) All other applicable provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW have full
force and application with respect to the fee imposed under this
section. The department of revenue shall administer this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "new replacement vehicle
tires" means tires that are newly manufactured for vehicle purposes and
does not include retreaded vehicle tires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.95 RCW
to read as follows:
The waste tire removal account is created in the state treasury.
All receipts from tire fees imposed under RCW 70.95.510 must be
deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used for the
cleanup of unauthorized waste tire piles and measures that prevent
future accumulation of unauthorized waste tire piles.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.95.530 and 1988 c 250 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Moneys in the waste tire removal account may be appropriated to the
department of ecology:
(1) To provide for funding to state and local governments for the
removal of discarded vehicle tires from unauthorized tire dump sites;
(2) To accomplish the other purposes of RCW 70.95.020(((5))) (6);
and
(3) ((To fund the study authorized in section 2, chapter 250, Laws
of 1988)) To conduct a study of existing tire cleanup sites. The
office of financial management shall oversee the study process and
approve the completed study. The completed study shall be delivered to
the house of representatives and senate transportation committees by
November 15, 2005. In conducting the study, the department shall
consult on a regular basis with interested parties. The following
identified elements at a minimum shall be included in the completed
study:
(a) Identification of existing tire cleanup sites in the state of
Washington;
(b) The estimated number of tires in each tire cleanup site;
(c) A map identifying the location of each one of the tire cleanup
sites;
(d) A photograph of each one of the tire cleanup sites;
(e) The estimated cost for cleanup of each tire site by cost
component;
(f) The estimated reimbursement of costs to be recovered from
persons or entities that created or have responsibility for the tire
cleanup site;
(g) Identification of the type of reimbursements for recovery by
each of the tire cleanup sites;
(h) The estimated time frame to begin the cleanup project and the
estimated completion date for each tire cleanup site;
(i) An assessment of local government functions relating to
unauthorized tire piles, including cleanup, enforcement, and public
health;
(j) Identification of needs in the areas in (i) of this subsection
for each one of the counties; and
(k) A statewide cleanup plan based on multiple funding options
between twenty cents and sixty cents for each new tire sold at retail
in the state starting on July 1, 2005. The plan shall include the
estimated time frame to begin each of the tire cleanup sites and the
estimated completion date for each one of the sites. In addition, the
plan must include a process to be followed in selecting entities to
perform the tire site cleanups. The 2006 legislature shall determine
the final distribution of the tire cleanup fee and the appropriations
for this statewide tire cleanup plan.
(4) In spending funds in the account under this section, the
department of ecology shall identify communities with the most severe
problems with waste tires and provide funds first to those communities
to remove accumulations of waste tires.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.95.555 and 1988 c 250 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person engaged in the business of transporting or storing waste
tires shall be licensed by the department. To obtain a license, each
applicant must:
(1) Provide assurances that the applicant is in compliance with
this chapter and the rules regarding waste tire storage and
transportation; ((and))
(2) Accept liability for and authorize the department to recover
any costs incurred in any cleanup of waste tires transported or newly
stored after the effective date of this section;
(3) Post a bond in ((the sum of ten thousand dollars)) an amount to
be determined by the department sufficient to cover the liability for
the cost of cleanup of the transported or stored waste tires, in favor
of the state of Washington. In lieu of the bond, the applicant may
submit financial assurances acceptable to the department;
(4) Be registered in the state of Washington as a business and be
in compliance with all state laws, rules, and local ordinances;
(5) Have a federal identification number and be in compliance with
all applicable federal codes and regulations; and
(6) Report annually to the department the amount of tires
transported and their disposition. Failure to report shall result in
revocation of the license.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.95.560 and 1989 c 431 s 95 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who transports or stores waste tires without a
license in violation of RCW 70.95.555 shall be guilty of a gross
misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished under RCW
9A.20.021(2).
(2) Any person who transports or stores waste tires without a
license in violation of RCW 70.95.555 is liable for the costs of
cleanup of any and all waste tires transported or stored.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 70.95 RCW
to read as follows:
No person or business, having legally transferred possession of
waste tires to a licensed transporter or storer of waste tires or to a
permitted recycler, has any further liability related to the waste
tires legally transferred.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.95.903 and 1989 c 431 s 32 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a permitted or properly
exempted recycling company or nonprofit entity from collecting and
transporting recyclable materials from a buy-back center, drop-box, or
from a commercial or industrial generator of recyclable materials, or
upon agreement with a permitted or properly exempted solid waste
collection company.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting a
commercial or industrial generator of commercial recyclable materials
from selling, conveying, or arranging for transportation of such
material to a permitted or properly exempted recycler for reuse or
reclamation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The sum of one hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006, from the waste tire removal
account to the office of financial management to reimburse the
department of ecology to complete the study in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The sum of forty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2007, from the waste tire removal account to the
department of revenue for administration of the fee established in
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---