BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Hood Canal is
a precious aquatic resource of our state. The legislature finds that
Hood Canal is a rich source of recreation, fishing, aquaculture, and
aesthetic enjoyment for the citizens of this state. The legislature
also finds that Hood Canal has great cultural significance for the
tribes in the Hood Canal area. The legislature therefore recognizes
Hood Canal's substantial environmental, cultural, economic,
recreational, and aesthetic importance to Washington.
(2) The legislature finds that Hood Canal is a marine water of the
state at significant risk. The legislature finds that Hood Canal has
a "dead zone" related to low-dissolved oxygen concentrations, a
condition that has recurred for many years. The legislature also finds
this problem and various contributors to the problem were documented in
the May 2004 Preliminary Assessment and Corrective Action Plan
published by the state Puget Sound action team and the Hood Canal
coordinating council. The legislature recognizes this report
identifies on-site sewage systems as a prime contributor of nitrogen,
a nutrient linked to the low-dissolved oxygen concentrations in Hood
Canal.
(3) The legislature recognizes the state's growth management act
specifies in RCW 36.70A.110(4) that generally it is not appropriate to
extend or expand urban governmental services, such as sewer systems,
into rural areas. The legislature also recognizes that RCW
36.70A.110(4) contains an exception to this general rule in those
limited circumstances shown to be necessary to protect basic public
health and safety and the environment when the facilities are
financially supportable at rural densities and do not permit urban
development.
(4) The legislature recognizes the Washington supreme court in
Thurston County v. The Cooper Point Association, 148 Wn.2d 1 (2002),
approved a restrictive interpretation of the term "necessary" in the
RCW 36.70A.110(4) exception to accomplish the legislature's intent in
enacting these and other growth management act provisions. The court
in the Cooper Point case also noted the existing sewage treatment plant
and septic systems at issue in that case were not experiencing waste
discharge problems that threaten public health and the environment.
The legislature recognizes and affirms the RCW 36.70A.110(4) exception
specifying that extension or expansion of urban governmental services,
such as sewer systems, must be shown necessary to protect public health
and the environment.
(5) The legislature intends to provide for an assessment of the
efficacy of nitrogen reduction capabilities in existing and alternative
on-site sewage treatment systems and an inventory of existing on-site
sewage treatment systems in the Hood Canal vicinity to support
development of sewage treatment solutions for this area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Puget Sound action team shall assess
the effectiveness of nitrogen treatment provided by currently approved
and alternative on-site sewage treatment technologies. The Puget Sound
action team may consult with other federal, state, tribal, and local
agencies in conducting this assessment. The Puget Sound action team
shall submit a report documenting the findings of this assessment to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005.
(2) The Puget Sound action team, in consultation with local and
state health agencies, shall conduct an inventory of on-site sewage
systems operating in the Hood Canal watershed. The Puget Sound action
team shall submit the inventory to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---