BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.96 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies to misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor
domestic violence offenses as identified in RCW 10.99.020.
(2)(a) In addition to any vacation of records of conviction under
RCW 9.96.060, a person may apply to the sentencing court under this
section for a vacation of his or her records of convictions for one or
more misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offenses as identified in RCW
10.99.020.
(b) If the court finds the applicant meets the criteria prescribed
in subsection (3) of this section, the court may in its discretion
vacate the applicant's records of convictions by: (i)(A) Permitting
the applicant to withdraw the applicant's plea of guilty and to enter
a plea of not guilty; or (B) if the applicant has been convicted after
a plea of not guilty, the court setting aside the verdict of guilty;
and (ii) the court dismissing the information, indictment, complaint,
or citation against the applicant and vacating the judgment and
sentence.
(3)(a) An applicant may have his or her records of convictions
vacated if:
(i) There are no criminal charges against the applicant pending in
any court of this state or another state, or in any federal court;
(ii) Five years have elapsed since the applicant completed the
terms of the original conditions of the sentence for the offense,
including any legal financial obligations;
(iii) The applicant has successfully completed a domestic violence
perpetrator program meeting the minimum qualifications established by
RCW 26.50.150;
(iv) The prosecuting attorney's office that prosecuted the offense
for which vacation is sought consents to the vacation; and
(v) The court finds that the applicant is remorseful for the
offense.
(b) Notwithstanding the criteria in (a) of this subsection and RCW
9.96.060, an applicant may have his or her records of convictions
vacated if a court finds there are compelling circumstances justifying
vacation. In determining compelling circumstances, the court may
consider factors including, but not limited to, the wishes of the
victim of the offense for which vacation is sought and whether the
court's denial of the request to vacate would cause a hardship to
family members of the applicant.
(4) Once the court vacates a record of conviction, the person shall
be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the
offense and the fact that the person has been convicted of the offense
shall not be included in the person's criminal history for purposes of
determining a sentence in any subsequent conviction. For all purposes,
including responding to questions on employment or housing
applications, a person whose conviction has been vacated under this
section may state that he or she has never been convicted of that
crime. Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use of an
offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution.
(5) All costs incurred by the court and probation services shall be
paid by the person making the motion to vacate the record unless a
determination is made pursuant to chapter 10.101 RCW that the person
making the motion is indigent at the time the motion is brought.
(6) The clerk of the court in which the vacation order is entered
shall immediately transmit the order vacating the conviction to the
Washington state patrol identification section and to the local police
agency, if any, which holds criminal history information for the person
who is the subject of the conviction. The Washington state patrol and
any such local police agency shall immediately update their records to
reflect the vacation of the conviction and shall transmit the order
vacating the conviction to the federal bureau of investigation. A
conviction that has been vacated under this section may not be
disseminated or disclosed by the state patrol or local law enforcement
agency to any person, except other criminal justice enforcement
agencies.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.96.060 and 2001 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person convicted of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
offense who has completed all of the terms of the sentence for the
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense may apply to the sentencing
court for a vacation of the applicant's record of conviction for the
offense. If the court finds the applicant meets the tests prescribed
in subsection (2) of this section, the court may in its discretion
vacate the record of conviction by: (a)(i) Permitting the applicant to
withdraw the applicant's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not
guilty; or (ii) if the applicant has been convicted after a plea of not
guilty, the court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (b) the
court dismissing the information, indictment, complaint, or citation
against the applicant and vacating the judgment and sentence.
(2) An applicant may not have the record of conviction for a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense vacated if any one of the
following is present:
(a) There are any criminal charges against the applicant pending in
any court of this state or another state, or in any federal court;
(b) The offense was a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030
or an attempt to commit a violent offense;
(c) The offense was a violation of RCW 46.61.502 (driving while
under the influence), 46.61.504 (actual physical control while under
the influence), or 9.91.020 (operating a railroad, etc. while
intoxicated);
(d) The offense was any misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor violation,
including attempt, of chapter 9.68 RCW (obscenity and pornography),
chapter 9.68A RCW (sexual exploitation of children), or chapter 9A.44
RCW (sex offenses);
(e) Except as provided in section 1 of this act, the applicant was
convicted of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense as ((defined))
identified in RCW 10.99.020, or the court determines after a review of
the court file that the offense was committed by one family member or
household member against another, or the court, after considering the
damage to person or property that resulted in the conviction, any prior
convictions for crimes ((defined)) identified in RCW 10.99.020, or for
comparable offenses in another state or in federal court, and the
totality of the records under review by the court regarding the
conviction being considered for vacation, determines that the offense
involved domestic violence, and any one of the following factors exist:
(i) The applicant has not provided written notification of the
vacation petition to the prosecuting attorney's office that prosecuted
the offense for which vacation is sought, or has not provided that
notification to the court; or
(ii) ((The applicant has previously had a conviction for domestic
violence. For purposes of this subsection, however, if the current
application is for more than one conviction that arose out of a single
incident, none of those convictions counts as a previous conviction;
(iii) The applicant has signed an affidavit under penalty of
perjury affirming that the applicant has not previously had a
conviction for a domestic violence offense, and a criminal history
check reveals that the applicant has had such a conviction; or
(iv))) Less than five years have elapsed since the person completed
the terms of the original conditions of the sentence, including any
financial obligations and successful completion of any treatment
ordered as a condition of sentencing;
(f) For any offense other than those described in (e) of this
subsection, less than three years have passed since the person
completed the terms of the sentence, including any financial
obligations;
(g) The offender has been convicted of a new crime in this state,
another state, or federal court since the date of conviction;
(h) The applicant has ever had the record of another conviction
vacated; or
(i) The applicant is currently restrained, or has been restrained
within five years prior to the vacation application, by a domestic
violence protection order, a no-contact order, an antiharassment order,
or a civil restraining order which restrains one party from contacting
the other party.
(3) Once the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection
(1) of this section, the person shall be released from all penalties
and disabilities resulting from the offense and the fact that the
person has been convicted of the offense shall not be included in the
person's criminal history for purposes of determining a sentence in any
subsequent conviction. For all purposes, including responding to
questions on employment or housing applications, a person whose
conviction has been vacated under subsection (1) of this section may
state that he or she has never been convicted of that crime. Nothing
in this section affects or prevents the use of an offender's prior
conviction in a later criminal prosecution.
(4) All costs incurred by the court and probation services shall be
paid by the person making the motion to vacate the record unless a
determination is made pursuant to chapter 10.101 RCW that the person
making the motion is indigent, at the time the motion is brought.
(5) The clerk of the court in which the vacation order is entered
shall immediately transmit the order vacating the conviction to the
Washington state patrol identification section and to the local police
agency, if any, which holds criminal history information for the person
who is the subject of the conviction. The Washington state patrol and
any such local police agency shall immediately update their records to
reflect the vacation of the conviction, and shall transmit the order
vacating the conviction to the federal bureau of investigation. A
conviction that has been vacated under this section may not be
disseminated or disclosed by the state patrol or local law enforcement
agency to any person, except other criminal justice enforcement
agencies.
(6) A vacation of an applicant's record of conviction under this
section shall not preclude any vacation of an applicant's record of
conviction under section 1 of this act.

--- END ---