BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.52.150 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 23 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee may accept gifts, other than
those specified in subsections (2) and (5) of this section, with an
aggregate value in excess of ((fifty)) seventy-five dollars from a
single source in a calendar year or a single gift from multiple sources
with a value in excess of ((fifty)) seventy-five dollars. For purposes
of this section, "single source" means any person, as defined in RCW
42.52.010, whether acting directly or through any agent or other
intermediary, and "single gift" includes any event, item, or group of
items used in conjunction with each other or any trip including
transportation, lodging, and attendant costs, not excluded from the
definition of gift under RCW 42.52.010. The value of gifts given to an
officer's or employee's family member or guest shall be attributed to
the official or employee for the purpose of determining whether the
limit has been exceeded, unless an independent business, family, or
social relationship exists between the donor and the family member or
guest.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
following items are presumed not to influence under RCW 42.52.140, and
may be accepted without regard to the limit established by subsection
(1) of this section:
(a) Unsolicited flowers, plants, and floral arrangements;
(b) Unsolicited advertising or promotional items of nominal value,
such as pens and note pads;
(c) Unsolicited tokens or awards of appreciation in the form of a
plaque, trophy, desk item, wall memento, or similar item;
(d) Unsolicited items received by a state officer or state employee
for the purpose of evaluation or review, if the officer or employee has
no personal beneficial interest in the eventual use or acquisition of
the item by the officer's or employee's agency;
(e) Informational material, publications, or subscriptions related
to the recipient's performance of official duties;
(f) Food and beverages consumed at hosted receptions where
attendance is related to the state officer's or state employee's
official duties;
(g) Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or
personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise accepted and
solicited for deposit in the legislative international trade account
created in RCW 44.04.270;
(h) Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or
personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise accepted and
solicited for the purpose of promoting the expansion of tourism as
provided for in RCW 43.330.090;
(i) Gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or
personal property, or both, solicited on behalf of a national
legislative association or host committee for the purpose of hosting an
official conference under the circumstances specified in RCW 42.52.820.
Anything solicited or accepted may only be received by the national
association or host committee and may not be commingled with any funds
or accounts that are the property of any person;
(j) Admission to, and the cost of food and beverages consumed at,
events sponsored by or in conjunction with a civic, charitable,
governmental, or community organization; and
(k) Unsolicited gifts from dignitaries from another state or a
foreign country that are intended to be personal in nature.
(3) The presumption in subsection (2) of this section is rebuttable
and may be overcome based on the circumstances surrounding the giving
and acceptance of the item.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (5) of this section, a
state officer or state employee of a regulatory agency or of an agency
that seeks to acquire goods or services who participates in those
regulatory or contractual matters may receive, accept, take, or seek,
directly or indirectly, only the following items from a person
regulated by the agency or from a person who seeks to provide goods or
services to the agency:
(a) Unsolicited advertising or promotional items of nominal value,
such as pens and note pads;
(b) Unsolicited tokens or awards of appreciation in the form of a
plaque, trophy, desk item, wall memento, or similar item;
(c) Unsolicited items received by a state officer or state employee
for the purpose of evaluation or review, if the officer or employee has
no personal beneficial interest in the eventual use or acquisition of
the item by the officer's or employee's agency;
(d) Informational material, publications, or subscriptions related
to the recipient's performance of official duties;
(e) Food and beverages consumed at hosted receptions where
attendance is related to the state officer's or state employee's
official duties;
(f) Admission to, and the cost of food and beverages consumed at,
events sponsored by or in conjunction with a civic, charitable,
governmental, or community organization; and
(g) Those items excluded from the definition of gift in RCW
42.52.010 except:
(i) Payments by a governmental or nongovernmental entity of
reasonable expenses incurred in connection with a speech, presentation,
appearance, or trade mission made in an official capacity;
(ii) Payments for seminars and educational programs sponsored by a
bona fide governmental or nonprofit professional, educational, trade,
or charitable association or institution; and
(iii) Flowers, plants, and floral arrangements.
(5) A state officer or state employee may accept gifts in the form
of food and beverage on infrequent occasions in the ordinary course of
meals where attendance by the officer or employee is related to the
performance of official duties. Gifts in the form of food and beverage
that exceed ((fifty)) seventy-five dollars on a single occasion shall
be reported as provided in chapter 42.17 RCW.
(6) Once properly received under this section, the item received is
the personal property of the recipient to dispose of as the recipient
chooses, except as provided in subsection (2)(g) through (i) of this
section.

--- END ---