BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds and declares that the practices of body
piercing and body art involve an invasive procedure with the use of
needles, single-use disposable sharps, reusable sharps, instruments,
and jewelry, which may be dangerous when improperly sterilized
presenting a risk of infecting the client with bloodborne pathogens
including, but not limited to, HIV, hepatitis B, and hepatitis C. The
legislature also finds that body piercing has achieved mainstream
popularity among adults and minors. It is in the interests of the
public health, safety, and welfare to establish requirements in the
commercial practice of body piercing in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 1, 3, and
4 of this act and RCW 5.40.050 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Body art" means the practice of physical cosmetic body
adornment utilizing, but not limited to, branding and scarification.
"Body art" also includes the intentional production of scars upon the
body. "Body art" does not include medical procedures performed by a
licensed physician or medical practitioner.
(2) "Body piercing" means the process of penetrating the skin or
mucous membrane for the purpose of insertion of any object, including
but not limited to jewelry, for cosmetic purposes. "Body piercing"
also includes any scar tissue resulting from or relating to the
piercing. "Body piercing" does not include the use of stud and clasp
piercing systems to pierce the earlobe in accordance with the
manufacturer's directions and applicable United States food and drug
administration requirements. "Body piercing" does not include any
medical procedures performed by a licensed physician or medical
practitioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary of health shall adopt by rule requirements for the
sterilization of needles, single-use disposable sharps, reusable
sharps, instruments, and jewelry used by any person who practices body
piercing or body art and restrictions to be placed on body art and
piercing procedures for adults and minors in accordance with nationally
recognized professional standards. The secretary shall consider the
standard precautions recommended by the United States centers for
disease control, the national environmental health association, and the
association of professional piercers, in the adoption of these
sterilization requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person who practices body piercing or body art shall comply
with the rules adopted by the department of health under section 3 of
this act.
(2) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 5 RCW 5.40.050 and 2001 c 194 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A breach of a duty imposed by statute, ordinance, or administrative
rule shall not be considered negligence per se, but may be considered
by the trier of fact as evidence of negligence; however, any breach of
duty as provided by statute, ordinance, or administrative rule relating
to electrical fire safety, the use of smoke alarms, sterilization of
needles and instruments used in tattooing or electrology as required
under RCW 70.54.350, sterilization of needles, single-use disposable
sharps, reusable sharps, instruments, and jewelry used in body piercing
or body art and restrictions placed on body art and piercing procedures
for adults and minors as required under section 4 of this act, or
driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug,
shall be considered negligence per se.

--- END ---