BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.108.010 and 2002 c 277 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the
following meanings shall apply:
(1) "Board" means the Washington state board of massage.
(2) "Massage" and "massage therapy" mean a health care service
involving the external manipulation or pressure of soft tissue of the
human body for therapeutic purposes. Massage therapy includes
techniques such as tapping, compressions, friction, Swedish gymnastics
or movements, gliding, kneading, shaking, and fascial or connective
tissue stretching, with or without the aids of superficial heat, cold,
water, lubricants, or salts. Massage therapy does not include
diagnosis or attempts to adjust or manipulate any articulations of the
body or spine or mobilization of these articulations by the use of a
thrusting force, nor does it include genital manipulation.
(3) "Massage practitioner" means an individual licensed under this
chapter.
(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(5) "Massage business" means the operation of a business where
massages are given.
(((6) "Animal massage practitioner" means an individual with a
license to practice massage therapy in this state with additional
training in animal therapy.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 18.108.230 (Animal massage practitioner -- Endorsement--Training requirements -- Rules) and 2001 c 297 s 3; and
(2) 2001 c 297 s 1 (uncodified).

--- END ---