BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.42.010 and 1997 c 392 s 508 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Basic necessities of life" means food, water, shelter,
clothing, and medically necessary health care, including but not
limited to health-related treatment or activities, hygiene, oxygen, and
medication.
(2)(a) "Bodily injury" means physical pain or injury, illness, or
an impairment of physical condition;
(b) "Substantial bodily harm" means bodily injury which involves a
temporary but substantial disfigurement, or which causes a temporary
but substantial loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part
or organ, or which causes a fracture of any bodily part;
(c) "Great bodily harm" means bodily injury which creates a high
probability of death, or which causes serious permanent disfigurement,
or which causes a permanent or protracted loss or impairment of the
function of any bodily part or organ.
(3) "Child" means a person under eighteen years of age and includes
an unborn quick child.
(4) "Dependent person" means a person who, because of physical or
mental disability, or because of extreme advanced age, is dependent
upon another person to provide the basic necessities of life. A
resident of a nursing home, as defined in RCW 18.51.010, a resident of
an adult family home, as defined in RCW 70.128.010, and a frail elder
or vulnerable adult, as defined in RCW 74.34.020(((8))) (13), is
presumed to be a dependent person for purposes of this chapter.
(5) "Employed" means hired by a dependent person, another person
acting on behalf of a dependent person, or by an organization or
governmental entity, to provide to a dependent person any of the basic
necessities of life. A person may be "employed" regardless of whether
the person is paid for the services or, if paid, regardless of who pays
for the person's services.
(6) "Parent" has its ordinary meaning and also includes a guardian
and the authorized agent of a parent or guardian.
(7) "Abandons" means leaving a child or other dependent person
without the means or ability to obtain one or more of the basic
necessities of life.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.42.020 and 1997 c 392 s 510 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A parent of a child, the person entrusted with the physical
custody of a child or dependent person, or a person employed to provide
to the child or dependent person the basic necessities of life is
guilty of criminal mistreatment in the first degree:
(a) If he or she recklessly, as defined in RCW 9A.08.010, causes
great bodily harm to a child or dependent person by withholding any of
the basic necessities of life; or
(b) If a mother recklessly, as defined in RCW 9A.08.010, causes
great bodily harm to her unborn quick child by the use of alcohol or
any illicit drug including, but not limited to, cocaine, heroin, opium,
amphetamine, methamphetamine, lysergic acid diethylamide, mescaline,
peyote, psilocybin, and methadone.
(2) Criminal mistreatment in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.42.030 and 1997 c 392 s 511 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A parent of a child, the person entrusted with the physical
custody of a child or dependent person, or a person employed to provide
to the child or dependent person the basic necessities of life is
guilty of criminal mistreatment in the second degree:
(a) If he or she recklessly, as defined in RCW 9A.08.010, either
(((a))) (i) creates an imminent and substantial risk of death or great
bodily harm, or (((b))) (ii) causes substantial bodily harm by
withholding any of the basic necessities of life; or
(b) If a mother recklessly, as defined in RCW 9A.08.010, causes
substantial bodily harm to her unborn quick child by the use of alcohol
or any illicit drug including, but not limited to, cocaine, heroin,
opium, amphetamine, methamphetamine, lysergic acid diethylamide,
mescaline, peyote, psilocybin, and methadone.
(2) Criminal mistreatment in the second degree is a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9A.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A mother is guilty of criminal mistreatment in the third degree
if she causes her unborn quick child to be born addicted to any illicit
drug including, but not limited to, cocaine, heroin, opium,
amphetamine, methamphetamine, lysergic acid diethylamide, mescaline,
peyote, psilocybin, and methadone.
(2) The first conviction for criminal mistreatment in the third
degree is a misdemeanor. The second conviction for criminal
mistreatment in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor. The third and
subsequent convictions for criminal mistreatment in the third degree is
a class C felony. "Conviction" has the meaning as defined in RCW
9.94A.030(11).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, morals or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes
effect immediately.

--- END ---