BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that all children have
the right to be born healthy and free from the consequences of alcohol
abuse or illegal drug use by the mother during pregnancy. Babies who
are born alcohol or drug-affected are more likely to suffer from
premature birth and low birth weight, to be shorter, weigh less, and
have a smaller head size, and to develop health problems than children
born to mothers who did not abuse alcohol or use illegal drugs. The
legislature further finds that the state has a compelling interest in
protecting unborn children from the harmful effects of alcohol abuse
and illegal drug use during pregnancy and that requiring pharmaceutical
birth control or tubal ligation for women who are incapable for
whatever reason of making long-term decisions in controlling their
abuse of alcohol or use of illegal drugs is in the best interest of the
mothers and their children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) If a physician, physician assistant,
advanced registered nurse practitioner, including a certified nurse
midwife, or licensed midwife is consulting, treating, providing care
for, or working with a pregnant woman, and the physician, physician
assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, including a
certified nurse midwife, or licensed midwife discovers or reasonably
believes that the woman's unborn child is alcohol or drug-affected or
is likely to be alcohol or drug-affected, the physician, physician
assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, including a
certified nurse midwife, or licensed midwife shall inform the woman of
the provisions of this act and of available alcohol or drug dependency
treatment programs and counseling.
(2) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW primarily
responsible for the supervision of the birth of an infant or care of
the mother of the infant, or a hospital administrator, who has
reasonable cause to believe an infant is alcohol or drug-affected or
has been exposed to alcohol abuse or the use of illegal drugs shall:
(a) Conduct appropriate tests to determine whether the infant is
alcohol or drug-affected; (b) notify the department of the name and
address of the parents of an infant who is alcohol or drug-affected;
and (c) retain the infant in the birthing facility for medical
treatment or place the infant in an appropriate pediatric care facility
with the concurrence of the department for sufficient time for the
infant to undergo withdrawal from the effects of the alcohol or drug.
The withdrawal shall be under the supervision of appropriate medical
professionals. In addition, the physician shall, as soon as practical,
inform the mother of the alcohol or drug-affected infant of the
provisions of this act and of available alcohol or drug dependency
treatment programs and counseling.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department, upon receipt of a report
under section 2 of this act, shall investigate and, in cases where a
physician has determined the infant is alcohol or drug-affected, shall
file a petition in the superior court requesting the court to issue an
order requiring the mother to abstain from alcohol or the
nonprescription use of controlled substances, to submit to random
testing by the department for such substances, and to attend alcohol or
drug dependency treatment programs and counseling as determined
appropriate by the department. If the evidence supports the
physician's determination that the infant is alcohol or drug-affected
and that the infant is alcohol or drug-affected as a result of the
ingestion of alcohol or drugs by the mother, the court shall issue the
order.
(2) If a mother previously has been issued an order under
subsection (1) of this section and the department receives another
report under section 2 of this act, the department shall investigate
and, in cases where a physician has determined the infant is alcohol or
drug-affected, shall file a petition in the superior court requesting
the court to issue an order requiring the mother to abstain from
alcohol or the nonprescription use of controlled substances, to submit
to random testing by the department for such substances, to attend
alcohol or drug dependency treatment programs and counseling as
determined appropriate by the department, and to submit to the
involuntary use of the pharmaceutical birth control, Norplant or depo-provera, and it shall be administered not less than once every thirty
days, unless an evaluation of the medical and physical consequences to
the mother determines such use of Norplant or depo-provera would prove
harmful to the physical well-being of the mother. The use of Norplant
or depo-provera shall remain in effect until a petition is dismissed or
the court determines it is no longer medically appropriate. If the
evidence supports the physician's determination that the infant is
alcohol or drug-affected, that the infant is alcohol or drug-affected
as a result of the ingestion of alcohol or drugs by the mother, and
that the mother previously has been issued an order under subsection
(1) of this section, the court shall issue the order.
(3) If a mother previously has been issued an order under
subsection (2) of this section and the department receives another
report under section 2 of this act, the department shall investigate
and, in cases where a physician has determined the infant is alcohol or
drug-affected, shall file a petition in the superior court requesting
the court to issue an order requiring the mother to abstain from
alcohol or the nonprescription use of controlled substances, to submit
to random testing by the department for such substances, to attend
alcohol or drug dependency treatment programs and counseling as
determined appropriate by the department, and to submit to the
involuntary use of tubal ligation, unless an evaluation of the medical
and physical consequences to the mother determines that the tubal
ligation would prove harmful to the physical well-being of the mother.
If the evidence supports the physician's determination that the infant
is alcohol or drug-affected, that the infant is alcohol or drug-affected as a result of the ingestion of alcohol or drugs by the
mother, and that the mother previously has been issued an order under
subsection (2) of this section, the court shall issue the order.
(4) The department and the mother may enter an agreement in which
the mother agrees to abstain from alcohol abuse or the nonprescription
use of controlled substances and undergo random testing for such
substances, or to submit to the involuntary use of pharmaceutical birth
control or tubal ligation. If the department and the mother enter into
an agreement under this subsection that the mother will abstain from
alcohol abuse or the nonprescription use of controlled substances,
undergo random testing by the department for such substances, and
attend alcohol or drug dependency treatment programs and counseling as
determined appropriate by the department, the department shall request
the court to defer the entry of any order requiring the mother to
submit to the involuntary use of pharmaceutical birth control or tubal
ligation for as long as the mother continues to comply with the terms
of the agreement, subject to the department's monitoring for
compliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department may request the court to
dismiss the petition deferred under section 3 of this act at any time,
but a petition may not be vacated or dismissed unless the mother
demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence that she has not abused
alcohol or used controlled substances in a nonprescription manner for
at least thirty-six consecutive months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department shall pay for pharmaceutical
birth control or tubal ligation administered under section 3 of this
act if the mother's income is less than two hundred percent of the
federal poverty level. The department shall report by December 1st of
each year to the governor and legislature: (1) The number of physician
reports under section 2 of this act received by the department; (2) the
number of cases where a physician has determined an infant is alcohol
or drug-affected; (3) the number of cases where involuntary or
voluntary use of pharmaceutical birth control measures or tubal
ligation was implemented and whether pharmaceutical birth control or
tubal ligation was utilized; and (4) the recidivism rate of subsequent
births of alcohol or drug-affected infants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 13.34 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---