BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Hood Canal is
a precious aquatic resource of our state. The legislature finds that
Hood Canal is a rich source of recreation, fishing, aquaculture, and
aesthetic enjoyment for the citizens of this state. The legislature
also finds that Hood Canal has great cultural significance for the
tribes in the Hood Canal area. The legislature therefore recognizes
Hood Canal's substantial environmental, cultural, economic,
recreational, and aesthetic importance to Washington.
(2) The legislature finds that Hood Canal is a marine water of the
state at significant risk. The legislature finds that Hood Canal has
a "dead zone" related to low-dissolved oxygen concentrations, a
condition that has recurred for many years. The legislature also finds
this problem and various contributors to the problem were documented in
the May 2004 Preliminary Assessment and Corrective Action Plan
published by the state Puget Sound action team and the Hood Canal
coordinating council.
(3) The legislature further finds that significant research,
monitoring, and study efforts are currently occurring regarding Hood
Canal's low-dissolved oxygen concentrations. The legislature
recognizes that federal, state, tribal, and local governments and other
organizations and entities are coordinating research, monitoring, and
modeling efforts through the Hood Canal low-dissolved oxygen program.
The legislature also recognizes that these entities and others are
continuing individual efforts to study and identify potential solutions
for Hood Canal's low-dissolved oxygen concentrations. The legislature
also recognizes numerous public, private, and community organizations
are working to provide public education regarding Hood Canal's low-dissolved oxygen concentrations. The legislature recognizes and
encourages the continuation of these efforts.
(4) The legislature finds a need exists for the state to take
additional action to address and resolve Hood Canal's low-dissolved
oxygen concentrations. The legislature also finds a need exists to
designate the state and local entities to develop, coordinate, and
administer a Hood Canal rehabilitation program and funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The development of a program for
rehabilitation of Hood Canal is authorized in Jefferson, Kitsap, and
Mason counties within the aquatic rehabilitation zone one.
(2) The Puget Sound action team is designated as the state lead
agency for the rehabilitation program authorized in this section.
(3) The Hood Canal coordinating council is designated as the local
management board for the rehabilitation program authorized in this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Hood Canal coordinating council
shall serve as the local management board for aquatic rehabilitation
zone one. The local management board shall coordinate local government
efforts with respect to the program authorized according to section 2
of this act. In the Hood Canal area, the Hood Canal coordinating
council also shall:
(a) Serve as the lead entity and the regional recovery organization
for the purposes of chapter 77.85 RCW for Hood Canal summer chum and
other salmon as agreed to by the governor's salmon recovery office; and
(b) Assist in coordinating activities under chapter 90.82 RCW.
(2) When developing and implementing the program authorized in
section 2 of this act and when establishing funding criteria according
to subsection (7) of this section, the Puget Sound action team and the
local management board shall solicit participation by federal, tribal,
state, and local agencies and universities and nonprofit organizations
with expertise in areas related to program activities. The local
management board may include state and federal agency representatives
as nonvoting management board members or may appoint them to a
technical advisory committee. The local management board also may
appoint additional persons to a technical advisory committee as needed.
(3) The local management board and the Puget Sound action team
shall participate in the development of the program authorized under
section 2 of this act.
(4) The local management board and its participating local and
tribal governments shall assess concepts for a regional governance
structure and shall submit a report regarding the findings and
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature.
(5) Any of the local management board's participating counties and
tribes, any federal, tribal, state, or local agencies, or any
universities or nonprofit organizations may continue individual efforts
and activities for rehabilitation of Hood Canal. Nothing in this
section limits the authority of units of local government to enter into
interlocal agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW or any other provision of
law.
(6) The local management board may not exercise authority over land
or water within the individual counties or otherwise preempt the
authority of any units of local government.
(7) The local management board and the Puget Sound action team may
receive and disburse funding for projects, studies, and activities
related to Hood Canal's low-dissolved oxygen concentrations. The Puget
Sound action team and the local management board shall jointly
coordinate a process to determine the prioritization, approval, and
funding of projects, studies, and activities for which the Puget Sound
action team receives state funding specifically allocated for Hood
Canal corrective actions to implement this section. The local
management board and the Puget Sound action team shall establish
criteria for funding these projects, studies, and activities based upon
their likely value in addressing and resolving Hood Canal's low-dissolved oxygen concentrations. Nothing in this section prohibits any
federal, tribal, state, or local agencies, universities, or nonprofit
organizations from receiving funding for specific projects that may
assist in the rehabilitation of Hood Canal.
(8) The local management board may hire and fire staff, including
an executive director, enter into contracts, accept grants and other
moneys, disburse funds, make recommendations to local governments about
potential regulations and the development of programs and incentives
upon request, pay all necessary expenses, and choose a fiduciary agent.
(9) The local management board shall report its progress on a
quarterly basis to the legislative bodies of the participating counties
and tribes and the participating state agencies. The local management
board also shall submit an annual report describing its efforts and
successes in implementing the program established according to section
2 of this act to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added
to chapter 90.-- RCW (the new chapter created in Substitute House Bill
No. 2081).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---