BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.128.160 and 2001 c 193 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to take one or more of the actions
listed in subsection (2) of this section in any case in which the
department finds that an adult family home provider has:
(a) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;
(b) Operated an adult family home without a license or under a
revoked license;
(c) Knowingly or with reason to know made a false statement of
material fact on his or her application for license or any data
attached thereto, or in any matter under investigation by the
department; or
(d) Willfully prevented or interfered with any inspection or
investigation by the department.
(2) When authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the
department may take one or more of the following actions:
(a) Refuse to issue a license;
(b) Impose reasonable conditions on a license, such as correction
within a specified time, training, and limits on the type of clients
the provider may admit or serve;
(c) Impose civil penalties of not more than one hundred dollars per
day per violation;
(d) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license; or
(e) Suspend admissions to the adult family home by imposing stop
placement.
(3) If an employee is the cause of the problem identified under
subsection (1) of this section, the department shall not suspend,
revoke, or refuse to renew a license, and shall develop a corrective
action plan to address the problem. When the department orders stop
placement, the facility shall not admit any person until the stop
placement order is terminated. The department may approve readmission
of a resident to the facility from a hospital or nursing home during
the stop placement. The department shall terminate the stop placement
when: (a) The violations necessitating the stop placement have been
corrected; and (b) the provider exhibits the capacity to maintain
correction of the violations previously found deficient. However, if
upon the revisit the department finds new violations that the
department reasonably believes will result in a new stop placement, the
previous stop placement shall remain in effect until the new stop
placement is imposed.
(4) After a department finding of a violation for which a stop
placement has been imposed, the department shall make an on-site
revisit of the provider within fifteen working days from the request
for revisit, to ensure correction of the violation. For violations
that are serious or recurring or uncorrected following a previous
citation, and create actual or threatened harm to one or more
residents' well-being, including violations of residents' rights, the
department shall make an on-site revisit as soon as appropriate to
ensure correction of the violation. Verification of correction of all
other violations may be made by either a department on-site revisit or
by written or photographic documentation found by the department to be
credible. This subsection does not prevent the department from
enforcing license suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this
subsection shall interfere with or diminish the department's authority
and duty to ensure that the provider adequately cares for residents,
including to make departmental on-site revisits as needed to ensure
that the provider protects residents, and to enforce compliance with
this chapter.
(5) Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to department actions under this
section, except that orders of the department imposing license
suspension, stop placement, or conditions for continuation of a license
are effective immediately upon notice and shall continue in effect
pending any hearing.

--- END ---