BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.84.020 and 1986 c 170 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Long-term care insurance" or "long-term care benefit contract"
means any insurance policy or benefit contract primarily advertised,
marketed, offered, or designed to provide coverage or services for
either institutional or community-based convalescent, custodial,
chronic, or terminally ill care. Such terms include adult family
homes, boarding homes, and assisted living facilities. Such terms do
not include and this chapter shall not apply to policies or contracts
governed by chapter 48.66 RCW and continuing care retirement
communities.
(2) "Loss ratio" means the incurred claims plus or minus the
increase or decrease in reserves as a percentage of the earned
premiums, or the projected incurred claims plus or minus the increase
or decrease in projected reserves as a percentage of projected earned
premiums, as defined by the commissioner.
(3) "Preexisting condition" means a covered person's medical
condition that caused that person to have received medical advice or
treatment during the specified time period before the effective date of
coverage.
(4) "Medicare" means Title XVIII of the United States social
security act, or its successor program.
(5) "Medicaid" means Title XIX of the United States social security
act, or its successor program.
(6) "Nursing home" means a nursing home as defined in RCW
18.51.010.

--- END ---