BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.128.060 and 2004 c 140 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An application for license shall be made to the department upon
forms provided by it and shall contain such information as the
department reasonably requires.
(2) Subject to the provisions of this section, the department shall
issue a license to an adult family home if the department finds that
the applicant and the home are in compliance with this chapter and the
rules adopted under this chapter, unless (a) the applicant or a person
affiliated with the applicant has prior violations of this chapter
relating to the adult family home subject to the application or any
other adult family home, or of any other law regulating residential
care facilities within the past five years that resulted in revocation,
suspension, or nonrenewal of a license or contract with the department;
or (b) the applicant or a person affiliated with the applicant has a
history of significant noncompliance with federal, state, or local
laws, rules, or regulations relating to the provision of care or
services to vulnerable adults or to children. A person is considered
affiliated with an applicant if the person is listed on the license
application as a partner, officer, director, resident manager, or
majority owner of the applying entity, or is the spouse of the
applicant.
(3) The license fee shall be submitted with the application.
(4) The department shall serve upon the applicant a copy of the
decision granting or denying an application for a license. An
applicant shall have the right to contest denial of his or her
application for a license as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW by
requesting a hearing in writing within twenty-eight days after receipt
of the notice of denial.
(5) The department shall not issue a license to a provider if the
department finds that the provider or spouse of the provider or any
partner, officer, director, managerial employee, or majority owner has
a history of significant noncompliance with federal or state
regulations, rules, or laws in providing care or services to vulnerable
adults or to children.
(6) The department shall license an adult family home for the
maximum level of care that the adult family home may provide. The
department shall define, in rule, license levels based upon the
education, training, and caregiving experience of the licensed provider
or staff.
(7) The department shall establish, by rule, standards used to
license nonresident providers and multiple facility operators.
(8) The department shall establish, by rule, for multiple facility
operators educational standards substantially equivalent to recognized
national certification standards for residential care administrators.
(9) The license fee shall be set at fifty dollars per year for each
home. A fifty dollar processing fee shall also be charged each home
when the home is initially licensed.
(10) A provider who receives notification of the department's
initiation of a denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of an
adult family home license may, in lieu of appealing the department's
action, surrender or relinquish the license. The department shall not
issue a new license to or contract with the provider, for the purposes
of providing care to vulnerable adults or children, for a period of
twenty years following the surrendering or relinquishment of the former
license. The licensing record shall indicate that the provider
relinquished or surrendered the license, without admitting the
violations, after receiving notice of the department's initiation of a
denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of a license.
(11) The department shall establish, by rule, the circumstances
requiring a change in the licensed provider, which include, but are not
limited to, a change in ownership or control of the adult family home
or provider, a change in the provider's form of legal organization,
such as from sole proprietorship to partnership or corporation, and a
dissolution or merger of the licensed entity with another legal
organization. The new provider is subject to the provisions of this
chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter, and other applicable
law. In order to ensure that the safety of residents is not
compromised by a change in provider, the new provider is responsible
for correction of all violations that may exist at the time of the new
license.
(12) The department shall, by rule, provide for an adult family
home operator to take a sabbatical of up to twelve months without
affecting their licensing status. To qualify for a sabbatical the
operator must meet their annual training requirement, pay all
applicable fees, and provide for the appropriate care of residents, as
determined by the department.

--- END ---