BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.100 and 2003 c 329 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
ground water right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
ground waters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the ((manner)) purpose or the place of use of the
water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the ((manner)) purpose or place of use of the water
shall be issued only after publication of notice of the application and
findings as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such
amendment shall be issued by the department only on the conditions
that: (a) The additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the
same body of public ground water as the original well or wells; (b)
where a replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original
well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells
shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW;
(c) where an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well
or wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal
from the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge by
increasing the annual consumptive quantity of the right conveyed by the
original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing rights shall not
be impaired. The department may specify an approved manner of
construction and shall require a showing of compliance with the terms
of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of an
original permit.
(3) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public ground water as the original
well or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original water use permit or certificate; (d) the
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the original
public notice published for the application for the water right for the
well.
(5) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring an amendment of any
existing water right to enable the holder of the right to store water
governed by the right.

--- END ---