BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Water is a clean and sustainable resource that produces clean,
efficient, and low-cost power;
(2) There is an increasing demand for clean and renewable power;
(3) Hydroelectric power is an abundant and reliable source of power
with potential for growth;
(4) Hydroelectric power makes a valuable contribution to the
state's electricity network and accounts for more than half of the
state's overall fuel mix; and
(5) Hydroelectric power balances the needs of the environment with
the need for clean, nonpolluting, reliable, and abundant electricity
for the electrical market.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 It is the policy of the state of Washington
to recognize water as a renewable energy resource and to encourage the
use of hydroelectric power.

--- END ---