BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall
work with economic development councils, chambers of commerce, the
economic development commission, industry organizations, and trade
organizations to incorporate within the existing marketing campaign,
the "Washington Made" logo adopted under section 2 of this act. The
department shall also work with these organizations to secure private
funding and other public funds to assist in the educational campaign.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The arts commission shall conduct a competition for the design
of a "Washington Made" logo for the voluntary labeling of consumer
goods produced in Washington. The eligibility requirements for the
competition, the members of the selection committee, the competition
rules, and other details shall be established by the commission.
(2) The trademark rights to the winning "Washington Made" logo
shall be vested in the state of Washington.
(3) In subsequent years, if the commission, in conjunction with the
department of community, trade, and economic development, determines
that it is cost-effective to issue a different logo, a competition for
the logo design shall be conducted in the same manner as the original
competition.

--- END ---