BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.71.100 and 2001 c 273 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The action team shall establish ((a shellfish -)) an on-site
sewage grant program ((in)) for:
(a) Puget Sound;
(b) Mason, Jefferson, and Kitsap counties; and
((for)) (c) Pacific and Grays Harbor counties.
(2) The action team shall provide funds to local health
jurisdictions to be used as grants to individuals for improving their
on-site sewage systems. The grants may be provided only in areas:
(a) That have the potential to adversely affect water quality in
commercial and recreational shellfish growing areas; or
(b) Within the watersheds that drain to Hood Canal south of a line
projected from Tala Point in Jefferson county to Foulweather Bluff in
Kitsap county.
(3) A recipient of a grant shall enter into an agreement with the
appropriate local health jurisdiction to maintain the improved on-site
sewage system according to specifications required by the local health
jurisdiction.
(4)(a) For grants provided in Puget Sound and Pacific and Grays
Harbor counties, the action team shall work closely with local health
jurisdictions and shall endeavor to attain geographic equity between
Willapa Bay and the Puget Sound when making funds available under this
program. For the purposes of this subsection, "geographic equity"
means issuing on-site sewage grants at a level that matches the funds
generated from the oyster reserve lands in that area.
(((2))) (b) For grants provided in Mason, Jefferson, and Kitsap
counties, the action team may use any:
(i) Funds appropriated by the legislature;
(ii) Federal funds received for this program; and
(iii) Funds generated from oyster reserve lands, as provided in RCW
77.60.160, that are located in Mason, Jefferson, and Kitsap counties.
(5) In the Puget Sound, the action team shall give first priority
to areas that are:
(a) Identified as (("areas of special concern" under WAC 246-272-01001)) areas of special concern in rules adopted by the department of
health pursuant to chapter 70.118 RCW and RCW 43.20.050; or
(b) Included within a shellfish protection district under chapter
90.72 RCW.
(((3))) (6) In Grays Harbor and Pacific counties, the action team
shall give first priority to preventing the deterioration of water
quality in areas where commercial or recreational shellfish are grown.
(((4))) (7) The action team and each participating local health
jurisdiction shall enter into a memorandum of understanding that will
establish an applicant income eligibility requirement for individual
grant applicants from within the jurisdiction and other mutually
agreeable terms and conditions of the grant program.
(((5))) (8) The action team may recover the costs to administer
this program not to exceed ten percent of the shellfish - on-site
sewage grant program.
(((6) For the 2001-2003 biennium, the action team may use up to
fifty percent of the shellfish - on-site sewage grant program funds for
grants to local health jurisdictions to establish areas of special
concern under WAC 246-272-01001, or for operation and maintenance
programs therein, where commercial and recreational uses are present.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---