BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a chamber of
commerce or other similar business association for administering the
operation of a parking and business improvement area as defined in RCW
35.87A.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city shall not impose a gross receipts tax on amounts
received by a chamber of commerce or other similar business association
for administering the operation of a parking and business improvement
area within the meaning of RCW 35.87A.110.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax measured by gross proceeds of
sales, gross income of the business, or value proceeding or accruing.
(b) "City" includes cities, code cities, and towns.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.87A.110 and 1971 ex.s. c 45 s 11 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of each city or town or county shall
have sole discretion as to how the revenue derived from the special
assessments is to be used within the scope of the purposes; however,
the legislative authority may appoint existing advisory boards or
commissions to make recommendations as to its use, or the legislative
authority may create a new advisory board or commission for the
purpose.
(2) The legislative authority may contract with a chamber of
commerce or other similar business association operating primarily
within the boundaries of the legislative authority to administer the
operation of a parking and business improvement area, including any
funds derived pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That such administration
must comply with all applicable provisions of law including this
chapter, with all county, city, or town resolutions and ordinances, and
with all regulations lawfully imposed by the state auditor or other
state agencies.
(3) Amounts paid by the legislative authority of a city, town, or
county to a chamber of commerce or other similar business association
operating primarily within the boundaries of the city, town, or county
pursuant to a contract to operate a parking and business improvement
area are not subject to taxation under chapter 82.04, 82.08, or 82.12
RCW, or city gross receipts taxes, as defined in RCW 35.21.855.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act apply
retroactively to December 31, 1999.

--- END ---