BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that students at
Washington's public four-year institutions of higher education should
have the opportunity to participate in debates, discussion, and the
policymaking process regarding higher education through their
designated student representatives.
(2) The legislature further finds that, as a statewide student
association, the Washington student lobby has had notable successes,
but faces financial challenges that threaten its sustainability and
stability.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to explore alternative
models of providing for active and regular participation in state
policymaking by students at four-year institutions of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The higher education coordinating board
shall conduct a study of statewide student associations representing
students at public four-year institutions of higher education. The
study shall include but not be limited to: Role and mission, funding
mechanisms, activities and budget, oversight and accountability, and
governance. In conducting the study, the board shall work with
representatives from the Washington student lobby, campus student
government associations, and the four-year institutions of higher
education. The board shall submit a report with alternative models for
how Washington students could be represented to the higher education
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005.

--- END ---