BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79A.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The committee may not prohibit or limit an otherwise qualified
public body from receiving a grant or funds for a project from any
source controlled by the committee solely because the public body is
also receiving a grant or funds for the same project from other
sources, including other local, state, or federal sources.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section only applies to a public body
that currently has at least fifty percent of the funds required for a
project, excluding state or federal funds, secured at the time the
public body applies for a grant or funds for the project from any
source of grant or funds controlled by the committee.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.25.080 and 2000 c 11 s 74 are each amended to read
as follows:
Moneys transferred to the recreation resource account from the
marine fuel tax refund account may be used when appropriated by the
legislature, as well as any federal or other funds now or hereafter
available, to pay the necessary administrative and coordinative costs
of the interagency committee for outdoor recreation established by RCW
79A.25.110. All moneys so transferred, except those appropriated as
aforesaid, shall be divided into two equal shares and shall be used to
benefit watercraft recreation in this state as follows:
(1) One share as grants to state agencies for (a) acquisition of
title to, or any interests or rights in, marine recreation land, (b)
capital improvement and renovation of marine recreation land, including
periodic dredging in accordance with subsection (3) of this section, if
needed, to maintain or make the facility more useful, or (c) matching
funds in any case where federal or other funds are made available on a
matching basis for purposes described in (a) or (b) of this subsection;
(2) One share as grants to public bodies to help finance (a)
acquisition of title to, or any interests or rights in, marine
recreation land, or (b) capital improvement and renovation of marine
recreation land, including periodic dredging in accordance with
subsection (3) of this section, if needed, to maintain or make the
facility more useful. A public body is authorized to use a grant,
together with its own contribution, as matching funds in any case where
federal or other funds are made available for purposes described in (a)
or (b) of this subsection regardless of the source or administration of
these funds. The committee may prescribe further terms and conditions
for the making of grants in order to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.
(3) For the purposes of this section "periodic dredging" is limited
to dredging of materials that have been deposited in a channel due to
unforeseen events. This dredging should extend the expected usefulness
of the facility for at least five years.

--- END ---