BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of this act to clarify that
the public shall have access under the public disclosure act to all
accident reports and information compiled or collected by the
Washington state patrol under this statute.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.52.060 and 1998 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the chief of the Washington state
patrol to file, tabulate, and analyze all accident reports and to
publish annually, immediately following the close of each fiscal year,
and monthly during the course of the year, statistical information
based thereon showing the number of accidents, the location, the
frequency and circumstances thereof and other statistical information
which may prove of assistance in determining the cause of vehicular
accidents.
(2) Such accident reports and analysis or reports thereof shall be
available to the director of licensing, the department of
transportation, the utilities and transportation commission, the
traffic safety commission, and other public entities authorized by the
chief of the Washington state patrol, or their duly authorized
representatives, for further tabulation and analysis for pertinent data
relating to the regulation of highway traffic, highway construction,
vehicle operators and all other purposes, and to publish information so
derived as may be deemed of publication value.
(3) Such accident reports and information and any statistical
analysis thereof under this section shall be available from the
Washington state patrol to the general public upon request under the
provisions of chapter 42.17 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.52.080 and 1979 c 158 s 162 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All required accident reports and supplemental reports and
copies thereof shall be without prejudice to the individual so
reporting and shall be for the confidential use of the county
prosecuting attorney and chief of police or county sheriff, as the case
may be, and the director of licensing and the chief of the Washington
state patrol, and other officer or commission as authorized by law,
except that any such officer shall disclose the names and addresses of
persons reported as involved in an accident or as witnesses thereto,
the vehicle license plate numbers and descriptions of vehicles
involved, and the date, time and location of an accident, to any person
who may have a proper interest therein, including the driver or drivers
involved, or the legal guardian thereof, the parent of a minor driver,
any person injured therein, the owner of vehicles or property damaged
thereby, or any authorized representative of such an interested party,
or the attorney or insurer thereof. No such accident report or copy
thereof shall be used as evidence in any trial, civil or criminal,
arising out of an accident, except that any officer above named for
receiving accident reports shall furnish, upon demand of any person who
has, or who claims to have, made such a report, or, upon demand of any
court, a certificate showing that a specified accident report has or
has not been made to the chief of the Washington state patrol solely to
prove a compliance or a failure to comply with the requirement that
such a report be made in the manner required by law: PROVIDED, That
the reports may be used as evidence when necessary to prosecute charges
filed in connection with a violation of RCW 46.52.088.
(2) This section does not apply to accident reports filed,
tabulated, and analyzed under RCW 46.52.060.

--- END ---