BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4463 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for property taxes paid during the calendar year.
(2) The credit is equal to:
(a)(i) Property taxes paid on new buildings, and land upon which
this property is located, built after December 1, 2003, and used
exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such
airplanes; or
(ii) Property taxes attributable to an increase in assessed value
due to the renovation or expansion, after December 1, 2003, of a
building used exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes; and
(b) An amount equal to property taxes paid on machinery and
equipment exempt under RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 ((used in
manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes))
and acquired after December 1, 2003, multiplied by a fraction. The
numerator of the fraction is the total taxable amount subject to the
tax imposed under RCW 82.04.260(13) and the denominator of the fraction
is the total taxable amount subject to the tax imposed under all
manufacturing classifications in chapter 82.04 RCW, required to be
reported on the person's returns for the calendar year before the
calendar year in which the credit under this section is earned. No
credit is available under this subsection (2)(b) if either the
numerator or the denominator of the fraction is zero. If the fraction
is greater than or equal to nine-tenths, then the fraction is rounded
to one. For purposes of this subsection, "returns" means the combined
excise tax returns for the calendar year.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "commercial passenger
airplane" and "component" have the meanings given in RCW 82.32.550.
(4) A person taking the credit under this section is subject to all
the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. In addition, the person must
report as required under RCW 82.32.545. A credit earned during one
calendar year may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred
in a subsequent calendar year, but may not be carried over a second
year. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(5) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person taking the credit under this section must report as required
under RCW 82.32.545.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---