BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.250 and 1996 c 191 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it shall
be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of each
professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of ((that)) every profession, occupation, or
business. The secretary shall from time to time establish the amount
of all application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination
fees, permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with
licensing or regulation of professions, occupations, or businesses
administered by the department. In fixing said fees, the secretary
shall set the fees for each program at a sufficient level to defray the
costs of administering that program. All such fees shall be fixed by
rule adopted by the secretary in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2)(a) The secretary shall set fees for all certified health
professions regulated by the department so that the fees are equal for
all certified health professions and are set at a sufficient level to
defray the costs of administering all certified health profession
programs.
(b) The secretary shall set fees for all registered health
professions regulated by the department so that the fees are equal for
all registered health professions and are set at a sufficient level to
defray the costs of administering all registered health profession
programs.
(c) The secretary shall set fees for all licensed health
professions regulated by the department so that the fees are equal for
all licensed health professions and are set at a sufficient level to
defray the costs of administering all licensed health profession
programs.

--- END ---