BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to provide tax exemptions to
assist ((dairy)) livestock farmers to comply with ((the dairy nutrient
management act,)) chapter 90.64 RCW, and to assist public or private
entities to establish and operate anaerobic digesters to treat
((dairy)) livestock nutrients on a regional or on-farm basis.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.890 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
eligible persons of services rendered in respect to operating,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of ((dairy)) livestock
nutrient management equipment and facilities, or to sales of tangible
personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of the
equipment and facilities. The equipment and facilities must be used
exclusively for activities necessary to maintain a ((dairy)) nutrient
management plan ((as)) required under chapter 90.64 RCW. This
exemption applies to sales made after the ((dairy)) nutrient management
plan is certified under chapter 90.64 RCW.
(2)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
department of agriculture must provide a list of eligible persons to
the department of revenue. The application must be in a form and
manner prescribed by the department and must contain information
regarding the location of the ((dairy)) livestock operation and other
information the department may require.
(b) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
RCW 82.12.890 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "((Dairy)) Livestock nutrient management equipment and
facilities" means machinery, equipment, and structures used in the
handling and treatment of ((dairy)) livestock manure, such as aerators,
agitators, alley scrapers, augers, dams, gutter cleaners, loaders,
lagoons, pipes, pumps, separators, and tanks. The term also includes
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of
the equipment and facilities, including repair and replacement parts.
(b) "Eligible person" means a person (i) licensed to produce milk
under chapter 15.36 RCW or (ii) holding a livestock national pollutant
discharge elimination system permit, who has a certified ((dairy))
livestock nutrient management plan by December 31, ((2003, as required
by chapter 90.64 RCW)) 2006.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.890 and 2003 c 5 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
by an eligible person of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of ((dairy)) livestock nutrient management
equipment and facilities, as defined in RCW 82.08.890, or to labor and
services rendered in respect to repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving eligible tangible personal property. The equipment and
facilities must be used exclusively for activities necessary to
maintain a ((dairy)) nutrient management plan as required under chapter
90.64 RCW. This exemption applies to the use of tangible personal
property or labor and services made after the ((dairy)) nutrient
management plan is certified under chapter 90.64 RCW. The exemption
certificate and recordkeeping requirements of RCW 82.08.890 apply to
this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.08.900 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to an
eligible person establishing or operating an anaerobic digester or to
services rendered in respect to installing, constructing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving an anaerobic digester, or to sales of
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of
the anaerobic digester. The anaerobic digester must be used primarily
to treat ((dairy)) livestock manure.
(2)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department
and must contain information regarding the location of the facility and
other information as the department may require.
(b) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
RCW 82.12.900 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Anaerobic digester" means a facility that processes manure
from ((cattle)) livestock into biogas and dried manure using
microorganisms in a decomposition process within a closed, oxygen-free
container.
(b) "Eligible person" means any person establishing or operating an
anaerobic digester to treat primarily ((dairy)) livestock manure.
(c) "Primarily" means more than fifty percent measured by volume or
weight.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.12.900 and 2003 c 5 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of anaerobic digesters, tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of anaerobic digesters, or the use of services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving eligible tangible personal property by an eligible person
establishing or operating an anaerobic digester, as defined in RCW
82.08.900. The anaerobic digester must be used primarily to treat
((dairy)) livestock manure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---