BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that two-thirds of
teen passenger deaths occur when another teen is driving. The
legislature finds that states with teenage driver restrictions
experience a decrease in teenage car crashes. The legislature further
finds that teenagers are often distracted when other teens are in the
vehicle. The purpose of this act is to reduce vehicle collisions by
providing penalties for the number of teenage passengers in a vehicle
with a teenage driver.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.267 and 2000 c 115 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a person issued an intermediate license is convicted of or
found to have committed a traffic offense described in chapter 46.61
RCW or violated restrictions placed on an intermediate license under
RCW 46.20.075:
(((1))) (a) On the first such conviction or finding, the
((department shall mail the parent or guardian of the person a letter
warning the person of the provisions of this section)) department shall
suspend the person's intermediate license for a period of six months or
until the person reaches eighteen years of age, whichever occurs first,
and mail the parent or guardian of the person a notification of the
suspension;
(((2))) (b) On the second such conviction or finding, the
department shall again suspend the person's intermediate ((driver's))
license for ((a)) an additional period of six months beginning on the
date of the conviction or finding or until the person reaches eighteen
years of age, whichever occurs first, and mail the parent or guardian
of the person a notification of the suspension;
(((3))) (c) On the third such conviction or finding, the department
shall suspend the person's intermediate ((driver's)) license until the
person reaches eighteen years of age, and mail the parent or guardian
of the person a notification of the suspension.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a single ticket for one or
more traffic offenses constitutes a single traffic offense.

--- END ---