BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature finds that: (i) With increasing demands for
public services and limited resources for additional state personnel,
the state needs to be more effective and responsive in ensuring that
parents meet their child support obligations; and (ii) private and
nonprofit entities are able to provide high quality services more cost-effectively than the state because of management flexibility and better
access to technology.
(b) The purpose of this section is to improve customer service,
increase collection of child support owed to custodial parents, and
improve the lives of affected children.
(2) By July 1, 2005, the secretary shall initiate a process under
RCW 41.06.142 (1), (4), and (5) for the purpose of contracting with one
or more private or nonprofit entities or employee business units, as
defined in RCW 41.06.142, for services in administering all aspects of
child support enforcement functions under this chapter and chapter
74.20A RCW. However, the requirement in RCW 41.06.142(1)(e) for
determining savings or efficiency improvements shall be deemed to be
satisfied if the successful bidder or bidders for the contract
reasonably demonstrate the methods by which savings or efficiency
improvements, or both, will be achieved.
(3) The secretary shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to
implement this section, including but not limited to:
(a) Providing for the reimbursement of the contractors, but such
reimbursement may not:
(i) Exceed the administrative cost per child support dollar
collected by the department in the fiscal year preceding the year in
which the contract becomes effective; or
(ii) Be made from child support collections;
(b) Requiring the contractor to offer employment upon terms deemed
fair by the secretary to any existing state employee affected by the
transfer of child support enforcement responsibilities and to retain,
unless there is cause for dismissal, any employees who accept the
offer. However, the contractor is not bound to any collective
bargaining agreement that may be applicable to the affected employees
at the time of the transfer, and the contractor is not a successor to
any bargaining obligations that may have applied to the state under
chapter 41.80 RCW at the time of the transfer; and
(c) Providing for the orderly transition of child support
enforcement functions to one or more contractors selected under this
section.
(4) The transfer of all aspects of child support enforcement to one
or more contractors must be completed by July 1, 2006.
(5) Beginning December 1, 2007, and each December 1st thereafter,
the secretary must report to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the operation and performance of the
program contracted under this section. The report must include an
assessment of the effectiveness and success of the contracted program
in enhancing child support collection and provide any plans or
recommendations for improving the effectiveness and success of the
contracted program in achieving the purposes of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.80 RCW
to read as follows:
A contractor under section 1 of this act is not a successor to any
bargaining obligations that may have applied to the state under this
chapter at the time of the transfer required under section 1 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---