BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. Counties provide
regional services to all residents living in both incorporated and
unincorporated areas. They also provide an array of additional local
governmental services to those living in unincorporated areas. Those
services often include sheriff patrols, misdemeanor prosecution, public
defense, district courts, misdemeanant detention, land use regulation
and oversight, parks and recreation facilities, and road construction
and maintenance.
Counties across Washington are facing difficult budget challenges
in providing all of these services. These challenges are especially
difficult in counties that include urban areas. The challenges are
further exacerbated by unincorporated urban "islands" -- areas of urban
density and service demands that remain unincorporated because
surrounding cities lack the incentives to annex them.
The legislature therefore finds that it is in the best interest of
the people of the state of Washington to be able to establish urban
impact districts as municipal corporations and independent taxing units
to address the particular needs of unincorporated areas that are
characterized by urban growth and demand for urban governmental
services. These districts are intended to facilitate the annexation or
incorporation of unincorporated areas that lie within designated urban
growth areas and to provide resources to support the provision of urban
governmental services to areas that remain unincorporated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter.
(1) "Annexation priority neighborhood" means an unincorporated area
characterized by urban growth and/or a demand for urban governmental
services, as those terms are defined in RCW 36.70A.030, that a county
legislative authority has, by resolution or ordinance, designated as a
priority for annexation or incorporation into one or more cities.
(2) "Local governmental services" includes county rural
governmental services, county urban governmental services, and those
services historically and typically provided by city government to its
residents.
(3) "Urban governmental services" or "urban services" has the
meaning given in RCW 36.70A.030.
(4) "Utility service" means a light and power business or a natural
gas distribution business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010; a telephone
business, as defined in RCW 82.04.065; cable television services; sewer
or water services; drainage services; solid waste services; steam
services; and any other business or service traditionally taxed as a
utility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 URBAN IMPACT DISTRICT--AUTHORIZED--BOUNDARIES--POWERS--GOVERNING BOARD. (1) The legislative authority of
any county that is required to plan under chapter 36.70A RCW is
authorized to establish one or more urban impact districts within the
county for the purpose of: (a) Providing significant incentives and
financial support to cities to promote annexation of unincorporated
areas that lie within designated urban growth areas; (b) providing
incentives and financial support to new cities that may be incorporated
within such areas; and (c) providing resources to support the provision
by the county of urban governmental services to areas that remain
outside of incorporated cities.
(2) An urban impact district shall include all unincorporated
territory within its boundaries that is designated as an urban growth
area pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, and shall not include any area
within the corporate limits of a city or town. The county legislative
authority may modify the boundaries of the urban impact district,
consistent with these requirements, by the same procedure used to
establish the boundaries of the district.
(3) The county legislative authority shall be the governing board
of an urban impact district. The electors of an urban impact district
shall be all registered voters residing within the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 URBAN IMPACT DISTRICT--ESTABLISHMENT,
MODIFICATION, OR DISSOLUTION--HEARING--NOTICE. (1) A county
legislative authority proposing to establish an urban impact district,
or to modify an existing urban impact district, shall conduct a hearing
at the time and place specified in a notice published at least once not
less than fifteen days prior to the hearing in a newspaper of general
circulation within the proposed urban impact district. This notice
shall be in addition to any other notice required by law to be
published. Additional notice of such hearing may be given by mail,
posting within the proposed urban impact district, or in any manner
local authorities deem advisable to notify affected persons. All
hearings shall be public and the county legislative authority shall
hear objections from any person affected by the formation or
modification of the urban impact district and make such changes in the
boundaries of the district or any other modifications that the county
legislative authority deems necessary.
(2) No urban impact district shall be established within a county
unless the county legislative authority determines, following a hearing
held pursuant to this section, that it is in the public interest to
form the district and the county legislative authority adopts an
ordinance creating the urban impact district and establishing its
boundaries. The creation of an urban impact district is not subject to
review by a boundary review board under chapter 36.93 RCW.
Notwithstanding any other statute or county charter provision, the
creation of an urban impact district shall not be the subject of a
local initiative or be subject to local referendum.
(3) The governing board of an urban impact district may dissolve
the district by holding public hearings in the same manner required for
formation of the district and adopting a resolution declaring that the
district has wound up its affairs. Alternatively, an urban impact
district shall be automatically dissolved upon annexation of all of the
territory included within the district into one or more cities and the
adoption of a resolution of its governing board declaring that the
district has wound up its affairs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 URBAN IMPACT DISTRICT--POWERS--RESTRICTIONS--EXCISE TAX. (1) An urban impact district is a quasi-municipal corporation, an independent taxing authority within the
meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a
taxing district within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution. An urban impact district shall constitute a body
corporate and shall possess all the usual powers of a corporation for
public purposes as well as all other powers that may now or hereafter
be specifically conferred by statute, including, but not limited to,
the power to enter into contracts, to sue and be sued, and all other
powers necessary or incident to carrying out its purpose. An urban
impact district shall not have the power of eminent domain. An urban
impact district may, by interlocal agreement or otherwise: (a) Make
payments, with or without consideration, to a county for the support of
urban governmental services; and (b) make annexation incentive payments
to one or more cities to offset costs connected with annexation of the
area and costs related to extending municipal services and
infrastructure to the residents of the district. Nothing in this
chapter permits urban impact districts to provide local governmental
services except indirectly, by contracting with a county or city to
support those services provided by the county or city.
(2) An urban impact district may, by resolution of the governing
board, levy and collect an excise tax on the privilege of engaging in
any business that provides a utility service to customers within the
district. This utility tax shall be measured by the gross receipts or
gross income received from the business of providing a utility service
to customers within the district, and shall not exceed a maximum rate
of five percent except with the approval of a majority of the electors
residing in the district. Voter approval shall not otherwise be
required.
(3) All money received by an urban impact district shall be used
exclusively for district purposes as follows:
(a)(i) For a period of twenty-four months following the date that
a district first collects any utility tax under this chapter, the
district shall create one or more special funds or accounts for the
support of: (A) Specific annexation priority neighborhoods, and (B)
one or more urban services areas, which may be identified individually
or as a class. All utility tax revenues received by the district shall
be allocated to these funds or accounts on such basis as the district
governing board shall determine, after considering factors such as:
The number of residents in the corresponding area, the amount of
utility gross receipts generated by utility customers within that area,
the cost of providing local governmental services in the area, or any
other factor deemed reasonable.
(ii) Money in any fund or account for a specific annexation
priority neighborhood shall be used to provide incentive payments to
cities to encourage annexation of that neighborhood. Incentive
payments authorized by this section shall be determined by interlocal
agreement between the district and the city or cities annexing the
neighborhood, and shall be authorized only in relation to annexations
with effective dates earlier than thirty months from the date the
utility tax is first collected. Any funds remaining unused in an
annexation priority neighborhood fund or account more than thirty
months after the date of first collection may be transferred to an
urban services area fund or account and used for the purposes of that
account.
(iii) Money in any fund or account for an urban services area may
be used to: (A) Provide incentive payments to cities to encourage
annexation of areas within the urban services area; (B) supplement
annexation incentive payments for an annexation priority neighborhood
under (a)(ii) of this subsection; or (C) support urban governmental
services.
(b) Upon the expiration of the twenty-four-month period described
in (a) of this subsection, the district governing board may cease
allocating revenues into separately designated funds or accounts, in
which case utility tax revenues may be used for any proper district
purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are not
any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 CODIFICATION. Sections 1 through 7 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

--- END ---