BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 5.60.060 and 2001 c 286 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A husband shall not be examined for or against his wife,
without the consent of the wife, nor a wife for or against her husband
without the consent of the husband; nor can either during marriage or
afterward, be without the consent of the other, examined as to any
communication made by one to the other during marriage. But this
exception shall not apply to a civil action or proceeding by one
against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime
committed by one against the other, nor to a criminal action or
proceeding against a spouse if the marriage occurred subsequent to the
filing of formal charges against the defendant, nor to a criminal
action or proceeding for a crime committed by said husband or wife
against any child of whom said husband or wife is the parent or
guardian, nor to a proceeding under chapter 70.96A, 71.05, or 71.09
RCW: PROVIDED, That the spouse of a person sought to be detained under
chapter 70.96A, 71.05, or 71.09 RCW may not be compelled to testify and
shall be so informed by the court prior to being called as a witness.
(2)(a) An attorney or counselor shall not, without the consent of
his or her client, be examined as to any communication made by the
client to him or her, or his or her advice given thereon in the course
of professional employment.
(b) A parent or guardian of a minor child arrested on a criminal
charge may not be examined as to a communication between the child and
his or her attorney if the communication was made in the presence of
the parent or guardian. This privilege does not extend to
communications made prior to the arrest.
(3) A member of the clergy or a priest shall not, without the
consent of a person making the confession, be examined as to any
confession made to him or her in his or her professional character, in
the course of discipline enjoined by the church to which he or she
belongs.
(4) Subject to the limitations under RCW 70.96A.140 or 71.05.250,
a physician or surgeon or osteopathic physician or surgeon or podiatric
physician or surgeon shall not, without the consent of his or her
patient, be examined in a civil action as to any information acquired
in attending such patient, which was necessary to enable him or her to
prescribe or act for the patient, except as follows:
(a) In any judicial proceedings regarding a child's injury,
neglect, or sexual abuse or the cause thereof; and
(b) Ninety days after filing an action for personal injuries or
wrongful death, the claimant shall be deemed to waive the physician-patient privilege. Waiver of the physician-patient privilege for any
one physician or condition constitutes a waiver of the privilege as to
all physicians or conditions, subject to such limitations as a court
may impose pursuant to court rules.
(5) A public officer shall not be examined as a witness as to
communications made to him or her in official confidence, when the
public interest would suffer by the disclosure.
(6)(a) A peer support group counselor shall not, without consent of
the law enforcement officer making the communication, be compelled to
testify about any communication made to the counselor by the officer
while receiving counseling. The counselor must be designated as such
by the sheriff, police chief, or chief of the Washington state patrol,
prior to the incident that results in counseling. The privilege only
applies when the communication was made to the counselor while acting
in his or her capacity as a peer support group counselor. The
privilege does not apply if the counselor was an initial responding
officer, a witness, or a party to the incident which prompted the
delivery of peer support group counseling services to the law
enforcement officer.
(b) For purposes of this section, "peer support group counselor"
means a:
(i) Law enforcement officer, or civilian employee of a law
enforcement agency, who has received training to provide emotional and
moral support and counseling to an officer who needs those services as
a result of an incident in which the officer was involved while acting
in his or her official capacity; or
(ii) Nonemployee counselor who has been designated by the sheriff,
police chief, or chief of the Washington state patrol to provide
emotional and moral support and counseling to an officer who needs
those services as a result of an incident in which the officer was
involved while acting in his or her official capacity.
(7) A sexual assault advocate may not, without the consent of the
victim, be examined as to any communication made by the victim to the
sexual assault advocate.
(a) For purposes of this section, "sexual assault advocate" means
the employee or volunteer from a rape crisis center, victim assistance
unit, program, or association, that provides information, medical or
legal advocacy, counseling, or support to victims of sexual assault,
who is designated by the victim to accompany the victim to the hospital
or other health care facility and to proceedings concerning the alleged
assault, including police and prosecution interviews and court
proceedings.
(b) A sexual assault advocate may disclose a confidential
communication without the consent of the victim if failure to disclose
is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk of serious physical
injury or death of the victim or another person. Any sexual assault
advocate participating in good faith in the disclosing of records and
communications under this section shall have immunity from any
liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the
action. In any proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a
disclosure under this section, the good faith of the sexual assault
advocate who disclosed the confidential communication shall be
presumed.
(8) A domestic violence advocate may not, without the consent of
the victim, be examined as to any communication made by the victim to
the domestic violence advocate.
(a) For purposes of this section, "domestic violence advocate"
means the employee or volunteer from a domestic violence shelter,
victim assistance unit, program, or association, that provides
information, medical or legal advocacy, counseling, or support to
victims of domestic violence, who is designated by the victim to
accompany the victim to proceedings concerning the alleged acts of
domestic violence, including police and prosecution interviews, court
proceedings, and to the hospital or other health care facility.
(b) A domestic violence advocate may disclose a confidential
communication without the consent of the victim if failure to disclose
is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk of serious physical
injury or death of the victim or another person. Any domestic violence
advocate participating in good faith in the disclosing of records and
communications under this section is immune from any liability, civil,
criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the action. In any
proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a disclosure under this
section, the good faith of the domestic violence advocate who disclosed
the confidential communication shall be presumed.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.123.020 and 1991 c 301 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Shelter" means a place of temporary refuge, offered on a
twenty-four hour, seven day per week basis to victims of domestic
violence and their children.
(2) "Domestic violence" is a categorization of offenses, as defined
in RCW 10.99.020, committed by one cohabitant against another.
(3) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(4) "Victim" means a cohabitant who has been subjected to domestic
violence.
(5) "Cohabitant" means a person who is married or who is cohabiting
with a person of the opposite sex like husband and wife at the present
or at sometime in the past. Any person who has one or more children in
common with another person, regardless of whether they have been
married or lived together at any time, shall be treated as a
cohabitant.
(6) "Community advocate" means a person employed by a local
domestic violence program to provide ongoing assistance to victims of
domestic violence in assessing safety needs, documenting the incidents
and the extent of violence for possible use in the legal system, making
appropriate social service referrals, and developing protocols and
maintaining ongoing contacts necessary for local systems coordination.
(7) "Domestic violence program" means an agency that provides
shelter, advocacy, and counseling, or advocacy and counseling, for
domestic violence victims in a supportive environment.
(8) "Legal advocate" means a person employed by a domestic violence
program or court system to advocate for victims of domestic violence,
within the criminal and civil justice systems, by attending court
proceedings, assisting in document and case preparation, and ensuring
linkage with the community advocate.
(9) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services or the secretary's designee.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.123.030 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 235 are each
amended to read as follows:
The department of social and health services, in consultation with
the state department of health, and individuals or groups having
experience and knowledge of the problems of victims of domestic
violence, shall:
(1) Establish minimum standards for shelters applying for grants
from the department under this chapter. Classifications may be made
dependent upon size, geographic location, and population needs;
(2) Establish minimum standards for domestic violence programs that
apply for grants under this chapter;
(3) Receive grant applications for the development and
establishment of ((shelters)) domestic violence programs for victims of
domestic violence;
(((3))) (4) Distribute funds, within forty-five days after
approval, to those ((shelters)) domestic violence programs meeting
departmental standards;
(((4))) (5) Evaluate biennially each ((shelter)) domestic violence
program receiving departmental funds for compliance with the
established minimum standards; and
(((5))) (6) Review the minimum standards each biennium to ensure
applicability to community and client needs.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.123.040 and 1979 ex.s. c 245 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Minimum standards established by the department under RCW
70.123.030 shall ensure that shelters receiving grants under this
chapter provide services meeting basic survival needs, where not
provided by other means, such as, but not limited to, food, clothing,
housing, safety, security, client advocacy, client confidentiality, and
counseling. These services shall be problem-oriented and designed to
provide necessary assistance to the victims of domestic violence and
their children.
(2) Minimum standards established by the department under RCW
70.123.030 regarding domestic violence programs shall ensure that
domestic violence programs receiving grants under this chapter provide
services designed to enhance safety and security by means such as, but
not limited to, client advocacy, client confidentiality, and
counseling.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.123 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as authorized in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, a domestic violence program, an individual who assists a
domestic violence program in the delivery of services, or an agent,
employee, or volunteer of a domestic violence program may not disclose
information about a recipient of shelter, advocacy, or counseling
services without the informed authorization of the recipient. In the
case of an unemancipated minor, the minor and the parent or guardian
must provide the authorization.
(2)(a) A recipient of shelter, advocacy, or counseling services may
authorize a domestic violence program to disclose information about the
recipient. The authorization must be in writing, signed by the
recipient, or if an unemancipated minor is the recipient, signed by the
minor and the parent or guardian, and must contain a reasonable time
limit on the duration of the recipient's authorization. If the
authorization does not contain a date upon which the authorization to
disclose information expires, the recipient's authorization will expire
ninety days after the date it was signed.
(b) The domestic violence program's disclosure of information shall
be only to the extent authorized by the recipient. The domestic
violence program, if requested, shall provide a copy of the disclosed
information to the recipient.
(c) Except as provided under this chapter, an authorization is not
a waiver of the recipient's rights or privileges under other statutes,
rules of evidence, or common law.
(3) If disclosure of a recipient's information is required by
statute or court order, the domestic violence program shall make
reasonable attempts to provide notice to the recipient affected by the
disclosure of information. If personally identifying information is or
will be disclosed, the domestic violence program shall take steps
necessary to protect the privacy and safety of the persons affected by
the disclosure of the information.
(4) To comply with tribal, federal, state, or territorial
reporting, evaluation, or data collection requirements, domestic
violence programs may share data in the aggregate that does not contain
personal identifying information and that: (a) Pertains to services to
their clients; or (b) is demographic information.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.04.060 and 1987 c 435 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) For the protection of applicants and recipients, the
department and the county offices and their respective officers and
employees are prohibited, except as hereinafter provided, from
disclosing the contents of any records, files, papers and
communications, except for purposes directly connected with the
administration of the programs of this title. In any judicial
proceeding, except such proceeding as is directly concerned with the
administration of these programs, such records, files, papers and
communications, and their contents, shall be deemed privileged
communications and except for the right of any individual to inquire of
the office whether a named individual is a recipient of welfare
assistance and such person shall be entitled to an affirmative or
negative answer, unless such answer is likely to impair the safety of
past or current victims of domestic violence or stalking. The
secretary shall adopt rules to establish procedures to protect the
confidentiality and prevent the disclosure of information that may
impair the safety of past and current victims of domestic violence and
stalking. At a minimum, the rules shall address the sharing of
information among state agencies and other partners and modifying or
improving existing data bases to protect from unauthorized information
sharing and disclosure.
((However,)) (b) Upon written request of a parent who has been
awarded visitation rights in an action for divorce or separation or any
parent with legal custody of the child, the department shall disclose
to him or her the last known address and location of his or her natural
or adopted children. The secretary shall adopt rules which establish
procedures for disclosing the address of the children and providing,
when appropriate, for prior notice to the custodian of the children.
The notice shall state that a request for disclosure has been received
and will be complied with by the department unless the department
receives a copy of a court order which enjoins the disclosure of the
information or restricts or limits the requesting party's right to
contact or visit the other party or the child. Information supplied to
a parent by the department shall be used only for purposes directly
related to the enforcement of the visitation and custody provisions of
the court order of separation or decree of divorce. No parent shall
disclose such information to any other person except for the purpose of
enforcing visitation provisions of the said order or decree.
(2) The county offices shall maintain monthly at their offices a
report showing the names and addresses of all recipients in the county
receiving public assistance under this title, together with the amount
paid to each during the preceding month.
(3) The provisions of this section shall not apply to duly
designated representatives of approved private welfare agencies, public
officials, members of legislative interim committees and advisory
committees when performing duties directly connected with the
administration of this title, such as regulation and investigation
directly connected therewith: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That any information
so obtained by such persons or groups shall be treated with such degree
of confidentiality as is required by the federal social security law.
(4) It shall be unlawful, except as provided in this section, for
any person, body, association, firm, corporation or other agency to
solicit, publish, disclose, receive, make use of, or to authorize,
knowingly permit, participate in or acquiesce in the use of any lists
or names for commercial or political purposes of any nature. The
violation of this section shall be a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---