BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state needs
to reestablish itself as a leader in public transportation.
The legislature also finds that increased demands on transportation
resources require increased coordination among public transportation
service providers.
The legislature also finds that the efficiency of transportation
corridors would be enhanced by a more proactive and integrated approach
to public transportation service delivery and planning.
The legislature also finds that the state department of
transportation is in the unique position of being able to improve
connectivity between service territories of transit agencies and modes
of transportation.
The legislature also finds that the state should be a center of
excellence in public transportation planning and research and providing
technical assistance to transit agencies serving urban, suburban, and
rural areas.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that the state
department of transportation be a leader in public transportation. The
department shall play a guiding role in coordinating decentralized
public transportation services, increasing connectivity between them,
advocating for public transportation as a means to increase corridor
efficiency, and increasing the integration of public transportation and
the highway system.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.01.081 and 1984 c 48 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Initially the department shall be organized into divisions,
including the division of highways, the division of public
transportation, the division of aeronautics, the division of marine
transportation, and the division of transportation planning and budget.
(2) The secretary may reorganize divisions in order to attain the
maximum possible efficiency in the operation of the department. Each
division shall be headed by an assistant secretary to be appointed by
the secretary. The secretary may also appoint a deputy secretary as
may be needed for the performance of the duties and functions vested in
the department and may also appoint up to twelve ferry system
management positions as defined in RCW 47.64.011. The secretary may
delegate to officers within the several divisions of the department
authority to employ personnel necessary to discharge the
responsibilities of the department. The secretary shall establish an
office of transit mobility to strive to ensure the integration of
decentralized public transportation services with the state
transportation system. The director of the office must report directly
to the secretary.
(3) The officers appointed under this section shall be exempt from
the provisions of the state civil service law and shall be paid
salaries to be fixed by the governor in accordance with the procedure
established by law for the fixing of salaries for officers exempt from
the operation of the state civil service law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The primary goals of the office of transit mobility are to
facilitate: (a) Connection and coordination of transit services and
planning; and (b) maximizing opportunities to use public transportation
to improve the efficiency of transportation corridors.
(2) The duties of the office include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(a) Developing a statewide strategic plan that creates common goals
for transit agencies and reduces competing plans for cross-jurisdictional service;
(b) Developing a park and ride lot program;
(c) Encouraging long-range transit planning;
(d) Providing public transportation expertise to improve linkages
between regional transportation planning organizations and transit
agencies;
(e) Strengthening policies for inclusion of transit and
transportation demand management strategies in route development,
corridor plan standards, and budget proposals;
(f) Providing staff assistance to the regional mobility steering
committee established in section 5 of this act. Periodically, the
office of transit mobility shall report to the steering committee,
identifying needs for increased transit and multimodal coordination and
corridor efficiency;
(g) Developing standards to integrate transit and demand management
strategies with regional and local land use plans in order to reduce
traffic and improve mobility and access;
(h) Producing recommendations for the public transportation section
of the Washington transportation plan; and
(i) Participating in all aspects of corridor planning, including
freight planning, ferry system planning, and passenger rail planning.
(3) In forming the office, the secretary shall use existing
resources to the greatest extent possible. Specifically, the office of
transit mobility shall take over functions as appropriate from the
division of public transportation and rail and the urban planning
office, including but not limited to the administration of the commute
trip reduction program, special needs transportation grants, planning
and construction of high-occupancy vehicle lanes, and planning and
construction of high-occupancy toll lanes.
(4) The office of transit mobility shall establish measurable
performance objectives for evaluating the success of its initiatives
and progress toward accomplishing the overall goals of the office. The
office is subject to review by the transportation performance audit
board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Local and regional transportation agencies shall adopt common
transportation goals. The office of transit mobility shall review
local and regional transportation plans, including plans required under
RCW 35.58.2795, 36.70A.070(6), 36.70A.210, and 47.80.023, to provide
for the efficient integration of multimodal and multijurisdictional
transportation planning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 47.66 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The regional mobility steering committee is created. The
committee is composed of twelve voting members and four nonvoting,
legislative members.
(2) The twelve voting members are the secretary of transportation
or a designee, the director of the transportation improvement board or
a designee, and ten members appointed by the governor as follows:
(a) Three representatives of transit agencies, one from an urban
area with a population more than five hundred thousand, one from an
area with a population of one hundred thousand to five hundred
thousand, and one from an area with a population less than one hundred
thousand;
(b) One representative of nonmotorized transportation interests;
(c) One representative of transit users;
(d) One representative of commute trip reduction users;
(e) One representative from a regional transportation planning
organization;
(f) One representative of counties;
(g) One representative of cities; and
(h) One representative from a labor union that represents the most
transit workers in this state.
(3) The four nonvoting members are legislators as follows:
(a) Two members from the house of representatives, one from each of
the two largest caucuses, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(b) Two members from the senate, one from each of the two largest
caucuses, appointed by the president of the senate.
(4) Gubernatorial appointees of the committee serve two-year terms.
Members may not receive compensation for their service on the
committee, but will be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses
incurred in performing their duties as members as set forth in RCW
43.03.220.
(5) The secretary of transportation or a designee shall serve as
the chair.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.66.030 and 1996 c 49 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1)(a))) The ((transportation improvement board)) regional
mobility steering committee is authorized and responsible for the final
selection of programs and projects funded from the central Puget Sound
public transportation account; public transportation systems account;
and ((the intermodal surface transportation and efficiency act of 1991,
surface transportation program, statewide competitive)) twenty-two
percent of the surface transportation program flexible funds authorized
by the Transportation Equity Act for the Twenty-first Century and the
successor to that act.
(((b))) The ((board)) steering committee may establish
subcommittees as well as technical advisory committees to carry out the
mandates of this chapter.
(((2) Expenses of the board, including administrative expenses for
managing the program, shall be paid in accordance with RCW 47.26.140.))

Sec. 7 RCW 47.66.040 and 1995 c 269 s 2606 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((transportation improvement board)) regional mobility
steering committee shall select programs and projects based on a
competitive process consistent with the mandates governing each account
or source of funds. The competition shall be consistent with the
following criteria:
(a) Local, regional, and state transportation plans;
(b) Local transit development plans; and
(c) Local comprehensive land use plans.
(2) The following criteria shall be considered by the ((board))
steering committee in selecting programs and projects:
(a) Objectives of the growth management act, the high capacity
transportation act, the commute trip reduction act, transportation
demand management programs, federal and state air quality requirements,
and federal Americans with Disabilities Act and related state
accessibility requirements; and
(b) Enhancing the efficiency of regional corridors in moving people
among jurisdictions and modes of transportation, energy efficiency
issues, reducing delay for people and goods, freight and goods movement
as related to economic development, regional significance, rural
isolation, the leveraging of other funds ((including funds administered
by this board)), and safety and security issues.
(3) The ((board)) steering committee shall determine the
appropriate level of local match required for each program and project
based on the source of funds.

--- END ---