BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that it is
important that dependent persons who are witnesses and victims of crime
cooperate with law enforcement and prosecutorial agencies and that
their assistance contributes to state and local enforcement efforts and
the general effectiveness of the criminal justice system. The
legislature finds that the state has an interest in making it possible
for courts to adequately and fairly conduct cases involving dependent
persons who are victims of crimes. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature, by means of this chapter, to insure that all dependent
persons who are victims and witnesses of crime are treated with
sensitivity, courtesy, and special care and that their rights be
protected by law enforcement agencies, prosecutors, and judges in a
manner no less vigorous than the protection afforded to other victims,
witnesses, and criminal defendants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Crime" means an act punishable as a felony, gross misdemeanor,
or misdemeanor under the laws of this state or equivalent federal or
local law.
(2) "Dependent person" has the same meaning as that term is defined
in RCW 9A.42.010.
(3) "Victim" means a living person against whom a crime has been
committed.
(4) "Witness" means a person who has been or is expected to be
summoned to testify for the prosecution or defense in a criminal
action, or who by reason of having relevant information is subject to
call or likely to be called as a witness, whether or not an action or
proceeding has been commenced.
(5) "Family member" means a person who is not accused of a crime
and who is an adult child, adult sibling, spouse, parent, or legal
guardian of the dependent person.
(6) "Advocate" means any person not accused of a crime, including
a family member, approved by the witness or victim, in consultation
with his or her guardian if applicable, who provides support to a
dependent person during any legal proceeding.
(7) "Court proceedings" means any court proceeding conducted during
the course of the prosecution of a crime committed against a dependent
person, including pretrial hearings, trial, sentencing, or appellate
proceedings.
(8) "Identifying information" means the dependent person's name,
address, location, and photograph, and in cases in which the dependent
person is a relative of the alleged perpetrator, identification of the
relationship between the dependent person and the alleged perpetrator.
(9) "Crime victim/witness program" means any crime victim and
witness program of a county or local law enforcement agency or
prosecutor's office, any rape crisis center's sexual assault victim
advocacy program as provided in chapter 70.125 RCW, any domestic
violence program's legal and community advocate program for domestic
violence victims as provided in chapter 70.123 RCW, or any other crime
victim advocacy program which provides trained advocates to assist
crime victims during the investigation and prosecution of the crime.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) In addition to the rights of victims and
witnesses provided for in RCW 7.69.030, there shall be every reasonable
effort made by law enforcement agencies, prosecutors, and judges to
assure that dependent persons who are victims or witnesses are afforded
the rights enumerated in this section. The enumeration of rights under
this chapter shall not be construed to create substantive rights and
duties, and the application of an enumerated right in an individual
case is subject to the discretion of the law enforcement agency,
prosecutor, or judge. Dependent persons who are victims or witnesses
in the criminal justice system have the following rights, which apply
to any criminal court or juvenile court proceeding:
(a) To have explained in language easily understood by the
dependent person, all legal proceedings and police investigations in
which the dependent person may be involved.
(b) With respect to a dependent person who is a victim of a sex or
violent crime, to have a crime victim advocate from a crime
victim/witness program, or any other advocate of the victim's choosing,
present at any prosecutorial or defense interviews with the dependent
person. This subsection applies unless it creates undue hardship and
if the presence of the crime victim advocate or other advocate does not
cause any unnecessary delay in the investigation or prosecution of the
case. The role of the crime victim advocate or other advocate is to
provide emotional support to the dependent person and to promote the
dependent person's feelings of security and safety.
(c) To be provided, whenever possible, a secure waiting area during
court proceedings and to have an advocate or support person remain with
the dependent person prior to and during any court proceedings.
(d) To allow an advocate to make recommendations to the prosecuting
attorney about the ability of the dependent person to cooperate with
prosecution and the potential effect of the proceedings on the
dependent person.
(e) To allow an advocate to provide information to the court
concerning the dependent person's ability to understand the nature of
the proceedings.
(f) To be provided information or appropriate referrals to social
service agencies to assist the dependent person with the emotional
impact of the crime, the subsequent investigation, and judicial
proceedings in which the dependent person is involved.
(g) To allow an advocate to be present in court while the dependent
person testifies in order to provide emotional support to the dependent
person.
(h) To provide information to the court as to the need for the
presence of other supportive persons at the court proceedings while the
dependent person testifies in order to promote the dependent person's
feelings of security and safety.
(i) To allow law enforcement agencies the opportunity to enlist the
assistance of other professional personnel such as victim advocates or
prosecutorial staff trained in the interviewing of the dependent
person.
(j) With respect to a dependent person who is a victim of a violent
or sex crime, to receive either directly or through the dependent
person's legal guardian, if applicable, at the time of reporting the
crime to law enforcement officials, a written statement of the rights
of dependent persons as provided in this chapter. The statement may be
paraphrased to make it more easily understood. The written statement
shall include the name, address, and telephone number of a county or
local crime victim/witness program, if such a crime victim/witness
program exists in the county.
(2) Any party may request a preliminary hearing for the purpose of
establishing accommodations for the dependent person consistent with,
but not limited to, the rights enumerated in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The prosecutor or defense may file a
motion with the court at any time prior to commencement of the trial
for an order authorizing the taking of a video tape deposition for the
purpose of preserving the direct testimony of the moving party's
witness if that witness is a dependent person.
(2) The court may grant the motion if the moving party shows that
it is likely that the dependent person will be unavailable to testify
at a subsequent trial. The court's finding shall be based upon, at a
minimum, recommendations from the dependent person's physician or any
other person having direct contact with the dependent person and whose
recommendations are based on specific behavioral indicators exhibited
by the dependent person.
(3) The moving party shall provide reasonable written notice to the
other party of the motion and order, if granted, pursuant to superior
court criminal rules for depositions.
(4) Both parties shall have an opportunity to be present at the
deposition and the nonmoving party shall have the opportunity to cross-examine the dependent person.
(5) Under circumstances permitted by the rules of evidence, the
deposition may be introduced as evidence in a subsequent proceeding if
the dependent person is unavailable at trial and both the prosecutor
and the defendant had notice of and an opportunity to participate in
the taking of the deposition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) On motion of the prosecuting attorney in
a criminal proceeding, the court may order that a dependent person may
testify in a room outside the presence of the defendant or the jury, or
both, while one-way closed circuit television equipment simultaneously
projects the dependent person's testimony into another room so the
defendant or the jury, or both, can watch and hear the dependent person
testify if:
(a) The testimony is taken during the court proceeding;
(b) The court finds by substantial evidence, in a hearing conducted
outside the presence of the jury, that requiring the dependent person
to testify in the presence of the defendant or the jury, or both, will
cause the dependent person to suffer serious emotional or mental
distress that will prevent the dependent person from reasonably
communicating at the trial or that the dependent person will suffer
emotional or mental distress from testifying in the presence of the
defendant or the jury, or both. If the defendant is excluded from the
presence of the dependent person, the jury must also be excluded. If
the dependent person is able to testify in the presence of the
defendant but not the jury, the jury shall be excluded from the room
and the defendant shall remain in the room with the dependent person;
(c) The court finds that the prosecutor has made all reasonable
efforts to prepare the dependent person for testifying, including
informing the dependent person about community counseling services,
giving court tours, and explaining the trial process. If the
prosecutor fails to demonstrate that preparations were implemented or
the prosecutor in good faith attempted to implement them, the court
shall deny the motion;
(d) The court balances the strength of the state's case without the
testimony of the dependent person against the defendant's
constitutional rights and the degree of infringement of the closed-circuit television procedure on those rights;
(e) The court finds that no less restrictive method of obtaining
the testimony exists that can adequately protect the dependent person
from the serious emotional or mental distress;
(f) When the court allows the dependent person to testify outside
the presence of the defendant, the defendant can communicate constantly
with the defense attorney by electronic transmission and be granted
reasonable court recesses during the dependent person's testimony for
person-to-person consultation with the defense attorney;
(g) The court can communicate with the attorneys by an audio system
so that the court can rule on objections and otherwise control the
proceedings;
(h) All parties in the room with the dependent person are on camera
and can be viewed by all other parties. If viewing all participants is
not possible, the court shall describe for the viewers the location of
the prosecutor, defense attorney, and other participants in relation to
the dependent person;
(i) The court finds that the television equipment is capable of
making an accurate reproduction and the operator of the equipment is
competent to operate the equipment; and
(j) The court imposes reasonable guidelines upon the parties for
conducting the filming to avoid trauma to the dependent person or abuse
of the procedure for tactical advantage.
(2) The prosecutor, defense attorney, and a neutral and trained
victim's advocate, if any, shall always be in the room where the
dependent person is testifying.
(3) During the hearing conducted under subsection (1) of this
section to determine whether the dependent person may testify outside
the presence of the defendant or the jury, or both, the court may
conduct the observation and examination of the dependent person outside
the presence of the defendant if:
(a) The prosecutor alleges and the court concurs that the dependent
person will be unable to testify in front of the defendant or will
suffer severe emotional or mental distress if forced to testify in
front of the defendant;
(b) The defendant can observe and hear the dependent person by
closed-circuit television;
(c) The defendant can communicate constantly with the defense
attorney during the examination of the dependent person by electronic
transmission and be granted reasonable court recesses during the
dependent person's examination for person-to-person consultation with
the defense attorney; and
(d) The court finds the closed-circuit television is capable of
making an accurate reproduction and the operator of the equipment is
competent to operate the equipment. Whenever possible, all the parties
in the room with the dependent person shall be on camera so that the
viewers can see all the parties. If viewing all participants is not
possible, then the court shall describe for the viewers the location of
the prosecutor, defense attorney, and other participants in relation to
the dependent person.
(4) The court shall make particularized findings on the record
articulating the factors upon which the court based its decision to
allow the dependent person to testify via closed-circuit television
pursuant to this section. The factors the court may consider include,
but are not limited to, a consideration of the dependent person's age,
physical health, emotional stability, expressions of fear made by the
dependent person regarding testifying in open court or in front of the
defendant, the relationship of the defendant to the dependent person,
and the court's observations of the dependent person's inability to
reasonably communicate in front of the defendant or in open court. The
court's findings shall identify the impact the factors have upon the
dependent person's ability to testify in front of the jury or the
defendant, or both, and the specific nature of the emotional or mental
trauma the dependent person would suffer. The court shall determine
whether the source of the trauma is the presence of the defendant, the
jury, or both, and shall limit the use of the closed-circuit television
accordingly.
(5) This section does not apply if the defendant is an attorney pro
se unless the defendant has a court-appointed attorney assisting the
defendant in the defense.
(6) This section may not preclude the presence of both the victim
and the defendant in the courtroom together for purposes of
establishing or challenging the identification of the defendant when
identification is a legitimate issue in the proceeding.
(7) All recorded tapes of testimony produced by closed-circuit
television equipment shall be subject to any protective order of the
court for the purpose of protecting the privacy of the dependent
person.
(8) Nothing in this section creates a right of the dependent person
to a closed-circuit television procedure in lieu of testifying in open
court.
(9) The state shall bear the costs of the closed-circuit television
procedure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The failure to provide notice to a
dependent person of the rights enumerated in this chapter or the
failure to provide the rights enumerated shall not result in civil
liability so long as the failure was in good faith.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit a party's
ability to bring an action, including an action for damages, based on
rights conferred by other state or federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---