BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of tangible personal property: (a) Purchased outside this state
more than six months prior to first use in this state; and (b) required
to be registered in this state by the department of licensing, or in
the case of aircraft, the department of transportation.
(2)(a) A person claiming exemption under this section must display
proof of his or her nonresident status at the time of the registration.
Acceptable proof of a nonresident's status shall include one piece of
identification such as a valid driver's license from the jurisdiction
in which out-of-state residency is claimed or a valid identification
card which has a photograph of the holder and is issued by the out-of-state jurisdiction. Identification must show the holder's residential
address and have as one of its legal purposes the establishment of
residency in that out-of-state jurisdiction.
(b) A person claiming exemption under this section must provide
proof, such as a sales receipt or invoice, that the tangible personal
property was purchased outside of the state more than six months prior
to first use in this state.
(3) A person claiming exemption under this section shall receive a
credit for any sales or use tax paid in the out-of-state jurisdiction
on the purchase of the item.

--- END ---