BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department shall administer a performance-based
grant program that provides funding assistance to public agencies that
issue business licenses and that wish to join with the department's
master licensing service.
(2) The department may determine among interested grant applicants
the order and the amount of the grant. In making grant determinations,
consideration must be given, but not limited to, the following
criteria: Readiness of the public agency to participate; the number of
renewable licenses; and the reduced regulatory impact to businesses
subject to licensure relative to the overall investment required by the
department.
(3) The department shall invite and encourage participation by all
Washington city and county governments having interests or
responsibilities relating to business licensing.
(4) The total amount of grants provided under this section may not
exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars in any one fiscal year.
(5) The source of funds for this grant program is the master
license account.

--- END ---