BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of health shall develop, in
consultation with the department of revenue, a program to provide
business and occupation tax credits for physicians who serve uninsured,
medicare, and medicaid patients in a private practice or a reduced fee
access program for the uninsured and shall submit proposed legislation
to the legislature by December 15, 2005. The program must relate the
amount of any tax credit to the extent to which a provider serves
uninsured, medicare, and medicaid patients, such that providers who
serve the greatest number of uninsured, medicare, and medicaid patients
receive the greatest tax credit. The program also should recommend a
minimum threshold of uninsured, medicare, or medicaid patients that a
provider must serve in order to qualify for the tax credit.

--- END ---