BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Each school district, at least one month before the
presentation in any classroom, assembly, lecture series, or other group
setting, of information regarding sex education or other matters
pertaining to sexual conduct, shall:
(a) Provide written notice to the parents, guardians, or other
custodians of the students who are the intended audience of such
presentation; and
(b) Make the curricula and all related materials available for
inspection by parents, guardians, and other custodians.
(2) No student may be permitted to attend or participate in a
class, assembly, lecture, or other setting in which information
regarding sex education or sexual conduct is presented unless the
student's parent, guardian, or other custodian consents in writing.
(3) The notice required under this section must include:
(a) The date, time, and location of the scheduled presentation to
students;
(b) A sampling of the curriculum that is a fair representation of
the information to be provided to students;
(c) The places and times when the curriculum and materials will be
available for inspection or viewing; and
(d) An explanation that no student will be allowed to participate
in or attend a presentation of the information without written consent
from a parent, guardian, or other custodian.
(4) The consent form required under this section must include a
means for a parent, guardian, or other custodian to indicate whether
the parent, guardian, or custodian:
(a) Has inspected or reviewed the curriculum; and
(b) Consents to the student's participation in the class, assembly,
lecture, or other setting.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.070 and 1994 c 245 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The life-threatening dangers of acquired immunodeficiency
syndrome (AIDS) and its prevention shall be taught in the public
schools of this state. AIDS prevention education shall be limited to
the discussion of the life-threatening dangers of the disease, its
spread, and prevention. Students shall receive such education at least
once each school year beginning no later than the fifth grade.
(2) Each district board of directors shall adopt an AIDS prevention
education program which is developed in consultation with teachers,
administrators, parents, and other community members including, but not
limited to, persons from medical, public health, and mental health
organizations and agencies so long as the curricula and materials
developed for use in the AIDS education program either (a) are the
model curricula and resources under subsection (3) of this section, or
(b) are developed by the school district and approved for medical
accuracy by the office on AIDS established in RCW 70.24.250. If a
district elects to use curricula developed by the school district, the
district shall submit to the office on AIDS a copy of its curricula and
an affidavit of medical accuracy stating that the material in the
district-developed curricula has been compared to the model curricula
for medical accuracy and that in the opinion of the district the
district-developed materials are medically accurate. Upon submission
of the affidavit and curricula, the district may use these materials
until the approval procedure to be conducted by the office of AIDS has
been completed.
(3) Model curricula and other resources available from the
superintendent of public instruction may be reviewed by the school
district board of directors, in addition to materials designed locally,
in developing the district's AIDS education program. The model
curricula shall be reviewed for medical accuracy by the office on AIDS
established in RCW 70.24.250 within the department of social and health
services.
(4) Each school district shall, at least one month before teaching
AIDS prevention education in any classroom, conduct at least one
presentation during weekend and evening hours for the parents and
guardians of students concerning the curricula and materials that will
be used for such education. The parents and guardians shall be
notified ((by the school district of the presentation and that the
curricula and materials are available for inspection)) according to the
procedures in section 1 of this act. No student may ((be required to))
participate in AIDS prevention education ((if)) unless the student's
parent or guardian((, having attended one of the district
presentations, objects)) consents in writing to the participation.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction with the
assistance of the office on AIDS shall update AIDS education curriculum
material as newly discovered medical facts make it necessary.
(6) The curriculum for AIDS prevention education shall be designed
to teach students which behaviors place a person dangerously at risk of
infection with the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and methods to
avoid such risk including, at least:
(a) The dangers of drug abuse, especially that involving the use of
hypodermic needles; and
(b) The dangers of sexual intercourse, with or without condoms.
(7) The program of AIDS prevention education shall stress the life-threatening dangers of contracting AIDS and shall stress that
abstinence from sexual activity is the only certain means for the
prevention of the spread or contraction of the AIDS virus through
sexual contact. It shall also teach that condoms and other artificial
means of birth control are not a certain means of preventing the spread
of the AIDS virus and reliance on condoms puts a person at risk for
exposure to the disease.

--- END ---