BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.185.050 and 2002 c 294 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall use moneys from the housing trust fund and
other legislative appropriations to finance in whole or in part any
loans or grant projects that will provide housing for persons and
families with special housing needs and with incomes at or below fifty
percent of the median family income for the county or standard
metropolitan statistical area where the project is located. At least
thirty percent of these moneys used in any given funding cycle shall be
for the benefit of projects located in rural areas of the state as
defined by the department. If the department determines that it has
not received an adequate number of suitable applications for rural
projects during any given funding cycle, the department may allocate
unused moneys for projects in nonrural areas of the state.
(2) Activities eligible for assistance from the housing trust fund
and other legislative appropriations include, but are not limited to:
(a) New construction, rehabilitation, ((or)) acquisition of low and
very low-income housing units, or building or property acquisition for
the purpose of low-income housing development;
(b) Rent subsidies;
(c) Matching funds for social services directly related to
providing housing for special-need tenants in assisted projects;
(d) Technical assistance, design and finance services and
consultation, and administrative costs for eligible nonprofit community
or neighborhood-based organizations;
(e) Administrative costs for housing assistance groups or
organizations when such grant or loan will substantially increase the
recipient's access to housing funds other than those available under
this chapter;
(f) Shelters and related services for the homeless, including
emergency shelters and overnight youth shelters;
(g) Mortgage subsidies, including temporary rental and mortgage
payment subsidies to prevent homelessness;
(h) Mortgage insurance guarantee or payments for eligible projects;
(i) Down payment or closing cost assistance for eligible first-time
home buyers;
(j) Acquisition of housing units for the purpose of preservation as
low-income or very low-income housing; and
(k) Projects making housing more accessible to families with
members who have disabilities.
(3) Legislative appropriations from capital bond proceeds may be
used only for the costs of projects authorized under subsection (2)(a),
(i), and (j) of this section, and not for the administrative costs of
the department.
(4) Moneys from repayment of loans from appropriations from capital
bond proceeds may be used for all activities necessary for the proper
functioning of the housing assistance program except for activities
authorized under subsection (2)(b) and (c) of this section.
(5) Administrative costs of the department shall not exceed four
percent of the annual funds available for the housing assistance
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.185 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may use up to five million dollars annually from the
housing trust fund capital bond proceeds to provide short-term loans to
eligible organizations for property or building acquisition when the
purpose of the acquisition is affordable housing development. The
department may finance the properties for a period not to exceed three
years during which time the organization must secure replacement
permanent financing. In addition to seeking outside financing during
the three-year period, the organization may apply for permanent
financing from the department through the housing trust fund. Once
awarded permanent financing, either through the housing trust fund or
an alternative source, the organization must repay the short-term loan.
Loan repayments must be placed in the housing trust fund short-term
financing account under section 3 of this act to be used by the
department for future short-term financing loans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.185 RCW
to read as follows:
The housing trust fund short-term financing account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the housing
trust fund short-term financing program must be deposited in the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for short-term
financing of property or building acquisition when the purpose of such
acquisition is affordable housing development. Only the director or
the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.185A.030 and 1994 c 160 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Using moneys specifically appropriated for such purpose, the
department shall finance in whole or in part projects that will provide
housing for low-income households.
(2) Activities eligible for assistance include, but are not limited
to:
(a) New construction, rehabilitation, ((or)) acquisition of housing
for low-income households, or building or property acquisition for the
purpose of low-income housing development;
(b) Rent subsidies in new construction or rehabilitated multifamily
units;
(c) Down payment or closing costs assistance for first-time home
buyers;
(d) Mortgage subsidies for new construction or rehabilitation of
eligible multifamily units; and
(e) Mortgage insurance guarantee or payments for eligible projects.
(3) Legislative appropriations from capital bond proceeds may be
used only for the costs of projects authorized under subsection (2)
(a), (c), (d), and (e) of this section, and not for the administrative
costs of the department.
(4) Moneys from repayment of loans from appropriations from capital
bond proceeds may be used for all activities necessary for the proper
functioning of the affordable housing program except for activities
authorized under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(5) Administrative costs of the department shall not exceed four
percent of the annual funds available for the affordable housing
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.185A
RCW to read as follows:
The department may use up to five million dollars annually from the
housing trust fund capital bond proceeds to provide short-term loans to
eligible organizations for property or building acquisition when the
purpose of the acquisition is affordable housing development. The
department may finance the properties for a period not to exceed three
years during which time the organization must secure replacement
permanent financing. In addition to seeking outside financing during
the three-year period, the organization may apply for permanent
financing from the department through the housing trust fund. Once
awarded permanent financing, either through the housing trust fund or
an alternative source, the organization must repay the short-term loan.
Loan repayments will be placed in the housing trust fund short-term
financing account under section 3 of this act to be used by the
department for future short-term financing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect August 1, 2005.

--- END ---