BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.40.065 and 2003 c 136 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No less frequently than once each year, the governor's
committee on disability issues and employment shall determine whether
entities seeking to qualify as vendors in good standing, pursuant to
this section and RCW 43.19.531, have achieved, or continue to work
towards, the goal of enhancing opportunities for persons of
disabilities to maximize their employment and career advancement, and
increase the number employed and their wages.
(2) In making the determination provided for in subsection (1) of
this section, the governor's committee on disability issues and
employment shall appoint and, except in the case of malfeasance or
misfeasance, shall rely upon the conclusions of an advisory
subcommittee consisting of: (a) Three members chosen from among those
current or former clients of a community rehabilitation program who
have nominated themselves, at least one of whom must be a person with
a developmental disability; (b) one member chosen from among those
guardians, parents, or other relatives of a current client or employee
of a community rehabilitation program who have nominated themselves;
(c) one member chosen from among those who have been nominated by a
community rehabilitation program; (d) one member chosen from among
those owners of a business owned and operated by persons with
disabilities who have nominated themselves; (e) one member who is
designated by the developmental disabilities council; (f) one member
who is a member of and selected by the governor's committee on
disability issues and employment; (g) one member who is designated by
the secretary of the department of social and health services; and (h)
one member who is designated by the director of the department of
services for the blind.
(3) The advisory subcommittee appointed by the governor's committee
on disability issues and employment shall conclude that entities
seeking to qualify, pursuant to this section and RCW 43.19.531, as
vendors in good standing, have achieved, or continue to work towards,
the goal of enhancing opportunities for persons of disabilities to
maximize their employment and career advancement, and increase the
number employed and their wages if, and only if, the entity provides
reasonably conclusive evidence that, during the twelve-month period
immediately preceding the entity's application, at least one-half of
the following measurement categories applicable to the entity have been
either achieved, pursuant to rules established under subsection (4) of
this section, or have been improved as compared to the entity's
condition with respect to that measurement category one year ago:
(a) The number of people with disabilities in the entity's total
work force who are working in integrated settings;
(b) The percentage of the people with disabilities in the entity's
total work force who are working in integrated settings;
(c) The number of people with disabilities in the entity's total
work force who are working in individual supported employment settings;
(d) The percentage of the people with disabilities in the entity's
total work force who are working in individual supported employment
settings;
(e) The number of people with disabilities in the entity's total
work force who, during the last twelve months, have transitioned to
less restrictive employment settings either within the entity or with
other community employers;
(f) The number of people with disabilities in the entity's total
work force who are earning at least the state minimum wage;
(g) The percentage of the people with disabilities in the entity's
total work force who are earning at least the state minimum wage;
(h) The number of people with disabilities serving in supervisory
capacities within the entity;
(i) The percentage of supervisory positions within the entity that
are occupied by people with disabilities;
(j) The number of people with disabilities serving in an ownership
capacity or on the governing board of the entity;
(k) The ratio of the total amount paid by the entity in wages,
salaries, and related employment benefits to people with disabilities,
as compared to the amount paid by the entity in wages, salaries, and
related employment benefits paid by the entity to persons without
disabilities during the previous year; and
(l) The percentage of people with disabilities in the entity's
total work force for whom the entity has developed a reasonable,
achievable, and written career plan.
(4) The commissioner shall consult with the advisory subcommittee
established in subsection (2) of this section to develop and adopt
rules establishing the measurement at which it is deemed that the
measurement categories identified in subsection (3)(b), (d), (e), (g),
(h), (j), (k), and (l) of this section have been achieved.
(5) This section expires December 31, ((2007)) 2009.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.40.066 and 2003 c 136 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner is authorized to adopt rules to implement RCW
50.40.065, including but not limited to authority to establish (a) a
nonrefundable application fee of not more than five hundred dollars to
be paid by each entity seeking to establish or renew qualification as
a vendor in good standing, pursuant to RCW 43.19.531 and 50.40.065; (b)
a fee of not more than two percent of the face amount of any contract
awarded under chapter 136, Laws of 2003; or (c) both fees identified in
(a) and (b) of this subsection.
(2) The fee or fees established pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section must set a level of revenue sufficient to recover costs
incurred by the department of general administration in fulfilling the
duties identified in RCW 43.19.531 and the governor's committee on
disability issues and employment in fulfilling the duties identified in
RCW 50.40.065.
(3) The vendors in good standing account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from the fee or fees established
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
purpose described in subsection (2) of this section. Expenditures from
the account may be authorized only upon the approval of both the
director of the department of general administration and the
commissioner, or their respective designees. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.
(4) This section expires December 31, ((2007)) 2009, and any
unencumbered funds remaining in the vendors in good standing account on
that date shall revert to the general fund.

--- END ---