BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.176.030 and 2004 c 237 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The small business incubator program is created in the
department of community, trade, and economic development to provide
start-up and operating assistance to qualified small business
incubators.
(2) The department shall award grants to qualified small business
incubator organizations for:
(a) Construction and equipment costs, up to a maximum of three
million dollars per recipient; and
(b) Provision of technical assistance to small businesses, up to a
maximum of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars per year per
recipient.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Require a grant recipient to show that it has the resources to
complete the project in a timely manner and the state grant is not the
sole source of funds;
(b) Develop, in conjunction with the Washington association of
small business incubators, criteria for receipt of grant funds,
including criteria related to organizational capacity, community need,
and the availability of other economic development resources;
(c) Accept and receive grants, gifts, and pledges of funds for the
support of the small business incubator program, which shall be
deposited in the small business incubator account established in RCW
43.176.040; ((and))
(d) Integrate the promotion of small business incubators as
economic development tools in its strategic plan; and
(e) Develop state tax incentive proposals for persons that invest
or otherwise provide financial assistance to clients of qualified small
business incubators certified by the Washington association of small
business incubators. The department shall submit a report to the
appropriate committee of the house of representatives and senate of the
state of Washington, by December 1, 2005, with recommendations on state
tax incentives that should be considered by the legislature to
encourage investment in the clients serviced by qualified small
business incubators certified by the Washington association of small
business incubators.

--- END ---