BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to fish caught at
a private fishing facility. For the purposes of this section, a
"private fishing facility" means a facility managed by an "aquatic
farmer" as defined in RCW 15.85.020.

--- END ---