BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.85.020 and 2003 c 39 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Aquaculture" means the process of growing, farming, or
cultivating private sector cultured aquatic products in marine or
freshwaters and includes management by an aquatic farmer.
(2) "Aquatic farmer" is a private sector person who commercially
farms and manages the cultivating of private sector cultured aquatic
products on the person's own land or on land in which the person has a
present right of possession.
(3) "Private sector cultured aquatic products" are native,
nonnative, or hybrids of marine or freshwater plants and animals that
are propagated, farmed, or cultivated on aquatic farms under the
supervision and management of a private sector aquatic farmer or that
are naturally set on aquatic farms which at the time of setting are
under the active supervision and management of a private sector aquatic
farmer. When produced under such supervision and management, private
sector cultured aquatic products include, but are not limited to, the
following plants and animals:

Scientific Name Common Name

Enteromorpha green nori

Monostroma awo-nori

Ulva sea lettuce

Laminaria konbu

Nereocystis bull kelp

Porphyra nori

Iridaea

Haliotis abalone

Zhlamys pink scallop

Hinnites rock scallop

Tatinopecten Japanese or weathervane
scallop

Protothaca native littleneck clam

Tapes manila clam

Saxidomus butter clam

Mytilus mussels

Crassostrea Pacific oysters

Ostrea Olympia and European oysters

Pacifasticus crayfish

Macrobrachium freshwater prawn

Salmo and Salvelinus trout, char, and Atlantic
salmon

Oncorhynchus salmon

Ictalurus catfish

Cyprinus carp

Acipenseridae Sturgeon

Private sector cultured aquatic products do not include herring
spawn on kelp and other products harvested under a herring spawn on
kelp permit issued in accordance with RCW 77.70.210. For the purposes
of this chapter, private sector cultured aquatic products are
livestock.
(4) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(5) "Director" means the director of agriculture.
(6) "Livestock" means any animal raised on a farm for use or
profit.

--- END ---