BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.15.190 and 1987 c 170 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state of Washington recognizes the authority of Indian tribes
within the state to license agencies, located ((within)) on or near the
boundaries of a federally recognized Indian reservation, to receive
children for control, care, and maintenance outside their own homes, or
to place, receive, arrange the placement of, or assist in the placement
of children for foster care or adoption. The department and state
licensed child-placing agencies may place children in tribally licensed
facilities if the requirements of RCW 74.15.030 (2)(b) and (3) and
supporting rules are satisfied before placing the children in such
facilities by the department or any state licensed child-placing
agency.

--- END ---