BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.40.060 and 2001 c 71 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every officer and employee of the state or of any county, city,
or other political subdivision thereof who is a member of the
Washington national guard or of the army, navy, air force, coast guard,
or marine corps reserve of the United States, or of any organized
reserve or armed forces of the United States ((shall be)) is entitled
to and shall be granted military leave of absence from such employment
for a period not exceeding fifteen days during each year beginning
October 1st and ending the following September 30th. Such leave shall
be granted ((in order)) so that the person may report for active duty,
when called, or take part in active training duty in such manner and at
such time as he or she may be ordered to active duty or active training
duty. Such military leave of absence ((shall be)) is in addition to
any vacation or sick leave to which the officer or employee might
otherwise be entitled, and shall not involve any loss of efficiency
rating, privileges, or pay. During the period of military leave, the
officer or employee shall receive from the state, or the county, city,
or other political subdivision, his or her normal pay.
(2) If, on or after July 1, 2005, an officer or employee of the
state is called into the federal service of the United States for a
period exceeding thirty days, the officer or employee shall receive
from the state fifty percent of the difference between his or her
normal pay while employed by the state and his or her pay and
allowances while in the service of the United States, if the pay and
allowances while in the service of the United States is less than his
or her pay while employed by the state. Payment and benefits provided
for a mobilization under this subsection shall not exceed four years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 38.40 RCW
to read as follows:
The support our deployed state employees program is created. The
purpose of the program is to enable and encourage state employees to
make voluntary contributions for the support of officers or employees
of the state who are called into the federal service of the United
States for more than thirty days, in order to assist those officers and
their families with the loss of salary compensation and other financial
burdens occasioned by a period of active military deployment. The
department of personnel shall administer this program through a system
of voluntary payroll deductions. The state shall match voluntary
contributions to the support our deployed state employees program to a
maximum of forty dollars per employee per month. The military
department shall provide any information required by the department of
personnel for implementation of this section and RCW 38.40.060(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 38.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The deployed state employees' account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from state employee contributions
and state matching contributions must be deposited into the account.
Except under subsection (2) of this section, expenditures from the
account may be used only for pay and allowances under RCW 38.40.060(2).
Only the director of personnel or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.
(2) The director shall retain funds as necessary to administer the
program under section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2004 c 246 s 8 and 2004 c 58 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving
account, the Washington state combined fund drive account, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future
teachers conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative
account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion
account, the produce railcar pool account, the rural rehabilitation
account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth athletic
facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide
abatement account, the children's trust fund, the Washington horse
racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the
Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account, ((and))
the Washington horse racing commission operating account (earnings from
the Washington horse racing commission operating account must be
credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund
account), and the deployed state employees' account. However, the
earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to
the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---