BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.99.040 and 2000 c 119 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Because of the serious nature of domestic violence, the court
in domestic violence actions:
(a) Shall not dismiss any charge or delay disposition because of
concurrent dissolution or other civil proceedings;
(b) Shall not require proof that either party is seeking a
dissolution of marriage prior to instigation of criminal proceedings;
(c) Shall waive any requirement that the victim's location be
disclosed to any person, other than the attorney of a criminal
defendant, upon a showing that there is a possibility of further
violence: PROVIDED, That the court may order a criminal defense
attorney not to disclose to his or her client the victim's location;
and
(d) Shall identify by any reasonable means on docket sheets those
criminal actions arising from acts of domestic violence.
(2)(a) Because of the likelihood of repeated violence directed at
those who have been victims of domestic violence in the past, when any
person charged with or arrested for a crime involving domestic violence
is released from custody before arraignment or trial on bail or
personal recognizance, the court authorizing the release ((may)) shall
prohibit that person from having any contact with the victim((. The
jurisdiction authorizing the release shall determine whether that
person should be prohibited from having any contact with the victim))
unless the court finds good cause why the person arrested or charged
should have contact with the victim. If there is no outstanding
restraining or protective order prohibiting that person from having
contact with the victim, the court authorizing release ((may)) shall
issue((, by telephone,)) a no-contact order prohibiting the person
charged or arrested from having contact with the victim or from
knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified
distance of a location, unless the court finds good cause why the
person arrested or charged should have contact with the victim. The
court may issue the no-contact order by telephone.
(b) In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions
of RCW 9.41.800.
(c) The no-contact order shall also be issued in writing as soon as
possible.
(3) At the time of arraignment the court shall determine whether a
no-contact order shall be issued or extended. The no-contact order
shall terminate if the defendant is acquitted or the charges are
dismissed.
(4) If a no-contact order is issued or extended, the court ((may))
shall also include in the conditions of release a requirement that the
defendant submit to electronic monitoring, unless the court finds good
cause why the electronic monitoring should not be ordered. If
electronic monitoring is ordered, the court shall specify who shall
provide the monitoring services, and the terms under which the
monitoring shall be performed. Upon conviction, the court may require
as a condition of the sentence that the defendant reimburse the
providing agency for the costs of the electronic monitoring.
(((4))) (5)(a) Willful violation of a court order issued under
subsection (2) or (3) of this section is punishable under RCW
26.50.110.
(b) The written order releasing the person charged or arrested
shall contain the court's directives and shall bear the legend:
"Violation of this order is a criminal offense under chapter 26.50 RCW
and will subject a violator to arrest; any assault, drive-by shooting,
or reckless endangerment that is a violation of this order is a felony.
You can be arrested even if any person protected by the order invites
or allows you to violate the order's prohibitions. You have the sole
responsibility to avoid or refrain from violating the order's
provisions. Only the court can change the order."
(c) A certified copy of the order shall be provided to the victim.
(((5))) (6) If a no-contact order has been issued prior to
charging, that order shall expire at arraignment or within seventy-two
hours if charges are not filed. Such orders need not be entered into
the computer-based criminal intelligence information system in this
state which is used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding
warrants.
(((6))) (7) Whenever a no-contact order is issued, modified, or
terminated under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the clerk of
the court shall forward a copy of the order on or before the next
judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the
order. Upon receipt of the copy of the order the law enforcement
agency shall enter the order for one year or until the expiration date
specified on the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence
information system available in this state used by law enforcement
agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the computer-based
criminal intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law
enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully
enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state. Upon receipt of notice
that an order has been terminated under subsection (3) of this section,
the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from the computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

--- END ---