BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state of Washington recognizes that an
informed citizenry is indispensable to the proper functioning of a
democratic society. It is the basic right of citizens to know about
the activities of their government, to benefit from the information
developed at public expense, and to have permanent access to the
information published by state agencies.
The state library within the office of the secretary of state
should ensure permanent public access to public state government
publications, regardless of the format, and prescribe the conditions
for use of state publications in depository libraries. It is the
intent of the legislature that this act be implemented within existing
appropriation levels. The legislature does not intend to appropriate
additional funding for purposes of implementing this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 27.04.045 and 2002 c 342 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state librarian shall be responsible and accountable for the
following functions:
(1) Establishing content-related standards for common formats and
agency indexes for state agency-produced information. In developing
these standards, the state librarian is encouraged to seek involvement
of, and comments from, public and private entities with an interest in
such standards;
(2) Managing and administering the state library;
(3) Exerting leadership in information access and the development
of library services;
(4) Acquiring library materials, equipment, and supplies by
purchase, exchange, gift, or otherwise; and, as appropriate, assisting
the legislature, other state agencies, and other libraries in the cost-effective purchase of information resources;
(5) Employing and terminating personnel in accordance with chapter
41.06 RCW as may be necessary to implement the purposes of this
chapter;
(6) Entering into agreements with other public or private entities
as a means of implementing the mission, goals, and objectives of the
state library and the entity with which it enters such agreements. In
agreements for services between the library and other state agencies,
the library may negotiate an exchange of services in lieu of monetary
reimbursement for the library's indirect or overhead costs, when such
an arrangement facilitates the delivery of library services;
(7) Maintaining a library at the state capitol grounds to
effectively provide library and information services to members of the
legislature, state officials, and state employees in connection with
their official duties;
(8) Serving as the depository for newspapers published in the state
of Washington thus providing a central location for a valuable
historical record for scholarly, personal, and commercial reference and
circulation;
(9) Promoting and facilitating electronic access to public
information and services, including providing, or providing for, a
service that identifies, describes, and provides location information
for government information through electronic means, and that assists
government agencies in making their information more readily available
to the public;
(10) Collecting and distributing copies of state publications, as
defined in RCW 40.06.010, prepared by any state agency for
distribution. The state library shall maintain the state publications
distribution center, as provided in chapter 40.06 RCW to provide copies
of materials that are not available in electronic format to state
depository libraries. The office of the secretary of state, on
recommendation of the state librarian, may provide by rule for deposit
with the state library of up to ((three)) two copies of each
publication;
(11) Providing for the sale of library material in accordance with
RCW 27.12.305;
(12) Providing advisory services to state agencies regarding their
information needs;
(13) Providing for library and information service to residents and
staff of state-supported residential institutions;
(14) Providing for library and information services to persons
throughout the state who are blind and/or physically handicapped;
(15) Assisting individuals and groups such as libraries, library
boards, governing bodies, and citizens throughout the state toward the
establishment and development of library services;
(16) Making studies and surveys of library needs in order to
provide, expand, enlarge, and otherwise improve access to library
facilities and services throughout the state;
(17) Serving as an interlibrary loan, information, reference, and
referral resource for all libraries in the state. The state library
may charge lending fees to other libraries that charge the state
library for similar services. Money paid as fees shall be retained by
the state library as a recovery of costs; and
(18) Accepting and expending in accordance with the terms thereof
grants of federal, state, local, or private funds. For the purpose of
qualifying to receive such grants, the state librarian is authorized to
make applications and reports required by the grantor.

Sec. 3 RCW 40.06.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 232 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) (("Print" includes all forms of reproducing multiple copies,
with the exception of typewritten correspondence and interoffice
memoranda.)) "Format" includes any media used in the publication of
state information including electronic, print, audio, visual, and
microfilm.
(2) "State agency" includes every state office, officer,
department, division, bureau, board, commission and agency of the
state, and, where applicable, all subdivisions of each.
(3) "State publication" means information published by state
agencies intended for distribution to state government or the public,
including publications issued electronically or in other formats.
Examples may include((s)) annual, biennial, and special reports
required by law, state agency newsletters, periodicals, and magazines,
((books, pamphlets, leaflets, and all other materials, other than news
releases sent exclusively to the news media, typewritten correspondence
and interoffice memoranda, issued in print by the state, the
legislature, constitutional officers, or any state department,
committee, or other state agency supported wholly or in part by state
funds)) and other printed informational material intended for general
dissemination to state agencies, the public, or the legislature.

Sec. 4 RCW 40.06.020 and 2002 c 342 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created as a division of the state library, and
under the direction of the state librarian, a state publications
distribution center. The center shall utilize the depository library
system to permit citizens economical and convenient access to state
publications in any format. To this end the secretary of state shall
make such rules as may be deemed necessary to carry out the provisions
of this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 40.06.030 and 1977 ex.s. c 232 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Every state agency shall promptly and electronically submit to
the state library copies of published information that are state
publications and that conform to state library and the office of
financial management standards of any electronic or print publication.
For publications not electronically available, each state agency shall
deposit copies of each of its state publications with the state library
in quantities as certified by the state librarian as required to meet
the needs of the depository library system. Upon consent of the
issuing state agency such state publications as are printed by the
public printer shall be delivered directly to the center.
(2) For print publications, in addition to the electronic files,
each state agency shall deposit copies of each of its state
publications with the state library in quantities as certified by the
state librarian as required to meet the needs of the depository library
system. Other materials that are state publications shall be deposited
with the state library in the appropriate format as a public record.
(3) In the interest of economy and efficiency, the state librarian
may specifically or by general rule exempt a given state publication or
class of publications from the requirements of this section in full or
in part.
(4) Each issuing state agency shall make available by March 15th
each year to the state library an annual listing of all its
publications, including those produced in electronic form, made
available to state government and the public during the preceding year.

Sec. 6 RCW 40.06.040 and 2002 c 342 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To provide economical public access to state publications, the
center may enter into depository contracts with any free public
library, The Evergreen State College, regional university, or state
university library, or, if needed, the library of any privately
incorporated college or university in this state. The requirements for
eligibility to contract as a depository library shall be established by
the secretary of state upon recommendations of the state librarian.
The standards shall include and take into consideration the type of
library, available housing and space for the publications, the number
and qualifications of personnel, and availability for public use. The
center may also contract with public, out-of-state libraries for the
exchange of state and other publications on a reciprocal basis. Any
state publication to be distributed to the public and the legislature
shall be mailed at the lowest available postal rate.
(2) The office of the secretary of state through the state
librarian shall preserve and make accessible state agency electronic
publications deposited with the state library through an electronic
repository.

Sec. 7 RCW 40.06.050 and 1963 c 233 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The center shall publish and distribute regularly a list of
available state publications, and may publish and distribute such other
descriptive ((printed)) matter as will facilitate the distribution of
and access to state publications.

Sec. 8 RCW 40.07.020 and 1989 c 175 s 86 are each amended to read
as follows:
The terms defined in this section shall have the meanings indicated
when used in this chapter.
(1) "Director" means the director of financial management.
(2) "Electronic repository" is a collection of electronic
publications kept in a secure environment with adequate backup to
protect the collection.
(3) "Format" has the definition in RCW 40.06.010.
(4) "State agency" includes every state office, department,
division, bureau, board, commission, committee, higher education
institution, community college, and agency of the state and all
subordinate subdivisions of such agencies in the executive branch
financed in whole or in part from funds held in the state treasury, but
does not include the offices of executive officials elected on a
statewide basis, agricultural commodity commissions, the legislature,
the judiciary, or agencies of the legislative or judicial branches of
state government.
(((3))) (5)(a) "State publication" means ((publications of state
agencies and shall)) information published by state agencies intended
for distribution to state government or the public, including
publications issued electronically or in other formats. Examples may
include any annual and biennial reports, any special report required by
law, state agency newsletters, periodicals and magazines, and other
printed informational material intended for general dissemination to
the public or to the legislature.
(b) "State publication" may include such other state agency
((printed)) informational material as the director may prescribe by
rule or regulation, in the interest of economy and efficiency, after
consultation with the governor, the state librarian, and any state
agencies affected.
(c) "State publication" does not include:
(i) Business forms, preliminary draft reports, working papers, or
copies of testimony and related exhibit material prepared solely for
purposes of a presentation to a committee of the state legislature;
(ii) Typewritten correspondence and interoffice memoranda, and
staff memoranda and similar material prepared exclusively as testimony
or exhibits in any proceeding in the courts of this state, the United
States, or before any administrative entity;
(iii) Any notices of intention to adopt rules under RCW 34.05.320;
(iv) Publications relating to a multistate program financed by more
than one state or by federal funds or private subscriptions; or
(v) News releases sent exclusively to the news media.
(((4) "Print" includes all forms of reproducing multiple copies
with the exception of typewritten correspondence and interoffice
memoranda.))

Sec. 9 RCW 40.07.030 and 1977 ex.s. c 232 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any annual, biennial, or special report required to be made by
any state officer, board, agency, department, commissioner, regents,
trustees, or institution to the governor or to the legislature may be
typewritten and a copy shall be filed with the governor, or the
governor's designee, and the legislature as the law may require. ((An
additional copy shall be filed with the state library as a public
record.))
(2) Each state agency shall promptly and electronically submit to
the state library each of the agency's state publications in a manner
that conforms to state library and the office of financial management
standards.
(3) For print publications, in addition to the electronic files,
each state agency shall deposit copies of each of its state
publications with the state library in quantities as certified by the
state librarian as required to meet the needs of the depository library
system. Other state publications shall be deposited with the state
library in the appropriate format as a public record.
(4) Each agency shall assign a designee as a contact for the state
librarian regarding agency publications and shall notify the state
library of the assigned designee.
(5) The agency director or the agency's director's designee may
selectively review state publications in order to determine if specific
state publications are economically and effectively contributing to the
accomplishment of state agency program objectives. The agency director
or the agency director's designee shall provide general guidelines as
to the number of copies to be printed for use or distribution by the
issuing agency and any public or other distribution under chapter 40.06
RCW as now or hereafter amended, or other applicable directives.
(((3))) (6) No agency head shall recommend a state publication for
printing and distribution, other than those required by law, unless the
benefits from the publication and distribution thereof to the citizens
and taxpayers of this state clearly exceed the costs of preparation,
printing, and distribution.
(((4))) (7) The agency director, after consultation with affected
agencies, shall prepare and publish guidelines for use by state
agencies in determining and evaluating the benefits and costs of
current and proposed state publications. All state agencies shall
evaluate each new state publication they propose and shall annually
evaluate each continuing state publication they produce in accordance
with the guidelines published by the director.
(((5))) (8) The agency director shall, after consultation with
affected state agencies, also provide by general rules ((and
regulations)) for overall control of the quality of the printing of
state publications. Necessary publications are to be prepared and
printed in the most economic manner consistent with effectiveness and
achievement of program objectives.

--- END ---