BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An administrative law judge or a court shall award an employer
that prevails in an administrative appeal or judicial review of a
citation or a notice of assessment under this chapter fees and other
expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred by that
employer, unless the court finds that the citation or the notice of
assessment was substantially justified or that circumstances make an
award unjust. The administrative law judge or the court shall
determine whether the citation or the notice of assessment was
substantially justified based on the administrative record on appeal.
(2) An employer seeking an award of fees and other expenses,
including reasonable attorneys' fees shall, within thirty days of a
final disposition in the appeal proceeding, submit to the
administrative law judge or the court an application for fees and other
expenses that:
(a) Alleges that the citation or the notice of assessment was not
substantially justified;
(b) Shows that the employer prevailed in the administrative or
judicial review of the citation or the notice of assessment; and
(c) Sets forth the amount sought, including an itemized statement
from any attorney, agent, or expert witness representing or appearing
on behalf of the employer stating the actual time expended and the rate
at which fees and other expenses were computed.

--- END ---