BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) A legislative task force on
telecommunications and information technology is established. The task
force shall consist of the following members:
(i) Seven members from each of the two largest caucuses of the
senate, appointed by the president of the senate; at least one member
from each caucus shall be a member of the senate labor, commerce,
research, and development committee;
(ii) Seven members from each of the two largest caucuses of the
house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; at least one member from each caucus shall be a member
of the house technology, energy, and communications committee;
(iii) Five members representing telecommunications and information
industries including but not limited to cable industry representatives,
broadcast and print media, and internet representatives, appointed
jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(iv) Five members representing consumer groups and the general
public, including community-based noncommercial media, appointed
jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(b) In addition, the department of information services and office
of financial management shall cooperate with the task force and
maintain a liaison representative, who shall be a nonvoting member.
The department shall cooperate with the task force and provide
information as the chair may reasonably request. The task force shall
choose its chair from among its membership.
(2) The task force shall review the following issues:
(a) Taxation of telecommunications, cable, and internet services;
(b) Sales taxes as related to online commerce;
(c) Taxes on radio and television advertising;
(d) Taxes on satellite services;
(e) Use of public rights of way by the entities in (a) through (d)
of this subsection;
(f) The impact of these taxes on the revenue needs of local
governments; and
(g) The impact of changing technologies and universal service
policies.
(3) The task force, where feasible, may consult with individuals
from the public and private sector or ask such persons to establish an
advisory committee.
(4)(a) The task force shall use legislative facilities, and staff
support shall be provided by senate committee services and the house of
representatives office of program research. The task force may hire
additional staff with specific technical expertise if such expertise is
necessary to carry out the mandates of this study.
(b) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to receive compensation in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and
be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060, such reimbursement to be paid jointly by the senate and the
house of representatives.
(c) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the expenses of
the task force shall be paid jointly by the senate and the house of
representatives.
(5) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the legislature by December 1, 2006.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2007.

--- END ---