BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.88A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office of financial management shall prepare a fiscal note
under this chapter for any bill introduced before the legislature that
would result in a net increase in periods of incarceration in state
adult or juvenile correctional facilities.
(2) The office of financial management shall forward a copy of each
required fiscal note under subsection (1) of this section to the
sponsor of the bill that has been introduced before the legislature.
The sponsor shall, on a form devised or adopted by the office of
financial management, state a revenue source or budget reduction
declaring how the proposed bill will be funded. The sponsor must
return the form back to the office of financial management. The office
of financial management shall transmit copies of the response form to
the chairperson of the committee to which the bill was referred upon
introduction in the house of origin and the appropriate legislative
fiscal committees.
(3) The fiscal note requirement in subsection (1) of this section
applies, at a minimum, to bills that:
(a) Add new crimes for which incarceration is authorized;
(b) Increase the periods of incarceration authorized for existing
crimes;
(c) Impose or increase mandatory minimum terms of incarceration; or
(d) Modify the law governing the release of adult or juvenile
offenders in such a way that the time of incarceration is increased.
(4)(a) For each law enacted for which a fiscal note is required
under this section, the legislature shall make a one-time transfer from
the general fund to the state corrections special reserve account.
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the transfer required
under this subsection shall be in an amount equal to the estimated
increase in state operating costs associated with the law for the year
containing the highest increase in such costs on the fiscal note.
(b) The transfer may be in an amount determined by the legislature
if:
(i) The fiscal note estimates the increased operating costs as
indeterminate; or
(ii) The legislature's best estimate of the increased operating
costs differs from the amount estimated in the fiscal note.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.132 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office of financial management shall prepare a fiscal note
under this chapter for any bill introduced before the legislature that
would result in a net increase in periods of incarceration in local
adult or juvenile correctional facilities.
(2) The fiscal note requirement in subsection (1) of this section
applies, at a minimum, to bills that:
(a) Add new crimes for which incarceration is authorized;
(b) Increase the periods of incarceration authorized for existing
crimes;
(c) Impose or increase mandatory minimum terms of incarceration; or
(d) Modify the law governing the release of adult or juvenile
offenders in such a way that the time of incarceration is increased.
(3)(a) For each law enacted for which a fiscal note is required
under this section, the legislature shall make a one-time transfer from
the general fund to the local corrections special reserve account.
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the transfer required
under this subsection shall be in an amount equal to the estimated
increase in local operating costs associated with the law for the year
containing the highest increase in such costs on the fiscal note.
(b) The transfer may be in an amount determined by the legislature
if:
(i) The fiscal note estimates the increased operating costs as
indeterminate; or
(ii) The legislature's best estimate of the increased operating
costs differs from the amount estimated in the fiscal note.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Counties, cities, towns, and other units of local government
may submit petitions to the department for reimbursement of increased
capital costs associated with increased offender populations in locally
operated adult or juvenile correctional facilities, including the cost
of planning or preplanning studies that may be required to initiate
capital projects.
(2) The department, in consultation with the Washington association
of sheriffs and police chiefs, shall develop procedures for processing
the petitions, for auditing the validity of the petitions, and for
prioritizing the petitions. Prioritization of the petitions shall be
based on, but not limited to, factors such as disproportionate fiscal
impact relative to the county budget, efficient use of resources, and
whether the costs were mainly incurred because of changes in state
criminal law.
(3) Before January 1st of each year, the department, in
consultation with the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs, shall develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees
of the legislature a prioritized list of submitted petitions that are
recommended for funding by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
The local corrections special reserve account is created in the
state treasury. Revenues to the account shall consist of moneys
transferred into the account under section 2 of this act and any
interest thereon. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
reimbursement of local government capital expenses pursuant to the
prioritized list developed in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
The state corrections special reserve account is created in the
state treasury. Revenues to the account shall consist of moneys
transferred into the account under section 1 of this act and any
interest thereon. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
capital expenses relating to state correctional institutions, including
the cost of planning or preplanning studies that may be required to
initiate capital projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 43.135.035(4) does not apply to the transfers established in
sections 1 and 2 of this act.

--- END ---