BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The joint legislative committee on water
supply during drought is created.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The committee shall consist of four senators
and four representatives who shall be selected biennially as follows:
(1) The president of the senate shall appoint four members from the
senate to serve on the committee, including the chair of the committee
responsible for water resource issues. Two members from each major
political party must be appointed.
(2) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint four
members from the house of representatives to serve on the committee,
including the chair of the committee responsible for water resource
issues. Two members from each major political party must be appointed.
(3) The committee shall elect a chair and a vice-chair. The chair
shall be a member of the house of representatives in even-numbered
years and a member of the senate in odd-numbered years.
(4) The presiding officer of the appropriate legislative chamber
shall fill any vacancies occurring on the committee by appointment from
the same political party as the departing member.
(5) Members shall serve until their successors are appointed as
provided in this section, or until they are no longer members of the
legislature, whichever is sooner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The joint legislative committee on water
supply during drought shall convene from time to time at the call of
the chair when a drought conditions order under RCW 43.83B.405 is in
effect, or when the chair determines, in consultation with the
department of ecology, that it is likely that such an order will be
issued within the next year.
(2) The committee may request and review information relating to
water supply conditions in the state, and economic, environmental, and
other impacts relating to decreased water supply being experienced or
anticipated. The governor's executive water emergency committee, the
department of ecology, the water supply advisory committee, and other
state agencies with water management or related responsibilities shall
cooperate in responding to requests from the committee.
(3) During drought conditions in which an order issued under RCW
43.83B.405 is in effect, the department of ecology shall provide to the
committee no less than monthly a report describing drought response
activities of the department and other state and federal agencies
participating on the water supply availability committee. The report
shall include information regarding applications for, and approvals and
denials of emergency water withdrawals and temporary changes or
transfers of, water rights under RCW 43.83B.410.
(4) The committee from time to time shall make recommendations to
the senate and house of representatives on budgetary and legislative
actions that will improve the state's drought response programs and
planning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---