BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.22.432 and 2002 c 268 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may adopt all standards and regulations adopted
by the secretary under the national manufactured home construction and
safety standards act of 1974 (800 Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C. Secs. 5401-5426)
for manufactured home construction and safety standards. If any
deletions or amendments to the federal standards or regulations are
thereafter made and notice thereof is given to the department, the
standards or regulations shall be considered automatically adopted by
the state under this chapter after the expiration of thirty days from
publication in the federal register of a final order describing the
deletions or amendments unless within that thirty day period the
department objects to the deletion or amendment. In case of objection,
the department shall proceed under the rule making procedure of chapter
34.05 RCW.
(2) The department shall adopt rules with respect to manufactured
homes that require:
(a) The prior written approval of the department before changes or
alterations may be made to a manufactured home that differ from the
construction standards provided for in this section; and
(b) The seller, whether a distributor, dealer, or other seller, of
a new or used, but not installed, manufactured home to a consumer to
deliver to the purchaser, before completion of the sales transaction,
a written notice that any alteration of the manufactured home may
require a permit from the department of labor and industries.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 43.22.436, it is unlawful for any
person to lease, sell, or offer for sale, within this state, a
manufactured home unless the home meets the requirements of the rules
provided for in this section.

--- END ---