BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Notwithstanding RCW 74.15.030, counties
with a population of three thousand or less may adopt and enforce
ordinances and regulations as provided in this act for family day-care
providers as defined in RCW 74.15.020(1)(f) as a twelve-month pilot
project. Before a county may regulate family day-care providers in
accordance with this act, it shall adopt ordinances and regulations
that address, at a minimum, the following: (a) The size, safety,
cleanliness, and general adequacy of the premises; (b) the plan of
operation; (c) the character, suitability, and competence of a family
day-care provider and other persons associated with a family day-care
provider directly responsible for the care of children served; (d) the
number of qualified persons required to render care; (e) the provision
of necessary care, including food, clothing, supervision, and
discipline; (f) the physical, mental, and social well-being of children
served; (g) educational and recreational opportunities for children
served; and (h) the maintenance of records pertaining to children
served.
(2) The county shall notify the department of social and health
services in writing sixty days prior to adoption of the family day-care
regulations required pursuant to this act. The transfer of
jurisdiction shall not occur until the county has notified the
department in writing of the effective date of the regulations, and
shall be limited to a period of twelve months from the effective date
of the regulations. Regulation by counties of family day-care
providers as provided in this act shall be administered and enforced by
those counties. The department shall not regulate these activities
under chapter 74.15 RCW for the twelve-month pilot period. Upon
request, the department shall provide technical assistance to any
county that is in the process of adopting the regulations required by
this act, and after the regulations become effective.
(3) Any county regulating family day-care providers pursuant to
this act shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees of
the legislature concerning the outcome of the pilot project upon
expiration of the twelve-month pilot period. The report shall include
the ordinances and regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section and a description of how those ordinances and regulations
address the specific areas of regulation identified in subsection (1)
of this section.

--- END ---