BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 44.04.010 and 1980 c 87 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
Regular sessions of the legislature shall be held annually,
commencing on the second Monday of ((January)) March.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.01.010 and 1965 c 8 s 43.01.010 are each amended to
read as follows:
The governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, treasurer,
auditor, attorney general, superintendent of public instruction,
commissioner of public lands, and insurance commissioner, shall hold
office for the term of four years, and until their successors are
elected and qualified; and the term shall commence on ((the Wednesday
after)) the second Monday of January following their election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On the second Monday of January of each odd-numbered year, the
legislature shall meet for the following purposes:
(a) To judge the election, returns, and qualifications of its
members as provided in Article II, section 8 of the state Constitution;
(b) To administer the oath of office of such state officers and
members of the legislature; and
(c) To canvass the votes for elected state officers as provided in
Article III, section 4 of the state Constitution.
(2) The legislature may also elect its officers and adopt rules of
procedure at such meeting, but it shall not act on legislation unless
convened in regular or special session pursuant to Article II, section
12 of the state Constitution.

--- END ---