BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.120 and 1997 c 394 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except in the case of an agricultural fair as authorized
under chapters 15.76 and 36.37 RCW, no person other than a member of a
bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization (and their employees) or
any other person, association, or organization (and their employees)
approved by the commission, shall take any part in the management ((or
operation)) of any gambling activity authorized under this chapter
unless approved by the commission. No person who takes any part in the
management ((or operation)) of any such gambling activity shall take
any part in the management or operation of any gambling activity
conducted by any other organization or any other branch of the same
organization unless approved by the commission. However, no bona fide
charitable or nonprofit organization (and their members and employees)
that takes any part in the management or ownership of any gambling
activity authorized by the commission under RCW 9.46.070(1) may take
any part in the management or ownership of any commercial gambling
activity authorized by the commission under RCW 9.46.070(2). No part
of the proceeds of the activity shall inure to the benefit of any
person other than the organization conducting such gambling activities
or if such gambling activities be for the charitable benefit of any
specific persons designated in the application for a license, then only
for such specific persons as so designated.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "management" includes
those activities engaged in by persons who are the highest ranking
managers of the charitable or nonprofit organization or by any other
person who exercises substantial control over the daily operations of
the charitable or nonprofit organization.
(2) No bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization or any other
person, association or organization shall conduct any gambling activity
authorized under this chapter in any leased premises if rental for such
premises is unreasonable or to be paid, wholly or partly, on the basis
of a percentage of the receipts or profits derived from such gambling
activity.

--- END ---