BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
A landlord shall not bill a tenant separately for water or
wastewater services, or engage or authorize a third party billing agent
to bill a tenant separately for water or wastewater services, unless
the water or wastewater service is measured by an individual meter for
that tenant's dwelling unit. If a dwelling unit does not have an
individual meter for measuring the water and wastewater usage in the
dwelling unit, the landlord must include the charge for water and
wastewater services for the dwelling unit as part of the rent due under
the rental agreement for that dwelling unit.

--- END ---