BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares that a safe and
healthy environment for Washington's school children is of great
importance. The legislature finds that children are especially
vulnerable to contaminants, which can impair health and reduce
learning. The legislature also finds that it is important that the
indoor air quality, and instructional areas and play areas in all
schools are safe. Recognizing that the presence of toxic mold can
adversely impact the air quality of a school, the legislature finds
that the best way to ensure that individual school buildings are free
from toxic mold is through testing air of affected buildings and
developing and implementing corrective action plans when problems are
found.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the state board of health.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Local school governing authority" means a local board of
education under chapter 28A.330 RCW or school decision-making authority
for private schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW.
(4) "School" means common schools under RCW 28A.150.020 and
approved private schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The board shall adopt rules for toxic
mold levels in school facilities by August 1, 2006. The rules shall
include: (a) Toxic mold quality monitoring requirements and action
levels; (b) toxic mold testing protocols and testing thresholds; (c)
deadlines for schools to complete toxic mold testing; (d) requirements
and deadlines for posting test results, and for providing notice to
students, parents, school staff, and the public when test results
exceed established action levels; and (e) requirements for the local
school governing authority to report to the community on implementation
of corrective actions.
(2) At a minimum, the board shall require each local school
governing authority to maintain records of safety inspections and
testing results for environmental health hazards, including toxic mold,
for all school facilities, and communicate the availability of these
records to school employees and the public, either through the internet
or by direct mailing. School records of environmental health hazards
shall include all available testing and remediation records for
drinking water, indoor air quality, mold, contaminated soil, asbestos,
and safety hazards. The board shall require each local school
governing authority to provide written notification annually or upon
enrollment to parents or guardians of students and employees describing
the school's environmental hazard testing and remediation policies and
methods, including the posting and notification requirements of this
section.
(3) In adopting rules, the board shall also recognize that the
public has the right to know and to review plans to remediate
environmental health hazards, before remediation efforts occur. The
public also has the right to review records of testing, inspections,
and postremediation assessments. The public shall be notified of the
availability of these records on the internet or by direct mailing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) It is the intent of this chapter that
the exclusive responsibility for undertaking corrective actions to
respond to environmental health hazards in schools remains with the
governing entities of the school institutions, but also ensure that
sufficient tests are conducted to identify where such hazards are
occurring and that test results are widely accessible to parents,
students, staff, and to local and state health departments. In this
effort, local departments of health shall annually certify compliance
of schools with this chapter based on oversight and compliance
guidelines provided by the department. Therefore, while it is the
intent of this chapter not to provide additional corrective action
authority to the board or the department, the department shall report
the status of the testing and reporting program as required by
subsection (2) of this section, and for the legislature to determine
upon consideration of the report at that time whether the board or
department should be granted additional corrective action enforcement
authority.
(2) The department shall post on its web site the results of
testing received under the standards established in section 3 of this
act, as well as corrective action and monitoring reports provided.
Each school or school district that maintains a web site shall also
post such test results and reports.
(3) The department shall examine compliance with adopted standards
and rules and provide a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature biennially, beginning December 1, 2007. In the report due
December 1, 2011, the department shall report on the status of testing,
disclosure of test results, and corrective actions taken at school
facilities across the state. This report shall include any
recommendations for legislation that would improve compliance with, or
facilitate the enforcement or achievement of, environmental hazard
standards established under this chapter, including any needed
compliance enforcement authority to be added to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Within available funds, the department shall
provide technical assistance to school administrators in conducting
toxic mold testing and corrective actions pursuant to this chapter.
The department and the board shall cooperate with local health
jurisdictions in establishing the standards under section 3 of this act
and in providing the technical assistance under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This chapter does not apply to schools that
are regulated as nontransient noncommunity systems under chapter 246-290 WAC.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---