BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The graphic depictions of violence against others in video and
computer games are becoming more disturbingly realistic, especially
with the sophisticated advancements in technology;
(2) Some video and computer games give the player points or
otherwise reward or encourage the player to assault, rape, torture, and
kill other characters;
(3) Some of these games contain graphics of torture, sexual
assault, and killing of women, persons of color, and law enforcement
officers;
(4) These games choreograph violence in a stylized and romanticized
way that encourages children and adolescents to associate violence and
killing with pleasure, entertainment, feelings of achievement, and
personal empowerment;
(5) Studies show a correlation between exposure to violent video
and computer games and hostile behavior. Children and adolescents who
spend hours playing these video games can become desensitized to
violence against others, and such games can be a factor in creating
conditions that lead to actual violence;
(6) Throughout the country, law enforcement officers report that
offenders committing violent crimes admit that they are intentionally
copying the types of violent acts they play out in video or computer
games. There have been accounts reported in the media in which violent
offenders boast of the similarity between their crimes and the games;
and
(7) Manufacturers and retailers of these games are aware of the
inappropriateness of violent video and computer games for children.
Manufacturers and retailers are also aware of the studies and reports
regarding the effects of these violent video and computer games on
adolescents.
The legislature declares that manufacturers and retailers of these
games should do their part in taking responsibility when individuals
copy in real life the violence they learn from these violent video and
computer games. Therefore, the legislature intends to create a private
cause of action against manufacturers and retailers of violent video
and computer games.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
A person may maintain an action for personal injury or wrongful
death against a manufacturer or retailer of violent video or computer
games if the manufacturer or retailer has distributed, sold, or rented
a violent video or computer game to a person under the age of seventeen
and the game was a factor in creating conditions that assisted or
encouraged the person to cause injury or death to another person.

--- END ---