BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the diversity and
splendor of Washington's parks system and local active recreational
opportunities are important resources for the people of this state.
Such outdoor opportunities contribute to the quality of life, are one
of the reasons people choose to live in Washington state, and
contribute to economic development. The state faces ever-increasing
demands from use of our parks and recreation resources and the
responsibility to protect natural and cultural resources while
accommodating recreation needs. The legislature further finds that
there has been a decline in suitable outdoor fields for community
athletic activities that have resulted in overcrowding and
deterioration of existing surfaces. Therefore, it is the policy of the
state to maintain, develop, fund, and improve the state's parks system
and local active recreation opportunities. The legislature recognizes
that a dedicated revenue source is needed and intends to authorize,
with approval by the people of the state, a bond measure to provide
approximately fifty million dollars per year for ten years for these
purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 For the purpose of providing funds for
acquisition, preservation, and development of recreation areas and
facilities by the state, the state finance committee is authorized to
issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of
five hundred million dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to
finance these projects and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds
authorized in this section may be sold at such price as the state
finance committee shall determine. No bonds authorized in this section
may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the
net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized under section 2 of this act shall be deposited in the parks
and outdoor recreation enhancement account hereby created in the state
treasury and shall be used exclusively for the purpose specified in
this chapter and for payment of the expenses incurred in the issuance
and sale of bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds
deposited in the parks and outdoor recreation enhancement account shall
be divided into two shares as follows:
(a) Fifty percent of such proceeds shall be allocated, subject to
legislative appropriation, to the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation for purposes of RCW 79A.25.800; and
(b) Fifty percent of such proceeds shall be allocated to the state
parks and recreation commission, subject to legislative appropriation,
for improvement of existing state parks and the acquisition and
preservation of historic sites and buildings. The commission may use
or permit the use of any portion of such share as matching funds in any
case where federal, local, or other funds are made available on a
matching basis for improvements within the purposes of this chapter.
(2) In the event that the bonds authorized by this chapter are sold
in more than one series, the division into shares in subsection (1) of
this section shall apply to the total proceeds of the bonds authorized
by this chapter and not to the proceeds of each separate series.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Bonds issued under section 2 of this act
shall state that they are a general obligation of the state of
Washington, pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the
payment of principal thereof and the interest thereon, and shall
contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and interest as
the same shall become due.
(2) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The parks and outdoor recreation enhancement
bond repayment account is hereby created in the state treasury.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The nondebt-limit reimbursable bond
retirement account shall be used for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2 of this act.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in section 2 of this act.
(3) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued for the purposes of section 2 of this
act, the state treasurer shall transfer from the parks and outdoor
recreation enhancement bond repayment account created in section 6 of
this act for deposit into the nondebt-limit reimbursable bond
retirement account the amount computed in subsection (2) of this
section for bonds issued for the purposes of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 For the purposes of this chapter, "admission
charge" includes a charge made for season tickets or subscriptions, a
cover charge, or a charge made for use of seats and tables, reserved or
otherwise, and other similar accommodations; a charge made for food and
refreshments in any place where any free entertainment, recreation, or
amusement is provided; a charge made for rental or use of equipment or
facilities for purpose of recreation or amusement, and where the rental
of the equipment or facilities is necessary to the enjoyment of a
privilege for which a general admission is charged, the combined
charges shall be considered as the admission charge. "Admission
charge" also includes any automobile parking charge where the amount of
such charge is determined according to the number of passengers in any
automobile.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) A state tax is hereby imposed on the
admission to any place, measured by the amount of admission charge.
(2) The rate of tax is as follows:
(a) For the state fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2005, one
percent;
(b) For the state fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2007, three
percent; and
(c) Five percent, beginning July 1, 2009.
(3) The person paying the admission charge shall pay the tax to the
person receiving the admission charge.
(4) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the taxes imposed in this chapter.
The tax due dates, reporting periods, and return requirements
applicable to chapter 82.04 RCW apply equally to the taxes imposed in
this chapter.
(5) The tax imposed under this section periodically shall be
deposited into the parks and outdoor recreation enhancement bond
repayment account created in section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The tax imposed under this chapter is in
addition to any other state or local tax imposed upon admission
charges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The legislature finds that professional
sports teams doing business in Washington need an equitable way to
apportion their gross receipts from service-related activities to
Washington and that current methods do not provide a fair apportionment
or reflection of the Washington activity. The legislature intends,
through this act, to provide a method by which professional sports
teams can properly apportion their gross receipts between the states in
which they do business.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.04.460 and 2004 c 174 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person
rendering services taxable under RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908 and
maintaining places of business both within and without this state which
contribute to the rendition of such services shall, for the purpose of
computing tax liability under RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908, apportion to
this state that portion of the person's gross income which is derived
from services rendered within this state. Where such apportionment
cannot be accurately made by separate accounting methods, the taxpayer
shall apportion to this state that proportion of the taxpayer's total
income which the cost of doing business within the state bears to the
total cost of doing business both within and without the state.
(2) ((Notwithstanding the provision of subsection (1) of this
section,)) Persons doing business both within and without the state who
receive gross income from service charges, as defined in RCW 63.14.010
(relating to amounts charged for granting the right or privilege to
make deferred or installment payments) or who receive gross income from
engaging in business as financial institutions within the scope of
chapter 82.14A RCW (relating to city taxes on financial institutions)
shall apportion or allocate gross income taxable under RCW 82.04.290 to
this state pursuant to rules ((promulgated)) adopted by the department
consistent with uniform rules for apportionment or allocation developed
by the states.
(3) The department shall by rule provide a method or methods of
apportioning or allocating gross income derived from sales of telephone
services taxed under this chapter, if the gross proceeds of sales
subject to tax under this chapter do not fairly represent the extent of
the taxpayer's income attributable to this state. The rules shall be,
so far as feasible, consistent with the methods of apportionment
contained in this section and shall require the consideration of those
facts, circumstances, and apportionment factors as will result in an
equitable and constitutionally permissible division of the services.
(4) Persons doing business both within and without the state who
engage in business as professional sports teams shall apportion their
income to this state as provided in section 13 of this act. The tax
collected based on the apportionment in section 13 of this act shall be
deposited into the parks and outdoor recreation enhancement bond
repayment account created in section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The apportionable income of a professional sports team engaged
in business both within and without Washington shall be apportioned to
Washington using an apportionment fraction composed of a property
factor representing twenty-five percent of the fraction, a payroll
factor representing twenty-five percent of the fraction, and a sales
factor representing fifty percent of the fraction determined as
provided in this section.
(2)(a) The property factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is
the average value of the taxpayer's real and tangible personal property
owned or rented and used in this state during the tax year and the
denominator of which is the average value of all the taxpayer's real
and tangible personal property owned or rented and used during the tax
year. Cash on hand or in the bank, shares of stock, notes, bonds,
accounts receivable, or other evidence of indebtedness, special
privileges, franchises, goodwill, or property the income of which is
not taxable or is separately allocated shall not be considered tangible
property nor included in the apportionment.
(b) Property used in the production of nonapportionable income or
losses shall be excluded from the numerator and denominator of the
property factor. Property used in the production of both apportionable
and nonapportionable income or losses shall be partially excluded from
the numerator and denominator of the property factor so as to exclude,
as near as possible, the portion of such property producing the
nonapportionable income or loss. Minor equipment, such as uniforms,
and playing and practice equipment, need not be included in the factor.
(c) Property owned by the taxpayer is valued at its original cost.
Property rented by the taxpayer is valued at eight times the net annual
rental. Net annual rental is the annual rental paid by the taxpayer
less any annual rental received by the taxpayer from subrentals.
(d) The average value of property shall be determined by averaging
the values at the beginning and ending of the tax year but the
department may require the averaging of monthly values during the tax
year if reasonably required to reflect properly the average value of
the taxpayer's property.
(3)(a) The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is
the total amount paid in this state during the tax year by the taxpayer
for compensation, and the denominator of which is the total
compensation paid everywhere during the tax year. Compensation related
to the operation, maintenance, protection, or supervision of property
used in the production of both apportionable and nonapportionable
income shall be partially excluded from the numerator and denominator
of the payroll factor so as to exclude, as near as possible, the
portion of pay related to the operation, maintenance, protection, and
supervision of property used in the production of nonapportionable
income.
(b) Compensation, other than compensation for members of a
professional sports team, is paid in this state if:
(i) The individual's service is performed entirely within this
state;
(ii) The individual's service is performed within and without this
state, but the service performed without this state is incidental to
the individual's service within this state;
(iii) A portion of the service is performed within this state and
the base of operations of the individual is in this state;
(iv) A portion of the service is performed within this state and,
if there is no base of operations, the place from which the
individual's service is directed or controlled is in this state;
(v) A portion of the service is performed within this state and
neither the base of operations of the individual nor the place from
which the service is directed or controlled is in any state in which
some part of the service is performed, but the individual's residence
is in this state; or
(vi) The individual is neither a resident of nor performs services
in this state but is directed or controlled from an office in this
state and returns to this state periodically for business purposes and
the state in which the individual resides does not have jurisdiction to
impose income or franchise taxes on the employer.
(c) Compensation for members of a professional sports team shall be
allocated to this state as follows: The Washington compensation of a
member of a professional sports team includes that portion of such
individual's total compensation for services rendered as a member of
the team during the tax year which the number of duty days spent within
Washington rendering services for the team in any manner during the tax
year bears to the total number of duty days spent both within and
without Washington during the tax year.
(4)(a) The sales factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is
the total gross income of the taxpayer in Washington during the tax
year, and the denominator of which is the gross income everywhere
during the tax year.
(b) Gate receipts include all receipts from games played at the
taxpayer's home facility plus any gate receipts received from games
played away from the taxpayer's home facility. The numerator of the
sales fraction for taxpayers whose home facility is in Washington
includes all gate receipts from games played in its home facility. The
numerator of the sales fraction for taxpayers whose home facility is
outside Washington includes the percentage of gate receipts received
from games played in Washington.
(c) Radio and television receipts received by the taxpayer as its
proportionate share from a league or association contract with the
major communications networks are in Washington in proportion to the
number of games played in Washington to total games played by the
taxpayer covered by the contract during the season. Local television
and radio receipts are sited to the state in which the games are
played.
(d) Concession income is assigned to this state if the concession
is operated within the state. Other miscellaneous income taxable under
RCW 82.04.290 is assigned to this state if the activity is conducted
within this state.
(e) Income from player contract transactions and other similar
sources shall be excluded from the numerator and the denominator of the
sales fraction.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Apportionable income" means only those gross receipts taxable
under RCW 82.04.290.
(b) "Compensation for members of a professional sports team" means
the total compensation received during the taxable year for services
rendered:
(i) From the beginning of the official preseason training period
through the last game in which the team competes or is scheduled to
compete during that taxable year; and
(ii) During the taxable year on a date which does not fall within
the period described in this subsection (5)(b). Such compensation
shall include, but is not limited to, salaries, wages, bonuses, and any
other type of compensation paid during the taxable year to a member of
a professional sports team for services performed in that year. Such
compensation shall not include strike benefits, severance pay,
termination pay, contract or option year buy-out payments, expansion or
relocation payments, or any other payments not related to services
rendered to the team.
(c) "Duty days" means all days during the taxable year from the
beginning of the professional sports team's official preseason training
period through the last game in which the team competes or is scheduled
to compete. Duty days include game days, practice days, days spent at
team meetings, promotional caravans, and preseason training camps, and
days served with the team through all postseason games in which the
team competes or is scheduled to compete. Duty days also include days
on which a member of a professional sports team renders a service for
a team on a date that does not fall within the period described in this
subsection (5)(c), including but not limited to participation in
instructional leagues on behalf of the team and promotional events.
Rendering a service includes conducting training and rehabilitation
activities, but only if conducted at the facilities of the team. Days
for which a member of a professional sports team is not compensated and
is not rendering services for the team in any manner, including days
when such member of a professional sports team has been suspended
without pay and prohibited from performing any services for the team
shall not be treated as duty days. Travel days that do not involve
either a game, practice, team meeting, promotional caravan, or other
similar team event are not considered duty days spent in Washington.
(d) "Member of a professional sports team" includes those employees
who are active players, players on the disabled list, and any other
persons required to travel and who do travel with and perform services
on behalf of a professional sports team on a regular basis. This
includes but is not limited to coaches, managers, and trainers.
(e) "Professional sports team" includes, but is not limited to, any
professional baseball, basketball, football, soccer, or hockey team.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The legislature may provide additional
means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal and interest
on the bonds authorized in section 2 of this act, and sections of this
act shall not be deemed as the exclusive method for payment.

Sec. 15 RCW 39.42.060 and 2003 c 147 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
No bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness for borrowed
money shall be issued by the state which will cause the aggregate debt
contracted by the state to exceed that amount for which payments of
principal and interest in any fiscal year would require the state to
expend more than seven percent of the arithmetic mean of its general
state revenues, as defined in RCW 39.42.070, for the three immediately
preceding fiscal years as certified by the treasurer in accordance with
RCW 39.42.070. It shall be the duty of the state finance committee to
compute annually the amount required to pay principal of and interest
on outstanding debt. In making such computation, the state finance
committee shall include all borrowed money represented by bonds, notes,
or other evidences of indebtedness which are secured by the full faith
and credit of the state or are required to be paid, directly or
indirectly, from general state revenues and which are incurred by the
state, any department, authority, public corporation or quasi public
corporation of the state, any state university or college, or any other
public agency created by the state but not by counties, cities, towns,
school districts, or other municipal corporations, and shall include
debt incurred pursuant to section 3 of Article VIII of the Washington
state Constitution, but shall exclude the following:
(1) Obligations for the payment of current expenses of state
government;
(2) Indebtedness incurred pursuant to RCW 39.42.080 or 39.42.090;
(3) Principal of and interest on bond anticipation notes;
(4) Any indebtedness which has been refunded;
(5) Financing contracts entered into under chapter 39.94 RCW;
(6) Indebtedness authorized or incurred before July 1, 1993,
pursuant to statute which requires that the state treasury be
reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and the interest on such
indebtedness, from money other than general state revenues or from the
special excise tax imposed pursuant to chapter 67.40 RCW;
(7) Indebtedness authorized and incurred after July 1, 1993,
pursuant to statute that requires that the state treasury be
reimbursed, in the amount of the principal of and the interest on such
indebtedness, from (a) moneys outside the state treasury, except higher
education operating fees, (b) higher education building fees, (c)
indirect costs recovered from federal grants and contracts, and (d)
fees and charges associated with hospitals operated or managed by
institutions of higher education;
(8) Any agreement, promissory note, or other instrument entered
into by the state finance committee under RCW 39.42.030 in connection
with its acquisition of bond insurance, letters of credit, or other
credit support instruments for the purpose of guaranteeing the payment
or enhancing the marketability, or both, of any state bonds, notes, or
other evidence of indebtedness;
(9) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes identified in RCW
43.99N.020;
(10) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of the school district
bond guaranty established by chapter 39.98 RCW;
(11) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of replacing the
waterproof membrane over the east plaza garage and revising related
landscaping construction pursuant to RCW 43.99Q.070;
(12) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of the state
legislative building rehabilitation, to the extent that principal and
interest payments of such indebtedness are paid from the capitol
building construction account pursuant to RCW 43.99Q.140(2)(b); and
(13) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of financing projects
under RCW 47.10.867; and
(14) Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of outdoor recreation
facilities under chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7 and 14 of this
act).
To the extent necessary because of the constitutional or statutory
debt limitation, priorities with respect to the issuance or
guaranteeing of bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness by the
state shall be determined by the state finance committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 7 and 14 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 8 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 2003 c 126 s 1002 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 8 through 13 of this act take
effect January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 The secretary of state shall submit this
act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at
the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---