BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08.580 and 2002 c 252 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person receiving public assistance is prohibited from using
electronic benefit cards or cash obtained with electronic benefit
cards:
(a) For the purpose of participating in any of the activities
authorized under chapter 9.46 RCW;
(b) For the purpose of parimutuel wagering authorized under chapter
67.16 RCW; ((or))
(c) To purchase lottery tickets or shares authorized under chapter
67.70 RCW; or
(d) For any purpose other than to obtain necessities such as rent,
transportation, child care, education, food, nonfood hygiene, medical
supplies or care, dental supplies or care, cleaning supplies, and
clothing.
(2)(a) The department shall notify, in writing, all recipients of
electronic benefit cards that any violation of subsection (1) of this
section could result in legal proceedings and forfeiture of all cash
public assistance.
(b) Whenever the department receives notice that a person has
violated subsection (1) of this section, the department shall notify
the person in writing that the violation could result in legal
proceedings and forfeiture of all cash public assistance.
(c) The department shall assign a protective payee to the person
receiving public assistance who violates subsection (1) of this
section.
(d) If the department finds a person receiving public assistance
has violated subsection (1) of this section, the department may assess
a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five dollars.

--- END ---