BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that there is a need to improve the
standards under which the department provides residence modification
assistance to workers who have sustained catastrophic injury.
(2) The director shall adopt rules that take effect no later than
nine months after the effective date of this section to establish
standards for residence modification pursuant to RCW 51.36.020(7).
These rules must address at least the following:
(a) The rules must use, as guidelines, the standards on adaptive
residential housing adopted by the federal department of veterans
affairs;
(b) For purposes of determining the needs and requirements of the
worker under RCW 51.36.020(7) or determining whether a modification is
medically necessary, the department must give substantial weight to the
opinion of the worker's attending health services provider.
(3) In developing rules under this section, the director shall
consult with other persons with an interest in improving standards for
adaptive housing.
(4) The director shall report by January 31, 2006, to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the rules adopted under
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---