BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.335.210 and 1983 c 204 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state board of education and superintendent of public
instruction shall allocate, as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys
appropriated for state assistance to school districts for the original
construction of any school plant facility the amount of one-half of one
percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state
arts commission for the acquisition of works of art. The works of art
may be placed in accordance with Article IX, sections 2 and 3 of the
state Constitution on public lands, integral to or attached to a public
building or structure, detached within or outside a public building or
structure, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a
temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public
facilities. The Washington state arts commission shall, in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction, determine
the amount to be made available for the purchase of works of art under
this section, and payments therefor shall be made in accordance with
law. The designation of projects and sites, selection, contracting,
purchase, commissioning, reviewing of design, execution and placement,
acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or disposition of works of
art shall be the responsibility of the Washington state arts commission
in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and
representatives of school district boards of directors. ((However, the
costs to carry out the Washington state arts commission's
responsibility for maintenance shall not be funded from the moneys
referred to under this section, RCW 43.17.200, 43.19.455, or
28B.10.025, but shall be contingent upon adequate appropriations being
made for that purpose: PROVIDED, That)) The superintendent of public
instruction and the school district board of directors of the districts
where the sites are selected shall have the right to:
(1) Waive its use of the one-half of one percent of the
appropriation for the acquisition of works of art before the selection
process by the Washington state arts commission;
(2) Appoint a representative to the body established by the
Washington state arts commission to be part of the selection process
with full voting rights;
(3) Reject the results of the selection process;
(4) Reject the placement of a completed work or works of art on
school district premises if such works are portable.
Rejection at any point before or after the selection process shall
not cause the loss of or otherwise endanger state construction funds
available to the local school district. Any works of art rejected
under this section shall be applied to the provision of works of art
under this chapter, at the discretion of the Washington state arts
commission, notwithstanding any contract or agreement between the
affected school district and the artist involved. In addition to the
cost of the works of art the one-half of one percent of the
appropriation as provided herein shall be used to provide for the
administration, including conservation of the state art collection, by
the Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation of
the work of art. For the purpose of this section building shall not
include sheds, warehouses or other buildings of a temporary nature.
The executive director of the arts commission, the superintendent
of public instruction and the Washington state school directors
association shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the
one-half of one percent for works of art under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.10.025 and 1990 c 33 s 557 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington state arts commission shall, in consultation with
the boards of regents of the University of Washington and Washington
State University and with the boards of trustees of the regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community college
districts, determine the amount to be made available for the purchases
of art under RCW 28B.10.027, and payment therefor shall be made in
accordance with law. The designation of projects and sites, the
selection, contracting, purchase, commissioning, reviewing of design,
execution and placement, acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange,
or disposition of works of art shall be the responsibility of the
Washington state arts commission in consultation with the board of
regents or trustees. ((However, the costs to carry out the Washington
state arts commission's responsibility for maintenance shall not be
funded from the moneys referred to under this section, RCW 43.17.200,
43.19.455, or 28A.335.210, but shall be contingent upon adequate
appropriations being made for that purpose.))

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.10.027 and 1983 c 204 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
All universities and colleges shall allocate as a nondeductible
item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original construction or
any major renovation or remodel work exceeding two hundred thousand
dollars of any building, an amount of one-half of one percent of the
appropriation to be expended by the Washington state arts commission
with the approval of the board of regents or trustees for the
acquisition of works of art. The works of art may be placed on public
lands of institutions of higher education, integral to or attached to
a public building or structure of institutions of higher education,
detached within or outside a public building or structure of
institutions of higher education, part of a portable exhibition or
collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in
other public facilities.
In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half of one
percent of the appropriation shall be used to provide for the
administration of the visual arts program, including conservation of
the state art collection, by the Washington state arts commission and
all costs for installation of the work of art. For the purpose of this
section building shall not include sheds, warehouses, and other
buildings of a temporary nature.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.17.200 and 1983 c 204 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
All state agencies including all state departments, boards,
councils, commissions, and quasi public corporations shall allocate, as
a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original
construction of any public building, an amount of one-half of one
percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state
arts commission for the acquisition of works of art. The works of art
may be placed on public lands, integral to or attached to a public
building or structure, detached within or outside a public building or
structure, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a
temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public
facilities. In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half
of one percent of the appropriation as provided herein shall be used to
provide for the administration of the visual arts program, including
conservation of the state art collection, by the Washington state arts
commission and all costs for installation of the works of art. For the
purpose of this section building shall not include highway construction
sheds, warehouses or other buildings of a temporary nature.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.17.210 and 1990 c 33 s 575 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state arts commission shall determine the amount to
be made available for the purchase of art in consultation with the
agency, except where another person or agency is specified under RCW
43.19.455, 28A.335.210, or 28B.10.025, and payments therefor shall be
made in accordance with law. The designation of projects and sites,
selection, contracting, purchase, commissioning, reviewing of design,
execution and placement, acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange,
or disposition of works of art shall be the responsibility of the
Washington state arts commission in consultation with the directors of
the state agencies. ((However, the costs to carry out the Washington
state arts commission's responsibility for maintenance shall not be
funded from the moneys referred to in RCW 43.17.200, 43.19.455,
28A.335.210, or 28B.10.025, but shall be contingent upon adequate
appropriations being made for that purpose.))

Sec. 6 RCW 43.19.455 and 1990 c 33 s 576 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided under RCW 43.17.210, the Washington state arts
commission shall determine the amount to be made available for the
purchase of art under RCW 43.17.200 in consultation with the director
of general administration, and payments therefor shall be made in
accordance with law. The designation of projects and sites, selection,
contracting, purchase, commissioning, reviewing of design, execution
and placement, acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or
disposition of works of art shall be the responsibility of the
Washington state arts commission in consultation with the director of
general administration. ((However, the costs to carry out the
Washington state arts commission's responsibility for maintenance shall
not be funded from the moneys referred to under this section, RCW
43.17.200, 28A.335.210, or 28B.10.025, but shall be contingent upon
adequate appropriations being made for that purpose.))

--- END ---