BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that efforts to
protect children from abuse and neglect and support families are
dependent upon the efforts of staff in the field who work directly with
the children and families of this state. Child protective services
staff investigate reports of suspected child abuse and neglect and,
when necessary, intervene by providing services designed to increase
children's safety and protect them from further harm. Child welfare
services staff provide longer-term services to families, including
intensive treatment services to children and families who may need help
with chronic or serious problems that interfere with their ability to
protect or parent children.
The legislature determines that in order to perform their work, the
safety of child protective services and child welfare services staff
must be addressed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of social and health
services shall establish a work group to develop policies and protocols
to address the safety of child protective services and child welfare
services staff.
(2) Membership of the work group shall include the following:
Representatives of the children's administration of the department of
social and health services, including representatives of child
protective services staff and child welfare services staff; law
enforcement; and prosecuting attorneys.
(3) The department of social and health services shall provide the
developed policies and protocols to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005.

--- END ---