BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the staff and
volunteers at the state's residential habilitation centers and in
community residential settings provide compassionate, skilled care to
persons with developmental disabilities. The legislature also finds
that nationally there has been a decline in the number of residents in
states' institutions for individuals with developmental disabilities as
the demand for services has shifted from institutions to community
settings. In Washington state, just over one thousand one hundred
residents currently live in the state's residential habilitation
centers, down from a high of four thousand residents in 1967.
The legislature recognizes that the continuing decline in the
number of residents and the capital investments required by aging
facilities has resulted in increased costs to serve the residents
remaining at the state's residential habilitation centers. In order to
address this situation, the legislature intends to establish a
mechanism for determining how best to meet the residential care needs
of citizens of this state with developmental disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A commission is hereby created in the
governor's office to review the need for and existing capacity of
residential services, including residential habilitation centers and
community residential settings, that serve individuals with
developmental disabilities in Washington state. The commission shall
develop a plan for meeting the residential care needs of these
individuals. The commission shall take into consideration the research
conducted by the joint legislative audit and review committee relating
to the state's residential habilitation centers.
(1) In developing the residential plan, the commission shall
consider, at a minimum, the following factors:
(a) The needs of individuals currently being served in residential
habilitation centers or community residential programs;
(b) Staff expertise and specialization of care at existing
facilities;
(c) Utilization level of existing residential habilitation centers;
(d) Capacity for growth of each of the existing residential
habilitation centers and community residential programs;
(e) The relative costs and benefits of serving individuals in
residential habilitation centers and community residential programs;
(f) The geographic factors associated with each residential
habilitation center and its proximity to dense populations as well as
other similar facilities; and
(g) Costs and savings related to the consolidation or closure, or
both, of residential habilitation centers.
(2) The commission shall consist of thirteen members as follows:
(a) One representative each of the governor's office, the office of
financial management, the department of social and health services, and
the Washington state developmental disabilities council, appointed by
the governor;
(b) One representative of organized labor, appointed by the
governor;
(c) One representative of community residential care providers,
appointed by the governor;
(d) One representative of an advocacy organization for residents of
residential habilitation centers and their families, and one
representative of an advocacy organization for individuals served in
community residential programs and their families, appointed by the
governor;
(e) One individual with a developmental disability who is or has
been a resident in a residential habilitation center and who is being
or has been served in a community residential program, appointed by the
governor; and
(f) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives, one of whom shall be a member
of the majority caucus and one of whom shall be a member of the
minority caucus, and two members of the senate appointed by the
president of the senate, one of whom shall be a member of the majority
caucus and one of whom shall be a member of the minority caucus. The
legislative members of the commission shall be ex officio, nonvoting
members.
(3) The commission shall select a chairperson from among its
members.
(4) Legislative members of the commission shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The commission shall provide its residential plan to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by January
1, 2006.

--- END ---