BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.035 and 1999 c 315 s 708 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The public participation requirements of this chapter shall
include notice procedures that are reasonably calculated to provide
notice to property owners and other affected and interested
individuals, tribes, government agencies, businesses, school districts,
and organizations of proposed amendments to comprehensive plans and
development regulations. Examples of reasonable notice provisions
include:
(((a))) (i) Posting the property for site-specific proposals;
(((b))) (ii) Publishing notice in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county, city, or general area where the proposal is
located or that will be affected by the proposal;
(((c))) (iii) Notifying public or private groups with known
interest in a certain proposal or in the type of proposal being
considered;
(((d))) (iv) Placing notices in appropriate regional, neighborhood,
ethnic, or trade journals; and
(((e))) (v) Publishing notice in agency newsletters or sending
notice to agency mailing lists, including general lists or lists for
specific proposals or subject areas.
(b) Counties, with a population greater than two hundred thousand,
and cities, with a population greater than five thousand, satisfying
the requirements of RCW 36.70A.130 shall commence a public notification
process consistent with (a) of this subsection no later than one year
before the applicable completion date specified in RCW 36.70A.130(4)
(a) through (d). If the applicable completion date is less than one
year in the future on the effective date of this act, the affected city
or county shall commence the public notification process as soon as
reasonably possible.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, if
the legislative body for a county or city chooses to consider a change
to an amendment to a comprehensive plan or development regulation, and
the change is proposed after the opportunity for review and comment has
passed under the county's or city's procedures, an opportunity for
review and comment on the proposed change shall be provided before the
local legislative body votes on the proposed change.
(b) An additional opportunity for public review and comment is not
required under (a) of this subsection if:
(i) An environmental impact statement has been prepared under
chapter 43.21C RCW for the pending resolution or ordinance and the
proposed change is within the range of alternatives considered in the
environmental impact statement;
(ii) The proposed change is within the scope of the alternatives
available for public comment;
(iii) The proposed change only corrects typographical errors,
corrects cross-references, makes address or name changes, or clarifies
language of a proposed ordinance or resolution without changing its
effect;
(iv) The proposed change is to a resolution or ordinance making a
capital budget decision as provided in RCW 36.70A.120; or
(v) The proposed change is to a resolution or ordinance enacting a
moratorium or interim control adopted under RCW 36.70A.390.
(3) This section is prospective in effect and does not apply to a
comprehensive plan, development regulation, or amendment adopted before
July 27, 1997.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.140 and 1995 c 347 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Each county and city that is ((required or chooses to plan))
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish and broadly disseminate
to the public a public participation program identifying procedures
providing for early and continuous public participation in the
development and amendment of comprehensive land use plans and
development regulations implementing such plans. The procedures shall
provide for broad dissemination of proposals and alternatives,
opportunity for written comments, public meetings after effective
notice, provision for open discussion, communication programs,
information services, and consideration of and response to public
comments.
(b) In enacting legislation in response to the board's decision
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.300 declaring part or all of a comprehensive
plan or development regulation invalid, the county or city shall
provide for public participation that is appropriate and effective
under the circumstances presented by the board's order. ((Errors in
exact compliance with the established program and procedures shall not
render the comprehensive land use plan or development regulations
invalid if the spirit of the program and procedures is observed.))
(2) Counties, with a population greater than two hundred thousand,
and cities, with a population greater than five thousand, satisfying
the requirements of RCW 36.70A.130 shall commence a public
participation program consistent with subsection (1)(a) of this section
no later than one year before the applicable completion date specified
in RCW 36.70A.130(4) (a) through (d). If the applicable completion
date is less than one year in the future on the effective date of this
act, the affected city or county shall commence the public
participation program as soon as reasonably possible.
(3) Errors in exact compliance with the established program and
procedures shall not render the comprehensive land use plan or
development regulations invalid if the spirit of the program and
procedures is observed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
Failure to exactly comply with the public notification requirements
in sections 1 and 2 of this act shall not render the comprehensive land
use plan or development regulations invalid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is intended to be prospective, not
retroactive, in its application.

--- END ---