BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the need to
provide local governments with a new, stable, and broad source of
funding for capital infrastructure. The legislature recognizes also
the need to adequately fund growth in school districts and the need to
provide relief to the ongoing affordable housing crisis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other taxes authorized under this chapter,
the legislative authority of any county or any city may impose an
excise tax on each sale of real property in the unincorporated areas of
the county for the county tax, and in the corporate limits of the city
for the city tax, at a rate not exceeding two-fifths of one percent of
the selling price.
(2) Proceeds from tax imposed under this section shall be used
solely for the financing of a capital project.
(3) No city or county that imposes an impact fee with respect to
system improvements for public facilities other than school facilities
may impose a tax under this section.
(4) The following are exempt from tax imposed under this section:
(a) A sale of low-income housing property;
(b) A sale of property that is assessed under a preferential
valuation provided by chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW; and
(c) The first sale after the effective date of the tax imposed
under this section of a property within a residential development for
which impact fees were required for system improvements before the
effective date of the tax and for which the system improvements are not
yet complete.
(5) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Capital project" means:
(i) An activity or project described in RCW 82.46.010(6), except
that it does not include any activity or project associated with
trails, libraries, administrative or judicial facilities, or river or
waterway flood control projects;
(ii) A project for which impact fees are imposed under RCW
82.02.050 through 82.02.090, except that "capital project" also means
system improvements relating to fire protection facilities in fire
protection districts; and
(iii) A low-income housing project.
(b) "Impact fee" means:
(i) A fee imposed pursuant to RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 for
system improvements for public facilities; and
(ii) A fee imposed pursuant to RCW 43.21C.060 for a system
improvement for which a fee may otherwise be imposed pursuant to RCW
82.02.050 through 82.02.090.
(c) "Low-income housing" means housing constructed for the
principal purpose of making affordable housing available to households
for which the income is at or below fifty percent of the county median
household income.
(d) "System improvement" and "public facility" mean the same as in
RCW 82.02.090.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of a school district may impose an
excise tax on each sale of real property within the boundaries of the
district at a rate not to exceed one-quarter of one percent of the
selling price. Any taxes imposed under this section shall be paid to
and collected by the treasurer of the county within which the property
is located, as provided in RCW 82.46.060.
(2) Proceeds of the tax imposed under this section shall be used
solely for the purposes that impact fees may be imposed with respect to
system improvements for school facilities within the district.
(3) No school district may impose a tax under this section if the
city or county in which the district is located imposes an impact fee
with respect to system improvements for school facilities within the
district.
(4) The following are exempt from tax imposed under this section:
(a) A sale of low-income housing property;
(b) A sale of property that is assessed under a preferential
valuation provided by chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW;
(c) The first sale after the effective date of the tax imposed
under this section of a property within a residential development for
which impact fees were required for system improvements before the
effective date of the tax and for which the system improvements are not
yet complete; and
(d) A sale of property other than residential property.
(5) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Impact fee" means:
(i) A fee imposed pursuant to RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 for
system improvements for public facilities; and
(ii) A fee imposed pursuant to RCW 43.21C.060 for a system
improvement for which a fee may otherwise be imposed pursuant to RCW
82.02.050 through 82.02.090.
(b) "Low-income housing" means housing constructed for the
principal purpose of making affordable housing available to households
for which the income is at or below fifty percent of the county median
household income.
(c) "System improvement" and "public facility" mean the same as in
RCW 82.02.090.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.505.140 and 1990 c 33 s 422 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
superintendent of public instruction is hereby directed to ((promulgate
such)) adopt rules ((and regulations as)) that will insure proper
budgetary procedures and practices, including monthly financial
statements consistent with the provisions of RCW 43.09.200, and this
chapter.
(b) The adopted rules shall require that districts separately
report revenues resulting from the imposition and collection of each of
the following:
(i) Impact fees under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090;
(ii) Fees under RCW 43.21C.060; and
(iii) Taxes authorized under section 3 of this act.
(2) If the superintendent of public instruction determines upon a
review of the budget of any district that said budget does not comply
with the budget procedures established by this chapter or by rules
((and regulations promulgated)) adopted by the superintendent of public
instruction, or the provisions of RCW 43.09.200, the superintendent
shall give written notice of this determination to the board of
directors of the local school district.
(3) The local school district, notwithstanding any other provision
of law, shall, within thirty days from the date the superintendent of
public instruction issues a notice pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, submit a revised budget which meets the requirements of RCW
43.09.200, this chapter, and the rules ((and regulations)) of the
superintendent of public instruction: PROVIDED, That if the district
fails or refuses to submit a revised budget which in the determination
of the superintendent of public instruction meets the requirements of
RCW 43.09.200, this chapter, and the rules ((and regulations)) of the
superintendent of public instruction, the matter shall be submitted to
the state board of education, which board shall meet and adopt a
financial plan which shall be in effect until a budget can be adopted
and submitted by the district in compliance with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
No impact fee may be imposed by a city or county under RCW
82.02.050 through 82.02.090 for system improvements for:
(1) Public facilities other than school facilities, if the city or
county imposes a real estate excise tax under section 2 of this act;
(2) School facilities in a school district that imposes a real
estate excise tax under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
No fee may be imposed by a city or county under RCW 43.21C.060 for
a system improvement for:
(1) Public facilities other than school facilities, if the city or
county imposes a real estate excise tax under section 2 of this act;
(2) School facilities in a school district that imposes a real
estate excise tax under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a city or county imposes a real estate excise tax under
section 2 of this act, no impact fee may be imposed by that city or
county under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 for system improvements,
other than for school facilities, for at least eight years after the
effective date of the tax imposed under section 2 of this act.
(2) If a school district imposes a real estate excise tax under
section 3 of this act, no impact fee may be imposed by a city or county
under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 for school facilities in the
district for at least eight years after the effective date of the tax
imposed under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a city or county imposes a real estate excise tax under
section 2 of this act, no fee may be imposed by the city or county
under RCW 43.21C.060 for system improvements, other than for school
facilities, for at least eight years after the effective date of the
tax imposed under section 2 of this act.
(2) If a school district imposes a real estate excise tax under
section 3 of this act, no fee may be imposed by a city or county under
RCW 43.21C.060 for school facilities in the district for at least eight
years after the effective date of the tax imposed under section 3 of
this act.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.02.070 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 46 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Impact fee receipts shall be earmarked specifically and
retained in special interest-bearing accounts. Separate accounts shall
be established for each type of public facility for which impact fees
are collected. All interest shall be retained in the account and
expended for the purpose or purposes for which the impact fees were
imposed. Annually, each county, city, or town imposing impact fees
shall provide a report on each impact fee account showing the source
and amount of all moneys collected, earned, or received and system
improvements that were financed in whole or in part by impact fees.
(2) Impact fees for system improvements shall be expended only in
conformance with the capital facilities plan element of the
comprehensive plan.
(3)(a) Impact fees shall be expended or encumbered for a
permissible use within six years of receipt, unless there exists an
extraordinary and compelling reason for fees to be held longer than six
years. Such extraordinary or compelling reasons shall be identified in
written findings by the governing body of the county, city, or town.
(b) A city or county may retain unspent or unencumbered funds after
a tax is imposed under section 2 or 3 of this act under the following
conditions:
(i) The fees are expended or encumbered for a permissible use as
described under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 within six years of
when the required fees were due; and
(ii) An exemption is allowed from tax under section 2 or 3 of this
act with respect to the first sale after the effective date of the tax
of each property within a residential development for which the impact
fees are required.
(4) Impact fees may be paid under protest in order to obtain a
permit or other approval of development activity.
(5) The requirement to pay impact fees with respect to development
activity that occurs before a tax is imposed under section 2 or 3 of
this act is not extinguished by the imposition of the tax.
(6) Each county, city, or town that imposes impact fees shall
provide for an administrative appeals process for the appeal of an
impact fee; the process may follow the appeal process for the
underlying development approval or the county, city, or town may
establish a separate appeals process. The impact fee may be modified
upon a determination that it is proper to do so based on principles of
fairness. The county, city, or town may provide for the resolution of
disputes regarding impact fees by arbitration.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.02.080 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 47 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The current owner of property on which an impact fee has been
paid may receive a refund of such fees if the county, city, or town
fails to expend or encumber the impact fees within six years of when
the fees were paid or other such period of time established pursuant to
RCW 82.02.070(3) on public facilities intended to benefit the
development activity for which the impact fees were paid. In
determining whether impact fees have been encumbered, impact fees shall
be considered encumbered on a first in, first out basis. The county,
city, or town shall notify potential claimants by first class mail
deposited with the United States postal service at the last known
address of claimants.
The request for a refund must be submitted to the county, city, or
town governing body in writing within one year of the date the right to
claim the refund arises or the date that notice is given, whichever is
later. Any impact fees that are not expended within these time
limitations, and for which no application for a refund has been made
within this one-year period, shall be retained and expended on the
indicated capital facilities. Refunds of impact fees under this
subsection shall include interest earned on the impact fees.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, when a
county, city, or town seeks to terminate any or all impact fee
requirements, all unexpended or unencumbered funds, including interest
earned, shall be refunded pursuant to this section. Upon the finding
that any or all fee requirements are to be terminated, the county,
city, or town shall place notice of such termination and the
availability of refunds in a newspaper of general circulation at least
two times and shall notify all potential claimants by first class mail
to the last known address of claimants. All funds available for refund
shall be retained for a period of one year. At the end of one year,
any remaining funds shall be retained by the local government, but must
be expended for the indicated public facilities. This notice
requirement shall not apply if there are no unexpended or unencumbered
balances within an account or accounts being terminated.
(3) A developer may request and shall receive a refund, including
interest earned on the impact fees, when the developer does not proceed
with the development activity and no impact has resulted.
(4) Unexpended or unencumbered funds may be retained by a city or
county as provided in RCW 82.02.070(3)(b).

Sec. 11 RCW 82.46.030 and 2000 c 103 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county treasurer shall place one percent of the proceeds of
the taxes imposed under this chapter in the county current expense fund
to defray costs of collection.
(2) The remaining proceeds from the county tax under RCW
82.46.010(2) shall be placed in a county capital improvements fund.
The remaining proceeds from city or town taxes under RCW 82.46.010(2)
shall be distributed to the respective cities and towns monthly and
placed by the city treasurer in a municipal capital improvements fund.
The remaining proceeds from school district taxes under section 3 of
this act shall be placed for each district imposing tax in a school
district capital improvement fund for the purposes provided in section
3(2) of this act, as applicable.
(3) This section does not limit the existing authority of any city,
town, or county to impose special assessments on property specially
benefited thereby in the manner prescribed by law.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.46.060 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 41 and 1990 1st
ex.s. c 5 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Any taxes imposed under this chapter or RCW 82.46.070 shall be paid
to and collected by the treasurer of the county within which is located
the real property which was sold. The treasurer shall act as agent for
any city or school district within the county imposing the tax. The
county treasurer shall cause a stamp evidencing satisfaction of the
lien to be affixed to the instrument of sale or conveyance prior to its
recording or to the real estate excise tax affidavit in the case of
used mobile home sales. A receipt issued by the county treasurer for
the payment of the tax imposed under this chapter or RCW 82.46.070
shall be evidence of the satisfaction of the lien imposed in RCW
82.46.040 and may be recorded in the manner prescribed for recording
satisfactions of mortgages. No instrument of sale or conveyance
evidencing a sale subject to the tax may be accepted by the county
auditor for filing or recording until the tax is paid and the stamp
affixed thereto; in case the tax is not due on the transfer, the
instrument shall not be accepted until suitable notation of this fact
is made on the instrument by the treasurer.

Sec. 13 RCW 82.46.080 and 1998 c 106 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
A county, city, ((or)) town, or school district that imposes an
excise tax under this chapter must provide the county treasurer with a
copy of the ordinance or other action initially authorizing the tax or
altering the rate of the tax that is imposed at least sixty days before
change becomes effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 No tax may be imposed under this act before
January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---