BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the need to
provide local governments with a new, stable, and broad source of
funding for capital infrastructure. The legislature recognizes also
the need to adequately fund growth in school districts and the need to
provide relief to the ongoing affordable housing crisis.

--- END ---