BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.12.220 and 2004 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If an employer fails to file in a timely and complete manner
a report required by RCW 50.12.070, or the rules adopted pursuant
thereto, the employer shall be subject to a penalty to be determined by
the commissioner, but not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars or ten
percent of the quarterly contributions for each such offense, whichever
is less.
(b) If an employer knowingly misrepresents to the employment
security department the amount of his or her payroll upon which
contributions under this title are based, the employer shall be liable
to the state for up to ten times the amount of the difference in
contributions paid, if any, and the amount the employer should have
paid and for the reasonable expenses of auditing his or her books and
collecting such sums. Such liability may be enforced in the name of
the department.
(c) If any part of a delinquency for which an assessment is made
under this title is due to an intent to evade the successorship
provisions of RCW 50.29.062, then for the calendar year in which the
commissioner makes the determination under this subsection, the
commissioner shall assign to the employer, and to any business found to
be promoting the evasion of such provisions, the contribution rate
determined for that calendar year under RCW 50.29.025, including the
solvency surcharge, if any, for rate class 20 or rate class 40, as
applicable, plus two percent.
(2) If contributions are not paid on the date on which they are due
and payable as prescribed by the commissioner, there shall be assessed
a penalty of five percent of the amount of the contributions for the
first month or part thereof of delinquency; there shall be assessed a
total penalty of ten percent of the amount of the contributions for the
second month or part thereof of delinquency; and there shall be
assessed a total penalty of twenty percent of the amount of the
contributions for the third month or part thereof of delinquency. No
penalty so added shall be less than ten dollars. These penalties are
in addition to the interest charges assessed under RCW 50.24.040.
(3) Penalties shall not accrue on contributions from an estate in
the hands of a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee in
bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating officer
subsequent to the date when such receiver, executor, administrator,
trustee in bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating
officer qualifies as such, but contributions accruing with respect to
employment of persons by a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee
in bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating officer shall
become due and shall be subject to penalties in the same manner as
contributions due from other employers.
(4)(a) Where adequate information has been furnished to the
department and the department has failed to act or has advised the
employer of no liability or inability to decide the issue, penalties
shall be waived by the commissioner.
(b) If a quarterly wage report lists an employee's name, hours
worked, and wages paid, but does not list the employee's social
security number, and if the employee's hours worked are less than
seventy hours, it is presumed that, on or before the seventh day after
the occurrence of the first day of employment, the employee did not:
(i) Show the employer the employee's account number card issued by the
social security administration; (ii) advise the employer of the
employee's account number and name; or (iii) show the employer a
receipt issued to him by an office of the social security
administration acknowledging that an application for an account number
has been received. In these circumstances, the commissioner shall
waive any penalties for not listing the employee's social security
number on the quarterly wage report.
(c) Penalties may also be waived for good cause if the commissioner
determines that the failure to timely file reports or pay contributions
was not due to the employer's fault.
(5) Any decision to assess a penalty as provided by this section
shall be made by the chief administrative officer of the tax branch or
his or her designee.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny an employer
the right to appeal the assessment of any penalty. Such appeal shall
be made in the manner provided in RCW 50.32.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

--- END ---