BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.95M RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2006, a person who is known to be pregnant or
who is under three years of age shall not be vaccinated with a mercury-containing vaccine or injected with a mercury-containing product that
contains more than 0.5 micrograms of mercury per 0.5 milliliter dose.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, an influenza
vaccine may contain up to 1.0 micrograms of mercury per 0.5 milliliter
dose.

--- END ---