BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington's
agriculture and food processing industries are diversified, productive,
and significant contributors to our state's economy. Urban and rural
communities statewide benefit from the direct jobs, income, and
revenues generated by the production of commodities and processing of
food. However, these direct impacts do not represent the full value of
these industries to our economy. The legislature finds that an
accurate and comprehensive assessment of the economic impacts of
agriculture and food processing is needed to assist in the development
of good public policy and planning for the future.
(2) The department of agriculture shall commission a comprehensive
study of the direct, indirect, and induced impacts of agriculture and
food processing on the state's economy. The study shall consider the
multiplier effects of the agriculture and food industries on sectors
such as: Transportation; research and development; retailing;
packaging; distribution and storage; inputs; banking; law;
manufacturing; tourism; and other relevant industries. The study shall
include data on the statewide and regional impacts of the agriculture
and food processing industries; growth trends of specific commodities
and value-added products; and external events or conditions that are
affecting the economic performance of the agriculture and food industry
overall.
The study shall also assess the economic linkages between the food
processing sector and agricultural commodities, specifically the extent
to which Washington food manufacturers use local and regional
commodities in their processing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of agriculture shall use a
competitive process to select a contractor to conduct the study. The
department of agriculture shall convene an advisory committee to help
determine the scope of the study, select the contractor, and provide
industry data as needed. The advisory committee may include, but not
be limited to, representatives of agricultural commodity commissions
and organizations, food industry organizations, local economic
development councils, and state agencies including the department of
community, trade, and economic development, the employment security
department, and the department of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of agriculture shall submit
a report on the study findings and recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by June 30, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2006, from the general fund to the department of
agriculture for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---