BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall seek to promptly reestablish galley food
service on vessels. In reestablishing galley service, the department
shall follow these principles:
(1) First, make every effort to facilitate the completion of
current negotiations for the provision of galley service for the 2005
summer season.
(2) At a minimum, fully recover the costs of providing galley
service.
(3) Consider state operation of galley service if it will result in
earliest commencement of the service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---