BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to maintain the best
available science requirement. The intent of the legislature is to
clarify the best available science requirement and what it means for a
local government to include best available science in designating and
protecting critical areas, while achieving the other goals and
requirements of the growth management act.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.172 and 1995 c 347 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In designating and protecting critical areas under this
chapter, counties and cities shall include the best available science
in developing policies and development regulations to protect the
functions and values of critical areas. In addition, counties and
cities shall give special consideration to conservation or protection
measures necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous fisheries.
(2) If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts
is necessary or will be of substantial assistance in reaching its
decision, a growth management hearings board may retain scientific or
other expert advice to assist in reviewing a petition under RCW
36.70A.290 that involves critical areas.
(3) To demonstrate that the best available science has been
included in the development of critical areas policies and regulations,
counties and cities must address each of the following on the record:
(a) The specific policies and development regulations adopted to
protect the functions and values of the critical areas at issue;
(b) The relevant sources of best available scientific information
included in the decision making; and
(c) Any nonscientific information, including legal, social,
cultural, economic, and political information, used as a basis for
critical area policies and regulations.
(4) If a county or city elects to adopt a critical area policy or
regulation that is outside the range that best available science alone
would support because another goal or requirement of this chapter
cannot otherwise be achieved, the county or city must:
(a) Identify the information in the record that supports its
decision to depart from science-based recommendations;
(b) Explain its rationale for departing from science-based
recommendations;
(c) Identify potential risks to the functions and values of the
critical area or areas at issue and any additional measures chosen to
limit such risks; and
(d) Identify evidence in the record that shows the departure is
necessary to achieve the goals or requirements of this chapter.
(5) If a county or city adopts a policy or regulation under
subsection (4) of this section, the county or city must minimize risk
and employ monitoring and adaptive management and any other components
necessary to confirm whether the approach used is adequately protecting
the functions and values of that critical area, and adjust the approach
as necessary to ensure protection of critical area functions and
values.

--- END ---