BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.16 RCW
to read as follows:
No person, other than an entity subject to RCW 19.16.500, may
assign a debt to a collection agency unless:
(1) The person has made an attempt to advise the debtor (a) of the
existence of the debt; and (b) that the debt may be assigned to a
collection agency for collection if the debt is not paid within ten
days after the date of notice of the existence of the debt; and
(2) At least thirty days have elapsed from the time notice was
attempted.

--- END ---