BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) One strategy to accomplish expansion of capacity for
baccalaureate degrees in underserved regions of the state is to
allocate state funds for student enrollment to community and technical
colleges and authorize the colleges to enter into agreements with a
regional university or state college as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or a
branch campus under chapter 28B.45 RCW, to offer baccalaureate degree
programs.
(2) Subject to legislative appropriation for the purpose described
in this section:
(a) A community or technical college may enter into agreements with
one or more regional universities, branch campuses, or the state
college to offer baccalaureate degree programs on the college campus;
or
(b) The college board may enter into a master agreement with
regional universities, branch campuses, or the state college to offer
baccalaureate degree programs on multiple college campuses.
(3) Allocation of funds by the college board shall be based on
analysis of gaps in service delivery, capacity, and student and
employer demand for programs. Students enrolled in programs under this
section are considered students of the regional university, branch
campus, or state college for all purposes including tuition and
reporting of state-funded enrollments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2005, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---