BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the professional
certification process required of new teachers and experienced teachers
from out of state is intended to provide candidates with a method for
advancing their teaching skills and demonstrating their ability to
improve student achievement. The legislature also finds that the
implementation of the professional certification process has faced
unresolved challenges that include wide variations in the quality,
relevance, and cost of different certification programs. The
legislature intends to direct state agencies to address issues of
educator preparation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board shall biennially
review preparation programs leading to professional certification. The
review shall include but need not be limited to:
(a) A review of program coursework requirements and their
relationships to student learning;
(b) Linkages of programs to individual teacher professional growth
plans;
(c) Linkages to school district and school improvement plans;
(d) An evaluation of program costs to participants;
(e) Surveys of current and past program participants and mentors;
and
(f) To the extent possible, linkages to school district
professional enrichment and growth programs for teachers, where such
programs are in place in school districts.
(2) Beginning in 2008, to the extent possible, the review shall
include the impact on student work and achievement of educators who
have obtained professional certification.
(3) The professional educator standards board shall report the
results of the review to the education and higher education committees
of the senate and house of representatives by December 1, 2005, and
December 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter. The report shall
include: The board's findings by institution; a summary of each
institution's improvement plan; a description of exemplary practices;
and any specific plans for agency technical assistance and support to
the individual programs.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.410.210 and 2000 c 39 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington professional educator standards board shall:
(1) Serve as an advisory body to the superintendent of public
instruction and as the sole advisory body to the state board of
education on issues related to educator recruitment, hiring,
preparation, certification including high quality alternative routes to
certification, mentoring and support, professional growth, retention,
governance, prospective teacher pedagogy assessment, prospective
principal assessment, educator evaluation including but not limited to
peer evaluation, and revocation and suspension of licensure;
(2) Adopt rules for the professional certification of educators who
have already obtained initial or residency certification and for the
approval of preparation programs leading to the professional
certificate;
(3) Submit annual reports and recommendations, beginning December
1, 2000, to the governor, the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature, the state board of education, and the superintendent of
public instruction concerning duties and activities within the board's
advisory capacity. The Washington professional educator standards
board shall submit a separate report by December 1, 2000, to the
governor, the education and fiscal committees of the legislature, the
state board of education, and the superintendent of public instruction
providing recommendations for at least two high quality alternative
routes to teacher certification. In its deliberations, the board shall
consider at least one route that permits persons with substantial
subject matter expertise to achieve residency certification through an
on-the-job training program provided by a school district; and
(((3))) (4) Establish the prospective teacher assessment system for
basic skills and subject knowledge that shall be required to obtain
residency certification pursuant to RCW 28A.410.220 through
28A.410.240.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
The professional educator standards board shall adopt rules for the
professional certification of educators and the programs that prepare
educators for that certification. The rules shall:
(1) Permit maximum program choice for applicants, promote
portability among programs, and require program designs that promote
the professional growth of candidates in ways that minimize paperwork
and link requirements directly to student learning and achievement;
(2) Require professional certification beginning no earlier than
the 2006-07 school year;
(3) Require professional certification no earlier than the fifth
year following the receipt of a continuing employment contract and
allow any teacher who began a professional certification program before
June 30, 2005, to continue the program under the administrative rules
in place when the teacher began the program;
(4) Provide criteria for the approval of professional certification
programs offered by accredited institutions of higher education;
(5) Provide criteria for a liaison relationship between approved
programs and school districts for teachers enrolled in the programs;
(6) Identify a process for out-of-state certificated teachers not
yet certificated in Washington who have graduated from regionally
accredited institutions of higher education and who hold valid out-of-state certificates. The rules shall award professional certification
to out-of-state teachers who have five years or more of successful
teaching experience if the teachers have had that experience within the
preceding three years and can show evidence of professional development
during their teaching careers. The rules may require these teachers,
within one year of the time they begin to teach in the state's public
schools, to take a course in or show evidence that they can teach to
the state's essential academic learning requirements;
(7) Design and pilot a professional certification preparation
program in which one or more educational service districts are lead
partners in the program. In the program, educational service districts
shall control the professional growth process and no core of coursework
may be required. Institutions of higher education may be partners in
the process, offering expertise as necessary and providing some or all
of the coursework required by teachers' professional growth plans. By
September 1, 2006, the board shall report the design of the pilot
program to the legislative education committees. The board shall
report to the legislative committees on education on the results of the
pilot program no later than three years after the pilot program has
commenced;
(8) Explore ways to provide candidates with low or no-cost program
options;
(9) Require the board to notify school districts and teachers about
six months before a certificate is due to expire;
(10) Require the board to explore reasonable options to deal with
lapsed certificates. Any options should include a graduated series of
consequences that are lenient for teachers whose certificates have been
lapsed fewer than six months and consists of a small fine for teachers
whose certificates have been lapsed between six months and two years;
and
(11) Implement an annual evaluation process of approved programs
that includes a review of the program coursework requirements, linkages
of programs to individual teacher professional growth plans, linkages
to school district and school improvement plans, and, to the extent
possible, linkages to school district professional enrichment and
growth programs for teachers, where such programs are in place in
school districts.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.305.130 and 2002 c 205 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the
state board of education shall:
(1) Approve or disapprove the program of courses leading to initial
teacher, school administrator, and school specialized personnel
certification offered by all institutions of higher education within
the state which may be accredited and whose graduates may become
entitled to receive such certification, except those programs leading
to professional certification.
(2) Conduct every five years a review of the program approval
standards, except those programs leading to professional certification,
including the minimum standards for teachers, administrators, and
educational staff associates, to reflect research findings and assure
continued improvement of preparation programs for teachers,
administrators, and educational staff associates.
(3) Investigate the character of the work required to be performed
as a condition of entrance to and graduation from any institution of
higher education in this state relative to such certification as
provided for in subsection (1) of this section, and prepare a list of
accredited institutions of higher education of this and other states
whose graduates may be awarded such certificates.
(4)(a) The state board of education shall adopt rules to allow a
teacher certification candidate to fulfill, in part, teacher
preparation program requirements through work experience as a
classified teacher's aide in a public school or private school meeting
the requirements of RCW 28A.195.010. The rules shall include, but are
not limited to, limitations based upon the recency of the teacher
preparation candidate's teacher aide work experience, and limitations
based on the amount of work experience that may apply toward teacher
preparation program requirements under this chapter.
(b) The state board of education shall require that at the time of
the individual's enrollment in a teacher preparation program, the
supervising teacher and the building principal shall jointly provide to
the teacher preparation program of the higher education institution at
which the teacher candidate is enrolled, a written assessment of the
performance of the teacher candidate. The assessment shall contain
such information as determined by the state board of education and
shall include: Evidence that at least fifty percent of the candidate's
work as a classified teacher's aide was involved in instructional
activities with children under the supervision of a certificated
teacher and that the candidate worked a minimum of six hundred thirty
hours for one school year; the type of work performed by the candidate;
and a recommendation of whether the candidate's work experience as a
classified teacher's aide should be substituted for teacher preparation
program requirements. In compliance with such rules as may be
established by the state board of education under this section, the
teacher preparation programs of the higher education institution where
the candidate is enrolled shall make the final determination as to what
teacher preparation program requirements may be fulfilled by teacher
aide work experience.
(5) Supervise the issuance of such certificates, except
professional certificates, as provided for in subsection (1) of this
section and specify the types and kinds of certificates necessary for
the several departments of the common schools by rule or regulation in
accordance with RCW 28A.410.010.
(6) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and
procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all
schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to the
provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a program
for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve: PROVIDED,
That no private school may be approved that operates a kindergarten
program only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no public or private schools
shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret
societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school
officials: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the state board may elect to require
all or certain classifications of the public schools to conduct and
participate in such preaccreditation examination and evaluation
processes as may now or hereafter be established by the board.
(7) Make rules ((and regulations)) governing the establishment in
any existing nonhigh school district of any secondary program or any
new grades in grades nine through twelve. Before any such program or
any new grades are established the district must obtain prior approval
of the state board.
(8) Prepare such outline of study for the common schools as the
board shall deem necessary, and prescribe such rules for the general
government of the common schools, as shall seek to secure regularity of
attendance, prevent truancy, secure efficiency, and promote the true
interest of the common schools.
(9) Continuously reevaluate courses and adopt and enforce
((regulations)) rules within the common schools so as to meet the
educational needs of students and articulate with the institutions of
higher education and unify the work of the public school system.
(10) Carry out board powers and duties relating to the organization
and reorganization of school districts under chapter 28A.315 RCW
((28A.315.010 through 28A.315.680 and 28A.315.900)).
(11) Hear and decide appeals as otherwise provided by law.
The state board of education is given the authority to promulgate
information and rules dealing with the prevention of child abuse for
purposes of curriculum use in the common schools.

--- END ---