BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
LEVY LID
Sec. 101 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2004 c 21 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsections (3) and (4)
of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as
defined in subsection (5) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (5) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2005 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year and the amounts determined under subsection (4) of
this section, including allocations for compensation increases, plus
the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per full
time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) For levy collections in calendar years 2005 through 2007, in
addition to the allocations included under subsection (3)(a) through
(c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include the
following:
(a) The difference between the allocation the district would have
received in the current school year had RCW 84.52.068 not been amended
by chapter 19, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocation the
district received in the current school year pursuant to RCW 84.52.068.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offset the
amount added to a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection
(4)(a) by any additional per student allocations included in a
district's levy base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the
people subsequent to June 10, 2004; and
(b) The difference between the allocations the district would have
received the prior school year had RCW 28A.400.205 not been amended by
chapter 20, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocations the district
actually received the prior school year pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offset the
amount added to a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection
(4)(b) by any additional salary increase allocations included in a
district's levy base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the
people subsequent to June 10, 2004.
(5) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be ((twenty-two))
forty percent ((in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year
thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the grandfathered
percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (6) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection)).
(6) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsections (3) and
(4) of this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment
changes, compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b)
that are or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year" means the
most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies
are to be collected.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "current school year" means
the year immediately following the prior school year.
(9) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

Sec. 102 RCW 84.52.0531 and 1997 c 259 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as defined
in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (4) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year, including allocations for compensation increases,
plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per
full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be ((twenty-two))
forty percent ((in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year
thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the grandfathered
percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (5) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection)).
(5) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsection (3) of
this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment changes,
compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b) that are
or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year" means the
most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies
are to be collected.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "current school year" means
the year immediately following the prior school year.
(8) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

PART II
LEVY EQUALIZATION
Sec. 201 RCW 28A.150.250 and 1990 c 33 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) From those funds made available by the legislature for the
current use of the common schools, the superintendent of public
instruction shall distribute annually as provided in RCW 28A.510.250 to
each school district of the state operating a program approved by the
state board of education an amount which, when combined with an
appropriate portion of such locally available revenues, other than
receipts from federal forest revenues distributed to school districts
pursuant to RCW 28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020, as the superintendent of
public instruction may deem appropriate for consideration in computing
state equalization support, excluding excess property tax levies, will
constitute a basic education allocation in dollars for each annual
average full time equivalent student enrolled, based upon one full
school year of one hundred eighty days, except that for kindergartens
one full school year shall be one hundred eighty half days of
instruction, or the equivalent as provided in RCW 28A.150.220.
(2) Basic education shall be considered to be fully funded by those
amounts of dollars appropriated by the legislature pursuant to:
(a) RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 to fund those program
requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 in accordance with the
formula and ratios provided in RCW 28A.150.260 ((and));
(b) Those amounts of dollars appropriated by the legislature to
fund the salary requirements of RCW 28A.150.100 and 28A.150.410; and
(c) RCW 28A.500.030.
(3) Operation of a program approved by the state board of
education, for the purposes of this section, shall include a finding
that the ratio of students per classroom teacher in grades kindergarten
through three is not greater than the ratio of students per classroom
teacher in grades four and above for such district: PROVIDED, That for
the purposes of this section, "classroom teacher" shall be defined as
an instructional employee possessing at least a provisional
certificate, but not necessarily employed as a certificated employee,
whose primary duty is the daily educational instruction of students:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the state board of education shall adopt rules
and regulations to insure compliance with the student/teacher ratio
provisions of this section, and such rules and regulations shall allow
for exemptions for those special programs and/or school districts which
may be deemed unable to practicably meet the student/teacher ratio
requirements of this section by virtue of a small number of students.
(4) If a school district's basic education program fails to meet
the basic education requirements enumerated in RCW 28A.150.250,
28A.150.260, and 28A.150.220, the state board of education shall
require the superintendent of public instruction to withhold state
funds in whole or in part for the basic education allocation until
program compliance is assured: PROVIDED, That the state board of
education may waive this requirement in the event of substantial lack
of classroom space.

Sec. 202 RCW 28A.500.010 and 1999 c 317 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Commencing with calendar year 2000, in addition to a school
district's other general fund allocations, each eligible district shall
be provided local effort assistance funds. The purpose of these funds
is to mitigate the effect that above average property tax rates might
have on the ability of a school district to raise local revenues to
supplement the state's basic program of education. These funds serve
to equalize the property tax rates that individual taxpayers would pay
for such levies and to provide tax relief to taxpayers in high tax rate
school districts. ((Such funds are not part of the district's basic
education allocation.))

Sec. 203 RCW 28A.500.030 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 912 are each
amended to read as follows:
((Allocation of state matching funds to eligible districts for
local effort assistance shall be determined as follows:
(1) Funds raised by the district through maintenance and operation
levies shall be matched with state funds using the following ratio of
state funds to levy funds:
(a) The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate
and the statewide average twelve percent levy rate; to
(b) The statewide average twelve percent levy rate.
(2) The maximum amount of state matching funds for districts
eligible for local effort assistance shall be the district's twelve
percent levy amount, multiplied by the following percentage:
(a) The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate
and the statewide average twelve percent levy rate; divided by
(b) The district's twelve percent levy rate.
(3) Calendar year 2003 allocations and maximum eligibility under
this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.99.
(4) From January 1, 2004, to June 30, 2005, allocations and maximum
eligibility under this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.937.)) (1)
Beginning with calendar year 2006, and thereafter, total statewide
local effort assistance allocations shall be 14.5 percent of total
statewide excess levy collections under RCW 84.52.0531.
(2) Levy equalization allocations to districts shall be determined
by rule adopted by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 RCW 28A.500.020 (Definitions) and 2004 c
21 s 1 & 1999 c 317 s 2 are each repealed.

PART III
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 Sections 101, 201 through 204, and 301 of
this act take effect January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 Section 102 of this act takes effect
January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 Section 101 of this act expires January 1,
2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 This act takes effect if the proposed
amendment to Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution providing
for a simple majority of voters voting to authorize a school levy,
House Joint Resolution No. 4205 is validly submitted to and is approved
and ratified by the voters at the next general election. If the
proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void in
its entirety.

--- END ---