BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.030 and 1997 c 429 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new
comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land
use plan.
(2) "Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the
commercial production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural,
dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay,
straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax
imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish in upland
hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial
significance for agricultural production.
(3) "City" means any city or town, including a code city.
(4) "Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan"
means a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the
governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to this
chapter.
(5) "Critical areas" include the following areas and ecosystems:
(a) Wetlands; (b) areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers
used for potable water; (c) fish and wildlife habitat conservation
areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; and (e) geologically hazardous
areas.
(6) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(7) "Development regulations" or "regulation" means the controls
placed on development or land use activities by a county or city,
including, but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas
ordinances, shoreline master programs, official controls, planned unit
development ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan
ordinances together with any amendments thereto. A development
regulation does not include a decision to approve a project permit
application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though the decision may
be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body of
the county or city.
(8) "Forest land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for
long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically
and practically managed for such production, including Christmas trees
subject to the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through
84.33.140, and that has long-term commercial significance. In
determining whether forest land is primarily devoted to growing trees
for long-term commercial timber production on land that can be
economically and practically managed for such production, the following
factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban,
suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for
timber production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and
services conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.
(9) "Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that because of
their susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other
geological events, are not suited to the siting of commercial,
residential, or industrial development consistent with public health or
safety concerns.
(10) "Land suitable for development" means all vacant, partially
used, and underutilized parcels that are: (a) Designated for
commercial, industrial, or residential use; (b) not intended for public
use; and (c) not constrained by critical areas in a way that limits
development potential and makes new construction on a parcel
unfeasible.
(11) "Long-term commercial significance" includes the growing
capacity, productivity, and soil composition of the land for long-term
commercial production, in consideration with the land's proximity to
population areas, and the possibility of more intense uses of the land.
(((11))) (12) "Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable
metallic substances.
(((12))) (13) "Performance measures" means an indicator providing
consistent and reliable information over time to help gauge how a
jurisdiction is achieving specified performance results. For purposes
of this subsection, "indicator" means a quantifiable measurement or
index.
(14) "Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways,
sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic
water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational
facilities, and schools.
(((13))) (15) "Public services" include fire protection and
suppression, law enforcement, public health, education, recreation,
environmental protection, and other governmental services.
(((14))) (16) "Reasonable measures" means comprehensive planning
policies and development regulations that are likely to increase
consistency with this chapter and the countywide planning policies and
comprehensive plan.
(17) "Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and
development established by a county in the rural element of its
comprehensive plan:
(a) In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation
predominate over the built environment;
(b) That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based
economies, and opportunities to both live and work in rural areas;
(c) That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in
rural areas and communities;
(d) That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and
for fish and wildlife habitat;
(e) That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development;
(f) That generally do not require the extension of urban
governmental services; and
(g) That are consistent with the protection of natural surface
water flows and ground water and surface water recharge and discharge
areas.
(((15))) (18) "Rural counties" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.14.370(5).
(19) "Rural development" refers to development outside the urban
growth area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource
lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can
consist of a variety of uses and residential densities, including
clustered residential development, at levels that are consistent with
the preservation of rural character and the requirements of the rural
element. Rural development does not refer to agriculture or forestry
activities that may be conducted in rural areas.
(((16))) (20) "Rural governmental services" or "rural services"
include those public services and public facilities historically and
typically delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and
may include domestic water systems, fire and police protection
services, transportation and public transit services, and other public
utilities associated with rural development and normally not associated
with urban areas. Rural services do not include storm or sanitary
sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW 36.70A.110(4).
(((17))) (21) "Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive
use of land for the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable
surfaces to such a degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of
land for the production of food, other agricultural products, or fiber,
or the extraction of mineral resources, rural uses, rural development,
and natural resource lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A
pattern of more intensive rural development, as provided in RCW
36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread over
wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban governmental
services. "Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban
growth located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area
with urban growth on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.
(((18))) (22) "Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by
a county pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.
(((19))) (23) "Urban governmental services" or "urban services"
include those public services and public facilities at an intensity
historically and typically provided in cities, specifically including
storm and sanitary sewer systems, domestic water systems, street
cleaning services, fire and police protection services, public transit
services, and other public utilities associated with urban areas and
normally not associated with rural areas.
(((20))) (24) "Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are
inundated or saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency
and duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances
do support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in
saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes,
bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial
wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland sites, including, but
not limited to, irrigation and drainage ditches, grass-lined swales,
canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment facilities, farm
ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1,
1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the construction
of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those artificial
wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.210 and 1998 c 171 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that counties are regional
governments within their boundaries, and cities are primary providers
of urban governmental services within urban growth areas. For the
purposes of this section, a "countywide planning policy" is a written
policy statement or statements used solely for establishing a
countywide framework from which county and city comprehensive plans are
developed and adopted pursuant to this chapter. This framework shall
ensure that city and county comprehensive plans are consistent as
required in RCW 36.70A.100. Nothing in this section shall be construed
to alter the land-use powers of cities.
(2) The legislative authority of a county that plans under RCW
36.70A.040 shall adopt a countywide planning policy in cooperation with
the cities located in whole or in part within the county as follows:
(a) No later than sixty calendar days from July 16, 1991, the
legislative authority of each county that as of June 1, 1991, was
required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall convene a meeting
with representatives of each city located within the county for the
purpose of establishing a collaborative process that will provide a
framework for the adoption of a countywide planning policy. In other
counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this
meeting shall be convened no later than sixty days after the date the
county adopts its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management.
(b) The process and framework for adoption of a countywide planning
policy specified in (a) of this subsection shall determine the manner
in which the county and the cities agree to all procedures and
provisions including but not limited to desired planning policies,
deadlines, ratification of final agreements and demonstration thereof,
and financing, if any, of all activities associated therewith.
(c) If a county fails for any reason to convene a meeting with
representatives of cities as required in (a) of this subsection, the
governor may immediately impose any appropriate sanction or sanctions
on the county from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340.
(d) If there is no agreement by October 1, 1991, in a county that
was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991,
or if there is no agreement within one hundred twenty days of the date
the county adopted its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management in any other county that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, the governor shall first inquire
of the jurisdictions as to the reason or reasons for failure to reach
an agreement. If the governor deems it appropriate, the governor may
immediately request the assistance of the department of community,
trade, and economic development to mediate any disputes that preclude
agreement. If mediation is unsuccessful in resolving all disputes that
will lead to agreement, the governor may impose appropriate sanctions
from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on the county, city, or
cities for failure to reach an agreement as provided in this section.
The governor shall specify the reason or reasons for the imposition of
any sanction.
(e) No later than July 1, 1992, the legislative authority of each
county that was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of
June 1, 1991, or no later than fourteen months after the date the
county adopted its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management the county legislative authority of any
other county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040,
shall adopt a countywide planning policy according to the process
provided under this section and that is consistent with the agreement
pursuant to (b) of this subsection, and after holding a public hearing
or hearings on the proposed countywide planning policy.
(3) A countywide planning policy shall at a minimum, address the
following:
(a) Policies to implement RCW 36.70A.110;
(b) Policies for promotion of contiguous and orderly development
and provision of urban services to such development;
(c) Policies for siting public capital facilities of a countywide
or statewide nature, including transportation facilities of statewide
significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140;
(d) Policies for countywide transportation facilities and
strategies;
(e) Policies that consider the need for affordable housing, such as
housing for all economic segments of the population and parameters for
its distribution;
(f) Policies for joint county and city planning within urban growth
areas;
(g) Policies for countywide economic development and employment;
((and))
(h) Policies for the allocation of projected population and
employment growth, and the number of residential units necessary to
accommodate growth in the urban and rural areas by jurisdiction;
(i) Policies establishing appropriate densities for urban and rural
areas;
(j) Performance measures to annually review progress towards
accommodating the twenty-year population and employment growth
projections established in the countywide planning policies;
(k) Policies that plan for and achieve a supply of housing
sufficient to accommodate employment growth; and
(l) An analysis of the fiscal impact.
(4) Federal agencies and Indian tribes may participate in and
cooperate with the countywide planning policy adoption process.
Adopted countywide planning policies shall be adhered to by state
agencies.
(5) Failure to adopt a countywide planning policy that meets the
requirements of this section may result in the imposition of a sanction
or sanctions on a county or city within the county, as specified in RCW
36.70A.340. In imposing a sanction or sanctions, the governor shall
specify the reasons for failure to adopt a countywide planning policy
in order that any imposed sanction or sanctions are fairly and
equitably related to the failure to adopt a countywide planning policy.
(6) Cities and the governor may appeal an adopted countywide
planning policy to the growth management hearings board within sixty
days of the adoption of the countywide planning policy.
(7) Multicounty planning policies shall be adopted by two or more
counties, each with a population of four hundred fifty thousand or
more, with contiguous urban areas and may be adopted by other counties,
according to the process established under this section or other
processes agreed to among the counties and cities within the affected
counties throughout the multicounty region.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.215 and 1997 c 429 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in subsection (((7))) (8) of this
section, a county shall adopt, in consultation with its cities,
countywide planning policies to establish a review and evaluation
program. This program shall be in addition to the requirements of RCW
36.70A.110, 36.70A.130, and 36.70A.210. In developing and implementing
the review and evaluation program required by this section, the county
and its cities shall consider information from other appropriate
jurisdictions and sources. The purpose of the review and evaluation
program shall be to:
(a) Determine whether a county and its cities are achieving urban
densities within urban growth areas by comparing growth and development
assumptions, targets, and objectives contained in the countywide
planning policies and the county and city comprehensive plans with
actual growth and development that has occurred in the county and its
cities; and
(b) Identify and adopt reasonable measures, other than adjusting
urban growth areas, that will be taken to comply with the requirements
of this chapter, which are sufficient to accommodate residential and
nonresidential growth.
(2) The review and evaluation program shall:
(a) Encompass land uses and activities both within and outside of
urban growth areas and provide for annual collection and reporting of
data to the county on urban and rural land uses, development, critical
areas, and capital facilities to the extent necessary to determine the
quantity and type of land suitable for development, both for
residential and employment-based activities;
(b) Provide for evaluation of the data collected under (a) of this
subsection every five years as provided in subsection (3) of this
section. The first evaluation shall be completed not later than
September 1, 2002. The county and its cities may establish in the
countywide planning policies indicators, benchmarks, and other similar
criteria to use in conducting the evaluation;
(c) Provide for methods to resolve disputes among jurisdictions
relating to the countywide planning policies required by this section
and procedures to resolve inconsistencies in collection and analysis of
data; and
(d) Provide for the amendment of the countywide policies and county
and city comprehensive plans and development regulations as needed to
remedy an inconsistency identified through the evaluation required by
this section, or to bring these policies into compliance with the
requirements of this chapter.
(3) At a minimum, the evaluation component of the program required
by subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) Require a joint report from each county and its cities
regarding regional growth patterns and trends, comparing employment,
housing growth, and market conditions; and compiling data on new
development. The report shall:
(i) Evaluate whether or not the zoning and development regulations
allow development at the densities sufficient to accommodate the
adopted population and employment projections;
(ii) Highlight the reasons for the difference between the planned
outcomes and actual performance, such as market and other factors
affecting the achievement of planned outcomes; and
(iii) Indicate reasonable and appropriate actions adopted to
encourage growth to occur sufficient to accommodate residential and
nonresidential needs;
(b) Determine whether there is sufficient land suitable ((land))
for development to accommodate the countywide population projection
established for the county pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 and the subsequent
population allocations within the county and between the county and its
cities and the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110;
(((b))) (c) Determine the net number and types of new residential
dwelling units; the actual density of housing that has been constructed
((and)); the square footage of new nonresidential development
permitted; the actual amount of land developed for commercial and
industrial uses; the estimated net number of new jobs created
countywide; and the amount of known environmentally sensitive land and
lands that cannot be built upon within the urban growth area since the
adoption of a comprehensive plan under this chapter or since the last
periodic evaluation as required by subsection (1) of this section; and
(((c))) (d) Based on the actual density of development as
determined under (((b))) (c) of this subsection, review commercial,
industrial, and housing needs by type and density range to determine
the amount of land needed for commercial, industrial, and housing for
the remaining portion of the twenty-year planning period used in the
most recently adopted comprehensive plan.
(4) If the evaluation required by subsection (3) of this section
demonstrates an inconsistency between what has occurred since the
adoption of the countywide planning policies and the county and city
comprehensive plans and development regulations and what was envisioned
in those policies and plans and the planning goals and the requirements
of this chapter, as the inconsistency relates to the evaluation factors
specified in subsection (3) of this section, ((the county and its
cities)) or demonstrates that the county or any city is not achieving
the land use designations and densities planned for the jurisdiction in
its comprehensive plan based on the evaluation factors specified in
subsection (3) of this section, the county or city shall identify and
adopt reasonable measures in order to accommodate the demand for
residential units and nonresidential growth during the subsequent
five-year period.
(a) If actions to achieve consistency are necessary, the county or
city shall revise its comprehensive land use plan and development or
other regulations, or take other actions necessary to increase
consistency, and ensure sufficient land suitable for development with
applicable development regulations to accommodate projected residential
units necessary for population growth, and achieved densities projected
for the jurisdiction in the countywide planning policy and its
comprehensive plan. The county or city shall adopt and implement
appropriate measures within one year of conducting the evaluation under
this section that are reasonably likely to increase consistency during
the subsequent five-year period. If necessary, a county, in
consultation with its cities as required by RCW 36.70A.210, shall adopt
amendments to countywide planning policies to increase consistency.
The county and its cities shall annually monitor the measures adopted
under this subsection to determine their effect and may revise or
rescind them as appropriate.
(b) A county or city adopting actions shall, at a minimum,
demonstrate that it has considered whether the urban land designated
for residential and nonresidential uses is zoned at density ranges with
applicable development regulations that are reasonably likely to be
achieved by the market.
(c) Actions to increase consistency in planned and achieved growth
may include, but are not limited to, the following:
(i) Incentives to encourage new development consistent with the
local plan;
(ii) Funding of infrastructure and amenities to attract
development;
(iii) Changes in land use regulations and zoning designations for
land within the boundaries of the jurisdiction in a manner that
encourages development to occur at densities sufficient to accommodate
projected residential and nonresidential growth;
(iv) Outreach programs to encourage developers to build the type of
development sought in the jurisdiction's plan or development
regulations; and
(v) Improved procedures to reduce the time it takes the
jurisdiction to issue permits.
(5) Countywide planning policies may include additional incentive
provisions and enforcement measures to accommodate growth and achieve
goals.
(6)(a) Not later than July 1, 1998, the department shall prepare a
list of methods used by counties and cities in carrying out the types
of activities required by this section. The department shall provide
this information and appropriate technical assistance to counties and
cities required to or choosing to comply with the provisions of this
section.
(b) By December 31, 2007, the department shall submit to the
appropriate committees of the legislature a report analyzing the
effectiveness of the activities described and measures taken by the
counties and cities in this section in achieving the goals envisioned
by the countywide planning policies and the comprehensive plans and
development regulations of the counties and cities.
(((6))) (7) From funds appropriated by the legislature for this
purpose, the department shall provide grants to counties, cities, and
regional planning organizations required under subsection (((7))) (8)
of this section to conduct the review and perform the evaluation
required by this section.
(((7))) (8) The provisions of this section shall apply to counties,
and the cities within those counties, that were greater than one
hundred fifty thousand in population in 1995 as determined by office of
financial management population estimates and that are located west of
the crest of the Cascade mountain range. Any other county planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 may carry out the review, evaluation, and
amendment programs and procedures as provided in this section.

--- END ---