BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.030 and 2005 c 423 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new
comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land
use plan.
(2) "Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the
commercial production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural,
dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay,
straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax
imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish in upland
hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial
significance for agricultural production.
(3) "City" means any city or town, including a code city.
(4) "Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan"
means a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the
governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to this
chapter.
(5) "Critical areas" include the following areas and ecosystems:
(a) Wetlands; (b) areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers
used for potable water; (c) fish and wildlife habitat conservation
areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; and (e) geologically hazardous
areas.
(6) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(7) "Development regulations" or "regulation" means the controls
placed on development or land use activities by a county or city,
including, but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas
ordinances, shoreline master programs, official controls, planned unit
development ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan
ordinances together with any amendments thereto. A development
regulation does not include a decision to approve a project permit
application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though the decision may
be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body of
the county or city.
(8) "Forest land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for
long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically
and practically managed for such production, including Christmas trees
subject to the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through
84.33.140, and that has long-term commercial significance. In
determining whether forest land is primarily devoted to growing trees
for long-term commercial timber production on land that can be
economically and practically managed for such production, the following
factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban,
suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for
timber production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and
services conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.
(9) "Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that because of
their susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other
geological events, are not suited to the siting of commercial,
residential, or industrial development consistent with public health or
safety concerns.
(10) "Land suitable for development" means all parcels that are
vacant, and all undeveloped portions of parcels that are partially
used, or underutilized to an extent that further development would be
likely and are: (a) Designated by applicable development regulations
for commercial, industrial, or residential use; (b) not intended for
public use; (c) not constrained by critical areas in a way that limits
development potential and makes new construction on a parcel
unfeasible; and (d) served by infrastructure currently available and
adequate or planned for within the twenty-year planning period.
(11) "Long-term commercial significance" includes the growing
capacity, productivity, and soil composition of the land for long-term
commercial production, in consideration with the land's proximity to
population areas, and the possibility of more intense uses of the land.
(((11))) (12) "Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable
metallic substances.
(((12))) (13) "Performance measures" means an indicator providing
consistent and reliable information over time to help gauge how a
jurisdiction is achieving specified performance results. For purposes
of this subsection, "indicator" means a quantifiable measurement or
index.
(14) "Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways,
sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic
water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational
facilities, and schools.
(((13))) (15) "Public services" include fire protection and
suppression, law enforcement, public health, education, recreation,
environmental protection, and other governmental services.
(((14))) (16) "Reasonable measures" means comprehensive planning
policies and development regulations that increase consistency with
this chapter and the countywide planning policies and comprehensive
plan.
(17) "Recreational land" means land so designated under RCW
36.70A.1701 and that, immediately prior to this designation, was
designated as agricultural land of long-term commercial significance
under RCW 36.70A.170. Recreational land must have playing fields and
supporting facilities existing before July 1, 2004, for sports played
on grass playing fields.
(((15))) (18) "Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use
and development established by a county in the rural element of its
comprehensive plan:
(a) In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation
predominate over the built environment;
(b) That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based
economies, and opportunities to both live and work in rural areas;
(c) That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in
rural areas and communities;
(d) That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and
for fish and wildlife habitat;
(e) That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development;
(f) That generally do not require the extension of urban
governmental services; and
(g) That are consistent with the protection of natural surface
water flows and ground water and surface water recharge and discharge
areas.
(((16))) (19) "Rural counties" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.14.370(5).
(20) "Rural development" refers to development outside the urban
growth area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource
lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can
consist of a variety of uses and residential densities, including
clustered residential development, at levels that are consistent with
the preservation of rural character and the requirements of the rural
element. Rural development does not refer to agriculture or forestry
activities that may be conducted in rural areas.
(((17))) (21) "Rural governmental services" or "rural services"
include those public services and public facilities historically and
typically delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and
may include domestic water systems, fire and police protection
services, transportation and public transit services, and other public
utilities associated with rural development and normally not associated
with urban areas. Rural services do not include storm or sanitary
sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW 36.70A.110(4).
(((18))) (22) "Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive
use of land for the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable
surfaces to such a degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of
land for the production of food, other agricultural products, or fiber,
or the extraction of mineral resources, rural uses, rural development,
and natural resource lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A
pattern of more intensive rural development, as provided in RCW
36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread over
wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban governmental
services. "Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban
growth located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area
with urban growth on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.
(((19))) (23) "Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by
a county pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.
(((20))) (24) "Urban governmental services" or "urban services"
include those public services and public facilities at an intensity
historically and typically provided in cities, specifically including
storm and sanitary sewer systems, domestic water systems, street
cleaning services, fire and police protection services, public transit
services, and other public utilities associated with urban areas and
normally not associated with rural areas.
(((21))) (25) "Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are
inundated or saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency
and duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances
do support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in
saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes,
bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial
wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland sites, including, but
not limited to, irrigation and drainage ditches, grass-lined swales,
canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment facilities, farm
ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1,
1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the construction
of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those artificial
wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.115 and 2003 c 333 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Counties and cities that are required or choose to plan under
RCW 36.70A.040 shall ensure that, taken collectively, adoption of and
amendments to their comprehensive plans and/or development regulations
provide sufficient capacity of land suitable for development within
their jurisdictions to accommodate their allocated housing and
employment growth, as adopted in the applicable countywide planning
policies and consistent with the twenty-year population forecast from
the office of financial management. When land use regulations are
adopted that reduce a local jurisdiction's capacity to accommodate
planned growth, the jurisdiction shall recapture that reduced capacity
by increasing residential densities within the jurisdiction.
(2)(a) Nothing in this section shall be construed as:
(i) Prohibiting a qualifying city from determining an urban
residential density that is sufficient to accommodate projected
population growth under RCW 36.70A.110; or
(ii) Requiring a qualifying city to establish a uniform minimum
residential density.
(b) "Qualifying city," for the purposes of this subsection, means
a city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that is coterminous with, and
comprised only of, an island in a county with more than two hundred
twenty-five thousand residents and fewer than three hundred twenty-five
thousand residents.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.210 and 1998 c 171 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that counties are regional
governments within their boundaries, and cities are primary providers
of urban governmental services within urban growth areas. For the
purposes of this section, a "county-wide planning policy" is a written
policy statement or statements used solely for establishing a county-wide framework from which county and city comprehensive plans are
developed and adopted pursuant to this chapter. This framework shall
ensure that city and county comprehensive plans are consistent as
required in RCW 36.70A.100. Nothing in this section shall be construed
to alter the land-use powers of cities.
(2) The legislative authority of a county that plans under RCW
36.70A.040 shall adopt a county-wide planning policy in cooperation
with the cities located in whole or in part within the county as
follows:
(a) No later than sixty calendar days from July 16, 1991, the
legislative authority of each county that as of June 1, 1991, was
required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall convene a meeting
with representatives of each city located within the county for the
purpose of establishing a collaborative process that will provide a
framework for the adoption of a county-wide planning policy. In other
counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this
meeting shall be convened no later than sixty days after the date the
county adopts its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management.
(b) The process and framework for adoption of a county-wide
planning policy specified in (a) of this subsection shall determine the
manner in which the county and the cities agree to all procedures and
provisions including but not limited to desired planning policies,
deadlines, ratification of final agreements and demonstration thereof,
and financing, if any, of all activities associated therewith.
(c) If a county fails for any reason to convene a meeting with
representatives of cities as required in (a) of this subsection, the
governor may immediately impose any appropriate sanction or sanctions
on the county from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340.
(d) If there is no agreement by October 1, 1991, in a county that
was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991,
or if there is no agreement within one hundred twenty days of the date
the county adopted its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management in any other county that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, the governor shall first inquire
of the jurisdictions as to the reason or reasons for failure to reach
an agreement. If the governor deems it appropriate, the governor may
immediately request the assistance of the department of community,
trade, and economic development to mediate any disputes that preclude
agreement. If mediation is unsuccessful in resolving all disputes that
will lead to agreement, the governor may impose appropriate sanctions
from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on the county, city, or
cities for failure to reach an agreement as provided in this section.
The governor shall specify the reason or reasons for the imposition of
any sanction.
(e) No later than July 1, 1992, the legislative authority of each
county that was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of
June 1, 1991, or no later than fourteen months after the date the
county adopted its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management the county legislative authority of any
other county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040,
shall adopt a county-wide planning policy according to the process
provided under this section and that is consistent with the agreement
pursuant to (b) of this subsection, and after holding a public hearing
or hearings on the proposed county-wide planning policy.
(3) A county-wide planning policy shall at a minimum, address the
following:
(a) Policies to implement RCW 36.70A.110;
(b) Policies for promotion of contiguous and orderly development
and provision of urban services to such development;
(c) Policies for siting public capital facilities of a county-wide
or statewide nature, including transportation facilities of statewide
significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140;
(d) Policies for county-wide transportation facilities and
strategies;
(e) Policies that consider the need for affordable housing, such as
housing for all economic segments of the population and parameters for
its distribution;
(f) Policies for joint county and city planning within urban growth
areas;
(g) Policies for county-wide economic development and employment;
((and))
(h) Policies for the allocation of projected population and
employment growth, and the number of residential units necessary to
accommodate growth in the urban and rural areas by jurisdiction;
(i) Policies establishing appropriate densities for urban and rural
areas;
(j) Policies that annually review progress towards accommodating
the twenty-year population and employment growth projections
established in the countywide planning policies;
(k) Policies that plan for and achieve a supply of housing
sufficient to accommodate employment growth; and
(l) An analysis of the fiscal impact.
(4) Federal agencies and Indian tribes may participate in and
cooperate with the county-wide planning policy adoption process.
Adopted county-wide planning policies shall be adhered to by state
agencies.
(5) Failure to adopt a county-wide planning policy that meets the
requirements of this section may result in the imposition of a sanction
or sanctions on a county or city within the county, as specified in RCW
36.70A.340. In imposing a sanction or sanctions, the governor shall
specify the reasons for failure to adopt a county-wide planning policy
in order that any imposed sanction or sanctions are fairly and
equitably related to the failure to adopt a county-wide planning
policy.
(6) Cities and the governor may appeal an adopted county-wide
planning policy to the growth management hearings board within sixty
days of the adoption of the county-wide planning policy.
(7) Multicounty planning policies shall be adopted by two or more
counties, each with a population of four hundred fifty thousand or
more, with contiguous urban areas and may be adopted by other counties,
according to the process established under this section or other
processes agreed to among the counties and cities within the affected
counties throughout the multicounty region.
(8)(a) Nothing in this section shall be construed as:
(i) Prohibiting a qualifying city from determining an urban
residential density that is sufficient to accommodate projected
population growth under RCW 36.70A.110; or
(ii) Requiring a qualifying city to establish a uniform minimum
residential density.
(b) "Qualifying city," for the purposes of this subsection, means
a city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that is coterminous with, and
comprised only of, an island in a county with more than two hundred
twenty-five thousand residents and fewer than three hundred twenty-five
thousand residents.

--- END ---