BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.08.178 and 1988 c 161 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Wages" means the gross remuneration paid in cash by the
employer to the worker for services performed with respect to a pay
period, before any deductions. "Paid in cash" means payment in cash,
by check, by electronic transfer, or by other means made directly to
the worker.
(2) For purposes of determining a worker's wage under this section:
(a) Tips shall be considered wages only to the extent that the tips
are reported to the employer for federal income tax purposes; and
(b) Wages include:
(i) The average monthly value of any bonus received from the
employer in the twelve months immediately preceding the worker's injury
or manifestation of occupational disease;
(ii) The actual cash value of board, housing, fuel, and other
consideration of like nature received from the employer as part of the
contract of hire. This subsection (2)(b)(ii) shall not apply during
any period in which the employer continues to provide, through a past
or current payment, board, housing, and/or fuel that were provided to
the worker at the time of injury or manifestation of occupational
disease; and
(iii) The cost to the employer as of the date of injury or
manifestation of occupational disease for insurance for medical,
vision, and dental treatment. This subsection (2)(b)(iii) shall not
apply during any period in which the employer continues to make
contributions towards the same level of insurance for medical, vision,
and dental treatment as was provided at the time of injury or
manifestation of occupational disease.
(c) Wages shall not include overtime pay, except in cases under
subsection (4) of this section.
(3)(a) For the purposes of this title, the monthly wages the worker
was receiving from all employment at the time of injury shall be the
basis upon which compensation is computed unless otherwise provided
specifically in the statute concerned. In cases where the worker's
wages are not fixed by the month, they shall be determined by
multiplying the daily wage the worker was receiving at the time of the
injury:
(((a))) (i) By five, if the worker was normally employed one day a
week;
(((b))) (ii) By nine, if the worker was normally employed two days
a week;
(((c))) (iii) By thirteen, if the worker was normally employed
three days a week;
(((d))) (iv) By eighteen, if the worker was normally employed four
days a week;
(((e))) (v) By twenty-two, if the worker was normally employed five
days a week;
(((f))) (vi) By twenty-six, if the worker was normally employed six
days a week;
(((g))) (vii) By thirty, if the worker was normally employed seven
days a week.
((The term "wages" shall include the reasonable value of board,
housing, fuel, or other consideration of like nature received from the
employer as part of the contract of hire, but shall not include
overtime pay except in cases under subsection (2) of this section.
However, tips shall also be considered wages only to the extent such
tips are reported to the employer for federal income tax purposes.))
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (3), the daily wage shall
be the hourly wage multiplied by the number of hours the worker is
normally employed. The number of hours the worker is normally employed
shall be determined by the department in a fair and reasonable manner,
which may include averaging the number of hours worked per day.
(((2))) (4) In cases where (a) the worker's employment is
exclusively seasonal in nature or (b) the worker's current employment
or his or her relation to his or her employment is essentially part-time or intermittent, the monthly wage shall be determined by dividing
by twelve the total wages earned, including overtime, from all
employment in any twelve successive calendar months preceding the
injury which fairly represent the claimant's employment pattern.
(((3) If, within the twelve months immediately preceding the
injury, the worker has received from the employer at the time of injury
a bonus as part of the contract of hire, the average monthly value of
such bonus shall be included in determining the worker's monthly wages.
(4))) (5) In cases where a worker's wage has not been fixed or
cannot be reasonably and fairly determined, the monthly wage shall be
computed on the basis of the usual wage paid other employees engaged in
like or similar occupations where the wages are fixed.

--- END ---