BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS. The legislature finds that the
state annually awards contracts to private contractors to provide
services on behalf of or for the house of representatives and the
senate, and that such expenditures should be spent in a manner that
promotes the creation of jobs that allow residents to support
themselves and their families with dignity. The legislature further
finds that the present federal and state minimum wage rates generate
income at a level below the amount required to support a family at a
basic level, and that jobs that do not pay living wages result in
families who have a greater need for social services provided by the
state and paid for by state taxpayers. The payment of adequate wages
to workers for those hours performing services on behalf of or for the
house of representatives and the senate will promote stability and
reduced turnover, resulting in a higher quality of service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Contract" means public works contracts, personal services
contracts, and purchasing contracts for goods and services entered
into, renewed, or extended by the state on behalf of or for the house
of representatives and the senate on or after July 1, 2005.
(2) "Contractor" means any person, firm, or corporation that, in
the pursuit of an independent business, undertakes a contract.
(3) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(4) "Employee" has the meaning provided in RCW 49.46.010. In
addition to individuals not included in the definition of "employee"
under RCW 49.46.010, "employee" shall not include: (a) An individual
enrolled in a state-approved apprenticeship training program; (b) an
individual in a work study position, internship, or who is in a
position that requires student status as a prerequisite to being
employed in that position; and (c) an individual subject to a bona fide
collective bargaining agreement.
(5) "Subcontractor" means any person, firm, or corporation that, in
the pursuit of an independent business, undertakes a contract with
another person, firm, or corporation who holds a contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 LIVING WAGE REQUIREMENT. All contracts and
any subcontracts under these contracts shall require the following:
(1) The contractor and any subcontractors must pay each employee
performing work under the contract the living wage rate under this
chapter or, if applicable, the prevailing wage rate under chapter 39.12
RCW, whichever is higher;
(2) Within ten days of a request by the house of representatives or
the senate, the contractor and any subcontractors must provide
satisfactory proof of compliance with the living wage requirement in
the form of payroll records, benefit records, or other appropriate
evidence;
(3) If the contractor or any subcontractor violates the living wage
requirement, the contractor or subcontractor must provide proof of
compliance, including the payment of any back wages owed, within thirty
days. If the contractor or subcontractor remains out of compliance
after thirty days, the state may terminate the contract and otherwise
pursue contractual remedies for breach of contract;
(4) If a contractor or subcontractor continues to violate or
subsequently violates the living wage requirement, the state may
terminate all contracts with the contractor or subcontractor on behalf
of or for the house of representatives and the senate, and the
contractor or subcontractor shall be prohibited from contracting with
the state on behalf of or for the house of representatives or the
senate for two years; and
(5) If a contractor or subcontractor retaliates or discriminates
against an employee in his or her terms and conditions of employment
for reporting a possible violation of the living wage requirement to
the chief clerk of the house of representatives or the secretary of the
senate, the state may terminate all contracts with the contractor or
subcontractor on behalf of or for the house of representatives and the
senate, and the contractor or subcontractor shall be prohibited from
contracting with the state on behalf of or for either the house of
representatives or the senate for two years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 LIVING WAGE RATE. (1) Until January 1,
2006, every contractor and subcontractor shall pay to each of his or
her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years a living wage
rate of not less than ten dollars per hour if health benefits are paid
for in whole or in substantial part by the contractor or subcontractor,
or eleven dollars and fifty cents per hour if health benefits are not
so provided.
(2)(a) Beginning January 1, 2006, and each following January 1st as
set forth in (b) of this subsection, every contractor and subcontractor
shall pay each of his or her employees performing work under a contract
at a rate not less than the amount established in this subsection.
(b) Beginning September 30, 2005, and on each following September
30th, the department shall calculate an adjusted living wage rate by
increasing the current year's living wage rate by the rate of
inflation. The adjusted living wage rate shall be calculated to the
nearest cent using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and
clerical workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months
before each September 1st as calculated by the United States department
of labor. Each adjusted living wage rate calculated under this
subsection takes effect on the following January 1st.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 EXEMPTION. The chief clerk of the house of
representatives and the secretary of the senate may grant an exemption
to the living wage requirement of this chapter upon making a written
finding either that:
(1) Compliance with the living wage requirement will cause economic
hardship to the state or its citizens; or
(2) The exemption is in the best interests of the state due to
unforeseen or special circumstances including but not limited to a
declared natural disaster.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

--- END ---