BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.18.016 and 2002 c 338 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Revenue collected under this section is not subject to division
under RCW 36.18.025 or 27.24.070.
(2) For the filing of a petition for modification of a decree of
dissolution or paternity, within the same case as the original action,
a fee of twenty dollars must be paid.
(3)(a) The party making a demand for a jury of six in a civil
action shall pay, at the time, a fee of one hundred twenty-five
dollars; if the demand is for a jury of twelve, a fee of two hundred
fifty dollars. If, after the party demands a jury of six and pays the
required fee, any other party to the action requests a jury of twelve,
an additional one hundred twenty-five dollar fee will be required of
the party demanding the increased number of jurors.
(b) Upon conviction in criminal cases a jury demand charge of fifty
dollars for a jury of six, or one hundred dollars for a jury of twelve
may be imposed as costs under RCW 10.46.190.
(4) For preparing, transcribing, or certifying an instrument on
file or of record in the clerk's office, with or without seal, for the
first page or portion of the first page, a fee of two dollars, and for
each additional page or portion of a page, a fee of one dollar must be
charged. For authenticating or exemplifying an instrument, a fee of
one dollar for each additional seal affixed must be charged.
(5) For executing a certificate, with or without a seal, a fee of
two dollars must be charged.
(6) For a garnishee defendant named in an affidavit for garnishment
and for a writ of attachment, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
(7) For approving a bond, including justification on the bond, in
other than civil actions and probate proceedings, a fee of two dollars
must be charged.
(8) For the issuance of a certificate of qualification and a
certified copy of letters of administration, letters testamentary, or
letters of guardianship, there must be a fee of two dollars.
(9) For the preparation of a passport application, the clerk may
collect an execution fee as authorized by the federal government.
(10) For clerk's services such as processing ex parte orders,
performing historical searches, compiling statistical reports, and
conducting exceptional record searches, the clerk may collect a fee not
to exceed twenty dollars per hour or portion of an hour.
(11) For duplicated recordings of court's proceedings there must be
a fee of ten dollars for each audio tape and twenty-five dollars for
each video tape.
(12) For the filing of oaths and affirmations under chapter 5.28
RCW, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.
(13) For filing a disclaimer of interest under RCW 11.86.031(4), a
fee of two dollars must be charged.
(14) For registration of land titles, Torrens Act, under RCW
65.12.780, a fee of five dollars must be charged.
(15) For the issuance of extension of judgment under RCW 6.17.020
and chapter 9.94A RCW, a fee of one hundred ten dollars must be
charged.
(16) A facilitator surcharge of ten dollars must be charged as
authorized under RCW 26.12.240.
(17) For filing a water rights statement under RCW 90.03.180, a fee
of twenty-five dollars must be charged.
(18) A service fee of three dollars for the first page and one
dollar for each additional page must be charged for receiving faxed
documents, pursuant to Washington state rules of court, general rule
17.
(19) For preparation of clerk's papers under RAP 9.7, a fee of
fifty cents per page must be charged.
(20) For copies and reports produced at the local level as
permitted by RCW 2.68.020 and supreme court policy, a variable fee must
be charged.
(21) Investment service charge and earnings under RCW 36.48.090
must be charged.
(22) Costs for nonstatutory services rendered by clerk by authority
of local ordinance or policy must be charged.
(23) For filing a request for mandatory arbitration, a filing fee
may be assessed against the party filing a statement of arbitrability
not to exceed two hundred twenty dollars as established by authority of
local ordinance. This charge shall be used solely to offset the cost
of the mandatory arbitration program.
(24) For filing a request for trial de novo of an arbitration
award, a fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars as established by
authority of local ordinance must be charged.
(25) A public agency may not charge a fee to a law enforcement
agency, for preparation, copying, or mailing of certified copies of the
judgment and sentence, information, affidavit of probable cause, and/or
the notice of requirement to register, of a sex offender convicted in
a Washington court, when such records are necessary for risk
assessment, preparation of a case for failure to register, or
maintenance of a sex offender's registration file.

--- END ---