BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Telephone utility" means a person providing network telephone
service as defined in RCW 82.04.065.
(2) "Water utility" means a water distribution business as defined
in RCW 82.16.010.
(3) "Sewer utility" means a sewerage collection business as defined
in RCW 82.16.020.
(4) "Solid waste utility" means a solid waste collection business
as defined in RCW 82.18.010.
(5) "Cable service utility" means a person providing cable service
as defined in the federal telecommunications act of 1996.
(6) "Utility" means a telephone utility, water utility, sewer
utility, solid waste utility, or cable service utility.
(7) "Gross income of the business" is defined as provided in RCW
82.04.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislative authority of a county
may impose an excise tax on the privilege of engaging in business as a
utility. The tax is equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by a rate not exceeding two percent.
(2) Taxes imposed under this section must apply uniformly
throughout the county.
(3) The utility must add a tax imposed under this section to the
rates or charges it makes for utility services and separately state the
amount of tax on billings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Revenues received from taxes imposed under
this chapter must be used exclusively for criminal justice purposes as
defined in RCW 82.14.310(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

--- END ---