BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A joint select committee on the study of
improvements to the electronic benefits transfer system is established.
The joint select committee shall consist of the following members:
(a) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the
senate, appointed by the president of the senate; and
(b) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(2) The joint select committee shall review the following issues:
(a) Identify alternatives to the current procedure which permits
public assistance recipients to receive cash back through the
electronic benefit transfer system for the purpose of providing more
accountability for the use of public funds;
(b) Examine the feasibility, logistical considerations, and costs
associated with alternatives to the current procedure as identified in
(a) of this subsection; and
(c) Identify methods and procedures for monitoring and oversight to
reduce the inappropriate use of public funds.
(3) The joint select committee, where feasible, may consult with
individuals from the public and private sector or ask such persons to
establish an advisory committee, including the department of social and
health services.
(4)(a) The joint select committee shall use legislative facilities,
and staff support shall be provided by the house of representatives
office of program research. The joint select committee may hire
additional staff with specific technical expertise if such expertise is
necessary to carry out the mandates of this study.
(b) Legislative members of the joint select committee shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employer or
organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, such reimbursement to be
paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives.
(5) The joint select committee shall report its findings and
recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2005.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2006.

--- END ---