BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.172 and 1995 c 347 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In designating and protecting critical areas under this
chapter, counties and cities shall include the best available science
in developing policies and development regulations to protect the
functions and values of critical areas. In addition, counties and
cities shall give special consideration to conservation or protection
measures necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous fisheries.
(2) If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts
is necessary or will be of substantial assistance in reaching its
decision, a growth management hearings board may retain scientific or
other expert advice to assist in reviewing a petition under RCW
36.70A.290 that involves critical areas.
(3) To demonstrate that the best available science has been
included in the development of critical areas policies and regulations,
counties and cities must address each of the following on the record:
(a) The specific policies and development regulations adopted to
protect the functions and values of the critical areas at issue;
(b) The relevant sources of best available scientific information
in the decision making; and
(c) Any nonscientific information, including legal, social,
cultural, economic, and political information, used as a basis for
critical area policies and regulations that depart from recommendations
derived from the best available science.
(4) A county or city departing from science-based recommendations
must:
(a) Identify the information in the record that supports its
decision to depart from science-based recommendations;
(b) Explain its rationale for departing from science-based
recommendations; and
(c) Identify potential risks to the functions and values of the
critical area or areas at issue and any additional measures chosen to
limit such risks.

--- END ---