BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that active military
and naval veterans, reserve military and naval veterans, and national
guard members called to active duty have served their country and have
risked their lives to defend the lives of all Americans and the
freedoms that define and distinguish our nation. The legislature
intends to honor active military and naval veterans, reserve military
and naval veterans, and national guard members who have served on
active military or naval duty for the public service they have provided
to this country by designating to veterans a percentage of the total
amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or reduced by a
state university, a regional university, The Evergreen State College,
or the community colleges as a whole.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.910 and 2005 c 249 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of providing state general fund support to
public institutions of higher education, except for revenue waived
under programs listed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and
unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state appropriations
act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by a state university, a regional university, The Evergreen
State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees
revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated
under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial
management, before granting any waivers. This limitation applies to
all tuition waiver programs established before or after July 1, 1992.
(a) University of Washington 21 percent
(b) Washington State University 20 percent
(c) Eastern Washington University 11 percent
(d) Central Washington University 8 percent
(e) Western Washington University 10 percent
(f) The Evergreen State College 6 percent
(g) Community colleges as a whole 35 percent
(2) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to
waivers, exemptions, or reductions in operating fees contained in the
following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.014;
(b) RCW 28B.15.100;
(c) RCW 28B.15.225;
(d) RCW 28B.15.380;
(e) RCW 28B.15.520;
(f) RCW 28B.15.526;
(g) RCW 28B.15.527;
(h) RCW 28B.15.543;
(i) RCW 28B.15.545;
(j) RCW 28B.15.555;
(k) RCW 28B.15.556;
(l) RCW 28B.15.615;
(m) RCW 28B.15.730;
(n) RCW 28B.15.740;
(o) RCW 28B.15.750;
(p) RCW 28B.15.756;
(q) RCW 28B.50.259;
(r) RCW 28B.70.050; and
(s) RCW 28B.15.621(2).
(3) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply
to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees
contained in the following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.522;
(b) RCW 28B.15.540; and
(c) RCW 28B.15.558.
(4) The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by institutions of higher education participating in the
western interstate commission for higher education western
undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection.
(a) Washington State University 1 percent
(b) Eastern Washington University 3 percent
(c) Central Washington University 3 percent
(5) The institutions of higher education will participate in
outreach activities to increase the number of veterans who receive
tuition waivers. Colleges and universities shall revise the uniform
application for admissions so that all applicants shall have the
opportunity to advise the institution that they are veterans who need
assistance. The legislature intends to make available to all eligible
admitted veterans a waiver of operating fees by a state university, a
regional university, The Evergreen State College, or the community
colleges as a whole, to veterans who qualify under RCW 28B.15.621.

--- END ---