BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.17.010 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 939 and 2003 c 334
s 452 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department, with the approval of the board, may exchange
any state land and any timber thereon for any land of equal value in
order to:
(a) Facilitate the marketing of forest products of state lands;
(b) Consolidate and block-up state lands;
(c) Acquire lands having commercial recreational leasing potential;
(d) Acquire county-owned lands;
(e) Acquire urban property which has greater income potential or
which could be more efficiently managed by the department in exchange
for state urban lands as defined in RCW 79.19.100; or
(f) Acquire any other lands when such exchange is determined by the
board to be in the best interest of the trust for which the state land
is held.
(2) Land exchanged under this section shall not be used to reduce
the publicly owned forest land base.
(3) The board shall determine that each land exchange is in the
best interest of the trust for which the land is held prior to
authorizing the land exchange.
(4) During the biennium ending June 30, 2005, the department, with
approval of the board, may exchange any state land and any timber
thereon for any land and proceeds of equal value. Proceeds may be in
the form of cash or services in order to achieve the purposes
established in this section. Any cash received as part of an exchange
transaction shall be deposited in the resource management cost account
to pay for administrative expenses incurred in carrying out an exchange
transaction. The amount of proceeds received from the exchange partner
may not exceed five percent of the total value of the exchange. The
receipt of proceeds shall not change the character of the transaction
from an exchange to a sale.
(5) If the department acquires agricultural lands, the department
must maintain a five percent rate of return on the land in perpetuity.
If the department fails to maintain a five percent rate of return on
the land for three consecutive years, the department must sell the
property.

--- END ---