BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.094 and 2003 c 153 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tourism development and promotion account is created in the
state treasury. All receipts from RCW 36.102.060(10) and
43.330.090(3)(a) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the
account received under RCW 36.102.060(10) may be spent only after
appropriation. No appropriation is required for expenditures from
moneys received under RCW 43.330.090(3)(a). In addition, funds under
RCW 43.88.093 shall be deposited in this account and shall be available
for the purposes of this act. Expenditures from the account may be
used by the department of community, trade, and economic development
only for the purposes of expanding and promoting the tourism industry
in the state of Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.88.093 and 1998 c 299 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When developing a biennial budget for the tourism development
division of the department of community, trade, and economic
development, the request for funding submitted to the office of
financial management shall be calculated according to the formula in
RCW 43.88.094. The request shall be a specific designated amount in
the budget request for the department of community, trade, and economic
development.
(2) ((This section expires June 30, 2008)) In the biennial budget,
there shall be an amount equal to the funding request developed under
subsection (1) of this section appropriated and deposited in the
tourism development and promotion account in RCW 43.330.094.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.88.094 and 1998 c 299 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The budget amount designated in RCW 43.88.093(1) is the sum of
the base amount and the growth component as calculated under subsection
(2) of this section.
(2) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall calculate the tourism development division
budget in consultation with the appropriate agencies in the following
manner:
(a) The base amount, beginning in the budget for the biennium
ending June 30, 2001, and for each subsequent biennium thereafter,
equals the previous biennial budget, including any supplemental
allocations and any growth component amounts from previous biennia.
(b) For the growth component, beginning in the budget for the
biennium ending June 30, 2001: (i) Compute the state retail sales tax
revenues for the target business categories for the calendar year two
years prior to the beginning of the biennium for which the budget
request will be made; (ii) compute the state retail sales tax revenues
for the target business categories for the calendar year four years
prior to the beginning of the biennium for which the budget request
will be made; (iii) calculate the percentage change in these two sales
tax revenue amounts; (iv) if the percentage exceeds eight percent
growth, calculate the amount of sales tax revenue that represents the
excess in revenue growth greater than six percent; and (v) calculate
the growth component by dividing the excess revenue growth by two. The
amount of the growth component for any biennium shall not exceed two
million dollars per fiscal year for the biennium.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Target business categories" means businesses in standard
industrial classification codes 58 (eating and drinking), 70 (lodging),
7514 (auto rental), and 79 (recreation). If at any time the United
States office of management and budget or a successor agency should
change or replace the present standard industrial classification code
system, the department of community, trade, and economic development
shall use the code system issued by the office of management and budget
or its successor agency to determine codes corresponding to those
listed in this definition.
(b) "Retail sales" means the gross sales subject to the tax imposed
in chapter 82.08 RCW received by businesses identified in department of
revenue records by standard industrial classification codes 58, 70,
7514, and 79.
(((4) This section expires June 30, 2008.))

--- END ---