BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state's
current tax structure does not meet the needs perceived by some
citizens of the state to contribute a sufficient amount of their
personal resources to the support of state programs and services. The
legislature therefore declares that it is the responsibility of state
government to create an opportunity for such citizens to provide
enhancements to state revenues in a way that ensures recognition of
their generosity and civic-mindedness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
The monetary offerings for revenue enhancement account, which may
be known and cited as the MORE account, is created in the state
treasury. Within the MORE account, there are created the following
subaccounts: MORE--education; MORE--social services; MORE--natural
resources; and MORE--transportation.
All receipts from citizens' voluntary contributions, donations,
gifts, bequests, grants, or other sources granted or given for this
account shall be deposited in the MORE account. Donations designated
for a specific subaccount shall be deposited in that subaccount.
Money in the MORE account may be spent only after appropriation.
Appropriations from the MORE account may be made for the support of any
function currently supported by the general fund. Appropriations from
the MORE subaccounts may be made only for purposes of the respective
subaccounts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.01 RCW
to read as follows:
To encourage donations to the MORE accounts, the department of
revenue may publicize and promote the MORE accounts on a statewide
basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---