BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.87A.010 and 2000 c 201 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
To aid general economic development and neighborhood
revitalization, and to facilitate the cooperation of merchants,
businesses, and residential property owners which assists trade,
economic viability, and liveability, the legislature hereby authorizes
all counties and all incorporated cities and towns, including
unclassified cities and towns operating under special charters:
(1) To establish, after a petition submitted by the operators
responsible for sixty percent of the assessments by businesses and
multifamily residential or mixed-use projects within the area, parking
and business improvement areas, hereafter referred to as area or areas,
for the following purposes:
(a) The acquisition, construction or maintenance of parking
facilities for the benefit of the area;
(b) Decoration of any public place in the area;
(c) Sponsorship or promotion of public events which are to take
place on or in public places in the area;
(d) Furnishing of music in any public place in the area;
(e) Providing professional management, planning, and promotion for
the area, including the management and promotion of retail trade
activities in the area; ((or))
(f) Providing maintenance and security for common, public areas; or
(g) Providing transportation services for the benefit of the area.
(2) To levy special assessments on all businesses and multifamily
residential or mixed-use projects within the area and specially
benefited by a parking and business improvement area to pay in whole or
in part the damages or costs incurred therein as provided in this
chapter.

--- END ---