BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that accurate
information about the use of lottery funds is necessary to clarify
understanding of lottery advertisements. The legislature intends that
the lottery commission have the duty and authority to conduct
educational outreach efforts related to lottery funds.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.70.040 and 1994 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall have the power, and it shall be its duty:
(1) To promulgate such rules governing the establishment and
operation of a state lottery as it deems necessary and desirable in
order that such a lottery be initiated at the earliest feasible and
practicable time, and in order that such lottery produce the maximum
amount of net revenues for the state consonant with the dignity of the
state and the general welfare of the people. Such rules shall include,
but shall not be limited to, the following:
(a) The type of lottery to be conducted which may include the
selling of tickets or shares. The use of electronic or mechanical
devices or video terminals which allow for individual play against such
devices or terminals shall be prohibited. Approval of the legislature
shall be required before entering any agreement with other state
lotteries to conduct shared games;
(b) The price, or prices, of tickets or shares in the lottery;
(c) The numbers and sizes of the prizes on the winning tickets or
shares;
(d) The manner of selecting the winning tickets or shares;
(e) The manner and time of payment of prizes to the holder of
winning tickets or shares which, at the director's option, may be paid
in lump sum amounts or installments over a period of years;
(f) The frequency of the drawings or selections of winning tickets
or shares. Approval of the legislature is required before conducting
any on-line game in which the drawing or selection of winning tickets
occurs more frequently than once every twenty-four hours;
(g) Without limit as to number, the type or types of locations at
which tickets or shares may be sold;
(h) The method to be used in selling tickets or shares;
(i) The licensing of agents to sell or distribute tickets or
shares, except that a person under the age of eighteen shall not be
licensed as an agent;
(j) The manner and amount of compensation, if any, to be paid
licensed sales agents necessary to provide for the adequate
availability of tickets or shares to prospective buyers and for the
convenience of the public;
(k) The apportionment of the total revenues accruing from the sale
of lottery tickets or shares and from all other sources among: (i) The
payment of prizes to the holders of winning tickets or shares, which
shall not be less than forty-five percent of the gross annual revenue
from such lottery, (ii) transfers to the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260, and (iii) transfer to the state's general
fund. Transfers to the state general fund shall be made in compliance
with RCW 43.01.050;
(l) Such other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and
economical operation and administration of the lottery and for the
convenience of the purchasers of tickets or shares and the holders of
winning tickets or shares.
(2) To ensure that in each place authorized to sell lottery tickets
or shares, on the back of the ticket or share, and in any advertising
or promotion there shall be conspicuously displayed an estimate of the
probability of purchasing a winning ticket.
(3) To amend, repeal, or supplement any such rules from time to
time as it deems necessary or desirable.
(4) To advise and make recommendations to the director for the
operation and administration of the lottery.
(5) To conduct educational outreach efforts to the public that
include the following:
(a) Educating the public about the use of moneys in the state
lottery under this chapter;
(b) Educating the public about the amount the lottery contributes
to the education construction fund; and
(c) Educating the public about the amount the lottery contributes
to the education construction fund compared to the total amount in the
education construction fund.

--- END ---