BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature hereby designates the song, music, and lyrics to
"Washington My Homeland," composed by Cary J. Sand, as the official
state centennial song.

--- END ---