BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that, over the
past decade, student learning has improved faster at elementary schools
than at middle schools and high schools. The legislature also finds
that the achievement gap between white students and students of color
and low-income students grows in middle school and high school. For
example, forty-nine and three-tenths of one percent of African-American
fourth graders meet the Washington assessment of student learning
standard for reading, but only thirty-two and two-tenths of one percent
meet the standard in tenth grade. These numbers understate the
decline, because they do not factor in the disproportionate number of
African-American students who drop out of school. The legislature
further finds that there is broad recognition that the design of middle
schools and high schools is an important component of this problem, and
that there is a growing body of research and experience that may help
schools accelerate student learning improvement by changing the way
schools are organized by increasing rigor, relevance, and
relationships.
(2) A task force is established to examine the basic design of
middle schools and high schools. The task force shall be composed of
four members of the house of representatives, two from each major
caucus, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; four
members of the senate, two from each major caucus, appointed by the
president of the senate; two school district superintendents chosen by
the Washington association of school administrators; two principals
chosen by the Washington association of school principals; two school
board members chosen by the Washington state school directors
association; the superintendent of public instruction; a representative
of the governor; and a representative of skill centers, the Washington
association for career and technical education, and the Gates
foundation.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Examine the rate of student academic improvement in Washington
middle schools and high schools and state, national, and international
research on redesign efforts;
(b) Identify successful models and practices for middle school and
high school organization, within Washington, nationally and
internationally, that have been shown to:
(i) Reduce the dropout rate;
(ii) Close the achievement gap;
(iii) Accelerate academic improvement;
(iv) Improve the teaching and learning of math; and
(v) Provide more challenging opportunities for students who meet
standards early and more flexible options after the sophomore year; and
(c) Identify steps to improve alignment between middle schools and
high school, and between high schools and postsecondary education, job
training, and the world of work.
(4) By December 15, 2005, the task force shall report to the
governor, the superintendent of public instruction, and the fiscal and
education policy committees of the legislature. The report shall
include recommendations for change and improvement consistent with
Washington's academic standards and goals. The report shall identify
the roles and responsibilities of state policymakers, local school
districts, communities, businesses, principals, teachers, parents, and
students in school redesign and improvement.
(5) Staff services to the task force shall be provided by senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(6) Legislative members of the task force shall receive per diem
and travel as provided in RCW 44.04.120. The agency or organization
that appoints the other task force members shall be responsible for any
per diem and travel provided to its task force members.
(7) The task force expires June 30, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---