BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.093 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 357 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of sexual misconduct with a minor in the
first degree when:
(a) The person has, or knowingly causes another person under the
age of eighteen to have, sexual intercourse with another person who is
at least sixteen years old but less than eighteen years old and not
married to the perpetrator, if the perpetrator is at least sixty months
older than the victim, is in a significant relationship to the victim,
and abuses a supervisory position within that relationship in order to
engage in or cause another person under the age of eighteen to engage
in sexual intercourse with the victim; ((or))
(b) The person is a school employee who has, or knowingly causes
another person under the age of eighteen to have, sexual intercourse
with a registered student of the school who is at least sixteen years
old and not married to the employee, if the employee is at least sixty
months older than the student; or
(c) The person has, or knowingly causes another person under the
age of eighteen to have, sexual intercourse with another person who is
at least sixteen years old but less than eighteen years old and not
married to the perpetrator, if the perpetrator is at least sixty months
older than the victim, is personally known by the victim and a parent
or guardian of the victim, and takes advantage of the personal
relationship or familiarity in order to engage in or cause another
person under the age of eighteen to engage in sexual intercourse with
the victim.
(2) Sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree is a class
C felony.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "school employee" means an
employee of a common school defined in RCW 28A.150.020, or a grade
kindergarten through twelve employee of a private school under chapter
28A.195 RCW, who is not enrolled as a student of the common school or
private school.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.44.096 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 358 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of sexual misconduct with a minor in the
second degree when:
(a) The person has, or knowingly causes another person under the
age of eighteen to have, sexual contact with another person who is at
least sixteen years old but less than eighteen years old and not
married to the perpetrator, if the perpetrator is at least sixty months
older than the victim, is in a significant relationship to the victim,
and abuses a supervisory position within that relationship in order to
engage in or cause another person under the age of eighteen to engage
in sexual contact with the victim; ((or))
(b) The person is a school employee who has, or knowingly causes
another person under the age of eighteen to have, sexual contact with
a registered student of the school who is at least sixteen years old
and not married to the employee, if the employee is at least sixty
months older than the student; or
(c) The person has, or knowingly causes another person under the
age of eighteen to have, sexual contact with another person who is at
least sixteen years old but less than eighteen years old and not
married to the perpetrator, if the perpetrator is at least sixty months
older than the victim, is personally known by the victim and a parent
or guardian of the victim, and takes advantage of the personal
relationship or familiarity in order to engage in or cause another
person under the age of eighteen to engage in sexual contact with the
victim.
(2) Sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree is a gross
misdemeanor.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "school employee" means an
employee of a common school defined in RCW 28A.150.020, or a grade
kindergarten through twelve employee of a private school under chapter
28A.195 RCW, who is not enrolled as a student of the common school or
private school.

--- END ---