BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.95A.130 and 2002 c 248 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The special excise tax imposed under RCW 35.95A.080(1) will be
collected at the same time and in the same manner as ((relicensing))
tab fees for initial registrations and renewals under RCW 46.16.0621
and 35.95A.090. Every year on January 1st, April 1st, July 1st, and
October 1st the department of licensing shall remit special excise
taxes collected on behalf of an authority, back to the authority, at no
cost to the authority. Valuation of motor vehicles for purposes of the
special excise tax imposed under RCW 35.95A.080(1) must be consistent
with chapter 82.44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---