BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that, over the
next decade, large numbers of Washington students will graduate from
high school and seek access to higher education. Washington continues
to lag significantly behind other states in its production of students
with baccalaureate degrees and graduate degrees. The legislature
further finds that in Clark and Cowlitz counties, the two largest
counties in southwest Washington, the baccalaureate attainment rate is
less than the state average, and less than half the rate of Seattle.
(2) The legislature also finds that a new public four-year
institution of higher education has not been created in the state of
Washington since 1967. The three comprehensive institutions of higher
education were created in the late 1890s when the state normal schools
were established and no new comprehensive institution of higher
education has been created since then.
(3) The legislature further finds that although several regions of
the state do not have reasonable access to a four-year institution of
higher education, population growth in southwest Washington clearly
outstrips availability of higher education options. Nearly five
hundred thousand people live and work in the region. Creation of an
additional four-year institution or the conversion of an existing
institution should complement the existing structure and provide
additional options for students.
(4) The legislature intends to create a four-year baccalaureate
degree-granting institution following the completion of the report
required in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy is directed to evaluate and recommend to the legislature
whether a four-year baccalaureate degree-granting institution should be
created in southwest Washington.
(2) The institute shall:
(a) Analyze data indicating demand for and access to four-year
degrees in the region; and
(b) Conduct a comprehensive review of existing estimates of needs
for specific degree programs.
(3) In conducting the evaluation, the institute shall consult with
the higher education coordinating board, the state board for community
and technical colleges, the work force training and education
coordinating board, the existing research and regional institutions,
and local community colleges. The higher education coordinating board,
the state board for community and technical colleges, the work force
training and education coordinating board, and the existing research
and comprehensive institutions shall provide data to the institute
necessary to complete this study.
(4) By December 1, 2005, the institute shall provide a report to
the legislature and the governor recommending the type of four-year
baccalaureate degree-granting institution to be created and a schedule
for constructing and staffing the new institution. In addition, the
report shall estimate the costs to establish the new institution,
including, but not limited to: Land acquisition, master plan, design
and construction, staffing, and number of enrollments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of one hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from
the general fund to The Evergreen State College for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2006, to carry out the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires June 30, 2006.

--- END ---