BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.20.010 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) An unemployed individual shall be eligible to receive waiting
period credits or benefits with respect to any week in his or her
eligibility period only if the commissioner finds that:
(a) He or she has registered for work at, and thereafter has
continued to report at, an employment office in accordance with such
regulation as the commissioner may prescribe, except that the
commissioner may by regulation waive or alter either or both of the
requirements of this subdivision as to individuals attached to regular
jobs and as to such other types of cases or situations with respect to
which the commissioner finds that the compliance with such requirements
would be oppressive, or would be inconsistent with the purposes of this
title;
(b) He or she has filed an application for an initial determination
and made a claim for waiting period credit or for benefits in
accordance with the provisions of this title;
(c) He or she is able to work, and is available for work in any
trade, occupation, profession, or business for which he or she is
reasonably fitted.
(i) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
January 4, 2004, to be available for work an individual must be ready,
able, and willing, immediately to accept any suitable work which may be
offered to him or her and must be actively seeking work pursuant to
customary trade practices and through other methods when so directed by
the commissioner or the commissioner's agents.
(ii) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 4, 2004, to be available for work an individual must be ready,
able, and willing, immediately to accept any suitable work which may be
offered to him or her and must be actively seeking work pursuant to
customary trade practices, or be an apprentice registered by the
Washington state apprenticeship and training council and complying with
a recognized employment referral program pursuant to chapter 49.04 RCW,
and through other methods when so directed by the commissioner or the
commissioner's agents. If a labor agreement or dispatch rules apply,
customary trade practices must be in accordance with the applicable
agreement or rules;
(d) He or she has been unemployed for a waiting period of one week;
(e) He or she participates in reemployment services if the
individual has been referred to reemployment services pursuant to the
profiling system established by the commissioner under RCW 50.20.011,
unless the commissioner determines that:
(i) The individual has completed such services; or
(ii) There is justifiable cause for the claimant's failure to
participate in such services; and
(f) As to weeks beginning after March 31, 1981, which fall within
an extended benefit period as defined in RCW 50.22.010, the individual
meets the terms and conditions of RCW 50.22.020 with respect to
benefits claimed in excess of twenty-six times the individual's weekly
benefit amount.
(2) An individual's eligibility period for regular benefits shall
be coincident to his or her established benefit year. An individual's
eligibility period for additional or extended benefits shall be the
periods prescribed elsewhere in this title for such benefits.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.20.230 and 1998 c 161 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The employment security department will ensure that within a
reasonably short period of time after the initiation of benefits, all
unemployment insurance claimants, except those with employer
attachment, union referral, apprentices registered by the Washington
state apprenticeship and training council and complying with a
recognized employment referral program pursuant to chapter 49.04 RCW,
in commissioner-approved training, or the subject of antiharassment
orders, register for job search in an electronic labor exchange system
that supports direct employer access for the purpose of selecting job
applicants.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.20.240 and 2004 c 110 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) To ensure that following the initial application for
benefits, an individual is actively engaged in searching for work, the
employment security department shall implement a job search monitoring
program. Effective January 4, 2004, the department shall contract with
employment security agencies in other states to ensure that individuals
residing in those states and receiving benefits under this title are
actively engaged in searching for work in accordance with the
requirements of this section. The department may use interactive voice
technology and other electronic means to ensure that individuals are
subject to comparable job search monitoring, regardless of whether they
reside in Washington or elsewhere.
(b) Except for those individuals with employer attachment ((or)),
union referral, apprentices registered by the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council and complying with a recognized
employment referral program pursuant to chapter 49.04 RCW, individuals
who qualify for unemployment compensation under RCW 50.20.050
(1)(b)(iv) or (2)(b)(iv), as applicable, and individuals in
commissioner-approved training, an individual who has received five or
more weeks of benefits under this title, regardless of whether the
individual resides in Washington or elsewhere, must provide evidence of
seeking work, as directed by the commissioner or the commissioner's
agents, for each week beyond five in which a claim is filed. With
regard to claims with an effective date before January 4, 2004, the
evidence must demonstrate contacts with at least three employers per
week or documented in-person job search activity at the local
reemployment center. With regard to claims with an effective date on
or after January 4, 2004, the evidence must demonstrate contacts with
at least three employers per week or documented in-person job search
activities at the local reemployment center at least three times per
week.
(c) In developing the requirements for the job search monitoring
program, the commissioner or the commissioner's agents shall utilize an
existing advisory committee having equal representation of employers
and workers.
(2) Effective January 4, 2004, an individual who fails to comply
fully with the requirements for actively seeking work under RCW
50.20.010 shall lose all benefits for all weeks during which the
individual was not in compliance, and the individual shall be liable
for repayment of all such benefits under RCW 50.20.190.

--- END ---