BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the unemployment
insurance system was created to set aside unemployment reserves to be
used for the benefit of persons who are unemployed through no fault of
their own and to maintain purchasing power and limit the social
consequences of unemployment. The legislature further finds that the
system is falling short of these goals by failing to recognize the
importance of applying liberal construction for the purpose of reducing
involuntary unemployment, and the suffering caused by it, to the
minimum, and by failing to provide equitable benefits to unemployed
workers. The legislature also recognizes the desirability of managing
the system to take into account the goal of reducing costs to foster a
competitive business climate. The legislature intends to adjust the
balance between these goals by reinstating the requirement for liberal
construction and making other adjustments in the system that will allow
reasonable improvements in benefit equity, including reinstating a
weekly benefit calculation based on the wages in the two quarters of
the claimant's base year in which wages were the highest. The
legislature finds that these adjustments are critical to the health and
welfare of unemployed workers, and to the purchasing power essential to
the economic health and welfare of communities and the state, and
should be implemented as soon as feasible.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.01.010 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
Whereas, economic insecurity due to unemployment is a serious
menace to the health, morals and welfare of the people of this state;
involuntary unemployment is, therefore, a subject of general interest
and concern which requires appropriate action by the legislature to
prevent its spread and to lighten its burden which now so often falls
with crushing force upon the unemployed worker and his family. Social
security requires protection against this greatest hazard of our
economic life. This can be provided only by application of the
insurance principle of sharing the risks, and by the systematic
accumulation of funds during periods of employment to provide benefits
for periods of unemployment, thus maintaining purchasing powers and
limiting the serious social consequences of relief assistance. The
state of Washington, therefore, exercising herein its police and
sovereign power endeavors by this title to remedy any widespread
unemployment situation which may occur and to set up safeguards to
prevent its recurrence in the years to come. The legislature,
therefore, declares that in its considered judgment the public good,
and the general welfare of the citizens of this state require the
enactment of this measure, under the police powers of the state, for
the compulsory setting aside of unemployment reserves to be used for
the benefit of persons unemployed through no fault of their own, and
that this title shall be liberally construed for the purpose of
reducing involuntary unemployment and the suffering caused thereby to
the minimum.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.20.120 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 11 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to the other provisions of this title, benefits
shall be payable to any eligible individual during the individual's
benefit year in a maximum amount equal to the lesser of thirty times
the weekly benefit amount, as determined in subsection (2) of this
section, or one-third of the individual's base year wages under this
title: PROVIDED, That as to any week which falls in an extended
benefit period as defined in RCW 50.22.010(1), an individual's
eligibility for maximum benefits in excess of twenty-six times his or
her weekly benefit amount will be subject to the terms and conditions
set forth in RCW 50.22.020.
(b) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
the first Sunday of the calendar month immediately following the month
in which the commissioner finds that the state unemployment rate is six
and eight-tenths percent or less, benefits shall be payable to any
eligible individual during the individual's benefit year in a maximum
amount equal to the lesser of twenty-six times the weekly benefit
amount, as determined in subsection (2) of this section, or one-third
of the individual's base year wages under this title.
(2)(a) For claims with an effective date before January 4, 2004, an
individual's weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one
twenty-fifth of the average quarterly wages of the individual's total
wages during the two quarters of the individual's base year in which
such total wages were highest.
(b) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after
January 4, 2004, and before January 2, 2005, an individual's weekly
benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one twenty-fifth of the
average quarterly wages of the individual's total wages during the
three quarters of the individual's base year in which such total wages
were highest.
(c)(i) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after
January 2, 2005, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, an
individual's weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one
percent of the total wages paid in the individual's base year.
(ii) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after the
first Sunday following the day on which the governor signs this act,
and before July 1, 2007, an individual's weekly benefit amount shall be
an amount equal to three and eighty-five one-hundredths percent of the
average quarterly wages of the individual's total wages during the two
quarters of the individual's base year in which such total wages were
highest.
(3) The maximum and minimum amounts payable weekly shall be
determined as of each June 30th to apply to benefit years beginning in
the twelve-month period immediately following such June 30th.
(a)(i) With respect to claims that have an effective date before
January 4, 2004, the maximum amount payable weekly shall be seventy
percent of the "average weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding
such June 30th.
(ii) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 4, 2004, the maximum amount payable weekly shall be either four
hundred ninety-six dollars or sixty-three percent of the "average
weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding such June 30th, whichever
is greater.
(b) The minimum amount payable weekly shall be fifteen percent of
the "average weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding such June
30th.
(4) If any weekly benefit, maximum benefit, or minimum benefit
amount computed herein is not a multiple of one dollar, it shall be
reduced to the next lower multiple of one dollar.

Sec. 4 RCW 50.29.025 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 14 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions under RCW
50.24.010 shall be determined under this subsection.
(a) A fund balance ratio shall be determined by dividing the
balance in the unemployment compensation fund as of the September 30th
immediately preceding the rate year by the total remuneration paid by
all employers subject to contributions during the second calendar year
preceding the rate year and reported to the department by the following
March 31st. The division shall be carried to the fourth decimal place
with the remaining fraction, if any, disregarded. The fund balance
ratio shall be expressed as a percentage.
(b) The interval of the fund balance ratio, expressed as a
percentage, shall determine which tax schedule in (e) of this
subsection shall be in effect for assigning tax rates for the rate
year. The intervals for determining the effective tax schedule shall
be:

Interval of the
Fund Balance Ratio
Expressed as a Percentage
Effective
Tax Schedule

2.90 and above AA

2.10 to 2.89 A

1.70 to 2.09 B

1.40 to 1.69 C

1.00 to 1.39 D

0.70 to 0.99 E

Less than 0.70 F

(c) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (i) Identification number; (ii) benefit ratio;
(iii) taxable payrolls for the four calendar quarters immediately
preceding the computation date and reported to the department by the
cut-off date; (iv) a cumulative total of taxable payrolls consisting of
the employer's taxable payroll plus the taxable payrolls of all other
employers preceding him or her in the array; and (v) the percentage
equivalent of the cumulative total of taxable payrolls.
(d) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of twenty
rate classes according to the percentage intervals of cumulative
taxable payrolls set forth in (e) of this subsection: PROVIDED, That
if an employer's taxable payroll falls within two or more rate classes,
the employer and any other employer with the same benefit ratio shall
be assigned to the lowest rate class which includes any portion of the
employer's taxable payroll.
(e) Except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the contribution rate for
each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the following
tables for the rate class to which he or she has been assigned, as
determined under (d) of this subsection, within the tax schedule which
is to be in effect during the rate year:

Percent of
Cumulative
Taxable Payrolls
Schedules of Contributions Rates
for Effective Tax Schedule

From
To
Rate
Class
AA
A
B
C
D
E
F

0.00 5.00 1 0.47 0.47 0.57 0.97 1.47 1.87 2.47

5.01 10.00 2 0.47 0.47 0.77 1.17 1.67 2.07 2.67

10.01 15.00 3 0.57 0.57 0.97 1.37 1.77 2.27 2.87

15.01 20.00 4 0.57 0.73 1.11 1.51 1.90 2.40 2.98

20.01 25.00 5 0.72 0.92 1.30 1.70 2.09 2.59 3.08

25.01 30.00 6 0.91 1.11 1.49 1.89 2.29 2.69 3.18

30.01 35.00 7 1.00 1.29 1.69 2.08 2.48 2.88 3.27

35.01 40.00 8 1.19 1.48 1.88 2.27 2.67 3.07 3.47

40.01 45.00 9 1.37 1.67 2.07 2.47 2.87 3.27 3.66

45.01 50.00 10 1.56 1.86 2.26 2.66 3.06 3.46 3.86

50.01 55.00 11 1.84 2.14 2.45 2.85 3.25 3.66 3.95

55.01 60.00 12 2.03 2.33 2.64 3.04 3.44 3.85 4.15

60.01 65.00 13 2.22 2.52 2.83 3.23 3.64 4.04 4.34

65.01 70.00 14 2.40 2.71 3.02 3.43 3.83 4.24 4.54

70.01 75.00 15 2.68 2.90 3.21 3.62 4.02 4.43 4.63

75.01 80.00 16 2.87 3.09 3.42 3.81 4.22 4.53 4.73

80.01 85.00 17 3.27 3.47 3.77 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97

85.01 90.00 18 3.67 3.87 4.17 4.57 4.87 4.97 5.17

90.01 95.00 19 4.07 4.27 4.57 4.97 5.07 5.17 5.37

95.01 100.00 20 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40

(f) The contribution rate for each employer not qualified to be in
the array shall be as follows:
(i) Employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due shall be
assigned a contribution rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class
20 for the applicable rate year, except employers who have an approved
agency-deferred payment contract by September 30 of the previous rate
year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred payment
contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely
manner, the employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to a
contribution rate two-tenths higher than that in rate class 20 for the
applicable rate year; and
(ii) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array, the
contribution rate shall be a rate equal to the average industry rate as
determined by the commissioner; however, the rate may not be less than
one percent.
(2) Beginning with contributions assessed for rate year 2005, the
contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions under RCW
50.24.010 shall be the sum of the array calculation factor rate and the
graduated social cost factor rate determined under this subsection, and
the solvency surcharge determined under RCW 50.29.041, if any.
(a) The array calculation factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i) An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in
ascending order of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each
qualified employer: (A) Identification number; (B) benefit ratio; and
(C) taxable payrolls for the four consecutive calendar quarters
immediately preceding the computation date and reported to the
employment security department by the cut-off date.
(ii) Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of forty
rate classes according to his or her benefit ratio as follows, and,
except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the array calculation factor rate
for each employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the rate
class to which the employer has been assigned:

Benefit Ratio Rate
Class Rate
(percent)

At least Less than

0.000001 1 0.00

0.000001 0.001250 2 0.13

0.001250 0.002500 3 0.25

0.002500 0.003750 4 0.38

0.003750 0.005000 5 0.50

0.005000 0.006250 6 0.63

0.006250 0.007500 7 0.75

0.007500 0.008750 8 0.88

0.008750 0.010000 9 1.00

0.010000 0.011250 10 1.15

0.011250 0.012500 11 1.30

0.012500 0.013750 12 1.45

0.013750 0.015000 13 1.60

0.015000 0.016250 14 1.75

0.016250 0.017500 15 1.90

0.017500 0.018750 16 2.05

0.018750 0.020000 17 2.20

0.020000 0.021250 18 2.35

0.021250 0.022500 19 2.50

0.022500 0.023750 20 2.65

0.023750 0.025000 21 2.80

0.025000 0.026250 22 2.95

0.026250 0.027500 23 3.10

0.027500 0.028750 24 3.25

0.028750 0.030000 25 3.40

0.030000 0.031250 26 3.55

0.031250 0.032500 27 3.70

0.032500 0.033750 28 3.85

0.033750 0.035000 29 4.00

0.035000 0.036250 30 4.15

0.036250 0.037500 31 4.30

0.037500 0.040000 32 4.45

0.040000 0.042500 33 4.60

0.042500 0.045000 34 4.75

0.045000 0.047500 35 4.90

0.047500 0.050000 36 5.05

0.050000 0.052500 37 5.20

0.052500 0.055000 38 5.30

0.055000 0.057500 39 5.35

0.057500 40 5.40

(b) The graduated social cost factor rate shall be determined as
follows:
(i)(A) Except as provided in (b)(i)(B) ((and)), (C), and (D) of
this subsection, the commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost
factor for a rate year by dividing the total social cost by the total
taxable payroll. The division shall be carried to the second decimal
place with the remaining fraction disregarded unless it amounts to five
hundredths or more, in which case the second decimal place shall be
rounded to the next higher digit. The flat social cost factor shall be
expressed as a percentage.
(B) If, on the cut-off date, the balance in the unemployment
compensation fund is determined by the commissioner to be an amount
that will provide more than ten months of unemployment benefits, the
commissioner shall calculate the flat social cost factor for the rate
year immediately following the cut-off date by reducing the total
social cost by the dollar amount that represents the number of months
for which the balance in the unemployment compensation fund on the cut-off date will provide benefits above ten months and dividing the result
by the total taxable payroll. However, the calculation under this
subsection (2)(b)(i)(B) for a rate year may not result in a flat social
cost factor that is more than two-tenths lower than the calculation
under (b)(i)(A) of this subsection for that rate year. For the
purposes of this subsection, the commissioner shall determine the
number of months of unemployment benefits in the unemployment
compensation fund using the benefit cost rate for the average of the
three highest calendar benefit cost rates in the twenty consecutive
completed calendar years immediately preceding the cut-off date or a
period of consecutive calendar years immediately preceding the cut-off
date that includes three recessions, if longer.
(C) The minimum flat social cost factor calculated under this
subsection (2)(b) shall be six-tenths of one percent.
(D) With respect to rate year 2007, the flat social cost factor
shall be the lesser of:
(I) The flat social cost factor determined under (b)(i)(A) through
(C) of this subsection; or
(II) The flat social cost factor that would be determined under
(b)(i)(A) through (C) of this subsection if RCW 50.20.120(2)(c) had
been in effect during the immediately preceding rate year.
(ii)(A) Except as provided in (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection, the
graduated social cost factor rate for each employer in the array is the
flat social cost factor multiplied by the percentage specified as
follows for the rate class to which the employer has been assigned in
(a)(ii) of this subsection((, except that the sum of an employer's
array calculation factor rate and the graduated social cost factor rate
may not exceed six and five-tenths percent or, for employers whose
standard industrial classification code is within major group "01,"
"02," "07," "091," "203," "209," or "5148," or the equivalent code in
the North American industry classification system code, may not exceed
six percent)):
(((A))) (I) Rate class 1 - 78 percent;
(((B))) (II) Rate class 2 - 82 percent;
(((C))) (III) Rate class 3 - 86 percent;
(((D))) (IV) Rate class 4 - 90 percent;
(((E))) (V) Rate class 5 - 94 percent;
(((F))) (VI) Rate class 6 - 98 percent;
(((G))) (VII) Rate class 7 - 102 percent;
(((H))) (VIII) Rate class 8 - 106 percent;
(((I))) (IX) Rate class 9 - 110 percent;
(((J))) (X) Rate class 10 - 114 percent;
(((K))) (XI) Rate class 11 - 118 percent; and
(((L))) (XII) Rate classes 12 through 40 - 120 percent.
(B) The sum of an employer's array calculation factor rate and the
graduated social cost factor rate may not exceed six and five-tenths
percent, except that:
(I) For contributions assessed beginning July 1, 2005, through June
30, 2007, for employers whose North American industry classification
system code is "111," "112," "115," "3114," "3117," "42448," or
"49312," the graduated social cost factor rate is zero; and
(II) The sum of an employer's array calculation factor rate and the
graduated social cost factor rate may not exceed six percent for
employers whose North American industry classification system code is
"1141," and, for periods not covered by (b)(ii)(B)(I) of this
subsection, for employers whose North American industry classification
system code is "111," "112," "115," "3114," "3117," or "42448."
(iii) For the purposes of this section:
(A) "Total social cost" means:
(I) Except as provided in (b)(iii)(A)(II) of this subsection, the
amount calculated by subtracting the array calculation factor
contributions paid by all employers with respect to the four
consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding the computation
date and paid to the employment security department by the cut-off date
from the total unemployment benefits paid to claimants in the same four
consecutive calendar quarters. To calculate the flat social cost
factor for rate year 2005, the commissioner shall calculate the total
social cost using the array calculation factor contributions that would
have been required to be paid by all employers in the calculation
period if (a) of this subsection had been in effect for the relevant
period.
(II) For rate year 2007, the amount calculated under (b)(iii)(A)(I)
of this subsection reduced by the amount of benefits charged that
exceed the contributions paid in the four consecutive calendar quarters
immediately preceding the applicable computation date because, as
applicable, specified employers are subject to the social cost
contributions under (b)(ii)(B)(I) of this subsection, and/or because
the social cost factor contributions are paid under (b)(i)(D)(II) of
this subsection.
(B) "Total taxable payroll" means the total amount of wages subject
to tax, as determined under RCW 50.24.010, for all employers in the
four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding the
computation date and reported to the employment security department by
the cut-off date.
(c) The array calculation factor rate for each employer not
qualified to be in the array shall be as follows:
(i) Employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified
employer" by reason of failure to pay contributions when due shall be
assigned an array calculation factor rate two-tenths higher than that
in rate class 40, except employers who have an approved agency-deferred
payment contract by September 30th of the previous rate year. If any
employer with an approved agency-deferred payment contract fails to
make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or fails to submit any
succeeding tax report and payment in a timely manner, the employer's
tax rate shall immediately revert to an array calculation factor rate
two-tenths higher than that in rate class 40; and
(ii) For all other employers not qualified to be in the array, the
array calculation factor rate shall be a rate equal to the average
industry array calculation factor rate as determined by the
commissioner, plus fifteen percent of that amount; however, the rate
may not be less than one percent or more than the array calculation
factor rate in rate class 40.
(d) The graduated social cost factor rate for each employer not
qualified to be in the array shall be as follows:
(i) For employers whose array calculation factor rate is determined
under (c)(i) of this subsection, the social cost factor rate shall be
the social cost factor rate assigned to rate class 40 under (b)(ii) of
this subsection.
(ii) For employers whose array calculation factor rate is
determined under (c)(ii) of this subsection, the social cost factor
rate shall be a rate equal to the average industry social cost factor
rate as determined by the commissioner, plus fifteen percent of that
amount, but not more than the social cost factor rate assigned to rate
class 40 under (b)(ii) of this subsection.
(3) Assignment of employers by the commissioner to industrial
classification, for purposes of this section, shall be in accordance
with established classification practices found in the "Standard
Industrial Classification Manual" issued by the federal office of
management and budget to the third digit provided in the standard
industrial classification code, or in the North American industry
classification system code.

Sec. 5 RCW 50.16.030 and 1999 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, moneys
shall be requisitioned from this state's account in the unemployment
trust fund solely for the payment of benefits and repayment of loans
from the federal government to guarantee solvency of the unemployment
compensation fund in accordance with regulations prescribed by the
commissioner, except that money credited to this state's account
pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as amended, shall
be used exclusively as provided in RCW 50.16.030(5). The commissioner
shall from time to time requisition from the unemployment trust fund
such amounts, not exceeding the amounts standing to its account
therein, as he or she deems necessary for the payment of benefits for
a reasonable future period. Upon receipt thereof the treasurer shall
deposit such moneys in the benefit account and shall issue his or her
warrants for the payment of benefits solely from such benefits account.
(b) During fiscal years 2006 and 2007, moneys for the payment of
regular benefits as defined in RCW 50.22.010 shall be requisitioned in
the following order:
(i) First, from the moneys credited to this state's account in the
unemployment trust fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security
act, as amended in section 209 of the temporary extended unemployment
compensation act of 2002 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1103(d)), the amount equal to
the amount of benefits charged that exceed the contributions paid in
the four consecutive calendar quarters ending on June 30, 2006, for the
fiscal year 2006 calculation, and ending on June 30, 2007, for the
fiscal year 2007 calculation, because the social cost factor
contributions that employers are subject to under RCW
50.29.025(2)(b)(ii)(B)(I) are less than the social cost factor
contributions that would have applied to these employers under RCW
50.29.025(2)(b)(ii)(B)(II); and
(ii) Second, after the requisitioning required under (b)(i) of this
subsection in the respective fiscal year, from all other moneys
credited to this state's account in the unemployment trust fund.
(c) After the requisitioning required under (b) of this subsection,
if applicable, during calendar years 2006 and 2007, moneys for the
payment of regular benefits as defined in RCW 50.22.010 shall be
requisitioned in the following order:
(i) First, from the moneys credited to this state's account in the
unemployment trust fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security
act, as amended in section 209 of the temporary extended unemployment
compensation act of 2002 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1103(d)), the amount equal to
the amount of benefits charged that exceed the contributions paid in
the four consecutive calendar quarters immediately preceding the
applicable computation date because the social cost factor
contributions paid pursuant to RCW 50.29.025(2)(b)(i)(D)(II) are less
than the social cost factor contributions that would have been paid if
RCW 50.29.025(2)(b)(i)(D)(I) had been applicable; and
(ii) Second, after the requisitioning required under (c)(i) of this
subsection in the respective calendar year, from all other moneys
credited to this state's account in the unemployment trust fund.
(2) Expenditures of such moneys in the benefit account and refunds
from the clearing account shall not be subject to any provisions of law
requiring specific appropriations or other formal release by state
officers of money in their custody, and RCW 43.01.050, as amended,
shall not apply. All warrants issued by the treasurer for the payment
of benefits and refunds shall bear the signature of the treasurer and
the countersignature of the commissioner, or his or her duly authorized
agent for that purpose.
(3) Any balance of moneys requisitioned from the unemployment trust
fund which remains unclaimed or unpaid in the benefit account after the
expiration of the period for which sums were requisitioned shall either
be deducted from estimates for, and may be utilized for the payment of,
benefits during succeeding periods, or in the discretion of the
commissioner, shall be redeposited with the secretary of the treasury
of the United States of America to the credit of this state's account
in the unemployment trust fund.
(4) Money credited to the account of this state in the unemployment
trust fund by the secretary of the treasury of the United States of
America pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as amended,
may be requisitioned and used for the payment of expenses incurred for
the administration of this title pursuant to a specific appropriation
by the legislature, provided that the expenses are incurred and the
money is requisitioned after the enactment of an appropriation law
which:
(a) Specifies the purposes for which such money is appropriated and
the amounts appropriated therefor;
(b) Limits the period within which such money may be obligated to
a period ending not more than two years after the date of the enactment
of the appropriation law; and
(c) Limits the amount which may be obligated during a twelve-month
period beginning on July 1st and ending on the next June 30th to an
amount which does not exceed the amount by which (i) the aggregate of
the amounts credited to the account of this state pursuant to section
903 of the social security act, as amended, during the same twelve-month period and the thirty-four preceding twelve-month periods,
exceeds (ii) the aggregate of the amounts obligated pursuant to RCW
50.16.030 (4), (5) and (6) and charged against the amounts credited to
the account of this state during any of such thirty-five twelve-month
periods. For the purposes of RCW 50.16.030 (4), (5) and (6), amounts
obligated during any such twelve-month period shall be charged against
equivalent amounts which were first credited and which are not already
so charged; except that no amount obligated for administration during
any such twelve-month period may be charged against any amount credited
during such a twelve-month period earlier than the thirty-fourth
twelve-month period preceding such period: PROVIDED, That any amount
credited to this state's account under section 903 of the social
security act, as amended, which has been appropriated for expenses of
administration, whether or not withdrawn from the trust fund shall be
excluded from the unemployment compensation fund balance for the
purpose of experience rating credit determination.
(5) Money credited to the account of this state pursuant to section
903 of the social security act, as amended, may not be withdrawn or
used except for the payment of benefits and for the payment of expenses
of administration and of public employment offices pursuant to RCW
50.16.030 (4), (5) and (6). However, moneys credited because of excess
amounts in federal accounts in federal fiscal years 1999, 2000, and
2001 shall be used solely for the administration of the unemployment
compensation program and are not subject to appropriation by the
legislature for any other purpose.
(6) Money requisitioned as provided in RCW 50.16.030 (4), (5) and
(6) for the payment of expenses of administration shall be deposited in
the unemployment compensation fund, but until expended, shall remain a
part of the unemployment compensation fund. The commissioner shall
maintain a separate record of the deposit, obligation, expenditure and
return of funds so deposited. Any money so deposited which either will
not be obligated within the period specified by the appropriation law
or remains unobligated at the end of the period, and any money which
has been obligated within the period but will not be expended, shall be
returned promptly to the account of this state in the unemployment
trust fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 50.29 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By October 1, 2006, and October 1, 2007, the employment
security department must report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on the impact, or projected impact, of sections 2 and 3,
chapter ..., Laws of 2005 (sections 2 and 3 of this act) on the
unemployment trust fund in the three consecutive fiscal years beginning
with the year before the report date.
(2) This section expires January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 To establish additional capacity within the
employment security department, the department is authorized to add two
full-time equivalent employees to develop economic models for
estimating the impacts of policy changes on the unemployment insurance
system and the unemployment trust fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1)(a) The joint legislative task force on
unemployment insurance benefit equity is established. The joint
legislative task force shall consist of the following members:
(i) The chair and ranking minority member of the senate labor,
commerce, research and development committee;
(ii) The chair and ranking minority member of the house commerce
and labor committee;
(iii) Four members representing business, selected from nominations
submitted by statewide business organizations representing a cross-section of industries and appointed jointly by the president of the
senate and the speaker of the house of representatives; and
(iv) Four members representing labor, selected from nominations
submitted by statewide labor organizations representing a cross-section
of industries and appointed jointly by the president of the senate and
the speaker of the house of representatives.
(b) In addition, the employment security department shall cooperate
with the task force and maintain a liaison representative, who shall be
a nonvoting member. The department shall cooperate with the task force
and provide information as the task force may reasonably request.
(2) The task force shall review the unemployment insurance system,
including, but not limited to, whether the benefit structure provides
for equitable benefits, whether the structure fairly accounts for
changes in the work force and industry work patterns, including
seasonality, and for claimants' annual work patterns, whether the tax
structure provides for an equitable distribution of taxes, and whether
the trust fund is adequate in the long term.
(3)(a) The task force shall use legislative facilities, and staff
support shall be provided by senate committee services and the house of
representatives office of program research. The task force may hire
additional staff with specific technical expertise if such expertise is
necessary to carry out the mandates of this study.
(b) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(c) The expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives.
(5) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the legislature by January 1, 2006.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Section 2 of this act expires June 30,
2007.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that the expiration of
sections or subsections of this act results in those sections of law
being returned to the law in effect immediately before the effective
date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---