BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is a
substantial governmental interest to:
(1) Extend to public employees protections similar to those
afforded to private sector employees regarding reporting and
accountability for their bargaining representatives;
(2) Assure that a public employee's right to refrain from compelled
speech and from financing expenditures that are not germane to the
collective bargaining process or to contract administration is properly
balanced with the bargaining representative's ability to collect dues
and fees and to use them;
(3) Discourage corruption and mismanagement within employee
organizations; and
(4) By providing better information, reduce the disputes brought
under union security clauses between members of a bargaining unit and
their bargaining representative.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.52.045 and 1987 c 314 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon filing with the employer the voluntary written
authorization of a bargaining unit employee under this chapter, the
employee organization which is the exclusive bargaining representative
of the bargaining unit shall have the right to have deducted from the
salary of the bargaining unit employee the periodic dues and initiation
fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or retaining
membership in the exclusive bargaining representative. Such employee
authorization shall not be irrevocable for a period of more than one
year. Such dues and fees shall be deducted from the pay of all
employees who have given authorization for such deduction, and shall be
transmitted by the employer to the employee organization or to the
depository designated by the employee organization. Nothing in this
section obligates the employer to withhold funds for a political action
committee obligated to report under RCW 42.17.040.
(2) A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions, but not a closed shop. If an agency shop or other union
security provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce any such
provision by deductions from the salary of bargaining unit employees
affected thereby and shall transmit such funds to the employee
organization or to the depository designated by the employee
organization.
(3) A union security provision in a collective bargaining agreement
is not permitted and ceases to be binding unless the employee
organization that is the exclusive bargaining representative of
employees covered by a union security provision permitted in this
chapter and any affiliated organization collecting dues, fees, or
assessments pursuant to a union security provision:
(a) Provide each employee with annual written notice, separate from
any other publication, conspicuously explaining the affected employees'
right to decline membership in the union and the process for paying a
work place representation fee, the services the bargaining agent will
provide for that fee, and the process for receiving any funds collected
as agency fees but not used for purposes germane to the collective
bargaining process or to contract administration;
(b) Provide each employee with annual written notice, separate from
any other publication, conspicuously explaining that employees have a
right of nonassociation when based upon bona fide personally held
religious beliefs or the tenets or teachings of a church or religious
body of which such employee is a member, and the process for exercising
this right;
(c) Provide each employee with an annual written notice specifying
the financial information the exclusive bargaining representative or
affiliated organization will make available to the affected employee
upon request. Any exclusive bargaining representative with annual
receipts of two hundred thousand dollars or more shall, on request by
an affected employee, provide the employee with detailed and timely
information as specified in rule by the commission on at least the
following:
(i) Salary, the cost of fringe benefits, allowances, and other
direct or indirect disbursements to each officer of the exclusive
bargaining representative, and the support staff, as well as all
contributions to state or national affiliates and any official or
employee thereof;
(ii) All income received or the value of services furnished to an
exclusive bargaining representative by either a parent affiliated labor
organization or by any other labor organization on behalf of the
exclusive bargaining representative; and
(iii) An itemization of the total amount spent by the exclusive
bargaining representative for such items as contract negotiation and
administration, organizing activities, labor dispute activities, public
relations activities, political activities, voter education and issue
advocacy activities, contributions to charitable, nonprofit, or
community organizations, and travel expenses;
(d) Permit all members of the bargaining unit equal ability to
affect decisions related to work place representation; and
(e) Do not expend or divert funds collected as work place
representation dues or fees to make contributions or expenditures to
influence an election or to operate a political committee, unless an
assessment for such use is affirmatively authorized by an affected
employee. Such authorized assessments must be segregated from dues and
fees collected pursuant to the collective bargaining agreement and
reported pursuant to RCW 42.17.040.
(4) An employee who is covered by a union security provision and
who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide personally
held religious beliefs or the tenets or teachings of a church or
religious body of which such employee is a member shall either have his
or her right accommodated by the reduction or waiver of the
representation fees, or pay to a nonreligious charity or other
charitable organization an amount of money equivalent to ((the periodic
dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring
or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining representative)) a
pro rata share of expenditures for purposes germane to the collective
bargaining process, to contract administration, or to pursuing matters
affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of employment. The
charity shall be agreed upon by the employee and the employee
organization to which such employee would otherwise pay the dues and
fees. The employee shall furnish written proof that such payments have
been made. If the employee and the employee organization do not reach
agreement on such matter, the commission shall designate the charitable
organization. The employee shall not be a member of the employee
organization but is entitled to all the representation rights of a
member of the employee organization.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.56.122 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 22 are each
amended to read as follows:
A collective bargaining agreement may:
(1) Contain union security provisions: PROVIDED, That nothing in
this section shall authorize a closed shop provision: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That agreements involving union security provisions must
safeguard the right of nonassociation of public employees based on bona
fide personally held religious beliefs or the tenets or teachings of a
church or religious body of which such public employee is a member.
Such public employee shall either have his or her right accommodated by
the reduction or waiver of the representation fees, or pay an amount of
money equivalent to ((regular union dues and initiation fee)) a pro
rata share of expenditures for purposes germane to the collective
bargaining process, to contract administration, or to pursuing matters
affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of employment to a
nonreligious charity or to another charitable organization mutually
agreed upon by the public employee affected and the bargaining
representative to which such public employee would otherwise pay the
dues and initiation fee. The public employee shall furnish written
proof that such payment has been made. If the public employee and the
bargaining representative do not reach agreement on such matter, the
commission shall designate the charitable organization. ((When there
is a conflict between any collective bargaining agreement reached by a
public employer and a bargaining representative on a union security
provision and any charter, ordinance, rule, or regulation adopted by
the public employer or its agents, including but not limited to, a
civil service commission, the terms of the collective bargaining
agreement shall prevail.)) The employee shall not be a member of the
employee organization but is entitled to all the representation rights
of a member of the employee organization.
(2) Provide for binding arbitration of a labor dispute arising from
the application or the interpretation of the matters contained in a
collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.76.045 and 2002 c 356 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon filing with the employer the voluntary written
authorization of a bargaining unit faculty member under this chapter,
the employee organization which is the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit shall have the right to have
deducted from the salary of the bargaining unit faculty member the
periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of
acquiring or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining
representative. Such employee authorization shall not be irrevocable
((for a period of more than one year)). Such dues and fees shall be
deducted from the pay of all faculty members who have given
authorization for such deduction, and shall be transmitted by the
employer to the employee organization or to the depository designated
by the employee organization. Nothing in this section obligates the
employer to withhold funds for a political action committee obligated
to report under RCW 42.17.040.
(2) A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions, but not a closed shop. If an agency shop or other union
security provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce any such
provision by deductions from the salary of bargaining unit faculty
members affected thereby and shall transmit such funds to the employee
organization or to the depository designated by the employee
organization.
(3) A union security provision in a collective bargaining agreement
is not permitted and ceases to be binding unless the employee
organization that is the exclusive bargaining representative of
employees covered by a union security provision permitted in this
chapter and any affiliated organization collecting dues, fees, or
assessments pursuant to a union security provision:
(a) Provide each faculty member with annual written notice,
separate from any other publication, conspicuously explaining the
affected faculty members' right to decline membership in the union and
the process for paying a work place representation fee, the services
the bargaining agent will provide for that fee, and the process for
receiving any funds collected as agency fees but not used for purposes
germane to the collective bargaining process or to contract
administration;
(b) Provide each faculty member with annual written notice,
separate from any other publication, conspicuously explaining that
faculty members have a right of nonassociation when based upon bona
fide personally held religious beliefs or the tenets or teachings of a
church or religious body of which such faculty member is a member, and
the process for exercising this right;
(c) Provide each employee with an annual written notice specifying
the financial information the exclusive bargaining representative or
affiliated organization will make available to the affected employee
upon request. Any exclusive bargaining representative with annual
receipts of two hundred thousand dollars or more shall, on request by
an affected employee, provide the employee with detailed and timely
information as specified in rule by the commission on at least the
following:
(i) Salary, the cost of fringe benefits, allowances, and other
direct or indirect disbursements to each officer of the exclusive
bargaining representative, and the support staff, as well as all
contributions to state or national affiliates and any official or
employee thereof;
(ii) All income received or the value of services furnished to an
exclusive bargaining representative by either a parent affiliated labor
organization or by any other labor organization on behalf of the
exclusive bargaining representative; and
(iii) An itemization of the total amount spent by the exclusive
bargaining representative for such items as contract negotiation and
administration, organizing activities, labor dispute activities, public
relations activities, political activities, voter education and issue
advocacy activities, contributions to charitable, nonprofit, or
community organizations, and travel expenses;
(d) Permit all members of the bargaining unit equal ability to
affect decisions related to work place representation; and
(e) Do not expend or divert funds collected as work place
representation dues or fees to make contributions or expenditures to
influence an election or to operate a political committee, unless an
assessment for such use is affirmatively authorized by an affected
faculty member. Such authorized assessments must be segregated from
dues and fees collected pursuant to the collective bargaining agreement
and reported pursuant to RCW 42.17.040.
(4) A faculty member who is covered by a union security provision
and who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide personally
held religious beliefs or the tenets or teachings of a church or
religious body of which such faculty member is a member shall either
have his or her right accommodated by the reduction or waiver of the
representation fees, or pay to a nonreligious charity or other
charitable organization an amount of money equivalent to ((the periodic
dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring
or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining representative)) a
pro rata share of expenditures for purposes germane to the collective
bargaining process, to contract administration, or to pursuing matters
affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of employment. The
charity shall be agreed upon by the faculty member and the employee
organization to which such faculty member would otherwise pay the dues
and fees. The faculty member shall furnish written proof that such
payments have been made. If the faculty member and the employee
organization do not reach agreement on such matter, the dispute shall
be submitted to the commission for determination. The employee shall
not be a member of the employee organization but is entitled to all the
representation rights of a member of the employee organization.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.59.100 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions including an agency shop, but not a union or closed shop.
If an agency shop provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce it
by deducting from the salary payments to members of the bargaining unit
the dues required of membership in the bargaining representative, or,
for nonmembers thereof, a fee equivalent to or less than such dues.
Nothing in this section obligates the employer to withhold funds for a
political action committee obligated to report under RCW 42.17.040.
(2) A union security provision in a collective bargaining agreement
is not permitted and ceases to be binding unless the employee
organization that is the exclusive bargaining representative of
employees covered by a union security provision permitted in this
chapter and any affiliated organization collecting dues, fees, or
assessments pursuant to a union security provision:
(a) Provide each employee with annual written notice, separate from
any other publication, conspicuously explaining the affected employees'
right to decline membership in the union and the process for paying a
work place representation fee, the services the bargaining agent will
provide for that fee, and the process for receiving any funds collected
as agency fees but not used for purposes germane to the collective
bargaining process or to contract administration;
(b) Provide each employee with annual written notice, separate from
any other publication, conspicuously explaining that employees have a
right of nonassociation when based upon bona fide personally held
religious beliefs or the tenets or teachings of a church or religious
body of which such employee is a member, and the process for exercising
this right;
(c) Provide each employee with an annual written notice specifying
the financial information the exclusive bargaining representative or
affiliated organization will make available to the affected employee
upon request. Any exclusive bargaining representative with annual
receipts of two hundred thousand dollars or more shall, on request by
an affected employee, provide the employee with detailed and timely
information as specified in rule by the commission on at least the
following:
(i) Salary, the cost of fringe benefits, allowances, and other
direct or indirect disbursements to each officer of the exclusive
bargaining representative, and the support staff, as well as all
contributions to state or national affiliates and any official or
employee thereof;
(ii) All income received or the value of services furnished to an
exclusive bargaining representative by either a parent affiliated labor
organization or by any other labor organization on behalf of the
exclusive bargaining representative; and
(iii) An itemization of the total amount spent by the exclusive
bargaining representative for such items as contract negotiation and
administration, organizing activities, labor dispute activities, public
relations activities, political activities, voter education and issue
advocacy activities, contributions to charitable, nonprofit, or
community organizations, and travel expenses;
(d) Permit all members of the bargaining unit equal ability to
affect decisions related to work place representation; and
(e) Do not expend or divert funds collected as work place
representation dues or fees to make contributions or expenditures to
influence an election or to operate a political committee, unless an
assessment for such use is affirmatively authorized by an affected
employee. Such authorized assessments must be segregated from dues and
fees collected pursuant to the collective bargaining agreement and
reported pursuant to RCW 42.17.040.
(3) All union security provisions must safeguard the right of
nonassociation of employees based on bona fide personally held
religious beliefs or the tenets or teachings of a church or religious
body of which such employee is a member. Such employee shall either
have his or her right accommodated by the reduction or waiver of the
representation fees, or pay an amount of money equivalent to ((regular
dues and fees)) a pro rata share of expenditures for purposes germane
to the collective bargaining process, to contract administration, or to
pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of
employment to a nonreligious charity or to another charitable
organization mutually agreed upon by the employee affected and the
bargaining representative to which such employee would otherwise pay
the dues and fees. The employee shall furnish written proof that such
payment has been made. If the employee and the bargaining
representative do not reach agreement on such matter, the commission
shall designate the charitable organization. The employee shall not be
a member of the employee organization but is entitled to all the
representation rights of a member of the employee organization.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.80.100 and 2002 c 354 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A collective bargaining agreement may contain a union security
provision requiring as a condition of employment the payment, no later
than the thirtieth day following the beginning of employment or July 1,
2004, whichever is later, of an agency shop fee to the employee
organization that is the exclusive bargaining representative for the
bargaining unit in which the employee is employed. The amount of the
fee shall be equal to or less than the amount required to become a
member in good standing of the employee organization. Each employee
organization shall establish a procedure by which any employee so
requesting may pay a representation fee no greater than the part of the
membership fee that represents a pro rata share of expenditures for
purposes germane to the collective bargaining process, to contract
administration, or to pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and
other conditions of employment.
(2) A union security provision in a collective bargaining agreement
is not permitted and ceases to be binding unless the employee
organization that is the exclusive bargaining representative of
employees covered by a union security provision permitted in this
chapter and any affiliated organization collecting dues, fees, or
assessments pursuant to a union security provision:
(a) Provide each employee with annual written notice, separate from
any other publication, conspicuously explaining the affected employees'
right to decline membership in the union and the process for paying a
work place representation fee, the services the bargaining agent will
provide for that fee and the process for receiving any funds collected
as agency fees but not used for purposes germane to the collective
bargaining process or to contract administration;
(b) Provide each employee with annual written notice, separate from
any other publication, conspicuously explaining that employees have a
right of nonassociation when based upon bona fide personally held
religious beliefs or the tenets or teachings of a church or religious
body of which such employee is a member, and the process for exercising
this right;
(c) Provide each employee with an annual written notice specifying
the financial information the exclusive bargaining representative or
affiliated organization will make available to the affected employee
upon request. Any exclusive bargaining representative with annual
receipts of two hundred thousand dollars or more shall, on request by
an affected employee, provide the employee with detailed and timely
information as specified in rule by the commission on at least the
following:
(i) Salary, the cost of fringe benefits, allowances, and other
direct or indirect disbursements to each officer of the exclusive
bargaining representative, and the support staff, as well as all
contributions to state or national affiliates and any official or
employee thereof;
(ii) All income received or the value of services furnished to an
exclusive bargaining representative by either a parent affiliated labor
organization or by any other labor organization on behalf of the
exclusive bargaining representative; and
(iii) An itemization of the total amount spent by the exclusive
bargaining representative for such items as contract negotiation and
administration, organizing activities, labor dispute activities, public
relations activities, political activities, voter education and issue
advocacy activities, contributions to charitable, nonprofit, or
community organizations, and travel expenses;
(d) Permit all members of the bargaining unit equal ability to
affect decisions related to work place representation; and
(e) Do not expend or divert funds collected as work place
representation dues or fees to make contributions or expenditures to
influence an election or to operate a political committee, unless an
assessment for such use is affirmatively authorized by an affected
employee. Such authorized assessments must be segregated from dues and
fees collected pursuant to the collective bargaining agreement and
reported pursuant to RCW 42.17.040.
(3) An employee who is covered by a union security provision and
who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide personally
held religious beliefs or the tenets, or teachings of a church or
religious body of which the employee is a member, shall((, as a
condition of employment, make payments to the employee organization,
for purposes within the program of the employee organization as
designated by the employee that would be in harmony with his or her
individual conscience. The amount of the payments shall be equal to
the periodic dues and fees uniformly required as a condition of
acquiring or retaining membership in the employee organization minus
any included monthly premiums for insurance programs sponsored by the
employee organization)) either have his or her right accommodated by
the reduction or waiver of the representation fees, or pay to a
nonreligious charity or other charitable organization an amount of
money equivalent to a pro rata share of expenditures for purposes
germane to the collective bargaining process, to contract
administration, or to pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and
other conditions of employment. The employee shall not be a member of
the employee organization but is entitled to all the representation
rights of a member of the employee organization.
(((3))) (4) Upon filing with the employer the written authorization
of a bargaining unit employee under this chapter, the employee
organization that is the exclusive bargaining representative of the
bargaining unit shall have the exclusive right to have deducted from
the salary of the employee an amount equal to the fees and dues
uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or retaining membership
in the employee organization. The fees and dues shall be deducted each
pay period from the pay of all employees who have given authorization
for the deduction and shall be transmitted by the employer as provided
for by agreement between the employer and the employee organization.
Nothing in this section obligates the employer to withhold funds for a
political action committee obligated to report under RCW 42.17.040.
(((4))) (5) Employee organizations that before July 1, 2004, were
entitled to the benefits of this section shall continue to be entitled
to these benefits.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.64.160 and 1983 c 15 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions including an agency shop, but not a union or closed shop.
If an agency shop provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce it
by deducting from the salary payments to members of the bargaining unit
the dues required of membership in the bargaining representative, or,
for nonmembers thereof, a fee equivalent to or less than such dues.
Nothing in this section obligates the employer to withhold funds for a
political action committee obligated to report under RCW 42.17.040.
(2) A union security provision in a collective bargaining agreement
is not permitted and ceases to be binding unless the employee
organization that is the exclusive bargaining representative of
employees covered by a union security provision permitted in this
chapter and any affiliated organization collecting dues, fees, or
assessments pursuant to a union security provision:
(a) Provide each employee with annual written notice, separate from
any other publication, conspicuously explaining the affected employees'
right to decline membership in the union and the process for paying a
work place representation fee, the services the bargaining agent will
provide for that fee, and the process for receiving any funds collected
as agency fees but not used for purposes germane to the collective
bargaining process or to contract administration;
(b) Provide each employee with annual written notice, separate from
any other publication, conspicuously explaining that employees have a
right of nonassociation when based upon bona fide personally held
religious beliefs or the tenets or teachings of a church or religious
body of which such employee is a member, and the process for exercising
this right;
(c) Provide each employee with an annual written notice specifying
the financial information the exclusive bargaining representative or
affiliated organization will make available to the affected employee
upon request. Any exclusive bargaining representative with annual
receipts of two hundred thousand dollars or more shall, on request by
an affected employee, provide the employee with detailed and timely
information as specified in rule by the commission on at least the
following:
(i) Salary, the cost of fringe benefits, allowances, and other
direct or indirect disbursements to each officer of the exclusive
bargaining representative, and the support staff, as well as all
contributions to state or national affiliates and any official or
employee thereof;
(ii) All income received or the value of services furnished to an
exclusive bargaining representative by either a parent affiliated labor
organization or by any other labor organization on behalf of the
exclusive bargaining representative; and
(iii) An itemization of the total amount spent by the exclusive
bargaining representative for such items as contract negotiation and
administration, organizing activities, labor dispute activities, public
relations activities, political activities, voter education and issue
advocacy activities, contributions to charitable, nonprofit, or
community organizations, and travel expenses;
(d) Permit all members of the bargaining unit equal ability to
affect decisions related to work place representation; and
(e) Do not expend or divert funds collected as work place
representation dues or fees to make contributions or expenditures to
influence an election or to operate a political committee, unless an
assessment for such use is affirmatively authorized by an affected
employee. Such authorized assessments must be segregated from dues and
fees collected pursuant to the collective bargaining agreement and
reported pursuant to RCW 42.17.040.
(3) All union security provisions shall safeguard the right of
nonassociation of employees based on bona fide personally held
religious beliefs or the tenets or teachings of a church or religious
body of which such employee is a member. Such employee shall either
have his or her right accommodated by the reduction or waiver of the
representation fees, or pay an amount of money equivalent to ((regular
dues and fees)) a pro rata share of expenditures for purposes germane
to the collective bargaining process, to contract administration, or to
pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of
employment to a nonreligious charity or to another charitable
organization mutually agreed upon by the employee affected and the
bargaining representative to which such employee would otherwise pay
the dues and fees. The employee shall furnish written proof that such
payment has been made. If the employee and the bargaining
representative do not reach agreement on such matter, the commission
shall designate the charitable organization. The employee shall not be
a member of the employee organization but is entitled to all the
representation rights of a member of the employee organization.

--- END ---