BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is essential that the legislature and
state agencies spend tax dollars in a manner that is both responsible
and consistent with the best interests of the state and the nation.
The legislature and state agencies should, therefore, consider indirect
benefits that may be achieved when entering into state contracts for
goods and services. Such benefits include, but are not limited to, job
creation, capital investment, and economic stimulus. Additionally,
such benefits include greater protection of privacy interests, less
risk of disclosure of personal information, and avoidance of undue
risk.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.29 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of financial management, in consultation with
representatives of state agency management, business, labor, and
agricultural groups, shall develop and implement procurement policies
and procedures necessary to determine whether civil service contracts
and contracts for public works, personal services, purchased services,
information services, highway design and construction, and materials,
supplies, and equipment, and any subcontracts awarded under such
contracts, are in the best interests of Washington state, its
residents, and its economy. These procurement policies and procedures
shall require consideration of the following when making decisions to
enter into contracts:
(1) The extent to which the contract, or any subcontract awarded
under the contract, will be performed at a location outside the United
States;
(2) The extent to which international trade agreements apply to the
contract, or any subcontract awarded under the contract;
(3) The extent to which awarding the contract to a Washington
business will result in job creation or retention or other economic
benefits to Washington, its residents, and its economy; and
(4) The extent to which the contract, or any subcontract awarded
under the contract, involves solicitation or disclosure of personal
information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 39.29 RCW
to read as follows:
The office of financial management, in consultation with
representatives of state agency management, business, labor, and
agricultural groups, shall conduct a study of the indirect benefits of
adopting procurement policies giving Washington businesses a price
preference when determining the lowest responsible bidder on civil
service contracts and contracts for public works, personal services,
purchased services, information services, highway design and
construction, and materials, supplies, and equipment. These benefits
shall include, but are not limited to, job creation and retention,
capital investment, state and local tax revenue, and economic stimulus.
The office of financial management shall report its findings, and any
recommendations for legislation adopting procurement policies giving
Washington businesses a price preference, to the legislature by
December 1, 2005.

--- END ---