BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.13A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city may not assume, under this chapter, the jurisdiction of
all or part of a water-sewer district serving a population greater than
one thousand residents and containing, within its boundaries, the
territory of two or more cities, or one city and unincorporated
territory, unless voters of the entire water-sewer district approve a
ballot proposition authorizing the assumption under general election
law. The cost of the election shall be borne by the city seeking
approval to assume jurisdiction of a water-sewer district.
(2) A city or town may assume jurisdiction over a water-sewer
district located within its boundaries without seeking approval of the
voters, as required under subsection (1) of this section, if the board
of commissioners of the water-sewer district consent to the assumption
of jurisdiction by the city or town. The feasibility study required
under subsection (3) of this section is not required if the board of
commissioners of the water-sewer district consents to the assumption of
jurisdiction by the city or town.
(3) Following the passage of a resolution by a city or town to
assume all or part of a special purpose water-sewer district under this
chapter, a feasibility study of such assumption shall be conducted,
unless the board of commissioners of the water-sewer district consents
to the assumption of jurisdiction by the city or town as provided under
subsection (2) of this section. The study will be jointly and equally
funded by the city and the district through a mutually agreed contract
with a qualified independent consultant with professional expertise
involving public water and sewer systems. The study shall address the
impact of the proposed assumption on both the city and district.
Issues to be considered shall be mutually agreed to by the city and the
district and shall include, but not be limited to, engineering and
operational impacts, costs of the assumption to the city and the
district including potential impacts on future water-sewer rates, bond
ratings and future borrowing costs, status of existing water rights,
and other issues jointly agreed to. The findings of the joint study
shall be presented as a public record that is available to the
registered voters of the district, both within and without the boundary
of the city conducting the assumption, prior to a vote on the proposed
assumption by all the voters in the district. The study shall be
completed within six months of the passage of the resolution to assume
the district. No vote shall take place until such study has been
completed and the results have been made available to the registered
voters of the district.
(4) This section is applicable to assumptions of jurisdiction of
water-sewer districts by cities or towns that have been initiated prior
to the effective date of this act and which are pending as of that
date, as well as those assumptions of jurisdiction that are initiated
on or after the effective date of this act.
(5) Once the voters in a water-sewer district have approved or
disapproved an assumption through the ballot proposition process
required under subsection (1) of this section, a boundary review board
does not have jurisdiction, under chapter 36.93 RCW, to conduct a
review of such assumption where the attempted or completed assumption
involves not more than one city.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city or town in which a water-sewer district operates works,
plants, or facilities for the distribution and sale of water or sewer
services has the power to levy and collect from the district a tax on
the gross revenues derived by the district from the sale of water or
sewer services within the city or town, exclusive of the revenues
derived from the sale of water or sewer services for purposes of
resale. The rate of tax shall not exceed six percent. The tax when
levied shall be a debt of the district, and may be collected as such.
The district has the power to add the amount of tax to the rates or
charges it makes for water or sewer services sold within the limits of
the city or town. A city or town shall not impose the tax under this
section if the city or town is imposing any tax, fee, or charge on the
water-sewer district pursuant to an interlocal agreement.
(2) A city or town that does not currently impose a utility tax
shall not impose the tax under this section on a water-sewer district
unless a majority of the voters in the city or town approve the tax at
a primary or general election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---