BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some areas of the
state have a significantly higher capacity of licensed boarding home,
adult family home, and nursing home beds than they have occupancy. In
Yakima county, in addition to having significantly higher capacity than
occupancy in boarding homes, adult family homes, and nursing homes,
approximately seventy-eight percent of those receiving care in adult
family homes, boarding homes, and nursing home beds are on medicaid.
High vacancy rates, coupled with a high medicaid population in these
care settings, can lead to quality of care issues and cost shifting to
the private pay sector. It is for this reason that a moratorium on
licensing of new boarding homes and adult family homes should occur
until a comprehensive study can be completed on occupancy rates and
projected future need in boarding homes, nursing homes, and adult
family homes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Effective July 1, 2005, and for any
application received after July 1, 2005, a moratorium exists on all new
boarding home and adult family home licenses in Yakima county until
June 30, 2007. The department of social and health services may issue
a license to an applicant for operation of a boarding home or adult
family home if the schematic plans or construction drawings for a
proposed facility were submitted prior to July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) No later than December 1, 2005, the
department of social and health services shall determine and inform the
legislature of:
(a) The number of licensed nursing home beds and the average
occupancy rate of each licensed nursing home in the state of Washington
between July 1, 2004, and June 30, 2005;
(b) The number of licensed boarding home beds and the average
occupancy rate of each licensed boarding home in the state of
Washington between July 1, 2004, and June 30, 2005;
(c) The number of licensed adult family home beds and the average
occupancy rate of licensed adult family homes in the state of
Washington between July 1, 2004, and June 30, 2005; and
(d) The number of individuals receiving home and community services
in the state of Washington by service area between July 1, 2004, and
June 30, 2005.
(2) Upon determining the licensed bed capacity and average
occupancy rates for residential care facilities in the state of
Washington, the department shall assess and analyze each planning
area's bed capacity, occupancy rates, and projected future need of
residential care facilities, and the impact of future construction of
residential care facilities on current providers.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Planning area" means each individual county designated by the
department as the smallest geographic area for which nursing home bed
need projections are developed except as follows:
(i) Clark and Skamania counties shall be one planning area; and
(ii) Chelan and Douglas counties shall be one planning area.
(b) "Residential care facility" means an adult family home licensed
under chapter 70.128 RCW, a boarding home licensed under chapter 18.20
RCW, or a nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The moratorium on boarding home and adult family home licenses in
Yakima county established in section 2 of this act shall be terminated
on June 30, 2007, as provided in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 2 of this act, as now existing or hereafter amended, is
repealed effective June 30, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---