BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.060 and 1998 c 286 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040, and each city within such county, shall adopt development
regulations on or before September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation
of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated under
RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations adopted under this subsection may not
prohibit uses legally existing on any parcel prior to their initial
adoption and ((shall remain in effect until the county or city adopts
development regulations pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040)) may not require
modification of or limit agricultural activities occurring on
agricultural lands. Such regulations shall assure that the use of
lands adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands shall
not interfere with the continued use, in the accustomed manner and in
accordance with best management practices, of these designated lands
for the production of food, agricultural products, or timber, or for
the extraction of minerals. Counties and cities shall require that all
plats, short plats, development permits, and building permits issued
for development activities on, or within five hundred feet of, lands
designated as agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource
lands, contain a notice that the subject property is within or near
designated agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands
on which a variety of commercial activities may occur that are not
compatible with residential development for certain periods of limited
duration. The notice for mineral resource lands shall also inform that
an application might be made for mining-related activities, including
mining, extraction, washing, crushing, stockpiling, blasting,
transporting, and recycling of minerals.
(b) "Agricultural activities" as used in this section has the same
meaning as defined in RCW 90.58.065(2).
(2) Each county and city shall adopt development regulations that
protect critical areas that are required to be designated under RCW
36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be
adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the
counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on
or before March 1, 1992.
(3) Such counties and cities shall review these designations and
development regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under
RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development regulations under RCW
36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and development regulations
to insure consistency.
(4) Forest land and agricultural land located within urban growth
areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forest land or
agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW
36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing
transfer or purchase of development rights.

--- END ---