BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.47 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) After the effective date of this section, any new mandated
health benefit for specific health services only applies to state
purchased health care programs as defined in RCW 41.05.011(2) for a
period of one year from the effective date of the new mandated benefit.
On or before March 1st, after the one-year period for which the
mandated benefit has been applied, the health care authority shall
submit to the president of the senate and speaker of the house of
representatives a report indicating the impact the mandated benefit has
had on state purchased health care programs, including data on the
utilization and costs of the mandated benefits. The report must also
include a recommendation whether the mandated benefit should continue
for state purchased health care programs or whether additional
utilization and cost data is required.
(2) The legislature shall periodically review all mandated benefits
required by law.

--- END ---