BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the social and
economic costs that substance abuse inflicts on individuals, families,
and communities in the state of Washington is devastating. The
legislature further finds that effective substance abuse reduction
requires prevention efforts and chemical dependency treatment to help
reduce the progressive disease that leads to behavioral problems and
increased costs in the state's criminal justice system.
The legislature has learned that the governor's council on
substance abuse is currently in the process of reviewing federal
legislation that would address methamphetamine impacts in local
communities. The council is also continuing its study on the we care
plan agency response matrix for drug endangered children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The governor's council on substance abuse
shall report its findings and recommendations on the we care plan
agency response matrix for drug endangered children to the legislature
by December 31, 2005.

--- END ---