BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.089 and 1994 c 271 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of child molestation in the third degree
when the person has, or knowingly causes another person under the age
of eighteen to have, sexual contact with another who is at least
fourteen years old but less than ((sixteen)) eighteen years old and not
married to the perpetrator and the perpetrator is at least forty-eight
months older than the victim.
(2) Child molestation in the third degree is a class C felony.

--- END ---