BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Restricting access to certain precursor
drugs used to manufacture methamphetamine to ensure that they are only
sold at retail to individuals who will use them for legitimate purposes
upon production of proper identification is an essential step to
controlling the manufacture of methamphetamine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 69.43 RCW
to read as follows:
Any product containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers as
its only active ingredient, dispensed, sold, or distributed at retail
shall be dispensed, sold, or distributed only by a licensed pharmacist,
an employee of a pharmacy or pharmacist, or a practitioner as defined
in RCW 18.64.011, or an employee of a practitioner. A pharmacist or
practitioner purchasing, receiving, or otherwise acquiring any product
containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their
salts, isomers, or salts of isomers as its only active ingredient, must
provide adequate identification verifying that the pharmacist is
licensed by the state. A pharmacist or practitioner that dispenses,
sells, or distributes any product containing ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers as its only active ingredient, must comply with all of
the requirements of section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 69.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "traditional Chinese herbal
practitioner" means a person who is certified as a diplomate in Chinese
herbology from the national certification commission for acupuncture
and oriental medicine or who has received a certificate in Chinese
herbology from a school accredited by the accreditation council on
acupuncture and oriental medicine.
(2) A pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, or
an employee thereof, a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a
traditional Chinese herbal practitioner may not knowingly sell,
transfer, or otherwise furnish to any person a product at retail that
he or she knows to contain any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, without first obtaining photo identification of the
person that shows the date of birth of the person, and having the
person sign a written log or receipt showing the date of the
transaction, the name of the person, and the amount of the product
being sold, transferred, or otherwise furnished. The written log must
be maintained for a period of two years.
(3) A person buying or receiving a product at retail containing any
detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, from
a pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor registered
with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, or an employee
thereof, a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a traditional
Chinese herbal practitioner must first produce photo identification of
the person that shows the date of birth of the person, and sign a
written log or receipt showing the date of the transaction, the name of
the person, and the amount of the product being sold, transferred, or
otherwise furnished.
(4) Any product containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, shall be kept in a location that is not accessible by
customers without assistance of an employee of the merchant. If the
product contains ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or
their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers as its only active
ingredient, the product must be kept in a location within the pharmacy
area that is not accessible by customers.
(5) No pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, or
an employee thereof, a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a
traditional Chinese herbal practitioner may sell any product containing
any detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, to
a person that is not at least eighteen years old.
(6) A pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, or
an employee thereof, a practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a
traditional Chinese herbal practitioner shall provide access to the
written log to the board of pharmacy or department of health if
necessary for regulatory activities.
(7) The board of pharmacy, by rule, may exempt products containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers, in combination with another active
ingredient from the requirements of this section if they are found not
to be used in the illegal manufacture of methamphetamine or other
controlled dangerous substances. A manufacturer of a drug product may
apply for removal of the product from the requirements of this section
if the product is determined by the board to have been formulated in
such a way as to effectively prevent the conversion of the active
ingredient into methamphetamine. The burden of proof for exemption is
upon the person requesting the exemption. The petitioner shall provide
the board with evidence that the product has been formulated in such a
way as to serve as an effective general deterrent to the conversion of
pseudoephedrine into methamphetamine. The evidence must include the
furnishing of a valid scientific study, conducted by an independent,
professional laboratory and evincing professional quality chemical
analysis. Factors to be considered in whether a product should be
excluded from this section include but are not limited to:
(a) Ease with which the product can be converted to
methamphetamine;
(b) Ease with which pseudoephedrine is extracted from the substance
and whether it forms an emulsion, salt, or other form;
(c) Whether the product contains a "molecular lock" that renders it
incapable of being converted into methamphetamine;
(d) Presence of other ingredients that render the product less
likely to be used in the manufacture of methamphetamine; and
(e) Any pertinent data that can be used to determine the risk of
the substance being used in the illegal manufacture of methamphetamine
or any other controlled substance.
(8) Nothing in this section applies:
(a) To any product containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers that
is not the only active ingredient and that is in liquid, liquid
capsule, or gel capsule form;
(b) To the sale of a product that may only be sold upon the
presentation of a prescription;
(c) To the sale of a product by a traditional Chinese herbal
practitioner to a patient; or
(d) When the details of the transaction are recorded in a pharmacy
profile individually identified with the recipient and maintained by a
licensed pharmacy.
(9)(a) No pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, a
practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a traditional Chinese
herbal practitioner may retaliate against any employee that has made a
good faith attempt to comply with the requirements of this section by
requesting that a customer present photo identification, making a
reasonable effort to determine the customer's age, and documenting the
transaction in the written log.
(b) No pharmacy licensed by, or shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered with, the department of health under chapter 18.64 RCW, a
practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011, or a traditional Chinese
herbal practitioner is subject to prosecution under subsection (10) of
this section if they made a good faith attempt to comply with the
requirements of this section by requesting that a customer present
photo identification, making a reasonable effort to determine the
customer's age, and documenting the transaction in the written log.
(10) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.64.044 and 2004 c 52 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A shopkeeper registered as provided in this section may sell
nonprescription drugs, if such drugs are sold in the original package
of the manufacturer.
(2) Every shopkeeper not a licensed pharmacist, desiring to secure
the benefits and privileges of this section, is hereby required to
register as a shopkeeper through the master license system, and he or
she shall pay the fee determined by the secretary for registration, and
on a date to be determined by the secretary thereafter the fee
determined by the secretary for renewal of the registration; and shall
at all times keep said registration or the current renewal thereof
conspicuously exposed in the location to which it applies. In event
such shopkeeper's registration is not renewed by the master license
expiration date, no renewal or new registration shall be issued except
upon payment of the registration renewal fee and the master license
delinquency fee under chapter 19.02 RCW. This registration fee shall
not authorize the sale of legend drugs or controlled substances.
(3) The registration fees determined by the secretary under
subsection (2) of this section shall not exceed the cost of registering
the shopkeeper.
(4) Any shopkeeper who shall vend or sell, or offer to sell to the
public any such nonprescription drug or preparation without having
registered to do so as provided in this section, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and each sale or offer to sell shall constitute a separate
offense.
(5) A shopkeeper who is not a licensed pharmacy may purchase
products containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine,
or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, in combination with
another active ingredient, only from a wholesaler licensed by the
department under RCW 18.64.046 or from a manufacturer licensed by the
department under RCW 18.64.045. The board shall issue a warning to a
shopkeeper who violates this subsection, and may suspend or revoke the
registration of the shopkeeper for a subsequent violation.
(6) A shopkeeper who has purchased products containing any
detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, in
a suspicious transaction as defined in RCW 69.43.035, is subject to the
following requirements:
(a) The shopkeeper may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
ten percent of the shopkeeper's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs in March through October. In November through
February, the shopkeeper may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
twenty percent of the shopkeeper's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs. For purposes of this section, "monthly sales"
means total dollars paid by buyers. The board may suspend or revoke
the registration of a shopkeeper who violates this subsection.
(b) The shopkeeper shall maintain inventory records of the receipt
and disposition of nonprescription drugs, utilizing existing inventory
controls if an auditor or investigator can determine compliance with
(a) of this subsection, and otherwise in the form and manner required
by the board. The records must be available for inspection by the
board or any law enforcement agency and must be maintained for two
years. The board may suspend or revoke the registration of a
shopkeeper who violates this subsection. For purposes of this
subsection, "disposition" means the return of product to the wholesaler
or distributor.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.64.046 and 2004 c 52 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner of each place of business which sells legend drugs
and nonprescription drugs, or nonprescription drugs at wholesale shall
pay a license fee to be determined by the secretary, and thereafter, on
or before a date to be determined by the secretary as provided in RCW
43.70.250 and 43.70.280, a like fee to be determined by the secretary,
for which the owner shall receive a license of location from the
department, which shall entitle such owner to either sell legend drugs
and nonprescription drugs or nonprescription drugs at wholesale at the
location specified for the period ending on a date to be determined by
the secretary, and each such owner shall at the time of payment of such
fee file with the department, on a blank therefor provided, a
declaration of ownership and location, which declaration of ownership
and location so filed as aforesaid shall be deemed presumptive evidence
of the ownership of such place of business mentioned therein. It shall
be the duty of the owner to notify immediately the department of any
change of location and ownership and to keep the license of location or
the renewal thereof properly exhibited in such place of business.
(2) Failure to conform with this section is a misdemeanor, and each
day that the failure continues is a separate offense.
(3) In event the license fee remains unpaid on the date due, no
renewal or new license shall be issued except upon compliance with
administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees
determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(4) No wholesaler may sell any quantity of drug products containing
ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or their salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these
products to persons within the state of Washington exceed five percent
of the wholesaler's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs
to persons within the state in March through October. In November
through February, no wholesaler may sell any quantity of drug products
containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their
salts, isomers, or salts of isomers if the total monthly sales of these
products to persons within the state of Washington exceed ten percent
of the wholesaler's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs
to persons within the state. For purposes of this section, monthly
sales means total dollars paid by buyers. The board may suspend or
revoke the license of any wholesaler that violates this section.
(5) The board may exempt a wholesaler from the limitations of
subsection (4) of this section if it finds that the wholesaler
distributes nonprescription drugs only through transactions between
divisions, subsidiaries, or related companies when the wholesaler and
the retailer are related by common ownership, and that neither the
wholesaler nor the retailer has a history of suspicious transactions in
precursor drugs as defined in RCW 69.43.035.
(6) The requirements for a license apply to all persons, in
Washington and outside of Washington, who sell both legend drugs and
nonprescription drugs and to those who sell only nonprescription drugs,
at wholesale to pharmacies, practitioners, and shopkeepers in
Washington.
(7)(a) No wholesaler may sell any product containing ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, as its only active ingredient, to any person in
Washington other than a pharmacy licensed under this chapter or a
practitioner as defined in RCW 18.64.011.
(b) No wholesaler may sell any ((quantity)) product containing any
detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine,
or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers in combination with
another active ingredient, to any person in Washington other than a
pharmacy licensed under this chapter, a shopkeeper or itinerant vendor
registered under this chapter, ((or)) a practitioner as defined in RCW
18.64.011, or a traditional Chinese herbal practitioner as defined in
section 3 of this act.
(c) A violation of this subsection is punishable as a class C
felony according to chapter 9A.20 RCW, and each sale in violation of
this subsection constitutes a separate offense.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.64.047 and 2004 c 52 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any itinerant vendor or any peddler of any nonprescription drug
or preparation for the treatment of disease or injury, shall pay a
registration fee determined by the secretary on a date to be determined
by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The
department may issue a registration to such vendor on an approved
application made to the department.
(2) Any itinerant vendor or peddler who shall vend or sell, or
offer to sell to the public any such nonprescription drug or
preparation without having registered to do so as provided in this
section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and each sale or offer to sell
shall constitute a separate offense.
(3) In event the registration fee remains unpaid on the date due,
no renewal or new registration shall be issued except upon compliance
with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees
determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. This
registration shall not authorize the sale of legend drugs or controlled
substances.
(4) An itinerant vendor may purchase products containing ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers in combination with another active ingredient, only
from a wholesaler licensed by the department under RCW 18.64.046 or
from a manufacturer licensed by the department under RCW 18.64.045.
The board shall issue a warning to an itinerant vendor who violates
this subsection, and may suspend or revoke the registration of the
vendor for a subsequent violation.
(5) An itinerant vendor who has purchased products containing any
detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, in
a suspicious transaction as defined in RCW 69.43.035, is subject to the
following requirements:
(a) The itinerant vendor may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
ten percent of the vendor's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs in March through October. In November through
February, the vendor may not sell any quantity of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or
salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed
twenty percent of the vendor's total prior monthly sales of
nonprescription drugs. For purposes of this section, "monthly sales"
means total dollars paid by buyers. The board may suspend or revoke
the registration of an itinerant vendor who violates this subsection.
(b) The itinerant vendor shall maintain inventory records of the
receipt and disposition of nonprescription drugs, utilizing existing
inventory controls if an auditor or investigator can determine
compliance with (a) of this subsection, and otherwise in the form and
manner required by the board. The records must be available for
inspection by the board or any law enforcement agency and must be
maintained for two years. The board may suspend or revoke the
registration of an itinerant vendor who violates this subsection. For
purposes of this subsection, "disposition" means the return of product
to the wholesaler or distributor.

--- END ---