BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.16.300 and 2004 c 257 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW 4.16.300 through 4.16.320 shall apply to all claims or causes
of action of any kind against any person, arising from such person
having constructed, altered, or repaired any improvement upon real
property, or having performed or furnished any design, planning,
surveying, architectural or construction or engineering services, or
supervision or observation of construction, or administration of
construction contracts for any construction, alteration, or repair of
any improvement upon real property. This section is specifically
intended to benefit persons having performed work for which the persons
must be registered or licensed under RCW 18.08.310, 18.27.020,
18.43.040, 18.96.020, 18.220.020, or 19.28.041, and shall not apply to
claims or causes of action against persons not required to be so
registered or licensed.

--- END ---