BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to public development authorities
created under RCW 35.21.660 or 35.21.730 through 35.21.755 in respect
to amounts derived from providing services to:
(1) A limited liability company in which the public development
authority is the sole managing member;
(2) A limited partnership in which the public development authority
is the sole general partner; or
(3) A single asset entity required under any federal, state, or
local governmental housing assistance program, which is controlled
directly or indirectly by the public development authority.

--- END ---