BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means the state of Washington, any of its political
subdivisions, including any city, town, or county, and any other public
body exercising regulatory authority or control over the use of real
property in the state.
(2) "Fair market value" means the most recent property assessment
as shown on the tax rolls, or the highest and best use of the property
as determined by the county assessor, whichever is higher;
(3) "Family member" includes the wife, husband, son, daughter,
mother, father, brother, brother-in-law, sister, sister-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, mother-in-law, father-in-law, aunt, uncle, niece,
nephew, stepparent, stepchild, grandparent, or grandchild of the owner
of the property, an estate of any of the foregoing family members, or
a legal entity owned by any one or combination of these family members
or the owner of the property.
(4) "Owner" is the present owner of the property, or any interest
therein.
(5) "Regulation" means any ordinance, resolution, or other rule or
regulation adopted pursuant to the authority provided by state or local
law, which imposes or alters restrictions, limitations, or conditions
on the use of real property. "Regulation" includes, without
limitation:
(a) Any statute regulating the use of land or any interest therein;
(b) Local government comprehensive plans, zoning ordinances,
subdivision ordinances, and transportation ordinances; and
(c) Statutes and administrative rules regulating farming and forest
practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) If an agency enacts or enforces a new
regulation or enforces a regulation enacted prior to the effective date
of this act that restricts the use of private real property, or any
interest therein, and has the effect of reducing the fair market value
of the property, or any interest therein, then the owner of the
property shall be paid just compensation.
(2) Just compensation shall be equal to the reduction in the fair
market value of the affected property interest resulting from enactment
or enforcement of the regulation as of the date the owner makes a
written demand for compensation under this section.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to regulations:
(a) Restricting or prohibiting activities commonly and historically
recognized as public nuisances under common law. This subsection
(3)(a) shall be construed narrowly in favor of a finding of
compensation under this section;
(b) Restricting or prohibiting activities for the protection of
public health and safety, such as fire and building codes, health and
sanitation regulations, solid or hazardous waste regulations, and
pollution control regulations;
(c) To the extent the regulation is required to comply with federal
law;
(d) Restricting or prohibiting the use of a property for the
purpose of selling pornography or performing nude dancing. Nothing in
this subsection (3)(d) is intended to affect or alter rights provided
by the Washington or United States Constitutions; or
(e) Enacted prior to the date of acquisition of the property by the
owner or a family member of the owner who owned the subject property
prior to acquisition or inheritance by the owner, whichever occurred
first.
(4) Just compensation under subsection (1) of this section shall be
due the owner of the property if the regulation continues to be
enforced against the property one hundred eighty days after the owner
of the property makes written demand for compensation under this
section to the agency enacting or enforcing the regulation.
(5) For claims arising from regulations enacted prior to the
effective date of this act, a written demand for compensation under
subsection (4) of this section shall be made within two years of the
effective date of this act, or the date the agency applies the
regulation as an approval criteria to a land use application submitted
by the owner of the property, whichever is later. For claims arising
from regulations enacted after the effective date of this act, written
demand for compensation under subsection (4) of this section shall be
made within two years of the enactment of the regulation, or the date
the owner of the property submits a land use application in which the
regulation is an approval criteria, whichever is later.
(6) If a regulation continues to apply to the subject property more
than one hundred eighty days after the present owner of the property
has made a written demand for compensation under this section, the
present owner of the property, or any interest therein, shall have a
cause of action for compensation under this chapter in the court of
appropriate jurisdiction in which the real property is located, and the
present owner of the real property shall be entitled to reasonable
attorney fees, expenses, costs, and other disbursements reasonably
incurred to collect the compensation.
(7)(a) An agency may adopt or apply procedures for the processing
of claims under this section, but in no event shall these procedures
act as a prerequisite to the filing of a compensation claim under
subsection (6) of this section, nor shall the failure of an owner of
property to file an application for a land use permit with the local
government serve as grounds for dismissal, abatement, or delay of a
compensation claim under subsection (6) of this section.
(b) An agency adopting or applying procedures in accordance with
this subsection (7) shall not require:
(i) Payment of administrative costs for the processing of claims;
(ii) Payment for expanded public services associated with any new
development; or
(iii) An administrative or public hearing or appeal process as a
condition of receiving compensation under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Claims made under this chapter shall be
paid from funds, if any, specifically allocated by the legislature,
local governmental authority, or the agency for payment of claims under
this chapter. Notwithstanding the availability of funds under this
section, an agency shall have discretion to use available funds to pay
claims or to modify, remove, or not apply a regulation pursuant to
section 2(6) of this act. If a claim has not been paid within two
years from the date on which it accrues, the owner shall be allowed to
use the property as permitted by law at the time the owner acquired
full or partial ownership of the property.
(2) Notwithstanding any other state statute or the availability of
funds under subsection (1) of this section, in lieu of payment of just
compensation under this chapter, the agency responsible for enacting or
enforcing the regulation may modify, remove, or decide not to apply the
regulation to allow the owner to use the property for a use permitted
at the time the owner acquired the property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The remedy created by this act is in
addition to any other remedy under the Washington or United States
Constitutions, and is not intended to modify or replace any other
remedy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 64 RCW.

--- END ---