BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I. DEFINITIONS
Sec. 101 RCW 82.32.020 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 13 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) The meaning attributed in chapters 82.01 through 82.27 RCW to
the words and phrases "tax year," "taxable year," "person," "company,"
"gross proceeds of sales," "gross income of the business," "business,"
"engaging in business," "successor," "gross operating revenue," "gross
income," "taxpayer," "retail sale," and "value of products" shall apply
equally to the provisions of this chapter.
(2) Unless the context requires otherwise, "agreement" means the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement.
(3) "Certified automated system" means software certified under the
agreement to calculate the tax imposed by each jurisdiction on a
transaction, determine the amount of tax to remit to the appropriate
state, and maintain a record of the transaction.
(4) "Certified service provider" means an agent certified under the
agreement to perform all of the seller's sales and use tax functions,
other than the seller's obligation to remit tax on its own purchases.
(5)(a) "Member state" means a state that:
(i) Has petitioned for membership in the agreement and submitted a
certificate of compliance; and
(ii) Prior to the effective date of the agreement, has been found
to be in substantial compliance with the requirements of the agreement
by an affirmative vote of three-fourths of the other petitioning
states; or
(iii) After the effective date of the agreement, has been found to
be in compliance with the agreement by a three-fourths vote of the
entire governing board of the agreement.
(b) Membership under (a)(ii) of this subsection is effective on the
first day of a calendar quarter at least sixty days after at least ten
states comprising at least twenty percent of the total population, as
determined by the 2000 federal census, of all states imposing a state
sales tax have petitioned for membership and have been found in
compliance with the agreement.
(c) Membership under (a)(iii) of this subsection is effective on
the state's proposed date of entry.
(6) "Model 1 seller" means a seller that has selected a certified
service provider as its agent to perform all the seller's sales and use
tax functions, other than the seller's obligation to remit tax on its
own purchases.
(7) "Model 2 seller" means a seller that has selected a certified
automated system to perform part of its sales and use tax functions,
but retains responsibility for remitting the tax.
(8) "Model 3 seller" means a seller that has sales in at least five
member states, has total annual sales revenue of at least five hundred
million dollars, has a proprietary system that calculates the amount of
tax due each jurisdiction, and has entered into a performance agreement
with the member states that establishes a tax performance standard for
the seller. As used in this subsection, a seller includes an
affiliated group of sellers using the same proprietary system.
(9) "Source" means the location in which the sale or use, of
tangible personal property or a service, subject to tax under chapter
82.08, 82.12, 82.14, or 82.14B RCW, is deemed to occur.

PART II. REGISTRATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A seller, by written agreement, may appoint a person to
represent the seller as its agent. The seller's agent has authority to
register the seller with the state. An agent may also be a certified
service provider, with authority to perform all the seller's sales and
use tax functions, except that the seller remains responsible for
remitting the tax on its own purchases.
(2) The seller or its agent must provide the state with a copy of
the written agreement upon request.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.32.030 and 1996 c 111 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
if any person engages in any business or performs any act upon which a
tax is imposed by the preceding chapters, he or she shall, under such
rules as the department of revenue shall prescribe, apply for and
obtain from the department a registration certificate. Such
registration certificate shall be personal and nontransferable and
shall be valid as long as the taxpayer continues in business and pays
the tax accrued to the state. In case business is transacted at two or
more separate places by one taxpayer, a separate registration
certificate for each place at which business is transacted with the
public shall be required. Each certificate shall be numbered and shall
show the name, residence, and place and character of business of the
taxpayer and such other information as the department of revenue deems
necessary and shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the place of
business for which it is issued. Where a place of business of the
taxpayer is changed, the taxpayer must return to the department the
existing certificate, and a new certificate will be issued for the new
place of business. No person required to be registered under this
section shall engage in any business taxable hereunder without first
being so registered. The department, by rule, may provide for the
issuance of certificates of registration to temporary places of
business.
(2) Unless the person is a dealer as defined in RCW 9.41.010,
registration under this section is not required if the following
conditions are met:
(a) A person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross
income of the business, from all business activities taxable under
chapter 82.04 RCW, is less than twelve thousand dollars per year;
(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities
taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twelve thousand dollars
per year;
(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department
of revenue any other tax or fee which the department is authorized to
collect; and
(d) The person is not otherwise required to obtain a license
subject to the master application procedure provided in chapter 19.02
RCW.
(3) Persons who agree to collect and remit sales and use tax to the
department under the agreement and are not required to register under
subsection (1) of this section, may register under subsection (1) of
this section or register through an online system authorized under the
agreement.

PART III. MONETARY ALLOWANCES AND VENDOR DISCOUNTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt by rule monetary allowances for
certified service providers, model 2 sellers, and model 3 sellers and
other sellers that are not model 1 or model 2 sellers. The department
may be guided by the provisions for monetary allowances adopted by the
governing board of the agreement to determine the amount of the
allowances and the conditions under which they are allowed. The
monetary allowance must be reasonable and provide adequate incentive
for certified service providers and sellers to collect and remit under
the agreement.
(2) For certified service providers, the monetary allowance may
include a base rate that applies to taxable transactions processed by
the certified service provider. Additionally, for a period not to
exceed twenty-four months following a seller's registration under RCW
82.32.030(3), the monetary allowance may include a percentage of tax
revenue generated by the seller.
(3) For model 2 sellers, the monetary allowance may include a base
rate or percentage of revenue generated by a seller registering under
RCW 82.32.030(3), but shall not exceed a period of twenty-four months.
(4) For model 3 sellers and all other sellers that are not model 1
sellers or model 2 sellers, the monetary allowance may include a
percentage of tax revenue generated by a seller registering under RCW
82.32.030(3), but shall not exceed a period of twenty-four months.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department may adopt by rule vendor compensation for
sellers collecting and remitting sales and use taxes. The vendor
compensation may include a base rate or a percentage of tax revenue
collected by the seller, and may vary by type of seller. The
department may be guided by the findings of the cost of collection
study performed under the agreement, by cost of collection studies
performed by the department, and by vendor compensation provided by
other states, to determine reasonable vendor compensation for sellers
for the costs to collect and remit sales and use taxes.
(2) A seller shall not be entitled to vendor compensation while the
seller or its certified service provider, as defined in RCW 82.32.020,
receives a monetary allowance under section 301 of this act.

PART IV. AMNESTY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) No assessment for taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW, or related penalties or interest, may be made by the department
against a seller who:
(a) Within twelve months of the effective date of this state
becoming a member state of the agreement, registers to collect and
remit to the department the applicable taxes imposed under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW on sales made to buyers in this state in accordance
with the terms of the agreement, if the seller was not so registered in
this state in the twelve-month period preceding the effective date of
this state becoming a member state of the agreement; and
(b) Continues to be registered and continues to collect and remit
to the department the applicable taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW for a period of at least thirty-six months, absent the
seller's fraud or intentional misrepresentation of a material fact.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section preclude an
assessment for taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW for
sales made to buyers during the period the seller was not registered in
this state.
(3) The provisions of this section do not apply to any seller with
respect to:
(a) Any matter or matters for which the seller, before registering
to collect and remit the applicable taxes imposed under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW, received notice from the department of the commencement
of an audit and which audit is not yet finally resolved including any
related administrative and judicial processes;
(b) Taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW and collected
or remitted to the department by the seller; or
(c) That seller's liability for taxes imposed under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW in that seller's capacity as a buyer.
(4) The periods of limitation for making an assessment or
correction of an assessment prescribed in RCW 82.32.050(3) and
82.32.100(3) do not run during the thirty-six month period in
subsection (1)(b) of this section.

PART V. SOURCING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) Subsections (2) through (11) of this section apply to retail
sales occurring after the effective date of this section. If any
county, city, transportation authority, public facilities district, or
regional transportation investment district imposing a sales and use
tax under this chapter has its local sales and use tax collection
reduced during a fiscal year as a result of section 501 of this act,
and is not otherwise fully compensated or mitigated for such losses by
the state as provided in sections 901 through 904 of this act,
subsection (12) of this section applies on the first day of the month
of the following calendar quarter, and thereafter. The department
shall provide notice of the application of subsection (12) of this
section to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed
appropriate by the department.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (6), (7), (8), and (9) of
this section, for purposes of collecting or paying sales or use taxes
to the appropriate jurisdictions, all sales at retail shall be sourced
in accordance with this subsection and subsections (3) through (5) of
this section.
(a) When tangible personal property or a service defined as a
retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 is received by the purchaser at a
business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to that business
location.
(b) When the tangible personal property or a service defined as a
retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 is not received by the purchaser at a
business location of the seller, the sale is sourced to the location
where receipt by the purchaser or the purchaser's donee, designated as
such by the purchaser, occurs, including the location indicated by
instructions for delivery to the purchaser or donee, known to the
seller.
(c) When (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply, the sale is
sourced to the location indicated by an address for the purchaser that
is available from the business records of the seller that are
maintained in the ordinary course of the seller's business when use of
this address does not constitute bad faith.
(d) When (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection do not apply, the
sale is sourced to the location indicated by an address for the
purchaser obtained during the consummation of the sale, including the
address of a purchaser's payment instrument, if no other address is
available, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith.
(e) When (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection do not apply,
including the circumstance where the seller is without sufficient
information to apply those provisions, then the location shall be
determined by the address from which tangible personal property was
shipped, from which the digital good or the computer software delivered
electronically was first available for transmission by the seller, or
from which the service defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050 was
provided, disregarding for these purposes any location that merely
provided the digital transfer of the product sold.
(3) The lease or rental of tangible personal property, other than
property identified in subsection (4) or (5) of this section, shall be
sourced as follows:
(a) For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic
payments, the first periodic payment is sourced the same as a retail
sale in accordance with subsection (2) of this section. Periodic
payments made subsequent to the first payment are sourced to the
primary property location for each period covered by the payment. The
primary property location shall be as indicated by an address for the
property provided by the lessee that is available to the lessor from
its records maintained in the ordinary course of business, when use of
this address does not constitute bad faith. The property location
shall not be altered by intermittent use at different locations, such
as use of business property that accompanies employees on business
trips and service calls.
(b) For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic
payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in
accordance with subsection (2) of this section.
(c) This subsection does not affect the imposition or computation
of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump sum or
accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.
(4) The lease or rental of motor vehicles, trailers, semitrailers,
or aircraft that do not qualify as transportation equipment shall be
sourced as follows:
(a) For a lease or rental that requires recurring periodic
payments, each periodic payment is sourced to the primary property
location. The primary property location shall be as indicated by an
address for the property provided by the lessee that is available to
the lessor from its records maintained in the ordinary course of
business, when use of this address does not constitute bad faith. This
location shall not be altered by intermittent use at different
locations.
(b) For a lease or rental that does not require recurring periodic
payments, the payment is sourced the same as a retail sale in
accordance with subsection (2) of this section.
(c) This subsection does not affect the imposition or computation
of sales or use tax on leases or rentals based on a lump sum or
accelerated basis, or on the acquisition of property for lease.
(5) The retail sale, including lease or rental, of transportation
equipment shall be sourced the same as a retail sale in accordance with
subsection (2) of this section.
(6) A purchaser that is a business and is not a holder of a direct
pay permit that knows at the time of purchase of a digital good,
computer software delivered electronically, or a service that the
digital good, computer software delivered electronically, or service
will be concurrently available for use in more than one jurisdiction
shall deliver to the seller in conjunction with its purchase a multiple
points of use exemption form disclosing this fact.
(a) Upon receipt of the multiple point of use exemption form, the
seller is relieved of all obligation to collect, pay, or remit the
applicable tax and the purchaser is obligated to collect, pay, or remit
the applicable tax.
(b) A purchaser delivering the multiple point of use exemption
form, or a direct pay permit in lieu of a multiple point of use
exemption form, may use any reasonable, but consistent and uniform,
method of apportionment that is supported by the purchaser's business
records as they exist at the time of the consummation of the sale.
(c) The multiple point of use exemption form shall remain in effect
for all future sales by the seller to the purchaser until it is revoked
in writing.
(7)(a) A purchaser of direct mail that is not a holder of a direct
pay permit shall provide to the seller in conjunction with the purchase
either a direct mail form or information that shows the jurisdictions
to which the direct mail is delivered to recipients.
(i) Upon receipt of the direct mail form, the seller is relieved of
all obligations to collect, pay, or remit the applicable tax and the
purchaser is obligated to pay or remit the applicable tax on a direct
pay basis. A direct mail form shall remain in effect for all future
sales of direct mail by the seller to the purchaser until it is revoked
in writing.
(ii) Upon receipt of information from the purchaser showing the
jurisdictions to which the direct mail is delivered to recipients, the
seller shall collect the tax according to the delivery information
provided by the purchaser. In the absence of bad faith, the seller is
relieved of any further obligation to collect tax on any transaction
where the seller has collected tax pursuant to the delivery information
provided by the purchaser.
(b) If the purchaser of direct mail does not have a direct pay
permit and does not provide the seller with either a direct mail form
or delivery information as required by (a) of this subsection, the
seller shall collect the tax according to subsection (2)(e) of this
section. This subsection does not limit a purchaser's obligation for
sales or use tax to any state to which the direct mail is delivered.
(c) If a purchaser of direct mail provides the seller with
documentation of direct pay authority, the purchaser is not required to
provide a direct mail form or delivery information to the seller.
(8) The following are sourced to the location at or from which
delivery is made to the consumer:
(a) A retail sale consisting of watercraft;
(b) A retail sale consisting of a modular home, manufactured home,
or mobile home;
(c) A retail sale, excluding the lease and rental, consisting of a
motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or aircraft, that do not qualify
as transportation equipment; and
(d) Until January 1, 2007, a retail sale of tangible personal
property made by a person engaged in the business of selling flowers.
The rules for the sourcing retail sales and use taxes of flowers
delivered with telegraphic instructions in WAC 458-20-158, as effective
on July 1, 1970, shall remain in effect until January 1, 2007.
(9) A retail sale consisting of the providing of telecommunications
services shall be sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520.
(10) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Delivered electronically" means delivered to the purchaser by
means other than tangible storage media.
(b) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed
by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or
to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the
direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed
directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal
property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct
mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed
material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed
material delivered to a single address.
(c) "Receive" and "receipt" means taking possession of tangible
personal property, making first use of services, or taking possession
or making first use of digital goods, whichever comes first. "Receive"
and "receipt" do not include possession by a shipping company on behalf
of the purchaser.
(d) "Transportation equipment" means any of the following:
(i) Locomotives and railcars that are used for the carriage of
persons or property in interstate commerce;
(ii) Trucks and truck-tractors with a gross vehicle weight rating
of 10,001 pounds or greater, trailers, semitrailers, or passenger buses
that are:
(A) Registered through the international registration plan; and
(B) Operated under authority of a carrier authorized and
certificated by the United States department of transportation or
another federal authority to engage in the carriage of persons or
property in interstate commerce;
(iii) Aircraft that are operated by air carriers authorized and
certificated by the United States department of transportation or
another federal or foreign authority to engage in the carriage of
persons or property in interstate or foreign commerce;
(iv) Containers designed for use on and component parts attached or
secured on the items described in (d)(i) through (iii) of this
subsection.
(11) In those instances where there is no obligation on the part of
a seller to collect or remit use tax, the use of tangible personal
property or of a service, subject to use tax, is sourced to the place
of first use. The definition of use in RCW 82.12.010 applies to this
subsection.
(12)(a) A retail sale consisting solely of the sale of tangible
personal property shall be deemed to have occurred at the retail outlet
at or from which delivery is made to the consumer.
(b) A retail sale consisting essentially of the performance of
personal, business, or professional services shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place at which such services were primarily performed,
except that for the performance of a tow truck service, as defined in
RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed to have occurred at the
place of business of the operator of the tow truck service.
(c) A retail sale consisting of the rental of tangible personal
property shall be deemed to have occurred (i) in the case of a rental
involving periodic rental payments, at the place of primary use by the
lessee during the period covered by each payment, or (ii) in all other
cases, at the place of first use by the lessee.
(d) A retail sale within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a
retail sale of taxable personal property to be installed by the seller
shall be deemed to have occurred at the place where the labor and
services involved were primarily performed.
(e)(i) A retail sale consisting of the providing to a consumer of
telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than a sale of
tangible personal property under (a) of this subsection or a rental of
tangible personal property under (c) of this subsection or a sale of
mobile telecommunications services, shall be deemed to have occurred at
the situs of the telephone or other instrument through which the
telephone service is rendered.
(ii) A retail sale consisting of the providing of
telecommunications services shall be sourced in accordance with RCW
82.32.520.
(f) A retail sale of linen and uniform supply services is deemed to
occur as provided in RCW 82.08.0202.

Sec. 502 RCW 82.14.020 and 2003 c 168 s 503 and 2003 c 168 s 502
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) ((A retail sale consisting solely of the sale of tangible
personal property shall be deemed to have occurred at the retail outlet
at or from which delivery is made to the consumer;
(2) A retail sale consisting essentially of the performance of
personal, business, or professional services shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place at which such services were primarily performed,
except that for the performance of a tow truck service, as defined in
RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed to have occurred at the
place of business of the operator of the tow truck service;
(3) A retail sale consisting of the rental of tangible personal
property shall be deemed to have occurred (a) in the case of a rental
involving periodic rental payments, at the place of primary use by the
lessee during the period covered by each payment, or (b) in all other
cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;
(4) A retail sale within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a
retail sale of taxable personal property to be installed by the seller
shall be deemed to have occurred at the place where the labor and
services involved were primarily performed;
(5)(a) A retail sale consisting of the providing to a consumer of
telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than a sale of
tangible personal property under subsection (1) of this section or a
rental of tangible personal property under subsection (3) of this
section or a sale of mobile telecommunications services, shall be
deemed to have occurred at the situs of the telephone or other
instrument through which the telephone service is rendered;
(b) A retail sale consisting of the providing of telecommunications
services shall be sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520;
(6) A retail sale of linen and uniform supply services is deemed to
occur as provided in RCW 82.08.0202;
(7))) "City" means a city or town;
(((8))) (2) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters
82.04, 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, insofar as
applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under authority of this chapter;
(((9))) (3) "Taxable event" shall mean any retail sale, or any use,
upon which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That the term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant to RCW
82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;
(((10))) (4) "Treasurer or other legal depository" shall mean the
treasurer or legal depository of a county or city.

PART VI. CONFIDENTIALITY AND PRIVACY PROTECTIONS FOR
PERSONS USING CERTIFIED SERVICE PROVIDERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A fundamental precept of allowing the use of a certified
service provider is to preserve the privacy of consumers by protecting
their anonymity. With very limited exceptions, a certified service
provider shall perform its tax calculation, remittance, and reporting
functions without retaining the personally identifiable information of
consumers.
(2) The department of revenue shall provide public notification to
consumers, including purchasers claiming exemption from tax, of its
practices relating to the collection, use, and retention of personally
identifiable information.
(3) When personally identifiable information that has been
collected and retained is no longer required to ensure the validity of
exemptions from taxation by reason of the consumer's status or the
intended use of the goods or services purchased, the information shall
no longer be retained by the state of Washington.
(4) When personally identifiable information regarding an
individual is retained by or on behalf of the state of Washington, this
state shall provide reasonable access for the individual to his or her
own information and a right to correct any inaccurately recorded
information.
(5) If anyone other than a member state of the agreement, or other
than a person authorized by Washington law or the agreement, seeks to
discover personally identifiable information, the state of Washington
shall make a reasonable and timely effort to notify the individual of
the request.
(6) The provisions of this section may be enforced by petitioning
the superior court of Thurston county for injunctive relief.

PART VII. TAXABILITY MATRIX
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department of revenue shall complete a taxability matrix
maintained by the member states of the agreement in downloadable
format. The matrix contains terms defined in the agreement. The
department of revenue shall provide notice of changes in the taxability
of products or services listed in the matrix.
(2) Sellers and certified service providers are relieved from
liability to the state and to local jurisdictions for having charged or
collected the incorrect amount of sales or use tax if the error
resulted from reliance on erroneous information provided by the
department of revenue in the taxability matrix.

PART VIII. DELIVERY CHARGES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
When computing the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020, if a shipment
consists of taxable tangible personal property and nontaxable tangible
personal property, and delivery charges are included in the sales
price, the seller must collect and remit tax on the percentage of
delivery charges allocated to the taxable tangible property, but does
not have to collect and remit tax on the percentage allocated to exempt
tangible personal property. The seller may use either of the following
percentages to determine the taxable portion of the delivery charges:
(1) A percentage based on the total sales price of the taxable
tangible property compared to the total sales price of all tangible
personal property in the shipment; or
(2) A percentage based on the total weight of the taxable tangible
personal property compared to the total weight of all tangible personal
property in the shipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
When computing the tax levied by RCW 82.12.020, if a shipment
consists of taxable tangible personal property and nontaxable tangible
personal property, and delivery charges are included in the purchase
price, the retailer must collect and remit tax on the percentage of
delivery charges allocated to the taxable personal property, but does
not have to collect and remit tax on the percentage allocated to exempt
tangible personal property. The retailer may use either of the
following percentages to determine the taxable portion of the delivery
charges:
(1) A percentage based on the total purchase price of the taxable
personal property compared to the total purchase price of all tangible
personal property in the shipment; or
(2) A percentage based on the total weight of the taxable tangible
personal property compared to the total weight of all tangible personal
property in the shipment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
When computing the tax levied by RCW 82.12.020, if a shipment
consists of taxable tangible personal property and nontaxable tangible
personal property, and delivery charges are included in the value of
the article used, the consumer must remit tax on the percentage of
delivery charges allocated to the taxable personal property, but does
not have to remit tax on the percentage allocated to exempt tangible
personal property. The consumer may use either of the following
percentages to determine the taxable portion of the delivery charges:
(1) A percentage based on the entire value of the taxable personal
property compared to the total value of all tangible personal property
in the shipment; or
(2) A percentage based on the total weight of the taxable tangible
personal property compared to the total weight of all tangible personal
property in the shipment.

PART IX. SOURCING MITIGATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 (1) The legislature finds and declares
that:
(a) Washington state's participation as a member state in the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement benefits the state, all its
local taxing jurisdictions, and its retailing industry by increasing
state and local revenues, improving the state's business climate, and
standardizing and simplifying the state's tax structure;
(b) Participation in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement is
a matter of statewide concern and is in the best interests of the
state, the general public, and all counties, cities, and transportation
authorities under RCW 82.14.045, public facility districts under
chapters 36.100 and 35.57 RCW, public transportation benefit areas
under RCW 82.14.440, and regional transportation investment districts,
that impose a sales and use tax under applicable law;
(c) Participation in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement
requires the adoption of the agreement's sourcing provisions, which
changes the location in which a retail sale of delivered tangible
personal property occurs from the point of origin to the point of
delivery;
(d) Changes in the state's sourcing law provisions to conform with
the streamlined sales and use tax agreement will cause sales and use
tax revenues to shift among local taxing jurisdictions. In so doing,
the legislature finds that there will be an unintended adverse impact
on local taxing jurisdictions that receive less revenues because local
tax revenues will be suddenly redistributed, with revenue increases for
some jurisdictions and reductions for others, due solely to changes in
state sales tax sourcing rules to be implemented under section 501 of
this act, even though no local taxing jurisdiction or subdivision has
changed its tax rate or tax base;
(e) The purpose of providing mitigation to such jurisdictions is to
appropriately stabilize revenues before congressional or court action
which is needed to fully implement the agreement, and for a limited
time after congressional action, and to mitigate the unintended revenue
redistribution effect of the sourcing law changes among local
governments for a period of time as provided herein;
(f) Additionally, changes in sourcing laws may have negative
implications for industry sectors such as warehousing and
manufacturing, as well as jurisdictions that house a concentration of
these industries and have made zoning decisions, infrastructure
investments, bonding decisions, and land-use policy decisions based on
point of origin sales tax rules in place prior to this act; and
(g) It is in the best interest of the state and all its
subdivisions to fully mitigate the adverse effects of amending the
state's sales and use tax sourcing provisions to be in conformance with
the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.
(2) The legislature intends that the streamlined sales and use tax
mitigation account established in section 902 of this act have the
objective of replacing, for each negatively affected local taxing
jurisdiction, the net local sales and use tax revenue reductions
incurred as a result of section 501 of this act. Because the
mitigation account developed in section 902 of this act will be
affected by changing circumstances and changes in retail sales patterns
in given communities, the legislature additionally finds that the
department would benefit from the formation of an oversight committee
to provide assistance with assessing and evaluating the mitigation
account formulae on an annual basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account is created
in the state treasury and shall be used for the purpose of mitigating
the negative fiscal impacts to local taxing jurisdictions as a result
of section 501 of this act. The state treasurer shall transfer into
this account from the general fund amounts as prescribed in section 903
of this act.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2006, the state treasurer, as directed by the
department, shall distribute the funds in the streamlined sales and use
tax mitigation account without appropriation to cities, counties,
transportation authorities, regional transportation investment
districts, and public facilities districts in accordance with section
903 of this act.
(3) For purposes of this section and section 903 of this act, the
following definitions apply:
(a) "Local taxing jurisdiction" means counties, cities, or
transportation authorities under RCW 82.14.045, public facility
districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57 RCW, public transportation
benefit areas under RCW 82.14.440, and regional transportation
investment districts, that impose a sales and use tax under this
chapter.
(b) "Agreement" means the same as in RCW 82.58.010.
(c) "Net loss" means the local sales and use tax revenue loss to
local taxing jurisdictions resulting from the sourcing provisions in
section 501 of this act offset by any gains as a result of Washington
becoming a member state in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2006, in order to mitigate local sales and
use tax revenue losses as a result of this act, the state treasurer
shall transfer into the streamlined sales and use tax mitigation
account from the general fund the sum of twenty-eight million dollars.
Each July 1st thereafter, the state treasurer shall transfer an amount
from the general fund equivalent to the department's estimate of
cumulative net losses to local taxing jurisdictions into the
streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account.
(2) Each fiscal year, the department shall estimate the amount of
local sales and use tax net loss each local taxing jurisdiction
experiences as a result of this act using data from tax return
information and tax collections from fiscal years before and after the
effective date of this section. Using these estimates, the department
shall develop formulae to make distributions from the streamlined sales
and use tax mitigation account as necessary to mitigate the net loss to
local taxing jurisdictions resulting from this act. The department
will evaluate and revise the formulae each fiscal year.
(3) The department shall convene an oversight committee to assist
in the development and revision of the formulae each fiscal year. The
committee shall include one representative of a city whose revenues are
increased, one representative of a city whose revenues are reduced, one
representative of a county whose revenues are increased, one
representative of a county whose revenues are decreased, one
representative of a transportation authority under RCW 82.14.045 whose
revenues are increased, and one representative of a transportation
authority under RCW 82.14.045 whose revenues are reduced, as a result
of section 501 of this act.
(4) Distributions shall be made from the streamlined sales and use
tax mitigation account by the state treasurer, as directed by the
department, to each adversely affected local taxing jurisdiction an
amount representing their net loss, based on the formulae developed in
subsection (2) of this section, as such times as distributions are made
under RCW 82.14.060.
(5) If a distribution is made to an eligible local taxing
jurisdiction and the department determines that the amount distributed
exceeds the local taxing jurisdiction's actual local sales and use tax
reductions resulting from this act, the excess amount shall be deducted
from any tax collected under the authority of this chapter by the
eligible local taxing jurisdiction, and the deducted amount shall be
deposited into the streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account.
(6) The rule-making provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW do not apply to
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of gathering the data to develop the formulae in
section 903(2) of this act, the department of revenue may require
persons engaging within this state in the business of making sales at
retail to report additional information on a form prescribed by the
department, but no more than once every six months. The report is due
within thirty days of the date that the form is transmitted to the
taxpayer by the department of revenue.
(2) If the additional information to be filed by a taxpayer is not
received by the department of revenue by the due date, there shall be
assessed a penalty of five hundred dollars if the taxpayer is required
to report and remit sales tax on a quarterly or annual basis, or the
greater of five hundred dollars or one percent of the sales tax
reported on the taxpayer's return due the month the request for
additional information is due if the taxpayer is required to report and
remit the sales tax on a monthly basis.
(3) If the additional information is received by the department of
revenue by the due date, the taxpayer shall receive a credit against
the tax due under chapter 82.04 RCW in the amount of five hundred
dollars. In no case may a credit earned during one calendar year be
carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent
calendar year. No refunds may be granted for credits under this
section.
(4) If the department of revenue finds that the failure of a
taxpayer to provide the additional information required under this
section by the due date was the result of circumstances beyond the
control of the taxpayer, the department of revenue shall waive or
cancel any penalties imposed under this section.
(5) The penalties imposed under this section are in addition to any
other penalties authorized by law.

Sec. 905 RCW 82.32.330 and 2000 c 173 s 1 and 2000 c 106 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Disclose" means to make known to any person in any manner
whatever a return or tax information;
(b) "Return" means a tax or information return or claim for refund
required by, or provided for or permitted under, the laws of this state
which is filed with the department of revenue by, on behalf of, or with
respect to a person, and any amendment or supplement thereto, including
supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are supplemental to,
or part of, the return so filed;
(c) "Tax information" means (i) a taxpayer's identity, (ii) the
nature, source, or amount of the taxpayer's income, payments, receipts,
deductions, exemptions, credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax
liability deficiencies, overassessments, or tax payments, whether taken
from the taxpayer's books and records or any other source, (iii)
whether the taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be examined or
subject to other investigation or processing, (iv) a part of a written
determination that is not designated as a precedent and disclosed
pursuant to RCW 82.32.410, or a background file document relating to a
written determination, and (v) other data received by, recorded by,
prepared by, furnished to, or collected by the department of revenue
with respect to the determination of the existence, or possible
existence, of liability, or the amount thereof, of a person under the
laws of this state for a tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or
other imposition, or offense: PROVIDED, That data, material, or
documents that do not disclose information related to a specific or
identifiable taxpayer do not constitute tax information under this
section. Except as provided by RCW 82.32.410, nothing in this chapter
shall require any person possessing data, material, or documents made
confidential and privileged by this section to delete information from
such data, material, or documents so as to permit its disclosure;
(d) "State agency" means every Washington state office, department,
division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency;
(e) "Taxpayer identity" means the taxpayer's name, address,
telephone number, registration number, or any combination thereof, or
any other information disclosing the identity of the taxpayer; and
(f) "Department" means the department of revenue or its officer,
agent, employee, or representative.
(2) Returns and tax information shall be confidential and
privileged, and except as authorized by this section, neither the
department of revenue nor any other person may disclose any return or
tax information.
(3) The foregoing, however, shall not prohibit the department of
revenue from:
(a) Disclosing such return or tax information in a civil or
criminal judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:
(i) In respect of any tax imposed under the laws of this state if
the taxpayer or its officer or other person liable under Title 82 RCW
is a party in the proceeding; or
(ii) In which the taxpayer about whom such return or tax
information is sought and another state agency are adverse parties in
the proceeding;
(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the
director shall prescribe by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW, such return or tax information regarding a taxpayer to such
taxpayer or to such person or persons as that taxpayer may designate in
a request for, or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person,
at the taxpayer's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a
request for information or assistance made by the taxpayer to such
other person: PROVIDED, That tax information not received from the
taxpayer shall not be so disclosed if the director determines that such
disclosure would compromise any investigation or litigation by any
federal, state, or local government agency in connection with the civil
or criminal liability of the taxpayer or another person, or that such
disclosure would identify a confidential informant, or that such
disclosure is contrary to any agreement entered into by the department
that provides for the reciprocal exchange of information with other
government agencies which agreement requires confidentiality with
respect to such information unless such information is required to be
disclosed to the taxpayer by the order of any court;
(c) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been either issued or filed and remains outstanding for
a period of at least ten working days. The department shall not be
required to disclose any information under this subsection if a
taxpayer: (i) Has been issued a tax assessment; (ii) has been issued
a warrant that has not been filed; and (iii) has entered a deferred
payment arrangement with the department of revenue and is making
payments upon such deficiency that will fully satisfy the indebtedness
within twelve months;
(d) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been filed with a court of record and remains
outstanding;
(e) Publishing statistics so classified as to prevent the
identification of particular returns or reports or items thereof;
(f) Disclosing such return or tax information, for official
purposes only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state
agency, or to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing
with matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of
industry or the professions;
(g) Permitting the department of revenue's records to be audited
and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and
employees;
(h) Disclosing any such return or tax information to a peace
officer as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for
official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a
search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure
is for the purpose of criminal tax enforcement. A peace officer or
county prosecuting attorney who receives the return or tax information
may disclose that return or tax information only for use in the
investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the court
proceeding for which the return or tax information originally was
sought;
(i) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the proper
officer of the internal revenue service of the United States, the
Canadian government or provincial governments of Canada, or to the
proper officer of the tax department of any state or city or town or
county, for official purposes, but only if the statutes of the United
States, Canada or its provincial governments, or of such other state or
city or town or county, as the case may be, grants substantially
similar privileges to the proper officers of this state;
(j) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the Department
of Justice, the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms of the
Department of the Treasury, the Department of Defense, the United
States Customs Service, the Coast Guard of the United States, and the
United States Department of Transportation, or any authorized
representative thereof, for official purposes;
(k) Publishing or otherwise disclosing the text of a written
determination designated by the director as a precedent pursuant to RCW
82.32.410;
(l) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other tax
information, the taxpayer name, entity type, business address, mailing
address, revenue tax registration numbers, North American industry
classification system or standard industrial classification code of a
taxpayer, and the dates of opening and closing of business. This
subsection shall not be construed as giving authority to the department
to give, sell, or provide access to any list of taxpayers for any
commercial purpose;
(m) Disclosing such return or tax information that is also
maintained by another Washington state or local governmental agency as
a public record available for inspection and copying under the
provisions of chapter 42.17 RCW or is a document maintained by a court
of record not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;
(n) Disclosing such return or tax information to the United States
department of agriculture for the limited purpose of investigating food
stamp fraud by retailers;
(o) Disclosing to a financial institution, escrow company, or title
company, in connection with specific real property that is the subject
of a real estate transaction, current amounts due the department for a
filed tax warrant, judgment, or lien against the real property; ((or))
(p) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted
liability as a successor under RCW 82.32.140 return or tax information
pertaining to the specific business of the taxpayer to which the person
has succeeded; or
(q) Disclosing to a local jurisdiction which has contracted with
the department for the administration of its sales and use taxes under
RCW 82.14.050 tax information used to determine the increase or
decrease in the distribution to that local jurisdiction under RCW
82.14.060.
(4)(a) The department may disclose return or taxpayer information
to a person under investigation or during any court or administrative
proceeding against a person under investigation as provided in this
subsection (4). The disclosure must be in connection with the
department's official duties relating to an audit, collection activity,
or a civil or criminal investigation. The disclosure may occur only
when the person under investigation and the person in possession of
data, materials, or documents are parties to the return or tax
information to be disclosed. The department may disclose return or tax
information such as invoices, contracts, bills, statements, resale or
exemption certificates, or checks. However, the department may not
disclose general ledgers, sales or cash receipt journals, check
registers, accounts receivable/payable ledgers, general journals,
financial statements, expert's workpapers, income tax returns, state
tax returns, tax return workpapers, or other similar data, materials,
or documents.
(b) Before disclosure of any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4), the department shall, through written
correspondence, inform the person in possession of the data, materials,
or documents to be disclosed. The correspondence shall clearly
identify the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The
department may not disclose any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4) until the time period allowed in (c) of this
subsection has expired or until the court has ruled on any challenge
brought under (c) of this subsection.
(c) The person in possession of the data, materials, or documents
to be disclosed by the department has twenty days from the receipt of
the written request required under (b) of this subsection to petition
the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides for
injunctive relief. The court shall limit or deny the request of the
department if the court determines that:
(i) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure are
cumulative or duplicative, or are obtainable from some other source
that is more convenient, less burdensome, or less expensive;
(ii) The production of the data, materials, or documents sought
would be unduly burdensome or expensive, taking into account the needs
of the department, the amount in controversy, limitations on the
petitioner's resources, and the importance of the issues at stake; or
(iii) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure
contain trade secret information that, if disclosed, could harm the
petitioner.
(d) The department shall reimburse reasonable expenses for the
production of data, materials, or documents incurred by the person in
possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed.
(e) Requesting information under (b) of this subsection that may
indicate that a taxpayer is under investigation does not constitute a
disclosure of tax return or tax information under this section.
(5) Any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information
in the course of his or her employment with the department of revenue
and any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information as
provided under subsection (3)(f), (g), (h), (i), (j), ((or)) (n), or
(q) of this section, who discloses any such return or tax information
to another person not entitled to knowledge of such return or tax
information under the provisions of this section, is guilty of a
misdemeanor. If the person guilty of such violation is an officer or
employee of the state, such person shall forfeit such office or
employment and shall be incapable of holding any public office or
employment in this state for a period of two years thereafter.

PART X. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 (1) Sections 501, 502, and 901 through
905 of this act take effect the later of July 1, 2006, or the first day
of April, June, or October at least six months after the streamlined
sales and use tax agreement takes effect.
(2) Section 302 of this act takes effect when:
(a) The United States congress grants individual states the
authority to impose sales and use tax collection duties on remote
sellers; or
(b) It is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a
judgment not subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use
tax collection duties on remote sellers.
(3) Section 401 of this act takes effect when Washington becomes a
member state of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.
(4) The department shall provide notice of the effective date of
sections 302, 401, 501, 502, and 901 through 905 of this act to
affected taxpayers, the legislature, the code reviser, and others as
deemed appropriate by the department.

Sec. 1002 2003 c 168 s 902 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) If a court of competent jurisdiction enters a final judgment on
the merits that is based on federal or state law, is no longer subject
to appeal, and substantially limits or impairs the essential elements
of P.L. 106-252, 4 U.S.C. Secs. 116 through 126, or chapter 67, Laws of
2002, then chapter 67, Laws of 2002 is null and void in its entirety,
except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) ((If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 502, chapter 168, Laws of 2003 is null and void)) Subsection
(1) of this section does not apply to section 7, chapter 67, Laws of
2002 on or after the effective date of section 502 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003 Part headings used in this act are not
any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---