BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to phase out the
department of agriculture's practice of using funds from the fruit and
vegetable inspection account for the payment of the department's
general and overhead expenses. The legislature intends that the
department's general and overhead expenses are paid from the state's
general fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.17.240 and 2002 c 322 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The fruit and vegetable inspection account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All fees collected under this chapter
must be deposited into the account. Except as specifically authorized
by this subsection, the director may authorize expenditures from the
account solely for the implementation and enforcement of ((this chapter
and any other expenditures authorized by statute or session law and
applying specifically to the account)) the fruit and vegetable program.
For each fiscal year in the 2005-2007 biennium, the director may
authorize the use of up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the
account for payment of general and administrative expenses of the
department, but only if the use of the funds provides some benefit to
the fruit and vegetable inspection program. For each fiscal year in
the 2007-2009 biennium, the director may authorize the use of up to one
hundred twenty-five thousand dollars from the account for payment of
general and administrative expenses of the department, but only if the
use of the funds provides some benefit to the fruit and vegetable
inspection program. The account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.
The director shall establish and maintain an account within the
fruit and vegetable inspection account for each district established
under RCW 15.17.230.
(2) By August 1, 2004, and by August 1st of each even-numbered year
thereafter, the director shall review the balance of each of the
district accounts in the fruit and vegetable inspection account at the
end of the previous fiscal year. If the balance in the district
account exceeds the sum of the following: An amount equal to the total
expenditures of the district served by that account for the last six
months of that previous fiscal year; any budgeted capital expenditures
from the account for the current fiscal year; and six hundred thousand
dollars, the director shall temporarily and equally, on a percentage
basis, reduce each of the fees accruing to the district account until
such time that the district account has a balance equal to the amount
of the total expenditures from the account for the last seven months of
the previous fiscal year, at which time the fees shall be returned to
the amounts before the temporary reduction. In making the reductions,
the director shall attempt to reduce fees for a twelve-month period so
as to apply the reductions to as many of the persons who annually pay
fees for services provided by the district. The temporary fee
reductions shall be initially provided through the adoption of
emergency rules. The emergency and subsequent rules temporarily
reducing the fees are exempt from the requirements of RCW 34.05.310 and
chapter 19.85 RCW. These fees shall be reinstated through the
expiration of the rules temporarily reducing them and the authority to
reinstate them is hereby granted.

--- END ---