BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.280 and 1999 c 167 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person to carry onto, or to possess on,
public or private elementary or secondary school premises, school-provided transportation, or areas of facilities while being used
exclusively by public or private schools:
(a) Any firearm;
(b) ((Any other dangerous weapon as defined in RCW 9.41.250)) Any
air gun, including any air pistol or air rifle, designed to propel a
BB, pellet, or other projectile by the discharge of compressed air,
carbon dioxide, or other gas;
(c) Any device commonly known as "nun-chu-ka sticks", consisting of
two or more lengths of wood, metal, plastic, or similar substance
connected with wire, rope, or other means;
(d) Any device, commonly known as "throwing stars", which are
multi-pointed, metal objects designed to embed upon impact from any
aspect; ((or))
(e) ((Any air gun, including any air pistol or air rifle, designed
to propel a BB, pellet, or other projectile by the discharge of
compressed air, carbon dioxide, or other gas)) Any slung shot, sling
shot, sand club, billy club, blackjack, or metal knuckles, or any metal
baton, metal pipe, metal bar, or metal tool that could reasonably be
used as a club;
(f) Any object, instrument, device, or tool equipped with a blade,
sharp, or sharpened extension that could reasonably be used for
cutting, slicing, or stabbing, including but not limited to any knife,
dirk, dagger, sword, machete, razor with an unguarded blade, box
cutter, carpet cutter, ice pick, or screw driver;
(g) Any stun gun or other object, instrument, device, or tool
which, when applied to a person or animal, is designed to administer an
incapacitating electrical shock, charge, or impulse, including but not
limited to a projectile stun gun which projects wired probes attached
to a device that is capable of emitting an electrical charge;
(h) Any explosive, firework as defined in RCW 70.77.126, or object,
instrument, or device containing any poisonous or injurious gas,
liquid, or other such substance; or
(i) Any object, instrument, device, or tool which has the capacity
to inflict death or substantial bodily harm and, from the manner in
which it is used, attempted to be used, or threatened to be used, is
likely to produce or may easily and readily produce death or
substantial bodily harm.
(2) Any such person violating subsection (1) of this section is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor. If any person is convicted of a
violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person shall have
his or her concealed pistol license, if any revoked for a period of
three years. Anyone convicted under this subsection is prohibited from
applying for a concealed pistol license for a period of three years.
The court shall send notice of the revocation to the department of
licensing, and the city, town, or county which issued the license.
Any violation of subsection (1) of this section by elementary or
secondary school students constitutes grounds for expulsion from the
state's public schools in accordance with RCW 28A.600.010. An
appropriate school authority shall promptly notify law enforcement and
the student's parent or guardian regarding any allegation or indication
of such violation.
Upon the arrest of a person at least twelve years of age and not
more than twenty-one years of age for violating subsection (1)(a) of
this section, the person shall be detained or confined in a juvenile or
adult facility for up to seventy-two hours. The person shall not be
released within the seventy-two hours until after the person has been
examined and evaluated by the county-designated mental health
professional unless the court in its discretion releases the person
sooner after a determination regarding probable cause or on probation
bond or bail.
Within twenty-four hours of the arrest, the arresting law
enforcement agency shall refer the person to the county-designated
mental health professional for examination and evaluation under chapter
71.05 or 71.34 RCW and inform a parent or guardian of the person of the
arrest, detention, and examination. The county-designated mental
health professional shall examine and evaluate the person subject to
the provisions of chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW. The examination shall
occur at the facility in which the person is detained or confined. If
the person has been released on probation, bond, or bail, the
examination shall occur wherever is appropriate.
The county-designated mental health professional may determine
whether to refer the person to the county-designated chemical
dependency specialist for examination and evaluation in accordance with
chapter 70.96A RCW. The county-designated chemical dependency
specialist shall examine the person subject to the provisions of
chapter 70.96A RCW. The examination shall occur at the facility in
which the person is detained or confined. If the person has been
released on probation, bond, or bail, the examination shall occur
wherever is appropriate.
Upon completion of any examination by the county-designated mental
health professional or the county-designated chemical dependency
specialist, the results of the examination shall be sent to the court,
and the court shall consider those results in making any determination
about the person.
The county-designated mental health professional and county-designated chemical dependency specialist shall, to the extent
permitted by law, notify a parent or guardian of the person that an
examination and evaluation has taken place and the results of the
examination. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the delivery of
additional, appropriate mental health examinations to the person while
the person is detained or confined.
If the county-designated mental health professional determines it
is appropriate, the county-designated mental health professional may
refer the person to the local regional support network for follow-up
services or the department of social and health services or other
community providers for other services to the family and individual.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Any student or employee of a private military academy when on
the property of the academy;
(b) Any person engaged in military, law enforcement, or school
district security activities;
(c) Any person who is involved in a convention, showing,
demonstration, lecture, or firearms safety course authorized by school
authorities in which the firearms of collectors or instructors are
handled or displayed;
(d) Any person while the person is participating in a firearms or
air gun competition approved by the school or school district;
(e) Any person in possession of a pistol who has been issued a
license under RCW 9.41.070, or is exempt from the licensing requirement
by RCW 9.41.060, while picking up or dropping off a student;
(f) Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age legally in
possession of a firearm or dangerous weapon that is secured within an
attended vehicle or concealed from view within a locked unattended
vehicle while conducting legitimate business at the school;
(g) Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age who is in lawful
possession of an unloaded firearm, secured in a vehicle while
conducting legitimate business at the school; ((or))
(h) Any law enforcement officer of the federal, state, or local
government agency;
(i) Any person who has in his or her possession or control any
object, instrument, device, or tool for a school-related and school-approved project, exercise, class, activity, or event which has been
provided to the person by the school specifically for use in the
project, exercise, class, activity, or event, or which the person has
brought to school with the express prior permission of a teacher or
other school official for use in the school-related and school-approved
project, exercise, class, activity, or event;
(j) Any person who has in his or her possession or control any
object, instrument, device, or tool for a nonschool related project,
exercise, class, activity, or event which has been approved by the
school or the school district to be conducted on the school or school
district premises, and the object, instrument, device, or tool has been
provided to the person by the organization approved to use on the
school or school district premises specifically for use in the project,
exercise, class, activity, or event, or which the person has brought to
the school or school district premises with the express prior
permission of the organization approved to use on the school or school
district premises for use in the approved project, exercise, class,
activity, or event; or
(k) Any person in possession of tools that are secured within an
attended vehicle or concealed from view within a locked unattended
vehicle while conducting legitimate business at the school.
(4) Subsections (1)(c) and (d) of this section do not apply to any
person who possesses nun-chu-ka sticks, throwing stars, or other
dangerous weapons to be used in martial arts classes authorized to be
conducted on the school premises.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (3)(b), (c), (f), and (h) of
this section, firearms are not permitted in a public or private school
building.
(6) "GUN-FREE ZONE" signs shall be posted around school facilities
giving warning of the prohibition of the possession of firearms on
school grounds.

--- END ---