BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.76.220 and 2004 c 275 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning with the ((2005-2007)) 2007-2009 biennial capital
budget submittal and thereafter, the public four-year institutions, in
consultation with the council of presidents and the higher education
coordinating board, shall prepare a single prioritized individual
ranking of the individual projects proposed by the four-year
institutions as provided in subsection (2) of this section. As the
project ranking is developed, public four-year institutions shall
include staff from the office of financial management and the fiscal
committees of the legislature in their discussions.
(b) The public four-year institutions may aggregate minor works
project requests into priority categories without separately ranking
each minor project, ((provided that)) if these aggregated minor works
requests are ranked within the overall list, and if each project meets
the definition of minor works according to the capital budget
instructions developed by the office of financial management.
(c) All other individual projects shall be rated and ranked
according to a point system that incorporates the following priorities:
(i) Statewide priorities: The legislature shall, by concurrent
resolution, establish statewide priorities for capital projects for the
public four-year institutions. Statewide priorities may include, but
are not limited to, expanding capacity in particular academic programs,
addressing measurable unmet demand for expanded capacity in different
geographic regions of the state, implementing particular models of
service delivery, or improving alignment between operating and capital
budgets. The statewide priorities may also be incorporated into
performance contracts negotiated between the state and public four-year
institutions. The concurrent resolution shall provide guidance for the
allocation of points for projects that meet the statewide priorities.
(ii) Preservation: For repairs and improvements to existing
facilities and systems, the rating and ranking of individual projects
must be based first on the facility condition index for the building as
established by the joint legislative audit and review committee.
Institutions with a higher level of preservation shall receive a
greater number of points. Other criteria or factors ((that)) may
include, but are not limited to, the age and condition of buildings or
systems, the programmatic suitability of the building or system, and
the activity/occupancy level supported by the building or system.
(iii) Utilization: For projects creating new space or capacity,
the ratings and rankings of projects must be based first upon
((criteria or factors that include, but are not limited to, measuring
existing capacity and progress toward meeting increased space
utilization levels as determined)) the utilization of existing space as
measured by standards established by the higher education coordinating
board. Institutions with a higher level of space utilization shall
receive a greater number of points.
(d) The project ranking shall not be implemented by assigning an
equal number of overall points to each public four-year institution,
but shall reflect an assignment of points to individual projects based
on the priorities and criteria established under this section.
(2) The single prioritized four-year project list shall be approved
by the governing boards of each public four-year institution and shall
be submitted to the office of financial management and the higher
education coordinating board concurrent with the institution's
submittal of their biennial capital budget requests.
(3)(a) The higher education coordinating board, in consultation
with the office of financial management and the joint legislative audit
and review committee, shall develop common definitions that public
four-year institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall use in developing their project lists under this
section.
(b) As part of its duties under RCW 28B.76.210, the higher
education coordinating board shall, as part of its biennial budget
guidelines, disseminate, by December 1st of each odd-numbered year, the
criteria framework, including general definitions, categories, and
rating system, to be used by the public four-year institutions in the
development of the prioritized four-year project list. The criteria
framework shall specify the general priority order of project types
based on the priorities described in subsection (1) of this section and
other criteria determined by the board, in consultation with the public
four-year institutions.
(c) Under RCW 28B.76.210, the public four-year institutions shall
submit a preliminary prioritized four-year project list to the higher
education coordinating board by August 1st of each even-numbered year.
(d) The state board for community and technical colleges shall, as
part of its biennial capital budget request, submit a single
prioritized ranking of the individual projects proposed for the
community and technical colleges. The state board for community and
technical colleges shall submit an outline of the prioritized community
and technical college project list to the higher education coordinating
board under RCW 28B.76.210 by August 1st of each even-numbered year.
(4) The higher education coordinating board, in consultation with
the public four-year institutions, shall resolve any disputes or
disagreements arising among the four-year institutions concerning the
ranking of particular projects. Further, should one or more governing
boards of the public four-year institutions fail to approve the
prioritized four-year project list as required in this section, or
should a prioritized project list not be submitted by the public four-year institutions concurrent with the submittal of their respective
biennial capital budget requests as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, the higher education coordinating board shall prepare the
prioritized four-year institution project list itself.
(5) In developing any rating and ranking of capital projects
proposed by the two-year and four-year public universities and
colleges, the board:
(a) Shall be provided with available information by the public two-year and four-year institutions as deemed necessary by the board;
(b) May utilize independent services to verify, sample, or evaluate
information provided to the board by the two-year and four-year
institutions; and
(c) Shall have full access to all data maintained by the office of
financial management and the joint legislative audit and review
committee concerning the condition of higher education facilities.
(6) Beginning with the 2005-2007 biennial capital budget submittal,
the higher education coordinating board shall, in consultation with the
state board for community and technical colleges and four-year colleges
and universities, submit its capital budget recommendations and the
separate two-year and four-year prioritized project lists.

--- END ---