BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide for a stable source of funding for art museums, cultural
museums, heritage museums, the arts, and the performing arts in
counties with a population of more than one million. It is also the
intent of the legislature to protect investments in publicly owned
multipurpose arenas located in counties with a population of more than
one million. The legislature does not intend to authorize taxes to
finance an expansion of a publicly owned multipurpose arena in a county
with a population of more than one million.

--- END ---