BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.02.045 and 1993 c 281 s 63 are each amended to read
as follows:
The superintendent of each institution has the powers, duties, and
responsibilities specified in this section.
(1) Subject to the rules of the department, the superintendent is
responsible for the supervision and management of the institution, the
grounds and buildings, the subordinate officers and employees, and the
prisoners committed, admitted, or transferred to the institution.
(2) Subject to the rules of the department and the director of the
division of prisons or his or her designee and the Washington personnel
resources board, the superintendent shall appoint all subordinate
officers and employees.
(3) The superintendent, subject to approval by the secretary, has
the authority to determine the types and amounts of property that
convicted persons may possess in department facilities. This authority
includes the authority to determine the types and amounts that the
department will transport at the department's expense whenever a
convicted person is transferred between department institutions or to
other jurisdictions. Convicted persons are responsible for the costs
of transporting their excess property. If a convicted person fails to
pay the costs of transporting any excess property within ninety days
from the date of transfer, such property shall be presumed abandoned
and may be disposed of in the manner allowed by RCW 63.42.040 (1)
through (3). The superintendent shall be the custodian of all funds
and valuable personal property of convicted persons as may be in their
possession upon admission to the institution, or which may be sent or
brought in to such persons, or earned by them while in custody, or
which shall be forwarded to the superintendent on behalf of convicted
persons. All such funds shall be deposited in the personal account of
the convicted person and the superintendent shall have authority to
disburse moneys from such person's personal account for the personal
and incidental needs of the convicted person as may be deemed
reasonably necessary. When convicted persons are released from the
((confines)) custody of the ((institution)) department either on
parole, ((transfer)) community placement, community custody, community
supervision, or discharge, all funds and valuable personal property in
the possession of the superintendent belonging to such convicted
persons shall be delivered to them. In no case shall the state of
Washington, or any state officer, including state elected officials,
employees, or volunteers, be liable for the loss of such personal
property, except upon a showing that the loss was occasioned by the
intentional act, gross negligence, or negligence of the officer,
official, employee, or volunteer, and that the actions or omissions
occurred while the person was performing, or in good faith purporting
to perform, his or her official duties. Recovery of damages for loss
of personal property while in the custody of the superintendent under
this subsection shall be limited to the lesser of the market value of
the item lost at the time of the loss, or the original purchase price
of the item or, in the case of hand-made goods, the materials used in
fabricating the item.
(4) The superintendent, subject to the approval of the director of
the division of prisons and the secretary, shall make, amend, and
repeal rules for the administration, supervision, discipline, and
security of the institution.
(5) When in the superintendent's opinion an emergency exists, the
superintendent may promulgate temporary rules for the governance of the
institution, which shall remain in effect until terminated by the
director of the division of prisons or the secretary.
(6) The superintendent shall perform such other duties as may be
prescribed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---