BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Person" means an individual, partnership, franchise holder,
association, corporation, state, city, county, or a subdivision or
instrumentality of a state, and its employees, agents, or legal
representatives.
(2) "Tobacco products" means one or more cigarettes or cigars,
bidis, chewing tobacco, powdered tobacco, or any other tobacco
products.
(3) "Tobacco business" means a sole proprietorship, corporation,
limited liability company, partnership, or other enterprise in which
the primary activity is the sale, manufacture, or promotion of tobacco,
tobacco products, and accessories, either at wholesale or retail, and
in which the sale, manufacture, or promotion of other products is
merely incidental.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 It is unlawful for a person in the business
of manufacturing, distributing, or selling tobacco products, including
those selling tobacco products over the internet or through mail-order
sales, to deliver or cause to be delivered any tobacco products to a
person in this state except in a face-to-face transaction at the time
of purchase, unless the tobacco products being delivered are in a
container or in wrapping plainly and visibly marked on the exterior
with the word "tobacco products" and the delivery is made to one of the
following persons for purposes other than personal consumption by the
recipient:
(1) A person who holds a license under RCW 82.24.520 or 82.24.530;
(2) An export warehouse proprietor under chapter 52 of the internal
revenue code or an operator of a customs bonded warehouse; or
(3) A person who is an officer, employee, or agent of the United
States government, this state, or a department, agency,
instrumentality, or political subdivision of the United States or this
state, when the person is acting in accordance with his or her official
duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 It is unlawful for a person in the business
of manufacturing, distributing, or selling tobacco products, including
those selling tobacco products over the internet or through mail-order
sales, to deliver or cause to be delivered, any tobacco products to a
person in this state under eighteen years of age or to any home or
residence in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 It is unlawful for a person within the
jurisdiction of this state's laws, including all common carriers or
commercial delivery services, to knowingly transport tobacco products
on behalf of another person for commercial or business purposes to:
(1) A person in this state under eighteen years of age;
(2) A home or residence in this state; or
(3) A person in this state other than a person described in section
2 of this act. It is unlawful for a common or contract carrier to
knowingly transport cigarettes to a person in this state reasonably
believed by the carrier to be other than a person described in section
2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department of licensing shall make
public, by posting on the internet and by other means, a list of all
persons currently licensed or registered by the state as agents,
dealers, or distributors, as described in section 2 of this act.
(2) The department of licensing shall provide to the United States
postal service, common carriers, commercial delivery services operating
in the state, and any other persons that deliver tobacco products into
or in the state a copy of this chapter and a list of persons making or
offering tobacco product sales or deliveries in or into the state in
violation of this chapter. Ten days before putting a person on this
list, the department shall send notice to that person, by letter or e-mail, that the interstate seller is being placed on the department's
list with that notice including the text of this chapter. This list
shall be kept confidential by all parties that receive it and shall be
used only to comply with this chapter.
(3) It is unlawful for a person within the jurisdiction of this
state's laws that receives a list provided by the department of
licensing, under this section, to make any deliveries in the state on
behalf of a person who is identified by that list unless:
(a) The delivery service or other person making the delivery knows
or affirmatively believes in good faith that the package does not
contain tobacco products; or
(b) The delivery is made to a person lawfully engaging in the
business of distributing or selling tobacco products.
(4) A delivery service or other person receiving a list from the
department of licensing under this section:
(a) Has no obligation to inspect any package to determine whether
or not it contains tobacco products, determine whether the list
provided by a state is complete, accurate, or up to date, or determine
whether a person ordering a delivery is in compliance with this
chapter.
(b) Is not subject to a penalty for:
(i) Not making any specific delivery on behalf of a person on the
list provided under this section;
(ii) Establishing and following a policy of not making deliveries
in the state on behalf of a person on the list provided under this
section, not making deliveries of tobacco products in the state, or not
making deliveries of tobacco products in the state for a person, or for
a person not in the business of manufacturing, distributing, or selling
tobacco products.
(5) A delivery service or other person receiving a list from the
department of licensing under this section may collect an additional
fee from its customers that order deliveries of tobacco products in
order to cover any costs incurred by the delivery service or other
person related to complying with this chapter.
(6) A delivery service or other person receiving a list from the
department of licensing under this section is not subject to criminal
penalties for a violation of this chapter unless that violation is done
knowingly and for the specific purpose of:
(a) Assisting a person engaged in the business of manufacturing,
distributing, or selling tobacco products to violate this chapter; or
(b) Profiting from the violation of this chapter by another person.
(7) No employee of a delivery service or of another person making
deliveries on behalf of a delivery seller is subject to criminal
penalties or civil fines for violating this chapter unless that
violation is done knowingly and for the specific purpose of assisting
a person engaged in the business of manufacturing, distributing, or
selling tobacco products to violate this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This chapter does not apply to tobacco
product sales by an Indian tribe, as defined by 25 U.S.C. Sec. 450b(e),
or by members of the Indian tribe, to a consumer in this state if the
consumer is a verified adult member of the Indian tribe, and the buyer
and seller are located in Indian country, as defined by 18 U.S.C. Sec.
1151, that is owned or occupied by the Indian tribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A person who violates this chapter is
subject to a civil fine of not less than five hundred dollars and not
more than five thousand dollars or five times the value of the tobacco
products at issue, whichever is highest, for each violation.
(2) A person engaged in the business of manufacturing or selling
tobacco products who violates section 2 or 3 of this act must reimburse
the state and its political subdivisions for all unpaid taxes of the
state or its political subdivisions relating to the tobacco products at
issue, plus interest, and for any other damages.
(3) A person who violates this chapter must pay, in addition to any
other damages or penalties, an amount equal to any profits, gain, gross
receipts, or other benefits from the violation.
(4) Except as provided in section 5 of this act, a person who
knowingly violates section 2, 3, or 4 of this act shall be fined up to
five thousand dollars or ten times the value of the tobacco products at
issue, whichever is highest, or imprisoned for up to one year, or both
for a first violation, and fined not less than ten thousand dollars or
imprisoned for up to five years, or both for a second or subsequent
violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 An amount equal to fifty percent of all
criminal and civil penalties recovered by the state under section 7 of
this act shall be distributed to the state offices or agencies
responsible for enforcing this chapter or making related
investigations, in rough proportion to their participation in the
enforcement of this chapter and related investigations, solely to
increase and supplement, but not to replace, existing resources
supporting state efforts to enforce this chapter and to enforce other
state laws relating to contraband tobacco products, the collection of
taxes on tobacco products, and the prohibition of tobacco product sales
to persons under the legal minimum purchase age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 In an action brought to enforce this
chapter, the state may recover the costs of the investigation, costs of
the action, and reasonable attorneys' fees, plus interest. All
recovered costs and fees, plus interest, shall be directed to and
retained by the state agencies and offices that incurred the costs and
fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Tobacco products sold or delivered or
attempted to be sold or delivered in this state in a manner that does
not meet the requirements of this chapter shall be forfeited to the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Unless otherwise expressly provided, the
remedies or penalties provided by this chapter are cumulative to each
other, and to any other damages, remedies, penalties, or relief
available under this chapter or other laws of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The attorney general or his or her
designee may bring an action in the appropriate court in the state to
enforce this chapter, seek fines, penalties, and related damages and
equitable relief, or to prevent or restrain violations of this chapter
by a person, or any person controlling such person.
(2) Upon providing at least fifteen days' notice to the attorney
general, enforcement officials of any state political subdivision may
bring an action in the appropriate court in the state, or join an
action being brought by the attorney general or his or her designee, to
seek damages and equitable relief or to prevent or restrain violations
of this chapter by any person, or any person controlling such person.
(3) Upon providing at least fifteen days' notice to the attorney
general, a person who holds a valid permit under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5712,
may bring an action in the appropriate court in the state, or join an
action being brought by the attorney general or his or her designee, to
prevent or restrain violations of this chapter by a person, or any
person controlling such person.
(4) Upon receiving notice from a person of his or her intent to
bring an action under this chapter in the appropriate court in the
state, the attorney general or his or her designee may choose to join
in the other person's action or bring an action by the state in its
stead, and shall inform the person providing notice of how the attorney
general or the designee will proceed within fifteen days of receiving
the notice.
(5) The attorney general shall make public, by posting on the
internet and other means, a list of all actions taken to enforce this
chapter and a list of all persons found to have violated this chapter,
including those persons' names, addresses, and any other information
the attorney general believes may be useful to other jurisdictions
enforcing laws prohibiting or restricting tobacco product sales for
personal consumption in which the seller and buyer do not initiate and
complete the entire transaction when in each other's physical presence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---