BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the recreational
fishing community agreed to self tax itself in 2004 regarding the
Dungeness crab fishery in Puget Sound in order to assist the department
of fish and wildlife in increasing the accuracy in the harvest
estimates. Recreational fishing is one of the most popular outdoor
activities in the state of Washington. The legislature finds that
Dungeness crab fishing is a major component of the recreational fishing
experience in Puget Sound and the opportunity for quality recreational
fisheries has steadily declined partially due to the continued
inaccuracy of harvest estimates and a lack of timely receipt of harvest
estimate data. The legislature further finds that the department of
fish and wildlife has chosen to impose restrictions on the recreational
crab fishery in Puget Sound rather than to focus on the problem of
improving data accuracy and timeliness of obtaining that data. Thus,
the legislature finds that a reduction in the endorsement fee collected
by the department of fish and wildlife is necessary to maintain a
reasonable fee amount for the level of opportunity provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A license to take and possess Dungeness crab is only valid in
Puget Sound east of the Bonilla-Tatoosh line if the fisher has in
possession a valid catch record card officially endorsed for Dungeness
crab. The endorsement costs one dollar and fifty cents, including any
fees authorized under RCW 77.32.050, and deposited into the
recreational Dungeness crab endorsement account created in section 3 of
this act.
(2) Catch record cards issued with affixed temporary short-term
charter stamp licenses are not subject to the Dungeness crab
endorsement fee provided for in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The recreational Dungeness crab endorsement account is created in
the state treasury. All receipts from section 3 of this act must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only
for costs associated with the sampling, monitoring, and management of
catch associated with the Dungeness crab recreational fisheries.
Moneys appropriated under this section must supplement and not supplant
other federal, state, and local funds used for Dungeness crab
recreational fisheries management. Under no circumstances may moneys
from the account be used to backfill shortfalls in other state funding
sources.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.32.430 and 2004 c 107 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Catch record card information is necessary for proper
management of the state's food fish and game fish species and shellfish
resources. Catch record card administration shall be under rules
adopted by the commission. There is no charge for an initial catch
record card. Each subsequent or duplicate catch record card costs ten
dollars.
(2) ((A license to take and possess Dungeness crab is only valid in
Puget Sound waters east of the Bonilla-Tatoosh line if the fisher has
in possession a valid catch record card officially endorsed for
Dungeness crab. The endorsement shall cost no more than three dollars
including any or all fees authorized under RCW 77.32.050.
(3))) Catch record cards issued with affixed temporary short-term
charter stamp licenses are not subject to the ten-dollar charge ((nor
to the Dungeness crab endorsement fee)) provided for in this section.
Charter boat or guide operators issuing temporary short-term charter
stamp licenses shall affix the stamp to each catch record card issued
before fishing commences. Catch record cards issued with a temporary
short-term charter stamp are valid for two consecutive days.
(((4))) (3) The department shall include provisions for recording
marked and unmarked salmon in catch record cards issued after March 31,
2004.
(((5))) (4) The funds received from the sale of catch record cards
((and the Dungeness crab endorsement)) must be deposited into the
wildlife fund. ((The funds received from the Dungeness crab
endorsement may be used only for the sampling, monitoring, and
management of catch associated with the Dungeness crab recreational
fisheries. Moneys allocated under this section shall supplement and
not supplant other federal, state, and local funds used for Dungeness
crab recreational fisheries management.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---