BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that community
stadiums provide a venue for wholesome, affordable, family-oriented
activities, including minor league baseball. The legislature intends
to provide local governments with assistance to ensure that these
important venues remain available to Washington citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a city or town in which a minor
league baseball team plays in a community stadium may impose a tax of
up to one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof to be paid by the
person who pays an admission charge to the events in the minor league
baseball stadium. The tax authorized in this section may also be
imposed on any parking charges or fees imposed in parking facilities
associated with the community stadium. The revenue generated by the
tax imposed in this section shall be used solely for the purpose of
paying for the operation, maintenance, repair, rehabilitation,
financing, equipping, and reequipping of a community stadium and
associated parking facilities. The tax authorized in this section is
in addition to any other taxes on admission levied by the city.
(2) "Community stadium" is any public facility existing and in use
on the effective date of this act which provides a venue for community
events and may have a minor league baseball team affiliated with a
major league baseball club operating in it for at least a portion of
the previous two years.

--- END ---