BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.5225 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Payments for recipients eligible for medical assistance
programs under this chapter for services provided by hospitals,
regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment status, shall
be made based on allowable costs incurred during the year, when
services are provided by a rural hospital certified by the ((health
care financing administration)) centers for medicare and medicaid
services as a critical access hospital. Any additional payments made
by the medical assistance administration for the healthy options
program shall be no more than the additional amounts per service paid
under this section for other medical assistance programs.
(2) Beginning on the effective date of this section, a moratorium
shall be placed on additional hospital participation in critical access
hospital payments under this section. However, rural hospitals that
applied for certification to the centers for medicare and medicaid
services prior to January 1, 2005, but have not yet completed the
process or have not yet been approved for certification, remain
eligible for medical assistance payments under this section.

--- END ---