BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that access to safe,
affordable health care is one of the most important issues facing the
citizens of Washington state. The legislature further finds that the
rising cost of medical malpractice insurance has caused some
physicians, particularly those in high-risk specialties such as
obstetrics and emergency room practice, to be unavailable when and
where the citizens need them the most. The answers to these problems
are varied and complex, requiring comprehensive solutions that
encourage patient safety practices, increase oversight of medical
malpractice insurance, and making the civil justice system more
understandable, fair, and efficient for all the participants.
It is the intent of the legislature to prioritize patient safety
and the prevention of medical errors above all other considerations as
legal changes are made to address the problem of high malpractice
insurance premiums. Thousands of patients are injured each year as a
result of medical errors, many of which can be avoided by supporting
health care providers, facilities, and carriers in their efforts to
reduce the incidence of those mistakes. It is also the legislature's
intent to provide incentives to settle cases before resorting to court,
and to provide the option of a more fair, efficient, and streamlined
alternative to trials for those for whom settlement negotiations do not
work. Finally, it is the intent of the legislature to provide the
insurance commissioner with the tools and information necessary to
regulate medical malpractice insurance rates and policies so that they
are fair to both the insurers and the insured.

PART I - PATIENT SAFETYEncouraging Patient Safety Through Communications With Patients
Sec. 101 RCW 5.64.010 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In any civil action against a health care provider for personal
injuries which is based upon alleged professional negligence ((and
which is against:
(1) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or
related services, including, but not limited to, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatrist,
chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist, pharmacist, optician,
physician's assistant, osteopathic physician's assistant, nurse
practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive care paramedic,
including, in the event such person is deceased, his estate or personal
representative;
(2) An employee or agent of a person described in subsection (1) of
this section, acting in the course and scope of his employment,
including, in the event such employee or agent is deceased, his estate
or personal representative; or
(3) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in subsection (1)
of this section, including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic,
health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or an officer,
director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and scope of
his employment, including, in the event such officer, director,
employee, or agent is deceased, his estate or personal
representative;)), or in any arbitration or mediation proceeding
related to such civil action, evidence of furnishing or offering or
promising to pay medical, hospital, or similar expenses occasioned by
an injury is not admissible ((to prove liability for the injury)).
(2)(a) In a civil action against a health care provider for
personal injuries that is based upon alleged professional negligence,
or in any arbitration or mediation proceeding related to such civil
action, a statement, affirmation, gesture, or conduct identified in (b)
of this subsection is not admissible as evidence if:
(i) More than twenty days before commencement of trial it was
conveyed by a health care provider to the injured person, or to a
person specified in RCW 7.70.065(1); and
(ii) It relates to the discomfort, pain, suffering, injury, or
death of the injured person as the result of the alleged professional
negligence.
(b) (a) of this subsection applies to:
(i) Any statement, affirmation, gesture, or conduct expressing
apology, fault, sympathy, commiseration, condolence, compassion, or a
general sense of benevolence; or
(ii) Any statement or affirmation regarding remedial actions that
may be taken to address the act or omission that is the basis for the
allegation of negligence.

Encouraging Reports of Unprofessional Conduct or Lack of
Capacity to Practice Safely
Sec. 102 RCW 4.24.260 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 701 are each amended
to read as follows:
((Physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, dentists licensed
under chapter 18.32 RCW, and pharmacists licensed under chapter 18.64
RCW)) Any member of a health profession listed under RCW 18.130.040
who, in good faith, makes a report, files charges, or presents evidence
against another member of ((their)) a health profession based on the
claimed ((incompetency or gross misconduct)) unprofessional conduct as
provided in RCW 18.130.180 or inability to practice with reasonable
skill and safety to consumers by reason of any physical or mental
condition as provided in RCW 18.130.170 of such person before the
((medical quality assurance commission established under chapter 18.71
RCW, in a proceeding under chapter 18.32 RCW, or to the board of
pharmacy under RCW 18.64.160)) agency, board, or commission responsible
for disciplinary activities for the person's profession under chapter
18.130 RCW, shall be immune from civil action for damages arising out
of such activities. A person prevailing upon the good faith defense
provided for in this section is entitled to recover expenses and
reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in establishing the defense.

Medical Quality Assurance Commission Consumer Membership
Sec. 103 RCW 18.71.015 and 1999 c 366 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington state medical quality assurance commission is
established, consisting of thirteen individuals licensed to practice
medicine in the state of Washington under this chapter, two individuals
who are licensed as physician assistants under chapter 18.71A RCW, and
((four)) six individuals who are members of the public. At least two
of the public members shall not be from the health care industry and
shall be representatives of patient advocacy groups or organizations.
Each congressional district now existing or hereafter created in the
state must be represented by at least one physician member of the
commission. The terms of office of members of the commission are not
affected by changes in congressional district boundaries. Public
members of the commission may not be a member of any other health care
licensing board or commission, or have a fiduciary obligation to a
facility rendering health services regulated by the commission, or have
a material or financial interest in the rendering of health services
regulated by the commission.
The members of the commission shall be appointed by the governor.
Members of the initial commission may be appointed to staggered terms
of one to four years, and thereafter all terms of appointment shall be
for four years. The governor shall consider such physician and
physician assistant members who are recommended for appointment by the
appropriate professional associations in the state. In appointing the
initial members of the commission, it is the intent of the legislature
that, to the extent possible, the existing members of the board of
medical examiners and medical disciplinary board repealed under section
336, chapter 9, Laws of 1994 sp. sess. be appointed to the commission.
No member may serve more than two consecutive full terms. Each member
shall hold office until a successor is appointed.
Each member of the commission must be a citizen of the United
States, must be an actual resident of this state, and, if a physician,
must have been licensed to practice medicine in this state for at least
five years.
The commission shall meet as soon as practicable after appointment
and elect officers each year. Meetings shall be held at least four
times a year and at such place as the commission determines and at such
other times and places as the commission deems necessary. A majority
of the commission members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum
for the transaction of commission business.
The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the commission is
required to carry any motion or resolution, to adopt any rule, or to
pass any measure. The commission may appoint panels consisting of at
least three members. A quorum for the transaction of any business by
a panel is a minimum of three members. A majority vote of a quorum of
the panel is required to transact business delegated to it by the
commission.
Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.265 and in addition thereto shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the commission
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Any such expenses
shall be paid from funds appropriated to the department of health.
Whenever the governor is satisfied that a member of a commission
has been guilty of neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or
misfeasance in office, the governor shall file with the secretary of
state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from
office, and the secretary shall forthwith send a certified copy of the
statement of causes and order of removal to the last known post office
address of the member.
Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled for
the unexpired term by appointment by the governor.
The members of the commission are immune from suit in an action,
civil or criminal, based on its disciplinary proceedings or other
official acts performed in good faith as members of the commission.
Whenever the workload of the commission requires, the commission
may request that the secretary appoint pro tempore members of the
commission. When serving, pro tempore members of the commission have
all of the powers, duties, and immunities, and are entitled to all of
the emoluments, including travel expenses, of regularly appointed
members of the commission.

Health Care Provider Discipline
Sec. 104 RCW 18.130.160 and 2001 c 195 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon a finding, after hearing, that a license holder or applicant
has committed unprofessional conduct or is unable to practice with
reasonable skill and safety due to a physical or mental condition, the
disciplining authority may consider the imposition of sanctions, taking
into account any prior findings of fact under RCW 18.130.110, any
stipulations to informal disposition under RCW 18.130.172, and any
action taken by other in-state or out-of-state disciplining
authorities, and issue an order providing for one or any combination of
the following:
(1) Revocation of the license;
(2) Suspension of the license for a fixed or indefinite term;
(3) Restriction or limitation of the practice;
(4) Requiring the satisfactory completion of a specific program of
remedial education or treatment;
(5) The monitoring of the practice by a supervisor approved by the
disciplining authority;
(6) Censure or reprimand;
(7) Compliance with conditions of probation for a designated period
of time;
(8) Payment of a fine for each violation of this chapter, not to
exceed five thousand dollars per violation. Funds received shall be
placed in the health professions account;
(9) Denial of the license request;
(10) Corrective action;
(11) Refund of fees billed to and collected from the consumer;
(12) A surrender of the practitioner's license in lieu of other
sanctions, which must be reported to the federal data bank.
Except as otherwise provided in section 106 of this act, any of the
actions under this section may be totally or partly stayed by the
disciplining authority. In determining what action is appropriate, the
disciplining authority must first consider what sanctions are necessary
to protect or compensate the public. Only after such provisions have
been made may the disciplining authority consider and include in the
order requirements designed to rehabilitate the license holder or
applicant. All costs associated with compliance with orders issued
under this section are the obligation of the license holder or
applicant.
The licensee or applicant may enter into a stipulated disposition
of charges that includes one or more of the sanctions of this section,
but only after a statement of charges has been issued and the licensee
has been afforded the opportunity for a hearing and has elected on the
record to forego such a hearing. The stipulation shall either contain
one or more specific findings of unprofessional conduct or inability to
practice, or a statement by the licensee acknowledging that evidence is
sufficient to justify one or more specified findings of unprofessional
conduct or inability to practice. The stipulation entered into
pursuant to this subsection shall be considered formal disciplinary
action for all purposes.

Sec. 105 RCW 18.130.172 and 2000 c 171 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for those acts of unprofessional conduct specified in
section 106 of this act, prior to serving a statement of charges under
RCW 18.130.090 or 18.130.170, the disciplinary authority may furnish a
statement of allegations to the licensee or applicant along with a
detailed summary of the evidence relied upon to establish the
allegations and a proposed stipulation for informal resolution of the
allegations. These documents shall be exempt from public disclosure
until such time as the allegations are resolved either by stipulation
or otherwise.
(2) The disciplinary authority and the applicant or licensee may
stipulate that the allegations may be disposed of informally in
accordance with this subsection. The stipulation shall contain a
statement of the facts leading to the filing of the complaint; the act
or acts of unprofessional conduct alleged to have been committed or the
alleged basis for determining that the applicant or licensee is unable
to practice with reasonable skill and safety; a statement that the
stipulation is not to be construed as a finding of either
unprofessional conduct or inability to practice; an acknowledgement
that a finding of unprofessional conduct or inability to practice, if
proven, constitutes grounds for discipline under this chapter; and an
agreement on the part of the licensee or applicant that the sanctions
set forth in RCW 18.130.160, except RCW 18.130.160 (1), (2), (6), and
(8), may be imposed as part of the stipulation, except that no fine may
be imposed but the licensee or applicant may agree to reimburse the
disciplinary authority the costs of investigation and processing the
complaint up to an amount not exceeding one thousand dollars per
allegation; and an agreement on the part of the disciplinary authority
to forego further disciplinary proceedings concerning the allegations.
A stipulation entered into pursuant to this subsection shall not be
considered formal disciplinary action.
(3) If the licensee or applicant declines to agree to disposition
of the charges by means of a stipulation pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section, the disciplinary authority may proceed to formal
disciplinary action pursuant to RCW 18.130.090 or 18.130.170.
(4) Upon execution of a stipulation under subsection (2) of this
section by both the licensee or applicant and the disciplinary
authority, the complaint is deemed disposed of and shall become subject
to public disclosure on the same basis and to the same extent as other
records of the disciplinary authority. Should the licensee or
applicant fail to pay any agreed reimbursement within thirty days of
the date specified in the stipulation for payment, the disciplinary
authority may seek collection of the amount agreed to be paid in the
same manner as enforcement of a fine under RCW 18.130.165.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 A new section is added to chapter 18.130
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The disciplining authority shall revoke the license of a
license holder who is found, in three unrelated orders under RCW
18.130.110 in a ten-year period, to have engaged in three separate
courses of unprofessional conduct based upon any combination of the
following:
(a) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(4) that causes or substantially
contributes to the death of or severe injury to a patient or creates a
significant risk of harm to the public;
(b) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(6) that creates a significant
risk of harm to the public;
(c) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(7) that causes or substantially
contributes to the death of or severe injury to a patient or creates a
significant risk of harm to the public;
(d) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(9);
(e) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(17), except gross misdemeanors;
(f) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(23) that causes or
substantially contributes to the death of or severe injury to a patient
or creates a significant risk of harm to the public;
(g) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(24) based upon an act of abuse
to a client or patient; and
(h) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(24) based upon sexual contact
with a client or patient.
(2) For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, a ten-year
period commences upon the completion of all conditions and obligations
imposed for the acts identified in subsection (1)(a) through (h) of
this section.
(3) An order that includes a finding of mitigating circumstances
for an act of unprofessional conduct may be issued and, except for (a)
of this subsection, applied one time for any license holder or
applicant for a license, and if so, that order does not count as one of
the three orders that triggers a license revocation for purposes of
this section. A finding of mitigating circumstances under (a) of this
subsection may be issued and applied as many times as the license
holder meets the criteria for such a finding and does not count as one
of the three orders that triggers the revocation of a license for the
purposes of this section. Except for (a) of this subsection, after a
finding of mitigating circumstances is issued and applied, no
subsequent orders under this section may consider any mitigating
circumstances. The following mitigating circumstances may be
considered:
(a) For subsection (1)(a) of this section, the act involved a high-risk procedure, there was no lower-risk alternative to that procedure,
the patient was informed of the risks of the procedure and consented to
the procedure anyway, and prior to the institution of disciplinary
actions the license holder took appropriate remedial measures;
(b) There is a strong potential for rehabilitation of the license
holder; or
(c) There is a strong potential for remedial education and training
to prevent future harm to the public.
(4) Nothing in this section limits the ability of the disciplining
authority to impose any sanction, including revocation, for a single
violation of any subsection of RCW 18.130.180.
(5) Notwithstanding RCW 9.96A.020(1), revocation of a license under
this section is not subject to a petition for reinstatement under RCW
18.130.150.
(6) Revocation of a license under this section is subject to appeal
as provided in RCW 18.130.140.

Burden of Proof for License Suspension or Revocation
NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 The legislature finds that under the
Washington Constitution, the legislative branch of government has
plenary authority over medical practice and the right to set policy for
the disciplining of health care practitioners. While medical
professionals have a right to due process before their professional
license may be taken away, citizens have equally significant concerns
for protection against incompetent or dishonest practitioners. The
legislature further finds that in carefully balancing the interests of
all concerned, a substantial and significant evidence standard of proof
most appropriately calibrates the balance of interests between the
practitioner and the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 A new section is added to chapter 18.130
RCW to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided by statute or the provisions of this
section, the burden of proof in all proceedings brought under this
chapter is a preponderance of the evidence. In a disciplinary
proceeding under this chapter involving the suspension or revocation of
the license of a health care professional licensed under chapter 18.57
or 18.71 RCW, the burden of proof is substantial and significant
evidence. A substantial and significant evidence standard is a higher
standard of proof than a preponderance of the evidence standard and a
lower standard of proof than a clear and convincing evidence standard
and shall be based on the kind of evidence that reasonably prudent
persons are accustomed to relying on in the conduct of their affairs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 In the event that the Washington supreme
court or other court of competent jurisdiction rules or affirms that
section 108 of this act is unconstitutional, then the prescribed
standard of proof set forth in section 108 of this act takes effect
upon the ratification of a state constitutional amendment that empowers
the legislature to enact a standard of proof in health care
professional disciplinary proceedings or upon the enactment by the
United States congress of a law permitting such standard of proof,
whichever occurs first.

Increasing Patient Safety Through
Disclosure and Analysis of Adverse Events
NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adverse event" means any of the following events or
occurrences:
(a) An unanticipated death or major permanent loss of function, not
related to the natural course of a patient's illness or underlying
condition;
(b) A patient suicide while the patient was under care in the
hospital;
(c) An infant abduction or discharge to the wrong family;
(d) Sexual assault or rape of a patient or staff member while in
the hospital;
(e) A hemolytic transfusion reaction involving administration of
blood or blood products having major blood group incompatibilities;
(f) Surgery performed on the wrong patient or wrong body part;
(g) A failure or major malfunction of a facility system such as the
heating, ventilation, fire alarm, fire sprinkler, electrical,
electronic information management, or water supply which affects any
patient diagnosis, treatment, or care service within the facility; or
(h) A fire which affects any patient diagnosis, treatment, or care
area of the facility.
The term does not include an incident.
(2) "Ambulatory surgical facility" means any distinct entity that
operates exclusively for the purpose of providing surgical services to
patients not requiring hospitalization, whether or not the facility is
certified under Title XVIII of the federal social security act.
(3) "Childbirth center" means a facility licensed under chapter
18.46 RCW.
(4) "Correctional medical facility" means a part or unit of a
correctional facility operated by the department of corrections under
chapter 72.10 RCW that provides medical services for lengths of stay in
excess of twenty-four hours to offenders.
(5) "Department" means the department of health.
(6) "Health care worker" means an employee, independent contractor,
licensee, or other individual who is directly involved in the delivery
of health services in a medical facility.
(7) "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.
(8) "Incident" means an event, occurrence, or situation involving
the clinical care of a patient in a medical facility which:
(a) Results in unanticipated injury to a patient that is less
severe than death or major permanent loss of function and is not
related to the natural course of the patient's illness or underlying
condition; or
(b) Could have injured the patient but did not either cause an
unanticipated injury or require the delivery of additional health care
services to the patient.
The term does not include an adverse event.
(9) "Medical facility" means an ambulatory surgical facility,
childbirth center, hospital, psychiatric hospital, or correctional
medical facility.
(10) "Psychiatric hospital" means a hospital facility licensed as
a psychiatric hospital under chapter 71.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 (1) Each medical facility shall report to
the department the occurrence of any adverse event. The report must be
submitted to the department within forty-five days after occurrence of
the event has been confirmed.
(2) The report shall be filed in a format specified by the
department after consultation with medical facilities. It shall
identify the facility but shall not include any identifying information
for any of the health care professionals, facility employees, or
patients involved. This provision does not modify the duty of a
hospital to make a report to the department of health or a disciplinary
authority if a licensed practitioner has committed unprofessional
conduct as defined in RCW 18.130.180.
(3) Any medical facility or health care worker may report an
incident to the department. The report shall be filed in a format
specified by the department after consultation with medical facilities
and shall identify the facility but shall not include any identifying
information for any of the health care professionals, facility
employees, or patients involved. This provision does not modify the
duty of a hospital to make a report to the department of health or a
disciplinary authority if a licensed practitioner has committed
unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW 18.130.180.
(4) If, in the course of investigating a complaint received from an
employee of a licensed medical facility, the department determines that
the facility has not undertaken efforts to investigate the occurrence
of an adverse event, the department shall direct the facility to
undertake an investigation of the event. If a complaint related to a
potential adverse event involves care provided in an ambulatory
surgical facility, the department shall notify the facility and request
that they undertake an investigation of the event. The protections of
RCW 43.70.075 apply to complaints related to adverse events or
incidents that are submitted in good faith by employees of medical
facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 The department shall:
(1) Receive reports of adverse events and incidents under section
111 of this act;
(2) Investigate adverse events;
(3) Establish a system for medical facilities and the health care
workers of a medical facility to report adverse events and incidents,
which shall be accessible twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week;
(4) Adopt rules as necessary to implement this act;
(5) Directly or by contract:
(a) Collect, analyze, and evaluate data regarding reports of
adverse events and incidents, including the identification of
performance indicators and patterns in frequency or severity at certain
medical facilities or in certain regions of the state;
(b) Develop recommendations for changes in health care practices
and procedures, which may be instituted for the purpose of reducing the
number and severity of adverse events and incidents;
(c) Directly advise reporting medical facilities of immediate
changes that can be instituted to reduce adverse events and incidents;
(d) Issue recommendations to medical facilities on a facility-specific or on a statewide basis regarding changes, trends, and
improvements in health care practices and procedures for the purpose of
reducing the number and severity of adverse events and incidents.
Prior to issuing recommendations, consideration shall be given to the
following factors: Expectation of improved quality care,
implementation feasibility, other relevant implementation practices,
and the cost impact to patients, payers, and medical facilities.
Statewide recommendations shall be issued to medical facilities on a
continuing basis and shall be published and posted on the department's
publicly accessible web site. The recommendations made to medical
facilities under this section shall not be considered mandatory for
licensure purposes unless they are adopted by the department as rules
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW; and
(e) Monitor implementation of reporting systems addressing adverse
events or their equivalent in other states and make recommendations to
the governor and the legislature as necessary for modifications to this
chapter to keep the system as nearly consistent as possible with
similar systems in other states;
(6) Report no later than January 1, 2007, and annually thereafter
to the governor and the legislature on the department's activities
under this act in the preceding year. The report shall include:
(a) The number of adverse events and incidents reported by medical
facilities on a geographical basis and their outcomes;
(b) The information derived from the data collected including any
recognized trends concerning patient safety; and
(c) Recommendations for statutory or regulatory changes that may
help improve patient safety in the state.
The annual report shall be made available for public inspection and
shall be posted on the department's web site;
(7) Conduct all activities under this section in a manner that
preserves the confidentiality of documents, materials, or information
made confidential by section 113 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 When a report of an adverse event or
incident under section 111 of this act is made by or through a
coordinated quality improvement program under RCW 43.70.510 or
70.41.200, or by a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250,
information and documents, including complaints and incident reports,
created specifically for and collected and maintained by a quality
improvement committee for the purpose of preparing a report of an
adverse event or incident shall be subject to the confidentiality
protections of those laws and RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh).

Coordinated Quality Improvement Programs
Sec. 114 RCW 43.70.510 and 2004 c 145 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Health care institutions and medical facilities, other than
hospitals, that are licensed by the department, professional societies
or organizations, health care service contractors, health maintenance
organizations, health carriers approved pursuant to chapter 48.43 RCW,
and any other person or entity providing health care coverage under
chapter 48.42 RCW that is subject to the jurisdiction and regulation of
any state agency or any subdivision thereof may maintain a coordinated
quality improvement program for the improvement of the quality of
health care services rendered to patients and the identification and
prevention of medical malpractice as set forth in RCW 70.41.200.
(b) All such programs shall comply with the requirements of RCW
70.41.200(1) (a), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h) as modified to
reflect the structural organization of the institution, facility,
professional societies or organizations, health care service
contractors, health maintenance organizations, health carriers, or any
other person or entity providing health care coverage under chapter
48.42 RCW that is subject to the jurisdiction and regulation of any
state agency or any subdivision thereof, unless an alternative quality
improvement program substantially equivalent to RCW 70.41.200(1)(a) is
developed. All such programs, whether complying with the requirement
set forth in RCW 70.41.200(1)(a) or in the form of an alternative
program, must be approved by the department before the discovery
limitations provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section and the
exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and subsection (5) of this section
shall apply. In reviewing plans submitted by licensed entities that
are associated with physicians' offices, the department shall ensure
that the exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and the discovery
limitations of this section are applied only to information and
documents related specifically to quality improvement activities
undertaken by the licensed entity.
(2) Health care provider groups of five or more providers may
maintain a coordinated quality improvement program for the improvement
of the quality of health care services rendered to patients and the
identification and prevention of medical malpractice as set forth in
RCW 70.41.200. For purposes of this section, a health care provider
group may be a consortium of providers consisting of five or more
providers in total. All such programs shall comply with the
requirements of RCW 70.41.200(1) (a), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h)
as modified to reflect the structural organization of the health care
provider group. All such programs must be approved by the department
before the discovery limitations provided in subsections (3) and (4) of
this section and the exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and
subsection (5) of this section shall apply.
(3) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information
to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical
malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith,
participates on the quality improvement committee shall not be subject
to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such
activity. Any person or entity participating in a coordinated quality
improvement program that, in substantial good faith, shares information
or documents with one or more other programs, committees, or boards
under subsection (6) of this section is not subject to an action for
civil damages or other relief as a result of the activity or its
consequences. For the purposes of this section, sharing information is
presumed to be in substantial good faith. However, the presumption may
be rebutted upon a showing of clear, cogent, and convincing evidence
that the information shared was knowingly false or deliberately
misleading.
(4) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected, and maintained by a
quality improvement committee are not subject to discovery or
introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was
in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the
creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents
specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to
testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or
the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee.
This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the
discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that
is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of
any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the
testimony of any person concerning the facts that form the basis for
the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal
knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil
action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or
revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges,
introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by
quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d)
in any civil action challenging the termination of a contract by a
state agency with any entity maintaining a coordinated quality
improvement program under this section if the termination was on the
basis of quality of care concerns, introduction into evidence of
information created, collected, or maintained by the quality
improvement committees of the subject entity, which may be under terms
of a protective order as specified by the court; (e) in any civil
action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or
restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any and the
reasons for the restrictions; or (f) in any civil action, discovery and
introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records required by
rule of the department of health to be made regarding the care and
treatment received.
(5) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee are exempt
from disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.
(6) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information
and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by a quality improvement
committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 with one or
more other coordinated quality improvement programs maintained in
accordance with this section or with RCW 70.41.200 or a peer review
committee under RCW 4.24.250, for the improvement of the quality of
health care services rendered to patients and the identification and
prevention of medical malpractice. The privacy protections of chapter
70.02 RCW and the federal health insurance portability and
accountability act of 1996 and its implementing regulations apply to
the sharing of individually identifiable patient information held by a
coordinated quality improvement program. Any rules necessary to
implement this section shall meet the requirements of applicable
federal and state privacy laws. Information and documents disclosed by
one coordinated quality improvement program to another coordinated
quality improvement program or a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250 and any information and documents created or maintained as a
result of the sharing of information and documents shall not be subject
to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be respected as
required by subsection (4) of this section and RCW 4.24.250.
(7) The department of health shall adopt rules as are necessary to
implement this section.

Prescription Legibility
NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 The legislature finds that prescription
drug errors occur because the pharmacist or nurse cannot read the
prescription from the physician or other provider with prescriptive
authority. The legislature further finds that legible prescriptions
can prevent these errors.

Sec. 116 RCW 69.41.010 and 2003 c 257 s 2 and 2003 c 140 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a legend drug
whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the
body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the
practitioner.
(2) "Community-based care settings" include: Community residential
programs for the developmentally disabled, certified by the department
of social and health services under chapter 71A.12 RCW; adult family
homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW; and boarding homes licensed
under chapter 18.20 RCW. Community-based care settings do not include
acute care or skilled nursing facilities.
(3) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or
attempted transfer from one person to another of a legend drug, whether
or not there is an agency relationship.
(4) "Department" means the department of health.
(5) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order
for a legend drug and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the
proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging
necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.
(6) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.
(7) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a legend drug.
(8) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.
(9) "Drug" means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States
pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States,
or official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in man or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food, minerals or vitamins) intended to
affect the structure or any function of the body of man or animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any article
specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection. It does not include
devices or their components, parts, or accessories.
(10) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means
the communication of prescription information by computer, or the
transmission of an exact visual image of a prescription by facsimile,
or other electronic means for original prescription information or
prescription refill information for a legend drug between an authorized
practitioner and a pharmacy or the transfer of prescription information
for a legend drug from one pharmacy to another pharmacy.
(11) "In-home care settings" include an individual's place of
temporary and permanent residence, but does not include acute care or
skilled nursing facilities, and does not include community-based care
settings.
(12) "Legend drugs" means any drugs which are required by state law
or regulation of the state board of pharmacy to be dispensed on
prescription only or are restricted to use by practitioners only.
(13) "Legible prescription" means a prescription or medication
order issued by a practitioner that is capable of being read and
understood by the pharmacist filling the prescription or the nurse or
other practitioner implementing the medication order. A prescription
must be hand printed, typewritten, or electronically generated.
(14) "Medication assistance" means assistance rendered by a
nonpractitioner to an individual residing in a community-based care
setting or in-home care setting to facilitate the individual's self-administration of a legend drug or controlled substance. It includes
reminding or coaching the individual, handing the medication container
to the individual, opening the individual's medication container, using
an enabler, or placing the medication in the individual's hand, and
such other means of medication assistance as defined by rule adopted by
the department. A nonpractitioner may help in the preparation of
legend drugs or controlled substances for self-administration where a
practitioner has determined and communicated orally or by written
direction that such medication preparation assistance is necessary and
appropriate. Medication assistance shall not include assistance with
intravenous medications or injectable medications, except prefilled
insulin syringes.
(15) "Person" means individual, corporation, government or
governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust,
partnership or association, or any other legal entity.
(16) "Practitioner" means:
(a) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician
or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, a
dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon
under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a
registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed
practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW, an optometrist under chapter
18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010,
an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW, a
physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW, a naturopath licensed
under chapter 18.36A RCW, a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW, or,
when acting under the required supervision of a dentist licensed under
chapter 18.32 RCW, a dental hygienist licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(b) A pharmacy, hospital, or other institution licensed,
registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct
research with respect to, or to administer a legend drug in the course
of professional practice or research in this state; and
(c) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a
physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery in any
state, or province of Canada, which shares a common border with the
state of Washington.
(17) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

Medical Malpractice Premium Assistance
NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 The department of health shall develop, in
consultation with the department of revenue, a program to provide
business and occupation tax credits for physicians who serve uninsured,
medicare, and medicaid patients in a private practice or a reduced fee
access program for the uninsured and shall submit proposed legislation
to the legislature by December 15, 2006.

PART II - INSURANCE INDUSTRY REFORMMedical Malpractice Closed Claim Reporting
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Claim" means a demand for payment of a loss caused by medical
malpractice.
(a) Two or more claims, or a single claim naming multiple health
care providers or facilities, arising out of a single injury or
incident of medical malpractice is one claim.
(b) A series of related incidents of medical malpractice is one
claim.
(2) "Claimant" means a person filing a claim against a health care
provider or health care facility.
(3) "Closed claim" means a claim concluded with or without payment
and for which all administrative activity has been finalized by the
insuring entity or self-insurer.
(4) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner.
(5) "Health care facility" or "facility" means a clinic, diagnostic
center, hospital, laboratory, mental health center, nursing home,
office, surgical facility, treatment facility, or similar place where
a health care provider provides health care to patients.
(6) "Health care provider" or "provider" means a physician licensed
under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician licensed under
chapter 18.57 RCW, a podiatric physician licensed under chapter 18.22
RCW, a dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW, a chiropractor
licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW, an advance registered nurse
practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, a physician assistant
licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, and a naturopath licensed under
chapter 18.36A RCW.
(7) "Insuring entity" means:
(a) An insurer;
(b) A joint underwriting association;
(c) A risk retention group; or
(d) An unauthorized insurer that provides surplus lines coverage.
(8) "Medical malpractice" means a negligent act, error, or omission
in providing or failing to provide professional health care services
that is actionable under chapter 7.70 RCW.
(9) "Self-insurer" means any health care provider, facility, or
other individual or entity that assumes operational or financial risk
for claims of medical malpractice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 (1) Beginning January 1, 2007, every self-insurer or insuring entity that provides medical malpractice insurance
to any facility or provider in Washington state must report to the
commissioner any closed claim related to medical malpractice, if the
claim resulted in a final:
(a) Judgment in any amount;
(b) Settlement or payment in any amount; or
(c) Disposition of a medical malpractice claim resulting in no
indemnity payment on behalf of an insured.
(2) If a closed claim is not required to be reported by an insuring
entity or self-insurer and is not covered by insurance, the facility or
provider named in the claim must report the closed claim to the
commissioner if the claim resulted in a final:
(a) Judgment in any amount;
(b) Settlement or payment in any amount; or
(c) Disposition of a medical malpractice claim resulting in no
payment by the health care facility or health care provider.
(3) Reports under this section must be filed with the commissioner
within sixty days after the claim is closed by the insuring entity or
self-insurer.
(4)(a) The commissioner may impose a fine of up to two hundred
fifty dollars per day per case against any insuring entity that
violates the requirements of this section. The total fine per case may
not exceed ten thousand dollars.
(b) The department of health may impose a fine of up to two hundred
fifty dollars per day per case against any facility or provider that
violates the requirements of this section. The total fine per case may
not exceed ten thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 The reports required under section 202 of
this act must contain the following data in a form and with coding
prescribed by the commissioner for each claim:
(1) A unique number assigned to the claim by the insuring entity or
self-insurer to serve as an identifier for the claim;
(2) The type of health care provider, including the provider's
medical specialty; the type of facility, if any, and the location
within the facility where the injury occurred;
(3) The date of the event that resulted in the claim;
(4) The county or counties in which the event that resulted in the
claim occurred;
(5) The date the claim was reported to the insuring entity, self-insurer, facility, or provider;
(6) The date of suit, if filed;
(7) The claimant's age and sex;
(8) Specific information about the judgment or settlement
including:
(a) The date and amount of any judgment or settlement;
(b) Whether the settlement:
(i) Was the result of a judgment, arbitration, or mediation; and
(ii) Occurred before or after trial;
(c) For claims that result in a verdict or judgment that itemizes
damages:
(i) Economic damages, such as incurred and anticipated medical
expense and lost wages;
(ii) Noneconomic damages; and
(iii) Allocated loss adjustment expense, including but not limited
to court costs, attorneys' fees, and costs of expert witnesses;
(d) For claims that do not result in a verdict or judgment that
itemizes damages:
(i) Total damages; and
(ii) Allocated loss adjustment expense, including but not limited
to court costs, attorneys' fees, and costs of expert witnesses; and
(e) If there is no judgment or settlement:
(i) The date and reason for final disposition; and
(ii) The date the claim was closed; and
(9) The reason for the medical malpractice claim. The commissioner
shall use the same coding of reasons for malpractice claims as those
used for mandatory reporting to the national practitioner data bank, in
the federal department of health and human services, as provided in 42
U.S.C. Secs. 11131 and 11134, as amended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 The commissioner must prepare aggregate
statistical summaries of closed claims based on calendar year data
submitted under section 202 of this act.
(1) At a minimum, data must be sorted by calendar year and calendar
incident year. The commissioner may also decide to display data in
other ways.
(2) The summaries must be available by April 30th of each year.
(3) Information included in an individual closed claim report
submitted by an insurer or self-insurer under this chapter is
confidential, is exempt from public disclosure, and may not be made
available by the commissioner to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 Beginning in 2008, the commissioner must
prepare an annual report by June 30th that summarizes and analyzes the
closed claim reports for medical malpractice filed under section 202 of
this act and the annual financial reports filed by insurers writing
medical malpractice insurance in this state. The report must include:
(1) An analysis of closed claim reports of prior years for which
data are collected and show:
(a) Trends in the frequency and severity of claims payments;
(b) An itemization of economic and noneconomic damages;
(c) An itemization of allocated loss adjustment expenses;
(d) The types of medical malpractice for which claims have been
paid; and
(e) Any other information the commissioner determines illustrates
trends in closed claims;
(2) An analysis of the medical malpractice insurance market in
Washington state, including:
(a) An analysis of the financial reports of the insurers with a
combined market share of at least ninety percent of net written medical
malpractice premium in Washington state for the prior calendar year;
(b) A loss ratio analysis of medical malpractice insurance written
in Washington state; and
(c) A profitability analysis of each insurer writing medical
malpractice insurance;
(3) A comparison of loss ratios and the profitability of medical
malpractice insurance in Washington state to other states based on
financial reports filed with the national association of insurance
commissioners and any other source of information the commissioner
deems relevant;
(4) A summary of the rate filings for medical malpractice that have
been approved by the commissioner for the prior calendar year,
including an analysis of the trend of direct and incurred losses as
compared to prior years;
(5) The commissioner must post reports required by this section on
the internet no later than thirty days after they are due; and
(6) The commissioner may adopt rules that require insuring entities
and self-insurers required to report under section 202(1) of this act
to report data related to:
(a) The frequency and severity of open claims for the reporting
period;
(b) The aggregate amounts reserved for incurred claims;
(c) Changes in reserves from the previous reporting period; and
(d) Any other information that helps the commissioner monitor
losses and claims development in the Washington state medical
malpractice insurance market.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 The commissioner shall adopt all rules
needed to implement this chapter. The rules shall identify which
insuring entity or self-insurer has the primary obligation to report a
closed claim when more than one insuring entity or self-insurer is
providing medical malpractice liability coverage to a single health
care provider or a single health care facility that has been named in
a claim. The rules may also specify standards and methodology for the
reporting by the insuring entities and self-insurers. To ensure that
claimants, health care providers, health care facilities, and self-insurers cannot be individually identified when data is disclosed to
the public, the commissioner shall adopt rules that require the
protection of information that, in combination, could result in the
ability to identify the claimant, health care provider, health care
facility, or self-insurer in a particular claim or collection of
claims.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In any action filed under this chapter that results in a final:
(1) Judgment in any amount;
(2) Settlement or payment in any amount; or
(3) Disposition resulting in no indemnity payment,
the claimant or his or her attorney shall report to the office of the
insurance commissioner on forms provided by the commissioner any court
costs, attorneys' fees, or costs of expert witnesses incurred in
pursuing the action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 If the national association of insurance
commissioners adopts model medical malpractice reporting standards, the
insurance commissioner must analyze the model standards and report to
the legislature on or before the December 1st subsequent to the
adoption of the model standards. The report must include an analysis
of any differences between the model standards and sections 201 through
206 of this act and make recommendations, if any, regarding possible
legislative changes. The report must be made to the house of
representatives committees on health care; financial institutions and
insurance; and judiciary and the senate committees on health and long-term care; financial institutions, housing and consumer protection; and
judiciary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 A new section is added to chapter 42.17
RCW to read as follows:
Information in a closed claim report filed under section 203 of
this act that alone or in combination could result in the ability to
identify a claimant, health care provider, health care facility, or
self-insurer involved in a particular claim is exempt from disclosure
under this chapter.

Underwriting Standards
NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 A new section is added to chapter 48.19
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "underwrite" means the
process of selecting, rejecting, or pricing a risk, and includes each
of these processes:
(a) Evaluation, selection, and classification of risk;
(b) Application of rates, rating rules, and classification plans to
risks that are accepted; and
(c) Determining eligibility for:
(i) Coverage provisions;
(ii) Providing or limiting the amount of coverage or policy limits;
or
(iii) Premium payment plans.
(2) Each medical malpractice insurer must file its underwriting
rules, guidelines, criteria, standards, or other information the
insurer uses to underwrite medical malpractice coverage. However, an
insurer is excluded from this requirement if the insurer is ordered
into rehabilitation under chapter 48.31 or 48.99 RCW.
(a) Every filing of underwriting information must identify and
explain:
(i) The class, type, and extent of coverage provided by the
insurer;
(ii) Any changes that have occurred to the underwriting standards;
and
(iii) How underwriting changes are expected to affect future
losses.
(b) The information under (a) of this subsection must be filed with
the commissioner at least thirty days before it becomes effective and
is subject to public disclosure upon receipt by the commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 A new section is added to chapter 48.18
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Adverse action" includes, but is not limited to, the
following:
(i) Cancellation, denial, or nonrenewal of medical malpractice
insurance coverage;
(ii) Charging a higher insurance premium for medical malpractice
insurance than would have been charged, whether the charge is by any of
the following:
(A) Application of a rating rule;
(B) Assignment to a rating tier that does not have the lowest
available rates; or
(C) Placement with an affiliate company that does not offer the
lowest rates available to the insured within the affiliate group of
insurance companies; or
(iii) Any reduction or adverse or unfavorable change in the terms
of coverage or amount of any medical malpractice insurance, including,
but not limited to, the following: Coverage provided to the insured
health care provider is not as broad in scope as coverage requested by
the insured health care provider but is available to other insured
health care providers of the insurer or any affiliate.
(b) "Affiliate" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.31B.005(1).
(c) "Claim" means a demand for payment by an allegedly injured
third party under the terms and conditions of an insurance contract.
(d) "Tier" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.18.545(1)(h).
(2) When an insurer takes adverse action against an insured, the
insurer may consider the following factors only in combination with
other substantive underwriting factors:
(a) An insured has inquired about the nature or scope of coverage
under a medical malpractice insurance policy;
(b) An insured has notified the insurer, pursuant to the provisions
of the insurance contract, about a potential claim, which did not
ultimately result in the filing of a claim; or
(c) A claim was closed without payment.

Cancellation or Nonrenewal of Liability Insurance Policies
Sec. 212 RCW 48.18.290 and 1997 c 85 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Cancellation by the insurer of any policy which by its terms is
cancellable at the option of the insurer, or of any binder based on
such policy which does not contain a clearly stated expiration date,
may be effected as to any interest only upon compliance with the
following:
(a)(i) For policies other than medical malpractice liability
insurance: Written notice of such cancellation, accompanied by the
actual reason therefor, must be actually delivered or mailed to the
named insured not less than forty-five days prior to the effective date
of the cancellation ((except for cancellation of insurance policies
for));
(ii) For policies that provide medical malpractice liability
insurance: Written notice of such cancellation, accompanied by the
actual reason therefore, must be actually delivered or mailed to the
named insured not less than ninety days prior to the effective date of
the cancellation;
(iii) For policies canceled due to nonpayment of premiums,
((which)) written notice ((shall be)) must be actually delivered or
mailed to the named insured not less than ten days prior to ((such date
and except for cancellation of fire insurance policies)) the effective
date of the cancellation; and
(iv) For fire insurance policies canceled under chapter 48.53 RCW,
((which)) written notice ((shall not be)) must be actually delivered or
mailed to the named insured not less than five days prior to ((such
date)) the effective date of the cancellation;
(b) Like notice must also be so delivered or mailed to each
mortgagee, pledgee, or other person shown by the policy to have an
interest in any loss which may occur thereunder. For purposes of this
subsection (1)(b), "delivered" includes electronic transmittal,
facsimile, or personal delivery.
(2) The mailing of any such notice shall be effected by depositing
it in a sealed envelope, directed to the addressee at his or her last
address as known to the insurer or as shown by the insurer's records,
with proper prepaid postage affixed, in a letter depository of the
United States post office. The insurer shall retain in its records any
such item so mailed, together with its envelope, which was returned by
the post office upon failure to find, or deliver the mailing to, the
addressee.
(3) The affidavit of the individual making or supervising such a
mailing, shall constitute prima facie evidence of such facts of the
mailing as are therein affirmed.
(4) The portion of any premium paid to the insurer on account of
the policy, unearned because of the cancellation and in amount as
computed on the pro rata basis, must be actually paid to the insured or
other person entitled thereto as shown by the policy or by any
endorsement thereon, or be mailed to the insured or such person as soon
as possible, and no later than forty-five days after the date of notice
of cancellation to the insured for homeowners', dwelling fire, and
private passenger auto. Any such payment may be made by cash, or by
check, bank draft, or money order.
(5) This section shall not apply to contracts of life or disability
insurance without provision for cancellation prior to the date to which
premiums have been paid, or to contracts of insurance procured under
the provisions of chapter 48.15 RCW.

Sec. 213 RCW 48.18.2901 and 2002 c 347 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each insurer shall be required to renew any contract of
insurance subject to RCW 48.18.290 unless one of the following
situations exists:
(a) The insurer gives the named insured at least forty-five or
ninety days' notice in writing as provided for in RCW 48.18.290(1)(a)
(i) or (ii), that it ((proposes to refuse to renew)) will not renew the
insurance contract upon its expiration date; and sets forth in that
writing the actual reason for refusing to renew;
(b) At least twenty days prior to its expiration date, the insurer
has communicated, either directly or through its agent, its willingness
to renew in writing to the named insured and has included in that
writing a statement of the amount of the premium or portion thereof
required to be paid by the insured to renew the policy, and the insured
fails to discharge when due his or her obligation in connection with
the payment of such premium or portion thereof;
(c) The insured has procured equivalent coverage prior to the
expiration of the policy period;
(d) The contract is evidenced by a written binder containing a
clearly stated expiration date which has expired according to its
terms; or
(e) The contract clearly states that it is not renewable, and is
for a specific line, subclassification, or type of coverage that is not
offered on a renewable basis. This subsection (1)(e) does not restrict
the authority of the insurance commissioner under this code.
(2) Any insurer failing to include in the notice required by
subsection (1)(b) of this section the amount of any increased premium
resulting from a change of rates and an explanation of any change in
the contract provisions shall renew the policy if so required by that
subsection according to the rates and contract provisions applicable to
the expiring policy. However, renewal based on the rates and contract
provisions applicable to the expiring policy shall not prevent the
insurer from making changes in the rates and/or contract provisions of
the policy once during the term of its renewal after at least twenty
days' advance notice of such change has been given to the named
insured.
(3) Renewal of a policy shall not constitute a waiver or estoppel
with respect to grounds for cancellation which existed before the
effective date of such renewal, or with respect to cancellation of fire
policies under chapter 48.53 RCW.
(4) "Renewal" or "to renew" means the issuance and delivery by an
insurer of a contract of insurance replacing at the end of the contract
period a contract of insurance previously issued and delivered by the
same insurer, or the issuance and delivery of a certificate or notice
extending the term of a contract beyond its policy period or term.
However, (a) any contract of insurance with a policy period or term of
six months or less whether or not made continuous for successive terms
upon the payment of additional premiums shall for the purpose of RCW
48.18.290 and 48.18.293 through 48.18.295 be considered as if written
for a policy period or term of six months; and (b) any policy written
for a term longer than one year or any policy with no fixed expiration
date, shall, for the purpose of RCW 48.18.290 and 48.18.293 through
48.18.295, be considered as if written for successive policy periods or
terms of one year.
(5) A midterm blanket reduction in rate, approved by the
commissioner, for medical malpractice insurance shall not be considered
a renewal for purposes of this section.

Prior Approval of Medical Malpractice Insurance Rates
Sec. 214 RCW 48.18.100 and 2005 c 223 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No insurance policy form or application form where written
application is required and is to be attached to the policy, or printed
life or disability rider or endorsement form may be issued, delivered,
or used unless it has been filed with and approved by the commissioner.
This section does not apply to:
(a) Surety bond forms;
(b) Forms filed under RCW 48.18.103;
(c) Forms exempted from filing requirements by the commissioner
under RCW 48.18.103;
(d) Manuscript policies, riders, or endorsements of unique
character designed for and used with relation to insurance upon a
particular subject; or
(e) Contracts of insurance procured under the provisions of chapter
48.15 RCW.
(2) Every such filing containing a certification, in a form
approved by the commissioner, by either the chief executive officer of
the insurer or by an actuary who is a member of the American academy of
actuaries, attesting that the filing complies with Title 48 RCW and
Title 284 of the Washington Administrative Code, may be used by the
insurer immediately after filing with the commissioner. The
commissioner may order an insurer to cease using a certified form upon
the grounds set forth in RCW 48.18.110. This subsection does not apply
to certain types of policy forms designated by the commissioner by
rule.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 48.18.103, every filing that does not
contain a certification pursuant to subsection (2) of this section must
be made not less than thirty days in advance of issuance, delivery, or
use. At the expiration of the thirty days, the filed form shall be
deemed approved unless prior thereto it has been affirmatively approved
or disapproved by order of the commissioner. The commissioner may
extend by not more than an additional fifteen days the period within
which he or she may affirmatively approve or disapprove any form, by
giving notice of the extension before expiration of the initial thirty-day period. At the expiration of the period that has been extended,
and in the absence of prior affirmative approval or disapproval, the
form shall be deemed approved. The commissioner may withdraw any
approval at any time for cause. By approval of any form for immediate
use, the commissioner may waive any unexpired portion of the initial
thirty-day waiting period.
(4) The commissioner's order disapproving any form or withdrawing
a previous approval must state the grounds for disapproval.
(5) No form may knowingly be issued or delivered as to which the
commissioner's approval does not then exist.
(6) The commissioner may, by rule, exempt from the requirements of
this section any class or type of insurance policy forms if filing and
approval is not desirable or necessary for the protection of the
public.
(7) Every member or subscriber to a rating organization must adhere
to the form filings made on its behalf by the organization. Deviations
from the organization are permitted only when filed with the
commissioner in accordance with this chapter.
(8) Medical malpractice insurance form filings are subject to the
provisions of this section.

Sec. 215 RCW 48.18.103 and 2005 c 223 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to assist the purchasers of
commercial property casualty insurance by allowing policies to be
issued more expeditiously and provide a more competitive market for
forms.
(2) Commercial property casualty policies may be issued prior to
filing the forms.
(3) All commercial property casualty forms must be filed with the
commissioner within thirty days after an insurer issues any policy
using them. This subsection does not apply to:
(a) Types or classes of forms that the commissioner exempts from
filing by rule; and
(b) Manuscript policies, riders, or endorsements of unique
character designed for and used with relation to insurance upon a
particular subject.
(4) If, within thirty days after a commercial property casualty
form has been filed, the commissioner finds that the form does not meet
the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner shall disapprove the
form and give notice to the insurer or rating organization that made
the filing, specifying how the form fails to meet the requirements and
stating when, within a reasonable period thereafter, the form shall be
deemed no longer effective. The commissioner may extend the time for
review an additional fifteen days by giving notice to the insurer prior
to the expiration of the original thirty-day period.
(5) Upon a final determination of a disapproval of a policy form
under subsection (4) of this section, the insurer must amend any
previously issued disapproved form by endorsement to comply with the
commissioner's disapproval.
(6) For purposes of this section, "commercial property casualty"
means insurance pertaining to a business, profession, occupation,
nonprofit organization, or public entity for the lines of property and
casualty insurance defined in RCW 48.11.040, 48.11.050, 48.11.060, or
48.11.070, but does not mean medical malpractice insurance.
(7) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the
disapproval shall not affect any contract made or issued prior to the
expiration of the period set forth in the notice of disapproval.
(8) Every member or subscriber to a rating organization must adhere
to the form filings made on its behalf by the organization. An insurer
may deviate from forms filed on its behalf by an organization only if
the insurer files the forms with the commissioner in accordance with
this chapter.
(9) In the event a hearing is held on the actions of the
commissioner under subsection (4) of this section, the burden of proof
shall be on the commissioner.

Sec. 216 RCW 48.19.043 and 2003 c 248 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to assist the purchasers of
commercial property casualty insurance by allowing policies to be
issued more expeditiously and provide a more competitive market for
rates.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 48.19.040(1), commercial
property casualty policies may be issued prior to filing the rates.
All commercial property casualty rates shall be filed with the
commissioner within thirty days after an insurer issues any policy
using them.
(3) If, within thirty days after a commercial property casualty
rate has been filed, the commissioner finds that the rate does not meet
the requirements of this chapter, the commissioner shall disapprove the
filing and give notice to the insurer or rating organization that made
the filing, specifying how the filing fails to meet the requirements
and stating when, within a reasonable period thereafter, the filing
shall be deemed no longer effective. The commissioner may extend the
time for review another fifteen days by giving notice to the insurer
prior to the expiration of the original thirty-day period.
(4) Upon a final determination of a disapproval of a rate filing
under subsection (3) of this section, the insurer shall issue an
endorsement changing the rate to comply with the commissioner's
disapproval from the date the rate is no longer effective.
(5) For purposes of this section, "commercial property casualty"
means insurance pertaining to a business, profession, occupation,
nonprofit organization, or public entity for the lines of property and
casualty insurance defined in RCW 48.11.040, 48.11.050, 48.11.060, or
48.11.070, but does not mean medical malpractice insurance.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
disapproval shall not affect any contract made or issued prior to the
expiration of the period set forth in the notice of disapproval.
(7) In the event a hearing is held on the actions of the
commissioner under subsection (3) of this section, the burden of proof
is on the commissioner.

Sec. 217 RCW 48.19.060 and 1997 c 428 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall review a filing as soon as reasonably
possible after made, to determine whether it meets the requirements of
this chapter.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 48.19.070 and 48.19.043:
(a) No such filing shall become effective within thirty days after
the date of filing with the commissioner, which period may be extended
by the commissioner for an additional period not to exceed fifteen days
if he or she gives notice within such waiting period to the insurer or
rating organization which made the filing that he or she needs such
additional time for the consideration of the filing. The commissioner
may, upon application and for cause shown, waive such waiting period or
part thereof as to a filing that he or she has not disapproved.
(b) A filing shall be deemed to meet the requirements of this
chapter unless disapproved by the commissioner within the waiting
period or any extension thereof.
(3) Medical malpractice insurance rate filings are subject to the
provisions of this section.

PART III - HEALTH CARE LIABILITY REFORMStatutes of Limitations and Repose
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 The purpose of this section and section
302 of this act is to respond to the court's decision in DeYoung v.
Providence Medical Center, 136 Wn.2d 136 (1998), by expressly stating
the legislature's rationale for the eight-year statute of repose in RCW
4.16.350.
The legislature recognizes that the eight-year statute of repose
alone may not solve the crisis in the medical insurance industry.
However, to the extent that the eight-year statute of repose has an
effect on medical malpractice insurance, that effect will tend to
reduce rather than increase the cost of malpractice insurance.
Whether or not the statute of repose has the actual effect of
reducing insurance costs, the legislature finds it will provide
protection against claims, however few, that are stale, based on
untrustworthy evidence, or that place undue burdens on defendants.
In accordance with the court's opinion in DeYoung, the legislature
further finds that compelling even one defendant to answer a stale
claim is a substantial wrong, and setting an outer limit to the
operation of the discovery rule is an appropriate aim.
The legislature further finds that an eight-year statute of repose
is a reasonable time period in light of the need to balance the
interests of injured plaintiffs and the health care industry.
The legislature intends to reenact RCW 4.16.350 with respect to the
eight-year statute of repose and specifically set forth for the court
the legislature's legitimate rationale for adopting the eight-year
statute of repose. The legislature further intends that the eight-year
statute of repose reenacted by section 302 of this act be applied to
actions commenced on or after the effective date of this act.

Sec. 302 RCW 4.16.350 and 1998 c 147 s 1 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
Any civil action for damages for injury occurring as a result of
health care which is provided after June 25, 1976 against:
(1) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or
related services, including, but not limited to, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician
and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist,
pharmacist, optician, physician's assistant, osteopathic physician's
assistant, nurse practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive
care paramedic, including, in the event such person is deceased, his
estate or personal representative;
(2) An employee or agent of a person described in subsection (1) of
this section, acting in the course and scope of his employment,
including, in the event such employee or agent is deceased, his estate
or personal representative; or
(3) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in subsection (1)
of this section, including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic,
health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or an officer,
director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and scope of
his employment, including, in the event such officer, director,
employee, or agent is deceased, his estate or personal representative;
based upon alleged professional negligence shall be commenced within
three years of the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury or
condition, or one year of the time the patient or his representative
discovered or reasonably should have discovered that the injury or
condition was caused by said act or omission, whichever period expires
later, except that in no event shall an action be commenced more than
eight years after said act or omission: PROVIDED, That the time for
commencement of an action is tolled upon proof of fraud, intentional
concealment, or the presence of a foreign body not intended to have a
therapeutic or diagnostic purpose or effect, until the date the patient
or the patient's representative has actual knowledge of the act of
fraud or concealment, or of the presence of the foreign body; the
patient or the patient's representative has one year from the date of
the actual knowledge in which to commence a civil action for damages.
For purposes of this section, notwithstanding RCW 4.16.190, the
knowledge of a custodial parent or guardian shall be imputed to a
person under the age of eighteen years, and such imputed knowledge
shall operate to bar the claim of such minor to the same extent that
the claim of an adult would be barred under this section. Any action
not commenced in accordance with this section shall be barred.
For purposes of this section, with respect to care provided after
June 25, 1976, and before August 1, 1986, the knowledge of a custodial
parent or guardian shall be imputed as of April 29, 1987, to persons
under the age of eighteen years.
This section does not apply to a civil action based on intentional
conduct brought against those individuals or entities specified in this
section by a person for recovery of damages for injury occurring as a
result of childhood sexual abuse as defined in RCW 4.16.340(5).

Sec. 303 RCW 4.16.190 and 1993 c 232 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise provided in this section, if a person entitled
to bring an action mentioned in this chapter, except for a penalty or
forfeiture, or against a sheriff or other officer, for an escape, be at
the time the cause of action accrued either under the age of eighteen
years, or incompetent or disabled to such a degree that he or she
cannot understand the nature of the proceedings, such incompetency or
disability as determined according to chapter 11.88 RCW, or imprisoned
on a criminal charge prior to sentencing, the time of such disability
shall not be a part of the time limited for the commencement of action.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section with respect to a person under
the age of eighteen years does not apply to the time limited for the
commencement of an action under RCW 4.16.350.

Expert Witnesses
NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an action against a health care provider under this chapter,
an expert may not provide testimony at trial unless the expert meets
the following criteria:
(a) Has expertise in the condition at issue in the action; and
(b) At the time of the occurrence of the incident at issue in the
action, or at the time of retirement in the case of an expert who
retired no sooner than five years prior to the time the action is
commenced, was either:
(i) Engaged in active practice in the same or similar area of
practice or specialty as the defendant; or
(ii) Teaching at an accredited health professions school or an
accredited or affiliated academic or clinical training program in the
same or similar area of practice or specialty as the defendant,
including instruction regarding the particular condition at issue.
(2) Upon motion of a party, the court may waive the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section and allow an expert who does not meet
those requirements to testify at trial if the court finds that:
(a) Extensive efforts were made by the party to locate an expert
who meets the criteria under subsection (1) of this section, but none
was willing and available to testify; and
(b) The proposed expert is qualified to be an expert witness by
virtue of the person's training, experience, and knowledge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
An expert opinion provided in the course of an action against a
health care provider under this chapter must be corroborated by
admissible evidence, such as, but not limited to, treatment or practice
protocols or guidelines developed by health care specialty
organizations, objective academic research, clinical trials or studies,
or widely accepted clinical practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In any action under this chapter, each side shall presumptively be
entitled to only two independent experts on an issue, except upon a
showing of good cause. Where there are multiple parties on a side and
the parties cannot agree as to which independent experts will be called
on an issue, the court, upon a showing of good cause, shall allow
additional experts on an issue to be called as the court deems
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In an action under this chapter, all parties shall submit a
pretrial expert report pursuant to time frames provided in court rules.
The expert report must disclose the identity of all expert witnesses
and state the nature of the opinions the expert witnesses will present
as testimony at trial. Further depositions of these expert witnesses
is prohibited. The testimony that an expert witness may present at
trial is limited in nature to the opinions disclosed to the court as
part of the pretrial expert report. The legislature respectfully
requests that the supreme court adopt rules to implement the provisions
of this section.

Certificate of Merit
NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an action against an individual health care provider under
this chapter for personal injury or wrongful death in which the injury
is alleged to have been caused by an act or omission that violates the
accepted standard of care, the plaintiff must file a certificate of
merit at the time of commencing the action. If the action is commenced
within forty-five days prior to the expiration of the applicable
statute of limitations, the plaintiff must file the certificate of
merit no later than forty-five days after commencing the action.
(2) The certificate of merit must be executed by a health care
provider who meets the qualifications of an expert under this chapter.
If there is more than one defendant in the action, the person
commencing the action must file a certificate of merit for each
defendant.
(3) The certificate of merit must contain a statement that the
person executing the certificate of merit believes, based on the
information known at the time of executing the certificate of merit,
that there is a reasonable probability that the defendant's conduct did
not follow the accepted standard of care required to be exercised by
the defendant.
(4) Upon motion of the plaintiff, the court may grant an additional
period of time to file the certificate of merit, not to exceed ninety
days, if the court finds there is good cause for the extension.
(5)(a) Failure to file a certificate of merit that complies with
the requirements of this section is grounds for dismissal of the case.
(b) If a case is dismissed for failure to file a certificate of
merit that complies with the requirements of this section, the filing
of the claim against the health care provider shall not be used against
the health care provider in professional liability insurance rate
setting, personal credit history, or professional licensing and
credentialing.

Encouraging Offers of Settlement
NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an action under this chapter where a claimant makes an offer
of settlement that complies with subsection (2) of this section, or
where a defendant makes an offer of settlement that complies with
subsection (2) of this section and has previously made a disclosure
that complies with subsection (3) of this section, the court may, in
its discretion, award reasonable attorneys' fees and statutory costs to
a prevailing party. In making the determination of whether or not
reasonable attorneys' fees should be awarded to a prevailing party, the
court may consider:
(a) Whether the party who rejected or failed to accept the offer of
settlement was substantially justified in bringing the case to trial;
(b) The extent to which additional relevant and material facts or
information became known after the offer was rejected or not accepted;
(c) Whether the offer of settlement was made in good faith;
(d) The closeness of questions of fact and law at issue in the
case;
(e) Whether a party engaged in conduct that unduly or unreasonably
delayed the resolution of the proceeding;
(f) Whether the circumstances make an award unjust; and
(g) Any other factor the court deems appropriate under the
circumstances of the case.
(2) An offer of settlement must be made in writing and served on
the opposing party at least fifteen days before trial and not before
thirty days after the completion of the service and filing of the
summons and complaint. The offer must remain open for a period of not
less than ten days.
(3) A defendant has made the disclosure required under subsection
(1) of this section if, within seven days after the defendant learned
that the claimant suffered an unanticipated outcome resulting from the
provision of health care involving the defendant, the defendant
disclosed the unanticipated outcome to the claimant, made an apology or
expression of sympathy regarding the unanticipated outcome, and
provided assurances that steps would be taken to prevent similar
occurrences in the future.
(4) An offer of settlement shall not be filed with the court or
communicated to the trier of fact until after judgment in the case, at
which point a copy of the offer of settlement shall be filed with the
court for the purpose of allowing the court to determine whether an
award of reasonable attorneys' fees is appropriate under the
circumstances of the case.
(5) If the court determines that an award of reasonable attorneys'
fees to a prevailing party is appropriate under this section, the court
shall consider the factors in RCW 7.70.070 in determining the amount of
reasonable attorneys' fees to be awarded. The award of reasonable
attorneys' fees shall be limited to attorneys' fees incurred from the
date of commencement of the trial.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "prevailing party" means a
party who makes an offer of settlement that is either rejected or not
accepted by the opposing party, and who improves his or her position at
trial relative to his or her offer of settlement.

Voluntary Arbitration
NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 This chapter applies to any cause of
action for damages for personal injury or wrongful death based on
alleged professional negligence in the provision of health care where
all parties to the action have agreed to submit the dispute to
arbitration under this chapter in accordance with the requirements of
section 311 of this act. Any contract or other agreement entered into
prior to the commencement of an action that purports to require a party
to elect arbitration under this chapter is void and unenforceable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 (1) Parties in an action covered under
section 310 of this act may elect to submit the dispute to arbitration
under this chapter only in accordance with the requirements in this
section.
(a) A claimant may elect to submit the dispute to arbitration under
this chapter by including such election in the complaint filed at the
commencement of the action. A defendant may elect to submit the
dispute to arbitration under this chapter by including such election in
the defendant's answer to the complaint. The dispute will be submitted
to arbitration under this chapter only if all parties to the action
elect to submit the dispute to arbitration.
(b) If the parties do not initially elect to submit the dispute to
arbitration in accordance with (a) of this subsection, the parties may
make such an election at any time during the pendency of the action by
filing a stipulation with the court in which all parties to the action
agree to submit the dispute to arbitration under this chapter.
(2) A party that does not initially elect to submit a dispute to
arbitration under this chapter must file a declaration with the court
that meets the following requirements:
(a) In the case of a claimant, the declaration must be filed at the
time of commencing the action and must state that the attorney
representing the claimant presented the claimant with a copy of the
provisions of this chapter before commencing the action and that the
claimant elected not to submit the dispute to arbitration under this
chapter; and
(b) In the case of a defendant, the declaration must be filed at
the time of filing the answer and must state that the attorney
representing the defendant presented the defendant with a copy of the
provisions of this chapter before filing the defendant's answer and
that the defendant elected not to submit the dispute to arbitration
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 (1) An arbitrator shall be selected by
agreement of the parties no later than forty-five days after: (a) The
date all defendants elected arbitration in the answer where the parties
elected arbitration in the initial complaint and answer; or (b) the
date of the stipulation where the parties agreed to enter into
arbitration after the commencement of the action through a stipulation
filed with the court. The parties may agree to select more than one
arbitrator to conduct the arbitration.
(2) If the parties are unable to agree to an arbitrator by the time
specified in subsection (1) of this section, each side may submit the
names of three arbitrators to the court, and the court shall select an
arbitrator from among the submitted names within fifteen days of being
notified that the parties are unable to agree to an arbitrator. If
none of the parties submit any names of potential arbitrators, the
court shall select an arbitrator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313 The arbitrator may conduct the arbitration
in such manner as the arbitrator considers appropriate so as to aid in
the fair and expeditious disposition of the proceeding subject to the
requirements of this section and section 314 of this act.
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, each side is
entitled to two experts on the issue of liability, two experts on the
issue of damages, and one rebuttal expert.
(b) Where there are multiple parties on one side, the arbitrator
shall determine the number of experts that are allowed based on the
minimum number of experts necessary to ensure a fair and economic
resolution of the action.
(2)(a) Unless the arbitrator determines that exceptional
circumstances require additional discovery, each party is entitled to
the following discovery from any other party:
(i) Twenty-five interrogatories, including subparts;
(ii) Ten requests for admission; and
(iii) In accordance with applicable court rules:
(A) Requests for production of documents and things, and for entry
upon land for inspection and other purposes; and
(B) Requests for physical and mental examinations of persons.
(b) The parties shall be entitled to the following depositions:
(i) Depositions of parties and any expert that a party expects to
call as a witness. Except by order of the arbitrator for good cause
shown, the length of the deposition of a party or an expert witness
shall be limited to four hours.
(ii) Depositions of other witnesses. Unless the arbitrator
determines that exceptional circumstances require additional
depositions, the total number of depositions of persons who are not
parties or expert witnesses is limited to five depositions per side,
each of which may last no longer than two hours in length. In the
deposition of a fact witness, each side is entitled to examine for one
hour of the deposition.
(3) An arbitrator may issue a subpoena for the attendance of a
witness and for the production of records and other evidence at any
hearing and may administer oaths. A subpoena must be served in the
manner for service of subpoenas in a civil action and, upon motion to
the court by a party to the arbitration proceeding or the arbitrator,
enforced in the manner for enforcement of subpoenas in a civil action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 314 (1) An arbitration under this chapter
shall be conducted according to the time frames specified in this
section. The time frames provided in this section run from the date
all defendants have agreed to arbitration in their answers where the
parties elected arbitration in the initial complaint and answer, and
from the date of the execution of the stipulation where the parties
agreed to enter into arbitration after the commencement of the action
through a stipulation filed with the court. The arbitrator shall issue
a case scheduling order in every case specifying the dates by which the
requirements of (b) through (g) of this subsection must be completed.
(a) Within forty-five days, the claimant shall provide stipulations
for all relevant medical records to the defendants.
(b) Within one hundred twenty days, the claimant shall disclose to
the defendants the names and curriculum vitae or other documentation of
qualifications of any expert the claimant expects to call as a witness.
(c) Within one hundred forty days, each defendant shall disclose to
the claimants the names and curriculum vitae or other documentation of
qualifications of any expert the defendant expects to call as a
witness.
(d) Within one hundred sixty days, each party shall disclose to the
other parties the name and curriculum vitae or other documentation of
qualifications of any rebuttal expert the party expects to call as a
witness.
(e) Within two hundred forty days, all discovery shall be
completed.
(f) Within two hundred fifty days, mandatory mediation as required
by RCW 7.70.100 shall be completed. The arbitrator for the dispute may
not serve as the mediator in the mediation.
(g) Within two hundred seventy days, the arbitration hearing shall
commence.
(2) It is the express public policy of the legislature that
arbitration hearings under this chapter be commenced no later than ten
months after the parties elect to submit the dispute to arbitration.
The arbitrator may grant a continuance of the commencement of the
arbitration hearing only where a party shows that exceptional
circumstances create an undue and unavoidable hardship on the party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 315 (1) The arbitrator shall issue a decision
in writing and signed by the arbitrator within fourteen days after the
completion of the arbitration hearing and shall promptly deliver a copy
of the decision to each of the parties or their attorneys.
(2) The arbitrator may not make an award of damages under this
chapter that exceeds one million dollars for both economic and
noneconomic damages.
(3) The arbitrator may not make an award of damages under this
chapter under a theory of ostensible agency liability.
(4) The arbitrator shall make a finding as to whether a claim,
counterclaim, cross-claim, or defense advanced by a party was frivolous
as defined in RCW 4.84.185.
(5) If the arbitrator makes an award of damages to the claimant,
the arbitrator shall make a finding as to whether the claimant suffered
serious mental or physical injury as a result of the professional
negligence of the defendant or defendants.
(6) The arbitrator shall review the reasonableness of each party's
attorneys' fees under the provisions of RCW 4.24.005.
(7) The fees and expenses of the arbitrator shall be paid by the
nonprevailing parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 316 After a party to the arbitration
proceeding receives notice of a decision, the party may file a motion
with the court for a judgment in accordance with the decision, at which
time the court shall issue such a judgment unless the decision is
modified, corrected, or vacated as provided in section 317 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 317 There is no right to a trial de novo on an
appeal of the arbitrator's decision. An appeal of the arbitrator's
decision is limited to the bases for appeal provided in RCW 7.04.160
(1) through (4) and 7.04.170, or equivalent provisions in a successor
statute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 318 The provisions of chapter 7.04 RCW do not
apply to arbitrations conducted under this chapter except to the extent
specifically provided in this chapter.

Sec. 319 RCW 7.04.010 and 1947 c 209 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Two or more parties may agree in writing to submit to arbitration,
in conformity with the provisions of this chapter, any controversy
which may be the subject of an action existing between them at the time
of the agreement to submit, or they may include in a written agreement
a provision to settle by arbitration any controversy thereafter arising
between them out of or in relation to such agreement. Such agreement
shall be valid, enforceable and irrevocable save upon such grounds as
exist in law or equity for the revocation of any agreement.
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any arbitration
agreement between employers and employees or between employers and
associations of employees, and as to any such agreement the parties
thereto may provide for any method and procedure for the settlement of
existing or future disputes and controversies, and such procedure shall
be valid, enforceable and irrevocable save upon such grounds as exist
in law or equity for the revocation of any agreement.
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to arbitrations under
chapter 7.--- RCW (sections 310 through 318 of this act) except to the
extent provided in that chapter.

Collateral Sources
Sec. 320 RCW 7.70.080 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
Any party may present evidence to the trier of fact that the
((patient)) plaintiff has already been compensated for the injury
complained of from any source except the assets of the ((patient, his))
plaintiff, the plaintiff's representative, or ((his)) the plaintiff's
immediate family((, or insurance purchased with such assets)). In the
event such evidence is admitted, the plaintiff may present evidence of
an obligation to repay such compensation and evidence of any amount
paid by the plaintiff, or his or her representative or immediate
family, to secure the right to the compensation. ((Insurance bargained
for or provided on behalf of an employee shall be considered insurance
purchased with the assets of the employee.)) Compensation as used in
this section shall mean payment of money or other property to or on
behalf of the ((patient)) plaintiff, rendering of services to the
((patient)) plaintiff free of charge to the ((patient)) plaintiff, or
indemnification of expenses incurred by or on behalf of the ((patient))
plaintiff. Notwithstanding this section, evidence of compensation by
a defendant health care provider may be offered only by that provider.

Preventing Frivolous Lawsuits
NEW SECTION. Sec. 321 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In any action under this section, an attorney that has drafted, or
assisted in drafting and filing an action, counterclaim, cross-claim,
third-party claim, or a defense to a claim, upon signature and filing,
certifies that to the best of the party's or attorney's knowledge,
information, and belief, formed after reasonable inquiry it is not
frivolous, and is well grounded in fact and is warranted by existing
law or a good faith argument for the extension, modification, or
reversal of existing law, and that it is not interposed for any
improper purpose, such as to harass or to cause frivolous litigation.
If an action is signed and filed in violation of this rule, the court,
upon motion or upon its own initiative, may impose upon the person who
signed it, a represented party, or both, an appropriate sanction, which
may include an order to pay to the other party or parties the amount of
the reasonable expenses incurred because of the filing of the action,
counterclaim, cross-claim, third-party claim, or a defense to a claim,
including a reasonable attorney fee. The procedures governing the
enforcement of RCW 4.84.185 shall apply to this section.

PART IV - MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Part headings and subheadings used in this
act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 (1) Sections 110 through 113 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.
(2) Sections 201 through 206 of this act constitute a new chapter
in Title 48 RCW.
(3) Sections 310 through 318 of this act constitute a new chapter
in Title 7 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---