BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I - PATIENT SAFETY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Thousands of patients are injured each year in the United
States as a result of medical errors, and that a comprehensive approach
is needed to effectively reduce the incidence of medical errors in our
health care system. Implementation of proven patient safety strategies
can reduce medical errors, and thereby potentially reduce the need for
disciplinary actions against licensed health care professionals and
facilities, and the frequency and severity of medical malpractice
claims; and
(b) Health care providers, health care facilities, and health
carriers can and should be supported in their efforts to improve
patient safety and reduce medical errors by encouraging health care
facilities and providers to communicate openly with patients regarding
medical errors that have occurred and steps that can be taken to
prevent errors from occurring in the future, encouraging health care
facilities and providers to work cooperatively in their patient safety
efforts, and increasing funding available to implement proven patient
safety strategies.
(2)(a) The legislature also finds that the advances in medical
technology, diagnosis, and treatment have resulted in great strides in
maintaining and improving the health of Washingtonians. Yet those
advances substantially increase the complexity of our health care
delivery system and increase the risk that medical errors will occur.
The legislature further finds that our health care and medical
liability systems are not structured to promote disclosure and analysis
of medical errors, whether they result in patient harm or not. Each
medical error provides an opportunity to learn how to avoid future
errors.
(b) The legislature intends to promote full disclosure of medical
errors and adverse health events, and to use the experience and
knowledge gained from analysis of those events to advance patient
safety in a nonpunitive manner. The legislature further intends to
promote full disclosure of medical errors to patients by substantially
reducing the risk of liability exposure associated with such
disclosure.
(3) Through the adoption of this act, the legislature intends to
positively influence the safety and quality of care provided in
Washington state's health care system.

Funding Patient Safety Efforts
Sec. 102 RCW 43.70.110 and 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 918 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining
a license. After June 30, 1995, municipal corporations providing
emergency medical care and transportation services pursuant to chapter
18.73 RCW shall be exempt from such fees, provided that such other
emergency services shall only be charged for their pro rata share of
the cost of licensure and inspection, if appropriate. The secretary
may waive the fees when, in the discretion of the secretary, the fees
would not be in the best interest of public health and safety, or when
the fees would be to the financial disadvantage of the state.
(2) Except as provided in section 104 of this act, fees charged
shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the department for
the licensure of the activity or class of activities and may include
costs of necessary inspection.
(3) Department of health advisory committees may review fees
established by the secretary for licenses and comment upon the
appropriateness of the level of such fees.

Sec. 103 RCW 43.70.250 and 1996 c 191 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of
each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. The
secretary shall from time to time establish the amount of all
application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination fees,
permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with licensing
or regulation of professions, occupations, or businesses administered
by the department. In fixing said fees, the secretary shall set the
fees for each program at a sufficient level to defray the costs of
administering that program and the patient safety fee established in
section 104 of this act. All such fees shall be fixed by rule adopted
by the secretary in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 A new section is added to chapter 43.70
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall increase the licensing fee established
under RCW 43.70.110 by two dollars for the health care professionals
designated in subsection (2) of this section and by two dollars per
licensed bed for the health care facilities designated in subsection
(2) of this section. Proceeds of the patient safety fee must be
deposited into the patient safety account in section 108 of this act
and dedicated to patient safety and medical error reduction efforts
that have been proven to improve, or have a substantial likelihood of
improving the quality of care provided by health care professionals and
facilities.
(2) The health care professionals and facilities subject to the
patient safety fee are:
(a) The following health care professionals licensed under Title 18
RCW:
(i) Registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW;
(ii) Chiropractors licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) Dentists licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW;
(iv) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(v) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(vi) Optometrists licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) Osteopathic physicians licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW;
(viii) Osteopathic physicians' assistants licensed under chapter
18.57A RCW;
(ix) Pharmacists and pharmacies licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW;
(x) Physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW;
(xi) Physician assistants licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW;
(xii) Podiatrists licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW; and
(xiii) Psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(b) Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW and psychiatric
hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) One percent of all attorneys' fees received for representation
of claimants or defendants in actions brought under this chapter that
result in payment to a claimant shall be paid as a patient safety set
aside. Proceeds of the patient safety set aside will be distributed by
the department of health in the form of grants, loans, or other
appropriate arrangements to support strategies that have been proven to
reduce medical errors and enhance patient safety, or have a substantial
likelihood of reducing medical errors and enhancing patient safety, as
provided in section 104 of this act.
(2) A patient safety set aside shall be transmitted to the
secretary of the department of health by the attorney who receives fees
under subsection (1) of this section for deposit into the patient
safety account established in section 108 of this act.
(3) The Washington state supreme court shall by rule adopt
procedures to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 A new section is added to chapter 43.70
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Patient safety fee and set aside proceeds shall be
administered by the department, after seeking input from health care
providers engaged in direct patient care activities, health care
facilities, health care provider organizations, and other interested
parties. In developing criteria for the award of grants, loans, or
other appropriate arrangements under this section, the department shall
rely primarily upon evidence-based practices to improve patient safety
that have been identified and recommended by governmental and private
organizations, including, but not limited to:
(i) The federal agency for health care quality and research;
(ii) The institute of medicine of the national academy of sciences;
(iii) The joint commission on accreditation of health care
organizations; and
(iv) The national quality forum.
(b) The department shall award grants, loans, or other appropriate
arrangements for at least two strategies that are designed to meet the
goals and recommendations of the federal institute of medicine's
report, "Keeping Patients Safe: Transforming the Work Environment of
Nurses."
(2) Projects that have been proven to reduce medical errors and
enhance patient safety shall receive priority for funding over those
that are not proven, but have a substantial likelihood of reducing
medical errors and enhancing patient safety. All project proposals
must include specific performance and outcome measures by which to
evaluate the effectiveness of the project. Project proposals that do
not propose to use a proven patient safety strategy must include, in
addition to performance and outcome measures, a detailed description of
the anticipated outcomes of the project based upon any available
related research and the steps for achieving those outcomes.
(3) The department may use a portion of the patient safety fee
proceeds for the costs of administering the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 A new section is added to chapter 43.70
RCW to read as follows:
The secretary may solicit and accept grants or other funds from
public and private sources to support patient safety and medical error
reduction efforts under this act. Any grants or funds received may be
used to enhance these activities as long as program standards
established by the secretary are followed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 A new section is added to chapter 43.70
RCW to read as follows:
The patient safety account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from the fees and set asides created in sections 104 and 105
of this act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for the purposes of this act. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 A new section is added to chapter 43.70
RCW to read as follows:
By December 1, 2008, the department shall report the following
information to the governor and the health policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature:
(1) The amount of patient safety fees and set asides deposited to
date in the patient safety account;
(2) The criteria for distribution of grants, loans, or other
appropriate arrangements under this act; and
(3) A description of the medical error reduction and patient safety
grants and loans distributed to date, including the stated performance
measures, activities, timelines, and detailed information regarding
outcomes for each project.

Encouraging Patient Safety Through
Communications With Patients
Sec. 110 RCW 5.64.010 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In any civil action against a health care provider for personal
injuries which is based upon alleged professional negligence ((and
which is against:
(1) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or
related services, including, but not limited to, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatrist,
chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist, pharmacist, optician,
physician's assistant, osteopathic physician's assistant, nurse
practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive care paramedic,
including, in the event such person is deceased, his estate or personal
representative;
(2) An employee or agent of a person described in subsection (1) of
this section, acting in the course and scope of his employment,
including, in the event such employee or agent is deceased, his estate
or personal representative; or
(3) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in subsection (1)
of this section, including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic,
health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or an officer,
director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and scope of
his employment, including, in the event such officer, director,
employee, or agent is deceased, his estate or personal
representative;)), or in any arbitration or mediation proceeding
related to such civil action, evidence of furnishing or offering or
promising to pay medical, hospital, or similar expenses occasioned by
an injury is not admissible ((to prove liability for the injury)).
(2) In a civil action against a health care provider for personal
injuries which is based upon alleged professional negligence, or in any
arbitration or mediation proceeding related to such civil action:
(a) Any and all statements, affirmations, gestures, or conduct
expressing apology, fault, sympathy, commiseration, condolence,
compassion, or a general sense of benevolence; or
(b) Any and all statements or affirmations regarding remedial
actions that may be taken to address the act or omission that is the
basis for the allegation of negligence;
which were in the past or are made by a health care provider to the
injured person, a relative of the injured person, or a representative
of the injured person and which relate to the discomfort, pain,
suffering, injury, or death of the injured person as the result of the
alleged professional negligence are not admissible as evidence.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Health care provider" has the same meaning provided in RCW
7.70.020.
(b) "Relative" means:
(i) An injured person's spouse, parent, grandparent, stepfather,
stepmother, child, grandchild, brother, sister, half brother, half
sister, or spouse's parents;
(ii) Relationships in (b)(i) of this subsection that are
established with an injured person as a result of adoption; and
(iii) Any person who has a family-type relationship with an injured
person.
(c) "Representative" means a legal guardian, attorney, person
designated to make decisions on behalf of a patient under a medical
power of attorney, or any person recognized in law or custom as a
patient's agent.

Encouraging Reports of Unprofessional Conduct
or Lack of Capacity to Practice Safely
Sec. 111 RCW 4.24.260 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 701 are each amended
to read as follows:
((Physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, dentists licensed
under chapter 18.32 RCW, and pharmacists licensed under chapter 18.64
RCW)) Any member of a health profession listed under RCW 18.130.040
who, in good faith, makes a report, files charges, or presents evidence
against another member of ((their)) a health profession based on the
claimed ((incompetency or gross misconduct)) unprofessional conduct as
provided in RCW 18.130.180 or inability to practice with reasonable
skill and safety to consumers by reason of any physical or mental
condition as provided in RCW 18.130.170 of such person before the
((medical quality assurance commission established under chapter 18.71
RCW, in a proceeding under chapter 18.32 RCW, or to the board of
pharmacy under RCW 18.64.160)) agency, board, or commission responsible
for disciplinary activities for the person's profession under chapter
18.130 RCW, shall be immune from civil action for damages arising out
of such activities. A person prevailing upon the good faith defense
provided for in this section is entitled to recover expenses and
reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in establishing the defense.

Coordinated Quality Improvement Programs
Sec. 112 RCW 43.70.510 and 2004 c 145 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Health care institutions and medical facilities, other than
hospitals, that are licensed by the department, professional societies
or organizations, health care service contractors, health maintenance
organizations, health carriers approved pursuant to chapter 48.43 RCW,
and any other person or entity providing health care coverage under
chapter 48.42 RCW that is subject to the jurisdiction and regulation of
any state agency or any subdivision thereof may maintain a coordinated
quality improvement program for the improvement of the quality of
health care services rendered to patients and the identification and
prevention of medical malpractice as set forth in RCW 70.41.200.
(b) All such programs shall comply with the requirements of RCW
70.41.200(1) (a), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h) as modified to
reflect the structural organization of the institution, facility,
professional societies or organizations, health care service
contractors, health maintenance organizations, health carriers, or any
other person or entity providing health care coverage under chapter
48.42 RCW that is subject to the jurisdiction and regulation of any
state agency or any subdivision thereof, unless an alternative quality
improvement program substantially equivalent to RCW 70.41.200(1)(a) is
developed. All such programs, whether complying with the requirement
set forth in RCW 70.41.200(1)(a) or in the form of an alternative
program, must be approved by the department before the discovery
limitations provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section and the
exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and subsection (5) of this section
shall apply. In reviewing plans submitted by licensed entities that
are associated with physicians' offices, the department shall ensure
that the exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and the discovery
limitations of this section are applied only to information and
documents related specifically to quality improvement activities
undertaken by the licensed entity.
(2) Health care provider groups of five or more providers may
maintain a coordinated quality improvement program for the improvement
of the quality of health care services rendered to patients and the
identification and prevention of medical malpractice as set forth in
RCW 70.41.200. For purposes of this section, a health care provider
group may be a consortium of providers consisting of five or more
providers in total. All such programs shall comply with the
requirements of RCW 70.41.200(1) (a), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h)
as modified to reflect the structural organization of the health care
provider group. All such programs must be approved by the department
before the discovery limitations provided in subsections (3) and (4) of
this section and the exemption under RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh) and
subsection (5) of this section shall apply.
(3) Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information
to further the purposes of the quality improvement and medical
malpractice prevention program or who, in substantial good faith,
participates on the quality improvement committee shall not be subject
to an action for civil damages or other relief as a result of such
activity. Any person or entity participating in a coordinated quality
improvement program that, in substantial good faith, shares information
or documents with one or more other programs, committees, or boards
under subsection (6) of this section is not subject to an action for
civil damages or other relief as a result of the activity or its
consequences. For the purposes of this section, sharing information is
presumed to be in substantial good faith. However, the presumption may
be rebutted upon a showing of clear, cogent, and convincing evidence
that the information shared was knowingly false or deliberately
misleading.
(4) Information and documents, including complaints and incident
reports, created specifically for, and collected, and maintained by a
quality improvement committee are not subject to discovery or
introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was
in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the
creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents
specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to
testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or
the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee.
This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the
discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that
is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of
any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the
testimony of any person concerning the facts that form the basis for
the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal
knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil
action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or
revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges,
introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by
quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d)
in any civil action challenging the termination of a contract by a
state agency with any entity maintaining a coordinated quality
improvement program under this section if the termination was on the
basis of quality of care concerns, introduction into evidence of
information created, collected, or maintained by the quality
improvement committees of the subject entity, which may be under terms
of a protective order as specified by the court; (e) in any civil
action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or
restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any and the
reasons for the restrictions; or (f) in any civil action, discovery and
introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records required by
rule of the department of health to be made regarding the care and
treatment received.
(5) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee are exempt
from disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.
(6) A coordinated quality improvement program may share information
and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected and maintained by a quality improvement
committee or a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250 with one or
more other coordinated quality improvement programs maintained in
accordance with this section or with RCW 70.41.200 or a peer review
committee under RCW 4.24.250, for the improvement of the quality of
health care services rendered to patients and the identification and
prevention of medical malpractice. The privacy protections of chapter
70.02 RCW and the federal health insurance portability and
accountability act of 1996 and its implementing regulations apply to
the sharing of individually identifiable patient information held by a
coordinated quality improvement program. Any rules necessary to
implement this section shall meet the requirements of applicable
federal and state privacy laws. Information and documents disclosed by
one coordinated quality improvement program to another coordinated
quality improvement program or a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250 and any information and documents created or maintained as a
result of the sharing of information and documents shall not be subject
to the discovery process and confidentiality shall be respected as
required by subsection (4) of this section and RCW 4.24.250.
(7) The department of health shall adopt rules as are necessary to
implement this section.

Prescription Legibility
NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 The legislature finds that prescription
drug errors occur because the pharmacist or nurse cannot read the
prescription from the physician or other provider with prescriptive
authority. The legislature further finds that legible prescriptions
can prevent these errors.

Sec. 114 RCW 69.41.010 and 2003 c 257 s 2 and 2003 c 140 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a legend drug
whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the
body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the
practitioner.
(2) "Community-based care settings" include: Community residential
programs for the developmentally disabled, certified by the department
of social and health services under chapter 71A.12 RCW; adult family
homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW; and boarding homes licensed
under chapter 18.20 RCW. Community-based care settings do not include
acute care or skilled nursing facilities.
(3) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or
attempted transfer from one person to another of a legend drug, whether
or not there is an agency relationship.
(4) "Department" means the department of health.
(5) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order
for a legend drug and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the
proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging
necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.
(6) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.
(7) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a legend drug.
(8) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.
(9) "Drug" means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States
pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States,
or official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in man or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food, minerals or vitamins) intended to
affect the structure or any function of the body of man or animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any article
specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection. It does not include
devices or their components, parts, or accessories.
(10) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means
the communication of prescription information by computer, or the
transmission of an exact visual image of a prescription by facsimile,
or other electronic means for original prescription information or
prescription refill information for a legend drug between an authorized
practitioner and a pharmacy or the transfer of prescription information
for a legend drug from one pharmacy to another pharmacy.
(11) "In-home care settings" include an individual's place of
temporary and permanent residence, but does not include acute care or
skilled nursing facilities, and does not include community-based care
settings.
(12) "Legend drugs" means any drugs which are required by state law
or regulation of the state board of pharmacy to be dispensed on
prescription only or are restricted to use by practitioners only.
(13) "Legible prescription" means a prescription or medication
order issued by a practitioner that is capable of being read and
understood by the pharmacist filling the prescription or the nurse or
other practitioner implementing the medication order. A prescription
must be hand printed, typewritten, or electronically generated.
(14) "Medication assistance" means assistance rendered by a
nonpractitioner to an individual residing in a community-based care
setting or in-home care setting to facilitate the individual's self-administration of a legend drug or controlled substance. It includes
reminding or coaching the individual, handing the medication container
to the individual, opening the individual's medication container, using
an enabler, or placing the medication in the individual's hand, and
such other means of medication assistance as defined by rule adopted by
the department. A nonpractitioner may help in the preparation of
legend drugs or controlled substances for self-administration where a
practitioner has determined and communicated orally or by written
direction that such medication preparation assistance is necessary and
appropriate. Medication assistance shall not include assistance with
intravenous medications or injectable medications, except prefilled
insulin syringes.
(15) "Person" means individual, corporation, government or
governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust,
partnership or association, or any other legal entity.
(16) "Practitioner" means:
(a) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician
or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, a
dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon
under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a
registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed
practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW, an optometrist under chapter
18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010,
an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW, a
physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW, a naturopath licensed
under chapter 18.36A RCW, a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW, or,
when acting under the required supervision of a dentist licensed under
chapter 18.32 RCW, a dental hygienist licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(b) A pharmacy, hospital, or other institution licensed,
registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct
research with respect to, or to administer a legend drug in the course
of professional practice or research in this state; and
(c) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a
physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery in any
state, or province of Canada, which shares a common border with the
state of Washington.
(17) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

Increasing Patient Safety Through
Disclosure and Analysis of Adverse Events
NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adverse event" means any of the following events or
occurrences:
(a) An unanticipated death or major permanent loss of function, not
related to the natural course of a patient's illness or underlying
condition;
(b) A patient suicide while the patient was under care in the
hospital;
(c) An infant abduction or discharge to the wrong family;
(d) Sexual assault or rape of a patient or staff member while in
the hospital;
(e) A hemolytic transfusion reaction involving administration of
blood or blood products having major blood group incompatibilities;
(f) Surgery performed on the wrong patient or wrong body part;
(g) A failure or major malfunction of a facility system such as the
heating, ventilation, fire alarm, fire sprinkler, electrical,
electronic information management, or water supply which affects any
patient diagnosis, treatment, or care service within the facility; or
(h) A fire which affects any patient diagnosis, treatment, or care
area of the facility.
The term does not include an incident.
(2) "Ambulatory surgical facility" means any distinct entity that
operates exclusively for the purpose of providing surgical services to
patients not requiring hospitalization, whether or not the facility is
certified under Title XVIII of the federal social security act.
(3) "Childbirth center" means a facility licensed under chapter
18.46 RCW.
(4) "Correctional medical facility" means a part or unit of a
correctional facility operated by the department of corrections under
chapter 72.10 RCW that provides medical services for lengths of stay in
excess of twenty-four hours to offenders.
(5) "Department" means the department of health.
(6) "Health care worker" means an employee, independent contractor,
licensee, or other individual who is directly involved in the delivery
of health services in a medical facility.
(7) "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.
(8) "Incident" means an event, occurrence, or situation involving
the clinical care of a patient in a medical facility which:
(a) Results in unanticipated injury to a patient that is less
severe than death or major permanent loss of function and is not
related to the natural course of the patient's illness or underlying
condition; or
(b) Could have injured the patient but did not either cause an
unanticipated injury or require the delivery of additional health care
services to the patient.
The term does not include an adverse event.
(9) "Medical facility" means an ambulatory surgical facility,
childbirth center, hospital, psychiatric hospital, or correctional
medical facility.
(10) "Psychiatric hospital" means a hospital facility licensed as
a psychiatric hospital under chapter 71.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 (1) Each medical facility shall report to
the department the occurrence of any adverse event. The report must be
submitted to the department within forty-five days after occurrence of
the event has been confirmed.
(2) The report shall be filed in a format specified by the
department after consultation with medical facilities. It shall
identify the facility but shall not include any identifying information
for any of the health care professionals, facility employees, or
patients involved. This provision does not modify the duty of a
hospital to make a report to the department of health or a disciplinary
authority if a licensed practitioner has committed unprofessional
conduct as defined in RCW 18.130.180.
(3) Any medical facility or health care worker may report an
incident to the department. The report shall be filed in a format
specified by the department after consultation with medical facilities
and shall identify the facility but shall not include any identifying
information for any of the health care professionals, facility
employees, or patients involved. This provision does not modify the
duty of a hospital to make a report to the department of health or a
disciplinary authority if a licensed practitioner has committed
unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW 18.130.180.
(4) If, in the course of investigating a complaint received from an
employee of a licensed medical facility, the department determines that
the facility has not undertaken efforts to investigate the occurrence
of an adverse event, the department shall direct the facility to
undertake an investigation of the event. If a complaint related to a
potential adverse event involves care provided in an ambulatory
surgical facility, the department shall notify the facility and request
that they undertake an investigation of the event. The protections of
RCW 43.70.075 apply to complaints related to adverse events or
incidents that are submitted in good faith by employees of medical
facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 The department shall:
(1) Receive reports of adverse events and incidents under section
116 of this act;
(2) Investigate adverse events;
(3) Establish a system for medical facilities and the health care
workers of a medical facility to report adverse events and incidents,
which shall be accessible twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week;
(4) Adopt rules as necessary to implement this act;
(5) Directly or by contract:
(a) Collect, analyze, and evaluate data regarding reports of
adverse events and incidents, including the identification of
performance indicators and patterns in frequency or severity at certain
medical facilities or in certain regions of the state;
(b) Develop recommendations for changes in health care practices
and procedures, which may be instituted for the purpose of reducing the
number and severity of adverse events and incidents;
(c) Directly advise reporting medical facilities of immediate
changes that can be instituted to reduce adverse events and incidents;
(d) Issue recommendations to medical facilities on a facility-specific or on a statewide basis regarding changes, trends, and
improvements in health care practices and procedures for the purpose of
reducing the number and severity of adverse events and incidents.
Prior to issuing recommendations, consideration shall be given to the
following factors: Expectation of improved quality care,
implementation feasibility, other relevant implementation practices,
and the cost impact to patients, payers, and medical facilities.
Statewide recommendations shall be issued to medical facilities on a
continuing basis and shall be published and posted on the department's
publicly accessible web site. The recommendations made to medical
facilities under this section shall not be considered mandatory for
licensure purposes unless they are adopted by the department as rules
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW; and
(e) Monitor implementation of reporting systems addressing adverse
events or their equivalent in other states and make recommendations to
the governor and the legislature as necessary for modifications to this
chapter to keep the system as nearly consistent as possible with
similar systems in other states;
(6) Report no later than January 1, 2007, and annually thereafter
to the governor and the legislature on the department's activities
under this act in the preceding year. The report shall include:
(a) The number of adverse events and incidents reported by medical
facilities on a geographical basis and their outcomes;
(b) The information derived from the data collected including any
recognized trends concerning patient safety; and
(c) Recommendations for statutory or regulatory changes that may
help improve patient safety in the state.
The annual report shall be made available for public inspection and
shall be posted on the department's web site;
(7) Conduct all activities under this section in a manner that
preserves the confidentiality of documents, materials, or information
made confidential by section 119 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 (1) Medical facilities licensed by the
department shall have in place policies to assure that, when
appropriate, information about unanticipated outcomes is provided to
patients or their families or any surrogate decision makers identified
pursuant to RCW 7.70.065. Notifications of unanticipated outcomes
under this section do not constitute an acknowledgment or admission of
liability, nor can the fact of notification or the content disclosed be
introduced as evidence in a civil action.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2006, the department shall, during the
annual survey of a licensed medical facility, ensure that the policy
required in subsection (1) of this section is in place.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 When a report of an adverse event or
incident under section 116 of this act is made by or through a
coordinated quality improvement program under RCW 43.70.510 or
70.41.200, or by a peer review committee under RCW 4.24.250,
information and documents, including complaints and incident reports,
created specifically for and collected and maintained by a quality
improvement committee for the purpose of preparing a report of an
adverse event or incident shall be subject to the confidentiality
protections of those laws and RCW 42.17.310(1)(hh).

PART II - MEDICAL DISCIPLINEDisciplinary Hearings for Physicians and Physician Assistants
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 The legislature finds that professional
discipline is a critical function of ensuring quality health care for
the people of the state of Washington, and that an alternative
disciplinary process for some professions will strengthen that process.

Sec. 202 RCW 18.130.090 and 1993 c 367 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the disciplining authority determines, upon investigation,
that there is reason to believe a violation of RCW 18.130.180 has
occurred, a statement of charge or charges shall be prepared and served
upon the license holder or applicant at the earliest practical time.
The statement of charge or charges shall be accompanied by a notice
that the license holder or applicant may request a hearing to contest
the charge or charges.
(2) For license holders and applicants under chapter 18.71 or
18.71A RCW, the disciplining authority shall file the statement of
charges with the superior court in the county in which the license
holder provided the care or committed the act that is the subject of
the complaint. The license holder or applicant must file a request for
hearing with the superior court in which the statement of charges has
been filed within twenty days after being served the statement of
charges. If the twenty-day limit results in a hardship upon the
license holder or applicant, he or she may request for good cause an
extension not to exceed sixty additional days. If the superior court
finds that there is good cause, it shall grant the extension. The
failure to request a hearing constitutes a default, whereupon the
superior court may enter a decision on the basis of the facts available
to it. If a hearing is requested, the hearing shall be held pursuant
to section 204 of this act.
(3) For license holders and applicants not covered by subsection
(2) of this section, the license holder or applicant must file a
request for hearing with the disciplining authority within twenty days
after being served the statement of charges. If the twenty-day limit
results in a hardship upon the license holder or applicant, he or she
may request for good cause an extension not to exceed sixty additional
days. If the disciplining authority finds that there is good cause, it
shall grant the extension. The failure to request a hearing
constitutes a default, whereupon the disciplining authority may enter
a decision on the basis of the facts available to it.
(((2))) If a hearing is requested, the time of the hearing shall be
fixed by the disciplining authority as soon as convenient, but the
hearing shall not be held earlier than thirty days after service of the
charges upon the license holder or applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 18.130
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A complainant dissatisfied with the decision of the
disciplining authority regarding a license holder or applicant under
chapter 18.71 or 18.71A RCW may appeal that decision to the prosecuting
attorney in the county in which the license holder provided the care or
committed the act that is the subject of the complaint. If the
prosecuting attorney determines, upon investigation, that there is
reason to believe a violation of RCW 18.130.180 has occurred, a
statement of charge or charges shall be prepared and served upon the
license holder or applicant at the earliest practical time. The
statement of charge or charges shall be accompanied by a notice that
the license holder or applicant may request a hearing to contest the
charge or charges. The decision of the prosecuting attorney as to
filing charges is final and may not be appealed by the complainant or
disciplining authority in any forum.
(2) The prosecuting attorney shall file the statement of charges
with the superior court. The license holder or applicant must file a
request for hearing with the superior court in which the statement of
charges has been filed within twenty days after being served the
statement of charges. If the twenty-day limit results in a hardship
upon the license holder or applicant, he or she may request for good
cause an extension not to exceed sixty additional days. If the
superior court finds that there is good cause, it shall grant the
extension. The failure to request a hearing constitutes a default,
whereupon the superior court may enter a decision on the basis of the
facts available to it. If a hearing is requested, the hearing shall be
held pursuant to section 204 of this act.
(3) If the prosecuting attorney files a statement of charges, he or
she shall also serve as the disciplining authority as to the settlement
function in RCW 18.130.098. All settlements are subject to the
approval of the superior court in which the statement of charges was
filed pursuant to this section or RCW 18.130.090.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 A new section is added to chapter 18.130
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If a disciplinary authority under RCW 18.130.090 or a
prosecuting attorney under section 203 of this act files a statement of
charges in superior court, the superior court shall serve as the
disciplinary authority for purposes of RCW 18.130.160 and shall serve
as the hearing authority for purposes of RCW 18.130.170(1).
(2) The superior court shall hold hearings requested under RCW
18.130.090 or section 203 of this act in accordance with the civil and
related rules of the superior courts.
(3) The superior court shall grant an expedited hearing upon a
petition filed by:
(a) The disciplinary authority or county prosecutor on the grounds
of jeopardy to the health and safety of patients caused by delay; or
(b) The license holder on the grounds of undue prejudice caused by
delay.
(4) Appeals from the decision of the superior court are governed by
the court rules governing appeals in civil matters from the superior
courts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 The supreme court may implement sections
201 through 204 of this act through court rule.

License Revocation for Three Acts of Unprofessional Conduct
Sec. 206 RCW 18.130.160 and 2001 c 195 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon a finding, after hearing, that a license holder or applicant
has committed unprofessional conduct or is unable to practice with
reasonable skill and safety due to a physical or mental condition, the
disciplining authority may issue an order providing for one or any
combination of the following:
(1) Revocation of the license;
(2) Suspension of the license for a fixed or indefinite term;
(3) Restriction or limitation of the practice;
(4) Requiring the satisfactory completion of a specific program of
remedial education or treatment;
(5) The monitoring of the practice by a supervisor approved by the
disciplining authority;
(6) Censure or reprimand;
(7) Compliance with conditions of probation for a designated period
of time;
(8) Payment of a fine for each violation of this chapter, not to
exceed five thousand dollars per violation. Funds received shall be
placed in the health professions account;
(9) Denial of the license request;
(10) Corrective action;
(11) Refund of fees billed to and collected from the consumer;
(12) A surrender of the practitioner's license in lieu of other
sanctions, which must be reported to the federal data bank.
Except as otherwise provided in section 208 of this act, any of the
actions under this section may be totally or partly stayed by the
disciplining authority. In determining what action is appropriate, the
disciplining authority must first consider what sanctions are necessary
to protect or compensate the public. Only after such provisions have
been made may the disciplining authority consider and include in the
order requirements designed to rehabilitate the license holder or
applicant. All costs associated with compliance with orders issued
under this section are the obligation of the license holder or
applicant.
The licensee or applicant may enter into a stipulated disposition
of charges that includes one or more of the sanctions of this section,
but only after a statement of charges has been issued and the licensee
has been afforded the opportunity for a hearing and has elected on the
record to forego such a hearing. The stipulation shall either contain
one or more specific findings of unprofessional conduct or inability to
practice, or a statement by the licensee acknowledging that evidence is
sufficient to justify one or more specified findings of unprofessional
conduct or inability to practice. The stipulation entered into
pursuant to this subsection shall be considered formal disciplinary
action for all purposes.

Sec. 207 RCW 18.130.172 and 2000 c 171 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for those acts of unprofessional conduct specified in
section 208 of this act, prior to serving a statement of charges under
RCW 18.130.090 or 18.130.170, the disciplinary authority may furnish a
statement of allegations to the licensee or applicant along with a
detailed summary of the evidence relied upon to establish the
allegations and a proposed stipulation for informal resolution of the
allegations. These documents shall be exempt from public disclosure
until such time as the allegations are resolved either by stipulation
or otherwise.
(2) The disciplinary authority and the applicant or licensee may
stipulate that the allegations may be disposed of informally in
accordance with this subsection. The stipulation shall contain a
statement of the facts leading to the filing of the complaint; the act
or acts of unprofessional conduct alleged to have been committed or the
alleged basis for determining that the applicant or licensee is unable
to practice with reasonable skill and safety; a statement that the
stipulation is not to be construed as a finding of either
unprofessional conduct or inability to practice; an acknowledgement
that a finding of unprofessional conduct or inability to practice, if
proven, constitutes grounds for discipline under this chapter; and an
agreement on the part of the licensee or applicant that the sanctions
set forth in RCW 18.130.160, except RCW 18.130.160 (1), (2), (6), and
(8), may be imposed as part of the stipulation, except that no fine may
be imposed but the licensee or applicant may agree to reimburse the
disciplinary authority the costs of investigation and processing the
complaint up to an amount not exceeding one thousand dollars per
allegation; and an agreement on the part of the disciplinary authority
to forego further disciplinary proceedings concerning the allegations.
A stipulation entered into pursuant to this subsection shall not be
considered formal disciplinary action.
(3) If the licensee or applicant declines to agree to disposition
of the charges by means of a stipulation pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section, the disciplinary authority may proceed to formal
disciplinary action pursuant to RCW 18.130.090 or 18.130.170.
(4) Upon execution of a stipulation under subsection (2) of this
section by both the licensee or applicant and the disciplinary
authority, the complaint is deemed disposed of and shall become subject
to public disclosure on the same basis and to the same extent as other
records of the disciplinary authority. Should the licensee or
applicant fail to pay any agreed reimbursement within thirty days of
the date specified in the stipulation for payment, the disciplinary
authority may seek collection of the amount agreed to be paid in the
same manner as enforcement of a fine under RCW 18.130.165.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 A new section is added to chapter 18.130
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The disciplining authority shall revoke the license of a
license holder who is found, in three unrelated orders under RCW
18.130.110 in a ten-year period, to have engaged in three separate
courses of unprofessional conduct based upon any combination of the
following:
(a) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(4) that causes or substantially
contributes to the death of or severe injury to a patient or creates a
significant risk of harm to the public;
(b) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(6) that creates a significant
risk of harm to the public;
(c) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(7) that causes or substantially
contributes to the death of or severe injury to a patient or creates a
significant risk of harm to the public;
(d) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(9);
(e) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(17), except gross misdemeanors;
(f) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(23) that causes or
substantially contributes to the death of or severe injury to a patient
or creates a significant risk of harm to the public;
(g) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(24) based upon an act of abuse
to a client or patient; and
(h) Any violation of RCW 18.130.180(24) based upon sexual contact
with a client or patient.
(2) For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, a ten-year
period commences upon the completion of all conditions and obligations
imposed for the acts identified in subsection (1)(a) through (h) of
this section.
(3) An order that includes a finding of mitigating circumstances
for an act of unprofessional conduct may be issued and, except for (a)
of this subsection, applied one time for any license holder or
applicant for a license, and if so, that order does not count as one of
the three orders that triggers a license revocation for purposes of
this section. A finding of mitigating circumstances under (a) of this
subsection may be issued and applied as many times as the license
holder meets the criteria for such a finding and does not count as one
of the three orders that triggers the revocation of a license for the
purposes of this section. Except for (a) of this subsection, after a
finding of mitigating circumstances is issued and applied, no
subsequent orders under this section may consider any mitigating
circumstances. The following mitigating circumstances may be
considered:
(a) For subsection (1)(a) of this section, the act involved a high-risk procedure, there was no lower-risk alternative to that procedure,
the patient was informed of the risks of the procedure and consented to
the procedure anyway, and prior to the institution of disciplinary
actions the license holder took appropriate remedial measures;
(b) There is a strong potential for rehabilitation of the license
holder; or
(c) There is a strong potential for remedial education and training
to prevent future harm to the public.
(4) Nothing in this section limits the ability of the disciplining
authority to impose any sanction, including revocation, for a single
violation of any subsection of RCW 18.130.180.
(5) Notwithstanding RCW 9.96A.020(1), revocation of a license under
this section is not subject to a petition for reinstatement under RCW
18.130.150.

Burden of Proof for License Suspension or Revocation
NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 The legislature finds that under the
Washington Constitution, the legislative branch of government has
plenary authority over medical practice and the right to set policy for
the disciplining of health care practitioners. While medical
professionals have a right to due process before their professional
license may be taken away, citizens have equally significant concerns
for protection against incompetent or dishonest practitioners. The
legislature further finds that in carefully balancing the interests of
all concerned, a substantial and significant evidence standard of proof
most appropriately calibrates the balance of interests between the
practitioner and the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 A new section is added to chapter 18.130
RCW to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided by statute or the provisions of this
section, the burden of proof in all proceedings brought under this
chapter is a preponderance of the evidence. In a disciplinary
proceeding under this chapter involving the suspension or revocation of
the license of a health care professional licensed under chapter 18.57
or 18.71 RCW, the burden of proof is substantial and significant
evidence. A substantial and significant evidence standard is a higher
standard of proof than a preponderance of the evidence standard and a
lower standard of proof than a clear and convincing evidence standard
and shall be based on the kind of evidence that reasonably prudent
persons are accustomed to relying on in the conduct of their affairs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 In the event that the Washington supreme
court or other court of competent jurisdiction rules or affirms that
section 210 of this act is unconstitutional, then the prescribed
standard of proof set forth in section 210 of this act takes effect
upon the ratification of a state constitutional amendment that empowers
the legislature to enact a standard of proof in health care
professional disciplinary proceedings or upon the enactment by the
United States congress of a law permitting such standard of proof,
whichever occurs first.

PART III - INSURANCE REFORMUnderwriting Standards
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 48.19
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "underwrite" means the
process of selecting, rejecting, or pricing a risk, and includes each
of these processes:
(a) Evaluation, selection, and classification of risk;
(b) Application of rates, rating rules, and classification plans to
risks that are accepted; and
(c) Determining eligibility for:
(i) Coverage provisions;
(ii) Providing or limiting the amount of coverage or policy limits;
or
(iii) Premium payment plans.
(2) Each medical malpractice insurer must file its underwriting
rules, guidelines, criteria, standards, or other information the
insurer uses to underwrite medical malpractice coverage. However, an
insurer is excluded from this requirement if the insurer is ordered
into rehabilitation under chapter 48.31 or 48.99 RCW.
(a) Every filing of underwriting information must identify and
explain:
(i) The class, type, and extent of coverage provided by the
insurer;
(ii) Any changes that have occurred to the underwriting standards;
and
(iii) How underwriting changes are expected to affect future
losses.
(b) The information under (a) of this subsection must be filed with
the commissioner at least thirty days before it becomes effective and
is subject to public disclosure upon receipt by the commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 48.18
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Adverse action" includes, but is not limited to, the
following:
(i) Cancellation, denial, or nonrenewal of medical malpractice
insurance coverage;
(ii) Charging a higher insurance premium for medical malpractice
insurance than would have been charged, whether the charge is by any of
the following:
(A) Application of a rating rule;
(B) Assignment to a rating tier that does not have the lowest
available rates; or
(C) Placement with an affiliate company that does not offer the
lowest rates available to the insured within the affiliate group of
insurance companies; or
(iii) Any reduction or adverse or unfavorable change in the terms
of coverage or amount of any medical malpractice insurance, including,
but not limited to, the following: Coverage provided to the insured
physician is not as broad in scope as coverage requested by the insured
physician but is available to other insured physicians of the insurer
or any affiliate.
(b) "Affiliate" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.31B.005(1).
(c) "Claim" means a demand for payment by an allegedly injured
third party under the terms and conditions of an insurance contract.
(d) "Tier" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.18.545(1)(h).
(2) When an insurer takes adverse action against an insured, the
insurer may consider the following factors only in combination with
other substantive underwriting factors:
(a) An insured has inquired about the nature or scope of coverage
under a medical malpractice insurance policy;
(b) An insured has notified the insurer, pursuant to the provisions
of the insurance contract, about a potential claim, which did not
ultimately result in the filing of a claim; or
(c) A claim was closed without payment.

Cancellation or Nonrenewal of Liability Insurance Policies
Sec. 303 RCW 48.18.290 and 1997 c 85 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Cancellation by the insurer of any policy which by its terms is
cancellable at the option of the insurer, or of any binder based on
such policy which does not contain a clearly stated expiration date,
may be effected as to any interest only upon compliance with the
following:
(a)(i) For policies other than medical malpractice liability
insurance: Written notice of such cancellation, accompanied by the
actual reason therefor, must be actually delivered or mailed to the
named insured not less than forty-five days prior to the effective date
of the cancellation ((except for cancellation of insurance policies
for));
(ii) For policies that provide medical malpractice liability
insurance: Written notice of such cancellation, accompanied by the
actual reason therefore, must be actually delivered or mailed to the
named insured not less than ninety days prior to the effective date of
the cancellation;
(iii) For policies canceled due to nonpayment of premiums,
((which)) written notice ((shall be)) must be actually delivered or
mailed to the named insured not less than ten days prior to ((such date
and except for cancellation of fire insurance policies)) the effective
date of the cancellation; and
(iv) For fire insurance policies canceled under chapter 48.53 RCW,
((which)) written notice ((shall not be)) must be actually delivered or
mailed to the named insured not less than five days prior to ((such
date)) the effective date of the cancellation;
(b) Like notice must also be so delivered or mailed to each
mortgagee, pledgee, or other person shown by the policy to have an
interest in any loss which may occur thereunder. For purposes of this
subsection (1)(b), "delivered" includes electronic transmittal,
facsimile, or personal delivery.
(2) The mailing of any such notice shall be effected by depositing
it in a sealed envelope, directed to the addressee at his or her last
address as known to the insurer or as shown by the insurer's records,
with proper prepaid postage affixed, in a letter depository of the
United States post office. The insurer shall retain in its records any
such item so mailed, together with its envelope, which was returned by
the post office upon failure to find, or deliver the mailing to, the
addressee.
(3) The affidavit of the individual making or supervising such a
mailing, shall constitute prima facie evidence of such facts of the
mailing as are therein affirmed.
(4) The portion of any premium paid to the insurer on account of
the policy, unearned because of the cancellation and in amount as
computed on the pro rata basis, must be actually paid to the insured or
other person entitled thereto as shown by the policy or by any
endorsement thereon, or be mailed to the insured or such person as soon
as possible, and no later than forty-five days after the date of notice
of cancellation to the insured for homeowners', dwelling fire, and
private passenger auto. Any such payment may be made by cash, or by
check, bank draft, or money order.
(5) This section shall not apply to contracts of life or disability
insurance without provision for cancellation prior to the date to which
premiums have been paid, or to contracts of insurance procured under
the provisions of chapter 48.15 RCW.

Sec. 304 RCW 48.18.2901 and 2002 c 347 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each insurer shall be required to renew any contract of
insurance subject to RCW 48.18.290 unless one of the following
situations exists:
(a) The insurer gives the named insured at least forty-five or
ninety days' notice in writing as provided for in RCW 48.18.290(1)(a)
(i) or (ii), that it ((proposes to refuse to renew)) will not renew the
insurance contract upon its expiration date; and sets forth in that
writing the actual reason for refusing to renew;
(b) At least twenty days prior to its expiration date, the insurer
has communicated, either directly or through its agent, its willingness
to renew in writing to the named insured and has included in that
writing a statement of the amount of the premium or portion thereof
required to be paid by the insured to renew the policy, and the insured
fails to discharge when due his or her obligation in connection with
the payment of such premium or portion thereof;
(c) The insured has procured equivalent coverage prior to the
expiration of the policy period;
(d) The contract is evidenced by a written binder containing a
clearly stated expiration date which has expired according to its
terms; or
(e) The contract clearly states that it is not renewable, and is
for a specific line, subclassification, or type of coverage that is not
offered on a renewable basis. This subsection (1)(e) does not restrict
the authority of the insurance commissioner under this code.
(2) Any insurer failing to include in the notice required by
subsection (1)(b) of this section the amount of any increased premium
resulting from a change of rates and an explanation of any change in
the contract provisions shall renew the policy if so required by that
subsection according to the rates and contract provisions applicable to
the expiring policy. However, renewal based on the rates and contract
provisions applicable to the expiring policy shall not prevent the
insurer from making changes in the rates and/or contract provisions of
the policy once during the term of its renewal after at least twenty
days' advance notice of such change has been given to the named
insured.
(3) Renewal of a policy shall not constitute a waiver or estoppel
with respect to grounds for cancellation which existed before the
effective date of such renewal, or with respect to cancellation of fire
policies under chapter 48.53 RCW.
(4) "Renewal" or "to renew" means the issuance and delivery by an
insurer of a contract of insurance replacing at the end of the contract
period a contract of insurance previously issued and delivered by the
same insurer, or the issuance and delivery of a certificate or notice
extending the term of a contract beyond its policy period or term.
However, (a) any contract of insurance with a policy period or term of
six months or less whether or not made continuous for successive terms
upon the payment of additional premiums shall for the purpose of RCW
48.18.290 and 48.18.293 through 48.18.295 be considered as if written
for a policy period or term of six months; and (b) any policy written
for a term longer than one year or any policy with no fixed expiration
date, shall, for the purpose of RCW 48.18.290 and 48.18.293 through
48.18.295, be considered as if written for successive policy periods or
terms of one year.
(5) A midterm blanket reduction in rate, approved by the
commissioner, for medical malpractice insurance shall not be considered
a renewal for purposes of this section.

Medical Malpractice Closed Claim Reporting
NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Claim" means a demand for payment of a loss caused by medical
malpractice.
(a) Two or more claims, or a single claim naming multiple health
care providers or facilities, arising out of a single injury or
incident of medical malpractice is one claim.
(b) A series of related incidents of medical malpractice is one
claim.
(2) "Claimant" means a person filing a claim against a health care
provider or health care facility.
(3) "Closed claim" means a claim concluded with or without payment
and for which all administrative activity has been finalized by the
insuring entity or self-insurer.
(4) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner.
(5) "Health care facility" or "facility" means a clinic, diagnostic
center, hospital, laboratory, mental health center, nursing home,
office, surgical facility, treatment facility, or similar place where
a health care provider provides health care to patients.
(6) "Health care provider" or "provider" means a physician licensed
under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician licensed under
chapter 18.57 RCW, a podiatric physician licensed under chapter 18.22
RCW, a dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW, a chiropractor
licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW, an advance registered nurse
practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, a physician assistant
licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, and a naturopath licensed under
chapter 18.36A RCW.
(7) "Insuring entity" means:
(a) An insurer;
(b) A joint underwriting association;
(c) A risk retention group; or
(d) An unauthorized insurer that provides surplus lines coverage.
(8) "Medical malpractice" means a negligent act, error, or omission
in providing or failing to provide professional health care services
that is actionable under chapter 7.70 RCW.
(9) "Self-insurer" means any health care provider, facility, or
other individual or entity that assumes operational or financial risk
for claims of medical malpractice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 (1) Beginning April 1, 2006, every self-insurer or insuring entity that provides medical malpractice insurance
to any facility or provider in Washington state must report to the
commissioner any closed claim related to medical malpractice, if the
claim resulted in a final:
(a) Judgment in any amount;
(b) Settlement or payment in any amount; or
(c) Disposition of a medical malpractice claim resulting in no
indemnity payment on behalf of an insured.
(2) If a claim is not reported by an insuring entity or self-insurer under subsection (1) of this section due to limitations in the
medical malpractice coverage of a facility or provider, the facility or
provider must report the claim to the commissioner.
(3) Reports under this section must be filed with the commissioner
within sixty days after the claim is closed by the insuring entity or
self-insurer.
(4)(a) The commissioner may impose a fine of up to two hundred
fifty dollars per day per case against any insuring entity that
violates the requirements of this section. The total fine per case may
not exceed ten thousand dollars.
(b) The department of health may impose a fine of up to two hundred
fifty dollars per day per case against any facility or provider that
violates the requirements of this section. The total fine per case may
not exceed ten thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 The reports required under section 306 of
this act must contain the following data in a form and with coding
prescribed by the commissioner for each claim:
(1) A unique number assigned to the claim by the insuring entity or
self-insurer to serve as an identifier for the claim;
(2) The type of health care provider, including the provider's
medical specialty; the type of facility, if any, and the location
within the facility where the injury occurred;
(3) The date of the event that resulted in the claim;
(4) The county or counties in which the event that resulted in the
claim occurred;
(5) The date the claim was reported to the insuring entity, self-insurer, facility, or provider;
(6) The date of suit, if filed;
(7) The claimant's age and sex;
(8) Specific information about the judgment or settlement
including:
(a) The date and amount of any judgment or settlement;
(b) Whether the settlement:
(i) Was the result of a judgment, arbitration, or mediation; and
(ii) Occurred before or after trial;
(c) For claims that result in a verdict or judgment that itemizes
damages:
(i) Economic damages, such as incurred and anticipated medical
expense and lost wages;
(ii) Noneconomic damages; and
(iii) Allocated loss adjustment expense, including but not limited
to court costs, attorneys' fees, and costs of expert witnesses;
(d) For claims that do not result in a verdict or judgment that
itemizes damages:
(i) Total damages; and
(ii) Allocated loss adjustment expense, including but not limited
to court costs, attorneys' fees, and costs of expert witnesses; and
(e) If there is no judgment or settlement:
(i) The date and reason for final disposition; and
(ii) The date the claim was closed; and
(9) The reason for the medical malpractice claim. The commissioner
shall use the same coding of reasons for malpractice claims as those
used for mandatory reporting to the national practitioner data bank, in
the federal department of health and human services, as provided in 42
U.S.C. Secs. 11131 and 11134, as amended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 The commissioner must prepare aggregate
statistical summaries of closed claims based on calendar year data
submitted under section 306 of this act.
(1) At a minimum, data must be sorted by calendar year and calendar
incident year. The commissioner may also decide to display data in
other ways.
(2) The summaries must be available by March 31st of each year.
(3) Information included in an individual closed claim report
submitted by an insurer or self-insurer under this chapter is
confidential, is exempt from public disclosure, and may not be made
available by the commissioner to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 Beginning in 2006, the commissioner must
prepare an annual report by June 30th that summarizes and analyzes the
closed claim reports for medical malpractice filed under section 306 of
this act and the annual financial reports filed by insurers writing
medical malpractice insurance in this state. The report must include:
(1) An analysis of closed claim reports of prior years for which
data are collected and show:
(a) Trends in the frequency and severity of claims payments;
(b) An itemization of economic and noneconomic damages;
(c) An itemization of allocated loss adjustment expenses;
(d) The types of medical malpractice for which claims have been
paid; and
(e) Any other information the commissioner determines illustrates
trends in closed claims;
(2) An analysis of the medical malpractice insurance market in
Washington state, including:
(a) An analysis of the financial reports of the insurers with a
combined market share of at least ninety percent of net written medical
malpractice premium in Washington state for the prior calendar year;
(b) A loss ratio analysis of medical malpractice insurance written
in Washington state; and
(c) A profitability analysis of each insurer writing medical
malpractice insurance;
(3) A comparison of loss ratios and the profitability of medical
malpractice insurance in Washington state to other states based on
financial reports filed with the national association of insurance
commissioners and any other source of information the commissioner
deems relevant;
(4) A summary of the rate filings for medical malpractice that have
been approved by the commissioner for the prior calendar year,
including an analysis of the trend of direct and incurred losses as
compared to prior years;
(5) The commissioner must post reports required by this section on
the internet no later than thirty days after they are due; and
(6) The commissioner may adopt rules that require insuring entities
and self-insurers required to report under section 306(1) of this act
to report data related to:
(a) The frequency and severity of open claims for the reporting
period;
(b) The aggregate amounts reserved for incurred claims;
(c) Changes in reserves from the previous reporting period; and
(d) Any other information that helps the commissioner monitor
losses and claims development in the Washington state medical
malpractice insurance market.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 The commissioner shall adopt all rules
needed to implement this chapter. To ensure that claimants, health
care providers, health care facilities, and self-insurers cannot be
individually identified when data is disclosed to the public, the
commissioner shall adopt rules that require the protection of
information that, in combination, could result in the ability to
identify the claimant, health care provider, health care facility, or
self-insurer in a particular claim or collection of claims.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In any action filed under this chapter that results in a final:
(1) Judgment in any amount;
(2) Settlement or payment in any amount; or
(3) Disposition resulting in no indemnity payment,
the claimant or his or her attorney shall report to the office of the
insurance commissioner on forms provided by the commissioner any court
costs, attorneys' fees, or costs of expert witnesses incurred in
pursuing the action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 If the national association of insurance
commissioners adopts model medical malpractice reporting standards, the
insurance commissioner must analyze the model standards and report to
the legislature on or before the December 1st subsequent to the
adoption of the model standards. The report must include an analysis
of any differences between the model standards and sections 305 through
310 of this act and make recommendations, if any, regarding possible
legislative changes. The report must be made to the house of
representatives committees on health care; financial institutions and
insurance; and judiciary and the senate committees on health and long-term care; financial institutions, housing and consumer protection; and
judiciary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313 A new section is added to chapter 42.17
RCW to read as follows:
Information in a closed claim report filed under section 307 of
this act that alone or in combination could result in the ability to
identify a claimant, health care provider, health care facility, or
self-insurer involved in a particular claim is exempt from disclosure
under this chapter.

PART IV - MEDICAL MALPRACTICE PREMIUM ASSISTANCE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 The department of health shall develop,
in consultation with the department of revenue, a program to provide
business and occupation tax credits for physicians who serve uninsured,
medicare, and medicaid patients in a private practice or a reduced fee
access program for the uninsured and shall submit proposed legislation
to the legislature by December 15, 2005.

PART V - CIVIL JUSTICE REFORMExpert Witness Qualifications and Limits
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an action against a health care provider under this chapter,
an expert may not provide testimony at trial unless the expert meets
the following criteria:
(a) Has expertise in the medical condition at issue in the action;
and
(b) At the time of the occurrence of the incident at issue in the
action, or at the time of retirement in the case of an expert who
retired no sooner than five years prior to the time the action is
commenced, was either:
(i) Engaged in active practice in the same or similar area of
practice or specialty as the defendant; or
(ii) Teaching at an accredited medical school or an accredited or
affiliated academic or clinical training program in the same or similar
area of practice or specialty as the defendant, including instruction
regarding the particular condition at issue.
(2) Upon motion of a party, the court may waive the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section and allow an expert who does not meet
those requirements to testify at trial if the court finds that:
(a) Extensive efforts were made by the party to locate an expert
who meets the criteria under subsection (1) of this section, but none
was willing and available to testify; and
(b) The proposed expert is qualified to be an expert witness by
virtue of the person's training, experience, and knowledge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
An expert opinion provided in the course of an action against a
health care provider under this chapter must be corroborated by
admissible evidence, such as, but not limited to, treatment or practice
protocols or guidelines developed by medical specialty organizations,
objective academic research, clinical trials or studies, or widely
accepted clinical practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In any action under this chapter, each party shall presumptively be
entitled to only two independent experts on an issue, except upon a
showing of good cause. The court, upon a showing of good cause, shall
allow additional experts on an issue to be called as the court deems
appropriate.

Certificate of Merit
NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In an action against an individual health care provider under
this chapter for personal injury or wrongful death in which the injury
is alleged to have been caused by an act or omission that violates the
accepted standard of care, the plaintiff must file a certificate of
merit at the time of commencing the action. If the action is commenced
within forty-five days of the expiration of the applicable statute of
limitations, the plaintiff must file the certificate of merit within
forty-five days of commencing the action.
(2) The certificate of merit must be executed by a health care
provider who meets the qualifications of an expert under this chapter.
If there is more than one defendant in the action, the person
commencing the action must file a certificate of merit for each
defendant.
(3) The certificate of merit must contain a statement that the
person executing the certificate of merit believes, based on the
information known at the time of executing the certificate of merit,
that there is a reasonable probability that the defendant's conduct did
not follow the accepted standard of care required to be exercised by
the defendant.
(4) Upon motion of the plaintiff, the court may grant an additional
period of time to file the certificate of merit, not to exceed ninety
days, if the court finds there is good cause for the extension.
(5)(a) Failure to file a certificate of merit that complies with
the requirements of this section is grounds for dismissal of the case.
(b) If a case is dismissed for failure to file a certificate of
merit that complies with the requirements of this section, the filing
of the claim against the health care provider shall not be used against
the health care provider in professional liability insurance rate
setting, personal credit history, or professional licensing and
credentialing.

Statute of Limitations Reform
Sec. 505 RCW 4.16.350 and 1998 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any civil action or arbitration for damages for injury or death
occurring as a result of health care or related services, or the
arranging for the provision of health care or related services, which
is provided after June 25, 1976, against((:
(1) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or
related services, including, but not limited to, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician
and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist,
pharmacist, optician, physician's assistant, osteopathic physician's
assistant, nurse practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive
care paramedic, including, in the event such person is deceased, his
estate or personal representative;
(2) An employee or agent of a person described in subsection (1) of
this section, acting in the course and scope of his employment,
including, in the event such employee or agent is deceased, his estate
or personal representative; or
(3) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in subsection (1)
of this section, including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic,
health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or an officer,
director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and scope of
his employment, including, in the event such officer, director,
employee, or agent is deceased, his estate or personal
representative;)) a health care provider as defined in RCW 7.70.020, or
a health care institution, based upon alleged professional negligence
shall be commenced within three years of the act or omission alleged to
have caused the injury, death, or condition, or within one year of the
time the patient or his or her representative or custodial parent or
guardian discovered or reasonably should have discovered that the
injury, death, or condition was caused by said act or omission,
whichever period ((expires later, except that in no event shall an
action be commenced more than eight years after said act or omission:
PROVIDED, That the time for commencement of an action is tolled upon
proof of fraud, intentional concealment, or the presence of a foreign
body not intended to have a therapeutic or diagnostic purpose or
effect, until the date the patient or the patient's representative has
actual knowledge of the act of fraud or concealment, or of the presence
of the foreign body; the patient or the patient's representative has
one year from the date of the actual knowledge in which to commence a
civil action for damages.
For purposes of this section, notwithstanding RCW 4.16.190, the
knowledge of a custodial parent or guardian shall be imputed to a
person under the age of eighteen years, and such imputed knowledge
shall operate to bar the claim of such minor to the same extent that
the claim of an adult would be barred under this section. Any action
not commenced in accordance with this section shall be barred.
For purposes of this section, with respect to care provided after
June 25, 1976, and before August 1, 1986, the knowledge of a custodial
parent or guardian shall be imputed as of April 29, 1987, to persons
under the age of eighteen years)) occurs first.
(2) In no event may an action be commenced more than three years
after the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury or
condition except:
(a) Upon proof of fraud, intentional concealment, or the presence
of a foreign body not intended to have a therapeutic or diagnostic
purpose or effect, in which case the patient or the patient's
representative has one year from the date the patient or the patient's
representative or custodial parent or guardian has actual knowledge of
the act of fraud or concealment or of the presence of the foreign body
within which to commence a civil action for damages.
(b) In the case of a minor, upon proof that the minor's custodial
parent or guardian and the defendant or the defendant's insurer have
committed fraud or collusion in the failure to bring an action on
behalf of the minor, in which case the patient or the patient's
representative has one year from the date the patient or the patient's
representative other than the custodial parent or guardian who
committed the fraud or collusion has actual knowledge of the fraud or
collusion, or one year from the date of the minor's eighteenth
birthday, whichever provides a longer period.
(c) In the case of a minor under the full age of six years, in
which case the action on behalf of the minor must be commenced within
three years, or prior to the minor's eighth birthday, whichever
provides a longer period.
(3) For purposes of this section, the tolling provisions of RCW
4.16.190 do not apply.
(4) This section does not apply to a civil action based on
intentional conduct brought against those individuals or entities
specified in this section by a person for recovery of damages for
injury occurring as a result of childhood sexual abuse as defined in
RCW 4.16.340(5).
(5) This section applies to all causes of action for injury or
death occurring as a result of health care or related services, or the
arranging for the provision of health care or related services, filed
on or after the effective date of this section. However, any action
which, if filed on or after the effective date of this section, would
have been timely under former law, but now would be barred under the
chapter . . ., Laws of 2005 amendments contained in this section, may
be brought within one year following the effective date of this
section.
(6) Any action not commenced in accordance with this section is
barred.

Encouraging Early Settlement Offers
NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 507
through 511 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Allegedly responsible party" means a health care provider
alleged by the claimant to be responsible for at least some portion of
an injury to the claimant resulting from alleged professional
negligence in the provision of health care.
(2) "Amount recovered" means the total compensation, including the
reasonable value of nonmonetary compensation, that an attorney has
obtained on behalf of a claimant through settlement, arbitration, or
judgment, minus the reasonable costs and expenses incurred by the
attorney in prosecuting or settling the claim.
(3) "Claimant" means any natural person who, in his or her own
right, or vicariously, is seeking compensation in connection with a
claim under this chapter for personal injury or wrongful death as a
result of alleged professional negligence in the provision of health
care.
(4) "Collateral source" means compensation or benefits paid or
payable to the claimant or on the claimant's behalf, to compensate the
claimant for the injury complained of, regardless of the right of
recoupment of any other entity, through subrogation, trust agreement,
lien, or otherwise.
(5) "Contingent fee" means compensation, however calculated, that
is payable only if an amount is recovered.
(6) "Early settlement offer" means a settlement offer made in
accordance with section 507 of this act.
(7) "Economic damages" has the meaning provided in RCW 4.56.250.
(8) "Entity" includes an individual or person.
(9) "Noneconomic damages" has the meaning provided in RCW 4.56.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any civil action for damages brought under this chapter
against a health care provider based on alleged professional
negligence, an allegedly responsible party may make an early settlement
offer at any time prior to one hundred twenty days after the claim is
filed with a court. To qualify as an early settlement offer, the offer
must include a good faith offer to compensate the claimant for the
claimant's current and future economic damages suffered as a result of
the allegedly responsible party's act or omission, less collateral
source benefits available to the claimant, and for reasonable hourly
attorneys' fees for the claimant. The early settlement offer must be
in writing and communicated to the claimant by certified mail. The
offer must remain open for acceptance for a minimum of thirty days from
the date the offer is received by the claimant.
(2) An allegedly responsible party may amend or issue an additional
early settlement offer prior to one hundred twenty days after the
action is commenced. The claimant may extend the time for receiving
the offer beyond this period.
(3) An attorney who receives an early settlement offer shall
provide a true and complete copy of the offer to his or her client.
(4) A claimant who agrees in writing to an early settlement offer
may not bring or continue a civil action, based on the same alleged
professional negligence, against the allegedly responsible party who
made the early settlement offer or any other allegedly responsible
parties who joined in the early settlement offer under subsection (5)
of this section.
(5) An offer under subsection (1) of this section may include other
allegedly responsible parties who were involved in the events that gave
rise to the civil action, regardless of the theory of liability on
which the claim is based, with their consent. If, after an early
settlement offer is made and accepted, the participants in the offer
dispute their relative contributions to the payments to be made to the
claimant, such disputes shall be resolved through binding arbitration
in accordance with chapter 7.04 RCW.
(6) The claimant may reject an offer of compensation made under
subsection (1) of this section and elect to bring or maintain a civil
action for damages. Upon rejection of an offer of compensation that
complies with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the
claimant may recover damages in the civil action only if the claimant
proves by clear and convincing evidence that the allegedly responsible
party caused the injury by reckless, willful, or wanton conduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An attorney who represents a person alleging personal injury or
death resulting from professional negligence in the provision of health
care, and who represents the person on a contingent-fee basis, shall
send a demand for compensation by certified mail to each allegedly
responsible party prior to commencing a court action. In the event
that multiple allegedly responsible parties are known to the attorney,
a demand must be sent on the same date to each party. The demand must
specify the amount of compensation sought and must set forth the
material facts, documentary evidence, and other information relevant to
the demand, including:
(a) The name and address of the claimant or of the person on whose
behalf the claim is being made;
(b) A brief description of how the injury or loss occurred;
(c) The names and, if known, the addresses and telephone numbers of
all known witnesses to the injury or loss;
(d) Copies of photographs in the claimant's possession which relate
to the injury or loss;
(e) The basis for claiming that the party to whom the demand is
addressed is responsible or partially responsible for the injury or
loss;
(f) A description of the nature of the injury or loss, including
the dates and nature of the care or services provided, and the names
and addresses of all physicians and other health care providers that
provided medical care or services to the claimant or injured party;
(g) Medical records relating to the injury, including those
involving a prior injury or preexisting medical condition which would
be discoverable by the allegedly responsible party during the course of
litigation or, in lieu thereof, executed releases authorizing the
allegedly responsible party to obtain the records directly from those
health care providers who provided treatment to the claimant; and
(h) Documentation of any medical expenses, lost wages, personal
losses, and other economic and noneconomic damages suffered as a
consequence of the injury or loss.
(2) The attorney shall mail copies of each demand to the claimant
and to each allegedly responsible party.
(3) A claimant's attorney who learns of an additional allegedly
responsible party after making a demand for compensation under
subsection (1) of this section shall send a demand for compensation to
the newly discovered allegedly responsible party and simultaneously
mail a copy of the demand to each of the other allegedly responsible
parties and to the claimant.
(4) In the event that a claimant's attorney learns of an additional
allegedly responsible party more than ninety days after making a demand
for compensation under subsection (1) of this section, the attorney
shall not be required to send a demand to that party nor do the fee
limitations imposed under section 510 (1) and (2) of this act apply
with regard to an amount recovered from that party, except as provided
by this subsection. An attorney who fails as a result of a breach of
the standard of care to learn of an additional allegedly responsible
party within ninety days of sending a demand for compensation to
another allegedly responsible party shall not collect a fee in excess
of that allowed under section 510 (1) and (2) of this act with respect
to an amount recovered from the additional allegedly responsible party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
An allegedly responsible party is under no obligation to issue a
response to a demand for compensation made under section 508 of this
act. The fact that a demand for compensation was or was not made, the
fact that an early settlement offer was or was not made, and the amount
of any demand or settlement offer made are inadmissible at a trial
arising from the injury or loss.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An attorney who represents a claimant who has accepted an early
settlement offer under section 507 of this act shall not collect an
amount as compensation for the attorney's services that is more than
the attorney's reasonable hourly fees for the services performed.
(2) An attorney who represents a claimant who has rejected or
failed to accept an early settlement offer shall not collect a
contingent fee that is greater than twenty percent of the amount of the
early settlement offer plus the percentage of the amount recovered in
excess of the early settlement offer as was agreed to by the claimant
and the attorney.
(3) A claimant's attorney who has failed to make a demand for
compensation under section 508 of this act, or who has omitted from the
demand any information required under section 508 of this act of a
material nature which the attorney had in his or her possession, or
which was readily available to him or her, or of which the attorney had
knowledge, shall not collect a contingent fee greater than twenty
percent of the amount recovered.
(4) A claimant's attorney who has failed to provide his or her
client a true and complete copy of an early settlement offer received
by the attorney, as required under section 507 of this act, shall not
collect a contingent fee greater than twenty percent of the amount
recovered.
(5) An attorney shall disclose, plainly and in writing, to
claimants whom the attorney proposes to represent on a contingent-fee
basis: (a) The fee limitations imposed by this section; and (b) the
fact that such limitations are maximum limits and that the attorney and
claimant may negotiate a lower fee.
The attorney shall also provide to each claimant a copy of this
act.
(6) The fee limitations imposed by this section may not be waived.
(7) This section applies to all attorneys practicing in this state,
including attorneys prosecuting claims filed in federal court, to the
maximum extent permitted by federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
A fiduciary relationship applies with respect to a fee agreement
between an attorney and a claimant.

Sec. 512 RCW 7.70.070 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The court shall, in any action under this chapter, determine
the reasonableness of each party's attorneys fees. The court shall
take into consideration the following:
(((1))) (a) The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty
of the questions involved, and the skill requisite to perform the legal
service properly;
(((2))) (b) The likelihood, if apparent to the client, that the
acceptance of the particular employment will preclude other employment
by the lawyer;
(((3))) (c) The fee customarily charged in the locality for similar
legal services;
(((4))) (d) The amount involved and the results obtained;
(((5))) (e) The time limitations imposed by the client or by the
circumstances;
(((6))) (f) The nature and length of the professional relationship
with the client;
(((7))) (g) The experience, reputation, and ability of the lawyer
or lawyers performing the services;
(((8))) (h) Whether the fee is fixed or contingent.
(2) An attorney's contingency fee is limited to the maximum
permissible fee allowed under section 510 of this act.

Collateral Source Payment Reform
Sec. 513 RCW 7.70.080 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any party may present evidence to the trier of fact that the
patient or claimant has already been, or will be, compensated for the
injury complained of from ((any source except the assets of the
patient, his representative, or his immediate family, or insurance
purchased with such assets. In the event such evidence is admitted,
the plaintiff may present evidence of an obligation to repay such
compensation. Insurance bargained for or provided on behalf of an
employee shall be considered insurance purchased with the assets of the
employee)) a collateral source. In the event the evidence is admitted,
the other party may present evidence of any amount that was paid or
contributed to secure the right to any compensation. Compensation as
used in this section shall mean payment of money or other property to
or on behalf of the patient or claimant, rendering of services to the
patient free of charge to the patient or claimant, or indemnification
of expenses incurred by or on behalf of the patient or claimant.
Notwithstanding this section, evidence of compensation by a defendant
health care provider may be offered only by that provider.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by state law or superseding federal
law, there is no right of subrogation or reimbursement from the
patient's or claimant's tort recovery with respect to compensation
covered in subsection (1) of this section. This subsection does not
apply to a subrogation or reimbursement right under a contract or other
agreement entered into prior to the effective date of this act.

Presuit Notice and Mandatory Mediation
Sec. 514 RCW 7.70.100 and 1993 c 492 s 419 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No action for damages for injury or death occurring as a result
of health care or related services, or the arranging for the provision
of health care or related services, may be commenced unless the
defendant has been given at least ninety days' notice of the intention
to commence the action. If the notice is served within ninety days
before the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations, the
time for the commencement of the action must be extended ninety days
from the service of the notice.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section are not
applicable with respect to any defendant whose name is unknown to the
plaintiff at the time of filing the complaint and who is identified
therein by a fictitious name.
(3) After the filing of the ninety-day presuit notice, and before
a superior court trial, all causes of action, whether based in tort,
contract, or otherwise, for damages ((arising from)) for injury or
death occurring as a result of health care or related services, or the
arranging for the provision of health care or related services,
provided after July 1, 1993, shall be subject to mandatory mediation
prior to trial.
(((2))) (4) The supreme court shall by rule adopt procedures to
implement mandatory mediation of actions under this chapter. The rules
shall require mandatory mediation without exception and address, at a
minimum:
(a) Procedures for the appointment of, and qualifications of,
mediators. A mediator shall have experience or expertise related to
actions arising from injury occurring as a result of health care, and
be a member of the state bar association who has been admitted to the
bar for a minimum of five years or who is a retired judge. The parties
may stipulate to a nonlawyer mediator. The court may prescribe
additional qualifications of mediators;
(b) Appropriate limits on the amount or manner of compensation of
mediators;
(c) The number of days following the filing of a claim ((under this
chapter)) within which a mediator must be selected;
(d) The method by which a mediator is selected. The rule shall
provide for designation of a mediator by the superior court if the
parties are unable to agree upon a mediator;
(e) The number of days following the selection of a mediator within
which a mediation conference must be held;
(f) A means by which mediation of an action ((under this chapter))
may be waived by a mediator who has determined that the claim is not
appropriate for mediation; and
(g) Any other matters deemed necessary by the court.
(((3))) (5) Mediators shall not impose discovery schedules upon the
parties.
(6) The supreme court shall by rule also adopt procedures for the
parties to certify to the court the manner of mediation used by the
parties to comply with this section.

Promoting Periodic Payments of Future Damages
NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Future damages" includes damages for future health care or
related services, care or custody, loss of future earnings, loss of
bodily function, or future pain and suffering of the judgment creditor.
(b) "Periodic payments" means the payment of money or delivery of
other property to the judgment creditor at regular intervals.
(2) In any action for damages for injury occurring as a result of
health care or related services, or for the arranging for the provision
of health care or related services, the court shall, at the request of
either party, enter a judgment ordering that money damages or its
equivalent for future damages of the judgment creditor be paid in whole
or in part by periodic payments rather than by a lump-sum payment if
the award equals or exceeds fifty thousand dollars in future damages.
In entering a judgment ordering the payment of future damages by
periodic payments, the court shall make a specific finding as to the
dollar amount of periodic payments which will compensate the judgment
creditor for such future damages. As a condition to authorizing
periodic payments of future damages, the court shall require the
judgment debtor who is not adequately insured to post security adequate
to ensure full payment of such damages awarded by the judgment. Upon
termination of periodic payments of future damages, the court shall
order the return of this security, or so much as remains, to the
judgment debtor.
(3)(a) The judgment ordering the payment of future damages by
periodic payments must specify the recipient or recipients of the
payments, the dollar amount of the payments, the interval between
payments, and the number of payments or the period of time over which
payments must be made. The payments are only subject to modification
in the event of the death of the judgment creditor.
(b) In the event that the court finds that the judgment debtor has
exhibited a continuing pattern of failing to make the payments, as
specified in (a) of this subsection, the court shall find the judgment
debtor in contempt of court and, in addition to the required periodic
payments, shall order the judgment debtor to pay the judgment creditor
all damages caused by the failure to make such periodic payments,
including court costs and attorneys' fees.
(4) In the event of the death of the judgment creditor, the court,
upon petition of any party in interest, shall modify the judgment to
eliminate future periodic payments of damages awarded for future
medical treatment, care or custody, loss of bodily function, or future
pain and suffering of the judgment creditor. However, money damages
awarded for loss of future earnings may not be reduced or payments
terminated by reason of the death of the judgment creditor, but must be
paid to persons to whom the judgment creditor owed a duty of support,
as provided by law, immediately prior to his or her death. In such
cases, the court that rendered the original judgment may, upon petition
of any party in interest, modify the judgment to award and apportion
the unpaid future damages in accordance with this subsection (4).
(5) Following the occurrence or expiration of all obligations
specified in the periodic payment judgment, any obligation of the
judgment debtor to make further payments ceases and any security given
under subsection (2) of this section reverts to the judgment debtor.
(6) For purposes of this section, the provisions of RCW 4.56.250 do
not apply.
(7) It is intended in enacting this section to authorize, in
actions for damages for injury occurring as a result of health care or
related services, or the arranging for the provision of health care or
related services, the entry of judgments that provide for the payment
of future damages through periodic payments rather than lump-sum
payments. By authorizing periodic payment judgments, it is further
intended that the courts will utilize such judgments to provide
compensation sufficient to meet the needs of an injured plaintiff and
those persons who are dependent on the plaintiff for whatever period is
necessary while eliminating the potential windfall from a lump-sum
recovery that was intended to provide for the care of an injured
plaintiff over an extended period who then dies shortly after the
judgment is paid, leaving the balance of the judgment award to persons
and purposes for which it was not intended. It is also intended that
all elements of the periodic payment program be specified with
certainty in the judgment ordering such payments and that the judgment
not be subject to modification at some future time that might alter the
specifications of the original judgment, except in the event of the
death of the judgment creditor.

Joint and Several Liability Reform
Sec. 516 RCW 4.22.070 and 1993 c 496 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In all actions involving fault of more than one entity, the
trier of fact shall determine the percentage of the total fault which
is attributable to every entity which caused the claimant's damages
except entities immune from liability to the claimant under Title 51
RCW. The sum of the percentages of the total fault attributed to at-fault entities shall equal one hundred percent. The entities whose
fault shall be determined include the claimant or person suffering
personal injury or incurring property damage, defendants, third-party
defendants, entities ((released by)) who have entered into a release,
covenant not to sue, covenant not to enforce judgment, or similar
agreement with the claimant, entities with any other individual defense
against the claimant, and entities immune from liability to the
claimant, but shall not include those entities immune from liability to
the claimant under Title 51 RCW. Judgment shall be entered against
each defendant except those entities who have ((been released by))
entered into a release, covenant not to sue, covenant not to enforce
judgment, or similar agreement with the claimant or are immune from
liability to the claimant or have prevailed on any other individual
defense against the claimant in an amount which represents that party's
proportionate share of the claimant's total damages. The liability of
each defendant shall be several only and shall not be joint except:
(a) A party shall be responsible for the fault of another person or
for payment of the proportionate share of another party where both were
acting in concert or when a person was acting as an agent or servant of
the party.
(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, if the
trier of fact determines that the claimant or party suffering bodily
injury or incurring property damages was not at fault, the defendants
against whom judgment is entered shall be jointly and severally liable
for the sum of their proportionate shares of the ((claimants
[claimant's])) claimant's total damages.
(ii) (b)(i) of this subsection does not apply to a health care
provider as defined in RCW 7.70.020 in an action for damages for injury
or death occurring as a result of health care or related services, or
the arranging for the provision of health care or related services,
whether brought under chapter 7.70 RCW, RCW 4.20.010, 4.20.020,
4.20.046, 4.24.010, or 48.43.545(1), any other applicable law, or any
combination thereof, with respect to judgments for noneconomic damages.
In all actions for damages for injury or death occurring as a result of
health care or related services, or the arranging for the provision of
health care or related services, the liability of a health care
provider for noneconomic damages is several only. For the purposes of
this subsection, "noneconomic damages" has the meaning given in RCW
4.56.250.
(2) If a defendant is jointly and severally liable under one of the
exceptions listed in subsection((s)) (1)(a) or (((1))) (b) of this
section, such defendant's rights to contribution against another
jointly and severally liable defendant, and the effect of settlement by
either such defendant, shall be determined under RCW 4.22.040,
4.22.050, and 4.22.060.
(3)(a) Nothing in this section affects any cause of action relating
to hazardous wastes or substances or solid waste disposal sites.
(b) Nothing in this section shall affect a cause of action arising
from the tortious interference with contracts or business relations.
(c) Nothing in this section shall affect any cause of action
arising from the manufacture or marketing of a fungible product in a
generic form which contains no clearly identifiable shape, color, or
marking.

Sec. 517 RCW 4.22.015 and 1981 c 27 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Fault" includes acts or omissions, including misuse of a product,
that are in any measure negligent or reckless toward the person or
property of the actor or others, or that subject a person to strict
tort liability or liability on a product liability claim. The term
also includes breach of warranty, unreasonable assumption of risk, and
unreasonable failure to avoid an injury or to mitigate damages. Legal
requirements of causal relation apply both to fault as the basis for
liability and to contributory fault.
A comparison of fault for any purpose under RCW 4.22.005 through
((4.22.060)) 4.22.070 shall involve consideration of both the nature of
the conduct of the parties to the action and the extent of the causal
relation between such conduct and the damages.

Preventing Frivolous Lawsuits
NEW SECTION. Sec. 518 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any action under this section, an attorney that has drafted,
or assisted in drafting and filing an action, counterclaim,
cross-claim, third-party claim, or a defense to a claim, upon signature
and filing, certifies that to the best of the party's or attorney's
knowledge, information, and belief, formed after reasonable inquiry it
is not frivolous, and is well grounded in fact and is warranted by
existing law or a good faith argument for the extension, modification,
or reversal of existing law, and that it is not interposed for any
improper purpose, such as to harass or to cause frivolous litigation.
If an action is signed and filed in violation of this rule, the court,
upon motion or upon its own initiative, may impose upon the person who
signed it, a represented party, or both, an appropriate sanction, which
may include an order to pay to the other party or parties the amount of
the reasonable expenses incurred because of the filing of the action,
counterclaim, cross-claim, third-party claim, or a defense to a claim,
including a reasonable attorney fee. The procedures governing the
enforcement of RCW 4.84.185 shall apply to this section.
(2) Within one hundred twenty days after filing a lawsuit under
this chapter, the attorney of record, or the plaintiff if pro se, must
file a certificate of merit. The certificate must state that the
attorney or pro se plaintiff has consulted with a qualified expert who
believes on a more probable than not basis that the claim set forth
satisfies at least one of the basis for recovery under this chapter.
Upon a showing of good cause, a court may extend the time frame for
filing the certificate for a period not to exceed sixty days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 519 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In any action brought under this chapter that is tried by jury, the
judge shall present the following questions to the jury after the jury
has delivered its verdict in the proceeding. The questions shall be
considered and answered by the jury in a deliberative process and the
results announced in open court.
(1) Do you as a jury believe any pleading, claim, or issue in this
case was frivolous? To decide that a pleading, claim, or issue in this
case was frivolous you must decide at least one of the following in the
affirmative:
(a) The pleading, claim, or issue was primarily filed, brought, or
raised by a party for an improper purpose. "Improper purpose" means
that the pleading, claim, or issue was filed, brought, or raised with
the purpose of harassing, embarrassing, or coercing another party,
causing unnecessary delay, or needlessly increasing litigation costs.
(b) The pleading, claim, or issue was filed, brought, or raised in
bad faith. "Bad faith" means that the party either knew reasonable
grounds did not exist for filing, bringing, or raising the pleading,
claim, or issue, or the party acted with reckless disregard as to
whether or not reasonable grounds existed for filing, bringing, or
raising the pleading, claim, or issue.
(2) If your answers to the question in both (a) and (b) of
subsection (1) of this section are "No" do not proceed further. If
your answer is "Yes" to a question in either (a) or (b) of subsection
(1) of this section, you must make one of the following
recommendations:
(a) We recommend that . . . . . . (name of party) be required to
pay sanctions in the amount of . . . . . dollars, payable to . . . . .
(name of party) as a result of filing, bringing, or raising a frivolous
pleading, claim, or issue.
(b) We do not believe that a monetary sanction should be imposed
against . . . . . . (name of party) for filing, bringing, or raising a
frivolous pleading, claim, or issue.
(3) The court shall take the jury's recommendation under
consideration in deciding whether to impose sanctions against a party
for filing, bringing, or raising a frivolous pleading, claim, or issue.
The court shall enter into the record written findings and conclusions
in accepting or rejecting the jury's recommendations.
(4) In addition to any other remedies provided in RCW 4.84.185 or
by court rule, sanctions that may be imposed under this section at the
discretion of the court for filing, bringing, or raising a frivolous
pleading, claim, or issue include the payment of reasonable costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees of the other party caused in responding to
the frivolous pleading, claim, or issue, and a monetary penalty on the
party or party's attorney who brought the frivolous pleading, claim, or
issue, and the firm with which the attorney is employed or associated.

PART VI - MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 The index, part headings, and subheadings
used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 (1) Sections 115 through 119 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.
(2) Sections 305 through 310 of this act constitute a new chapter
in Title 48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 This act constitutes an alternative to
Initiative 330. The secretary of state shall place this act on the
ballot in conjunction with Initiative 330 at the next regular general
election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 This act constitutes an alternative to
Initiative 336. The secretary of state shall place this act on the
ballot in conjunction with Initiative 336 at the next regular general
election.

INDEX PAGE #

BURDEN OF PROOF FOR LICENSE SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
CANCELLATION OR NONRENEWAL OF LIABILITY INSURANCE POLICIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
CERTIFICATE OF MERIT . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
CIVIL JUSTICE REFORM . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
COLLATERAL SOURCE PAYMENT REFORM . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
COORDINATED QUALITY IMPROVEMENT PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
DISCIPLINARY HEARINGS FOR PHYSICIANS AND PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
ENCOURAGING EARLY SETTLEMENT OFFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
ENCOURAGING PATIENT SAFETY THROUGH COMMUNICATIONS WITH PATIENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
EXPERT WITNESS QUALIFICATIONS AND LIMITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
FUNDING PATIENT SAFETY EFFORTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
INCREASING PATIENT SAFETY BY DISCLOSURE AND ANALYSIS OF ADVERSE EVENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
INSURANCE REFORM . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
JOINT AND SEVERAL LIABILITY REFORM . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
LICENSE REVOCATION FOR THREE ACTS OF UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
MEDICAL DISCIPLINE . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
MEDICAL MALPRACTICE CLOSED CLAIM REPORTING . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
MEDICAL MALPRACTICE PREMIUM ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 57
PATIENT SAFETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 1
PRESCRIPTION LEGIBILITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
PRESUIT NOTICE AND MANDATORY MEDIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
PREVENTING FRIVOLOUS LAWSUITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 55
PROMOTING PERIODIC PAYMENTS OF FUTURE DAMAGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
REPORTS OF UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT OR LACK OF CAPACITY TO PRACTICE SAFELY . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS REFORM . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
UNDERWRITING STANDARDS . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
--- END ---