BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A budget is hereby adopted and, subject
to the provisions set forth in the following sections, the several
amounts specified in parts I through VIII of this act, or so much
thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated,
are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries,
wages, and other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and
for other specified purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1,
2005, and ending June 30, 2007, except as otherwise provided, out of
the several funds of the state hereinafter named.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2006" or "FY 2006" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2006.
(b) "Fiscal year 2007" or "FY 2007" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007.
(c) "FTE" means full time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion
of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose which is
unnecessary to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,950,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,193,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,143,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,980,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,827,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,852,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW
COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,816,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,912,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,728,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,732,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,885,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,617,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,209,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS
COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,221,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,223,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,444,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,176,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,330,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,506,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES. In order to achieve
operating efficiencies within the financial resources available to the
legislative branch, the executive rules committee of the house of
representatives and the facilities and operations committee of the
senate by joint action may transfer funds among the house of
representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and review committee,
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
legislative transportation committee, office of the state actuary,
joint legislative systems committee, and statute law committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,106,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,303,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,409,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,021,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,024,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,045,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,863,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,127,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,990,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $996,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,026,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,022,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,648,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,957,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,151,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,614,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,370,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office of administrator for the courts
shall conduct a study of the revenues and expenditures of the public
safety and education account, and make recommendations on the long-term
sustainability of the account. The office shall consult with affected
agencies, the office of financial management, and the appropriate
fiscal committees of the legislature. The office of administrator for
the courts shall submit its report to the senate ways and means
committee, the house of representatives appropriations committee, and
the office of financial management no later than October 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,465,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,853,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,549,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,867,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $6,000,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely to expand the parent representation
project in dependency and termination cases. If sections 301 through
311 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5454 are not enacted
by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $600,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely to contract with the Washington
defender association to continue services previously funded from the
federal drug control and system improvement formula grant through the
department of community, trade, and economic development. If sections
301 through 311 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5454 are
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,948,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,102,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,112,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,512,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,112,000 of the water quality account appropriation and
$1,150,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided
solely for the Puget Sound water quality action team to implement the
Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan action items PSAT-01 through
PSAT-06.
(2) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $200,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for one-time corrective actions to address Hood canal's
dissolved oxygen problems, the Puget Sound conservation and recovery
plan action item PSAT-07.
(3) The Puget Sound water quality action team shall make
recommendations to improve, change, or eliminate monitoring activities
that impact performance measures related to salmon recovery and
watershed health. The Puget Sound water quality action team shall
coordinate with the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health
and consult with the office of financial management in determining the
scope and contents of this report.
In preparing these recommendations, the Puget Sound water quality
action team shall prepare a report detailing all new activity and
updating all previously identified activity within the comprehensive
monitoring strategy with a focus on salmon recovery and watershed
health related monitoring activity within the agency. At a minimum,
the report shall include sufficient detail identifying the specific
salmon recovery and watershed health monitoring activity being
performed and include: Precise costs by fund source, a narrative
stating why it is required, when the activity started, the frequency of
data collection, and geographic location of data being collected.
Furthermore, the agency shall also provide sufficient detail that
describes the purpose of each monitoring activity, who uses the
information, how often it is accessed, where the information is stored,
and the current status and cost, by fund source, of the data storage
systems housing each monitoring activity identified within the agency.
The Puget Sound water quality action team shall provide a status
report summarizing progress to the governor's forum on monitoring and
watershed health and the office of financial management by March 1,
2006. A final report to the governor's forum on monitoring and
watershed health, the office of financial management, and legislative
fiscal committees is due no later than September 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $686,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $688,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,374,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,016,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,947,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,963,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,469,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,557,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,025,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,025,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $702,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,773,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,993,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $109,544,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,296,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2) $1,999,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,403,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the verification of initiative
and referendum petitions, maintenance of related voter registration
records, and the publication and distribution of the voters and
candidates pamphlet.
(3) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $118,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for legal advertising of state
measures under RCW 29.27.072.
(4)(a) $1,944,004 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $1,986,772 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2005-07 biennium. The funding level
for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in
this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind,
in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The
office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once
all criteria in (a) and (b) of this subsection have been satisfactorily
documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $344,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $349,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $693,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office shall assist the department of
personnel on providing the government-to-government training sessions
for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The
training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal
issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the
training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the
participants of each session. The department of personnel shall be
responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training,
including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN-AMERICAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $298,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $591,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 FOR THE STATE TREASURER
State Treasurer's Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,668,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $731,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $727,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,639,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,097,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Audits of school districts by the division of municipal
corporations shall include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a)
Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience and education of the
district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.
(2) $731,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $727,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for staff and related costs to
verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for
state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state
funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state
funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is
not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits;
and to assist the state special education safety net committee when
requested.
(3) The office shall report to the office of financial management
and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature detailed
information on risk-based auditing, its theory, and its application for
the audits performed on Washington state government. The report shall
include an explanation of how the office identifies, measures, and
prioritizes risk, the manner in which the office uses these factors in
the planning and execution of the audits of Washington state
government, and the methods and procedures used in the conduct of the
risk-based audits themselves. The report is due no later than December
1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES
FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $202,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $335,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124 FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,389,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,269,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,927,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,239,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,298,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,103,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $197,495,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125 FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $695,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $695,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,390,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,097,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,525,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $252,567,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,175,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,113,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,914,000
Tourism Development and Promotion Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $213,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,108,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,808,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,359,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,198,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $236,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,567,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,881,000
Homeless Families Service Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $601,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $457,968,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
technology center for work essential to the mission of the Washington
technology center and conducted in partnership with universities. The
center shall not pay any increased indirect rate nor increases in other
indirect charges above the absolute amount paid during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium.
(2) $61,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $62,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item CTED-01.
(3) $5,902,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for the justice assistance grant program, to be
distributed in state fiscal year 2006 as follows:
(a) $2,064,000 to local units of government to continue
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;
(b) $330,000 to the department to continue the drug prosecution
assistance program in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces;
(c) $675,000 to the Washington state patrol for coordination,
investigative, and supervisory support to the multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces and for methamphetamine education and response;
(d) $20,000 to the department for tribal law enforcement;
(e) $345,000 to the department to continue domestic violence legal
advocacy;
(f) $60,000 to the department for community-based advocacy services
to victims of violent crime, other than sexual assault and domestic
violence;
(g) $351,000 to the department of social and health services,
division of alcohol and substance abuse, for juvenile drug courts in
eastern and western Washington;
(h) $626,000 to the department of social and health services,
juvenile rehabilitation administration, to continue youth violence
prevention and intervention projects;
(i) $97,000 to the department to continue evaluation of this grant
program;
(j) $290,000 to the office of financial management for criminal
history records improvement;
(k) $580,000 to the department for required grant administration,
monitoring, and reporting on justice assistance grant programs; and
(l) $464,000 to the department for distribution to small
municipalities.
These amounts represent the maximum justice assistance grant
expenditure authority for each program. No program may expend justice
assistance grant funds in excess of the amounts provided in this
subsection. If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this
subsection become available, whether from prior or current fiscal year
distributions, the department shall hold these moneys in reserve and
may not expend them without specific appropriation. These moneys shall
be carried forward and applied to the pool of moneys available for
appropriation for programs and projects in the succeeding fiscal year.
As part of its budget request for the succeeding year, the department
shall estimate and request authority to spend any justice assistance
grant funds.
(4) $205,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $205,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for grants to Washington Columbia
River Gorge counties to implement their responsibilities under the
national scenic area management plan. Of this amount, $390,000 is
provided for Skamania county and $20,000 is provided for Clark county.
(5) $29,871,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $29,900,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for providing early childhood
education assistance. Of these amounts, $2,500,000 in each fiscal year
may be used solely to increase provider contracts, and $1,094,000 in
each fiscal year may be used solely to increase the number of children
receiving education.
(6) Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600,
the mortgage and rental assistance program, shall be remitted to the
department, including any current revolving account balances. The
department shall contract with a lender or contract collection agent to
act as a collection agent of the state. The lender or contract
collection agent shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and
deposit them into an interest-bearing account. The funds collected
shall be remitted to the department quarterly. Interest earned in the
account may be retained by the lender or contract collection agent, and
shall be considered a fee for processing payments on behalf of the
state. Repayments of loans granted under this chapter shall be made to
the lender or contract collection agent as long as the loan is
outstanding, notwithstanding the repeal of the chapter.
(7) $3,000,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely to increase grant funding for civil
legal representation of indigent persons under RCW 43.08.260. If
sections 301 through 311 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5454 are not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(8) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to develop a recommendation of incentives
to recruit and retain filmmaking in Washington state. A report shall
be submitted to the governor and legislature by September 1, 2005.
(9) $1,288,000 of the Washington housing trust account--state
appropriation shall lapse if neither House Bill No. 1074 nor Senate
Bill No. 5108 are enacted by June 30, 2005.
(10) $236,000 of the public works assistance account--state
appropriation is provided solely for technical assistance to
municipalities through the small communities initiative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127 FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST
COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $568,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $503,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,071,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 128 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,277,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,221,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,510,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,479,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the public works assistance account appropriation
is provided solely for an inventory and evaluation of the most
effective way to organize the state public infrastructure programs and
funds. The inventory shall identify: The public infrastructure state
programs and funds and the purposes each serve; how the program or fund
is implemented; the types of public infrastructure projects supported
by the program or fund; the dollar amount of the projects funded by
each program or fund; and the geographic distribution of projects
supported by a program or fund. Where applicable, the inventory shall
identify overlaps or gaps in types of public infrastructure projects
supported through state programs or funds. The evaluation shall
develop recommendations to have the most efficient and effective
programs that fund: Economic development and job growth; repairing
failing systems; expanding systems to handle growth; geographic
diversity; the type of systems; and environmental improvements. The
inventory and evaluation shall be delivered to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2005.
(2)(a) $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for a study of residential services for
persons with developmental disabilities to identify a preferred
continuum of developmental disabilities residential services and
develop recommendations regarding steps to be undertaken to transition
to the preferred system within four years. The study shall make
recommendations by October 1, 2005, regarding the number and
proportions of different types of residential services that should be
available or developed in different regions of the state and how
current resources for residential services may be best allocated to
meet the needs of as many clients as possible, taking client acuity and
geography into consideration. By January 1, 2006, recommendations
shall be complete regarding suggested steps and timeline for
transitioning, within maintenance level funding, the current
residential service system to the preferred residential service system
within four years.
(b) The study shall be overseen by an advisory group consisting of
thirteen members including one representative each of the governor's
office, the office of financial management, the department of social
and health services, and the Washington state developmental
disabilities council, appointed by the governor; one representative of
labor, appointed by the governor; one representative of community
residential care providers, appointed by the governor; one
representative of residents of residential habilitation centers and
their families; one representative of individuals served in community
residential programs and their families, appointed by the governor; one
individual with a developmental disability who is or has been a
resident in a residential habilitation center and who is being or has
been served in a community residential program, appointed by the
governor; and two members of the house of representatives appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives, one of whom shall be a
member of the majority caucus and one of whom shall be a member of the
minority caucus, and two members of the senate appointed by the
president of the senate, one of whom shall be a member of the majority
caucus and one of whom shall be a member of the minority caucus. The
governor shall appoint the chairperson. Legislative members of the
advisory group shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members are entitled to be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. The department of social and health services, the
developmental disabilities council, the office of financial management,
the house of representatives office of program research, and senate
committee services shall provide staff support.
(c) The advisory group may contract for specialized outside
professional services to assist in completing the survey, analysis, and
plan development work described in subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(3) $163,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $127,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1220 (long-term care financing task force).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129 FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,870,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $103,000 of administrative hearing
revolving account--state appropriation is provided solely to determine,
in collaboration with other state agencies, the best mechanism of
digital recording for the office of administrative hearings, the manner
of conversion from tape recording to digital recording, and the
purchase of digital recording devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,758,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,608,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,366,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall coordinate with the
governor's office of Indian affairs on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal
government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal
historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal
governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through
a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department
shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the
training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the
training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY
Lottery Administrative Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,341,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132 FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $296,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $308,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $604,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133 FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $301,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $596,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134 FOR THE PERSONNEL APPEALS BOARD
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,006,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS -- OPERATIONS
Dependent Care Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $404,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,483,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,887,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 136 FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD
State Investment Board Expense Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,719,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 137 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,944,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,961,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,496,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,588,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $51,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $7,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the
implementation of House Bill or Senate Bill No. .... (tax incentives
program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 138 FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,219,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,067,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,286,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139 FOR THE MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL
County Research Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $787,000
City and Town Research Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,134,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,921,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140 FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S
BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,092,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $243,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $228,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,634,000
General Administration Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,848,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,953,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
SERVICES
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $684,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,552,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,236,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143 FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $655,000
Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,029,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,684,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144 FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
Certified Public Accountants' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,929,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 145 FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $282,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the death investigation
account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial
assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations.
The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding
these funds for multiple death investigations involving an
unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving
multiple jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 146 FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION
Horse Racing Commission Operating Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,876,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 147 FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,510,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,503,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,832,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,376,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $164,221,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) As authorized under RCW 66.16.010, the liquor control board
shall add an equivalent surcharge of $0.42 per liter on all retail
sales of spirits, excluding licensee, military and tribal sales,
effective no later than July 1, 2005. The intent of this surcharge is
to generate additional revenues for the state general fund in the
2005-07 biennium.
(2) $154,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the lease of state vehicles from the department
of general administration's motor pool.
(3) $2,228,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for costs associated with the installation of a wide
area network that connects all of the state liquor stores and the
liquor control board headquarters.
(4) $186,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for an alcohol education staff coordinator and
associated alcohol educational resources targeted toward middle school
and high school students.
(5) $2,261,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for replacement of essential computer equipment,
improvement of security measures, and improvement to the core
information technology infrastructure.
(6) $2,800,000 of the liquor control board construction and
maintenance account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
certificate of participation to fund the expansion of the liquor
distribution center.
(7) $3,233,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for upgrades to material handling system and
warehouse management system software and equipment, and associated
staff to increase the liquor distribution center's shipping capacity.
(8) $2,746,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for additional state liquor store and retail
business analysis staff. The additional liquor store staff will be
deployed to those stores with the greatest potential for increased
customer satisfaction and revenue growth. The liquor control board,
using the new retail business analysis staff and, if needed, an
independent consultant, will analyze the impact of additional staff on
customer satisfaction and revenue growth and make recommendations that
will increase the effectiveness and efficiency of all the liquor
control board's retail-related activities. Using best practices and
benchmarks from comparable retail organizations, the analysis will
evaluate and make recommendations, at a minimum, on the following
issues: Optimal staffing levels and store locations and numbers of
stores (both state liquor stores and contract liquor stores); options
for an improved retail organizational structure; strategies to increase
the retail decision-making capacity; and resources required for
enhanced internal organizational support of the retail activities. In
support of this evaluation, a survey shall be employed to gauge
customer satisfaction with state and contract liquor store services.
A written evaluation with recommendations shall be submitted to the
governor and the legislative fiscal committees by October 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 148 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
Public Service Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,727,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,819,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,476,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,022,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 149 FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS
Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'
Administrative Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $754,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,822,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,775,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $151,645,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,705,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,276,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,009,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $302,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,687,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,053,000
Military Department Rental and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $378,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $253,652,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,276,000 of the disaster response account -- state
appropriation and $11,009,000 of the disaster response account -- federal
appropriation may be spent only on disasters declared by the governor
and with the approval of the office of financial management. The
military department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2005-07 biennium based on current revenue and
expenditure patterns.
(2) $6,687,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account -- state
appropriation and $29,053,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--federal appropriation are provided solely for response and recovery
costs associated with the February 28, 2001, earthquake. The military
department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing earthquake
recovery costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b)
incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual
expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and
(e) estimates of future payments by biennium. This information shall
be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and by amount paid on
behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The military
department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2005-07 biennium based on current revenue and
expenditure patterns.
(3) $114,180,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee;
(b) This amount shall not be allotted until a spending plan is
reviewed by the governor's domestic security advisory group and
approved by the office of financial management; and
(c) The department shall submit a quarterly report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for Washington state; incremental changes from
the previous estimate, planned and actual homeland security
expenditures by the state and local governments with this federal
funding; and matching or accompanying state or local expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 151 FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,571,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,573,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,704,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,848,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 152 FOR THE GROWTH PLANNING HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,565,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,557,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,122,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $9,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the
Western Board to relocate. If the Western Board does not relocate by
June 30, 2006, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 153 FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
State Convention and Trade Center Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,512,000
State Convention and Trade Center Operating
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,981,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,493,000

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES. (1) Appropriations made in this act to the department of
social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by
this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include
transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly
provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other
than that purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) The department is authorized to develop an integrated health
care program designed to slow the progression of illness and disability
and better manage Medicaid expenditures for the aged and disabled
population. Under this Washington medicaid integration partnership
(WMIP) the department may combine and transfer such Medicaid funds
appropriated under sections 204, 206, 208, and 209 of this act as may
be necessary to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP program
enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 6,000 persons during the 2005-2007 biennium. The amount
of funding assigned to the pilot projects from each program may not
exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act for individuals
covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the health condition
of persons enrolled in the pilot, times the number of clients enrolled
in the pilot. In implementing the WMIP pilot projects, the department
may: (a) Withhold from calculations of "available resources" as set
forth in RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the capitated rate for
individuals enrolled in the pilots; and (b) employ capitation financing
and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health care service
contractors licensed by the office of the insurance commissioner and
qualified to participate in both the medicaid and medicare programs.
The department shall conduct an evaluation of the WMIP, measuring
changes in participant health outcomes, changes in patterns of service
utilization, participant satisfaction, participant access to services,
and the state fiscal impact.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $248,016,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $255,572,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $417,580,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,141,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,488,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $935,197,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The providers for the 31 HOPE beds shall be paid a $1,000 base
payment per bed per month, and reimbursed for the remainder of the bed
cost only when the beds are occupied.
(2) Within funding provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures. The
department shall adjust adoption support benefits to account for the
availability of the new federal adoption support tax credit for special
needs children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,870,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,965,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,117,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,098,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,060,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,528,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,638,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $695,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation is provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $6,065,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts
provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county
impacts associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $1,204,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,204,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $5,262,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation are provided solely to implement
community juvenile accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws
of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection
may be used solely for community juvenile accountability grants,
administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the
grants.
(4) $2,544,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely to implement alcohol and
substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders.
(5) For the purposes of a pilot project, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall provide a block grant, rather than
categorical funding, for consolidated juvenile services, community
juvenile accountability act grants, the chemically dependent
disposition alternative, and the special sex offender disposition
alternative to the Pierce county juvenile court. To evaluate the
effect of decategorizing funding for youth services, the juvenile court
shall do the following:
(a) Develop intermediate client outcomes according to the risk
assessment tool (RAT) currently used by juvenile courts and in
coordination with the juvenile rehabilitation administration;
(b) Track the number of youth participating in each type of
service, intermediate outcomes, and the incidence of recidivism within
twenty-four months of completion of services;
(c) Track similar data as in (b) of this subsection with an
appropriate control group, selected in coordination with the juvenile
rehabilitation administration; and
(d) Document the process for managing block grant funds on a
quarterly basis, and provide this report to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $261,203,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $272,566,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $336,878,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,970,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $872,617,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Regional support networks shall use
portions of the general fund -- state appropriation for implementation of
working agreements with the vocational rehabilitation program that will
maximize the use of federal funding for vocational programs.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,211,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,808,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,891,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,568,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $382,478,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The mental health program at Western state
hospital shall continue to use labor provided by the Tacoma prerelease
program of the department of corrections.

(3) CIVIL COMMITMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,562,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,013,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,575,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for public safety mitigation
funding for jurisdictions affected by the placement of the secure
community transition facility on McNeil Island. Of this amount,
$45,000 per year shall be provided to the city of Lakewood on September
1, 2005, and September 1, 2006, for police protection services provided
by the city at Western State Hospital and adjacent areas. Of the
remaining $255,000 per year, the department shall reimburse the
affected jurisdictions for their documented costs that have been
negotiated in an interagency agreement between the department and each
jurisdiction, as follows:
(i) Up to $125,000 per year shall be provided to Pierce county for
its additional public safety costs as defined in RCW 71.09.344(2).
(ii) Up to $45,000 per year shall be provided to affected
jurisdictions other than Pierce county for the costs of training their
law enforcement and administrative personnel as defined in RCW
71.09.344(2)(a).
(iii) The remaining amounts are for affected jurisdictions other
than Pierce county for reimbursement of their documented public safety
costs as defined in RCW 71.09.344(2) (b), (c), and (d).
(b) $358,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for mitigation costs associated with the
development and occupancy of the secure community transition facility
in Seattle, as described in the settlement agreement dated February 3,
2004, between the department and the city of Seattle.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,084,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,092,000

(5) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,603,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,641,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,753,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,997,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,547,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $314,898,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $514,055,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $904,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,130,404,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $193,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $368,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $558,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase wages for workers employed by agency home
care providers. The amounts in this subsection also include the funds
needed for the employer share of unemployment and social security taxes
on the amount of the increase.
(b) The entire health services account appropriation and $904,000
of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for
health care benefits for agency home care workers who are employed
through state contracts for at least twenty hours a week. The average
industry cost for the insurance shall be no greater than the monthly
allotment negotiated and provided to independent providers under the
collective bargaining agreement.
(c) Any new funding for family support and high school transition
along with a portion of existing funding for these programs shall be
provided as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental
payments for persons with developmental disabilities in families with
taxable incomes at or below 150 percent of median family income.
Individuals receiving family support or high school transition payments
shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW 74.09.510
due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.
(d) The department may transfer funding provided in this subsection
to meet the purposes of subsection (2) of this section to the extent
that fewer residents of residential habilitation centers choose to move
to community placements than was assumed in this appropriation.
(e) $822,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $719,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $1,540,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims and meeting
the terms of the settlement agreement in the consolidated lawsuits,
Boyle v. Braddock, United States District Court Western District of
Washington at Tacoma, Cause No. C01-5687 FDB and The Arc of Washington
v. Quasim, et al., United States District Court Western District of
Washington at Tacoma, Cause No. C-99-5577 FDB, covering waiver
services. The expenditure of these amounts is contingent on the
release of all claims in the case, and the total settlement costs shall
not exceed the amounts provided in this subsection.
(f) $1,678,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $3,109,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $1,709,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of settling all
claims in The Arc of Washington v. Quasim, et al., United States
District Court Western District of Washington at Tacoma, Cause No.
C-99-5577 FDB, covering waiting list claims. The expenditure of these
amounts is contingent on the release of all claims in the case, and
total settlement costs shall not exceed the amounts provided in this
subsection. If settlement is not fully executed by June 30, 2005, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,693,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,613,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,757,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,992,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $309,055,000

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,236,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,556,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,062,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,854,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $300,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for the purposes of
meeting the terms of the settlement agreement in regards to the award
of attorneys fees in the consolidated lawsuits, Boyle v. Braddock,
United States District Court Western District of Washington at Tacoma,
Cause No. C01-5687 FDB and The Arc of Washington v. Quasim, et al.,
United States District Court Western District of Washington at Tacoma,
Cause No. C-99-5577 FDB, covering waiver services. The expenditure of
this amount is contingent on the release of all claims in the case, and
the total settlement costs shall not exceed the amount provided in this
subsection.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,237,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,245,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $591,619,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $594,286,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,224,893,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,779,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,888,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,434,465,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire health services account appropriation, $610,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006, $610,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and
$5,552,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for health care benefits for agency home care workers who are
employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours a week. The
average industry cost for the insurance shall be no greater than the
monthly allotment negotiated and provided to independent providers
under the collective bargaining agreement.
(2) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $145.15 for
fiscal year 2006 and shall not exceed $145.15 for fiscal year 2007.
(3) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue certificates of capital authorization that result in up to $32
million of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in
fiscal year 2006; up to $32 million of increased asset value completed
and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2007; and up to $32 million of
increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year
2008.
(4) Adult day health services shall not be considered a duplication
of services for persons receiving care in long-term care settings
licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW.
(5) In accordance with chapter 74.39 RCW, the department may
implement two medicaid waiver programs for persons who do not qualify
for such services as categorically needy, subject to federal approval
and the following conditions and limitations:
(a) One waiver program shall include coverage of care in community
residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver shall not exceed 600
persons at any time.
(b) The second waiver program shall include coverage of in-home
care. Enrollment in this second waiver shall not exceed 200 persons at
any time.
(c) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on each of the
two medically needy waivers, on monthly management reports.
(d) If it is necessary to establish a waiting list for either
waiver because the budgeted number of enrollment opportunities has been
reached, the department shall track how the long-term care needs of
applicants assigned to the waiting list are met.
(6) $1,413,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $2,887,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $4,305,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase wages for workers
employed by agency home care providers. The amounts in this subsection
also include the funds needed for the employer share of unemployment
and social security taxes on the amount of the increase.
(7) $291,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1220
(long term care financing task force). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $471,929,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $473,838,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,237,710,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,466,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,214,943,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,047,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,890,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,167,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $626,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,500,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,142,000
Problem Gambling Treatment Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,062,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $273,934,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $966,197 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $966,197 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for the parent child assistance
program. The department shall contract with the University of
Washington and community-based providers in Spokane and Yakima for the
provision of this program. For all contractors, indirect charges for
administering the program shall not exceed ten percent of the total
contract amount.
(2) $1,500,000 of the problem gambling treatment account
appropriation is provided solely for the program established in RCW
43.20A.890. If legislation creating the account is not enacted by June
30, 2005, this appropriation shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,481,053,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,599,718,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,019,212,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $635,860,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,752,843,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the department estimates that expenditures for the medical
assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the department shall
take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or
elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total
program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.
(2) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $6,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental
payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts.
(3) $1,660,000 of the health services account appropriation,
$4,361,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation, $1,350,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006, and
$1,351,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2007 are provided solely for grants to rural hospitals. The department
shall distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively
larger share of the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients
and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the extent
allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(4) $35,514,000 of the health services account appropriation and
$15,514,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided
solely for grants to nonrural hospitals. The department shall
distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively larger
share of the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients
and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the extent
allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(5) In response to the centers for medicare and medicaid services
(CMS)'s directive to eliminate intergovernmental transfer transactions
effective June 30, 2005, the department is directed to implement the
inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program. The program
covers all payments to public hospitals that have not attained critical
access hospital status and to all hospitals owned or operated by the
state. Hospitals in the program will receive the federal funds portion
of each inpatient hospital fee for service claim paid. Inpatient
hospital claims shall be paid at the level that reimburses the federal
portion of total cost to the hospital. Total cost shall be determined
using the current payment methodologies used by the department to pay
claims on a ratio of cost to charges basis. Hospitals in the program
shall receive disproportionate share hospital funds to the limit
allowed under federal regulations, or to the amount historically paid
to them by the department, whichever is lower. Hospitals in the
program shall certify that they have used allowable certified public
expenditures to pay for the required state match portion of the costs.
The hospital shall provide annual certification of the certified public
expenditures used under this program to the department. $22,750,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006, $22,700,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and
$45,450,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided for
a new upper payment limit program for participating hospitals.
$10,417,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2006 and $10,985,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for a new state-only grant program for
participating hospitals.
(6) $4,372,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $4,014,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $65,112,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
a replacement system for the existing medicaid management information
system.
(7) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $225,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the medical assistance administration to contract
for a study of the administration's hospital inpatient payment
structure and recommendations for a new or updated payment structure
that is balanced, equitable, and that uses up-to-date cost data. The
study should make use of complete cost data from a wide variety of
hospitals, it should recognize the unique structure of inpatient
hospital service in Washington, and it should recommend a new or
updated payment system that rewards efficiently operated hospitals.
The study should include, but is not necessarily limited to, the
following: The selective contracting waiver program, border hospital
reimbursements, critical access hospital (CAH) medicaid reimbursements,
graduate medical education payments, and specialty hospital payment
methodologies.
(8) $6,831,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $21,165,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $18,737,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for increases in the rates paid to
Washington state hospitals for inpatient and outpatient care.
Increases shall be made on January 1, 2006, and January 1, 2007, and
shall be allocated among Washington state hospitals with proportionally
higher increases provided to those hospitals with the lowest cost of
care before considering medical education and outlier costs. Increases
shall be provided only on the portion of the hospital's rate that does
not include medical education and outlier costs. Increases shall be
provided in three percentage increments, with the lowest cost hospitals
receiving the greatest percent rate increase, highest cost hospitals
receiving the lowest percent increase, and medium cost hospitals
receiving the average of the highest and the lowest percent rate
increase. Increases shall not be provided to those hospitals that are
certified as critical access. The rate increase in January 2007 shall
be paid out only if the state's hospital reimbursement methodology has
been restructured according to the recommendations of the study
authorized in subsection (7) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,017,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,317,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,265,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $440,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,786,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,552,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,517,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,525,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $810,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,430,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $500,000 of the public safety and
education account--state appropriation is provided solely to continue
funding, through the governor's juvenile justice advisory committee, of
the teamchild project. If sections 301 through 311 of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5454 are not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,964,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,963,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,727,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $136,654,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,766,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,390,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $461,864,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $494,191,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within funds appropriated in this section and sections 205 and
206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to provide an
enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents licensed under
chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care programs.
Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents and home care
workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty
level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at the
minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(2) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals which are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
which choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(3) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(4) $24,108,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
is provided solely for funding for health care services provided
through local community clinics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,578,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,551,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,672,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,801,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE
APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,710,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,709,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,439,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,379,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,987,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,130,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,071,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,830,000
Public Safety and Education Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $782,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,158,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,732,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,569,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $199,360,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,616,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $197,649,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,180,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,560,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,087,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $506,752,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $700,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$699,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the construction of a computer system to collect data from
self-insured employers and are subject to the passage of legislation on
mandatory electronic data reporting by self-insured employers. If the
legislation is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts in this
subsection shall lapse.
(2) $399,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$73,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the management, coordination, and enforcement of laws
related to minor workers and are subject to the passage of legislation
establishing a fee for the administration of child labor laws. If the
legislation is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) The department shall delay the costs associated with
implementation of phase II of its indirect cost allocation plan for the
public works administration account until July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW
BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,057,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,052,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,584,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,244,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,801,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,803,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $318,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,105,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,027,000

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,401,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,387,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,990,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,260,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,038,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,402,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,586,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,041,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,029,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,602,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,277,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,987,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,935,000
Hospital Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,555,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,386,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,567,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,835,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,011,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,085,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,504,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,761,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,806,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,306,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $266,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,917,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,629,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $917,151,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department or any successor agency is authorized to raise
existing fees charged for the clandestine drug lab program, the
drinking water program, radioactive materials license fees, X-ray
facility registration fees, shellfish commercial paralytic shellfish
poisoning fees, the water recreation program, the wastewater management
program, and the midwifery program, in excess of the fiscal growth
factor established by Initiative Measure No. 601, if necessary, to meet
the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in
this section.
(2) $1,713,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2006
appropriation, $1,713,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2007
appropriation, and $676,000 of the general fund--local appropriation,
and $600,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action items, DOH-01,
DOH-02, DOH-03, and DOH-04.
(3) $49,000,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for state grant funding for local public health
districts to support protection and improvement of the public's health
and to increase the efficiency and effectiveness of the public health
system. Funds are to be provided to local public health departments
and districts through performance-based contracts to help attain the
standards for public health and to implement the recommendations of the
public health improvement plan. Within the amount provided in this
subsection, a monitoring and reporting mechanism will be established to
demonstrate progress toward these goals.
(4) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive,
and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not
anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require
expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated
unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services
authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(5) $383,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $317,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $600,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account are
provided solely to assist counties in marine areas complete on-site
sewage system management plans and electronic data bases to inventory
on-site sewage systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,376,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,729,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,022,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,656,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,809,000

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $499,596,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $511,553,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,046,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,984,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,019,179,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For the acquisition of properties and
facilities, the department of corrections is authorized to enter into
financial contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the
purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. This authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option to purchase or lease-purchase work release beds
in facilities throughout the state for $8,561,000.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,580,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,857,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,989,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $184,831,000

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $831,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $867,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,698,000

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,488,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,487,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE
BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,871,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,895,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,082,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,928,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $835,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $835,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,670,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $257,244,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,964,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $193,457,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,629,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,830,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $520,124,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,087,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from funds made available to
the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
These funds are provided to replace obsolete information technology
infrastructure.
(2) $12,734,556 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from funds made available to
the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
These funds are authorized for state choice administrative functions.

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $469,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $471,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,790,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,371,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,668,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,286,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,225,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,531,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,042,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,531,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,783,000
State Drought Preparedness Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving
Account (Water Supply Facilities) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $342,000
Vessel Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,876,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $725,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,392,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $357,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,051,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,732,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,083,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,951,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,794,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $815,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,961,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,103,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,249,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,505,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,519,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,078,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $393,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,913,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $383,328,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,526,196 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $2,526,195 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, $366,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation,
$2,581,000 of the state toxics account -- state appropriation, $540,806
of the water quality account -- state appropriation, $3,748,220 of the
water quality permit account -- state appropriation, and $705,000 of the
oil spill prevention account are provided solely for the implementation
of the Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action
items DOE-01, DOE-02, DOE-04, DOE-06, DOE-07, DOE-08, and DOE-09.
(2) $4,054,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely for methamphetamine lab clean-up activities.
(3) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the Puget Sound conservation and
recovery plan action item UW-02 through a contract with the University
of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(4) $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for shoreline grants to local
governments to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6012 (shoreline
management), chapter 262, Laws of 2003.
(5) Fees approved by the department of ecology in the 2005-07
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(6) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to move forward with the first
step to issue water rights from the Columbia River, under the Columbia
River Initiative Program.
(7) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to complete environmental reviews
required to support the governor's petition to the U.S. secretary of
agriculture to promulgate regulations establishing management
requirements for roadless areas within national forest lands in the
state. The department will provide funding from this appropriation to
the department of natural resources and the department of fish and
wildlife through interagency agreements to assist in this effort.
(8) $661,000 of the state and local improvements revolving
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill
No. 1939 or Senate Bill No. 5831 (well construction fees). If neither
bill is enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(9) The department shall make recommendations to improve, change,
or eliminate monitoring activities that impact performance measures
related to salmon recovery and watershed health. The department shall
coordinate with the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health
and consult with the office of financial management in determining the
scope and contents of this report.
In preparing these recommendations, the department shall prepare a
report detailing all new activity and updating all previously
identified activity within the comprehensive monitoring strategy with
a focus on salmon recovery and watershed health related monitoring
activity within the agency. At minimum, the report shall include
sufficient detail identifying the specific salmon recovery and
watershed health monitoring activity being performed and include:
Precise costs by fund source, a narrative stating why it is required,
when the activity started, the frequency of data collection, and
geographic location of data being collected. Furthermore, the agency
shall also provide sufficient detail that describes the purpose of each
monitoring activity, who uses the information, how often it is
accessed, where the information is stored, and the current status and
cost, by fund source, of the data storage systems housing each
monitoring activity identified within the agency.
The department shall provide a status report summarizing progress
to the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and the
office of financial management by March 1, 2006. A final report to the
governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health, the office of
financial management, and legislative fiscal committees is due no later
than September 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,968,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,726,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,697,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,092,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $189,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,797,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $340,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,825,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,047,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in
the 2005-07 biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $191,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound
conservation and recovery plan and agency action item PRC-02.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR
RECREATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,380,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,390,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,341,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $254,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,006,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $809,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,654,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $16,025,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the forest and fish agreement
rules. These funds will be passed through to the department of natural
resources and the department of fish and wildlife.
(2) The committee shall make recommendations to improve, change, or
eliminate monitoring activities that impact performance measures
related to salmon recovery and watershed health. The committee shall
coordinate with the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health
and consult with the office of financial management in determining the
scope and contents of this report.
In preparing these recommendations, the committee shall prepare a
report detailing all new activity and updating all previously
identified activity within the comprehensive monitoring strategy with
a focus on salmon recovery and watershed health related monitoring
activity within the agency. At minimum, the report shall include
sufficient detail identifying the specific salmon recovery and
watershed health monitoring activity being performed and include:
Precise costs by fund source, a narrative stating why it is required,
when the activity started, the frequency of data collection, and
geographic location of data being collected. Furthermore, the agency
shall also provide sufficient detail that describes the purpose of each
monitoring activity, who uses the information, how often it is
accessed, where the information is stored, and the current status and
cost, by fund source, of the data storage systems housing each
monitoring activity identified within the agency.
The committee shall provide a status report summarizing progress to
the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and the office
of financial management by March 1, 2006. A final report to the
governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health, the office of
financial management, and legislative fiscal committees is due no later
than September 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,067,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,060,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,127,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,233,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,241,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,629,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $197,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $197,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action item CC-01.
(2) $105,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $105,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1462
or Senate Bill No. 5010, relating to funding for conservation
districts. If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) The commission shall make recommendations to improve, change,
or eliminate monitoring activities that impact performance measures
related to salmon recovery and watershed health. The commission shall
coordinate with the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health
and consult with the office of financial management in determining the
scope and contents of this report.
In preparing these recommendations, the commission shall prepare a
report detailing all new activity and updating all previously
identified activity within the comprehensive monitoring strategy with
a focus on salmon recovery and watershed health related monitoring
activity within the agency. At minimum, the report shall include
sufficient detail identifying the specific salmon recovery and
watershed health monitoring activity being performed and include:
Precise costs by fund source, a narrative stating why it is required,
when the activity started, the frequency of data collection, and
geographic location of data being collected. Furthermore, the agency
shall also provide sufficient detail that describes the purpose of each
monitoring activity, who uses the information, how often it is
accessed, where the information is stored, and the current status and
cost, by fund source, of the data storage systems housing each
monitoring activity identified within the agency.
The commission shall provide a status report summarizing progress
to the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and the
office of financial management by March 1, 2006. A final report to the
governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health, the office of
financial management, and legislative fiscal committees is due no later
than September 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,552,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,197,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,359,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,329,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $387,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,710,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $566,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,747,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,589,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,690,000
Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,250,000
Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,296,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,119,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,799,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $458,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery
Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,754,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,010,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $411,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,024,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,556,714 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,556,713 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action items DFW-01 through DFW-06, DFW-08 through DFW-12, and DFW-16.
(2) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $550,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of hatchery reform
recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(3) The department shall support the activities of the aquatic
nuisance species coordination committee to foster state, federal,
tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues.
The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that are
introduced.
(4) Within funds provided, the department shall make available
enforcement and biological staff to respond and take appropriate action
to ensure public safety in response to public complaints regarding bear
and cougar.
(5) The department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to
protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and
steelhead. Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall provide support to the department of health to enforce state
shellfish harvest laws.
(6) $180,000 of the wildlife account -- state appropriation is
provided solely to test deer and elk for chronic wasting disease and to
document the extent of swan lead poisoning. Of this amount, $65,000 is
provided solely to document the extent of swan lead poisoning and to
begin environmental cleanup.
(7) The department shall provide quarterly status reports to the
office of financial management regarding the replacement of the
Washington interactive licensing system and the implementation of the
hydraulic permit management system.
(8) Prior to the department entering into any agreement relating to
the disposal, sale, lease, or transfer of property identified within
the 2003 legislatively authorized report "Thurston county property
functions, operations & valuations analysis," the department shall
notify the director of financial management and the chairs of the
senate committee on ways and means, the house of representatives
committee on appropriations, and the house of representatives capital
budget committee.
(9) The department shall prepare a report detailing the hydraulic
permit approval program applications and project types. The department
shall coordinate with the office of financial management in determining
the contents of the report. At minimum, the report shall include
permits by applicant (name, state, local, federal, tribal entity,
etc.), project type (pamphlet, minor, medium, major, extension,
revision, etc.) and project location (county and water resource
inventory area). The department shall submit the report to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees no later than
September 1, 2006.
(10) $1,900,000 of the state wildlife account--state is provided
solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5234 (expanding hunter access to
private lands). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) The department shall make recommendations to improve, change,
or eliminate monitoring activities that impact performance measures
related to salmon recovery and watershed health. The department shall
coordinate with the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health
and consult with the office of financial management in determining the
scope and contents of this report.
In preparing these recommendations, the department shall prepare a
report detailing all new activity and updating all previously
identified activity within the comprehensive monitoring strategy with
a focus on salmon recovery and watershed health related monitoring
activity within the agency. At minimum, the report shall include
sufficient detail identifying the specific salmon recovery and
watershed health monitoring activity being performed and include:
Precise costs by fund source, a narrative stating why it is required,
when the activity started, the frequency of data collection, and
geographic location of data being collected. Furthermore, the agency
shall also provide sufficient detail that describes the purpose of each
monitoring activity, who uses the information, how often it is
accessed, where the information is stored, and the current status and
cost, by fund source, of the data storage systems housing each
monitoring activity identified within the agency.
The department shall provide a status report summarizing progress
to the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and the
office of financial management by March 1, 2006. A final report to the
governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health, the office of
financial management, and legislative fiscal committees is due no later
than September 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,689,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,181,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,073,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,257,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,897,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,796,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,299,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,424,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,928,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,789,000
Disaster Response Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,554,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $647,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,155,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $540,000
Nonhighway and Off Road Vehicle Program
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $852,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,132,000
Agricultural College Trust Management
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,903,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $263,150,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $1,652,050 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action items DNR-01 and
DNR-02.
(2) $953,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $950,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(3) $8,635,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $11,635,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $9,000,000 of the disaster response account--state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire suppression.
Of these amounts, up to $250,000 may be expended for staff and other
necessary resources to design and implement a fire data-collection
system that includes financial- and performance-management information
for fires over 10 acres in size.
None of the general fund and disaster response account amounts
provided in this subsection may be used to fund agency indirect and
administrative expenses. Agency indirect and administrative costs
shall be allocated among the agency's remaining accounts and
appropriations.
(4) $582,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for spartina control.
(5) Fees approved by the board of natural resources in the 2005-07
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(6) $11,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims in
U.S., et al. v. State of Washington, et al. Subproceeding No. 89-3
(Shellfish), United States District Court for the Western District of
Washington at Seattle, Case No. C70-9213. The expenditure of this
appropriation is contingent on the release of all claims in this
subproceeding. In the event that the federal government does not
appropriate $22,000,000 for this purpose by June 30, 2006, this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) $852,000 of the nonhighway and off-road vehicle program
account--state appropriation is provided solely for making safety
improvements for off-road vehicle recreation on state lands. The
department shall develop an implementation plan for off-road
vehicle-related signage on state trust lands. The department shall
submit this plan by October 1, 2005, to the office of financial
management and appropriate committees of the legislature, and report
progress on plan implementation to these same entities by March 1,
2006, and September 1, 2006.
(8) $2,155,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to meet its obligations with the
U.S. environmental protection agency for the clean-up of Commencement
Bay and other sites.
(9) The department shall make recommendations to improve, change,
or eliminate monitoring activities that impact performance measures
related to salmon recovery and watershed health. The department shall
coordinate with the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health
and consult with the office of financial management in determining the
scope and contents of this report.
In preparing these recommendations, the department shall prepare a
report detailing all new activity and updating all previously
identified activity within the comprehensive monitoring strategy with
a focus on salmon recovery and watershed health related monitoring
activity within the agency. At minimum, the report shall include
sufficient detail identifying the specific salmon recovery and
watershed health monitoring activity being performed and include:
Precise costs by fund source, a narrative stating why it is required,
when the activity started, the frequency of data collection, and
geographic location of data being collected. Furthermore, the agency
shall also provide sufficient detail that describes the purpose of each
monitoring activity, who uses the information, how often it is
accessed, where the information is stored, and the current status and
cost, by fund source, of the data storage systems housing each
monitoring activity identified within the agency.
The department shall provide a status report summarizing progress
to the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and the
office of financial management by March 1, 2006. A final report to the
governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health, the office of
financial management, and legislative fiscal committees is due no later
than September 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,827,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,595,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,280,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $410,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,968,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $979,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,367,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,664,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $37,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $37,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action item WSDA-01.
(2) Fees and assessments approved by the department in the 2005-07
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY
REINSURANCE PROGRAM
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $849,000

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,669,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,524,000
Architects' License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $717,000
Cemetery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,078,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,352,000
Master License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,341,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,851,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $273,000
Real Estate Appraiser Commission
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,146,000
Real Estate Research Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $301,000
Funeral Directors and Embalmers
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $523,000
Geologists' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,087,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In accordance with RCW 43.24.086, it is
the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of each
professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. For
each licensing program covered by RCW 43.24.086, the department shall
set fees at levels sufficient to fully cover the cost of administering
the licensing program, including any costs associated with policy
enhancements funded in the 2005-07 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, during the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the department may
increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the increases
are necessary to fully fund the costs of the licensing programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,889,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,715,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,269,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $582,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,167,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,083,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $572,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,790,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,123,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,474,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,300,000
Fingerprint Identification
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,120,000
DNA Data Base Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,815,000

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION

(1) STATE AGENCY OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,771,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,658,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,522,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,951,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $10,834,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $10,726,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Within the
amounts provided in this subsection, the superintendent shall recognize
the extraordinary accomplishments of four students who have
demonstrated a strong understanding of the civics essential learning
requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans civic education award. The
students selected for the award must demonstrate understanding through
completion of at least one of the classroom-based civics assessment
models developed by the superintendent of public instruction, and
through leadership in the civic life of their communities. The
superintendent shall select two students from eastern Washington and
two students from western Washington to receive the award, and shall
notify the governor and legislature of the names of the recipients.
(b) $428,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $428,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities.
(c) $509,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $504,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the Washington professional educator standards board. Within the
amounts provided in this subsection, the Washington professional
educator standards board shall pursue the implementation of recent
study recommendations including: (i) Revision of teacher mathematics
endorsement competencies and alignment of teacher tests to the updated
competencies, and (ii) development of mathematics specialist
endorsement.

(2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,783,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,795,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,465,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,043,000

The appropriations in this subsection are provided solely for the
statewide programs specified in this subsection and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) A maximum of $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $2,541,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
a corps of nurses located at educational service districts, as
determined by the superintendent of public instruction, to be
dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to
students, health education, and training for school staff.
(ii) A maximum of $96,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for the school
safety center in the office of the superintendent of public instruction
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(A) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models of
school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(B) The school safety center advisory committee shall develop a
training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all
school safety personnel.
(iii) A maximum of $100,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $100,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
a school safety training program provided by the criminal justice
training commission. The commission, in collaboration with the school
safety center advisory committee, shall provide the school safety
training for all school administrators and school safety personnel,
including school safety personnel hired after the effective date of
this section.
(iv) $11,600,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for safe and drug free schools and communities grants for drug
and violence prevention activities and strategies.
(v) A maximum of $146,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $146,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for a nonviolence
and leadership training program provided by the institute for community
leadership. The program shall provide a request for proposal process,
with up to 80 percent funding, for nonviolence leadership workshops
serving at least 12 school districts with direct programming in 36
elementary, middle, and high schools throughout Washington state.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
A maximum of $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $1,939,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for K-20
telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to
prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization
of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the
network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced
technical support for the network.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $787,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $799,000 of
the fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided solely for the special
services pilot projects. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall allocate these funds to the district or districts
participating in the pilot program according to the provisions of RCW
28A.630.015.
(ii) A maximum of $1,097,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $1,097,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
alternative certification routes. Funds may be used by the
professional educator standards board to continue existing alternative-route grant programs and to create new alternative-route programs in
regions of the state with service shortages.
(iii) A maximum of $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $31,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for operation of
the Cispus environmental learning center.
(iv) A maximum of $1,224,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $1,224,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
in-service training and educational programs conducted by the Pacific
Science Center.
(v) A maximum of $1,079,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $1,079,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
the Washington state leadership assistance for science education reform
(LASER) regional partnership coordinated at the Pacific Science Center.
(vi) A maximum of $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $97,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided to support
vocational student leadership organizations.
(vii) A maximum of $146,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $146,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
the Washington civil liberties education program.
(viii) $500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers
scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support community
involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer
mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.
(ix) $1,521,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the advanced placement fee program to increase
opportunities for low-income students and under-represented populations
to participate in advanced placement courses and to increase the
capacity of schools to provide advanced placement courses to students.
(x) $8,292,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for comprehensive school reform demonstration projects to
provide grants to low-income schools for improving student achievement
through adoption and implementation of research-based curricula and
instructional programs.
(xi) $19,587,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for 21st century learning center grants, providing after-school and inter-session activities for students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,137,773,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,164,523,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,302,296,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2005-06 and
2006-07 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (d) through (f) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (c) through
(f) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) 49 certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-3;
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 4-12; and
(iv) An additional 4.2 certificated instructional staff units for
grades K-3 and an additional 7.2 certificated instructional staff units
for grade 4. Any funds allocated for the additional certificated units
provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be considered as basic
education funding;
(A) Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of
the amount required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established
under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the district
documents an actual ratio in grades K-4 equal to or greater than 53.2
certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent
students. For any school district documenting a lower certificated
instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff ratio
achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;
(B) Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per
one thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate
up to 1.3 of the 53.2 funding ratio to employ additional classified
instructional assistants assigned to basic education classrooms in
grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a district's staff ratio under
this section, funds used by the district to employ additional
classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual
certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional classified
instructional assistants, for the purposes of this subsection, shall be
determined using the 1989-90 school year as the base year;
(C) Any district maintaining a ratio in grades K-4 equal to or
greater than 53.2 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students may use allocations generated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of that required to maintain the
minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ
additional basic education certificated instructional staff or
classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) shall only be expended to reduce class
size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated instructional
funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent
vocational students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) Indirect cost charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic
education and vocational enhancement allocations of state funds;
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(h) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2005-06 and 2006-07
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(d) through (h) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each three certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
sixty average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
9.05 percent in the 2005-06 school year and 9.05 percent in the 2006-07
school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 12.64 percent in the
2005-06 school year and 12.64 percent in the 2006-07 school year for
classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (h) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$9,112 per certificated staff unit in the 2005-06 school year and a
maximum of $9,285 per certificated staff unit in the 2006-07 school
year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $22,377 per certificated
staff unit in the 2005-06 school year and a maximum of $22,802 per
certificated staff unit in the 2006-07 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $17,362 per certificated
staff unit in the 2005-06 school year and a maximum of $17,692 per
certificated staff unit in the 2006-07 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $531.09 for the 2005-06 and
2006-07 school years per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely
for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall
be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio
between the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and
the number of actual basic education certificated instructional staff
reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of $6,441,000
outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2006 and 2007
as follows:
(a) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $513,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2006
and a maximum of $523,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2007;
(b) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,035,000 may be expended for the 2006 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,035,000 for the 2007 fiscal year;
(c) A maximum of $365,000 may be expended for school district
emergencies; and
(d) A maximum of $485,000 each fiscal year may be expended for
programs providing skills training for secondary students who are
enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at
a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in
those programs.
(10) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 5.2 percent from the 2004-05 school year to the
2005-06 school year and 3.4 percent from the 2005-06 school year to the
2006-07 school year.
(11) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION. (1) The following
calculations determine the salaries used in the general fund
allocations for certificated instructional, certificated
administrative, and classified staff units under section 502 of this
act:
(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units
shall be determined for each district by multiplying the district's
certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 12E
by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP Document
1Sb; and
(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units
and classified staff units for each district shall be based on the
district's certificated administrative and classified salary allocation
amounts shown on LEAP Document 12E.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "LEAP Document 1Sb" means the computerized tabulation
establishing staff mix factors for certificated instructional staff
according to education and years of experience, as developed by the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on March
18, 2005, at 10:00 hours; and
(b) "LEAP Document 12E" means the computerized tabulation of 2005-06 and 2006-07 school year salary allocations for certificated
administrative staff and classified staff and derived and total base
salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed by the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on March
18, 2005, at 10:15 hours.
(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors shall be applied to salary
adjustments at a rate of 8.41 percent for school year 2005-06 and 8.41
percent for school year 2006-07 for certificated staff and for
classified staff 9.14 percent for school year 2005-06 and 9.14 percent
for the 2006-07 school year.
(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary
allocation schedules for certificated instructional staff are
established for basic education salary allocations:

K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2005-06 School Year

Years of MA+90

Service
BA
BA+15
BA+30
BA+45
BA+90
BA+135
MA
MA+45
or PHD

0 30,383 31,204 32,054 32,906 35,640 37,401 36,426 39,161 40,924

1 30,792 31,624 32,485 33,375 36,137 37,889 36,831 39,594 41,345

2 31,181 32,022 32,892 33,850 36,605 38,375 37,239 39,994 41,764

3 31,583 32,431 33,311 34,299 37,049 38,861 37,626 40,373 42,187

4 31,977 32,862 33,747 34,770 37,536 39,361 38,031 40,796 42,623

5 32,384 33,273 34,167 35,247 38,002 39,864 38,442 41,199 43,061

6 32,802 33,672 34,596 35,729 38,472 40,344 38,864 41,607 43,478

7 33,536 34,420 35,356 36,551 39,334 41,258 39,655 42,437 44,362

8 34,612 35,543 36,502 37,796 40,616 42,611 40,899 43,720 45,714

9 36,707 37,713 39,054 41,940 44,002 42,156 45,044 47,106

10 38,938 40,376 43,301 45,432 43,479 46,405 48,535

11 41,737 44,726 46,900 44,840 47,830 50,003

12 43,055 46,189 48,428 46,255 49,292 51,532

13 47,688 49,993 47,720 50,791 53,096

14 49,194 51,618 49,227 52,396 54,721

15 50,474 52,961 50,507 53,758 56,144

16 or more 51,483 54,019 51,517 54,833 57,266

K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2006-07 School Year

Years of MA+90

Service
BA
BA+15
BA+30
BA+45
BA+90
BA+135
MA
MA+45
or PHD

0 30,900 31,735 32,599 33,466 36,247 38,038 37,046 39,827 41,620

1 31,316 32,162 33,038 33,942 36,752 38,534 37,458 40,268 42,048

2 31,712 32,566 33,451 34,426 37,228 39,028 37,873 40,674 42,475

3 32,121 32,983 33,878 34,883 37,679 39,523 38,266 41,060 42,905

4 32,521 33,421 34,321 35,362 38,174 40,031 38,678 41,491 43,348

5 32,935 33,840 34,748 35,846 38,649 40,543 39,097 41,900 43,794

6 33,360 34,245 35,185 36,337 39,127 41,031 39,526 42,315 44,218

7 34,107 35,005 35,957 37,173 40,003 41,960 40,330 43,159 45,116

8 35,201 36,148 37,123 38,439 41,307 43,336 41,594 44,464 46,492

9 37,332 38,355 39,718 42,654 44,751 42,873 45,810 47,908

10 39,601 41,063 44,038 46,205 44,219 47,194 49,361

11 42,448 45,487 47,698 45,603 48,644 50,853

12 43,788 46,975 49,252 47,042 50,131 52,409

13 48,499 50,844 48,532 51,655 54,000

14 50,031 52,496 50,065 53,287 55,652

15 51,333 53,862 51,366 54,673 57,099

16 or more 52,359 54,938 52,393 55,766 58,241

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer
to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate
degree.
(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before
the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be
counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection,
the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:
(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and
(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.
(b) "MA" means a masters degree.
(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.
(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and
28A.415.023.
(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by
any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine
compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and
LEAP documents referenced in this act, or any replacement schedules and
documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(7) The certificated instructional staff base salary specified for
each district in LEAP Document 12E and the salary schedules in
subsection (4)(a) of this section include two learning improvement
days. A school district is eligible for the learning improvement day
funds only if the learning improvement days have been added to the 180-day contract year. If fewer days are added, the additional learning
improvement allocation shall be adjusted accordingly. The additional
days shall be limited to specific activities identified in the state
required school improvement plan related to improving student learning
that are consistent with education reform implementation, and shall not
be considered part of basic education. The principal in each school
shall assure that the days are used to provide the necessary school-wide, all staff professional development that is tied directly to the
school improvement plan. The school principal and the district
superintendent shall maintain documentation as to their approval of
these activities. The length of a learning improvement day shall not
be less than the length of a full day under the base contract. The
superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that school districts
adhere to the intent and purposes of this subsection.
(8) The salary allocation schedules established in this section are
for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2)
and subsection (7) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,983,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,798,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $730,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,511,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $133,281,000 is provided for a cost of living adjustment of 1.2
percent effective September 1, 2005, and another 1.7 percent effective
September 1, 2006, for state formula staff units. The appropriations
include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at rates of
8.41 percent for the 2005-06 school year and 8.41 percent for the 2006-07 school year for certificated staff and 9.14 percent for the 2005-06
school year and 9.14 percent for the 2006-07 school year for classified
staff.
(a) The appropriations in this section include the increased
portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant
state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Increases for
general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this
act. Increases for special education result from increases in each
district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
502 and 503 of this act.
(b) The appropriations in this section provide cost of living and
incremental fringe benefit allocations based on formula adjustments as
follows:

School Year

2005-06 2006-07

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.27 $0.66

Highly Capable (per formula student) $2.91 $7.07

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $7.78 $18.94

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $1.86 $4.53

(c) The appropriations in this section include $251,000 for fiscal
year 2006 and $676,000 for fiscal year 2007 for salary increase
adjustments for substitute teachers.
(2) $127,230,000 is provided for adjustments to insurance benefit
allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is
$582.47 per month for the 2005-06 and 2006-07 school years. The
appropriations in this section provide for a rate increase to $633 per
month for the 2005-06 school year and $675 per month for the 2006-07
school year. The adjustments to health insurance benefit allocations
are at the following rates:

School Year

2005-06 2006-07

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.46 $0.84

Highly Capable (per formula student) $3.08 $5.70

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $8.18 $14.98

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $1.82 $3.33

(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,597,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $245,582,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $486,179,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $796,000 of this fiscal year 2006 appropriation
and a maximum of $812,000 of the fiscal year 2007 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(3) $5,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $5,000 of the
fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided solely for the
transportation of students enrolled in "choice" programs.
Transportation shall be limited to low-income students who are
transferring to "choice" programs solely for educational reasons.
(4) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of $41.11 per weighted mile in the 2005-06 school
year and $41.35 per weighted mile in the 2006-07 school year exclusive
of salary and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act.
Allocations for transportation of students transported more than one
radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as determined by
superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based
on the number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five
living within one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by
the per mile reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.
(5) For busses purchased between July 1, 2005, and June 30, 2007,
the office of superintendent of public instruction shall provide
reimbursement funding to a school district only after the
superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was
purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or
a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote
based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195. The competitive specifications shall meet
federal motor vehicle safety standards, minimum state specifications as
established by rule by the superintendent, and supported options as
determined by the superintendent in consultation with the regional
transportation coordinators of the educational service districts.
(6) Beginning with the 2005-06 school year, the superintendent of
public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district
buses on the five-year average of prices in the appropriate category of
bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation
payment shall be based on the current state price. The replacement
cost shall be based on the lowest quote in the appropriate bus category
for that school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $287,403,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,603,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for state matching money for federal
child nutrition programs.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the 2007 fiscal year appropriation are
provided for summer food programs for children in low-income areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $464,338,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $474,607,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $435,315,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,374,260,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall use the
excess cost methodology developed and implemented for the 2001-02
school year using the S-275 personnel reporting system and all related
accounting requirements to ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The S-275 and accounting changes in effect since the 2001-02
school year shall supercede any prior excess cost methodologies and
shall be required of all school districts.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
funds to school districts based on two categories: The optional birth
through age two program for special education eligible developmentally
delayed infants and toddlers, and the mandatory special education
program for special education eligible students ages three to twenty-one. A "special education eligible student" means a student receiving
specially designed instruction in accordance with a properly formulated
individualized education program.
(5)(a) For the 2005-06 and 2006-07 school years, the superintendent
shall make allocations to each district based on the sum of:
(i) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of
developmentally delayed infants and toddlers ages birth through two,
multiplied by the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(ii) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment multiplied by the funded enrollment percent
determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, multiplied by
the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district shall be
based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment" means the resident enrollment including students enrolled
through choice (RCW 28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts
(RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding students residing in another district
enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program (RCW
28A.225.250).
(b) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding the birth through age
two enrollment, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
Each district's general fund -- state funded special education
enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment
percent or 12.7 percent.
(7) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with subsection
(6)(b) of this section, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student
shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units.
(8) To the extent necessary, $18,940,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation and $28,698,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided for safety net awards for districts with
demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts
provided in subsection (5) of this section. If safety net awards
exceed the amount appropriated in this subsection (8), the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds
necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds shall be awarded by the
state safety net oversight committee subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special
education exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas.
In the determination of need, the committee shall also consider
additional available revenues from federal sources. Differences in
program costs attributable to district philosophy, service delivery
choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for safety
net awards.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(d) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 1999.
(e) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(10) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor who shall be nonvoting
members of the committee; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.
(11) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund--state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(12) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for projects to provide special education students with
appropriate job and independent living skills, including work
experience where possible, to facilitate their successful transition
out of the public school system. The funds provided by this subsection
shall be from federal discretionary grants.
(13) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(14) A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation may be expended by the superintendent for projects
related to use of inclusion strategies by school districts for
provision of special education services.
(15) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund -- state funds allocated under
this program; however, carry over funds shall be expended in the
special education program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,645,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,645,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,290,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.310.340, may
receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct
school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education
rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,456,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,385,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,841,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,903,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,290,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,193,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $219,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $219,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to maintain at least one
certificated instructional staff and related support services at an
institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support
one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish
the educational program. The following types of institutions are
included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, and programs for
juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,797,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,812,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,609,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for school district programs for highly capable
students shall be distributed at a maximum rate of $343.10 per funded
student for the 2005-06 school year and $343.10 per funded student for
the 2006-07 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded students
shall be a maximum of two percent of each district's full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
(3) $170,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $170,000 of
the fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided for the centrum program
at Fort Worden state park.
(4) $90,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $90,000 of
the fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided for the Washington
destination imagination network and future problem-solving programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR MISCELLANEOUS PURPOSES UNDER THE ELEMENTARY AND
SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT AND THE NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,084,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,233,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,469,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,264,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $202,966,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) ASSESSMENT
$20,030,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $16,272,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $16,111,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
the Washington assessments of student learning (WASL), including
development and implementation of retake assessments for high school
students who are not successful in one or more content areas of the
WASL and development of alternative assessments or appeals procedures
to implement the certificate of academic achievement. Within these
amounts, the superintendent of public instruction shall contract for
the early return of 10th grade student WASL results, on or around June
10th of each year.
(2) PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT
(a) $548,000 of the fiscal year 2006 general fund -- state
appropriation and $548,000 of the fiscal year 2007 general fund -- state
appropriation are provided solely for training of paraprofessional
classroom assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom
assistants as provided in RCW 28A.415.310.
(b) $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for mentor teacher assistance,
including state support activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and
28A.415.260, and for a mentor academy. Up to $200,000 of the amount in
this subsection may be used each fiscal year to operate a mentor
academy to help districts provide effective training for peer mentors.
Funds for the teacher assistance program shall be allocated to school
districts based on the number of first year beginning teachers.
(c) $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(d) $3,010,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $4,018,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for salary bonuses for teachers
who attain certification by the national board for professional
teaching standards, subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(i) Teachers who hold a valid certificate from the national board
during the 2005-06 or 2006-07 school years shall receive an annual
bonus not to exceed $3,500 in each of these school years in which they
hold a national board certificate.
(ii) The annual bonus shall be paid in a lump sum amount and shall
not be included in the definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW
41.32.010(10).
(e) $90,395,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the no child left behind act.
(3) SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT
(a) $313,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $313,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a principal support program.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction may contract
with an independent organization to administer the program. The
program shall include: (i) Development of an individualized
professional growth plan for a new principal or principal candidate;
and (ii) participation of a mentor principal who works over a period of
between one and three years with the new principal or principal
candidate to help him or her build the skills identified as critical to
the success of the professional growth plan. Within the amounts
provided, $50,000 per year shall be used to support additional
participation of secondary principals.
(b) $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for focused assistance. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct
educational audits of low-performing schools and enter into performance
agreements between school districts and the office to implement the
recommendations of the audit and the community. Each educational audit
shall include recommendations for best practices and ways to address
identified needs and shall be presented to the community in a public
meeting to seek input on ways to implement the audit and its
recommendations.
(c) A maximum of $250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for summer
accountability institutes offered by the superintendent of public
instruction. The institutes shall provide school district staff with
training in the analysis of student assessment data, information
regarding successful district and school teaching models, research on
curriculum and instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve
instruction in reading, mathematics, language arts, social studies,
including civics, and guidance and counseling. The superintendent of
public instruction shall emphasize issues of high school reform and
mathematics instruction when offering summer institute programs
supported by funds provided in this subsection.
(d) $515,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $515,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for the evaluation of reading and
mathematics textbooks, other instructional materials, and diagnostic
tools to determine the extent to which they are aligned with the state
standards. A scorecard of the analysis shall be made available to
school districts. The superintendent shall also develop and
disseminate information on essential components of comprehensive,
school-based math and reading programs and shall develop and
disseminate grade level expectations for reading and math which shall
include professional development modules and web-based materials.
(e) $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the mathematics helping corps
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(i) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical
mathematics assistance statewide, the superintendent of public
instruction shall employ mathematics school improvement specialists to
provide assistance to schools and districts. The specialists shall be
hired by and work under the direction of a statewide school improvement
coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall not be
permanent employees of the superintendent of public instruction.
(ii) The school improvement specialists shall provide the
following:
(A) Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data
and develop improvement plans based on those data;
(B) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their
performance on the Washington assessment of student learning and other
assessments emphasizing the performance on the mathematics assessments;
(C) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the
essential academic learning requirements emphasizing the academic
learning requirements for mathematics, the Washington assessment of
student learning, and meets the needs of diverse learners;
(D) Assistance in the identification and implementation of
research-based instructional practices in mathematics;
(E) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional
strategies and classroom-based assessment for mathematics;
(F) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community
involvement programs emphasizing mathematics; and
(G) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to
improve student mathematics learning.
(f) $16,758,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the reading first program under Title I of the no child
left behind act.
(4) STUDENT SUPPORTS
(a) $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the meals for kids program
under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155.
(b) $3,713,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,713,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(i) Grants shall be allocated to low-performing schools and school
districts to implement comprehensive, proven, research-based mentoring
and tutoring programs in reading that may include research-based
reading skills development software for low-performing students in
grades K-6. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading
corps programs. If the grant is made to a school district, the
principals of schools enrolling targeted students shall be consulted
concerning design and implementation of the program.
(ii) Each program shall have measurable goals for student reading
aligned with the essential academic learning requirements.
(iii) Beginning and end-of-program testing data shall be available
to determine the effectiveness of funded programs and practices.
Common evaluative criteria across programs, such as grade-level
improvements shall be available for each reading corps program. The
superintendent of public instruction shall provide program evaluations
to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.
Administrative and evaluation costs may be assessed from the annual
appropriation for the program.
(iv) Grants provided under this section may be used by schools and
school districts for expenditures from September 2005 through August
31, 2007.
(5) TECHNOLOGY
(a) $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for improving technology
infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district technology
development, promoting standards for school district technology,
promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.
The superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate a process to
facilitate the evaluation and provision of online curriculum courses to
school districts which includes the following: Creation of a general
listing of the types of available online curriculum courses; a survey
conducted by each regional educational technology support center of
school districts in its region regarding the types of online curriculum
courses desired by school districts; a process to evaluate and
recommend to school districts the best online courses in terms of
curriculum, student performance, and cost; and assistance to school
districts in procuring and providing the courses to students.
(b) $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for the development and posting of web-based instructional tools, assessment data, and other information that
assists schools and teachers implementing higher academic standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,966,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,209,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,561,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $166,736,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $746.64 per
eligible bilingual student in the 2005-06 school year and $746.64 in
the 2006-07 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided in section 504 of this act.
(3) The superintendent may withhold up to 1.5 percent of the school
year allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section,
and adjust the per eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this
section accordingly, solely for the central provision of assessments as
provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2).
(4) $70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section are
provided solely to develop a system for the tracking of current and
former transitional bilingual program students.
(5) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for migrant education under Title I Part C and English
language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III
of the elementary and secondary education act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,986,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,933,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $343,227,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $513,146,000

(1) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(b) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of $204.42 per funded student for the
2005-06 school year and $204.94 per funded student for the 2006-07
school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided under
section 504 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the following as appropriate:
(i) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12
for the prior school year times the district's percentage of October
headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or reduced price
lunch in the prior school year; and
(ii) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch exceeded forty percent, subtract forty percent from
the district's percentage and multiply the result by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior school
year.
(d) Increases in a school district's allocation above the 2004-05
school year level shall be directed to grades nine through twelve.
Schools are encouraged to emphasize mathematics-related activities.
(e) In addition to amounts allocated in (b) and (c) of this
subsection, an additional amount shall be allocated to a school
district for each school year in which the district's allocation is
less than the amount the district received for the general fund--state
learning assistance program allocation in the 2004-05 school year. The
amount of the allocation in this section shall be sufficient to
maintain the 2004-05 school year allocation.
(2) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(3) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund -- state funds allocated under this
program; however, carryover funds shall be expended for the learning
assistance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM
Student Achievement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $629,356,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of $300.00 per FTE student for the 2005-06 school year and $375.00 per FTE student for the 2006-07 school year.
For the purposes of this section and in accordance with RCW 84.52.068,
FTE student refers to the annual average full-time equivalent
enrollment of the school district in grades kindergarten through twelve
for the prior school year.
(2) The appropriation is allocated for the following uses as
specified in RCW 28A.505.210:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school; or
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection (2).
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute the
school year allocation according to the monthly apportionment schedule
defined in RCW 28A.510.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517 K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR
ADJUSTMENTS. State general fund and state student achievement fund
appropriations provided to the superintendent of public instruction for
state entitlement programs in the public schools in this part V of this
act may be expended as needed by the superintendent for adjustments to
apportionment for prior fiscal periods. Recoveries of state general
fund moneys from school districts and educational service districts for
a prior fiscal period shall be made as reductions in apportionment
payments for the current fiscal period and shall be shown as prior year
adjustments on apportionment reports for the current period. Such
recoveries shall not be treated as revenues to the state, but as a
reduction in the amount expended against the appropriation for the
current fiscal period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION. Appropriations made in this act to the office of
superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 519 FOR THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
Education Savings Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
Education Construction Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,100,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $15,000,000 in fiscal year 2006 and $15,000,000 in fiscal year
2007 of the education savings account appropriation shall be deposited
in the common school construction account.
(2) $99,100,000 of the education construction account appropriation
shall be deposited in the common school construction account.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 The appropriations in sections 603 through
609 of this act are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.
(2)(a) The salary increases provided or referenced in this
subsection and described in sections 935 through 965 of this act shall
be the only allowable salary increases provided at institutions of
higher education, excluding increases associated with normally
occurring promotions and increases related to faculty and professional
staff retention, and excluding increases associated with employees
under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the provisions
of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.50.874(1).
(b) For employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.16.015 and 28B.50.874(1), salary
increases will be in accordance with the applicable collective
bargaining agreement. However, an increase shall not be provided to
any classified employee whose salary is above the approved salary range
maximum for the class to which the employee's position is allocated.
(c) Each institution of higher education receiving appropriations
for salary increases under sections 604 through 609 of this act may
provide additional salary increases from other sources to instructional
and research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic
administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research
assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and
all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW
28B.16.015. Any additional salary increase granted under the authority
of this subsection (2)(c) shall not be included in an institution's
salary base for future state funding. It is the intent of the
legislature that general fund -- state support for an institution shall
not increase during the current or any future biennium as a result of
any salary increases authorized under this subsection (2)(c).
(d) The legislature, the office of financial management, and other
state agencies need consistent and accurate personnel data from
institutions of higher education for policy planning purposes.
Institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to the
department of personnel for inclusion in the department's data
warehouse. Uniform reporting procedures shall be established by the
department of personnel for use by the reporting institutions,
including provisions for common job classifications and common
definitions of full-time equivalent staff. Annual contract amounts,
number of contract months, and funding sources shall be consistently
reported for employees under contract.
(3) The tuition fees, as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW, charged to
full-time students at the state's institutions of higher education for
the 2005-06 and 2006-07 academic years, other than the summer term,
shall be adjusted by the governing boards of the state universities,
regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state board
for community and technical colleges. Tuition fees may be increased in
excess of the fiscal growth factor.
For the 2005-06 academic year, the governing boards of the state
universities, regional universities and The Evergreen State College may
implement an increase no greater than five percent over tuition fees
charged to full-time resident undergraduate students for the 2004-05
academic year. The state board for community and technical colleges
may implement an increase no greater than three percent over tuition
fees charged to full-time resident students for the 2004-05 academic
year.
For the 2006-07 academic year, the governing boards of the state
universities, regional universities and The Evergreen State College may
implement an increase no greater than five percent over tuition fees
charged to full-time resident undergraduate students for the 2005-06
academic year. The state board for community and technical colleges
may implement an increase no greater than three percent over tuition
fees charged to full-time resident students for the 2005-06 academic
year.
(4) In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW
28B.15.910, the governing boards and the state board may waive all or
a portion of operating fees for any student. State general fund
appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and fee revenue
foregone as a result of waivers granted under this subsection.
(5) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act are
authorized to increase summer term tuition in excess of the fiscal
growth factor during the 2005-07 biennium. Tuition levels increased
pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed the per credit hour rate
calculated from the academic year tuition levels adopted under this
act.
(6) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, community and technical colleges
are authorized to increase services and activities fee charges in
excess of the fiscal growth factor during the 2005-2007 biennium. The
services and activities fee charges increased pursuant to this
subsection shall not exceed the maximum level authorized by the state
board for community and technical colleges.
(7) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the governing boards of the state
universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College
are authorized to increase application fees in excess of the fiscal
growth factor during the 2005-2007 biennium. The application fee
levels increased pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed sixty
dollars per application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 (1) The appropriations in sections 603
through 610 of this act provide state general fund support for full-time equivalent student enrollments at each institution of higher
education. Listed below are the annual full-time equivalent student
enrollments by institutions assumed in this act.

2005-06
Annual
Average 2006-07
Annual
Average

University of Washington

Main campus 33,007 33,157

Bothell branch 1,365 1,465

Tacoma branch 1,644 1,744

Washington State University

Main campus 17,520 17,670

Spokane campus 1,130 1,150

Tri-Cities branch 720 765

Vancouver branch 1,328 1,628

Central Washington University 8,240 8,441

Eastern Washington University 8,511 8,715

The Evergreen State College 4,033 4,133

Western Washington University 11,509 11,629

State Board for Community and Technical Colleges 130,529 132,428

Higher Education Coordinating Board 100 200

(2) For the state universities, the number of full-time equivalent
student enrollments enumerated in this section for the branch campuses
are the minimum required enrollment levels for those campuses. At the
start of an academic year, the governing board of a state university
may transfer full-time equivalent student enrollments from the main
campus to one or more branch campus. Intent notice shall be provided
to the office of financial management and reassignment of funded
enrollment is contingent upon satisfying data needs of the forecast
division who is responsible to track and monitor state-supported
college enrollment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $574,546,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $583,567,000
Administrative Contingency Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,950,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,161,063,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The technical colleges may increase tuition and fees in excess
of the fiscal growth factor to conform with the percentage increase in
community college operating fees.
(2) $540,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $540,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the displaced homemakers
program.
(3) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for higher education student child
care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(4) $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely as special funds for training and
related support services, including financial aid, as specified in
chapter 226, Laws of 1993 (employment and training for unemployed
workers). Funding is provided to support up to 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in each fiscal year.
(5) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for basic skills education at
community and technical colleges. These funds may be used to align or
integrate adult basic education and English as a second language
courses with vocational training.
(6) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 935 through 965 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding by $324 during the 2005-2007 biennium. This
increase in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition
revenues that will be generated and retained by the community and
technical colleges as a result of the tuition increases that are
authorized in section 601 of this act. Given these increases in core
funding, the state board for community and technical colleges shall, by
June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward achieving the
following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Increase the number of academic students who are eligible to
transfer to baccalaureate institutions;
(b) Increase the number of students prepared for work; and
(c) Increase the number of basic skills students who demonstrate
substantive skill gain.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the state board and the office of financial
management and shall be determined based on the per student funding
level assumed in this act.
The state board for community and technical colleges shall provide
a summary of the progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section to the governor and the appropriate fiscal
and policy committees of the legislature prior to November 1, 2006.
(7) $8,220,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $17,715,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to increase budgeted enrollments
by 1,644 student FTEs in academic year 2006 and an additional 1,899
student FTEs in academic year 2007. Of these new enrollments, at least
100 FTEs must be in high-demand fields as measured by both student and
employer demand. The state board for community and technical colleges
shall track enrollments, graduation rates, and job placement for each
program that receives high-demand enrollments using data provided by
each recipient institution. The board shall report on these outcomes
on November 1st of each fiscal year to the office of financial
management and the fiscal and higher education committees of the
legislature. The enrollment increases provided in this section shall
be limited to new students only and may not be used to pay for students
currently enrolled by the institutions.
(8) $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to increase salaries and related
benefits for part-time faculty. The board shall report by January 30,
2006, to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
and policy committees of the legislature on (a) the distribution of
state funds, and (b) wage adjustments for part-time faculty.
(9) $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for faculty salary increments and
associated benefits and may be used in combination with salary and
benefit savings from faculty turnover to provide salary increments and
associated benefits for faculty who qualify through professional
development and training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $343,251,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $353,853,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,174,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,123,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $709,701,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $165,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $165,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item UW-01.
(2) $300,000 of the general fund -- private/local appropriation is
provided solely for shellfish biotoxin monitoring as specified in
chapter 263, Laws of 2003 (SSB 6073, shellfish license fee).
(3) $2,225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $4,300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to expand general enrollments by
350 student FTEs in academic year 2006 and an additional 350 student
FTEs in academic year 2007. Of these, 150 FTEs in 2006 and 150 FTEs in
2007 must be allocated to the main campus, and 100 FTEs per year must
be used to expand upper-division access at the branch campuses in
Bothell and Tacoma. The enrollment increases provided in this section
shall be limited to new students only and may not be used to pay for
students currently enrolled by the university.
(4) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 935 through 965 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding by $585 during the 2005-2007 biennium. This
increase in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition
revenues that will be generated and retained by the university as a
result of the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of
this act. Given these increases in core funding, the University of
Washington shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward
achieving the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that are ranked in the top twenty
nationally;
(e) Sustain the quality of its research programs as measured by the
national ranking for federal research grants received; and
(f) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before October 1, 2006, the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education and coordinating
board shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to
the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to November 1, 2006.
(5) $2,430,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to support research in life science
fields.
(6) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely to assist the transition of University of
Washington-Tacoma from a branch campus serving upper-division students,
to a four-year campus serving freshmen, sophomores, and upper-division
students. Funds may be used to develop curricula, recruit new faculty,
and expand student services. Consistent with the recommendations of
the higher education coordinating board, UW-Tacoma may begin enrolling
lower-division students beginning in fiscal year 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $210,264,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $214,237,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $424,501,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $210,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $210,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item WSU-01.
(2) $1,980,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $5,220,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to expand general enrollments by
315 student FTEs in academic year 2006 and an additional 515 student
FTEs in academic year 2007. These new enrollments shall be distributed
as follows: 100 FTEs in 2006 shall be used to expand upper-division
access at Washington State University's (WSU) branch campus in
Vancouver, 20 FTEs in each year shall be used to expand upper-division
access at WSU's Spokane campus, and 45 FTEs each year shall be used to
expand upper-division access at WSU's branch campus in Tri-Cities. 200
FTEs in fiscal year 2007 shall be used to admit lower-division students
to WSU-Vancouver. These enrollments should be above the level reported
by the institution for academic year 2005, and may not be used for
students currently enrolled.
(3) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 935 through 965 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding by $726 during the 2005-2007 biennium. This
increase in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition
revenues that will be generated and retained by the university as a
result of the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of
this act. Given these increases in core funding, Washington State
University shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward
achieving the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that are ranked in the top twenty
nationally;
(e) Sustain the quality of its research programs as measured by the
national ranking for federal research grants received; and
(f) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before October 1, 2006 the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education and coordinating
board shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to
the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to November 1, 2006.
(4) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to assist the transition of Washington
State University-Vancouver from a branch campus serving only upper-division students, to a four-year campus serving freshmen, sophomores,
and upper-division students. Funds may be used to develop curricula,
recruit new faculty, and expand student services. Consistent with the
recommendations of the higher education coordinating board, WSU-Vancouver may begin enrolling lower-division students beginning in
fiscal year 2007.
(5) $1,014,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,014,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to expand the entering class of
veterinary medicine students by 16 resident student FTEs each academic
year during the 2005-2007 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,834,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,105,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,939,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,356,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,533,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to expand general enrollments by
242 student FTEs in academic year 2006 and an additional 204 student
FTEs in academic year 2007. The enrollment increases provided in this
section shall be limited to new students only and may not be used to
pay for students currently enrolled by the university.
(2) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 935 through 965 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding by $480 during the 2005-2007 biennium. This
increase in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition
revenues that will be generated and retained by the university as a
result of the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of
this act. Given these increases in core funding, Eastern Washington
University shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward
achieving the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that receive national accreditation;
and
(e) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before October 1, 2006, the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education and coordinating
board shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to
the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to November 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,229,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,840,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,069,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,321,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,455,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to expand general enrollments by
241 student FTEs in academic year 2006 and an additional 201 student
FTEs in academic year 2007. The enrollment increases provided in this
section shall be limited to new students only and may not be used to
pay for students currently enrolled by the university.
(2) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 935 through 965 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding by $499 during the 2005-2007 biennium. This
increase in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition
revenues that will be generated and retained by the university as a
result of the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of
this act. Given these increases in core funding, Central Washington
University shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward
achieving the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that receive national accreditation;
and
(e) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before October 1, 2006, the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education and coordinating
board shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to
the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to November 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,610,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,252,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,862,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $546,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,108,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to expand general enrollments by
100 student FTEs in academic year 2006 and an additional 100 student
FTEs in academic year 2007. The enrollment increases provided in this
section shall be limited to new students and may not be used to pay for
students currently enrolled by the institution.
(2) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 935 through 965 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding by $482 during the 2005-2007 biennium. This
increase in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition
revenues that will be generated and retained by the college as a result
of the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of this
act. Given these increases in core funding, The Evergreen State
College shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward
achieving the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that are ranked in the top twenty
nationally;
(e) Sustain the quality of its research programs as measured by the
national ranking for federal research grants received; and
(f) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before October 1, 2006, the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education and coordinating
board shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to
the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to November 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,015,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,970,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,985,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $980,400 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $980,400 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the operations of the North
Snohomish, Island, Skagit (NSIS) higher education consortium.
(2) $656,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to expand general enrollments by
100 student FTEs in academic year 2006 and an additional 120 student
FTEs in academic year 2007. The enrollment increases provided in this
section shall be limited to new students only, and may not be used to
pay for students currently enrolled by the university.
(3) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 935 through 965 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding by $486 during the 2005-2007 biennium. This
increase in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition
revenues that will be generated and retained by the university as a
result of the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of
this act. Given these increases in core funding, Western Washington
University shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward
achieving the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that are ranked in the top twenty
nationally;
(e) Sustain the quality of its research programs as measured by the
national ranking for federal research grants received; and
(f) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before October 1, 2006, the university shall submit to the
higher education coordinating board a report that outlines the
institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section. The higher education and coordinating
board shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to
the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to November 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD -- POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,333,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,345,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,272,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,950,000

The appropriations in this section are provided to carry out the
policy coordination, planning, studies and administrative functions of
the board and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$1,170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2006 and $2,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 are provided solely to contract for 100 full-time equivalent
students in high-demand fields in fiscal year 2006 and an additional
100 full-time equivalent students in high-demand fields in fiscal year
2007. High-demand fields are programs where enrollment access is
limited and employers are experiencing difficulty finding qualified
graduates to fill job openings. Of the amounts provided, up to $70,000
may be used for management of the competitive process for awarding
high-demand student FTEs during the 2005-07 biennium.
(1) The board will manage a competitive process for awarding
high-demand student FTEs. Public baccalaureate institutions are
eligible to apply for funding and may submit proposals that include
cooperative partnerships with private independent institutions.
(2) Among coequals, the board shall make it a priority to fund
proposals that prepare students for careers in (a) nursing and other
health services; (b) applied science and engineering; (c) teaching and
speech pathology; (d) computing and information technology; and (e)
viticulture and enology, but not to the exclusion of compelling
proposals that document specific regional student and employer demand
in fields not listed in this subsection. Proposals and grant awards
will separately identify one-time, nonrecurring costs and ongoing
costs.
(3) The board will establish a proposal review committee that will
include, but not be limited to, representatives from the board, the
office of financial management, and economic development and labor
market analysts. The board will develop the request for proposals,
including the criteria for awarding grants, in consultation with the
proposal review committee.
(4) Baccalaureate institutions that receive grants shall provide
the board and the forecast division of the office of financial
management with data specified by the board or the office of financial
management that shows the impact of this subsection, particularly the
degree of improved access to high-demand programs for students and
successful job placements for graduates. The institutions shall also
provide similar evaluations for previously awarded high demand grants.
The board will report on the implementation of this subsection by
November 1 of each fiscal year to the office of financial management
and the fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,710,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $181,027,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,645,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $378,382,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $273,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $273,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the western interstate
commission for higher education.
(2) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for higher education student child
care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(3) $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the benefit of students who
participate in college assistance migrant programs (CAMP) operating in
Washington state. To ensure timely state aid, the board may establish
a date after which no additional grants would be available for the
2005-06 and 2006-07 academic years. The board shall disperse grants in
equal amounts to eligible post-secondary institutions so that state
money in all cases supplements federal CAMP awards.
(4) $133,844,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $141,998,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the state
need grant program. After April 1st of each fiscal year, up to one
percent of the annual appropriation for the state need grant program
may be transferred to the state work study program.
(5) $17,989,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $18,868,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the state work study program.
After April 1st of each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual
appropriation for the state work study program may be transferred to
the state need grant program. In addition to the administrative
allowance in subsection (11) of this section, four percent of the
general fund -- state amount in this subsection may be expended for state
work study program administration.
(6) $2,867,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,867,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for educational opportunity grants
pursuant to chapter 233, Laws of 2003 (ESB 5676). The board may
deposit sufficient funds from its appropriation into the state
education trust fund as established in RCW 28B.10.821 to provide a one-year renewal of the grant for each new recipient of the educational
opportunity grant award.
(7) $2,341,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,458,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement the Washington
scholars program. Any Washington scholars program moneys not awarded
by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the board to the
Washington award for vocational excellence.
(8) $783,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $822,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement Washington award for
vocational excellence program. Any Washington award for vocational
program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred
by the board to the Washington scholars program.
(9) $246,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $246,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for community scholarship matching
grants of $2,000 each. To be eligible for the matching grant, a
nonprofit community organization organized under section 501(c)(3) of
the internal revenue code must demonstrate that it has raised $2,000 in
new moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this
section. An organization may receive more than one $2,000 matching
grant and preference shall be given to organizations affiliated with
the citizens' scholarship foundation.
(10) Subject to state need grant service requirements pursuant to
chapter 28B.119 RCW, $8,620,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $9,015,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the
Washington promise scholarship program.
(11) $2,820,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,820,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for financial aid administration,
in addition to the four percent cost allowance provision for state work
study under subsection (5) of this section. These funds are provided
to administer all the financial aid and grant programs assigned to the
board by the legislature and administered by the agency. To the extent
the executive director finds the agency will not require the full sum
provided in this subsection, a portion may be transferred to supplement
financial grants-in-aid to eligible clients after notifying the board
and the office of financial management of the intended transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612 FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,706,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,660,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,849,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,215,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $485,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $485,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the
operations and development of the inland northwest technology education
center (INTEC) as a regional resource and model for the rapid
deployment of skilled workers trained in the latest technologies for
Washington. The board shall serve as an advisor to and fiscal agent
for INTEC, and will report back to the governor and legislature by
September 2006 as to the progress and future steps for INTEC as this
public-private partnership evolves.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613 FOR THE SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH
AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,570,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,556,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,126,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,305,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,312,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,917,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,715,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,556,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,271,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,539,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,562,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,101,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,034,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,017,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,335,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,386,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,279,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,253,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $232,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,764,000

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $646,146,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $714,417,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,924,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $139,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,215,000
Debt-limit General Fund Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,113,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,583,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,372,537,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
deposit into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account. The
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 shall be deposited in the debt-limit
general fund bond retirement account by June 30, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES
State Convention and Trade Center
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,411,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,111,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,111,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,633,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,588,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,743,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,844,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $183,175,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
State Building Construction Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,080,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,259,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--FIRE CONTINGENCY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
deposit in the disaster response account for the purposes specified in
section 706 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

The sum of $4,000,000 is appropriated from the disaster response
account for the purpose of making allocations to the Washington state
patrol for fire mobilizations costs or to the department of natural
resources for fire suppression costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EMERGENCY FUND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are for
the governor's emergency fund for the critically necessary work of any
agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--SEX OFFENDER SENTENCING IMPACT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $792,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $837,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
distribution to counties to pay for the costs of implementing chapter
176, Laws of 2004, which makes amendments to the special sex offender
sentencing alternative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--SMALL AGENCY INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY POOL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
deposit into the data processing revolving account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CAPITOL BUILDING CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
deposit in the capitol building construction account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--PUBLIC SAFETY AND EDUCATION ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,838,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,838,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,676,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
deposit in the public safety and education account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 BELATED CLAIMS. The agencies and
institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act,
upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of
supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior
fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis beginning July 1,
2005, consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the
judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly
basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.
(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system:
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,400,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,400,000

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judges
retirement system:
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,550,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,550,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,100,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for deposit in the education technology revolving
account for the purpose of covering ongoing operational and equipment
replacement costs incurred by the K-20 educational network program in
providing telecommunication services to network participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--BASE REALIGNMENT AND CLOSURE ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
grants to support projects in Island county, Kitsap county, Pierce
county, Snohomish county, and Spokane county when a military base in
that county is at risk of being identified for closure on the federal
base realignment and closure process. The office of financial
management shall establish a process for selecting projects for funding
based on criteria used to determine the federal base realignment and
closure list and recommendations by the department of community, trade,
and economic development and the military department. Final allocation
of the grants shall be at the discretion and with the approval of the
director of the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 FOR THE GOVERNOR--LIFE SCIENCES DISCOVERY
FUND AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for a grant to the life sciences discovery fund
authority to be used in accordance with Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1623 or Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581. If
neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2005, the appropriation in this
section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 STRATEGIC PURCHASING STRATEGY. (1) The
office of financial management shall work with the appropriate state
agencies to generate savings of $50,000,000, of which $25,000,000 shall
be from the state general fund, that can arise from a strategic
purchasing strategy. The office of financial management shall identify
the savings arising from this effort in the 2006 supplemental operating
budget.
(2) The department of general administration, with the assistance
of the department of information services and the department of
printing and in consultation with the office of financial management,
shall conduct an analysis of the state's purchasing processes to
identify the most reasonable strategy of attaining a statewide savings
target of $50,000,000 without affecting direct program activities. The
analysis shall identify savings by agency and fund that may result from
the implementation of a strategic purchasing strategy. The results of
this analysis shall then be provided to the office of financial
management by October 1, 2005, so they may use it as the basis to
achieve the savings identified in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Before the purchase of goods and services, all state agencies
and higher education institutions shall first consider the utilization
of current or existing master contracts. All state agencies and higher
education institutions shall strive to use master contracts when that
use is consistent with the agency's requirements and purchase is
financially cost effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718 INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2006. The sum of
one hundred million dollars or so much thereof as may be available on
June 30, 2006, from the total amount of unspent fiscal year 2006 state
general fund appropriations is appropriated for the purposes of RCW
43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five
million dollars, is appropriated to the education savings account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719 INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2007. The sum of
one hundred million dollars or so much thereof as may be available on
June 30, 2007, from the total amount of unspent fiscal year 2007 state
general fund appropriations is appropriated for the purposes of RCW
43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five
million dollars, is appropriated to the education savings account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720 NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE SALARY COST OF
LIVING ADJUSTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,794,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,998,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,188,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $682,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,461,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,113,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the purposes set forth in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section, appropriations in this section are provided solely
for a 3.2% increase effective July 1, 2005, for all classified
employees, except those represented by a collective bargaining unit
under the personnel system reform act of 2002, and except the
certificated employees covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure
No. 732. Also included are employees in the Washington management
service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the personnel
resources board or the director of personnel, as applicable.
(2) The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 3.2% salary
increase effective July 1, 2005, for general government, legislative,
and judicial employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum
salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected
officials.
(3) Appropriations in this section are provided for a 1.6% salary
increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, for all
classified employees, except those represented by a collective
bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act of 2002, and
except the certificated employees covered by the provisions of
Initiative Measure No. 732. Also included are employees in the
Washington management service, and exempt employees under the
jurisdiction of the personnel resources board or the director of
personnel, as applicable. The appropriations are also sufficient to
fund a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30,
2007, for general government, legislative, and judicial employees
exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by
the commission on salaries for elected officials.
(4)(a) No salary increase may be paid under this section to any
person whose salary has been Y-rated pursuant to rules adopted by the
personnel resources board or the director of personnel, as applicable.
(b) The average salary increases paid under this section to agency
officials whose maximum salaries are established by the committee on
agency official salaries shall not exceed the average increases
provided under subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-8T
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721 NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE SALARY SURVEY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,169,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,412,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,737,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $314,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,455,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,087,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For state employees, except those
represented by a bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act
of 2002, funding is provided for implementation of the department of
personnel's 2002 salary survey, for job classes more than 25% below
market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-8Z
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 722 CLASSIFICATION REVISIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $566,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,144,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $608,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,571,000

The appropriations in this section, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, shall be expended solely for the purposes designated in this
section and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
Funding is provided for partial implementation of classification
consolidation and revisions under the personnel system reform act of
2002. Groups 2 and 3 of the department of personnel's initial class
consolidation plan are affected.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-8Q
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 723 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS.
Provisions of the collective bargaining agreements contained in
sections 724 through 730 are described in general terms. Only major
economic terms are included in the descriptions. These descriptions do
not contain the complete contents of the agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 724 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,730,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,698,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,902,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,233,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,678,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,241,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the Washington
federation of state employees under the personnel system reform act of
2002. For employees covered under this agreement, funding is provided
for a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also
provided for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30,
2007, and for implementation of the department of personnel 2002 salary
survey for classes more than 25% below market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-80
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 725 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WPEA
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,859,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,750,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $647,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,362,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,692,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the Washington
public employees association under the personnel system reform act of
2002. For employees covered under this agreement, funding is provided
for a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also
provided for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30,
2007, and for implementation of the department of personnel 2002 salary
survey for classes more than 25% below market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-81
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 726 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UFCW
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,138,000
The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the united food
and commercial workers under the personnel system reform act of 2002.
For employees covered under this agreement, funding is provided for a
3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided
for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-83
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 727 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--TEAMSTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,325,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,615,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,943,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the brotherhood
of teamsters under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For
employees covered under this agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2%
salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for
a 2.9% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for
implementation of the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for
classes more than 25% below market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-82
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 728 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--COALITION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $701,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $926,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,239,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,177,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the coalition
under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered
under this agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of
the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than
25% below market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-86
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 729 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--IFPTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $241,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the international
federation of professional and technical engineers local 17 under the
personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this
agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase effective
July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase effective
July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of the
department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than 25%
below market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-84
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 730 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--SEIU-1199
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,656,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,260,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,574,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $188,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,678,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the service
employees international union, local 1199 NW under the personnel system
reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement,
funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005.
Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006,
until June 30, 2007, for implementation of the department of personnel
2002 salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rates, and
for adjustments to the salary grid.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-85
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 731 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($44,771,000)
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($45,307,000)
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($28,778,000)
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($2,901,000)
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($41,836,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($163,593,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding in this section is provided solely
for funding agency pension changes as set forth in House Bill No. 1043
and House Bill No. 1044. The office of financial management shall
update agency appropriations schedules to reflect the change in funding
in this section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document
2005-07-79 dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 732 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($269,000)
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($933,000)
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($336,000)
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($32,000)
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($602,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($2,172,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding in this section is provided solely
for funding agency savings in the cost of other compensation items
provided at the pension rates as set forth in House Bill No. 1044. The
office of financial management shall update agency appropriations
schedules to reflect the change in funding in this section, as
identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-7A dated March
21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 733 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS IN BARGAINED AGREEMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,252,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,512,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,929,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,868,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,257,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,818,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the health
insurance collective bargaining agreement reached between the governor
and the health insurance coalition under the personnel system reform
act of 2002 as per the specifications in section 933 of this act. The
office of financial management shall update agency appropriations
schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this section, as
identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-88 dated March
21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 734 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS FOR NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,785,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,544,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $581,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,179,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,038,000

The appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for state employee
health insurance benefits for nonrepresented state employees as per the
specifications in section 934 of this act. The office of financial
management shall update agency appropriations schedules to reflect the
addition of the funding in this section, as identified by agency and
account in OFM document 2005-07-8V dated March 21, 2005.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,577,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,422,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,457,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety and
education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,430,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly
funded autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,969,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation
for harbor improvement revenue
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for
distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,110,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,914,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,104,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for
liquor excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,413,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for
liquor profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,186,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $330,427,000
The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE COUNTY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,913,400
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2005-07 biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,275,600
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2005-07 biennium to all
cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially
decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and
that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in
which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not
limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998
(deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license
suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations);
chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215,
Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FEDERAL REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing
fees distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,632,000
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood
control funds distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,000
Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal
forest reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,001,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,701,000
The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS. For
transfers in this section to the state general fund, pursuant to RCW
43.135.035(5), the state expenditure limit shall be increased by the
amount of the transfer. The increase shall occur in the fiscal year in
which the transfer occurs.

State Convention and Trade Center Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$5,150,000 for fiscal year 2006 and $5,150,000
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000
Financial Services Regulation Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $500,000 for
fiscal year 2006 and $500,000 for fiscal
year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer
to the state toxics control account,
$2,027,000 for fiscal year 2006 and $2,027,000
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,054,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For
transfer to the drinking water
assistance account, $8,400,000 for fiscal
year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,400,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer
to the health services account, in an
amount not to exceed the actual balance
of the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $185,823,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $85,700,000 for fiscal
year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,700,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$2,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Secretary of State's Revolving Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $250,000
for fiscal year 2006 and $250,000 for
fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account: For transfer to the state general fund,
$7,500,000 for fiscal year 2006 and $7,500,000
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $4,950,000 for fiscal
year 2006 and $4,950,000 for fiscal year
2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,900,000
State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $5,500,000 for fiscal
year 2006 and $5,000,000 for fiscal year
2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,500,000
State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $7,100,000 for fiscal
year 2006 and $7,100,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,200,000
General Fund: For transfer to the water quality
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,137,000
Water Quality Account: For transfer to the
water pollution control revolving account . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,534,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance repayment
account, an amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control
Account: For transfer to the state general
fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 and
$1,000,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to
the public facility construction loan revolving
account, $4,500,000 for fiscal year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Student Achievement Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $33,337,000 for
fiscal year 2006 and $26,255,000 for fiscal
year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,592,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to
the disaster response account, $3,000,000 for
fiscal year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Insurance Commissioner's Regulatory Account:
For transfer to general administrative
services account, $175,000 for fiscal
year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
State Treasurer's Service Account:
For transfer to general administrative
services account, $175,000 for fiscal
year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
General Fund: For transfer to the tourism
development and promotion account, $150,000
for fiscal year 2006 and $150,000 for fiscal
year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 806 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS--UNFUNDED PENSION LIABILITY. (1)(a) The office of financial management
shall calculate the difference between the first official general fund
state revenue forecast following the effective date of this section and
the amount of revenues assumed in the general fund state budget. If
the official revenue forecast is greater than the revenue assumed in
this act when enacted, within thirty days the state treasurer, as
limited by subsection (2) of this section, shall transfer 50% of the
difference to the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account
and the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account to reduce unfunded
actuarial accrued liabilities. The office of financial management
shall inform the state treasurer of the amount of any transfer.
(b) The office of financial management shall calculate the
difference between the first official general fund state revenue
forecast following the effective date of the first enacted budget in
2006 and the official revenue forecast in (a) of this subsection. If
that revenue forecast is greater than the official revenue forecast in
(a) of this subsection, within thirty days the state treasurer, as
limited by subsection (2) of this section, shall transfer 50% of the
difference to the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account
and the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account to reduce unfunded
actuarial accrued liabilities. The office of financial management
shall inform the state treasurer of the amount of any transfer.
(c) The office of financial management shall calculate the
difference between the June 2007 official general fund state revenue
forecast and the official state general fund revenue forecast in (b) of
this subsection. If the official revenue forecast issued in June 2007
is greater than the official revenue forecast in (b) of this
subsection, by June 30, 2007, the state treasurer, as limited by
subsection (2) of this section, shall transfer 50% of the difference to
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account and the
teachers' retirement system plan 1 account to reduce unfunded actuarial
accrued liabilities. The office of financial management shall inform
the state treasurer of the amount of any transfer.
(2) The state treasurer shall transfer an amount up to $173,000,000
under this section to the public employees' retirement system plan 1
account and teachers' retirement system plan 1 account. The funds
shall be transferred at a ratio of $3 to the public employees'
retirement system for every $4 transferred to the teachers' retirement
system, until $173,000,000 is transferred.
For the purpose of calculating contribution rates, the state
actuary shall treat the funds transferred to the public employees'
retirement system account under this section as assets specific to the
state until the unfunded liabilities of plan 1 are fully amortized
under chapter 41.45 RCW. The state actuary shall reduce the
contribution rates for the state by an amount attributable to
contributions made under this section.
(3) Any revenue transfers under this section are exempt from the
provisions of chapter 43.135 RCW.

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS. The
appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure
authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the
treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be recorded as
loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes. To
the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding
appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed
from the treasury during the 2003-05 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies
shall comply with the following requirements regarding information
systems projects when specifically directed to do so by this act.
(1) Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology
shall be made in the context of its information technology portfolio.
"Information technology portfolio" means a strategic management
approach in which the relationships between agency missions and
information technology investments can be seen and understood, such
that: Technology efforts are linked to agency objectives and business
plans; the impact of new investments on existing infrastructure and
business functions are assessed and understood before implementation;
and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative statewide infrastructure.
(2) Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in
making decisions on matters related to the following:
(a) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;
(b) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology
in meeting legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;
(c) Assessment of overall information processing performance,
resources, and capabilities;
(d) Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for
the operation of any new systems developed using external resources;
and
(e) Progress toward enabling electronic access to public
information.
(3) Each project will be planned and designed to take optimal
advantage of Internet technologies and protocols. Agencies shall
ensure that the project is in compliance with the architecture,
infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the information services board.
(4) The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information
technology projects at the direction of the information services board
and in accordance with published department of information services
policies and guidelines. At a minimum, such studies shall include a
statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus for change; (b) the business
value to the agency, including an examination and evaluation of
benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk assessment
based on the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state
operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d)
the impact on agency and statewide information infrastructure; and (e)
the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.
(5) The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for
each project. The plan or plans shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of each project. The plan(s) shall include, but
is not limited to, the following elements: A description of the
problem or opportunity that the information technology project is
intended to address; a statement of project objectives and assumptions;
a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be
accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for
the phased approach shall be such that the business case justification
for a project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or
adds measurable value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business
functions within each development cycle.
(6) The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for
information technology projects. Consistent with the direction of the
information services board and the published policies and guidelines of
the department of information services, the quality assurance plan
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of the
project and successful integration with the agency and state
information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality assurance
plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The
quality assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements
for each phase of a project.
(7) A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and
quality assurance plan shall be provided to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and
legislative fiscal committees. The plans and studies shall demonstrate
a sound business case that justifies the investment of taxpayer funds
on any new project, an assessment of the impact of the proposed system
on the existing information technology infrastructure, the disciplined
use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of
private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval
of the relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan by the department of information services and the office
of financial management.
(8) Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the
department of information services, the office of financial management,
and legislative fiscal committees at intervals specified in the
project's quality assurance plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 BUSINESS CONTINUITY AND DISASTER
RECOVERY. State agencies shall comply with the business continuity and
disaster recovery policies, guidelines, and statements of direction
developed by the department of information services and the information
services board in consultation with state agencies. To ensure that
agency business continuity and disaster recovery activities identify
the primary risks across state agencies, account for dependencies
between agencies, capitalize on economies of scale, and avoid
unnecessary duplication of costs and efforts, state agencies shall
receive the prior approval of the department of information services
before implementing business continuity and disaster recovery
strategies and expending funds for business continuity activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS. The department
of information services shall act as lead agency in coordinating video
telecommunications services for state agencies. As lead agency, the
department shall develop standards and common specifications for leased
and purchased telecommunications equipment and assist state agencies in
developing a video telecommunications expenditure plan. No agency may
spend any portion of any appropriation in this act for new video
telecommunication equipment, new video telecommunication transmission,
or new video telecommunication programming, or for expanding current
video telecommunication systems without first complying with chapter
43.105 RCW, including but not limited to, RCW 43.105.041(2), and
without first submitting a video telecommunications expenditure plan,
in accordance with the policies of the department of information
services, for review and assessment by the department of information
services under RCW 43.105.052. Prior to any such expenditure by a
public school, a video telecommunications expenditure plan shall be
approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall submit the plans to the
department of information services in a form prescribed by the
department. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications in public schools
by providing educational information to local school districts and
shall assist local school districts and educational service districts
in telecommunications planning and curriculum development. Prior to
any such expenditure by a public institution of postsecondary
education, a telecommunications expenditure plan shall be approved by
the higher education coordinating board. The higher education
coordinating board shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications
for instruction and instructional support in postsecondary education,
including the review and approval of instructional telecommunications
course offerings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 PROGRAM COST SHIFTS. Any program costs
or moneys in this act that are shifted to the general fund from another
fund or account require an adjustment to the expenditure limit under
RCW 43.135.035(5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS. Whenever
allocations are made from the governor's emergency fund appropriation
to an agency that is financed in whole or in part by other than general
fund moneys, the director of financial management may direct the
repayment of such allocated amount to the general fund from any balance
in the fund or funds which finance the agency. No appropriation shall
be necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS. In addition
to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenues for distribution,
state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2, and bond retirement and interest including
ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on
registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also
appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for
these purposes under any statutory formula or under chapters 39.94 and
39.96 RCW or any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 BOND EXPENSES. In addition to such other
appropriations as are made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to
the state finance committee from legally available bond proceeds in the
applicable construction or building funds and accounts such amounts as
are necessary to pay the expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the subject bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 VOLUNTARY SEPARATION INCENTIVES. As a
management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of
resources, while improving employee productivity and morale, agencies
may offer voluntary separation and/or downshifting incentives and
options according to procedures and guidelines established by the
department of personnel and the department of retirement systems in
consultation with the office of financial management. The options may
include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for: Voluntary
resignation and retirement, voluntary leave-without-pay, voluntary
workweek or work hour reduction, voluntary downward movement, or
temporary separation for development purposes. No employee shall have
a contractual right to a financial incentive offered pursuant to this
section. Agencies shall report on the outcomes of their plans, and
offers shall be reviewed and monitored jointly by the department of
personnel and the department of retirement systems, for reporting to
the office of financial management by December 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910 VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT INCENTIVES. It is
the intent of the legislature that agencies may implement a voluntary
retirement incentive program that is cost neutral or results in cost
savings provided that such a program is approved by the director of
retirement systems and the office of financial management. Agencies
participating in this authorization are required to submit a report by
June 30, 2007, to the legislature and the office of financial
management on the outcome of their approved retirement incentive
program. The report should include information on the details of the
program including resulting service delivery changes, agency
efficiencies, the cost of the retirement incentive per participant, the
total cost to the state, and the projected or actual net dollar savings
over the 2005-07 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911 AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR MOTOR VEHICLES.
The use of hybrid motor vehicles reduces air contaminants, greenhouse
gas emissions and reliance on imported sources of petroleum. To foster
the use of hybrid motor vehicles, beginning July 1, 2005, before the
purchase or lease of a motor vehicle, state agencies should first
consider the feasibility of hybrid motor vehicles. State agencies
should strive to purchase or lease a hybrid motor vehicle when the use
of such vehicle is consistent with and can accomplish the agency's
mission and when the purchase is financially reasonable. The financial
assessment should include savings accruing from reduced fuel purchases
over the life of the vehicle. Agencies shall report on their purchases
of hybrid vehicles in their biennial sustainability plans as required
under executive order 02-03.

Sec. 912 RCW 28A.160.195 and 2004 c 276 s 904 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the regional transportation coordinators of the educational service
districts, shall establish a minimum number of school bus categories
considering the capacity and type of vehicles required by school
districts in Washington. The superintendent, in consultation with the
regional transportation coordinators of the educational service
districts, shall establish competitive specifications for each category
of school bus. The categories shall be developed to produce minimum
long-range operating costs, including costs of equipment and all costs
in operating the vehicles. The categories, for purposes of comparative
studies, will be at a minimum the same as those in the beginning of the
1994-95 school year. The competitive specifications shall meet federal
motor vehicle safety standards, minimum state specifications as
established by rule by the superintendent, and supported options as
determined by the superintendent in consultation with the regional
transportation coordinators of the educational service districts. In
fiscal ((year 2005)) years 2006 and 2007, the superintendent may
solicit and accept price quotes for a rear-engine category school bus
that shall be reimbursed at the price of the corresponding front engine
category.
(2) After establishing school bus categories and competitive
specifications, the superintendent of public instruction shall solicit
competitive price quotes from school bus dealers to be in effect for
one year and shall (a) except in fiscal ((year 2005)) years 2006 and
2007, establish a list of the lowest competitive price quotes obtained
under this subsection, and (b) in fiscal ((year 2005)) years 2006 and
2007, establish a list of all accepted price quotes in each category
obtained under this subsection.
(3) The superintendent shall base the level of reimbursement to
school districts and educational service districts for school buses on
the lowest quote in each category.
(4) Notwithstanding RCW 28A.335.190, school districts and
educational service districts may purchase at the quoted price directly
from the dealer who is providing the lowest competitive price quote on
the list established under subsection (2) of this section and in fiscal
((year 2005)) years 2006 and 2007 from any dealer on the list
established under subsection (2)(b) of this section. School districts
and educational service districts may make their own selections for
school buses, but shall be reimbursed at the rates determined under
subsection (3) of this section and RCW 28A.160.200. District-selected
options shall not be reimbursed by the state. For the ((2003-05))
2005-2007 fiscal biennium, school districts and educational service
districts shall be reimbursed for buses purchased only through a
lowest-price competitive bid process conducted pursuant to RCW
28A.335.190 or through the state bid process established by this
section.
(5) This section does not prohibit school districts or educational
service districts from conducting their own competitive bid process.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW to implement this section.

Sec. 913 RCW 28A.305.210 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 911 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The state board of education, by rule or regulation, may
require the assistance of educational service district boards and/or
superintendents in the performance of any duty, authority, or power
imposed upon or granted to the state board of education by law, upon
such terms and conditions as the state board of education shall
establish. Such authority to assist the state board of education shall
be limited to the service function of information collection and
dissemination and the attestment to the accuracy and completeness of
submitted information.
(2) During the ((2003-05)) 2005-2007 biennium, educational service
districts may, at the request of the state board of education, receive
and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct school
accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education rules,
and submit to the state board of education postsite visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

Sec. 914 RCW 28A.500.030 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 912 are each
amended to read as follows:
Allocation of state matching funds to eligible districts for local
effort assistance shall be determined as follows:
(1) Funds raised by the district through maintenance and operation
levies shall be matched with state funds using the following ratio of
state funds to levy funds:
(a) The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate
and the statewide average twelve percent levy rate; to
(b) The statewide average twelve percent levy rate.
(2) The maximum amount of state matching funds for districts
eligible for local effort assistance shall be the district's twelve
percent levy amount, multiplied by the following percentage:
(a) The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate
and the statewide average twelve percent levy rate; divided by
(b) The district's twelve percent levy rate.
(3) Calendar year 2003 allocations and maximum eligibility under
this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.99.
(4) From January 1, 2004, to ((June 30,)) December 31, 2005,
allocations and maximum eligibility under this chapter shall be
multiplied by 0.937.
(5) From January 1, 2006, to June 30, 2007, allocations and maximum
eligibility under this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.918.

Sec. 915 RCW 28B.119.010 and 2004 c 275 s 60 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall design the Washington
promise scholarship program based on the following parameters:
(1) Scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating from
public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW,
students participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter
28A.200 RCW, and persons twenty-one years of age or younger receiving
a GED certificate, who meet both an academic and a financial
eligibility criteria.
(a) Academic eligibility criteria shall be defined as follows:
(i) ((Beginning with the graduating class of 2002,)) Students
graduating from public and approved private high schools under chapter
28A.195 RCW must be in the top fifteen percent of their graduating
class, as identified by each respective high school at the completion
of the first term of the student's senior year. If the fall term
enrollment of the current senior class is not available to the
superintendent in a timely manner then the number of seniors that may
be identified is equal to the previous year's fall term senior class
enrollment; or
(ii) Students graduating from public high schools, approved private
high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, students participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW, and persons
twenty-one years of age or younger receiving a GED certificate, must on
their first attempt equal or exceed a cumulative ((scholastic
assessment test I score of twelve hundred on their first attempt or
must equal or exceed a composite)) score on either the scholastic
assessment test (SAT) I or the American college test ((score of twenty-seven on their first attempt)) (ACT) that represents performance in the
top fifteen percent of students taking the test.
(b) To meet the financial eligibility criteria, a student's family
income shall not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent of the state
median family income adjusted for family size, as determined by the
higher education coordinating board for each graduating class.
Students not meeting the eligibility requirements for the first year of
scholarship benefits may reapply for the second year of benefits, but
must still meet the income standard set by the board for the student's
graduating class.
(2) Promise scholarships are not intended to supplant any grant,
scholarship, or tax program related to postsecondary education. If the
board finds that promise scholarships supplant or reduce any grant,
scholarship, or tax program for categories of students, then the board
shall adjust the financial eligibility criteria or the amount of
scholarship to the level necessary to avoid supplanting.
(3) Within available funds, each qualifying student shall receive
two consecutive annual awards, the value of each not to exceed the
full-time annual resident tuition rates charged by Washington's
community colleges. The higher education coordinating board shall
award scholarships to as many students as possible from among those
qualifying under this section.
(4) By October 15th of each year, the board shall determine the
award amount of the scholarships, after taking into consideration the
availability of funds.
(5) The scholarships may only be used for undergraduate coursework
at accredited institutions of higher education in the state of
Washington.
(6) The scholarships may be used for undergraduate coursework at
Oregon institutions of higher education that are part of the border
county higher education opportunity project in RCW 28B.76.685 when
those institutions offer programs not available at accredited
institutions of higher education in Washington state.
(7) The scholarships may be used for college-related expenses,
including but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books, and
materials.
(8) The scholarships may not be awarded to any student who is
pursuing a degree in theology.
(9) The higher education coordinating board may establish
satisfactory progress standards for the continued receipt of the
promise scholarship.
(10) The higher education coordinating board shall establish the
time frame within which the student must use the scholarship.

Sec. 916 RCW 41.50.110 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 914 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this
section, all expenses of the administration of the department, the
expenses of administration of the retirement systems, and the expenses
of the administration of the office of the state actuary created in
chapters 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.34, 41.35, 43.43, and
44.44 RCW shall be paid from the department of retirement systems
expense fund.
(2) In order to reimburse the department of retirement systems
expense fund on an equitable basis the department shall ascertain and
report to each employer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010,
41.35.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray its proportional
share of the entire expense of the administration of the retirement
system that the employer participates in during the ensuing biennium or
fiscal year whichever may be required. Such sum is to be computed in
an amount directly proportional to the estimated entire expense of the
administration as the ratio of monthly salaries of the employer's
members bears to the total salaries of all members in the entire
system. It shall then be the duty of all such employers to include in
their budgets or otherwise provide the amounts so required.
(3) The department shall compute and bill each employer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, at the end of
each month for the amount due for that month to the department of
retirement systems expense fund and the same shall be paid as are its
other obligations. Such computation as to each employer shall be made
on a percentage rate of salary established by the department. However,
the department may at its discretion establish a system of billing
based upon calendar year quarters in which event the said billing shall
be at the end of each such quarter.
(4) The director may adjust the expense fund contribution rate for
each system at any time when necessary to reflect unanticipated costs
or savings in administering the department.
(5) An employer who fails to submit timely and accurate reports to
the department may be assessed an additional fee related to the
increased costs incurred by the department in processing the deficient
reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the
retirement system expense fund.
(a) Every six months the department shall determine the amount of
an employer's fee by reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the
reports submitted by the employer in the preceding six months. If
those reports were not both timely and accurate the department may
prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.
(b) An additional fee assessed by the department under this
subsection shall not exceed fifty percent of the standard fee.
(c) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.
(6) Expenses other than those under RCW 41.34.060(3) shall be paid
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(7) During the ((2003-)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the department of retirement systems' expense fund to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
of the fund.

Sec. 917 RCW 41.50.110 and 2004 c 242 s 46 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this
section, all expenses of the administration of the department, the
expenses of administration of the retirement systems, and the expenses
of the administration of the office of the state actuary created in
chapters 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.34, 41.35, 41.37, 43.43,
and 44.44 RCW shall be paid from the department of retirement systems
expense fund.
(2) In order to reimburse the department of retirement systems
expense fund on an equitable basis the department shall ascertain and
report to each employer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010,
41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray its
proportional share of the entire expense of the administration of the
retirement system that the employer participates in during the ensuing
biennium or fiscal year whichever may be required. Such sum is to be
computed in an amount directly proportional to the estimated entire
expense of the administration as the ratio of monthly salaries of the
employer's members bears to the total salaries of all members in the
entire system. It shall then be the duty of all such employers to
include in their budgets or otherwise provide the amounts so required.
(3) The department shall compute and bill each employer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, at the
end of each month for the amount due for that month to the department
of retirement systems expense fund and the same shall be paid as are
its other obligations. Such computation as to each employer shall be
made on a percentage rate of salary established by the department.
However, the department may at its discretion establish a system of
billing based upon calendar year quarters in which event the said
billing shall be at the end of each such quarter.
(4) The director may adjust the expense fund contribution rate for
each system at any time when necessary to reflect unanticipated costs
or savings in administering the department.
(5) An employer who fails to submit timely and accurate reports to
the department may be assessed an additional fee related to the
increased costs incurred by the department in processing the deficient
reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the
retirement system expense fund.
(a) Every six months the department shall determine the amount of
an employer's fee by reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the
reports submitted by the employer in the preceding six months. If
those reports were not both timely and accurate the department may
prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.
(b) An additional fee assessed by the department under this
subsection shall not exceed fifty percent of the standard fee.
(c) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.
(6) Expenses other than those under RCW 41.34.060(3) shall be paid
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(7) During the ((2003-)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the department of retirement systems' expense fund to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
of the fund.

Sec. 918 RCW 43.07.130 and 1994 c 211 s 1311 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created within the state treasury a revolving fund, to be
known as the "secretary of state's revolving fund," which shall be used
by the office of the secretary of state to defray the costs of
printing, reprinting, or distributing printed matter authorized by law
to be issued by the office of the secretary of state, and any other
cost of carrying out the functions of the secretary of state under
Title 23B RCW, or chapters 18.100, 23.86, 23.90, 24.03, 24.06, 24.12,
24.20, 24.24, 24.28, 24.36, 25.15, or 25.10 RCW.
The secretary of state is hereby authorized to charge a fee for
such publications in an amount which will compensate for the costs of
printing, reprinting, and distributing such printed matter. Fees
recovered by the secretary of state under RCW 43.07.120(2), 23B.01.220
(1)(e), (6) and (7), 23B.18.050, 24.03.410, 24.06.455, or 46.64.040,
and such other moneys as are expressly designated for deposit in the
secretary of state's revolving fund shall be placed in the secretary of
state's revolving fund.
During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the secretary of state's revolving fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 919 RCW 43.08.190 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 916 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury to be
known as the "state treasurer's service fund". Such fund shall be used
solely for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the operation
and administration of the state treasurer's office.
Moneys shall be allocated monthly and placed in the state
treasurer's service fund equivalent to a maximum of one percent of the
trust and treasury average daily cash balances from the earnings
generated under the authority of RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.080 other
than earnings generated from investment of balances in funds and
accounts specified in RCW ((43.79.040)) 43.79A.040 or 43.84.092(4)(b).
The allocation shall precede the distribution of the remaining earnings
as prescribed under RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.092. The state treasurer
shall establish a uniform allocation rate based on the appropriations
for the treasurer's office.
During the ((2003-)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state treasurer's service fund to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 920 RCW 43.10.180 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 917 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The attorney general shall keep such records as are necessary
to facilitate proper allocation of costs to funds and agencies served
and the director of financial management shall prescribe appropriate
accounting procedures to accurately allocate costs to funds and
agencies served. Billings shall be adjusted in line with actual costs
incurred at intervals not to exceed six months.
(2) During the ((2003-05)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, all expenses
for administration of the office of the attorney general shall be
allocated to and paid from the legal services revolving fund in
accordance with accounting procedures prescribed by the director of
financial management.

Sec. 921 RCW 43.72.900 and 2003 c 259 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The health services account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Subject
to the transfers described in subsection (3) of this section, moneys in
the account may be expended only for maintaining and expanding health
services access for low-income residents, maintaining and expanding the
public health system, maintaining and improving the capacity of the
health care system, containing health care costs, and the regulation,
planning, and administering of the health care system.
(2) Funds deposited into the health services account under RCW
82.24.028 and 82.26.028 shall be used solely as follows:
(a) Five million dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July
1, 2002, and five million dollars for the state fiscal year beginning
July 1, 2003, shall be appropriated by the legislature for programs
that effectively improve the health of low-income persons, including
efforts to reduce diseases and illnesses that harm low-income persons.
The department of health shall submit a report to the legislature on
March 1, 2002, evaluating the cost-effectiveness of programs that
improve the health of low-income persons and address diseases and
illnesses that disproportionately affect low-income persons, and making
recommendations to the legislature on which of these programs could
most effectively utilize the funds appropriated under this subsection.
(b) Ten percent of the funds deposited into the health services
account under RCW 82.24.028 and 82.26.028 remaining after the
appropriation under (a) of this subsection shall be transferred no less
frequently than annually by the treasurer to the tobacco prevention and
control account established by RCW 43.79.480. The funds transferred
shall be used exclusively for implementation of the Washington state
tobacco prevention and control plan and shall be used only to
supplement, and not supplant, funds in the tobacco prevention and
control account as of January 1, 2001, however, these funds may be used
to replace funds appropriated by the legislature for further
implementation of the Washington state tobacco prevention and control
plan for the biennium beginning July 1, 2001. For each state fiscal
year beginning on and after July 1, 2002, the legislature shall
appropriate no less than twenty-six million two hundred forty thousand
dollars from the tobacco prevention and control account for
implementation of the Washington state tobacco prevention and control
plan.
(c) Because of its demonstrated effectiveness in improving the
health of low-income persons and addressing illnesses and diseases that
harm low-income persons, the remainder of the funds deposited into the
health services account under RCW 82.24.028 and 82.26.028 shall be
appropriated solely for Washington basic health plan enrollment as
provided in chapter 70.47 RCW. Funds appropriated under this
subsection may be used to support outreach and enrollment activities
only to the extent necessary to achieve the enrollment goals described
in this section.
(3) Prior to expenditure for the purposes described in subsection
(2) of this section, funds deposited into the health services account
under RCW 82.24.028 and 82.26.028 shall first be transferred to the
following accounts to ensure the continued availability of previously
dedicated revenues for certain existing programs:
(a) To the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520, two million two hundred forty-nine thousand five hundred
dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001, four million
two hundred forty-eight thousand dollars for the state fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2002, seven million seven hundred eighty-nine
thousand dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2003, six million
nine hundred thirty-two thousand dollars for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2005, and six million nine hundred thirty-two thousand dollars
for each biennium thereafter, as required by RCW 82.24.020(2);
(b) To the health services account under this section, nine million
seventy-seven thousand dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July
1, 2001, seventeen million one hundred eighty-eight thousand dollars
for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002, thirty-one million
seven hundred fifty-five thousand dollars for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2003, twenty-eight million six hundred twenty-two thousand
dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2005, and twenty-eight
million six hundred twenty-two thousand dollars for each biennium
thereafter, as required by RCW 82.24.020(3); and
(c) To the water quality account under RCW 70.146.030, two million
two hundred three thousand five hundred dollars for the state fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2001, four million two hundred forty-four
thousand dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002,
eight million one hundred eighty-two thousand dollars for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2003, seven million eight hundred eighty-five
thousand dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2005, and seven
million eight hundred eighty-five thousand dollars for each biennium
thereafter, as required by RCW 82.24.027(2)(a).
During the ((2001-2003)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the health services account such amounts as reflect
the excess fund balance of the account to the state general fund.

Sec. 922 RCW 43.320.110 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 921 and 2003 c
288 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
There is created a local fund known as the "financial services
regulation fund" which shall consist of all moneys received by the
divisions of the department of financial institutions, except for the
division of securities which shall deposit thirteen percent of all
moneys received, except as provided in RCW 43.320.115, and which shall
be used for the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the
payment of salaries, wages, and utilities; the establishment of
reserves; and other incidental costs required for the proper regulation
of individuals and entities subject to regulation by the department.
The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund. Disbursements
from the fund shall be on authorization of the director of financial
institutions or the director's designee. In order to maintain an
effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be subject in
all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to
permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.
During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the financial services regulation fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 923 RCW 46.09.170 and 2004 c 105 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on a tax rate of: (a) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle
fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (b) twenty cents per
gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;
(c) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2009; (d) twenty-two cents per gallon of motor
vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; and (e) twenty-three cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1, 2011,
and thereafter, less proper deductions for refunds and costs of
collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090.
(2) The treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as
follows:
(a) Thirty-six percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and
management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities, and information programs and maintenance of nonhighway
roads;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish
and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and the maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(c) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely
for the acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management
of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities; and
(d) Fifty-eight and one-half percent shall be credited to the
nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account to be
administered by the committee for planning, acquisition, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and for education, information, and law
enforcement programs. During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, a portion
of these funds may be appropriated to the department of natural
resources to design and implement safety enhancements at existing ORV
recreation sites. The funds under this subsection shall be expended in
accordance with the following limitations, except that during the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, funds appropriated to the committee from motor
vehicle fuel tax revenues for activities in (d)(ii) and (iii) of this
subsection shall be reduced by the amounts appropriated to the
department of natural resources as provided in this subsection:
(i) Not more than thirty percent may be expended for education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than seventy percent may be expended for ORV,
nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities. Except as
provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, of this amount:
(A) Not less than thirty percent, together with the funds the
committee receives under RCW 46.09.110, may be expended for ORV
recreation facilities;
(B) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonmotorized
recreation facilities. Funds expended under this subsection
(2)(d)(ii)(B) shall be known as Ira Spring outdoor recreation
facilities funds; and
(C) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(iii) The committee may waive the minimum percentage cited in
(d)(ii) of this subsection due to insufficient requests for funds or
projects that score low in the committee's project evaluation. Funds
remaining after such a waiver must be allocated in accordance with
committee policy.
(3) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.
(4) During the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the NOVA
account to the interagency committee for outdoor recreation, the
department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife,
and the state parks and recreation commission. This appropriation is
not required to follow the specific distribution specified in
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 924 RCW 67.40.040 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 929 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW
67.40.030, proceeds of the taxes imposed under RCW 67.40.090 and
67.40.130, and all other moneys received by the state convention and
trade center from any public or private source which are intended to
fund the acquisition, design, construction, expansion, exterior cleanup
and repair of the Eagles building, conversion of various retail and
other space to meeting rooms, purchase of the land and building known
as the McKay Parcel, development of low-income housing, or renovation
of the center, and those expenditures authorized under RCW 67.40.170
shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center account
hereby created in the state treasury and in such subaccounts as are
deemed appropriate by the directors of the corporation.
(2) Moneys in the account, including unanticipated revenues under
RCW 43.79.270, shall be used exclusively for the following purposes in
the following priority:
(a) For reimbursement of the state general fund under RCW
67.40.060;
(b) After appropriation by statute:
(i) For payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030;
(ii) For expenditures authorized in RCW 67.40.170;
(iii) For acquisition, design, and construction of the state
convention and trade center; and
(iv) For reimbursement of any expenditures from the state general
fund in support of the state convention and trade center; and
(c) For transfer to the state convention and trade center
operations account.
(3) The corporation shall identify with specificity those
facilities of the state convention and trade center that are to be
financed with proceeds of general obligation bonds, the interest on
which is intended to be excluded from gross income for federal income
tax purposes. The corporation shall not permit the extent or manner of
private business use of those bond-financed facilities to be
inconsistent with treatment of such bonds as governmental bonds under
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) In order to ensure consistent treatment of bonds authorized
under RCW 67.40.030 with applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, and notwithstanding RCW 43.84.092, investment
earnings on bond proceeds deposited in the state convention and trade
center account in the state treasury shall be retained in the account,
and shall be expended by the corporation for the purposes authorized
under chapter 386, Laws of 1995 and in a manner consistent with
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(5) During the ((2003-)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the state convention and trade center account to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the account.

Sec. 925 RCW 70.93.180 and 1998 c 257 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created an account within the state treasury to
be known as the "waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account". Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account shall be used as follows:
(a) Fifty percent to the department of ecology, for use by the
departments of ecology, natural resources, revenue, transportation, and
corrections, and the parks and recreation commission, for use in litter
collection programs, to be distributed under RCW 70.93.220. The amount
to the department of ecology shall also be used for a central
coordination function for litter control efforts statewide, for the
biennial litter survey under RCW 70.93.200(8), and for statewide public
awareness programs under RCW 70.93.200(7). The amount to the
department shall also be used to defray the costs of administering the
funding, coordination, and oversight of local government programs for
waste reduction, litter control, and recycling, so that local
governments can apply one hundred percent of their funding to achieving
program goals. The amount to the department of revenue shall be used
to enforce compliance with the litter tax imposed in chapter 82.19 RCW;
(b) Twenty percent to the department for local government funding
programs for waste reduction, litter control, and recycling activities
by cities and counties under RCW 70.93.250, to be administered by the
department of ecology; and
(c) Thirty percent to the department of ecology for waste reduction
and recycling efforts.
(2) All taxes imposed in RCW 82.19.010 and fines and bail
forfeitures collected or received pursuant to this chapter shall be
deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account
and used for the programs under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Not less than five percent and no more than ten percent of the
amount appropriated into the waste reduction, recycling, and litter
control account every biennium shall be reserved for capital needs,
including the purchase of vehicles for transporting crews and for
collecting litter and solid waste. Capital funds shall be distributed
among state agencies and local governments according to the same
criteria provided in RCW 70.93.220 for the remainder of the funds, so
that the most effective waste reduction, litter control, and recycling
programs receive the most funding. The intent of this subsection is to
provide funds for the purchase of equipment that will enable the
department to account for the greatest return on investment in terms of
reaching a zero litter goal.
(4) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the account.

Sec. 926 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 933 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship; and
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the top two hazardous waste
management priorities of RCW 70.105.150.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority: (i) Remedial
actions; (ii) hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105
RCW; (iii) solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW; (iv) funds for a program to assist in the
assessment and cleanup of sites of methamphetamine production, but not
to be used for the initial containment of such sites, consistent with
the responsibilities and intent of RCW 69.50.511; and (v) cleanup and
disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or derelict vessels
that pose a threat to human health or the environment. For purposes of
this subsection (3)(a)(v), "abandoned or derelict vessels" means
vessels that have little or no value and either have no identified
owner or have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean
up and dispose of the vessel. Funds for plans and programs shall be
allocated consistent with the priorities and matching requirements
established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW. During
the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be used
for the following activities: Conducting a study of whether dioxins
occur in fertilizers, soil amendments, and soils; reviewing
applications for registration of fertilizers; and conducting a study of
plant uptake of metals. During the ((2003-05)) 2005-2007 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the local toxics control
account to the state toxics control account such amounts as specified
in the omnibus operating budget bill for methamphetamine lab cleanup.
During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may also be
used for grants to local governments to retrofit public sector diesel
equipment and for storm water planning and implementation activities.
(b) Funds may also be appropriated to the department of health to
implement programs to reduce testing requirements under the federal
safe drinking water act for public water systems. The department of
health shall reimburse the account from fees assessed under RCW
70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) One percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local
toxics control accounts shall be allocated only for public
participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations
in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. However, during the 1999-2001
fiscal biennium, funding may not be granted to entities engaged in
lobbying activities, and applicants may not be awarded grants if their
cumulative grant awards under this section exceed two hundred thousand
dollars. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be
renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from
either account which are not expended at the close of any biennium
shall revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state toxics control account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.
(9) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the local toxics control account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 927 RCW 70.146.030 and 2004 c 277 s 909 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The water quality account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be used only in a manner
consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the account shall be
administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
tax receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027, 82.26.025, and 82.32.390,
principal and interest from the repayment of any loans granted pursuant
to this chapter, and any other moneys appropriated to the account by
the legislature.
(2) The department may use or permit the use of any moneys in the
account to make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants to
public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal, local,
or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for water
pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes of
assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water
pollution control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments
made by a public body to a service provider under a service agreement
entered into pursuant to RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this
chapter and for related administrative expenses. For the period July
1, ((2003)) 2005, to June 30, ((2005)) 2007, moneys in the account may
be used to process applications received by the department that seek to
make changes to or transfer existing water rights, for water conveyance
projects, and for grants and technical assistance to public bodies for
watershed planning under chapter 90.82 RCW. No more than three percent
of the moneys deposited in the account may be used by the department to
pay for the administration of the grant and loan program authorized by
this chapter.
(3) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 1997, the
department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of
moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31 of the odd-numbered year. The
report shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description,
and amount of the grant, loan, or both.

Sec. 928 RCW 70.146.080 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 935 are each
amended to read as follows:
Within thirty days after June 30, 1987, and within thirty days
after each succeeding fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer shall
determine the tax receipts deposited into the water quality account for
the preceding fiscal year. If the tax receipts deposited into the
account in each of the fiscal years 1988 and 1989 are less than forty
million dollars, the state treasurer shall transfer sufficient moneys
from general state revenues into the water quality account to bring the
total receipts in each fiscal year up to forty million dollars.
For the biennium ending June 30, 1991, if the tax receipts
deposited into the water quality account and the earnings on investment
of balances credited to the account are less than ninety million
dollars, the treasurer shall transfer sufficient moneys from general
state revenues into the water quality account to bring the total
revenue up to ninety million dollars. The determination and transfer
shall be made by July 31, 1991.
For fiscal year 1992 and for fiscal years 1995 and 1996 and
thereafter, if the tax receipts deposited into the water quality
account for each fiscal year are less than forty-five million dollars,
the treasurer shall transfer sufficient moneys from general state
revenues into the water quality account to bring the total revenue up
to forty-five million dollars. However, during the ((2003-05)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may specify the transfer of a
different amount in the operating budget bill. Determinations and
transfers shall be made by July 31 for the preceding fiscal year.

Sec. 929 RCW 70.148.020 and 1999 c 73 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The pollution liability insurance program trust account is
established in the custody of the state treasurer. All funds
appropriated for this chapter and all premiums collected for
reinsurance shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter
including payment of costs of administering the pollution liability
insurance and underground storage tank community assistance programs.
Expenditures for payment of administrative and operating costs of the
agency are subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW
and may be made only after appropriation by statute. No appropriation
is required for other expenditures from the account.
(2) Each calendar quarter, the director shall report to the
insurance commissioner the loss and surplus reserves required for the
calendar quarter. The director shall notify the department of revenue
of this amount by the fifteenth day of each calendar quarter.
(3) Each calendar quarter the director shall determine the amount
of reserves necessary to fund commitments made to provide financial
assistance under RCW 70.148.130 to the extent that the financial
assistance reserves do not jeopardize the operations and liabilities of
the pollution liability insurance program. The director shall notify
the department of revenue of this amount by the fifteenth day of each
calendar quarter. The director may immediately establish an initial
financial assistance reserve of five million dollars from available
revenues. The director may not expend more than fifteen million
dollars for the financial assistance program.
(4) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the pollution liability insurance program trust account
to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance of the account.
(5) This section expires June 1, ((2001 [2007])) 2007.

Sec. 930 RCW 74.09.5225 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Payments for recipients eligible for medical assistance
programs under this chapter for services provided by hospitals,
regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment status, shall
be made based on allowable costs incurred during the year, when
services are provided by a rural hospital certified by the health care
financing administration as a critical access hospital. Any additional
payments made by the medical assistance administration for the healthy
options program shall be no more than the additional amounts per
service paid under this section for other medical assistance programs.
(2) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, a moratorium shall be
placed on additional hospitals participating in the medical assistance
program under chapter 74.09 RCW as described in subsection (1) of this
section. However, rural hospitals that applied for certification to
the centers for medicare and medicaid services prior to January 1,
2005, but have not yet completed the process or have not yet been
approved for certification, remain eligible for medical assistance
reimbursement.

Sec. 931 RCW 79.90.245 and 2004 c 276 s 914 are each amended to
read as follows:
After deduction for management costs as provided in RCW 79.64.040
and payments to towns under RCW 79.92.110(2), all moneys received by
the state from the sale or lease of state-owned aquatic lands and from
the sale of valuable material from state-owned aquatic lands shall be
deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement account which is hereby
created in the state treasury. After appropriation, these funds shall
be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for the
purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public
purposes; for providing and improving access to such lands; and for
volunteer cooperative fish and game projects.
In providing grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the
department shall require grant recipients to incorporate the
environmental benefits of the project into their grant applications,
and the department shall utilize the statement of environmental
benefits in its prioritization and selection process. The department
shall also develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to
be used both for management and performance assessment of the grants.
To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its
performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies
as defined in RCW 43.41.270. The department shall consult with
affected interest groups in implementing this section.
During the fiscal biennium ending June 30, ((2005)) 2007, the funds
may be appropriated for boating safety((, settlement costs for aquatic
lands cleanup, and shellfish management, enforcement, and enhancement))
and assistance to local governments for septic system surveys and data
bases.

Sec. 932 RCW 86.26.007 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 943 are each
amended to read as follows:
The flood control assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. At the beginning of the ((1997-99 fiscal biennium and
each)) 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the state treasurer shall transfer
two million dollars from the general fund to the flood control
assistance account. Each biennium thereafter the state treasurer shall
transfer four million dollars from the general fund to the flood
control assistance account. Moneys in the flood control assistance
account may be spent only after appropriation for purposes specified
under this chapter. ((During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the flood control assistance account to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
of the account.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 933 COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS. The
appropriations for state agencies, including institutions of higher
education are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $663.00 per eligible employee
for fiscal year 2006. For fiscal year 2007 the monthly employer
funding rate shall not exceed $744.00 per eligible represented employee
or $527.70 per eligible nonrepresented employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2006, through December 31, 2006, the
subsidy shall be $131.87. Starting January 1, 2007, the subsidy shall
be $149.67 per month.
(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $48.71 per month beginning
September 1, 2005, and $56.59 beginning September 1, 2006;
(b) For each part-time employee who, at the time of the remittance,
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $48.71 each month beginning September 1, 2005, and
$56.59 beginning September 1, 2006, prorated by the proportion of
employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the
part-time employee receives. The remittance requirements specified in
this subsection shall not apply to employees of a technical college,
school district, or educational service district who purchase insurance
benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 934 NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION.
The appropriations for nonrepresented employee compensation adjustments
are provided solely for:
(1) Salary Cost of Living Adjustments.
(a) Appropriations are provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under the personnel system
reform act of 2002, and except the certificated employees of the state
schools for the deaf and blind and employees of community and technical
colleges covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure No. 732. Also
included are employees in the Washington management service, and exempt
employees under the jurisdiction of the personnel resources board or
the director of personnel, as applicable. However, institutions of
higher education shall increase salaries of all classified and
instructional staff not covered by Initiative Measure No. 732 or by a
collective bargaining agreement under the personnel system reform act
of 2002 by 3.2% of pay. Funds provided in this section may not be used
for any other purpose by institutions of higher education, including
for other pay increases.
The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 3.2% salary
increase effective July 1, 2005, for general government, legislative,
and judicial employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum
salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected
officials.
(b) Appropriations are provided for a 1.6% salary increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, for all classified
employees, except those represented by a collective bargaining unit
under the personnel system reform act of 2002, and except the
certificated employees of the state schools for the deaf and blind and
employees of community and technical colleges covered by the provisions
of Initiative Measure No. 732. Also included are employees in the
Washington management service, and exempt employees under the
jurisdiction of the personnel resources board or the director of
personnel, as applicable. However, institutions of higher education
shall increase salaries of all classified and instructional staff not
covered by Initiative Measure No. 732 or by a collective bargaining
agreement under the personnel system reform act of 2002 by 1.6% of pay
for the period specified. Funds provided in this section may not be
used for any other purpose by institutions of higher education,
including for other pay increases. The appropriations are also
sufficient to fund a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2005, until
June 30, 2007, for general government, legislative, and judicial
employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not
set by the commission on salaries for elected officials.
(2) Salary Survey.
For state employees, except those represented by a bargaining unit
under the personnel system reform act of 2002, funding is provided for
implementation of the department of personnel's 2002 salary survey, for
job classes more than 25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 935 CLASSIFICATION REVISIONS. Funding is
provided for partial implementation of classification consolidation and
revisions under the personnel system reform act of 2002. Groups 2 and
3 of the department of personnel's initial class consolidation plan are
affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 936 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS.
Provisions of collective bargaining agreements contained in sections
933 and 935 through 965 of this act are described in general terms.
Only major economic terms are included in the descriptions. These
descriptions do not contain the complete contents of the agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 937 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE.
Funding is provided for the collective bargaining agreement reached
between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees
under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered
under this agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of
the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than
25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 938 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WPEA.
Funding is provided for the collective bargaining agreement reached
between the governor and the Washington public employees association
under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered
under this agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of
the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than
25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 939 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UFCW.
Funding is provided for the collective bargaining agreement reached
between the governor and the united food and commercial workers under
the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered under
this agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006 until June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 940 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--TEAMSTERS. Funding is provided for the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the brotherhood of teamsters under the
personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this
agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase effective
July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for a 2.9% increase effective
July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of the
department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than 25%
below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 941 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING--COALITION.
Funding is provided for the collective bargaining agreement reached
between the governor and the coalition under the personnel system
reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement,
funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005.
Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006,
until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of the department of
personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than 25% below market
rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 942 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING--IFPTE. Funding
is provided for the collective bargaining agreement reached between the
governor and the international federation of professional and technical
engineers local 17 under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For
employees covered under this agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2%
salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for
a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for
implementation of the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for
classes more than 25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 943 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--SEIU
1199. Funding is provided for the collective bargaining agreement
reached between the governor and the service employees international
union, local 1199 NW under the personnel system reform act of 2002.
For employees covered under this agreement, funding is provided for a
3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided
for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, for
implementation of the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for
classes more than 25% below market rates, and for adjustments to the
salary grid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 944 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
HIGHER EDUCATION. Funding is provided for the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the Washington federation of
state employees in higher education under the personnel system reform
act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement, funding is
provided for a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is
also provided for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June
30, 2007, and for implementation of the department of personnel 2002
salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 945 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WPEA
HIGHER EDUCATION. Funding is provided for the collective bargaining
agreement reached between the governor and the Washington public
employees association in higher education under the personnel system
reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement,
funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005.
Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006,
until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of the department of
personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than 25% below market
rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 946 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU A. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the Western Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
unit A under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005, a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until
June 30, 2007, and implementation of the department of personnel 2002
salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 947 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU B. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the Western Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
unit B under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005, a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until
June 30, 2007, and implementation of the department of personnel 2002
salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 948 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WPEA/PROFESSIONAL LOCAL 365 UNIT C--WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY.
Budget amounts reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached
between the Western Washington University and the Washington Public
Employees Association bargaining unit C under the personnel system
reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005.
Provisions also include a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until
June 30, 2007, and for implementation of the department of personnel
2002 salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 949 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU E. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the Western Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
unit E under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005, and a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006,
until June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 950 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY, WSU POLICE GUILD. Budget amounts reflect
the collective bargaining agreement reached between Washington State
University and the Washington State University police guild bargaining
unit under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005, and a 2.9% lump sum payment effective July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 951 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU 1 AND 11. Budget amounts reflect
the collective bargaining agreement reached between Washington State
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
unit 1--research and extension units west of the Cascades, and
bargaining unit 11--intercollegiate college of nursing under the
personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this
agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1,
2005. Provisions also include a 2% lump sum payment effective July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 952 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON, SEIU 925. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreements reached between the University of
Washington and the service employees international union university-wide nonsupervisory, university-wide supervisory, research
technologist, research technologist supervisor, and medical/laboratory
technologist bargaining units under the personnel system reform act of
2002. For employees covered under this agreement, provisions include
a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005, a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, implementation of a
University of Washington salary survey, and adjustment to the salary
grid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 953 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON, WFSE. Budget amounts reflect the collective
bargaining agreements reached between the University of Washington and
the Washington federation of state employees campus-wide, library,
custodial supervisor, Harborview medical center, and Harborview medical
center public safety officers bargaining units under the personnel
system reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005, a
1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and
implementation of a University of Washington salary survey.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 954 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON, WFSE, SKILLED TRADES. Budget amounts reflect
the collective bargaining agreements reached between the University of
Washington and the Washington federation of state employees, skilled
trades bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act of 2002.
For employees covered under this agreement, provisions include a $1.00
per hour increase effective July 1, 2005, an increase in shift
differential pay, and an adjustment to the grid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 955 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON SEIU LOCAL 1199 NW PROFESSIONAL AND TECHNICAL.
Budget amounts reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached
between the University of Washington and the service employee
international union Harborview medical center professional and
technical bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act of
2002. For employees covered under this agreement, provisions include
a 1.5% salary increase effective January 1, 2006, a 1.5% salary
increase effective January 1, 2007, an adjustment to the salary grid,
and changes in premium pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 956 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON SEIU LOCAL 1199 NW NURSES. Budget amounts
reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached between the
University of Washington and the service employee international union
Harborview medical center registered nurse bargaining unit under the
personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this
agreement, provisions include a 2.0% salary increase effective July 1,
2005, a 2.0% salary increase effective July 1, 2006, a 2.0% salary
increase effective January 1, 2007, an adjustment to the salary grid,
and changes in premium pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 957 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON SEIU LOCAL 1199 NW SOCIAL WORK. Budget
amounts reflect the collective bargaining agreements reached between
the University of Washington and the service employee international
union Harborview medical center social work and health care specialist
bargaining units under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For
employees covered under this agreement, provisions include a 2.0%
salary increase effective July 1, 2005, a 2.0% salary increase
effective July 1, 2006, a 1.0% salary increase effective January 1,
2007, an adjustment to the salary grid, and changes in premium pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 958 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON POLICE OFFICERS ASSOCIATION. Budget amounts
reflect the collective bargaining agreements reached between the
University of Washington and the University of Washington police
officers association bargaining unit under the personnel system reform
act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement, provisions
include a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005, a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, and longevity pay increases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 959 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON WFSE UW POLICE MANAGEMENT. Budget amounts
reflect the collective bargaining agreements reached between the
University of Washington and the Washington federation of state
employees police management bargaining unit under the personnel system
reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005, and
a 15% supervisory differential effective July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 960 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON WASHINGTON STATE NURSES ASSOCIATION. Budget
amounts reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached between the
University of Washington and the Washington state nurses association
university medical center registered nurses bargaining unit under the
personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this
agreement, provisions include a 2.0% salary increase effective July 1,
2005, a 2.0% salary increase effective July 1, 2006, a 2.0% salary
increase effective January 1, 2007, an adjustment to the salary grid,
and changes in premium pay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 961 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON INLAND BOATMEN'S UNION. Budget amounts
reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached between the
University of Washington and the inland boatmen's union of the Pacific
Thompson research vessel crew bargaining unit under the personnel
system return act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2006, and
a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 962 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
UNIT 2 EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between Eastern Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
unit 2 under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Provisions also include a 1.6% salary increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for a $500 lump-sum
payment to full-time employees, and pro-rated for part-time employees,
effective July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 963 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
UNIT 1 EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between Eastern Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
unit 1 under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Provisions also include a $500 lump-sum
payment to full-time employees, and pro-rated for part-time employees,
effective July 1, 2005, and a lump sum payment of 1.6% of annual salary
effective July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 964 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
UNIT 2 CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between Central Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
unit 2 under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Provisions also include a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of
the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than
25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 965 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
UNIT 1 CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between Central Washington
University and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining
unit 1 under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees
covered under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Provisions also include a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of
the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than
25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 966 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 967 Except for sections 917 and 923 of this
act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 968 Section 917 (RCW 41.50.110) of this act
takes effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 969 Section 923 (RCW 46.09.170) of this act
takes effect June 30, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 970 Section 916 (RCW 41.50.110) of this act
expires July 1, 2006.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
AGENCY EXPENDITURES FOR MOTOR VEHICLES . . . . . . . . . . . . 144
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
BELATED CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 121
BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
BOARD OF TAX APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
BOND EXPENSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 143
BUSINESS CONTINUITY AND DISASTER RECOVERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 141
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 109
CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
CLASSIFICATION REVISIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 126, 170
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT
COALITION . . . . . . . . . . . . 129
IFPTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 129
SEIU 1199 . . . . . . . . . . . . 172
SEIU-1199 . . . . . . . . . . . . 130
TEAMSTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 128, 171
UFCW . . . . . . . . . . . . 128, 171
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON INLAND BOATMEN'S UNION . . . . . . . . . . . . 177
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON POLICE OFFICERS ASSOCIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON SEIU LOCAL 1199 NW NURSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON SEIU LOCAL 1199 NW PROF AND TECH . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON SEIU LOCAL 1199 NW SOCIAL WORK . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON WASHINGTON STATE NURSES ASSOC . . . . . . . . . . . . 177
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON WFSE UW POLICE MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 177
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON, SEIU 925 . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON, WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON, WFSE, SKILLED TRADES . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU 1 AND 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . 174
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY, WSU POLICE GUILD . . . . . . . . . . . . 174
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU A . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU B . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU E . . . . . . . . . . . . 174
WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 127, 171
WFSE HIGHER EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 172
WFSE UNIT 1 CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 178
WFSE UNIT 1 EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 178
WFSE UNIT 2 CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 178
WFSE UNIT 2 EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 177
WPEA . . . . . . . . . . . . 127, 171
WPEA HIGHER EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
WPEA/PROF LOCAL 365 UNIT C--WESTERN WA UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 174
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 126
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
COALITION . . . . . . . . . . . . 172
IFPTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 172
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
COMMISSION ON ASIAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 168
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 62
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 58
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 121
OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 117
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 107
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 139
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 97
FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
GOVERNOR
LIFE SCIENCES DISCOVERY FUND AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 122
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
GROWTH PLANNING HEARINGS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 114
POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 112
HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
HORSE RACING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
INCENTIVE SAVINGS
FY 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
FY 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . 124
INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 139
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 96
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 169
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE SALARY COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 124
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE SALARY SURVEY . . . . . . . . . . . . 125
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
BASE REALIGNMENT AND CLOSURE ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 122
CAPITOL BUILDING CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 120
COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS FOR NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES . . . . . . . . . . . . 132
COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS IN BARGAINED AGREEMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 131
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 130, 131
EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 122
EMERGENCY FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 120
FIRE CONTINGENCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 119
FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL . . . . . . . . . . . . 119
PUBLIC SAFETY AND EDUCATION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 121
SEX OFFENDER SENTENCING IMPACT . . . . . . . . . . . . 120
SMALL AGENCY INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY POOL . . . . . . . . . . . . 120
OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
PERSONNEL APPEALS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
PROGRAM COST SHIFTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 117
STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 101
STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 97
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
STATE INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 62
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 117
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 117
STATE TREASURER . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 118, 119
COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 134
FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 135
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 134
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 133
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 135
TRANSFERS--UNFUNDED PENSION LIABILITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 137
STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 143
STRATEGIC PURCHASING STRATEGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 64
BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 75
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 88
EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 86
ELEMENTARY/SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT AND NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 88
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 86
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 94
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 86
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 87
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 80
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 78
SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 81
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 95
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 93
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 110
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 141
VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT INCENTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 144
VOLUNTARY SEPARATION INCENTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 143
WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 117
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 117
WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 105
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 111
WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 116
--- END ---