BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.470 and 1993 c 495 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Except as otherwise provided in subsection (15) of this
section,)) (1) The following fees shall be collected by the department
in advance:
(((1))) (a) For the examination of an application for permit to
appropriate water or on application to change point of diversion,
withdrawal, purpose or place of use, a minimum fee of ((ten)) two
hundred dollars and five hundred dollars, respectively, to be paid with
the application. ((For each second foot between one and five hundred
second feet, two dollars per second foot; for each second foot between
five hundred and two thousand second feet, fifty cents per second foot;
and for each second foot in excess thereof, twenty cents per second
foot. For each acre foot of storage up to and including one hundred
thousand acre feet, one cent per acre foot, and for each acre foot in
excess thereof, one-fifth cent per acre foot. The ten dollar fee
payable with the application shall be a credit to that amount whenever
the fee for direct diversion or storage totals more than ten dollars
under the above schedule and in such case the further fee due shall be
the total computed amount less ten dollars.)) Within five days from
receipt of an application, the department shall notify the applicant by
registered mail of any additional fees due under the ((above)) schedule
((and)) specified in this subsection. Any additional fees shall be
paid to and received by the department within thirty days from the date
of filing the application, or the application shall be rejected((.
(2)));
(b) For filing and recording a permit to appropriate water for
irrigation purposes, a fee of forty cents per acre for each acre to be
irrigated up to and including one hundred acres, and twenty cents per
acre for each acre in excess of one hundred acres up to and including
one thousand acres, and ten cents for each acre in excess of one
thousand acres; and also twenty cents for each theoretical horsepower
up to and including one thousand horsepower, and four cents for each
theoretical horsepower in excess of one thousand horsepower, but in no
instance shall the minimum fee for filing and recording a permit to
appropriate water be less than five dollars. For all other beneficial
purposes the fee shall be twice the amount of the examination fee
except that for individual household and domestic use, which may
include water for irrigation of a family garden, the fee shall be five
dollars((.
(3)));
(c) For filing and recording any other water right instrument, a
fee of four dollars for the first hundred words and forty cents for
each additional hundred words or fraction thereof((.
(4)));
(d) For making a copy of any document recorded or filed in his or
her office, a fee of forty cents for each hundred words or fraction
thereof, but when the amount exceeds twenty dollars, only the actual
cost in excess of that amount shall be charged((.
(5)));
(e) For certifying to copies, documents, records or maps, a fee of
two dollars for each certification((.
(6)));
(f) For blueprint copies of a map or drawing, or, for such other
work of a similar nature as may be required of the department, ((at))
a fee equal to the actual cost of the work((.
(7)));
(g) For granting each extension of time for beginning construction
work under a permit to appropriate water, ((an amount equal to one-half
of the filing and recording fee, except that the minimum)) a fee
((shall be not less than)) of five hundred dollars for each year that
an extension is granted, and for granting an extension of time for
completion of construction work or for completing application of water
to a beneficial use, a fee of five hundred dollars for each year that
an extension is granted((.
(8)));
(h) For the inspection of any hydraulic works to ((insure)) ensure
safety to life and property, a fee equal to the actual cost of the
inspection, including the expense incident thereto((.
(9)));
(i) For the examination of plans and specifications as to safety of
controlling works for storage of ten acre feet or more of water, a
minimum fee of ((ten)) two hundred dollars, or the actual cost((.
(10)));
(j) For recording an assignment either of a permit to appropriate
water or of an application for such a permit, a fee of five dollars((.
(11)));
(k) For preparing and issuing all water right certificates, a fee
of five dollars((.
(12))); and
(l) For filing and recording a protest against granting any
application, a fee of two dollars.
(((13))) (2) The department shall provide timely notification by
certified mail with return receipt requested to applicants that fees
specified in this section are due. No action may be taken until the
fee is paid in full. Failure to remit fees within sixty days of the
department's notification shall be grounds for rejecting the
application or canceling the permit. Cash shall not be accepted. Fees
must be paid by check or money order and are nonrefundable.
(((14))) (3) For purposes of calculating fees for ground water
filings, one cubic foot per second shall be regarded as equivalent to
four hundred fifty gallons per minute.
(((15) For the period beginning July 1, 1993, and ending June 30,
1994, there is imposed and the department shall collect a one hundred
dollar surcharge on all water rights applications or changes filed
under this section, and upon all water rights applications or changes
pending as of July 1, 1993. This charge shall be in addition to any
other fees imposed under this section.))

--- END ---