BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
2005-07 BIENNIUM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The transportation budget of the state
is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several
amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish
the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several
accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices
for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and
for other specified purposes, including the payment of any final
judgments arising out of such activities, for the period ending June
30, 2007.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2006" or "FY 2006" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2006.
(b) "Fiscal year 2007" or "FY 2007" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
(f) "Reappropriation" means appropriation and, unless the context
clearly provides otherwise, is subject to the relevant conditions and
limitations applicable to appropriations.
(g) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES -- OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
Grade Crossing Protective Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $501,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $383,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $976,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation in this section
is provided solely for road maintenance purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation is provided
solely for costs associated with the motor fuel quality program.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY
COMMISSION
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,111,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,760,000
School Zone Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,059,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $775,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,905,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $728,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,408,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,460,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,461,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,921,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS
Pilotage Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $409,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION
COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,499,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $827,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC
INVESTMENT BOARD
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $653,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD
OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $189,161,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,397,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $199,716,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- SUPPORT
SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,105,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,994,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,099,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING--MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,323,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,883,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $507,000
Biometric Security Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,987,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING--INFORMATION SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,887,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,411,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,842,000
Biometric Security Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $728,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,496,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- VEHICLE
SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $603,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,187,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,662,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $872,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,146,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,496,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- DRIVER
SERVICES
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,151,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,116,000
Biometric Security Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,523,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,790,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,543,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM C
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,545,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,964,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,332,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,204,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $715,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for a feasibility study of
combining the department's accounting system with the agency financial
reporting system. The result will be a recommendation of how the
department's financial management requirements could be met through a
common system. The study, coordinated with the office of financial
management, will provide various alternatives, along with their costs,
benefits, risks, timelines, etc. The department shall submit a report
to the senate and the house of representatives transportation
committees and the office of financial management by June 30, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,147,000
Aeronautics Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
Aircraft Search and Rescue Safety and Education
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,557,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,109,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,609,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
The department shall make recommendations to improve, change, or
eliminate monitoring activities that impact performance measures
related to salmon recovery and watershed health. The department shall
coordinate with the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health
and consult with the office of financial management in determining the
scope and contents of this report.
In preparing these recommendations, the department shall prepare a
report detailing all new activity and updating all previously
identified activity within the comprehensive monitoring strategy with
a focus on salmon recovery and watershed health related monitoring
activity within the agency. At minimum, the report shall include
sufficient detail identifying the specific salmon recovery and
watershed health monitoring activity being performed and include:
Precise costs by fund source, a narrative stating why it is required,
when the activity started, the frequency of data collection, and
geographic location of data being collected. Furthermore, the agency
shall also provide sufficient detail that describes the purpose of each
monitoring activity, who uses the information, how often it is
accessed, where the information is stored, and the current status and
cost, by fund source, of the data storage systems housing each
monitoring activity identified within the agency.
The department shall provide a status report summarizing progress
to the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and the
office of financial management by March 1, 2006. A final report to the
governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health, the office of
financial management, and legislative fiscal committees is due no later
than September 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS -- PROGRAM K
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $291,087,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,426,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,248,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $296,761,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) If portions of the appropriations in this section are required
to fund maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by
federal emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides,
supplemental appropriations must be requested to restore state funding
for ongoing maintenance activities.
(2) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
federal moneys received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall
place an equal amount of the motor vehicle account -- state into
unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the amount of
funding available for snow and ice removal.
(3) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
private or local funds received for reimbursements of third party
damages that are in excess of the motor vehicle account -- private/local
appropriation.
(4) Funding is provided for maintenance on the state system to
allow for a continuation of the level of service targets included in
the 2003-05 biennium. In delivering the program, the department should
concentrate on the following areas:
(a) Meeting or exceeding the target for structural bridge repair on
a statewide basis;
(b) Eliminating the number of activities delivered in the "f" level
of service at the region level;
(c) Reducing the number of activities delivered in the "d" level of
service by increasing the resources directed to those activities on a
statewide and region basis; and
(d) Evaluating, analyzing, and potentially redistributing resources
within and among regions to provide greater consistency in delivering
the program statewide and in achieving overall level of service
targets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,235,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,410,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,722,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,321,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,221,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,703,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,327,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,094,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,785,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,009,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $500,000 of the motor vehicle account--
state appropriation is provided solely for a study of regional
congestion relief solutions for Puget Sound (including state route
169), Spokane, and Vancouver. The study must include proposals to
alleviate congestion consistent with population and land use
expectations under the growth management act, and must include
measurement of all modes of transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,101,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,501,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,360,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,559,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,074,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $2,500,000 of the multimodal
transportation account--state appropriation is provided solely for
public transportation grant programs, including rural mobility,
paratransit/special needs transportation, and vanpools beginning July
1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $319,874,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,513,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $336,387,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is based on the budgeted
expenditure of $45,348,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 2005-2007
biennium. If the actual cost of fuel is less than this budgeted
amount, the excess amount may not be expended. If the actual cost
exceeds this amount, the department shall request a supplemental
appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 227 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,361,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $29,091,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service contract and
Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and maintaining
the state-supported passenger rail service.
(2) $2,750,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a new round trip rail service
between Seattle and Portland beginning July 1, 2006.
(3) $250,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the produce railcar program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 228 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,046,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,514,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,560,000

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--CAPITAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,686,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,933,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,442,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,730,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $355,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided for county ferries as set forth in RCW
47.56.725(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,425,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,601,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $198,026,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The transportation improvement account--state appropriation includes $14,143,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized in RCW 47.26.500. The transportation improvement
board may authorize the use of current revenues available to the agency
in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,788,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $584,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the statewide administration.
(2) $632,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for regional minor projects.
(3) $310,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for designing the replacement of the existing outdated
maintenance facility in Ephrata.
(4) $244,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the designing of the northwest regional maintenance
complex in Seattle.
(5) $18,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for property option payments on the Thurston county
light industrial site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--IMPROVEMENTS -- MOBILITY -- PROGRAM I1
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,846,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $141,013,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,307,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $863,575,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,031,741,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The motor vehicle account -- state appropriation includes
$16,200,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account) -- state
appropriation includes $719,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.861. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.
(3) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to subprogram I1 and replaced with state
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be
transferred between federal programs, except in order to accept
federally earmarked funds and maintain eligibility for federal
discretionary programs. Fund transfers authorized under this
subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--
IMPROVEMENTS -- SAFETY -- PROGRAM I2
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,726,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,470,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,317,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,708,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,221,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$26,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to subprogram I2 and replaced with state
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be
transferred between federal programs, except in or to accept federally
earmarked funds and maintain eligibility for federal discretionary
programs. Fund transfers authorized under this subsection shall not
affect project prioritization status. Appropriations shall initially
be allotted as appropriated in this act. The department shall not
transfer funds as authorized under this subsection without approval of
the transportation commission and the director of financial management.
The department shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund
transfers to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--IMPROVEMENTS -- ECONOMIC INITIATIVES -- PROGRAM I3
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,765,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,518,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,419,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,206,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,918,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$2,400,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to subprogram I3 and replaced with state
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be
transferred between federal programs, except in or to accept federally
earmarked funds and maintain eligibility for federal discretionary
programs. Fund transfers authorized under this subsection shall not
affect project prioritization status. Appropriations shall initially
be allotted as appropriated in this act. The department shall not
transfer funds as authorized under this subsection without approval of
the transportation commission and the director of financial management.
The department shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund
transfers to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--IMPROVEMENTS -- ENVIRONMENTAL RETROFIT -- PROGRAM I4
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,091,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,448,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,939,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,678,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$9,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to subprogram I4 and replaced with state
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be
transferred between federal programs, except in or to accept federally
earmarked funds and maintain eligibility for federal discretionary
programs. Fund transfers authorized under this subsection shall not
affect project prioritization status. Appropriations shall initially
be allotted as appropriated in this act. The department shall not
transfer funds as authorized under this subsection without approval of
the transportation commission and the director of financial management.
The department shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund
transfers to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--IMPROVEMENTS -- SR 16 TACOMA NARROWS BRIDGE PROJECT -- PROGRAM I7
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $278,605,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state appropriation includes $257,016,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PRESERVATION -- ROADWAY -- PROGRAM P1
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,803,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,125,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,797,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,632,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $231,415,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: To manage some projects more efficiently,
federal funds may be transferred from program Z to subprogram P1 and
replaced with state funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds
may not be transferred between federal programs, except in order to
accept federally earmarked funds and maintain eligibility for federal
discretionary programs. Fund transfers authorized under this
subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PRESERVATION -- STRUCTURES -- PROGRAM P2
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,712,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,793,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $273,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $267,403,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$85,300,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to subprogram P2 and replaced with state
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be
transferred between federal programs, except in or to accept federally
earmarked funds and maintain eligibility for federal discretionary
programs. Fund transfers authorized under this subsection shall not
affect project prioritization status. Appropriations shall initially
be allotted as appropriated in this act. The department shall not
transfer funds as authorized under this subsection without approval of
the transportation commission and the director of financial management.
The department shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund
transfers to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PRESERVATION -- OTHER STRUCTURES -- PROGRAM P3
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,462,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,999,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,461,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$3,930,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to subprogram P3 and replaced with state
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be
transferred between federal programs, except in or to accept federally
earmarked funds and maintain eligibility for federal discretionary
programs. Fund transfers authorized under this subsection shall not
affect project prioritization status. Appropriations shall initially
be allotted as appropriated in this act. The department shall not
transfer funds as authorized under this subsection without approval of
the transportation commission and the director of financial management.
The department shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund
transfers to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,578,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,528,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,106,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 314 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $146,091,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,812,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account--Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,749,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,486,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,266,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $244,430,000

The appropriations in this section are provided for improving the
Washington state ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel preservation, and terminal
preservation, construction, and improvements. The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The Puget Sound capital construction account -- state
appropriation includes $38,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and terminal acquisition, major
and minor improvements, and long lead time materials acquisition for
the Washington state ferries. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the motor vehicle
account in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.
(2) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes $8,249,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.867. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds from any part of the state appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 315 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL
Essential Rail Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,783,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,961,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,287,000
Washington Fruit Express Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,781,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The multimodal transportation account -- state appropriation
includes $32,290,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.867. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) $890,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Cascade and Columbia River
upgrade project.
(3) $1,582,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Cheney-Coulee-Pullman upgrade
project.
(4) $3,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Geiger Spur connection
project.
(5) $640,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Yakima Sawmill traffic
upgrades project.
(6) $3,800,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Centennial high speed
crossover project.
(7) $3,900,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Ketron high speed crossover
project.
(8) $13,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the PA Junction to Delta Junction
project.
(9) $695,000 of the multimodal transportation account--federal
appropriation is provided solely for safety improvements to the Pacific
Northwest rail corridor.
(10) $2,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $250,000 of the essential rail assistance account--state appropriation are provided solely for the emerging freight rail
program. Prior to final selection of projects for emerging freight
projects that will result in economic development or maintaining rail
service on light-density rail lines, the house of representatives and
senate transportation committees must approve the projects.
(11) If federal block grant funding for freight or passenger rail
is received, the department shall consult with the legislative
transportation committee prior to spending the funds on additional
projects.
(12) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--federal
appropriation is provided solely for the produce railcar program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 316 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,624,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,413,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,864,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to programs I and P and state funds shall be
transferred from programs I and P to program Z to replace those federal
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. However, funds may not be
transferred between federal programs. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
The department may not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission. The
department shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund
transfers to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2006.
(2) The multimodal transportation account -- state appropriation
includes $6,905,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.867. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND
TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $330,800,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,138,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,010,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,903,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,562,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $358,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,177,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $417,188,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $283,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $663,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Account--State Reappropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $257,016,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$257,016,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound capital construction
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$38,000,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and
terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long lead-time
materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,757,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account--State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . $820,769,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRANSFERS
(1) RV Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,500,000
(3) Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to Puget Sound Capital
Construction Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
(4) Transportation Equipment Fund--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
(5) Advanced Right-of-Way Revolving Account--
State Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

The transfers identified in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) The department of transportation shall only transfer funds in
subsection (2) of this section up to the level provided, on an as-needed basis.
(b) The department of transportation shall transfer funds in
subsection (3) of this section up to the amount identified, provided
that a minimum balance of $5,000,000 is retained in the Puget Sound
ferry operations account.
(c) The amount identified in subsection (3) of this section may not
include any revenues collected as passenger fares.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS. In addition to
the amounts appropriated in this act for revenue for distribution,
state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system, and bond retirement and interest including ongoing
bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on
registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also
appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for
these purposes under any statutory formula or under any proper bond
covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 The department of transportation is
authorized to undertake federal advance construction projects under the
provisions of 23 U.S.C. Sec. 115 in order to maintain progress in
meeting approved highway construction and preservation objectives. The
legislature recognizes that the use of state funds may be required to
temporarily fund expenditures of the federal appropriations for the
highway construction and preservation programs for federal advance
construction projects prior to conversion to federal funding.

COMPENSATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE SALARY COST OF
LIVING ADJUSTMENT
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,109,000

The appropriation in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In addition to the purposes set forth in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section, appropriations in this section are provided solely
for a 3.2% increase effective July 1, 2005, for all classified
employees, except those represented by a collective bargaining unit
under the personnel system reform act of 2002, and except the
certificated employees covered by the provisions of Initiative Measure
No. 732. Also included are employees in the Washington management
service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the personnel
resources board or the director of personnel, as applicable.
(2) The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 3.2% salary
increase effective July 1, 2005, for general government, legislative,
and judicial employees exempt from merit system rules whose maximum
salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for elected
officials.
(3) Appropriations in this section are provided for a 1.6% salary
increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, for all
classified employees, except those represented by a collective
bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act of 2002, and
except the certificated employees covered by the provisions of
Initiative Measure No. 732. Also included are employees in the
Washington management service, and exempt employees under the
jurisdiction of the personnel resources board or the director of
personnel, as applicable. The appropriations are also sufficient to
fund a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2005, until June 30,
2007, for general government, legislative, and judicial employees
exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by
the commission on salaries for elected officials.
(4)(a) No salary increase may be paid under this section to any
person whose salary has been Y-rated pursuant to rules adopted by the
personnel resources board or the director of personnel, as applicable.
(b) The average salary increases paid under this section to agency
officials whose maximum salaries are established by the committee on
agency official salaries shall not exceed the average increases
provided under subsection (2) of this section.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-8T
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE SALARY SURVEY
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,098,000

The appropriation in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For state employees, except those
represented by a bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act
of 2002, funding is provided for implementation of the department of
personnel's 2002 salary survey, for job classes more than 25% below
market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-8Z
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 CLASSIFICATION REVISIONS
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,000

The appropriation in this section, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, shall be expended solely for the purposes designated in this
section and is subject to the following conditions and limitations:
Funding is provided for partial implementation of classification
consolidation and revisions under the personnel system reform act of
2002. Groups 2 and 3 of the department of personnel's initial class
consolidation plan are affected.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-8Q
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,971,000

The appropriation in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the Washington
federation of state employees under the personnel system reform act of
2002. For employees covered under this agreement, funding is provided
for a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also
provided for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30,
2007, and for implementation of the department of personnel 2002 salary
survey for classes more than 25% below market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-80
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WPEA
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $705,000

The appropriation in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the Washington
public employees association under the personnel system reform act of
2002. For employees covered under this agreement, funding is provided
for a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also
provided for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30,
2007, and for implementation of the department of personnel 2002 salary
survey for classes more than 25% below market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-81
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--COALITION
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000

The appropriation in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the coalition
under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered
under this agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of
the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than
25% below market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-86
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--IFPTE
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,792,000

The appropriation in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the collective
bargaining agreement reached between the governor and the international
federation of professional and technical engineers local 17 under the
personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this
agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase effective
July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase effective
July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of the
department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than 25%
below market rates.
The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-84
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($29,861,000)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding in this section is provided solely
for funding agency pension changes as set forth in House Bill No. 1043
and Substitute House Bill No. 1044. The office of financial management
shall update agency appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of
the funding in this section, as identified by agency and account in OFM
document 2005-07-79 dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($379,000)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding in this section is provided solely
for funding agency savings in the cost of other compensation items
provided at the pension rates as set forth in Substitute House Bill No.
1044. The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriations schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-7A
dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS IN BARGAINED AGREEMENTS
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,400,000

The appropriation in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for the health
insurance collective bargaining agreement reached between the governor
and the health insurance coalition under the personnel system reform
act of 2002 as per the specifications in section 519 of this act. The
office of financial management shall update agency appropriations
schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this section, as
identified by agency and account in OFM document 2005-07-88 dated March
21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS FOR NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,221,000

The appropriation in this section shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this section and is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided for state employee
health insurance benefits for nonrepresented state employees as per the
specifications in section 519 of this act. The office of financial
management shall update agency appropriations schedules to reflect the
addition of the funding in this section, as identified by agency and
account in OFM document 2005-07-8V dated March 21, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION.
The appropriations for nonrepresented employee compensation adjustments
are provided solely for:
(1) Salary cost of living adjustments.
(a) Appropriations are provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005, for all classified employees, except those
represented by a collective bargaining unit under the personnel system
reform act of 2002. Also included are employees in the Washington
management service, and exempt employees under the jurisdiction of the
personnel resources board or the director of personnel, as applicable.
The appropriations are also sufficient to fund a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005, for ferry system employees and for general
government, and legislative employees exempt from merit system rules
whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on salaries for
elected officials.
(b) Appropriations are provided for a 1.6% salary increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, for all classified
employees, except those represented by a collective bargaining unit
under the personnel system reform act of 2002. Also included are
employees in the Washington management service, and exempt employees
under the jurisdiction of the personnel resources board or the director
of personnel, as applicable. The appropriations are also sufficient to
fund a 1.6% salary increase effective July 1, 2005, until June 30,
2007, for ferry system employees and for general government, and
legislative exempt from merit system rules whose maximum salaries are
not set by the commission on salaries for elected officials.
(2) Salary survey. For state employees, except those represented
by a bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act of 2002,
funding is provided for implementation of the department of personnel's
2002 salary survey, for job classes more than 25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513 CLASSIFICATION REVISIONS. Funding is
provided for partial implementation of classification consolidation and
revisions under the personnel system reform act of 2002. Groups 2 and
3 of the department of personnel's initial class consolidation plan are
affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS.
Provisions of collective bargaining agreements contained in sections
515 through 518 of this act are described in general terms. Only major
economic terms are included in the descriptions. These descriptions do
not contain the complete contents of the agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WFSE.
Funding is provided for the collective bargaining agreement reached
between the governor and the Washington federation of state employees
under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered
under this agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of
the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than
25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WPEA.
Funding is provided for the collective bargaining agreement reached
between the governor and the Washington public employees association
under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered
under this agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase
effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase
effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of
the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than
25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING--COALITION.
Funding is provided for the collective bargaining agreement reached
between the governor and the coalition under the personnel system
reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement,
funding is provided for a 3.2% salary increase effective July 1, 2005.
Funding is also provided for a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006,
until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of the department of
personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than 25% below market
rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING--IFPTE. Funding is
provided for the collective bargaining agreement reached between the
governor and the international federation of professional and technical
engineers local 17 under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For
employees covered under this agreement, funding is provided for a 3.2%
salary increase effective July 1, 2005. Funding is also provided for
a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until June 30, 2007, and for
implementation of the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for
classes more than 25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 519 COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS. The
appropriations for state agencies, including institutions of higher
education are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $663.00 per eligible employee
for fiscal year 2006. For fiscal year 2007 the monthly employer
funding rate shall not exceed $744.00 per eligible represented employee
or $527.70 per eligible nonrepresented employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or
make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2006, through December 31, 2006, the
subsidy shall be $131.87. Starting January 1, 2007, the subsidy shall
be $149.67 per month.
(3) The appropriations in this section include amounts sufficient
to fund health benefits for ferry workers at the premium levels
specified in subsection (1) of this section consistent with the 2005-2007 transportation appropriations act.

MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies
shall comply with the following requirements regarding information
systems projects when specifically directed to do so by this act.
(1) Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology
shall be made in the context of its information technology portfolio.
"Information technology portfolio" means a strategic management
approach in which the relationships between agency missions and
information technology investments can be seen and understood, such
that: Technology efforts are linked to agency objectives and business
plans; the impact of new investments on existing infrastructure and
business functions are assessed and understood before implementation;
and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative statewide infrastructure.
(2) Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in
making decisions on matters related to the following:
(a) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;
(b) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology
in meeting legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;
(c) Assessment of overall information processing performance,
resources, and capabilities;
(d) Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for
the operation of any new systems developed using external resources;
and
(e) Progress toward enabling electronic access to public
information.
(3) Each project will be planned and designed to take optimal
advantage of Internet technologies and protocols. Agencies shall
ensure that the project is in compliance with the architecture,
infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the information services board.
(4) The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information
technology projects at the direction of the information services board
and in accordance with published department of information services
policies and guidelines. At a minimum, such studies shall include a
statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus for change; (b) the business
value to the agency, including an examination and evaluation of
benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk assessment
based on the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state
operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d)
the impact on agency and statewide information infrastructure; and (e)
the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.
(5) The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for
each project. The plan or plans shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of each project. The plan(s) shall include, but
is not limited to, the following elements: A description of the
problem or opportunity that the information technology project is
intended to address; a statement of project objectives and assumptions;
a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be
accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for
the phased approach shall be such that the business case justification
for a project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or
adds measurable value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business
functions within each development cycle.
(6) The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for
information technology projects. Consistent with the direction of the
information services board and the published policies and guidelines of
the department of information services, the quality assurance plan
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of the
project and successful integration with the agency and state
information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality assurance
plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The
quality assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements
for each phase of a project.
(7) A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and
quality assurance plan shall be provided to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and
legislative fiscal committees. The plans and studies shall demonstrate
a sound business case that justifies the investment of taxpayer funds
on any new project, an assessment of the impact of the proposed system
on the existing information technology infrastructure, the disciplined
use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of
private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval
of the relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan by the department of information services and the office
of financial management.
(8) Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the
department of information services, the office of financial management,
and legislative fiscal committees at intervals specified in the
project's quality assurance plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 The department of transportation may
transfer federal funds for state funds within the preservation and
improvement programs if funded projects are eligible to use additional
federal funds and the scope of the project is not increased. The
department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this subsection
without approval of the transportation commission and the director of
financial management. A report of the transfers will be submitted on
October 1st of each fiscal year to the senate and house of
representatives transportation committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 The transportation commission may
authorize a transfer of spending allocation within the appropriation
provided and between projects funded with transportation 2003 state
appropriations to manage project spending and efficiently deliver all
projects in the program under the following conditions and limitations:
(1) Transfers from a project may be made if the funds allocated to
the project are in excess of the amount needed to complete the project;
(2) Transfers from a project may be made if the project is
experiencing unavoidable expenditure delays;
(3) Transfers may be made between fund sources on projects that
contain both transportation 2003 state appropriations and other funds;
(4) Each transfer between projects may only occur if the commission
finds that any resulting change will not impact completing the projects
approved by the legislature; and
(5) Transfers may not occur to projects not identified on the list.
(6) A report of the transfers shall be submitted on October 1st of
each fiscal year to the senate and house of representatives
transportation committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
CLASSIFICATION REVISIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 25, 29
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT
COALITION . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
IFPTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 25, 29
WPEA . . . . . . . . . . . . 26, 30
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
COALITION . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
IFPTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
COMPENSATION
INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 3, 10
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
DRIVER SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
VEHICLE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AVIATION -- PROGRAM F . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS -- PROGRAM K . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
IMPROVEMENTS -- ECONOMIC INITIATIVES -- PROGRAM I3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
IMPROVEMENTS -- ENVIRONMENTAL RETROFIT -- PROGRAM I4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
IMPROVEMENTS -- MOBILITY -- PROGRAM I1 . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
IMPROVEMENTS -- SAFETY -- PROGRAM I2 . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
IMPROVEMENTS -- SR 16 TACOMA NARROWS BRIDGE PROJECT . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM C . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
MARINE -- PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
PRESERVATION -- OTHER STRUCTURES -- PROGRAM P3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
PRESERVATION -- ROADWAY -- PROGRAM P1 . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
PRESERVATION -- STRUCTURES -- PROGRAM P2 . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE SALARY COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEE SALARY SURVEY . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
COMPENSATION ||INSURANCE BENEFITS FOR NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
COMPENSATION ||INSURANCE BENEFITS IN BARGAINED AGREEMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 20, 21
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 3, 11
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
--- END ---