BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.26.030 and 2002 c 325 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent and purpose of this chapter to levy a tax on all
tobacco products sold, used, consumed, handled, or distributed within
this state and to collect the tax from the distributor as defined in
RCW 82.26.010. It is the further intent and purpose of this chapter to
impose the tax once, and only once, on all tobacco products for sale in
this state, but nothing in this chapter shall be construed to exempt
any person taxable under any other law or under any other tax imposed
under Title 82 RCW. It is the further intent and purpose of this
chapter that the distributor who first possesses the tobacco product in
this state shall be the distributor liable for the tax and that in most
instances the tax will be based on the actual price that the
distributor paid for the tobacco product, unless the distributor is
affiliated with the seller.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.26.010 and 2002 c 325 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Tobacco products" means cigars, cheroots, stogies, periques,
granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed, and other smoking
tobacco, snuff, snuff flour, cavendish, plug and twist tobacco, fine-cut and other chewing tobaccos, shorts, refuse scraps, clippings,
cuttings and sweepings of tobacco, and other kinds and forms of
tobacco, prepared in such manner as to be suitable for chewing or
smoking in a pipe or otherwise, or both for chewing and smoking, but
shall not include cigarettes as defined in RCW 82.24.010((;)).
(2) "Manufacturer" means a person who manufactures and sells
tobacco products((;)).
(3) "Distributor" means (a) any person engaged in the business of
selling tobacco products in this state who brings, or causes to be
brought, into this state from without the state any tobacco products
for sale, (b) any person who makes, manufactures, ((or)) fabricates, or
stores tobacco products in this state for sale in this state, (c) any
person engaged in the business of selling tobacco products without this
state who ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this
state, to be sold by those retailers, (d) any person engaged in the
business of selling tobacco products in this state who handles for sale
any tobacco products that are within this state but upon which tax has
not been imposed((;)).
(4) (("Subjobber" means any person, other than a manufacturer or
distributor, who buys tobacco products from a distributor and sells
them to persons other than the ultimate consumers;
(5))) "Retailer" means any person engaged in the business of
selling tobacco products to ultimate consumers((;)).
(((6))) (5)(a) "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter, in
any manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration, and
includes and means all sales made by any person.
((It)) (b) The term "sale" includes a gift by a person engaged in
the business of selling tobacco products, for advertising, promoting,
or as a means of evading the provisions of this chapter((, or for any
other purposes whatsoever;
(7) "Wholesale sales price" means the established price for which
a manufacturer sells a tobacco product to a distributor, exclusive of
any discount or other reduction;)).
(((8))) (6) "Business" means any trade, occupation, activity, or
enterprise engaged in for the purpose of selling or distributing
tobacco products in this state((;)).
(((9))) (7) "Place of business" means any place where tobacco
products are sold or where tobacco products are manufactured, stored,
or kept for the purpose of sale ((or consumption)), including any
vessel, vehicle, airplane, train, or vending machine((;)).
(((10))) (8) "Retail outlet" means each place of business from
which tobacco products are sold to consumers((;)).
(((11))) (9) "Department" means the ((state)) department of
revenue((;)).
(((12))) (10) "Person" means any individual, receiver,
administrator, executor, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust,
estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock
company, business trust, municipal corporation, the state and its
departments and institutions, political subdivision of the state of
Washington, corporation, limited liability company, association,
society, ((or)) any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether
mutual, cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise. The term
excludes any person immune from state taxation, including the United
States or its instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes
and enrolled tribal members, conducting business within Indian
country((;)).
(((13))) (11) "Indian country" means the same as defined in chapter
82.24 RCW.
(12) "Actual price" means the total amount of consideration for
which tobacco products are sold, valued in money, whether received in
money or otherwise, including any charges by the seller necessary to
complete the sale such as charges for delivery, freight,
transportation, or handling.
(13) "Affiliated" means related in any way by virtue of any form or
amount of common ownership, control, operation, or management.
(14) "Board" means the liquor control board.
(15) "Cigar" means a roll for smoking that is of any size or shape
and that is made wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective of whether
the tobacco is pure or flavored, adulterated or mixed with any other
ingredient, if the roll has a wrapper made wholly or in greater part of
tobacco. "Cigar" does not include a cigarette.
(16) "Cigarette" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.24.010.
(17) "Manufacturer's representative" means a person hired by a
manufacturer to sell or distribute the manufacturer's tobacco products,
and includes employees and independent contractors.
(18)(a) "Taxable sales price" means:
(i) In the case of a taxpayer that is not affiliated with the
manufacturer, distributor, or other person from whom the taxpayer
purchased tobacco products, the actual price for which the taxpayer
purchased the tobacco products;
(ii) In the case of a taxpayer that purchases tobacco products from
an affiliated manufacturer, affiliated distributor, or other affiliated
person, and that sells those tobacco products to unaffiliated
distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers, the actual
price for which that taxpayer sells those tobacco products to
unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate
consumers;
(iii) In the case of a taxpayer that sells tobacco products only to
affiliated distributors or affiliated retailers, the price, determined
as nearly as possible according to the actual price, that other
distributors sell similar tobacco products of like quality and
character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or
ultimate consumers;
(iv) In the case of a taxpayer that is a manufacturer selling
tobacco products directly to ultimate consumers, the actual price for
which the taxpayer sells those tobacco products to ultimate consumers;
(v) In the case of a taxpayer that has acquired tobacco products
under a sale as defined in subsection (5)(b) of this section, the
price, determined as nearly as possible according to the actual price,
that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same tobacco products
or similar tobacco products of like quality and character to
unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate
consumers; or
(vi) In any case where (a)(i) through (v) of this subsection do not
apply, the price, determined as nearly as possible according to the
actual price, that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same
tobacco products or similar tobacco products of like quality and
character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or
ultimate consumers.
(b) For purposes of (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection only,
"person" includes both persons as defined in subsection (10) of this
section and any person immune from state taxation, including the United
States or its instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes
and enrolled tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.
(c) The department may adopt rules regarding the determination of
taxable sales price under this subsection.
(19) "Taxpayer" means a person liable for the tax imposed by this
chapter.
(20) "Unaffiliated distributor" means a distributor that is not
affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from
whom the distributor has purchased tobacco products.
(21) "Unaffiliated retailer" means a retailer that is not
affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from
whom the retailer has purchased tobacco products.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.26.020 and 2002 c 325 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected a tax upon the
sale, ((use, consumption,)) handling, or distribution of all tobacco
products in this state at the following rate ((of forty-five percent of
the wholesale sales price of such tobacco products)):
(a) Seventy-five percent of the taxable sales price of cigars, not
to exceed fifty cents per cigar; or
(b) Seventy-five percent of the taxable sales price of all tobacco
products that are not cigars.
(2) Taxes under this section shall be imposed at the time the
distributor (a) brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from
without the state tobacco products for sale, (b) makes, manufactures,
((or)) fabricates, or stores tobacco products in this state for sale in
this state, (c) ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in
this state, to be sold by those retailers, or (d) handles for sale any
tobacco products that are within this state but upon which tax has not
been imposed.
(3) ((An additional tax is imposed equal to seven percent
multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) An additional tax is imposed equal to ten percent of the
wholesale sales price of tobacco products. The moneys collected under
this subsection shall be deposited in the health services account
created under RCW 43.72.900)) The moneys collected under this section
shall be deposited as follows:
(a) Thirty-seven percent in the general fund;
(b) Fifty percent in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900; and
(c) Thirteen percent in the water quality account under RCW
70.146.030 for the period beginning July 1, 2005, through June 30,
2021, and in the general fund for the period beginning July 1, 2021.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.26.060 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 73 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Every distributor shall keep at each ((registered)) place of
business complete and accurate records for that place of business,
including itemized invoices, of tobacco products held, purchased,
manufactured, brought in or caused to be brought in from without the
state, or shipped or transported to retailers in this state, and of all
sales of tobacco products made((, except sales to the ultimate
consumer)).
(2) These records shall show the names and addresses of purchasers,
the inventory of all tobacco products ((on hand on July 1, 1959)), and
other pertinent papers and documents relating to the purchase, sale, or
disposition of tobacco products. All invoices and other records
required by this section to be kept shall be preserved for a period of
five years from the date of the invoices or other documents or the date
of the entries appearing in the records.
((When a registered distributor sells tobacco products exclusively
to the ultimate consumer at the address given in the certificate, no
invoice of those sales shall be required, but itemized invoices shall
be made of all tobacco products transferred to other retail outlets
owned or controlled by that registered distributor. All books,
records, and other papers and documents required by this section to be
kept shall be preserved for a period of at least five years after the
date of the documents, as aforesaid, or the date of the entries thereof
appearing in the records, unless the department of revenue, in writing,
authorizes their destruction or disposal at an earlier date.))
(3) At any time during usual business hours the department, board,
or its duly authorized agents or employees, may enter any place of
business of a distributor, without a search warrant, and inspect the
premises, the records required to be kept under this chapter, and the
tobacco products contained therein, to determine whether or not all the
provisions of this chapter are being fully complied with. If the
department, board, or any of its agents or employees, are denied free
access or are hindered or interfered with in making such examination,
the registration certificate issued under RCW 82.32.030 of the
distributor at such premises shall be subject to revocation, and any
licenses issued under this chapter or chapter 82.24 RCW are subject to
suspension or revocation, by the department.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.26.080 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 74 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Every retailer ((and subjobber)) shall procure itemized
invoices of all tobacco products purchased. The invoices shall show
the seller's name and address ((of the seller and)), the date of
purchase, and all prices and discounts.
(2) The retailer ((and subjobber)) shall ((preserve a legible copy
of each such invoice)) keep at each retail outlet copies of complete,
accurate, and legible invoices for that retail outlet or place of
business. All invoices required to be kept under this section shall be
preserved for five years from the date of purchase. ((Invoices shall
be available for inspection by the department of revenue or its
authorized agents or employees at the retailer's or subjobber's place
of business.))
(3) At any time during usual business hours the department, board,
or its duly authorized agents or employees may enter any retail outlet
without a search warrant, and inspect the premises for invoices
required to be kept under this section and the tobacco products
contained in the retail outlet, to determine whether or not all the
provisions of this chapter are being fully complied with. If the
department, board, or any of its agents or employees, are denied free
access or are hindered or interfered with in making the inspection, the
registration certificate issued under RCW 82.32.030 of the retailer at
the premises is subject to revocation, and any licenses issued under
this chapter or chapter 82.24 RCW are subject to suspension or
revocation by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) For the purposes of obtaining
information concerning any matter relating to the administration or
enforcement of this chapter, the department, the board, or any of its
agents, may inspect the books, documents, or records of any person
transporting tobacco products for sale to any person or entity in the
state, and books, documents, or records containing any information
relating to the transportation or possession of tobacco products for
sale in the possession of a specific common carrier as defined in RCW
81.80.010 doing business in this state.
(2) If a person neglects or refuses to produce and submit for
inspection any book, record, or document as required by this section
when requested to do so by the department, the board, or its agent,
then the department or the board may seek an order in superior court
compelling production of the books, records, or documents.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.26.070 and 1961 c 15 s 82.26.070 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every person required to be licensed under this chapter who sells
tobacco products to persons other than the ultimate consumer shall
render with each sale itemized invoices showing the seller's name and
address, the purchaser's name and address, the date of sale, and all
prices ((and discounts)). ((He)) The person shall preserve legible
copies of all such invoices for five years from the date of sale.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.26.100 and 1983 c 3 s 218 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every ((distributor)) taxpayer shall report and make returns as
provided in RCW 82.32.045. ((Every registered distributor outside of
this state shall in like manner report and make returns.))

Sec. 9 RCW 82.26.110 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 76 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Where tobacco products upon which the tax imposed by this
chapter has been reported and paid, are shipped or transported outside
this state by the distributor to ((retailers without the state)) a
person engaged in the business of selling tobacco products, to be sold
by ((those retailers)) that person, or are returned to the manufacturer
by the distributor or destroyed by the distributor, credit of such tax
may be made to the distributor in accordance with ((regulations)) rules
prescribed by the department ((of revenue)).
(2) Credit allowed under this section shall be determined based on
the tax rate in effect for the period for which the tax imposed by this
chapter, for which a credit is sought, was paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) No person other than (a) a licensed
distributor in the distributor's own vehicle, a manufacturer's
representative authorized to sell or distribute tobacco products in
this state under section 14 of this act, or a licensed retailer in the
retailer's own vehicle, or (b) a person who has given notice to the
board in advance of the commencement of transportation shall transport
or cause to be transported in this state tobacco products for sale.
(2) When transporting tobacco products for sale, the person shall
have in his or her actual possession, or cause to have in the actual
possession of those persons transporting such tobacco products on his
or her behalf, invoices or delivery tickets for the tobacco products,
which shall show the true name and address of the consignor or seller,
the true name and address of the consignee or purchaser, and the
quantity and brands of the tobacco products being transported.
(3) In any case where the department or the board, or any peace
officer of the state, has knowledge or reasonable grounds to believe
that any vehicle is transporting tobacco products in violation of this
section, the department, the board, or peace officer, is authorized to
stop the vehicle and to inspect it for contraband tobacco products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The licenses issuable by the department
under this chapter are as follows:
(a) A distributor's license; and
(b) A retailer's license.
(2) Application for the licenses shall be made through the master
license system under chapter 19.02 RCW. The department may adopt rules
regarding the regulation of the licenses. The department may refuse to
issue any license under this chapter if the department has reasonable
cause to believe that the applicant has willfully withheld information
requested for the purpose of determining the eligibility of the
applicant to receive a license, or if the department has reasonable
cause to believe that information submitted in the application is false
or misleading or is not made in good faith. In addition, for the
purpose of reviewing an application for a distributor's license and for
considering the denial, suspension, or revocation of any such license,
the department may consider criminal convictions of the applicant
related to the selling of tobacco products within the previous five
years in any state, tribal, or federal jurisdiction in the United
States, its territories, or possessions, and the provisions of RCW
9.95.240 and chapter 9.96A RCW shall not apply to such cases. The
department may, in its discretion, issue or refuse to issue the
distributor's license, subject to the provisions of section 18 of this
act.
(3) No person may qualify for a distributor's license under this
section without first undergoing a criminal background check. The
background check shall be performed by the board and must disclose any
criminal convictions related to the selling of tobacco products within
the previous five years in any state, tribal, or federal jurisdiction
in the United States, its territories, or possessions. If the
applicant or licensee also has a license issued under chapter 66.24 or
82.24 RCW, the background check done under the authority of chapter
66.24 or 82.24 RCW satisfies the requirements of this section.
(4) Each license issued under this chapter shall expire on the
master license expiration date. The license shall be continued
annually if the licensee has paid the required fee and complied with
all the provisions of this chapter and the rules of the department
adopted pursuant to this chapter.
(5) Each license and any other evidence of license as the
department requires shall be exhibited in the place of business for
which it is issued and in the manner required for the display of a
master license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) A fee of six hundred fifty dollars
shall accompany each distributor's license application or license
renewal application. If a distributor sells or intends to sell tobacco
products at two or more places of business, whether established or
temporary, a separate license with a license fee of one hundred fifteen
dollars shall be required for each additional place of business.
(2) The fees imposed under subsection (1) of this section do not
apply to any person applying for a distributor's license or for renewal
of a distributor's license if the person has a valid wholesaler's
license under RCW 82.24.510 for the place of business associated with
the distributor's license application or license renewal application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) A fee of ninety-three dollars shall
accompany each retailer's license application or license renewal
application. A separate license is required for each separate location
at which the retailer operates.
(2) The fee imposed under subsection (1) of this section does not
apply to any person applying for a retailer's license or for renewal of
a retailer's license if the person has a valid retailer's license under
RCW 82.24.510 for the place of business associated with the retailer's
license application or renewal application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A manufacturer that has manufacturer's
representatives who sell or distribute the manufacturer's tobacco
products in this state must provide the department a list of the names
and addresses of all such representatives and must ensure that the list
provided to the department is kept current. A manufacturer's
representative is not authorized to distribute or sell tobacco products
in this state unless the manufacturer that hired the representative has
a valid distributor's license under this chapter and that manufacturer
provides the department a current list of all of its manufacturer's
representatives as required by this section. A manufacturer's
representative must carry a copy of the distributor's license of the
manufacturer that hired the representative at all times when selling or
distributing the manufacturer's tobacco products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The department shall compile and maintain
a current record of the names of all distributors and retailers
licensed under this chapter and the status of their license or
licenses. The information must be updated on a monthly basis and
published on the department's official internet web site. This
information is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and shall be disclosed to manufacturers, distributors,
retailers, and the general public upon request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1)(a) No person may engage in or conduct
business as a distributor or retailer in this state after September 30,
2005, without a valid license issued by the department under this
chapter. Any person who sells tobacco products to persons other than
ultimate consumers or who meets the definition of distributor under RCW
82.26.010(3)(d) must obtain a distributor's license under this chapter.
Any person who sells tobacco products to ultimate consumers must obtain
a retailer's license under this chapter.
(b) A violation of this subsection (1) is punishable as a class C
felony according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2)(a) No person engaged in or conducting business as a distributor
or retailer in this state may:
(i) Refuse to allow the department or the board, on demand, to make
a full inspection of any place of business where any of the tobacco
products taxed under this chapter are sold, stored, or handled, or
otherwise hinder or prevent such inspection;
(ii) Make, use, or present or exhibit to the department or the
board any invoice for any of the tobacco products taxed under this
chapter that bears an untrue date or falsely states the nature or
quantity of the goods invoiced; or
(iii) Fail to produce on demand of the department or the board all
invoices of all the tobacco products taxed under this chapter within
five years prior to such demand unless the person can show by
satisfactory proof that the nonproduction of the invoices was due to
causes beyond the person's control.
(b) No person, other than a licensed distributor or retailer, may
transport tobacco products for sale in this state for which the taxes
imposed under this chapter have not been paid unless:
(i) Notice of the transportation has been given as required under
section 10 of this act;
(ii) The person transporting the tobacco products actually
possesses invoices or delivery tickets showing the true name and
address of the consignor or seller, the true name and address of the
consignee or purchaser, and the quantity and brands of tobacco products
being transported; and
(iii) The tobacco products are consigned to or purchased by a
person in this state who is licensed under this chapter.
(c) A violation of this subsection (2) is a gross misdemeanor.
(3) Any person licensed under this chapter as a distributor, and
any person licensed under this chapter as a retailer, shall not operate
in any other capacity unless the additional appropriate license is
first secured. A violation of this subsection (3) is a misdemeanor.
(4) The penalties provided in this section are in addition to any
other penalties provided by law for violating the provisions of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) A retailer that obtains tobacco
products from an unlicensed distributor or any other person that is not
licensed under this chapter must be licensed both as a retailer and a
distributor under this chapter and is liable for the tax imposed under
RCW 82.26.020 with respect to the tobacco products acquired from the
unlicensed person that are held for sale, handling, or distribution in
this state. For the purposes of this subsection, "person" includes
both persons defined in RCW 82.26.010(10) and any person immune from
state taxation, such as the United States or its instrumentalities, and
federally recognized Indian tribes and enrolled tribal members,
conducting business within Indian country.
(2) Every distributor licensed under this chapter shall sell
tobacco products to retailers located in Washington only if the
retailer has a current retailer's license under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) The board shall enforce this chapter.
The board may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to enforce this
chapter.
(2) The department may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to
administer this chapter. The department has full power and authority
to revoke or suspend the distributor's or retailer's license of any
distributor or retailer of tobacco products in the state upon
sufficient cause showing a violation of this chapter or upon the
failure of the licensee to comply with any of the rules adopted under
it.
(3) A license shall not be suspended or revoked except upon notice
to the licensee and after a hearing as prescribed by the department.
The department, upon finding that the licensee has failed to comply
with any provision of this chapter or of any rule adopted under it,
shall, in the case of the first offense, suspend the license or
licenses of the licensee for a period of not less than thirty
consecutive business days, and in the case of a second or further
offense, suspend the license or licenses for a period of not less than
ninety consecutive business days but not more than twelve months, and
in the event the department finds the licensee has been guilty of
willful and persistent violations, it may revoke the license or
licenses.
(4) Any licenses issued under chapter 82.24 RCW to a person whose
license or licenses have been suspended or revoked under this section
shall also be suspended or revoked during the period of suspension or
revocation under this section.
(5) Any person whose license or licenses have been revoked under
this section may apply to the department at the expiration of one year
for a reinstatement of the license or licenses. The license or
licenses may be reinstated by the department if it appears to the
satisfaction of the department that the licensee will comply with the
provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted under it.
(6) A person whose license has been suspended or revoked shall not
sell tobacco products or cigarettes or permit tobacco products or
cigarettes to be sold during the period of suspension or revocation on
the premises occupied by the person or upon other premises controlled
by the person or others or in any other manner or form.
(7) Any determination and order by the department, and any order of
suspension or revocation by the department of the license or licenses,
or refusal to reinstate a license or licenses after revocation is
reviewable by an appeal to the superior court of Thurston county. The
superior court shall review the order or ruling of the department and
may hear the matter de novo, having due regard to the provisions of
this chapter and the duties imposed upon the department and the board.

Sec. 19 RCW 82.24.550 and 1997 c 420 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall enforce the provisions of this chapter. The
board may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to enforce the
provisions of this chapter.
(2) The department ((of revenue)) may adopt, amend, and repeal
rules necessary to administer the provisions of this chapter. The
department ((of revenue)) has full power and authority to revoke or
suspend the license or permit of any wholesale or retail cigarette
dealer in the state upon sufficient cause appearing of the violation of
this chapter or upon the failure of such licensee to comply with any of
the provisions of this chapter.
(3) A license shall not be suspended or revoked except upon notice
to the licensee and after a hearing as prescribed by the department
((of revenue)). The department ((of revenue)), upon ((a)) finding ((by
same,)) that the licensee has failed to comply with any provision of
this chapter or any rule ((promulgated thereunder)) adopted under this
chapter, shall, in the case of the first ((offender)) offense, suspend
the license or licenses of the licensee for a period of not less than
thirty consecutive business days, and, in the case of a second or
((plural offender)) further offense, shall suspend the license or
licenses for a period of not less than ninety consecutive business days
nor more than twelve months, and, in the event the department ((of
revenue)) finds the ((offender)) licensee has been guilty of willful
and persistent violations, it may revoke the license or licenses.
(4) Any licenses issued under chapter 82.26 RCW to a person whose
license or licenses have been suspended or revoked under this section
shall also be suspended or revoked during the period of suspension or
revocation under this section.
(5) Any person whose license or licenses have been ((so)) revoked
under this section may apply to the department ((of revenue)) at the
expiration of one year for a reinstatement of the license or licenses.
The license or licenses may be reinstated by the department ((of
revenue)) if it appears to the satisfaction of the department ((of
revenue)) that the licensee will comply with the provisions of this
chapter and the rules ((promulgated thereunder)) adopted under this
chapter.
(((5))) (6) A person whose license has been suspended or revoked
shall not sell cigarettes or tobacco products or permit cigarettes or
tobacco products to be sold during the period of such suspension or
revocation on the premises occupied by the person or upon other
premises controlled by the person or others or in any other manner or
form whatever.
(((6))) (7) Any determination and order by the department ((of
revenue)), and any order of suspension or revocation by the department
((of revenue)) of the license or licenses, or refusal to reinstate a
license or licenses after revocation shall be reviewable by an appeal
to the superior court of Thurston county. The superior court shall
review the order or ruling of the department ((of revenue)) and may
hear the matter de novo, having due regard to the provisions of this
chapter and the duties imposed upon the department ((of revenue)) and
the board.
(8) For purposes of this section, "tobacco products" has the same
meaning as in RCW 82.26.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) Any tobacco products in the possession
of a person selling tobacco products in this state acting as a
distributor or retailer and who is not licensed as required under
section 16 of this act, or a person who is selling tobacco products in
violation of section 18(6) of this act, may be seized without a warrant
by any agent of the department, agent of the board, or law enforcement
officer of this state. Any tobacco products seized under this
subsection shall be deemed forfeited.
(2) Any tobacco products in the possession of a person who is not
a licensed distributor or retailer and who transports tobacco products
for sale without having provided notice to the board required under
section 10 of this act, or without invoices or delivery tickets showing
the true name and address of the consignor or seller, the true name and
address of the consignee or purchaser, and the quantity and brands of
tobacco products being transported may be seized and are subject to
forfeiture.
(3) All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels that
are used, or intended for use to transport, or in any manner to
facilitate the transportation, for the purpose of sale or receipt of
tobacco products under subsection (2) of this section, may be seized
and are subject to forfeiture except:
(a) A conveyance used by any person as a common or contract carrier
having in actual possession invoices or delivery tickets showing the
true name and address of the consignor or seller, the true name of the
consignee or purchaser, and the quantity and brands of the tobacco
products transported, unless it appears that the owner or other person
in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a
violation of this chapter;
(b) A conveyance subject to forfeiture under this section by reason
of any act or omission of which the owner establishes to have been
committed or omitted without his or her knowledge or consent; or
(c) A conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest if the
secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or
omission.
(4) Property subject to forfeiture under subsections (2) and (3) of
this section may be seized by any agent of the department, the board,
or law enforcement officer of this state upon process issued by any
superior court or district court having jurisdiction over the property.
Seizure without process may be made if:
(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search warrant or an
inspection under an administrative inspection warrant; or
(b) The department, board, or law enforcement officer has probable
cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used
in violation of this chapter and exigent circumstances exist making
procurement of a search warrant impracticable.
(5) This section shall not be construed to require the seizure of
tobacco products if the department's agent, board's agent, or law
enforcement officer reasonably believes that the tobacco products are
possessed for personal consumption by the person in possession of the
tobacco products.
(6) Any tobacco products seized by a law enforcement officer shall
be turned over to the board as soon as practicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 (1) In all cases of seizure of any tobacco
products made subject to forfeiture under this chapter, the department
or board shall proceed as provided in RCW 82.24.135.
(2) When tobacco products are forfeited under this chapter, the
department or board may:
(a) Retain the property for official use or upon application by any
law enforcement agency of this state, another state, or the District of
Columbia, or of the United States for the exclusive use of enforcing
this chapter or the laws of any other state or the District of Columbia
or of the United States; or
(b) Sell the tobacco products at public auction to the highest
bidder after due advertisement. Before delivering any of the goods to
the successful bidder, the department or board shall require the
purchaser to pay the proper amount of any tax due. The proceeds of the
sale shall be first applied to the payment of all proper expenses of
any investigation leading to the seizure and of the proceedings for
forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, maintenance of
custody, advertising, and court costs. The balance of the proceeds and
all money shall be deposited in the general fund of the state. Proper
expenses of investigation include costs incurred by any law enforcement
agency or any federal, state, or local agency.
(3) The department or the board may return any property seized
under the provisions of this chapter when it is shown that there was no
intention to violate the provisions of this chapter. When any property
is returned under this section, the department or the board may return
the property to the parties from whom they were seized if and when such
parties have paid the proper amount of tax due under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 When the department or the board has good
reason to believe that any of the tobacco products taxed under this
chapter are being kept, sold, offered for sale, or given away in
violation of the provisions of this chapter, it may make affidavit of
facts describing the place or thing to be searched, before any judge of
any court in this state, and the judge shall issue a search warrant
directed to the sheriff, any deputy, police officer, or duly authorized
agent of the department or the board commanding him or her diligently
to search any building, room in a building, place, or vehicle as may be
designated in the affidavit and search warrant, and to seize the
tobacco products and hold them until disposed of by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.26.025 (Additional tax imposed -- Rate -- Where deposited)
and 2002 c 325 s 3, 1999 c 309 s 926, & 1986 c 3 s 14;
(2) RCW 82.26.028 (Surtax imposed -- Rate -- Health services account)
and 2002 c 2 s 4; and
(3) RCW 82.26.050 (Certificate of registration required) and 1975
1st ex.s. c 278 s 72 & 1961 c 15 s 82.26.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 6, 10 through 18, and 20 through
22 of this act are each added to chapter 82.26 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

--- END ---