BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.08.230 and 2003 c 111 s 218 are each amended to
read as follows:
For all voter registrations, the registrant shall sign the
following oath:

"I declare that the facts on this voter registration form are true.
I am a citizen of the United States, I am not presently denied my civil
rights as a result of being convicted of a felony, I will have lived in
Washington at this address for thirty days immediately before the next
election at which I vote, and I will be at least ((eighteen)) sixteen
years old when I vote."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect if the proposed
amendment to Article VI, section 1 of the state Constitution allowing
persons who are sixteen years of age or older to vote is validly
submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next
general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and
ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---