BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.501 and 2003 c 379 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the department performs a risk assessment pursuant to RCW
9.94A.500, or to determine a person's conditions of supervision, the
risk assessment shall classify the offender or probationer into one of
at least four risk categories.
(2) The department shall supervise every offender sentenced to a
term of community custody, community placement, or community
supervision and every misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor probationer
ordered to probation under the supervision of the department pursuant
to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210:
(a) Whose risk assessment places that offender or probationer in
one of the two highest risk categories; or
(b) Regardless of the offender's or probationer's risk category if:
(i) The offender's or probationer's current conviction is for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(ii) The offender or probationer has a prior conviction for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(iii) The conditions of the offender's community custody, community
placement, or community supervision or the probationer's supervision
include chemical dependency treatment;
(iv) The offender was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650 or 9.94A.670;
or
(v) The offender or probationer is subject to supervision pursuant
to RCW 9.94A.745.
(3) The department is not authorized to, and may not, supervise any
offender sentenced to a term of community custody, community placement,
or community supervision, or any probationer, unless the offender or
probationer is one for whom supervision is required under subsection
(2) of this section.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2010.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.92.060 and 1996 c 298 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any person is convicted of any crime except murder,
burglary in the first degree, arson in the first degree, robbery, rape
of a child, or rape, the superior court may, in its discretion, at the
time of imposing sentence upon such person, direct that such sentence
be stayed and suspended until otherwise ordered by the superior court,
and that the sentenced person be placed under the charge of a community
corrections officer employed by the department of corrections, or if
the county elects to assume responsibility for the supervision of all
superior court misdemeanant probationers a probation officer employed
or contracted for by the county, upon such terms as the superior court
may determine.
(2) As a condition to suspension of sentence, the superior court
shall require the payment of the penalty assessment required by RCW
7.68.035. In addition, the superior court may require the convicted
person to make such monetary payments, on such terms as the superior
court deems appropriate under the circumstances, as are necessary: (a)
To comply with any order of the court for the payment of family
support; (b) to make restitution to any person or persons who may have
suffered loss or damage by reason of the commission of the crime in
question or when the offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or
fewer offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that the
offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or
offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement; (c) to
pay any fine imposed and not suspended and the court or other costs
incurred in the prosecution of the case, including reimbursement of the
state for costs of extradition if return to this state by extradition
was required; and (d) to contribute to a county or interlocal drug
fund.
(3) As a condition of the suspended sentence, the superior court
may order the probationer to report to the secretary of corrections or
such officer as the secretary may designate and as a condition of the
probation to follow the instructions of the secretary. If the county
legislative authority has elected to assume responsibility for the
supervision of superior court misdemeanant probationers within its
jurisdiction, the superior court misdemeanant probationer shall report
to a probation officer employed or contracted for by the county. In
cases where a superior court misdemeanant probationer is sentenced in
one county, but resides within another county, there must be provisions
for the probationer to report to the agency having supervision
responsibility for the probationer's county of residence.
(4) If restitution to the victim has been ordered under subsection
(2)(b) of this section and the superior court has ordered supervision,
the officer supervising the probationer shall make a reasonable effort
to ascertain whether restitution has been made as ordered. If the
superior court has ordered supervision and restitution has not been
made, the officer shall inform the prosecutor of that violation of the
terms of the suspended sentence not less than three months prior to the
termination of the suspended sentence.
(5) The provisions of RCW 9.94A.501 apply to sentences imposed
under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.95.210 and 1996 c 298 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In granting probation, the superior court may suspend the
imposition or the execution of the sentence and may direct that the
suspension may continue upon such conditions and for such time as it
shall designate, not exceeding the maximum term of sentence or two
years, whichever is longer.
(2) In the order granting probation and as a condition thereof, the
superior court may in its discretion imprison the defendant in the
county jail for a period not exceeding one year and may fine the
defendant any sum not exceeding the statutory limit for the offense
committed, and court costs. As a condition of probation, the superior
court shall require the payment of the penalty assessment required by
RCW 7.68.035. The superior court may also require the defendant to
make such monetary payments, on such terms as it deems appropriate
under the circumstances, as are necessary: (a) To comply with any
order of the court for the payment of family support; (b) to make
restitution to any person or persons who may have suffered loss or
damage by reason of the commission of the crime in question or when the
offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer offenses and agrees
with the prosecutor's recommendation that the offender be required to
pay restitution to a victim of an offense or offenses which are not
prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement; (c) to pay such fine as may be
imposed and court costs, including reimbursement of the state for costs
of extradition if return to this state by extradition was required; (d)
following consideration of the financial condition of the person
subject to possible electronic monitoring, to pay for the costs of
electronic monitoring if that monitoring was required by the court as
a condition of release from custody or as a condition of probation; (e)
to contribute to a county or interlocal drug fund; and (f) to make
restitution to a public agency for the costs of an emergency response
under RCW 38.52.430, and may require bonds for the faithful observance
of any and all conditions imposed in the probation.
(3) The superior court shall order restitution in all cases where
the victim is entitled to benefits under the crime victims'
compensation act, chapter 7.68 RCW. If the superior court does not
order restitution and the victim of the crime has been determined to be
entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, the
department of labor and industries, as administrator of the crime
victims' compensation program, may petition the superior court within
one year of imposition of the sentence for entry of a restitution
order. Upon receipt of a petition from the department of labor and
industries, the superior court shall hold a restitution hearing and
shall enter a restitution order.
(4) In granting probation, the superior court may order the
probationer to report to the secretary of corrections or such officer
as the secretary may designate and as a condition of the probation to
follow the instructions of the secretary. If the county legislative
authority has elected to assume responsibility for the supervision of
superior court misdemeanant probationers within its jurisdiction, the
superior court misdemeanant probationer shall report to a probation
officer employed or contracted for by the county. In cases where a
superior court misdemeanant probationer is sentenced in one county, but
resides within another county, there must be provisions for the
probationer to report to the agency having supervision responsibility
for the probationer's county of residence.
(5) If the probationer has been ordered to make restitution and the
superior court has ordered supervision, the officer supervising the
probationer shall make a reasonable effort to ascertain whether
restitution has been made. If the superior court has ordered
supervision and restitution has not been made as ordered, the officer
shall inform the prosecutor of that violation of the terms of probation
not less than three months prior to the termination of the probation
period. The secretary of corrections will promulgate rules and
regulations for the conduct of the person during the term of probation.
For defendants found guilty in district court, like functions as the
secretary performs in regard to probation may be performed by probation
officers employed for that purpose by the county legislative authority
of the county wherein the court is located.
(6) The provisions of RCW 9.94A.501 apply to sentences imposed
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may supervise nonfelony offenders transferred to
Washington pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for adult
offender supervision, and shall supervise these offenders according to
the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The department shall process applications for interstate
transfer of felony and nonfelony offenders pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745,
the interstate compact for adult offender supervision, and may charge
offenders a reasonable fee for processing the application.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.95.204 and 1996 c 298 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a superior court places a defendant convicted of a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor on probation and orders supervision
under RCW 9.92.060 or 9.95.210, the department of corrections has
initial responsibility for supervision of that defendant.
(2) A county legislative authority may assume responsibility for
the supervision of all defendants within its jurisdiction who have been
convicted of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor and sentenced to
probation by a superior court. The assumption of responsibility shall
be made by contract with the department of corrections on a biennial
basis.
(3) If a county assumes supervision responsibility, the county
shall supervise all superior court misdemeanant probationers within
that county for the duration of the biennium, as set forth in the
contract with the department of corrections.
(4) A contract between a county legislative authority and the
department of corrections for the transfer of supervision
responsibility must include, at a minimum, the following provisions:
(a) The county's agreement to supervise all misdemeanant
probationers who are sentenced by a superior court within that county
and who reside within that county;
(b) A reciprocal agreement regarding the supervision of superior
court misdemeanant probationers sentenced in one county but who reside
in another county;
(c) The county's agreement to comply with the minimum standards for
classification and supervision of offenders as required under RCW
9.95.206;
(d) The amount of funds available from the department of
corrections to the county for supervision of superior court
misdemeanant probationers, calculated according to a formula
established by the department of corrections;
(e) A method for the payment of funds by the department of
corrections to the county;
(f) The county's agreement that any funds received by the county
under the contract will be expended only to cover costs of supervision
of superior court misdemeanant probationers;
(g) The county's agreement to account to the department of
corrections for the expenditure of all funds received under the
contract and to submit to audits for compliance with the supervision
standards and financial requirements of this section;
(h) Provisions regarding rights and remedies in the event of a
possible breach of contract or default by either party; and
(i) Provisions allowing for voluntary termination of the contract
by either party, with good cause, after sixty days' written notice.
(5) If the contract between the county and the department of
corrections is terminated for any reason, the department of corrections
shall reassume responsibility for supervision of superior court
misdemeanant probationers within that county. In such an event, the
department of corrections retains any and all rights and remedies
available by law and under the contract.
(6) The state of Washington, the department of corrections and its
employees, community corrections officers, and volunteers who assist
community corrections officers are not liable for any harm caused by
the actions of a superior court misdemeanant probationer who is under
the supervision of a county. A county, its probation department and
employees, probation officers, and volunteers who assist probation
officers are not liable for any harm caused by the actions of a
superior court misdemeanant probationer who is under the supervision of
the department of corrections. This subsection applies regardless of
whether the supervising entity is in compliance with the standards of
supervision at the time of the misdemeanant probationer's actions.
(7) The state of Washington, the department of corrections and its
employees, community corrections officers, any county under contract
with the department of corrections pursuant to this section and its
employees, probation officers, and volunteers who assist community
corrections officers and probation officers in the superior court
misdemeanant probation program are not liable for civil damages
resulting from any act or omission in the rendering of superior court
misdemeanant probation activities unless the act or omission
constitutes gross negligence. For purposes of this section,
"volunteers" is defined according to RCW 51.12.035.
(8)(a) If a misdemeanant probationer requests permission to travel
or transfer to another state, the assigned probation officer employed
or contracted for by the county shall determine whether such request is
subject to RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for adult offender
supervision. If such request is subject to the compact, the probation
officer shall:
(i) Notify the department of corrections of the probationer's
request;
(ii) Provide the department of corrections with the supporting
documentation it requests for processing an application for transfer;
(iii) Notify the probationer of the fee due to the department of
corrections for processing an application under the compact;
(iv) Cease supervision of the probationer while another state
supervises the probationer pursuant to the compact;
(v) Resume supervision if the probationer returns to this state
before the term of probation expires.
(b) The probationer shall receive credit for time served while
being supervised by another state.
(9) The provisions of RCW 9.94A.501 apply to sentences imposed
under this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.95.214 and 1996 c 298 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever a defendant convicted of a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor is placed on probation under RCW 9.92.060 or 9.95.210, and
the defendant is supervised by the department of corrections or a
county probation department, the department or county probation
department may assess and collect from the defendant for the duration
of the term of supervision a monthly assessment not to exceed one
hundred dollars per month. This assessment shall be paid to the agency
supervising the defendant and shall be applied, along with funds
appropriated by the legislature, toward the payment or part payment of
the cost of supervising the defendant. The department or county
probation department shall suspend such assessment while the defendant
is being supervised by another state pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745, the
interstate compact for adult offender supervision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 3.66 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a person placed on probation for a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor by a district court requests permission to travel or
transfer to another state, the assigned probation officer shall
determine whether such request is subject to RCW 9.94A.745, the
interstate compact for adult offender supervision. If such request is
subject to the compact, the probation officer shall:
(a) Notify the department of corrections of the probationer's
request;
(b) Provide the department of corrections with the supporting
documentation it requests for processing an application for transfer;
(c) Notify the probationer of the fee due to the department of
corrections for processing an application under the compact;
(d) Cease supervision of the probationer while another state
supervises the probationer pursuant to the compact;
(e) Resume supervision if the probationer returns to this state
before the term of probation expires.
(2) The probationer shall receive credit for time served while
being supervised by another state.
(3) If the probationer is returned to the state at the request of
the receiving state under rules of the interstate compact, the
department of corrections shall be responsible for the cost of
returning the probationer.

Sec. 8 RCW 35.20.255 and 2001 c 94 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Judges of the municipal court, in their discretion, shall have
the power in all criminal proceedings within their jurisdiction
including violations of city ordinances, to defer imposition of any
sentence, suspend all or part of any sentence including installment
payment of fines, fix the terms of any such deferral or suspension, and
provide for such probation as in their opinion is reasonable and
necessary under the circumstances of the case, but in no case shall it
extend for more than five years from the date of conviction for a
defendant to be sentenced under RCW 46.61.5055 and two years from the
date of conviction for all other offenses. A defendant who has been
sentenced, or whose sentence has been deferred, and who then fails to
appear for any hearing to address the defendant's compliance with the
terms of probation when ordered to do so by the court, shall have the
term of probation tolled until such time as the defendant makes his or
her presence known to the court on the record. However, the
jurisdiction period in this section does not apply to the enforcement
of orders issued under RCW 46.20.720. Any time before entering an
order terminating probation, the court may modify or revoke its order
suspending or deferring the imposition or execution of the sentence.
(2)(a) If a defendant whose sentence has been deferred requests
permission to travel or transfer to another state, the director of
probation services or a designee thereof shall determine whether such
request is subject to RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for adult
offender supervision. If such request is subject to the compact, the
director or designee shall:
(i) Notify the department of corrections of the defendant's
request;
(ii) Provide the department of corrections with the supporting
documentation it requests for processing an application for transfer;
(iii) Notify the defendant of the fee due to the department of
corrections for processing an application under the compact;
(iv) Cease supervision of the defendant while another state
supervises the defendant pursuant to the compact;
(v) Resume supervision if the defendant returns to this state
before the period of deferral expires.
(b) The defendant shall receive credit for time served while being
supervised by another state.
(c) If the probationer is returned to the state at the request of
the receiving state under rules of the interstate compact, the
department of corrections shall be responsible for the cost of
returning the probationer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 3.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a person placed on probation for a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor by a municipal court requests permission to travel or
transfer to another state, the assigned probation officer shall
determine whether such request is subject to RCW 9.94A.745, the
interstate compact for adult offender supervision. If such request is
subject to the compact, the probation officer shall:
(a) Notify the department of corrections of the probationer's
request;
(b) Provide the department of corrections with the supporting
documentation it requests for processing an application for transfer;
(c) Notify the probationer of the fee due to the department of
corrections for processing an application under the compact;
(d) Cease supervision of the probationer while another state
supervises the probationer pursuant to the compact;
(e) Resume supervision if the probationer returns to this state
before the term of probation expires.
(2) The probationer shall receive credit for time served while
being supervised by another state.
(3) If the probationer is returned to the state at the request of
the receiving state under rules of the interstate compact, the
department of corrections shall be responsible for the cost of
returning the probationer.

Sec. 10 RCW 10.64.120 and 1996 c 298 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every judge of a court of limited jurisdiction shall have the
authority to levy upon a person a monthly assessment not to exceed one
hundred dollars for services provided whenever the person is referred
by the court to the misdemeanant probation department for evaluation or
supervision services. The assessment may also be made by a judge in
superior court when such misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor cases are
heard in the superior court.
(2) For the purposes of this section the office of the
administrator for the courts shall define a probation department and
adopt rules for the qualifications of probation officers based on
occupational and educational requirements developed by an oversight
committee. This oversight committee shall include a representative
from the district and municipal court judges association, the
misdemeanant corrections association, the office of the administrator
for the courts, and associations of cities and counties. The oversight
committee shall consider qualifications that provide the training and
education necessary to (a) conduct presentencing and postsentencing
background investigations, including sentencing recommendations to the
court regarding jail terms, alternatives to incarceration, and
conditions of release; and (b) provide ongoing supervision and
assessment of offenders' needs and the risk they pose to the community.
(3) It shall be the responsibility of the probation services office
to implement local procedures approved by the court of limited
jurisdiction to ensure collection and payment of such fees into the
general fund of the city or county treasury.
(4) Revenues raised under this section shall be used to fund
programs for probation services and shall be in addition to those funds
provided in RCW 3.62.050.
(5) Assessments and fees levied upon a probationer under this
section shall be suspended while the probationer is being supervised by
another state pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for
adult offender supervision.

Sec. 11 RCW 9.94A.728 and 2004 c 176 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and
committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of
the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the
sentence except as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (2) of this
section, the term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and promulgated by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction in which the offender is confined. The earned release
time shall be for good behavior and good performance, as determined by
the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency
shall not credit the offender with earned release credits in advance of
the offender actually earning the credits. Any program established
pursuant to this section shall allow an offender to earn early release
credits for presentence incarceration. If an offender is transferred
from a county jail to the department, the administrator of a county
jail facility shall certify to the department the amount of time spent
in custody at the facility and the amount of earned release time. An
offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after July 23,
1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good time credits
or earned release time for that portion of his or her sentence that
results from any deadly weapon enhancements.
(a) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In the
case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex
offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 2003,
the aggregate earned release time may not exceed ten percent of the
sentence.
(b)(i) In the case of an offender who qualifies under (b)(ii) of
this subsection, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed fifty
percent of the sentence.
(ii) An offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time under this subsection (1)(b) if he or
she:
(A) Is classified in one of the two lowest risk categories under
(b)(iii) of this subsection;
(B) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
and
(C) Has no prior conviction for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor).
(iii) For purposes of determining an offender's eligibility under
this subsection (1)(b), the department shall perform a risk assessment
of every offender committed to a correctional facility operated by the
department who has no current or prior conviction for a sex offense, a
violent offense, a crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411,
a felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020, a
violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary), a violation of, or
an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.401 by
manufacture or delivery or possession with intent to deliver
methamphetamine, or a violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled
substance to a minor). The department must classify each assessed
offender in one of four risk categories between highest and lowest
risk.
(iv) The department shall recalculate the earned release time and
reschedule the expected release dates for each qualified offender under
this subsection (1)(b).
(v) This subsection (1)(b) applies retroactively to eligible
offenders serving terms of total confinement in a state correctional
facility as of July 1, 2003.
(vi) This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to offenders convicted
after July 1, 2010.
(c) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence;
(2)(a) A person convicted of a sex offense or an offense
categorized as a serious violent offense, assault in the second degree,
vehicular homicide, vehicular assault, assault of a child in the second
degree, any crime against persons where it is determined in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.602 that the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed before July 1, 2000, may become
eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the department, for
transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned release time
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(b) A person convicted of a sex offense, a violent offense, any
crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or a felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or after July 1, 2000, may
become eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the
department, for transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned
release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(c) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community placement or community
custody terms eligible for release to community custody status in lieu
of earned release shall provide an approved residence and living
arrangement prior to release to the community;
(d) The department may deny transfer to community custody status in
lieu of earned release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
if the department determines an offender's release plan, including
proposed residence location and living arrangements, may violate the
conditions of the sentence or conditions of supervision, place the
offender at risk to violate the conditions of the sentence, place the
offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk to victim safety or
community safety. The department's authority under this section is
independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence or statutory
provision regarding conditions for community custody or community
placement;
(e) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(4)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section;
(3) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an
authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may
leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections
officer or officers;
(4)(a) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical
placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:
(i) The offender has a medical condition that is serious enough to
require costly care or treatment;
(ii) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or
she is physically incapacitated due to age or the medical condition;
and
(iii) Granting the extraordinary medical placement will result in
a cost savings to the state.
(b) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without
the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an
extraordinary medical placement.
(c) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all
offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic
monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's
medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's
medical care. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the
monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed.
(d) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement
under this subsection at any time;
(5) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons
board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health
problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or
other extraordinary circumstances;
(6) No more than the final ((six)) twelve months of the sentence
may be served in partial confinement designed to aid the offender in
finding work and reestablishing himself or herself in the community;
(7) The governor may pardon any offender;
(8) The department may release an offender from confinement any
time within ten days before a release date calculated under this
section; ((and))
(9) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to
completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as
provided in RCW 9.94A.870; and
(10) The secretary may grant up to thirty days earned release
credit, in addition to credit earned otherwise under this section, to
any offender who:
(a) Is classified in one of the two lowest risk categories under
subsection (1)(b)(iii) of this section;
(b) Is housed, immediately prior to release, in a minimum security
correctional facility as defined by the department;
(c) Has less than twelve months of total confinement time remaining
in the offender's sentence; and
(d) Has successfully completed all training, physical ability
testing, and a minimum of six months' continuous employment in a work
crew supervised by the department of natural resources.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an offender
sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as subject to a
mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not be released
from total confinement before the completion of the listed mandatory
minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless allowed
under RCW 9.94A.540, however persistent offenders are not eligible for
extraordinary medical placement.

Sec. 12 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2003 c 53 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670,
9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or 9.94A.545, served in the
community subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and
activities by the department. For offenders placed on community
custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department
shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and
modify conditions of community custody, in addition to those imposed by
the court, based upon the risk to community safety.
(6) "Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum period
of community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW
9.94A.715, as established by the commission or the legislature under
RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000.
(7) "Community placement" means that period during which the
offender is subject to the conditions of community custody and/or
postrelease supervision, which begins either upon completion of the
term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release.
Community placement may consist of entirely community custody, entirely
postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.
(8) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(9) "Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other
sentence conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW
16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the court finds that any offender has
a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense, the
conditions of supervision may, subject to available resources, include
treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for out-of-state
supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be
considered the same as probation by other states.
(10) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(11) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles
10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and
acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(12) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(13) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior
convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(14) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that
equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the
reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the
offender and any dependents.
(15) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision
designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with
sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report
daily to a specific location designated by the department or the
sentencing court.
(16) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(17) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with
exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community supervision, the
number of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or
dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of
confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a
determinate sentence.
(18) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(19) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option
available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent
offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW
9.94A.660.
(20) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(21) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as
provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(22) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(23) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(24) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of
time.
(25) "First-time offender" means any person who has no prior
convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender
waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(26) "Home detention" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private
residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(27) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is
ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal
financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim,
statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as assessed
pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds,
court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any
other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result
of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense
of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction,
subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(28) "Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or
a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.
(29) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent
offense.
(30) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(31) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one
year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract
by the state or any other unit of government, or((, if home detention
or work crew has been ordered by the court,)) in an approved residence,
for a substantial portion of each day with the balance of the day spent
in the community. Partial confinement includes residential chemical
dependency treatment certified under chapter 70.96A RCW, day reporting,
work release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew
and home detention.
(32) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit
any crime listed in this subsection (32)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(33) "Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's
community placement that is not community custody.
(34) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(35) "Risk assessment" means the application of an objective
instrument supported by research and adopted by the department for the
purpose of assessing an offender's risk of reoffense, taking into
consideration the nature of the harm done by the offender, place and
circumstances of the offender related to risk, the offender's
relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be
based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(36) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug (RCW 46.61.502), actual physical control while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving
(RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5));
or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(37) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense
and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(38) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.130(11);
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.070 or 9.68A.080; or
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(39) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which
the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her
sexual gratification.
(40) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing court's
discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(41) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time
for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime as
prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the
crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(42) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical
boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four
hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(43) "Transition training" means written and verbal instructions
and assistance provided by the department to the offender during the
two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of the work
ethic camp program. The transition training shall include instructions
in the offender's requirements and obligations during the offender's
period of community custody.
(44) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as
a direct result of the crime charged.
(45) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(46) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting
of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that
complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(47) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program
as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower
the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(48) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005, except for sections 1 through 3 and 5 of this act, which
take effect immediately.

--- END ---