BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.415 and 2002 c 366 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) There is hereby established a program to be known as the
children's health program.
To the extent of available funds:
(((a))) (1) Health care services may be provided to persons who are
under eighteen years of age with household incomes at or below the
federal poverty level ((and)) not otherwise eligible for medical
assistance or the limited casualty program for the medically needy.
(((b))) (2) The determination of eligibility of recipients for
health care services shall be the responsibility of the department.
The application process shall be easy to understand and, to the extent
possible, applications shall be made available at local schools and
other appropriate locations. The department shall make eligibility
determinations within the time frames for establishing eligibility for
children on medical assistance, as defined by RCW 74.09.510.
(((c))) (3) The amount, scope, and duration of health care services
provided to eligible children under the children's health program
((shall)) may be the same as that provided to children under medical
assistance, as defined in RCW 74.09.520.
(((2) The legislature is interested in assessing the effectiveness
of the prenatal care program. However, the legislature recognizes the
cost and complexity associated with such assessment.
The legislature accepts the effectiveness of prenatal and maternity
care at improving birth outcomes when these services are received by
eligible persons. Therefore, the legislature intends to focus scarce
assessment resources to determine the extent to which support services
such as child care, psychosocial and nutritional assessment and
counseling, case management, transportation, and other support services
authorized by chapter 296, Laws of 1990, result in receipt of prenatal
and maternity care by eligible persons.
The University of Washington shall conduct a study, based on a
statistically significant statewide sampling of data, to evaluate the
effectiveness of the maternity care access program set forth in RCW
74.09.760 through 74.09.820 based on the principles set forth in RCW
74.09.770.
The University of Washington shall develop a plan and budget for
the study in consultation with the joint legislative audit and review
committee. The joint legislative audit and review committee shall also
monitor the progress of the study.
The department of social and health services shall make data and
other information available as needed to the University of Washington
as required to conduct this study.
The study shall determine:
(a) The characteristics of women receiving services, including
health risk factors;
(b) The extent to which access to maternity care and support
services have improved in this state as a result of this program;
(c) The utilization of services and birth outcomes for women and
infants served by this program by type of practitioner;
(d) The extent to which birth outcomes for women receiving services
under this program have improved in comparison to birth outcomes of
nonmedicaid mothers;
(e) The impact of increased medicaid reimbursement to physicians on
provider participation;
(f) The difference between costs for services provided under this
program and medicaid reimbursement for the services;
(g) The gaps in services, if any, that may still exist for women
and their infants as defined by RCW 74.09.790 (1) and (4) served by
this program, excluding pregnant substance abusers, and women covered
by private health insurance; and
(h) The number and mix of services provided to eligible women as
defined by subsection (2)(g) of this section and the effect on birth
outcomes as compared to nonmedicaid birth outcomes.)) In the event that
available funding is not sufficient to provide the amount, duration,
and scope of services provided to children under medical assistance,
the department shall make every effort to define covered services in a
manner that provides coverage for clinically proven preventive
services.
(4) Enrollment in the children's health program shall not result in
expenditures that exceed the amount that has been appropriated for the
program in the operating budget. In order to keep expenditures within
the appropriated amount, the department may manage enrollments,
including imposition of an enrollment freeze.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2005, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---