BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the fees
associated with various actions of the department of ecology relating
to the processing and administration of water rights are outdated and
are insufficient even to recover the cost of handling the funds
submitted. The legislature also finds that water right processing fees
are currently collected at three different stages of the water rights
process and that reducing the number of instances of fee collection to
two stages of the process would increase efficiency and reduce
administrative costs. The legislature further finds that several
current statutory fees are archaic or are otherwise covered by other
general statutes, including the state's public disclosure laws. The
legislature therefore intends to update and modernize the fee schedule
associated with water right-related actions of the department of
ecology.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.470 and 1993 c 495 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Except as otherwise provided in subsection (15) of this
section,)) The ((following)) fees specified in this section shall be
collected by the department in advance((:)) of the requested action.
(1) For the examination of an application for a permit to
appropriate water ((or on application to change point of diversion,
withdrawal, purpose or place of use)), a minimum fee of ((ten)) fifty
dollars((, to be paid)) must be remitted with the application. For
((each second foot between one and five hundred second feet, two
dollars per second foot; for each second foot between five hundred and
two thousand second feet, fifty cents per second foot; and for each
second foot in excess thereof, twenty cents per second foot)) an amount
of water exceeding one-half cubic foot per second, the examination fee
shall be assessed at the rate of one dollar per one hundredth cubic
foot per second. In no case will the examination fee be less than
fifty dollars or more than twenty-five thousand dollars. No fee is
required under this subsection (1) for an application filed by a party
to a cost reimbursement agreement made under RCW 90.03.265.
(2) For the examination of an application to store water, a fee of
two dollars for each acre foot of storage ((up to and including one
hundred thousand acre feet, one cent per acre foot, and for each acre
foot in excess thereof, one-fifth cent per acre foot)) proposed shall
be charged, but a minimum fee of fifty dollars must be remitted with
the application. In no case will the examination fee for a storage
project be less than fifty dollars or more than twenty-five thousand
dollars. No fee is required under this subsection (2) for an
application filed by a party to a cost reimbursement agreement made
under RCW 90.03.265.
(3)(a) For the examination of an application to transfer, change,
or amend a water right certificate, permit, or claim as authorized by
RCW 90.44.100, 90.44.105, or 90.03.380, a minimum fee of fifty dollars
must be remitted with the application. For an application for change
involving an amount of water exceeding one cubic foot per second, the
total examination fee shall be assessed at the rate of fifty cents per
one hundredth cubic foot per second. For an application for change of
a storage water right, the total examination fee shall be assessed at
the rate of one dollar for each acre foot of water involved in the
change. The fee shall be based on the amount of water subject to
change as proposed in the application, not on the total amount of water
reflected in the water right certificate, permit, or claim. In no case
will the examination fee charged for a change application be less than
fifty dollars or more than twelve thousand five hundred dollars.
(b) The examination fee for a temporary or seasonal change under
RCW 90.03.390 is fifty dollars and must be remitted with the
application.
(c) No fee is required under this subsection (3) for:
(i) An application to process a change relating to donation of a
trust water right to the state;
(ii) An application to process a change when the department
otherwise acquires a trust water right for purposes of improving
instream flows or for other public purposes;
(iii) An application filed with a water conservancy board according
to chapter 90.80 RCW or for the review of a water conservancy board's
record of decision submitted to the department according to chapter
90.80 RCW; or
(iv) An application filed by a party to a cost reimbursement
agreement made under RCW 90.03.265.
(d) For a change, transfer, or amendment involving a single project
operating under more than one water right, including related secondary
diversion rights, or involving the consolidation of multiple water
rights, only one examination fee and one certificate fee are required
to be paid.
(4) The ((ten)) fifty-dollar minimum fee payable with the
application shall be a credit to ((that)) the total amount whenever the
examination fee ((for direct diversion or storage)) totals more than
((ten)) fifty dollars under the ((above schedule)) schedule specified
in subsections (1) through (3) of this section and in such case the
further fee due shall be the total computed amount, less ((ten
dollars)) the amount previously paid. Within five working days from
receipt of an application, the department shall notify the applicant by
registered mail of any additional fees due under ((the above schedule
and any additional fees shall be paid to and received by the department
within thirty days from the date of filing the application, or the
application shall be rejected)) subsections (1) through (3) of this
section.
(((2) For filing and recording a permit to appropriate water for
irrigation purposes, forty cents per acre for each acre to be irrigated
up to and including one hundred acres, and twenty cents per acre for
each acre in excess of one hundred acres up to and including one
thousand acres, and ten cents for each acre in excess of one thousand
acres; and also twenty cents for each theoretical horsepower up to and
including one thousand horsepower, and four cents for each theoretical
horsepower in excess of one thousand horsepower, but in no instance
shall the minimum fee for filing and recording a permit to appropriate
water be less than five dollars. For all other beneficial purposes the
fee shall be twice the amount of the examination fee except that for
individual household and domestic use, which may include water for
irrigation of a family garden, the fee shall be five dollars.
(3) For filing and recording any other water right instrument, four
dollars for the first hundred words and forty cents for each additional
hundred words or fraction thereof.
(4) For making a copy of any document recorded or filed in his
office, forty cents for each hundred words or fraction thereof, but
when the amount exceeds twenty dollars, only the actual cost in excess
of that amount shall be charged.
(5) For certifying to copies, documents, records or maps, two
dollars for each certification.
(6) For blueprint copies of a map or drawing, or, for such other
work of a similar nature as may be required of the department, at
actual cost of the work.
(7))) (5) The fees specified in subsections (1) through (3) of this
section do not apply to any filings for emergency withdrawal
authorizations or temporary drought-related water right changes
authorized under RCW 43.83B.410 that are received by the department
while a drought condition order issued under RCW 43.83B.405 is in
effect.
(6) For ((granting)) applying for each extension of time for
beginning construction work under a permit to appropriate water, ((an
amount equal to one-half of the filing and recording fee, except that
the minimum fee shall be not less than five dollars for each year that
an extension is granted, and for granting an extension of time)) for
completion of construction work, or for completing application of water
to a beneficial use, ((five dollars for each year that an extension is
granted)) a fee of fifty dollars is required. These fees also apply to
similar extensions of time requested under a change or transfer
authorization.
(((8))) (7) For the inspection of any hydraulic works to insure
safety to life and property, a fee based on the actual cost of the
inspection, including the expense incident thereto, is required.
(((9))) (8) For the examination of plans and specifications as to
safety of controlling works for storage of ten acre feet or more of
water, a minimum fee of ten dollars, or a fee equal to the actual cost,
is required.
(((10))) (9) For recording an assignment either of a permit to
appropriate water or of an application for such a permit, a fee of
((five)) fifty dollars is required.
(((11))) (10) For preparing and issuing all water right
certificates, ((five)) a fee of fifty dollars is required.
(((12))) (11) For filing and recording a formal protest against
granting any application, ((two)) a fee of fifty dollars is required.
No fee is required to submit a comment, by mail or otherwise, regarding
an application.
(((13))) (12) For filing an application to amend a water right
claim filed under chapter 90.14 RCW, a fee of fifty dollars is
required.
(13) An application or request for an action as provided for under
this section is incomplete unless accompanied by the fee or the minimum
fee. If no fee or an amount less than the minimum fee accompanies an
application or other request for an action as provided under this
section, the department shall return the application or request to the
applicant with advice as to the fee that must be remitted with the
application or request for it to be accepted for processing. If
additional fees are due, the department shall provide timely
notification by certified mail with return receipt requested to
((applicants that fees are due)) the applicant. No action may be taken
by the department until the fee is paid in full. Failure to remit fees
within sixty days of the department's notification ((shall be)) is
grounds for rejecting the application or request or canceling the
permit. Cash shall not be accepted. Fees must be paid by check or
money order and are nonrefundable.
(14) For purposes of calculating fees for ground water filings, one
cubic foot per second shall be regarded as equivalent to four hundred
fifty gallons per minute.
(15) ((For the period beginning July 1, 1993, and ending June 30,
1994, there is imposed and the department shall collect a one hundred
dollar surcharge on all water rights applications or changes filed
under this section, and upon all water rights applications or changes
pending as of July 1, 1993. This charge shall be in addition to any
other fees imposed under this section.)) Eighty percent of the fees
collected by the department under this section shall be deposited in
the state general fund. Twenty percent of the fees collected by the
department under this section shall be deposited in the water rights
tracking system account established in section 3 of this act.
(16) Except for the fees relating to the inspection of hydraulic
works and the examination of plans and specifications of controlling
works provided for in subsections (7) and (8) of this section, nothing
in this section is intended to grant authority to the department to
amend the fees in this section by adoption of rules or otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The water rights tracking system account is created in the state
treasury. Twenty percent of the fees collected by the department of
ecology according to RCW 90.03.470 must be deposited in the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used by the department of ecology
for the development, implementation, and management of a water rights
tracking system, including a water rights mapping system and a water
rights data base.

--- END ---