BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Financial relationship" means a relationship between a
physician and a health care facility and that includes either:
(i) An ownership or investment interest; or
(ii) A compensation arrangement that involves remuneration between
a physician, or an immediate family member of a physician, and a health
care facility.
(b) "Health care facility" means a radiologist group practice or an
office consisting solely of one or more radiologists.
(c) "Radiologist" means a physician certified by the American board
of radiology or the American osteopathic board of radiology.
(d) "Radiology services" means health care services performed by a
radiologist or credentialed assistive personnel of a radiologist,
including magnetic resonance imaging services, computed axial
tomography services, or positron emission tomography services.
(2) A physician may not refer a patient, or direct an employee of
or person under contract with the physician to refer a patient, for
radiology services at a health care facility in which the physician has
a financial relationship.
(3) No health care services contractor or health plan is
responsible for payments for radiology services provided pursuant to an
improper referral under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) A violation of this section constitutes unprofessional conduct
under chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.57 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Financial relationship" means a relationship between an
osteopathic physician or surgeon and a health care facility and that
includes either:
(i) An ownership or investment interest; or
(ii) A compensation arrangement that involves remuneration between
an osteopathic physician or surgeon, or an immediate family member of
an osteopathic physician or surgeon, and a health care facility.
(b) "Health care facility" means a radiologist group practice or an
office consisting solely of one or more radiologists.
(c) "Radiologist" means a physician certified by the American board
of radiology or the American osteopathic board of radiology.
(d) "Radiology services" means health care services performed by a
radiologist or credentialed assistive personnel of a radiologist,
including magnetic resonance imaging services, computed axial
tomography services, or positron emission tomography services.
(2) An osteopathic physician or surgeon may not refer a patient, or
direct an employee of or person under contract with the osteopathic
physician or surgeon to refer a patient, for radiology services at a
health care facility in which the osteopathic physician or surgeon has
a financial relationship.
(3) No health care services contractor or health plan is
responsible for payments for radiology services provided pursuant to an
improper referral under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) A violation of this section constitutes unprofessional conduct
under chapter 18.130 RCW.

--- END ---