BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
EXTENDED WARRANTIES, SELF-SERVICE LAUNDRY,
AND DIRECT MAIL DELIVERY CHARGES
Sec. 101 RCW 82.04.050 and 2004 c 174 s 3 and 2004 c 153 s 407
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible
personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:
(a) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(b) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(c) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(d) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; ((or))
(e) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of tangible personal
property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the
performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail
sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as provided in
(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use. The
term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons
engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and
(7), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908; or
(f) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or
for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of ((coin-operated)) self-service
laundry facilities ((when such facilities are situated in an apartment
house, rooming house, or mobile home park for the exclusive use of the
tenants thereof)), and also excluding sales of laundry service to
nonprofit health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in
respect to live animals, birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and shall also include the sale of services or charges
made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The charge for labor and services rendered in respect to
constructing, repairing, or improving any structure upon, above, or
under any real property owned by an owner who conveys the property by
title, possession, or any other means to the person performing such
construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of performing such
construction, repair, or improvement and the property is then
reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the original
owner;
(d) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to the cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but shall not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging and
all other services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel,
trailer camp, and the granting of any similar license to use real
property, as distinguished from the renting or leasing of real
property, and it shall be presumed that the occupancy of real property
for a continuous period of one month or more constitutes a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to use or enjoy the same.
For the purposes of this subsection, it shall be presumed that the sale
of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous
period of one month or more to a person is a rental or lease of real
property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The sale of or charge made for tangible personal property,
labor and services to persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e),
and (f) of this subsection when such sales or charges are for property,
labor and services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by
such persons in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at
retail" or "retail sale" even though such property, labor and services
may be resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection shall be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4)(a) The term shall also include:
(i) The renting or leasing of tangible personal property to
consumers; and
(ii) Providing tangible personal property along with an operator
for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this
is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to
perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (4)(a)(ii), an
operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible
personal property.
(b) The term shall not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term shall also include the providing of telephone service,
as defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6) The term shall also include the sale of prewritten computer
software other than a sale to a person who presents a resale
certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery
to the end user, but shall not include custom software or the
customization of prewritten computer software.
(7) The term shall also include the sale of or charge made for an
extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection,
"extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to
perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no
additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property,
labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or
repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of
specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an
agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in
this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and
the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the
tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of
this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.010.
(8) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(((8))) (9) The term shall also not include sales of chemical
sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of
fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it
include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state department of
fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that
the farmer owns or leases.
(((9))) (10) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made
for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing,
repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or
other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and
nuclear research and development.

Sec. 102 RCW 82.04.060 and 2002 c 367 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Sale at wholesale" or "wholesale sale" means: (1) Any sale of
tangible personal property, any sale of services defined as a retail
sale in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), any sale of amusement or recreation
services as defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), any sale of canned
software, any sale of an extended warranty as defined in RCW
82.04.050(7), or any sale of telephone service as defined in RCW
82.04.065, which is not a sale at retail; and (2) any charge made for
labor and services rendered for persons who are not consumers, in
respect to real or personal property, if such charge is expressly
defined as a retail sale by RCW 82.04.050 when rendered to or for
consumers: PROVIDED, That the term "real or personal property" as used
in this subsection shall not include any natural products named in RCW
82.04.100.

Sec. 103 RCW 82.04.190 and 2004 c 174 s 4 and 2004 c 2 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
"Consumer" means the following:
(1) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any
article of tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the
person's business and including, among others, without limiting the
scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve,
construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than for the purpose (a) of resale as tangible personal property
in the regular course of business or (b) of incorporating such property
as an ingredient or component of real or personal property when
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving,
constructing, or decorating such real or personal property of or for
consumers or (c) of consuming such property in producing for sale a new
article of tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in
processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a
chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new
article being produced for sale or (d) ((purchases for the purpose)) of
consuming the property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is
subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary
purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon or (e) of satisfying
the person's obligations under an extended warranty as defined in RCW
82.04.050(7), if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person;
(2)(a) Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908; (b) any person who purchases, acquires, or
uses any telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than for
resale in the regular course of business; (c) any person who purchases,
acquires, or uses any service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a) ((or any
amusement and recreation service defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a))),
other than for resale in the regular course of business or for the
purpose of satisfying the person's obligations under an extended
warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7); ((and)) (d) any person who
purchases, acquires, or uses any amusement and recreation service
defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), other than for resale in the regular
course of business; (e) any person who is an end user of software; and
(f) any person who purchases or acquires an extended warranty as
defined in RCW 82.04.050(7) other than for resale in the regular course
of business;
(3) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the
building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington or by
the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or
vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind as
defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of
such publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right of
way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle by installing, placing or spreading the property in
or upon the right of way of such street, place, road, highway,
easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in or upon the site of such
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility;
(4) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of
possession to or an easement in real property which is being
constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a
person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal corporations
or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and services
rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road
purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and
county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82
RCW in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property.
Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this definition
shall be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";
(5) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired,
improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged
in business;
(6) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created
pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing land
and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality
thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to
chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person shall be a consumer within the
meaning of this subsection in respect to tangible personal property
incorporated into, installed in, or attached to such building or other
structure by such person, except that consumer does not include any
person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating,
or improving new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon,
or above real property of or for the United States, or any
instrumentality thereof, if the investment project would qualify for
sales and use tax deferral under chapter 82.63 RCW if undertaken by a
private entity;
(7) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the
rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under
RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for
tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the
machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful
life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other
subsection of this section shall be construed to modify any other
definition of "consumer"; ((and))
(8) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other
byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and development;
and
(9) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession of tangible personal property that, under the terms of an
extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), has been repaired or
is replacement property, but only with respect to the sale of or charge
made for the repairing of the tangible personal property or the
replacement property.

Sec. 104 RCW 82.12.010 and 2003 c 168 s 102 and 2003 c 5 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Purchase price" means the same as sales price as defined in
RCW 82.08.010.
(2)(a) "Value of the article used" shall be the purchase price for
the article of tangible personal property, the use of which is taxable
under this chapter. The term also includes, in addition to the
purchase price, the amount of any tariff or duty paid with respect to
the importation of the article used. In case the article used is
acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted, produced, or manufactured
by the person using the same or is sold under conditions wherein the
purchase price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of
the article used shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
(b) In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value
of the use of the articles so used shall be in an amount representing
a reasonable rental for the use of the articles so bailed, determined
as nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places
of use of similar products of like quality and character under such
rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such
articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the
construction, repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become
or are to become an ingredient or component of, new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or
for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city
housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or attaching of any such articles therein or thereto,
whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by
virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such articles so
used shall be determined according to the retail selling price of such
articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar products of like quality and character or, in the absence of
either of these selling price measures, such value may be determined
upon a cost basis, in any event under such rules as the department of
revenue may prescribe.
(c) In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business
outside the state which are brought into the state for no more than one
hundred eighty days in any period of three hundred sixty-five
consecutive days and which are temporarily used for business purposes
by the person in this state, the value of the article used shall be an
amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the articles,
unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW
upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.
(d) In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user
and used in the manufacture or production of products sold or to be
sold to the department of defense of the United States, the value of
the articles used shall be determined according to the value of the
ingredients of such articles.
(e) In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes
of serving as a prototype for the development of a new or improved
product, the value of the article used shall be determined by: (i) The
retail selling price of such new or improved product when first offered
for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into the
prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered
for sale.
(f) In the case of an article purchased with a direct pay permit
under RCW 82.32.087, the value of the article used shall be determined
by the purchase price of such article if, but for the use of the direct
pay permit, the transaction would have been subject to sales tax;
(3) "Value of the service used" means the purchase price for the
service, the use of which is taxable under this chapter. If the
service is received by gift or under conditions wherein the purchase
price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of the
service used shall be determined as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar services of like
quality and character under rules the department may prescribe;
(4) "Value of the extended warranty used" means the purchase price
for the extended warranty, the use of which is taxable under this
chapter. If the extended warranty is received by gift or under
conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
of the extended warranty, the value of the extended warranty used shall
be determined as nearly as possible according to the retail selling
price at place of use of similar extended warranties of like quality
and character under rules the department may prescribe;
(5) "Use," "used," "using," or "put to use" shall have their
ordinary meaning, and shall mean:
(a) With respect to tangible personal property, the first act
within this state by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or
control over the article of tangible personal property (as a consumer),
and include installation, storage, withdrawal from storage,
distribution, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or
consumption within this state; ((and))
(b) With respect to a service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), the
first act within this state after the service has been performed by
which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the
article of tangible personal property upon which the service was
performed (as a consumer), and includes installation, storage,
withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to
subsequent actual use or consumption of the article within this state;
and
(c) With respect to an extended warranty, the first act within this
state after the extended warranty has been acquired by which the
taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of
tangible personal property to which the extended warranty applies, and
includes installation, storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution,
or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption of
the article within this state;
(((5))) (6) "Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included
within the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word "consumer" as
defined in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;
(((6))) (7) "Retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW
82.08.010 and every person engaged in the business of selling tangible
personal property at retail and every person required to collect from
purchasers the tax imposed under this chapter;
(((7))) (8) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.050(7);
(9) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and
82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with
respect to taxes imposed under the provisions of this chapter.
"Consumer," in addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04
and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable, shall also mean any person who
distributes or displays, or causes to be distributed or displayed, any
article of tangible personal property, except newspapers, the primary
purpose of which is to promote the sale of products or services. With
respect to property distributed to persons within this state by a
consumer as defined in this subsection (((7))) (9), the use of the
property shall be deemed to be by such consumer.

Sec. 105 RCW 82.12.020 and 2003 c 361 s 302 and 2003 c 168 s 214
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected from every
person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of using within
this state as a consumer: (a) Any article of tangible personal
property purchased at retail, or acquired by lease, gift, repossession,
or bailment, or extracted or produced or manufactured by the person so
using the same, or otherwise furnished to a person engaged in any
business taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7); ((or)) (b) any
prewritten computer software, regardless of the method of delivery, but
excluding prewritten computer software that is either provided free of
charge or is provided for temporary use in viewing information, or
both; or (c) any extended warranty.
(2) This tax shall apply to the use of every extended warranty,
service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), and
the use of every article of tangible personal property, including
property acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and including
byproducts used by the manufacturer thereof, except as hereinafter
provided, irrespective of whether the article or similar articles are
manufactured or are available for purchase within this state.
(3) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty, or
service taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), purchased at
retail or acquired by lease, gift, or bailment if the sale to, or the
use by, the present user or his bailor or donor has already been
subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the
tax has been paid by the present user or by his bailor or donor.
(4) Except as provided in this section, payment by one purchaser or
user of tangible personal property, extended warranty, or service of
the tax imposed by chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW shall not have the effect
of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property, extended
warranty, or service from the taxes imposed by such chapters. If the
sale to, or the use by, the present user or his or her bailor or donor
has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this
chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by his or her
bailor or donor; or in respect to the use of property acquired by
bailment and the tax has once been paid based on reasonable rental as
determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by the value of the article at
time of first use multiplied by the tax rate imposed by chapter 82.08
RCW or this chapter as of the time of first use; or in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property acquired by bailment,
if the property was acquired by a previous bailee from the same bailor
for use in the same general activity and the original bailment was
prior to June 9, 1961, the tax imposed by this chapter does not apply.
(5) The tax shall be levied and collected in an amount equal to the
value of the article used, value of the extended warranty used, or
value of the service used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rates in
effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020, except in the case
of a seller required to collect use tax from the purchaser, the tax
shall be collected in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied
by the rate in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.

Sec. 106 RCW 82.12.0251 and 2003 c 5 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use:
(1) Of any article of tangible personal property, and services that
were rendered in respect to such property, brought into the state of
Washington by a nonresident thereof for his or her use or enjoyment
while temporarily within the state of Washington unless such property
is used in conducting a nontransitory business activity within the
state of Washington;
(2) By a nonresident of Washington of a motor vehicle or trailer
which is registered or licensed under the laws of the state of his or
her residence, and which is not required to be registered or licensed
under the laws of Washington, including motor vehicles or trailers
exempt pursuant to a declaration issued by the department of licensing
under RCW 46.85.060, and services rendered outside the state of
Washington in respect to such property;
(3) Of household goods, personal effects, and private motor
vehicles, and services rendered in respect to such property, by a bona
fide resident of Washington, or nonresident members of the armed forces
who are stationed in Washington pursuant to military orders, if such
articles and services were acquired and used by such person in another
state while a bona fide resident thereof and such acquisition and use
occurred more than ninety days prior to the time he or she entered
Washington. For purposes of this subsection, private motor vehicles
((does [do])) do not include motor homes((.));
(4) Of an extended warranty, to the extent that the property
covered by the extended warranty is exempt under this section from the
tax imposed under this chapter.
For purposes of this section, "state" means a state of the United
States, any political subdivision thereof, the District of Columbia,
and any foreign country or political subdivision thereof, and
"services" means services defined as retail sales in RCW
82.04.050(2)(a).

Sec. 107 RCW 82.12.0255 and 2003 c 5 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty, or
service which the state is prohibited from taxing under the
Constitution of the state or under the Constitution or laws of the
United States.

Sec. 108 RCW 82.12.035 and 2002 c 367 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
A credit shall be allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter
upon the use of tangible personal property, extended warranty, or
services taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), in the state of
Washington in the amount that the present user thereof or his or her
bailor or donor has paid a retail sales or use tax with respect to such
property, extended warranty, or service to any other state of the
United States, any political subdivision thereof, the District of
Columbia, and any foreign country or political subdivision thereof,
prior to the use of such property, extended warranty, or service in
Washington.

Sec. 109 RCW 82.12.040 and 2003 c 168 s 215 and 2003 c 76 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person who maintains in this state a place of business or
a stock of goods, or engages in business activities within this state,
shall obtain from the department a certificate of registration, and
shall, at the time of making sales of tangible personal property,
extended warranties, or sales of any service defined as a retail sale
in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), or making transfers of either
possession or title, or both, of tangible personal property for use in
this state, collect from the purchasers or transferees the tax imposed
under this chapter. The tax to be collected under this section shall
be in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied by the rate in
effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020. For the purposes
of this chapter, the phrase "maintains in this state a place of
business" shall include the solicitation of sales and/or taking of
orders by sales agents or traveling representatives. For the purposes
of this chapter, "engages in business activity within this state"
includes every activity which is sufficient under the Constitution of
the United States for this state to require collection of tax under
this chapter. The department shall in rules specify activities which
constitute engaging in business activity within this state, and shall
keep the rules current with future court interpretations of the
Constitution of the United States.
(2) Every person who engages in this state in the business of
acting as an independent selling agent for persons who do not hold a
valid certificate of registration, and who receives compensation by
reason of sales of tangible personal property, extended warranties, or
sales of any service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a)
or (3)(a), of his or her principals for use in this state, shall, at
the time such sales are made, collect from the purchasers the tax
imposed on the purchase price under this chapter, and for that purpose
shall be deemed a retailer as defined in this chapter.
(3) The tax required to be collected by this chapter shall be
deemed to be held in trust by the retailer until paid to the department
and any retailer who appropriates or converts the tax collected to the
retailer's own use or to any use other than the payment of the tax
provided herein to the extent that the money required to be collected
is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor. In case any seller fails to collect the tax
herein imposed or having collected the tax, fails to pay the same to
the department in the manner prescribed, whether such failure is the
result of the seller's own acts or the result of acts or conditions
beyond the seller's control, the seller shall nevertheless, be
personally liable to the state for the amount of such tax, unless the
seller has taken from the buyer in good faith a copy of a direct pay
permit issued under RCW 82.32.087.
(4) Any retailer who refunds, remits, or rebates to a purchaser, or
transferee, either directly or indirectly, and by whatever means, all
or any part of the tax levied by this chapter shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section,
any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by
this chapter if:
(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted
directly or through another person, are limited to:
(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;
(ii) The taking of orders; or
(iii) The processing of payments; and
(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on
a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not
owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned
or operated by an affiliated person. "Affiliated persons" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.424.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section expires when: (a) The United
States congress grants individual states the authority to impose sales
and use tax collection duties on remote sellers; or (b) it is
determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not
subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use tax collection
duties on remote sellers.

Sec. 110 RCW 82.08.010 and 2004 c 153 s 406 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Selling price" includes "sales price." "Sales price" means
the total amount of consideration, except separately stated trade-in
property of like kind, including cash, credit, property, and services,
for which tangible personal property, extended warranties, or services
defined as a "retail sale" under RCW 82.04.050 are sold, leased, or
rented, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise. No
deduction from the total amount of consideration is allowed for the
following: (a) The seller's cost of the property sold; (b) the cost of
materials used, labor or service cost, interest, losses, all costs of
transportation to the seller, all taxes imposed on the seller, and any
other expense of the seller; (c) charges by the seller for any services
necessary to complete the sale, other than delivery and installation
charges; (d) delivery charges; (e) installation charges; and (f) the
value of exempt tangible personal property given to the purchaser where
taxable and exempt tangible personal property have been bundled
together and sold by the seller as a single product or piece of
merchandise.
When tangible personal property is rented or leased under
circumstances that the consideration paid does not represent a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so rented or leased, the
"selling price" shall be determined as nearly as possible according to
the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
"Selling price" or "sales price" does not include: Discounts,
including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third
party that are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale;
interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the
sale of tangible personal property, extended warranties, or services,
if the amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or
similar document given to the purchaser; and any taxes legally imposed
directly on the consumer that are separately stated on the invoice,
bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser;
(2) "Seller" means every person, including the state and its
departments and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to
a buyer, purchaser, or consumer, whether as agent, broker, or
principal, except "seller" does not mean the state and its departments
and institutions when making sales to the state and its departments and
institutions;
(3) "Buyer," "purchaser," and "consumer" include, without limiting
the scope hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in
bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club,
company, joint stock company, business trust, corporation, association,
society, or any group of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual,
cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise, municipal corporation,
quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its departments and
institutions and all political subdivisions thereof, irrespective of
the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed, and
also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;
(4) "Delivery charges" means charges by the seller of personal
property or services for preparation and delivery to a location
designated by the purchaser of personal property or services including,
but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling,
crating, and packing;
(5) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed
by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or
to addressees on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the
direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed
directly to the recipients. "Direct mail" includes tangible personal
property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct
mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed
material. "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed
material delivered to a single address;
(6) The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax
year," "taxable year," "person," "company," "sale," "sale at retail,"
"retail sale," "sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business," "engaging
in business," "cash discount," "successor," "consumer," "in this state"
and "within this state" shall apply equally to the provisions of this
chapter;
(((6))) (7) For the purposes of the taxes imposed under this
chapter and under chapter 82.12 RCW, "tangible personal property" means
personal property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or
touched, or that is in any other manner perceptible to the senses.
Tangible personal property includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and
prewritten computer software;
(8) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.050(7).

Sec. 111 RCW 82.14.020 and 2003 c 168 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) A retail sale consisting solely of the sale of tangible
personal property shall be deemed to have occurred at the retail outlet
at or from which delivery is made to the consumer;
(2) A retail sale consisting essentially of the performance of
personal, business, or professional services shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place at which such services were primarily performed,
except that for the performance of a tow truck service, as defined in
RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed to have occurred at the
place of business of the operator of the tow truck service;
(3) A retail sale consisting of the rental of tangible personal
property shall be deemed to have occurred (a) in the case of a rental
involving periodic rental payments, at the place of primary use by the
lessee during the period covered by each payment, or (b) in all other
cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;
(4) A retail sale within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a
retail sale of taxable personal property to be installed by the seller
shall be deemed to have occurred at the place where the labor and
services involved were primarily performed;
(5)(a) A retail sale consisting of the providing to a consumer of
telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than a sale of
tangible personal property under subsection (1) of this section or a
rental of tangible personal property under subsection (3) of this
section or a sale of mobile telecommunications services, shall be
deemed to have occurred at the situs of the telephone or other
instrument through which the telephone service is rendered;
(b) A retail sale consisting of the providing of telecommunications
services shall be sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520;
(6) A retail sale of linen and uniform supply services is deemed to
occur as provided in RCW 82.08.0202;
(7) A retail sale consisting of an extended warranty shall be
deemed to have occurred at the business location of the seller if the
extended warranty is received by the purchaser at that location. If an
extended warranty is not received by the purchaser at the business
location of the seller, a retail sale of an extended warranty shall be
deemed to have occurred at the location where receipt by the buyer
occurs;
(8) "City" means a city or town;
(((8))) (9) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters
82.04, 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, insofar as
applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under authority of this chapter;
(((9))) (10) "Taxable event" shall mean any retail sale, or any
use, upon which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08 or
82.12 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That the term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant
to RCW 82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;
(((10))) (11) "Treasurer or other legal depository" shall mean the
treasurer or legal depository of a county or city.

Sec. 112 RCW 82.14.020 and 2003 c 168 s 503 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) A retail sale consisting solely of the sale of tangible
personal property shall be deemed to have occurred at the retail outlet
at or from which delivery is made to the consumer;
(2) A retail sale consisting essentially of the performance of
personal, business, or professional services shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place at which such services were primarily performed,
except that for the performance of a tow truck service, as defined in
RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed to have occurred at the
place of business of the operator of the tow truck service;
(3) A retail sale consisting of the rental of tangible personal
property shall be deemed to have occurred (a) in the case of a rental
involving periodic rental payments, at the primary place of use by the
lessee during the period covered by each payment, or (b) in all other
cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;
(4) A retail sale within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a
retail sale of taxable personal property to be installed by the seller
shall be deemed to have occurred at the place where the labor and
services involved were primarily performed;
(5) A retail sale consisting of the providing of telecommunications
services shall be sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520;
(6) A retail sale of linen and uniform supply services is deemed to
occur as provided in RCW 82.08.0202;
(7) A retail sale consisting of an extended warranty shall be
deemed to have occurred at the business location of the seller if the
extended warranty is received by the purchaser at that location. If an
extended warranty is not received by the purchaser at the business
location of the seller, a retail sale of an extended warranty shall be
deemed to have occurred at the location where receipt by the buyer
occurs;
(8) "City" means a city or town;
(((8))) (9) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters
82.04, 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, insofar as
applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under authority of this chapter;
(((9))) (10) "Taxable event" shall mean any retail sale, or any
use, upon which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08 or
82.12 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That the term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant
to RCW 82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;
(((10))) (11) "Treasurer or other legal depository" shall mean the
treasurer or legal depository of a county or city.

Sec. 113 2004 c 153 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) If a court of competent jurisdiction enters a final judgment on
the merits that is based on federal or state law, is no longer subject
to appeal, and substantially limits or impairs the essential elements
of P.L. 106-252, 4 U.S.C. Secs. 116 through 126, or chapter 67, Laws of
2002, then chapter 67, Laws of 2002 is null and void in its entirety.
(2) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 502, chapter 168, Laws of 2003 is null and void.
(3) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 410, chapter 153, Laws of 2004 is null and void.
(4) If the contingency in subsection (1) of this section occurs,
section 111, chapter ..., Laws of 2005 (section 111 of this act) is
null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax,
amounts derived from delivery charges made for the delivery of direct
mail if the charges are separately stated on an invoice or similar
billing document given to the purchaser.
(2) "Delivery charges" and "direct mail" have the same meanings as
in RCW 82.08.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to delivery charges
made for the delivery of direct mail if the charges are separately
stated on an invoice or similar billing document given to the
purchaser.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by this chapter does not apply to the value of
delivery charges made for the delivery of direct mail if the charges
are separately stated on an invoice or similar billing document given
to the purchaser.
(2) "Delivery charges" and "direct mail" have the same meanings as
in RCW 82.08.010.

PART II
LIQUOR
Sec. 201 RCW 82.08.150 and 2003 c 167 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each retail
sale of spirits in the original package at the rate of fifteen percent
of the selling price. The tax imposed in this subsection shall apply
to all such sales including sales by the Washington state liquor stores
and agencies, but excluding sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
licensees.
(2) There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each sale of
spirits in the original package at the rate of ten percent of the
selling price on sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies
to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(3) There is levied and shall be collected an additional tax upon
each retail sale of spirits in the original package at the rate of one
dollar and seventy-two cents per liter. The additional tax imposed in
this subsection shall apply to all such sales including sales by
Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(4) An additional tax is imposed equal to fourteen percent
multiplied by the taxes payable under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of
this section.
(5) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of seven cents per liter. The
additional tax imposed in this subsection shall apply to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and
including sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(6)(a) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in
the original package at the rate of one and seven-tenths percent of the
selling price through June 30, 1995, two and six-tenths percent of the
selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, and
three and four-tenths of the selling price thereafter. This additional
tax applies to all such sales including sales by Washington state
liquor stores and agencies, but excluding sales to spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant licensees.
(b) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in the
original package at the rate of one and one-tenth percent of the
selling price through June 30, 1995, one and seven-tenths percent of
the selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
and two and three-tenths of the selling price thereafter. This
additional tax applies to all such sales to spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant licensees.
(c) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of twenty cents per liter through
June 30, 1995, thirty cents per liter for the period July 1, 1995,
through June 30, 1997, and forty-one cents per liter thereafter. This
additional tax applies to all such sales including sales by Washington
state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to spirits, beer,
and wine restaurant licensees.
(d) All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes
under this subsection shall be deposited in the health services account
created under RCW 43.72.900 by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.
(7)(a) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of
spirits in the original package at the rate of one dollar and thirty-three cents per liter. This additional tax applies to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, but
excluding sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(b) All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes
under this subsection shall be deposited by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month as follows:
(i) 97.5 percent into the general fund;
(ii) 2.3 percent into the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900; and
(iii) 0.2 percent into the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account created under RCW 69.50.520.
(8) The tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
spirits in the original package.
(((8))) (9) The taxes imposed in this section shall be paid by the
buyer to the seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the
full amount of the tax payable in respect to each taxable sale under
this section. The taxes required by this section to be collected by
the seller shall be stated separately from the selling price and for
purposes of determining the tax due from the buyer to the seller, it
shall be conclusively presumed that the selling price quoted in any
price list does not include the taxes imposed by this section.
(((9))) (10) As used in this section, the terms, "spirits" and
"package" shall have the meaning ascribed to them in chapter 66.04 RCW.

Sec. 202 RCW 69.50.520 and 2004 c 276 s 912 are each amended to
read as follows:
The violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8),
66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(9)(a), 82.08.150 (5) and
(7)(b)(iii), 82.24.020(2), 82.64.020, and section 420, chapter 271,
Laws of 1989 shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for funding services and programs under
chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess.,
including state incarceration costs. Funds from the account may also
be appropriated to reimburse local governments for costs associated
with implementing criminal justice legislation including chapter 338,
Laws of 1997. During the 2003-2005 biennium, funds from the account
may also be used for costs associated with providing grants to local
governments in accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997, funding drug
offender treatment services in accordance with RCW 70.96A.350,
maintenance and operating costs of the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs jail reporting system, maintenance and
operating costs of the juvenile rehabilitation administration's client
activity tracking system, civil indigent legal representation,
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces, and grants to community
networks under chapter 70.190 RCW by the family policy council.

PART III
BOARDING HOMES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a nonprofit
boarding home licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW for providing room and
domiciliary care to residents of the boarding home.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Domiciliary care" has the meaning provided in RCW 18.20.020.
(b) "Nonprofit boarding home" means a boarding home that is
operated as a religious or charitable organization, is exempt from
federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3), is incorporated
under chapter 24.03 RCW, is operated as part of a nonprofit hospital,
or is operated as part of a public hospital district.

Sec. 302 RCW 82.04.2908 and 2004 c 174 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing room and domiciliary care to residents of a boarding home
licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, the amount of tax with respect to
such business shall be equal to the gross income ((from such services))
of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(2) ((If the persons described in subsection (1) of this section
receive income from sources other than those described in subsection
(1) of this section or provide services other than those named in
subsection (1) of this section, that income and those services are
subject to tax as otherwise provided in this chapter.
(3))) For the purposes of this section, "domiciliary care" has the
((same)) meaning ((as)) provided in RCW 18.20.020.

PART IV
COMPREHENSIVE CANCER CENTERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a
comprehensive cancer center to the extent the amounts are exempt from
federal income tax.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "comprehensive cancer center"
means a cancer center that has written confirmation that it is
recognized by the national cancer institute as a comprehensive cancer
center and that qualifies as an exempt organization under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 501(c)(3) as existing on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
medical supplies, chemicals, or materials to a comprehensive cancer
center. The exemption in this section does not apply to the sale of
construction materials, office equipment, building equipment,
administrative supplies, or vehicles.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Comprehensive cancer center" has the meaning provided in
section 401 of this act.
(b) "Chemical" means any catalyst, solvent, water, acid, oil, or
other additive that physically or chemically interacts with blood,
bone, or tissue.
(c) "Materials" means any item of tangible personal property,
including, but not limited to, bags, packs, collecting sets, filtering
materials, testing reagents, antisera, and refrigerants used or
consumed in performing research on, procuring, testing, processing,
storing, packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue.
(d) "Research" means basic and applied research that has as its
objective the design, development, refinement, testing, marketing, or
commercialization of a product, service, or process.
(e) "Medical supplies" means any item of tangible personal
property, including any repair and replacement parts for such tangible
personal property, used by a comprehensive cancer center for the
purpose of performing research on, procuring, testing, processing,
storing, packaging, distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue. The
term includes tangible personal property used to:
(i) Provide preparatory treatment of blood, bone, or tissue;
(ii) Control, guide, measure, tune, verify, align, regulate, test,
or physically support blood, bone, or tissue; and
(iii) Protect the health and safety of employees or others present
during research on, procuring, testing, processing, storing, packaging,
distributing, or using blood, bone, or tissue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of medical supplies, chemicals, or materials by a comprehensive
cancer center. The exemption in this section does not apply to the use
of construction materials, office equipment, building equipment,
administrative supplies, or vehicles.
(2) The definitions in sections 401 and 402 of this act apply to
this section.

PART V
COMMERCIAL AIRPLANE MANUFACTURING
Sec. 501 RCW 82.04.4463 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for property taxes paid during the calendar year.
(2) The credit is equal to:
(a)(i) Property taxes paid on new buildings, and land upon which
this property is located, built after December 1, 2003, and used
exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such
airplanes; or
(ii) Property taxes attributable to an increase in assessed value
due to the renovation or expansion, after December 1, 2003, of a
building used exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes; and
(b) An amount equal to property taxes paid on machinery and
equipment exempt under RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 ((used in
manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes))
and acquired after December 1, 2003, multiplied by a fraction. The
numerator of the fraction is the total taxable amount subject to the
tax imposed under RCW 82.04.260(13) and the denominator of the fraction
is the total taxable amount subject to the tax imposed under all
manufacturing classifications in chapter 82.04 RCW, required to be
reported on the person's returns for the calendar year before the
calendar year in which the credit under this section is earned. No
credit is available under this subsection (2)(b) if either the
numerator or the denominator of the fraction is zero. If the fraction
is greater than or equal to nine-tenths, then the fraction is rounded
to one. For purposes of this subsection, "returns" means the combined
excise tax returns for the calendar year.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "commercial passenger
airplane" and "component" have the meanings given in RCW 82.32.550.
(4) A person taking the credit under this section is subject to all
the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. In addition, the person must
report as required under RCW 82.32.545. A credit earned during one
calendar year may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred
in a subsequent calendar year, but may not be carried over a second
year. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(5) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person taking the credit under this section must report as required
under RCW 82.32.545.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2024.

PART VI
AMPHITHEATERS
Sec. 601 RCW 82.29A.130 and 1999 c 165 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following leasehold interests shall be exempt from taxes
imposed pursuant to RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040:
(1) All leasehold interests constituting a part of the operating
properties of any public utility which is assessed and taxed as a
public utility pursuant to chapter 84.12 RCW.
(2) All leasehold interests in facilities owned or used by a
school, college or university which leasehold provides housing for
students and which is otherwise exempt from taxation under provisions
of RCW 84.36.010 and 84.36.050.
(3) All leasehold interests of subsidized housing where the fee
ownership of such property is vested in the government of the United
States, or the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof
but only if income qualification exists for such housing.
(4) All leasehold interests used for fair purposes of a nonprofit
fair association that sponsors or conducts a fair or fairs which
receive support from revenues collected pursuant to RCW 67.16.100 and
allocated by the director of the department of agriculture where the
fee ownership of such property is vested in the government of the
United States, the state of Washington or any of its political
subdivisions: PROVIDED, That this exemption shall not apply to the
leasehold interest of any sublessee of such nonprofit fair association
if such leasehold interest would be taxable if it were the primary
lease.
(5) All leasehold interests in any property of any public entity
used as a residence by an employee of that public entity who is
required as a condition of employment to live in the publicly owned
property.
(6) All leasehold interests held by enrolled Indians of lands owned
or held by any Indian or Indian tribe where the fee ownership of such
property is vested in or held in trust by the United States and which
are not subleased to other than to a lessee which would qualify
pursuant to this chapter, RCW 84.36.451 and 84.40.175.
(7) All leasehold interests in any real property of any Indian or
Indian tribe, band, or community that is held in trust by the United
States or is subject to a restriction against alienation imposed by the
United States: PROVIDED, That this exemption shall apply only where it
is determined that contract rent paid is greater than or equal to
ninety percent of fair market rental, to be determined by the
department of revenue using the same criteria used to establish taxable
rent in RCW 82.29A.020(2)(b).
(8) All leasehold interests for which annual taxable rent is less
than two hundred fifty dollars per year. For purposes of this
subsection leasehold interests held by the same lessee in contiguous
properties owned by the same lessor shall be deemed a single leasehold
interest.
(9) All leasehold interests which give use or possession of the
leased property for a continuous period of less than thirty days:
PROVIDED, That for purposes of this subsection, successive leases or
lease renewals giving substantially continuous use of possession of the
same property to the same lessee shall be deemed a single leasehold
interest: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no leasehold interest shall be deemed
to give use or possession for a period of less than thirty days solely
by virtue of the reservation by the public lessor of the right to use
the property or to allow third parties to use the property on an
occasional, temporary basis.
(10) All leasehold interests under month-to-month leases in
residential units rented for residential purposes of the lessee pending
destruction or removal for the purpose of constructing a public highway
or building.
(11) All leasehold interests in any publicly owned real or personal
property to the extent such leasehold interests arises solely by virtue
of a contract for public improvements or work executed under the public
works statutes of this state or of the United States between the public
owner of the property and a contractor.
(12) All leasehold interests that give use or possession of state
adult correctional facilities for the purposes of operating
correctional industries under RCW 72.09.100.
(13) All leasehold interests used to provide organized and
supervised recreational activities for disabled persons of all ages in
a camp facility and for public recreational purposes by a nonprofit
organization, association, or corporation that would be exempt from
property tax under RCW 84.36.030(1) if it owned the property. If the
publicly owned property is used for any taxable purpose, the leasehold
excise taxes set forth in RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040 shall be
imposed and shall be apportioned accordingly.
(14) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of a baseball stadium with natural turf and a retractable roof or
canopy that is in a county with a population of over one million, that
has a seating capacity of over forty thousand, and that is constructed
on or after January 1, 1995. "Public or entertainment areas" include
ticket sales areas, ramps and stairs, lobbies and concourses, parking
areas, concession areas, restaurants, hospitality and stadium club
areas, kitchens or other work areas primarily servicing other public or
entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press and media areas,
control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas,
museum and exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage
areas, loading, staging, and servicing areas, seating areas and suites,
the playing field, and any other areas to which the public has access
or which are used for the production of the entertainment event or
other public usage, and any other personal property used for these
purposes. "Public or entertainment areas" does not include locker
rooms or private offices exclusively used by the lessee.
(15) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of a stadium and exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, that
is constructed on or after January 1, 1998. For the purposes of this
subsection, "public or entertainment areas" has the same meaning as in
subsection (14) of this section, and includes exhibition areas.
(16) All leasehold interests in public facilities districts, as
provided in chapter 36.100 or 35.57 RCW.
(17) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of an amphitheater if a private entity is responsible for one hundred
percent of the cost of constructing the amphitheater which is not
reimbursed by the public owner, both the public owner and the private
lessee sponsor events at the facility on a regular basis, the lessee is
responsible under the lease or agreement to operate and maintain the
facility, and the amphitheater has a seating capacity of over seventeen
thousand reserved and general admission seats and is in a county with
a population of over three hundred fifty thousand, but less than four
hundred twenty-five thousand. For the purposes of this subsection,
"public or entertainment areas" include box offices or other ticket
sales areas, entrance gates, ramps and stairs, lobbies and concourses,
parking areas, concession areas, restaurants, hospitality areas,
kitchens or other work areas primarily servicing other public or
entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press and media areas,
control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas,
museum and exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage
areas, loading, staging, and servicing areas, seating areas including
lawn seating areas and suites, stages, and any other areas to which the
public has access or which are used for the production of the
entertainment event or other public usage, and any other personal
property used for these purposes. "Public or entertainment areas" does
not include office areas used predominately by the lessee.

PART VII
HISTORIC AUTOMOBILE MUSEUM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The governing board of a nonprofit organization, corporation,
or association may apply for deferral of taxes on an eligible project.
Application shall be made to the department in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The application shall contain
information regarding the location of the project, estimated or actual
costs of the project, time schedules for completion and operation of
the project, and other information required by the department. The
department shall rule on the application within sixty days. All
applications for the tax deferral under this section must be received
no later than December 31, 2008.
(2) The department shall issue a sales and use tax deferral
certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters
82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on each eligible project.
(3) The nonprofit organization, corporation, or association shall
begin paying the deferred taxes in the fifth year after the date
certified by the department as the date on which the eligible project
is operationally complete. The first payment is due on December 31st
of the fifth calendar year after such certified date, with subsequent
annual payments due on December 31st of the following nine years. Each
payment shall equal ten percent of the deferred tax.
(4) The department may authorize an accelerated repayment schedule
upon request of the nonprofit organization, corporation, or
association.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, interest
shall not be charged on any taxes deferred under this section for the
period of deferral. The debt for deferred taxes is not extinguished by
insolvency or other failure of the nonprofit organization, corporation,
or association.
(6) If the project is not operationally complete within five
calendar years from issuance of the tax deferral or if at any time the
department finds that the project is not eligible for tax deferral
under this section, the amount of deferred taxes outstanding for the
project shall be immediately due and payable. If deferred taxes must
be repaid under this subsection, the department shall assess interest,
but not penalties, on amounts due under this subsection. Interest
shall be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this
chapter, retroactively to the date of deferral, and shall accrue until
the deferred taxes due are repaid.
(7) Applications and any other information received by the
department of revenue under this section are not confidential under RCW
82.32.330. This chapter applies to the administration of this section.
(8) This section applies to taxable eligible project activity that
occurs on or after July 1, 2007.
(9) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Eligible project" means a project that is used primarily for
a historic automobile museum.
(b) "Historic automobile museum" means a facility owned and
operated by a nonprofit organization, corporation, or association that
is used to maintain and exhibit to the public a collection of at least
five hundred motor vehicles.
(c) "Nonprofit organization, corporation, or association" means an
organization, corporation, or association exempt from tax under section
501(c) (3), (4), or (10) of the federal internal revenue code (26
U.S.C. Sec. 501(c) (3), (4), or (10)).
(d) "Project" means the construction of new structures, the
acquisition and installation of fixtures that are permanently affixed
to and become a physical part of those structures, and site
preparation. For purposes of this subsection, structures do not
include parking facilities used for motor vehicles that are not on
display or part of the museum collection.
(e) "Site preparation" includes soil testing, site clearing and
grading, demolition, or any other related activities that are initiated
before construction. Site preparation does not include landscaping
services or landscaping materials.

PART VIII
NURSING HOMES
Sec. 801 RCW 82.71.020 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 16 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other tax, a quality maintenance fee is
imposed on every operator of a nonexempt nursing facility in this
state. The quality maintenance fee shall be:
(a) Six dollars and fifty cents per patient day through June 30,
2005;
(b) Five dollars and twenty-five cents per patient day for the
period July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;
(c) Three dollars per patient day for the period July 1, 2007,
through June 30, 2009; and
(d) One dollar and fifty cents per patient day for the period July
1, 2009, through June 30, 2011.
(2) Each operator of a nonexempt nursing facility shall file a
return with the department on a monthly basis. The return shall
include the following:
(a) The number of patient days for nonexempt nursing facilities
operated by that person in that month; and
(b) Remittance of the nonexempt nursing facility operator's quality
maintenance fee for that month.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2011.

Sec. 802 2003 1st sp.s. c 16 s 6 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Sections 1 through 5 of this act)) RCW 82.71.010, 82.71.020,
82.71.030, 74.46.091, and 74.46.535 shall expire on the effective date
that federal medicaid matching funds are substantially reduced or that
a federal sanction is imposed due to the quality maintenance fee under
((section 2 of this act)) RCW 82.71.020, as such date is certified by
the secretary of social and health services.
(2) The expiration of ((sections 1 through 5 of this act)) RCW
82.71.010, 82.71.020, 82.71.030, 74.46.091, and 74.46.535 shall not be
construed as affecting any existing right acquired or liability or
obligation incurred under those sections or under any rule or order
adopted under those sections, nor as affecting any proceeding
instituted under those sections.

PART IX
COMMERCIAL DISTRICT REVITALIZATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 (1) The legislature finds:
(a) The continued economic vitality of downtown and neighborhood
commercial districts in our state's cities is essential to community
preservation, social cohesion, and economic growth;
(b) In recent years there has been a deterioration of downtown and
neighborhood commercial districts in both rural and urban communities
due to a shifting population base, changes in the marketplace, and
greater competition from suburban shopping malls, discount centers, and
business transacted through the internet;
(c) This decline has eroded the ability of businesses and property
owners to renovate and enhance their commercial and residential
properties; and
(d) Business owners in these districts need to maintain their local
economies in order to provide goods and services to adjacent residents,
to provide employment opportunities, to avoid disinvestment and
economic dislocations, and to develop and sustain downtown and
neighborhood commercial district revitalization programs to address
these problems.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to establish a program to:
(a) Work in partnership with these organizations;
(b) Provide technical assistance and training to local governments,
business organizations, downtown and neighborhood commercial district
organizations, and business and property owners to accomplish community
and economic revitalization and development of business districts; and
(c) Certify a downtown or neighborhood commercial district
organization's use of available tax incentives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.
(2) "Contribution" means cash contributions.
(3) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(4) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(5) "Program" means a nonprofit organization under internal revenue
code sections 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6), with the sole mission of
revitalizing a downtown or neighborhood commercial district area, that
is designated by the department of community, trade, and economic
development as described in sections 908 through 912 of this act.
(6) "Main street trust fund" means the department of community,
trade, and economic development's main street trust fund account under
section 912 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 (1) Application for tax credits under this
chapter must be made to the department before making a contribution to
a program or the main street trust fund. The application shall be made
to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department.
The application shall contain information regarding the proposed amount
of contribution to a program or the main street trust fund, and other
information required by the department to determine eligibility under
this act. The department shall rule on the application within forty-five days. Applications shall be approved on a first-come basis.
(2) The person must make the contribution described in the approved
application by the end of the calendar year in which the application is
approved to claim a credit allowed under section 904 of this act.
(3) The department shall not accept any applications before January
1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 (1) Subject to the limitations in this
chapter, a credit is allowed against the tax imposed by chapters 82.04
and 82.16 RCW for approved contributions that are made by a person to
a program or the main street trust fund.
(2) The credit allowed under this section is limited to an amount
equal to:
(a) Seventy-five percent of the approved contribution made by a
person to a program; or
(b) Fifty percent of the approved contribution made by a person to
the main street trust fund.
(3) The department may not approve credit with respect to a program
in a city or town with a population of one hundred ninety thousand
persons or more.
(4) The department shall keep a running total of all credits
approved under this chapter for each calendar year. The department
shall not approve any credits under this section that would cause the
total amount of approved credits statewide to exceed one million five
hundred thousand dollars in any calendar year.
(5) The total credits allowed under this chapter for contributions
made to each program may not exceed one hundred thousand dollars in a
calendar year. The total credits allowed under this chapter for a
person may not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars in a calendar
year.
(6) The credit may be claimed against any tax due under chapters
82.04 and 82.16 RCW only in the calendar year immediately following the
calendar year in which the credit was approved by the department and
the contribution was made to the program or the main street trust fund.
Credits may not be carried over to subsequent years. No refunds may be
granted for credits under this chapter.
(7) The total amount of the credit claimed in any calendar year by
a person may not exceed the lesser amount of the approved credit, or
seventy-five percent of the amount of the contribution that is made by
the person to a program and fifty percent of the amount of the
contribution that is made by the person to the main street trust fund,
in the prior calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 To claim a credit under this chapter, a
person must electronically file with the department all returns, forms,
and other information the department requires in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall provide information to the department to
administer this chapter, including a list of designated programs that
shall be updated as necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the
administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Area" means a geographic area within a local government that
is described by a closed perimeter boundary.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(4) "Local government" means a city, code city, or town.
(5) "Qualified levels of participation" means a local downtown or
neighborhood commercial district revitalization program that has been
designated by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 The Washington main street program is
created within the department. In order to implement the Washington
main street program, the department shall:
(1) Provide technical assistance to businesses, property owners,
organizations, and local governments undertaking a comprehensive
downtown or neighborhood commercial district revitalization initiative
and management strategy. Technical assistance may include, but is not
limited to, initial site evaluations and assessments, training for
local programs, training for local program staff, site visits and
assessments by technical specialists, local program design assistance
and evaluation, and continued local program on-site assistance;
(2) To the extent funds are made available, provide financial
assistance to local governments or local organizations to assist in
initial downtown or neighborhood commercial district revitalization
program start-up costs, specialized training, specific project
feasibility studies, market studies, and design assistance;
(3) Develop objective criteria for selecting recipients of
assistance under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, which shall
include priority for downtown or neighborhood commercial district
revitalization programs located in a rural county as defined in RCW
43.160.020(12), and provide for designation of local programs under
section 910 of this act;
(4) Operate the Washington main street program in accordance with
the plan developed by the department, in consultation with the
Washington main street advisory committee created under section 911 of
this act; and
(5) Consider other factors the department deems necessary for the
implementation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910 (1) The department shall adopt criteria
for the designation of local downtown or neighborhood commercial
district revitalization programs and official local main street
programs. In establishing the criteria, the department shall consider:
(a) The degree of interest and commitment to comprehensive downtown
or neighborhood commercial district revitalization and, where
applicable, historic preservation by both the public and private
sectors;
(b) The evidence of potential private sector investment in the
downtown or neighborhood commercial district;
(c) Where applicable, a downtown or neighborhood commercial
district with sufficient historic fabric to become a foundation for an
enhanced community image;
(d) The capacity of the organization to undertake a comprehensive
program and the financial commitment to implement a long-term downtown
or neighborhood commercial district revitalization program that
includes a commitment to employ a professional program manager and
maintain a sufficient operating budget;
(e) The department's existing downtown revitalization program's
tier system;
(f) The national main street center's criteria for designating
official main street cities; and
(g) Other factors the department deems necessary for the
designation of a local program.
(2) The department shall designate local downtown or neighborhood
commercial district revitalization programs and official local main
street programs. The programs shall be limited to three categories of
designation, one of which shall be the main street level.
(3) Section 902 of this act does not apply to any local downtown or
neighborhood commercial district revitalization program unless the
boundaries of the program have been identified and approved by the
department. The boundaries of a local downtown or neighborhood
commercial district revitalization program are typically defined using
the pedestrian core of a traditional commercial district.
(4) The department may not designate a local downtown or
neighborhood commercial district revitalization program or official
local main street program if the program is undertaken by a local
government with a population of one hundred ninety thousand persons or
more.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911 (1) The Washington main street advisory
committee is created within the department. The members of the
advisory committee are appointed by the director and consist of:
(a) The director, or the director's designee, who shall serve as
chair;
(b) Two representatives from local governments;
(c) Five representatives from existing local main street programs
or downtown and neighborhood commercial district programs including a
combination of staff, property owners, and business owners; and
(d) One representative from the Washington trust for historic
preservation.
(2) The department shall develop a plan for the Washington main
street program, in consultation with the Washington main street
advisory committee. The plan must describe:
(a) The objectives and strategies of the Washington main street
program;
(b) How the Washington main street program will be coordinated with
existing federal, state, local, and private sector business development
and historic preservation efforts;
(c) The means by which private investment will be solicited and
employed;
(d) The methods of selecting and providing assistance to
participating local programs; and
(e) A means to solicit private contributions for state and local
operations of the Washington main street program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 912 The Washington main street trust fund
account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from private
contributions, federal funds, legislative appropriations, and fees for
services, if levied, must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for the operation of the Washington
main street program.

PART X
HIGH TECHNOLOGY BUSINESSES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey under RCW 82.04.4452 by the due date was the result of
circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department shall
extend the time for filing the survey. Such extension shall be for a
period of thirty days from the date the department issues its written
notification to the taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under
this section. The department may grant additional extensions as it
deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey by the due date was the result of circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department shall be guided by
rules adopted by the department for the waiver or cancellation of
penalties when the underpayment or untimely payment of any tax was due
to circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file surveys under RCW 82.04.4452 must
electronically file with the department all surveys, returns, and any
other forms or information the department requires in an electronic
format as provided or approved by the department, unless the department
grants relief under subsection (2) of this section. As used in this
section, "returns" has the same meaning as "return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(2) Upon request, the department may relieve a person of the
obligations in subsection (1) of this section if the person's taxes
have been reduced a cumulative total of less than one thousand dollars
from all of the credits, exemptions, or preferential business and
occupation tax rates, for which a person is required to file an annual
survey under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.535, 82.32.545, 82.32.570,
82.32.560, 82.60.070, or 82.63.020.
(3) Persons who no longer qualify for relief under subsection (2)
of this section will be notified in writing by the department and must
comply with subsection (1) of this section by the date provided in the
notice.
(4) Any survey, return, or any other form or information required
to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format.

Sec. 1003 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2004 c 2 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2) The credit shall be calculated as follows:
(a) Determine the greater of the amount of qualified research and
development expenditures of a person or eighty percent of amounts
received by a person other than a public educational or research
institution in compensation for the conduct of qualified research and
development;
(b) Subtract 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount from the
amount determined under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Multiply the amount determined under (b) of this subsection by
((the rate provided in RCW 82.04.260(3) in the case of a nonprofit
corporation or nonprofit association engaging within this state in
research and development, and the person's average tax rate for every
other person)) the following:
(i) For the period June 10, 2004, through December 31, 2006, the
person's average tax rate for the calendar year for which the credit is
claimed;
(ii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2007, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 0.75 percent;
(iii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2008, the greater
of the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.0 percent;
(iv) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2009, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.25 percent;
(v) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2010, and thereafter,
1.50 percent.
For purposes of calculating the credit, if a person's reporting
period is less than annual, the person may use an estimated average tax
rate for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed by using the
person's average tax rate for each reporting period. A person who uses
an estimated average tax rate must make an adjustment to the total
credit claimed for the calendar year using the person's actual average
tax rate for the calendar year when the person files its last return
for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(3) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(4) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section, shall be ((taken)) claimed against
taxes due for the same calendar year in which the qualified research
and development expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any
credit assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section, for
each calendar year shall not exceed the lesser of two million dollars
or the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar
year.
(5) For any person ((taking)) claiming the credit, including any
credit assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section, whose
research and development spending during the calendar year in which the
credit is claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the person's taxable
amount during the same calendar year ((shall be liable for payment of
the additional)) or who is otherwise ineligible, the department shall
declare the taxes ((represented by the amount of)) against which the
credit ((taken together with)) was claimed to be immediately due and
payable. The department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on
the taxes against which the credit was claimed. Interest shall be
((due)) assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under
chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date the credit was ((taken
until the taxes are paid)) claimed, and shall accrue until the taxes
against which the credit was claimed are repaid. Any credit assigned
to a person under subsection (3) of this section that is disallowed as
a result of this section may be ((taken)) claimed by the person who
performed the qualified research and development subject to the
limitations set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(6) ((Any person claiming the credit, and any person assigning a
credit as provided in subsection (3) of this section, shall file an
annual report in a form prescribed by the department which shall
include the amount of the credit claimed, the qualified research and
development expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, and the taxable amount during the calendar year for which
the credit is claimed, and such additional information as the
department may prescribe. The report is due by March 31st following
any year a credit is taken.
(7)))(a) The legislature finds that accountability and
effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to
make policy choices regarding the best use of limited state resources
the legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) A person claiming the credit shall ((agree to)) file a complete
((an)) annual survey with the department. ((The annual survey is in
addition to the annual report due under subsection (6) of this
section.)) The survey is due by March 31st following any year in which
a credit is ((taken)) claimed. The department may extend the due date
for timely filing of annual surveys under this section as provided in
section 1001 of this act. The survey shall include the amount of the
tax credit ((taken)) claimed, the qualified research and development
expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit is claimed,
the taxable amount during the calendar year for which the credit is
claimed, the number of new products or research projects by general
classification, ((and)) the number of trademarks, patents, and
copyrights associated with the research and development activities for
which a credit was ((taken)) claimed, and whether the credit has been
assigned under subsection (3) of this section and who assigned the
credit. The survey shall also include the following information for
employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the tax credit program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d)(i) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax credit ((taken)) claimed, is deemed taxpayer
information under RCW 82.32.330 ((and is not disclosable)).
Information on the amount of tax credit ((taken)) claimed is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request, except ((that)) as provided in
this subsection (6)(d). If the amount of the tax credit as reported on
the survey is different than the amount actually claimed on the
taxpayer's tax returns or otherwise allowed by the department, the
amount actually claimed or allowed may be disclosed.
(ii) Persons ((taking)) for whom the actual amount of the tax
credit claimed on the taxpayer's returns or otherwise allowed by the
department is less than ten thousand dollars ((of credit)) during the
period covered by the survey may request the department to treat the
tax credit amount as confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(e) If a person fails to file a complete ((the)) annual survey
required under this subsection with the department by the due date or
any extension under section 1001 of this act, the person entitled to
the credit provided in subsection (2) of this section is not eligible
to ((take)) claim or assign the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section in the year the person failed to timely file a complete
((the)) survey.
(((8))) (7) The department shall use the information from
subsection (((7))) (6) of this section to prepare summary descriptive
statistics by category. No fewer than three taxpayers shall be
included in any category. The department shall report these statistics
to the legislature each year by September 1st.
(((9))) (8) The department shall use the information from
subsection (((7))) (6) of this section to study the tax credit program
authorized under this section. The department shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2009, and December 1, 2013. The reports
shall measure the effect of the program on job creation, the number of
jobs created for Washington residents, company growth, the introduction
of new products, the diversification of the state's economy, growth in
research and development investment, the movement of firms or the
consolidation of firms' operations into the state, and such other
factors as the department selects.
(((10))) (9) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Average tax rate" means a person's total tax liability under
this chapter for the ((reporting period)) calendar year for which the
credit is claimed divided by the taxpayer's total taxable ((income))
amount under this chapter for the ((reporting period)) calendar year
for which the credit is claimed.
(b) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development. Nor does
the term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(c) "Qualified research and development" shall have the same
meaning as in RCW 82.63.010.
(d) "Research and development spending" means qualified research
and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts paid to a
person other than a public educational or research institution to
conduct qualified research and development.
(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns ((during)) for the calendar year ((in)) for
which the credit is claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit
is allowed under RCW 82.04.440.
(((11))) (10) This section expires January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004 (1) A person who owes additional tax as
a result of section 1003(9)(a), chapter ..., Laws of 2005 (section
1003(9)(a) of this act) is liable for interest, but not penalties as
provided in RCW 82.32.090 (1) and (2), if the entire additional tax
liability is paid in full to the department of revenue before January
1, 2006. Interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the
date the credit was claimed, and shall accrue until the additional tax
is repaid.
(2) Persons who fail to repay the full amount of additional tax
owed as a result of section 1003(9)(a), chapter ..., Laws of 2005
(section 1003(9)(a) of this act) before January 1, 2006, are subject to
all applicable penalties and interest as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW
on the additional tax owing after December 31, 2005.
(3) This section expires December 31, 2010.

PART XI
EDUCATION FUNDING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101 A new section is added to chapter 83.100
RCW to read as follows:
The education legacy trust account is created in the state
treasury. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for deposit into the
student achievement fund and for expanding access to higher education
through funding for new enrollments and financial aid, and other
educational improvement efforts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1102 A new section is added to chapter 82.24
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the tax imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes set forth in RCW
82.24.020, there is imposed a tax in an amount equal to the rate of
thirty mills per cigarette.
(2) The revenue collected under this section shall be deposited as
follows:
(a) 21.7 percent shall be deposited into the health services
account.
(b) 2.8 percent shall be deposited into the general fund.
(c) 2.3 percent shall be deposited into the violence reduction and
drug enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520.
(d) 1.7 percent shall be deposited into the water quality account
under RCW 70.146.030.
(e) The remainder shall be deposited into the education legacy
trust account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1103 A new section is added to chapter 28A.505
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Total distributions from the student achievement fund to each
school district shall be based upon the average number of full-time
equivalent students in the school district during the previous school
year as reported to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction by August 31st of the previous school year.
(2) The allocation rate per full-time equivalent student shall be
three hundred dollars in the 2005-06 school year, three hundred
seventy-five dollars in the 2006-07 school year, and four hundred fifty
dollars in the 2007-08 school year. For each subsequent school year,
the amount allocated per full-time equivalent student shall be adjusted
for inflation as defined in RCW 43.135.025(8). These allocations per
full-time equivalent student from the student achievement fund shall be
supported from the following sources:
(a) Distributions from state property tax proceeds deposited into
the student achievement fund under RCW 84.52.068; and
(b) Distributions from the education legacy trust account created
in section 1101 of this act.
(3) Any funds deposited in the student achievement fund under RCW
43.135.045 shall be allocated to school districts on a one-time basis
using a rate per full-time equivalent student. These funds are
provided in addition to any amounts allocated in subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) The school district annual amounts as defined in subsection (2)
of this section shall be distributed on the monthly apportionment
schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250.

Sec. 1104 RCW 84.52.068 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 19 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A portion of the proceeds of the state property tax levy shall
be ((distributed to school districts in the amounts and in the manner))
deposited into the student achievement fund as provided in this
section.
(2)(a) The amount of the ((distribution to each school district))
deposit shall be based upon the average number of full-time equivalent
students in the school districts during the previous school year((, and
shall be calculated as follows:
(a) Out of taxes collected in calendar years 2001 through and
including 2003, an annual amount equal to one hundred forty dollars per
each full-time equivalent student in all school districts shall be
deposited in the student achievement fund to be distributed to each
school district based on one hundred forty dollars per full-time
equivalent student in the school district for each year beginning with
the school year 2001-2002 and through the end of the 2003-2004 school
year.
(b))) as reported to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction by August 31st of the previous school year.
(b) For the 2004-2005 through 2007-2008 school years, an annual
amount equal to two hundred fifty-four dollars per full-time equivalent
student in all school districts shall be deposited in the student
achievement fund ((to be distributed to each school district based on
two hundred fifty-four dollars per full-time equivalent student.
(c) For the 2005-2006 school year, an amount equal to three hundred
dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school districts shall
be deposited in the student achievement fund to be distributed to each
school district based on three hundred dollars per full-time equivalent
student.
(d) For the 2006-2007 school year, an amount equal to three hundred
seventy-five dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school
districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund to be
distributed to each school district based on three hundred seventy-five
dollars per full-time equivalent student.
(e) For the 2007-2008 school year, an amount equal to four hundred
fifty dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school districts
shall be deposited in the student achievement fund to be distributed to
each school district based on four hundred fifty dollars per full-time
equivalent student.
(f) Each subsequent year following the 2007-2008 school year, the
amount deposited and distributed shall be adjusted for inflation as
defined in RCW 43.135.025(8).
(3) For the 2001-2002 through 2003-2004 school years, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall verify the average
number of full-time equivalent students in each school district from
the previous school year to the state treasurer by August 1st of each
year.
(4) Beginning with the 2004-2005 school year:
(a) The annual distributions to each school district shall be based
on the average number of full-time equivalent students in the school
district from the previous school year as reported to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by August 31st of the previous
school year; and
(b))).
(c) For the 2008-2009 school year, an annual amount equal to two
hundred sixty-five dollars per full-time equivalent student in all
school districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(d) For the 2009-2010 school year, an annual amount equal to two
hundred seventy-seven dollars per full-time equivalent student in all
school districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(e) For the school year 2010-2011 and each year thereafter, an
annual amount equal to two hundred seventy-eight dollars per full-time
equivalent student in all school districts shall be deposited in the
student achievement fund.
(f) The school district annual amounts ((as defined in subsection
(2) of this section)) shall be ((distributed)) deposited based on the
monthly apportionment schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall notify the
department of the monthly amounts to be deposited into the student
achievement fund to meet the apportionment schedule ((distributions)).

Sec. 1105 RCW 43.84.092 and 2005 c . . . (SSB 5775) s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the emergency reserve fund, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health
services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the state higher education construction
account, the higher education construction account, the highway
infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
regional transportation investment district account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the small city
pavement and sidewalk account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University
of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express
account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be
distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 1106 RCW 43.84.092 and 2005 c . . . (SSB 5775) s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking
water assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the emergency reserve fund, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health
services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the state higher education construction
account, the higher education construction account, the highway
infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan
revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health
supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the
state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll
bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 1107 RCW 69.50.520 and 2004 c 276 s 912 are each amended to
read as follows:
The violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8),
66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(9)(a), 82.08.150(5),
82.24.020(2), section 1102(2)(c) of this act, 82.64.020, and section
420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989 shall be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for funding services and
programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of 1994
sp. sess., including state incarceration costs. Funds from the account
may also be appropriated to reimburse local governments for costs
associated with implementing criminal justice legislation including
chapter 338, Laws of 1997. During the 2003-2005 biennium, funds from
the account may also be used for costs associated with providing grants
to local governments in accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997,
funding drug offender treatment services in accordance with RCW
70.96A.350, maintenance and operating costs of the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs jail reporting system,
maintenance and operating costs of the juvenile rehabilitation
administration's client activity tracking system, civil indigent legal
representation, multijurisdictional narcotics task forces, and grants
to community networks under chapter 70.190 RCW by the family policy
council.

Sec. 1108 RCW 70.146.030 and 2004 c 277 s 909 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The water quality account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be used only in a manner
consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the account shall be
administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
tax receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027, section 1102(2)(d) of this
act, 82.26.025, and 82.32.390, principal and interest from the
repayment of any loans granted pursuant to this chapter, and any other
moneys appropriated to the account by the legislature.
(2) The department may use or permit the use of any moneys in the
account to make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants to
public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal, local,
or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for water
pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes of
assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water
pollution control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments
made by a public body to a service provider under a service agreement
entered into pursuant to RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this
chapter and for related administrative expenses. For the period July
1, 2003, to June 30, 2005, moneys in the account may be used to process
applications received by the department that seek to make changes to or
transfer existing water rights, for water conveyance projects, and for
grants and technical assistance to public bodies for watershed planning
under chapter 90.82 RCW. No more than three percent of the moneys
deposited in the account may be used by the department to pay for the
administration of the grant and loan program authorized by this
chapter.
(3) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 1997, the
department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of
moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31st of the odd-numbered year. The
report shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description,
and amount of the grant, loan, or both.

PART XII
ESTATES
Sec. 1201 RCW 83.100.--- and 2005 c ... (ESB 6096) s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of determining the Washington taxable estate,
a deduction is allowed from the federal taxable estate for ((the value
of qualified real property and the value of any tangible personal
property used primarily for farming purposes conducted on the qualified
real property, reduced by any amounts allowable as a deduction in
respect of the qualified real property and tangible personal property
under section 2053(a)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, if the decedent
was at the time of his or her death a citizen or resident of the United
States. For the purposes of determining the deduction amount, the
value of property is its value as used to determine the value of the
gross estate)):
(a) The value of qualified real property reduced by any amounts
allowable as a deduction in respect of the qualified real property and
tangible personal property under section 2053(a)(4) of the internal
revenue code, if the decedent was at the time of his or her death a
citizen or resident of the United States.
(b) The value of any tangible personal property used by the
decedent or a member of the decedent's family for a qualified use on
the date of the decedent's death, reduced by any amounts allowable as
a deduction in respect of the tangible personal property under section
2053(a)(4) of the internal revenue code, if all of the requirements of
subsection (10)(f)(i)(A) of this section are met and the decedent was
at the time of his or her death a citizen or resident of the United
States.
(c) The value of real property that is not deductible under (a) of
this subsection solely by reason of subsection (10)(f)(i)(B) of this
section, reduced by any amounts allowable as a deduction in respect of
the qualified real property and tangible personal property under
section 2053(a)(4) of the internal revenue code, if the requirements of
subsection (10)(f)(i)(C) of this section are met with respect to the
property and the decedent was at the time of his or her death a citizen
or resident of the United States.
(2) Property shall be considered to have been acquired from or to
have passed from the decedent if:
(a) The property is so considered under section 1014(b) of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(b) The property is acquired by any person from the estate; or
(c) The property is acquired by any person from a trust, to the
extent the property is includible in the gross estate of the decedent.
(3) If the decedent and the decedent's surviving spouse at any time
held qualified real property as community property, the interest of the
surviving spouse in the property shall be taken into account under this
section to the extent necessary to provide a result under this section
with respect to the property which is consistent with the result which
would have obtained under this section if the property had not been
community property.
(4) In the case of any qualified woodland, the value of trees
growing on the woodland may be deducted if otherwise qualified under
this section.
(5) If property is qualified real property with respect to a
decedent, hereinafter in this subsection referred to as the "first
decedent," and the property was acquired from or passed from the first
decedent to the surviving spouse of the first decedent, active
management of the farm by the surviving spouse shall be treated as
material participation by the surviving spouse in the operation of the
farm.
(6) Property owned indirectly by the decedent may qualify for a
deduction under this section if owned through an interest in a
corporation, partnership, or trust as the terms corporation,
partnership, or trust are used in section 2032A(g) of the Internal
Revenue Code. In order to qualify for a deduction under this
subsection, the interest, in addition to meeting the other tests for
qualification under this section, must qualify under section 6166(b)(1)
of the Internal Revenue Code as an interest in a closely held business
on the date of the decedent's death and for sufficient other time,
combined with periods of direct ownership, to equal at least five years
of the eight-year period preceding the death.
(7)(a) If, on the date of the decedent's death, the requirements of
subsection (10)(f)(i)(C)(II) of this section with respect to the
decedent for any property are not met, and the decedent (i) was
receiving old age benefits under Title II of the social security act
for a continuous period ending on such date, or (ii) was disabled for
a continuous period ending on this date, then subsection
(10)(f)(i)(C)(II) of this section shall be applied with respect to the
property by substituting "the date on which the longer of such
continuous periods began" for "the date of the decedent's death" in
subsection (10)(f)(i)(C) of this section.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, an individual shall
be disabled if the individual has a mental or physical impairment which
renders that individual unable to materially participate in the
operation of the farm.
(8) Property may be deducted under this section whether or not
special valuation is elected under section 2032A of the Internal
Revenue Code on the federal return. For the purposes of determining
the deduction under this section, the value of property is its value as
used to determine the value of the gross estate.
(9)(a) In the case of any qualified replacement property, any
period during which there was ownership, qualified use, or material
participation with respect to the replaced property by the decedent or
any member of the decedent's family shall be treated as a period during
which there was ownership, use, or material participation, as the case
may be, with respect to the qualified replacement property.
(b) Subsection (9)(a) of this section shall not apply to the extent
that the fair market value of the qualified replacement property, as of
the date of its acquisition, exceeds the fair market value of the
replaced property, as of the date of its disposition.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (9), the following
definitions apply:
(i) "Qualified replacement property" means any real property:
(A) Which is acquired in an exchange which qualifies under section
1031 of the Internal Revenue Code; or
(B) The acquisition of which results in the nonrecognition of gain
under section 1033 of the Internal Revenue Code.
The term "qualified replacement property" only includes property
which is used for the same qualified use as the replaced property was
being used before the exchange.
(ii) "Replaced property" means the property was:
(A) Transferred in the exchange which qualifies under section 1031
of the Internal Revenue Code; or
(B) Compulsorily or involuntarily converted within the meaning of
section 1033 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(10) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Active management" means the making of the management
decisions of a farm, other than the daily operating decisions.
(b) "Farm" includes stock, dairy, poultry, fruit, furbearing
animal, and truck farms; plantations; ranches; nurseries; ranges;
greenhouses or other similar structures used primarily for the raising
of agricultural or horticultural commodities; and orchards and
woodlands.
(c) "Farming purposes" means:
(i) Cultivating the soil or raising or harvesting any agricultural
or horticultural commodity, including the raising, shearing, feeding,
caring for, training, and management of animals on a farm;
(ii) Handling, drying, packing, grading, or storing on a farm any
agricultural or horticultural commodity in its unmanufactured state,
but only if the owner, tenant, or operator of the farm regularly
produces more than one-half of the commodity so treated; and
(iii)(A) The planting, cultivating, caring for, or cutting of
trees; or
(B) The preparation, other than milling, of trees for market.
(d) "Member of the family" means, with respect to any individual,
only:
(i) An ancestor of the individual;
(ii) The spouse of the individual;
(iii) A lineal descendant of the individual, of the individual's
spouse, or of a parent of the individual; or
(iv) The spouse of any lineal descendant described in (d)(iii) of
this subsection.
For the purposes of this subsection (10)(d), a legally adopted
child of an individual shall be treated as the child of such individual
by blood.
(e) "Qualified heir" means, with respect to any property, a member
of the decedent's family who acquired property, or to whom property
passed, from the decedent.
(f)(i) "Qualified real property" means real property which was
acquired from or passed from the decedent to a qualified heir of the
decedent and which, on the date of the decedent's death, was being used
for a qualified use by the decedent or a member of the decedent's
family, but only if:
(A) Fifty percent or more of the adjusted value of the gross estate
consists of the adjusted value of real or personal property which:
(I) On the date of the decedent's death, was being used for a
qualified use by the decedent or a member of the decedent's family; and
(II) Was acquired from or passed from the decedent to a qualified
heir of the decedent;
(B) Twenty-five percent or more of the adjusted value of the gross
estate consists of the adjusted value of real property which meets the
requirements of (f)(i)(A)(II) and (f)(i)(C) of this subsection; and
(C) During the eight-year period ending on the date of the
decedent's death there have been periods aggregating five years or more
during which:
(I) The real property was owned by the decedent or a member of the
decedent's family and used for a qualified use by the decedent or a
member of the decedent's family; and
(II) There was material participation by the decedent or a member
of the decedent's family in the operation of the farm. For the
purposes of this subsection (f)(i)(C)(II), material participation shall
be determined in a manner similar to the manner used for purposes of
section 1402(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection, the term "adjusted value"
means:
(A) In the case of the gross estate, the value of the gross estate,
determined without regard to any special valuation under section 2032A
of the Internal Revenue Code, reduced by any amounts allowable as a
deduction under section 2053(a)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code; or
(B) In the case of any real or personal property, the value of the
property for purposes of chapter 11 of the Internal Revenue Code,
determined without regard to any special valuation under section 2032A
of the Internal Revenue Code, reduced by any amounts allowable as a
deduction in respect of such property under section 2053(a)(4) of the
Internal Revenue Code.
(g) "Qualified use" means the property is used as a farm for
farming purposes. In the case of real property which meets the
requirements of (f)(i)(C) of this subsection, residential buildings and
related improvements on the real property occupied on a regular basis
by the owner or lessee of the real property or by persons employed by
the owner or lessee for the purpose of operating or maintaining the
real property, and roads, buildings, and other structures and
improvements functionally related to the qualified use shall be treated
as real property devoted to the qualified use. For tangible personal
property eligible for a deduction under subsection (1)(b) of this
section, "qualified use" means the property is used primarily for
farming purposes on a farm.
(h) "Qualified woodland" means any real property which:
(i) Is used in timber operations; and
(ii) Is an identifiable area of land such as an acre or other area
for which records are normally maintained in conducting timber
operations.
(i) "Timber operations" means:
(i) The planting, cultivating, caring for, or cutting of trees; or
(ii) The preparation, other than milling, of trees for market.

PART XIII
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1301 Part headings used in this act are not
any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1302 Except for sections 110(5), 114 through
116, 401 through 403, 501, 701, 1001 through 1004, 1106, 1201, 1311,
and 1312 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1303 Sections 110(5), 114 through 116, 1001,
1003, 1004, 1201, 1311, and 1312 of this act are necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and take effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1304 Sections 401 through 403 of this act take
effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1305 Sections 501 and 1002 of this act take
effect January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1306 Section 701 of this act takes effect July
1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1307 Sections 901 and 908 through 912 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1308 Sections 902 through 907 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1309 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1310 Sections 901 through 912 of this act may
be known and cited as the Washington main street act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1311 Section 1003 of this act applies
retroactively to June 10, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1312 Section 1001 of this act applies
retroactively to annual surveys required under RCW 82.04.4452 that are
due after December 31, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1313 Section 1107 of this act takes effect
July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1314 Section 1106 of this act expires July 1,
2006.

--- END ---