BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
this title. Except as provided in this section, any term used in this
title has the same meaning as when used in a comparable context in the
internal revenue code.
(1) "Department" means the state department of revenue.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department.
(3) "Individual" means a natural person.
(4) "Internal revenue code" means the United States internal
revenue code of 1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2005.
(5) "Taxable income" means income received from:
(a) Interest from bonds, notes, money at interest, and from all
debts due the person to be taxed, except interest from notes or bonds
of this state and notes or bonds of any political subdivision of this
state;
(b) Dividends, other than stock dividends paid in new stock of the
company issuing the same, on shares in all corporations and joint stock
companies organized under the laws of any state, territory, or nation;
(c) Dividends, other than stock dividends paid in new stock of the
partnership, limited liability company, association, or trust issuing
the same, on shares in partnerships, limited liability companies,
associations, or trusts if the beneficial interest is represented by
transferable shares;
(d) Dividends, other than that portion of a dividend declared by
corporations to be a return of capital and considered by the federal
internal revenue service to be such, the exemption of which is
permitted by section 104 of this act.
(6) "Taxable year" means the taxpayer's taxable year as defined
under the internal revenue code.
(7) "Taxpayer" means a person receiving income subject to tax under
this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 UNEARNED INCOME TAX IMPOSED. A one
percent tax is imposed on the taxable income of:
(1) Individuals; and
(2) Partnerships, limited liability companies, associations, and
trusts, the beneficial interest in which is not represented by
transferable shares, whose gross interest and dividend income from all
sources exceeds three thousand dollars during the taxable year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 PERSONAL EXEMPTIONS. The following
exemptions may be deducted from taxable income:
(1) Three thousand dollars for each individual taxpayer;
(2) Three thousand dollars for each individual taxpayer's spouse if
the taxpayer is entitled to an exemption for the spouse under section
151(b) of the internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 EXEMPT INCOME. The tax imposed under this
title does not apply to:
(1) Interest and dividend income received by an employee benefit
plan as defined by the employee retirement income security act of 1974,
29 U.S.C. Sec 1002(3), or any successor act enacted for the purpose of
regulating employee benefit plans, or an individual retirement
arrangement, keogh plan, or any other arrangement pursuant to which
payment of federal tax on the income thereof and of the plan sponsors,
participants, and beneficiaries is deferred; either to the plan or
arrangement or to its sponsors, participants, or beneficiaries,
irrespective of when or whether all or any portion of such income is
accumulated or expended for the benefit of, or distributed in any form
or manner to, such sponsors, participants, or beneficiaries;
(2) Any amount received from the sale, exchange, or transfer of
either a share of corporate stock or any other transferable share under
this title, whether by way of liquidation, redemption, or otherwise,
and irrespective of the identity of the parties to the sale, exchange,
or transfer;
(3) Any distribution of capital, whether in liquidation or
otherwise, but accumulated profits shall not be regarded as capital;
(4) Any amount received and used by any educational, religious, or
charitable organization incorporated or organized in this state, for
the purposes for which it is established as long as none of the income
or profits of the organization is divided among stockholders or members
or is used for purposes other than those for which it is established,
or which is received by any trustee for the use of the state or any of
its political subdivisions, or for the use of the organization for
these purposes;
(5) Income accumulated in an employee benefit plan, as defined by
the employment retirement income security act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. Sec.
1002(3), as amended, or in a trust comprising a part of such a plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 APPLICATION OF TAX IN CERTAIN
CIRCUMSTANCES. (1) For the purposes of the tax imposed under this
title, any securities or property of the classes designated herein
producing taxable income, held in pledge, or on margin, or otherwise as
security for a debt of the owner, whether standing in the name of the
owner or of any other person, shall be deemed the property of the
owner, and the income arising therefrom shall be included in his or her
total taxable income.
(2) The estates of deceased persons who last lived in this state
shall be subject to tax under this title upon all taxable income
received by such persons during their lifetime, which has not already
been taxed. The income received by estates during administration shall
be taxable to the estate, except the proportion that equals the
proportion of the estate to be distributed to nontaxable persons or
organizations.
(3) The income received by estates held by trustees, any one of
whom is an inhabitant of this state, or has derived his or her
appointment from a court of this state, shall be subject to the taxes
imposed by this title, except that income received by estates held by
trustees treated as grantor trusts under section 671 of the United
States internal revenue code shall be included in the return of their
owners, to the extent that the persons to whom the income from the
trust is payable, or for whose benefit it is accumulated, are
inhabitants of this state.
(4) Income accumulated in trust for the benefit of unborn or
unascertained persons shall be taxed as if accumulated for the benefit
of inhabitants of this state.
(5) If an inhabitant of this state receives income from one or more
trustees, none of whom is an inhabitant of this state or has derived
his or her appointment from a court of this state, the income is
subject to the taxes imposed under this title if it would be taxable to
the inhabitant if received by him or her from its source.
(6) Subsections (2) through (5) of this section apply to guardians,
conservators, trustees in bankruptcy, receivers, and assignees for the
benefit of creditors, as applicable, to the taxable income received by
them and to their beneficiaries, and to corporations acting as trustees
or in any other fiduciary capacity.
(7) Partnerships and limited liability companies having a usual
place of business in this state, any member of which is an inhabitant
thereof, shall be subject to taxes imposed under this title. If any of
the members of the partnership or limited liability company are not
inhabitants of this state only the income that is proportionate to the
aggregate interest of the partners or members who are inhabitants of
this state in the profits of the partnership or limited liability
company is subject to tax. .
(8) The tax shall be assessed on such a partnership or limited
liability company by the name under which it does business, and the
partners or members shall not be taxed with respect to the taxable
income derived by them from such a partnership or limited liability
company.
(9) An inhabitant of this state who is a member of a partnership or
limited liability company having no usual place of business in this
state, who receives income from such partnership or limited liability
company derived from such a source that it would be taxable if received
directly from such source by such partner or member, shall as to such
income be subject to the taxes imposed by this title.
(10) Subsections (7) through (9) of this section apply, so far as
apt, to associations and trusts, but not to partnerships, limited
liability companies, associations, and trusts, the beneficial interest
in which is represented by transferable shares.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 TAX RETURNS FOR FRACTIONAL YEAR. If the
first taxable year of any taxpayer with respect to which a tax is
imposed by this title ends before December 31st of the calendar year in
which this title becomes effective, referred to in this section as a
fractional taxable year, the taxable income for the fractional taxable
year shall be the taxpayer's taxable income for the entire taxable
year, adjusted by one of the following methods, at the taxpayer's
election:
(1) The taxable income shall be multiplied by a fraction. The
numerator of the fraction is the number of days in the fractional
taxable year. The denominator of the fraction is the number of days in
the entire taxable year.
(2) The taxable income shall be adjusted, in accordance with rules
of the department, so as to include only such income and be reduced
only by such deductions as can be clearly determined from the permanent
records of the taxpayer to be attributable to the fractional taxable
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 ESTIMATION AGREEMENTS. The department may
reasonably estimate the items of business or nonbusiness income of a
taxpayer having an office within the state and one or more other states
or foreign countries that may be apportioned or allocated to the state
and may enter into estimation agreements with such taxpayers for the
determination of their liability for the tax imposed by this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 ESTIMATED TAX IMPOSED--DUE DATE OF
ESTIMATED TAXES--AMOUNT OF ESTIMATED TAX--UNDERPAYMENT PENALTY. (1)
Each taxpayer who is required by the internal revenue code to make
payment of estimated taxes shall pay to the department on forms
prescribed by the department the estimated taxes due under this title.
(2) The provisions of the internal revenue code relating to the
determination of reporting periods and due dates of payments of
estimated tax apply to the estimated tax payments due under this
section.
(3) The amount of the estimated tax shall be the annualized tax
divided by the number of months in the reporting period. No estimated
tax shall be due if the annualized tax is less than five hundred
dollars. The provisions of RCW 82.32.050 and 82.32.090 shall apply to
underpayments of estimated tax but shall not apply to underpayments if
the tax remitted to the department under sections 101 through 117 of
this act is either ninety percent of the tax shown on the return or one
hundred percent of the tax shown on the previous year's tax return.
(4) For purposes of this section, the annualized tax is the
taxpayer's projected tax liability for the taxable year as computed
under section 6654 of the internal revenue code and the regulations
thereunder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 METHOD OF ACCOUNTING. (1) A taxpayer's
method of accounting for purposes of the tax imposed under this title
shall be the same as the taxpayer's method of accounting for federal
income tax purposes. If no method of accounting has been regularly
used by a taxpayer for federal income tax purposes or if the method
used does not clearly reflect income, tax due under this title shall be
computed by a method of accounting that in the opinion of the
department fairly reflects income.
(2) If a person's method of accounting is changed for federal
income tax purposes, it shall be similarly changed for purposes of this
title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 PERSONS REQUIRED TO FILE RETURNS. (1)
All taxpayers shall file with the department, on forms prescribed by
the department, an income tax return for each taxable year. An
individual owing no tax for a taxable year is not required to file a
return for that year. Each person required to file a return under this
title shall, without assessment, notice, or demand, pay any tax due
thereon to the department on or before the date fixed for the filing of
the return.
(2) The department may by rule require that certain taxpayers file,
on forms prescribed by the department, informational returns for any
period.
(3) If an adjustment to a taxpayer's federal return is made by the
taxpayer or the internal revenue service, and the adjustment affects
tax liability under this title, the taxpayer shall, within ninety days
of the final determination of the adjustment by the internal revenue
service or within thirty days of the filing of a federal return
adjusted by the taxpayer, file with the department on forms prescribed
by the department, a corrected return reflecting the adjustments as
finally determined. The taxpayer shall pay any additional tax due
resulting from the finally determined internal revenue service
adjustment or a taxpayer adjustment without notice and assessment. The
period of limitation for the collection of the additional tax,
interest, and penalty due as a result of an adjustment by the taxpayer
or a finally determined internal revenue service adjustment shall begin
at the later of thirty days following the final determination of the
adjustment or the date of the filing of the corrected return.
(4) Every small business corporation within this state, the
stockholders of which have been elected, or elect, to report their
share of the corporation's taxable income upon their individual federal
income tax returns, pursuant to federal tax laws and regulations, shall
annually on or before May 1st, file a list of the names and addresses
of all stockholders during the preceding year together with the amount
of dividends paid to each with the department. Provided, however, the
information report shall not be filed in any year that no such
dividends are paid and provided further that stockholders not legally
residents in this state need not be listed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 DUE DATE FOR FILING A RETURN--EXTENSIONS--INTEREST AND PENALTIES. The due date of a return required to be filed
with the department shall be the due date of the federal income tax
return or informational return for federal income tax purposes. The
department has the authority to grant extensions of times by which
returns required to be filed by this title may be submitted. The
department also has the authority to grant extensions of time to pay
tax with regard to taxes imposed by this title. Interest at the rate
as specified in RCW 82.32.050 shall accrue during any extension period
and the interest and penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW shall
apply to late payments and deficiencies. Notwithstanding the
limitation of RCW 82.32.090, in the case of the late filing of an
informational return, there shall be imposed a penalty the amount of
which shall be established by the department by rule. The penalty
shall not exceed fifty dollars per month for a maximum of ten months.
RCW 82.32.105 shall apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 JOINT RETURN. (1) If the federal income
tax liabilities of both spouses are determined on a joint federal
return for the taxable year, they shall file a joint return under this
title.
(2) If neither spouse is required to file a federal income tax
return for the taxable year, a joint return shall be filed under this
title under the same conditions under which a joint return may be filed
for purposes of the federal income tax.
(3) If the federal income tax liability of either spouse is
determined on a separate federal return for the taxable year, they
shall file separate returns under this title.
(4) In any case in which a joint return is filed under this
section, the liability of the husband and wife is joint and several,
unless the spouse is relieved of liability under section 6013 of the
internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 RECORDS--RETURNS. (1) Every taxpayer and
every person required to deduct and withhold the tax imposed under this
title shall keep records, render statements, make returns, file
reports, and perform other acts as the department requires by rule.
Each return shall be made under penalty of perjury and on forms
prescribed by the department. The department may require other
statements and reports be made under penalty of perjury and on forms
prescribed by the department. The department may require any taxpayer
and any person required to deduct and withhold the tax imposed under
this title to furnish to the department a correct copy of any return or
document that the taxpayer has filed with the internal revenue service
or received from the internal revenue service.
(2) All books and records and other papers and documents required
to be kept under this title are subject to inspection by the department
at all times during business hours of the day.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 PROVISIONS OF INTERNAL REVENUE CODE
CONTROL. (1) To the extent possible without being inconsistent with
this title, all of the provisions of the internal revenue code apply to
the taxes imposed under this title.
(2) The department by rule may provide modifications and exceptions
to the provisions in subsection (1) of this section, if reasonably
necessary to facilitate the prompt, efficient, and equitable collection
of tax under this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS. Chapter 82.32
RCW applies to the taxes imposed in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 RULES. The department may adopt rules
under chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration and enforcement of this
title. The rules, to the extent possible without being inconsistent
with this title, shall follow the internal revenue code and the
regulations and rulings of the United States department of the treasury
with respect to the federal income tax. The department may adopt as a
part of these rules any portions of the internal revenue code and
treasury department regulations and rulings, in whole or in part.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 CRIMES. (1) Any person who knowingly
attempts to evade the tax imposed under this title or payment thereof
is guilty of a class C felony as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2) Any person required to collect tax imposed under this title who
knowingly fails to collect, truthfully account for, or pay over the tax
is guilty of a class C felony as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) Any person who knowingly fails to pay tax, pay estimated tax,
make returns, keep records, or supply information, as required under
this title, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor as provided in chapter
9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 118 RCW 82.03.130 and 1998 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall have jurisdiction to decide the following types
of appeals:
(a) Appeals taken pursuant to RCW 82.03.190.
(b) Appeals from a county board of equalization pursuant to RCW
84.08.130.
(c) Appeals by an assessor or landowner from an order of the
director of revenue made pursuant to RCW 84.08.010 and 84.08.060, if
filed with the board of tax appeals within thirty days after the
mailing of the order, the right to such an appeal being hereby
established.
(d) Appeals by an assessor or owner of an intercounty public
utility or private car company from determinations by the director of
revenue of equalized assessed valuation of property and the
apportionment thereof to a county made pursuant to chapter 84.12 and
84.16 RCW, if filed with the board of tax appeals within thirty days
after mailing of the determination, the right to such appeal being
hereby established.
(e) Appeals by an assessor, landowner, or owner of an intercounty
public utility or private car company from a determination of any
county indicated ratio for such county compiled by the department of
revenue pursuant to RCW 84.48.075: PROVIDED, That
(i) Said appeal be filed after review of the ratio under RCW
84.48.075(3) and not later than fifteen days after the mailing of the
certification; and
(ii) The hearing before the board shall be expeditiously held in
accordance with rules prescribed by the board and shall take precedence
over all matters of the same character.
(f) Appeals from the decisions of sale price of second class
shorelands on navigable lakes by the department of natural resources
pursuant to RCW 79.94.210.
(g) Appeals from urban redevelopment property tax apportionment
district proposals established by governmental ordinances pursuant to
RCW 39.88.060.
(h) Appeals from interest rates as determined by the department of
revenue for use in valuing farmland under current use assessment
pursuant to RCW 84.34.065.
(i) Appeals from revisions to stumpage value tables used to
determine value by the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.33.091.
(j) Appeals from denial of tax exemption application by the
department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.36.850.
(k) Appeals pursuant to RCW 84.40.038(3).
(l) Appeals relating to income tax deficiencies and refunds
including penalties and interest under Title 82A RCW.
(2) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law hereafter, the
provisions of RCW 1.12.070 shall apply to all notices of appeal filed
with the board of tax appeals.

Sec. 119 RCW 82.03.140 and 2000 c 103 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In all appeals over which the board has jurisdiction under RCW
82.03.130, a party taking an appeal may elect either a formal or an
informal hearing, such election to be made according to rules of
practice and procedure to be promulgated by the board: PROVIDED, That
nothing shall prevent the assessor or taxpayer, as a party to an appeal
pursuant to RCW 84.08.130, within twenty days from the date of the
receipt of the notice of appeal, from filing with the clerk of the
board notice of intention that the hearing be a formal one: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall be construed to modify the
provisions of RCW 82.03.190: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That upon an appeal
under RCW 82.03.130(1) (e) or (l), the director of revenue may, within
ten days from the date of its receipt of the notice of appeal, file
with the clerk of the board notice of its ((intention that the hearing
be held pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW)) election of a formal hearing.
In the event that appeals are taken from the same decision, order, or
determination, as the case may be, by different parties and only one of
such parties elects a formal hearing, a formal hearing shall be
granted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 CAPTIONS. Captions as used in this act
constitute no part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of
this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 This act takes effect January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 CODIFICATION. Sections 101 through 117
and 120 through 122 of this act constitute a new title, to be codified
as Title 82A RCW.

--- END ---