BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.72.900 and 2003 c 259 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The health services account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Subject
to the transfers described in subsection (3) of this section, moneys in
the account may be expended only for maintaining and expanding health
services access for low-income residents, maintaining and expanding the
public health system, maintaining and improving the capacity of the
health care system, containing health care costs, and the regulation,
planning, and administering of the health care system.
(2) Funds deposited into the health services account under RCW
82.24.028 and 82.26.028 shall be used solely as follows:
(a) Five million dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July
1, 2002, and five million dollars for the state fiscal year beginning
July 1, 2003, shall be appropriated by the legislature for programs
that effectively improve the health of low-income persons, including
efforts to reduce diseases and illnesses that harm low-income persons.
The department of health shall submit a report to the legislature on
March 1, 2002, evaluating the cost-effectiveness of programs that
improve the health of low-income persons and address diseases and
illnesses that disproportionately affect low-income persons, and making
recommendations to the legislature on which of these programs could
most effectively utilize the funds appropriated under this subsection.
(b) Ten percent of the funds deposited into the health services
account under RCW 82.24.028 and 82.26.028 remaining after the
appropriation under (a) of this subsection shall be transferred no less
frequently than annually by the treasurer to the tobacco prevention and
control account established by RCW 43.79.480. The funds transferred
shall be used exclusively for implementation of the Washington state
tobacco prevention and control plan and shall be used only to
supplement, and not supplant, funds in the tobacco prevention and
control account as of January 1, 2001, however, these funds may be used
to replace funds appropriated by the legislature for further
implementation of the Washington state tobacco prevention and control
plan for the biennium beginning July 1, 2001. For each state fiscal
year beginning on and after July 1, 2002, the legislature shall
appropriate no less than twenty-six million two hundred forty thousand
dollars from the tobacco prevention and control account for
implementation of the Washington state tobacco prevention and control
plan.
(c) Because of its demonstrated effectiveness in improving the
health of low-income persons and addressing illnesses and diseases that
harm low-income persons, the remainder of the funds deposited into the
health services account under RCW 82.24.028 and 82.26.028 shall be
appropriated solely for Washington basic health plan enrollment as
provided in chapter 70.47 RCW. Funds appropriated under this
subsection may be used to support outreach and enrollment activities
only to the extent necessary to achieve the enrollment goals described
in this section.
(3) Prior to expenditure for the purposes described in subsection
(2) of this section, funds deposited into the health services account
under RCW 82.24.028 and 82.26.028 shall first be transferred to the
following accounts to ensure the continued availability of previously
dedicated revenues for certain existing programs:
(a) To the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520, two million two hundred forty-nine thousand five hundred
dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001, four million
two hundred forty-eight thousand dollars for the state fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2002, seven million seven hundred eighty-nine
thousand dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2003, six million
nine hundred thirty-two thousand dollars for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2005, and six million nine hundred thirty-two thousand dollars
for each biennium thereafter, as required by RCW 82.24.020(2);
(b) To the health services account under this section, nine million
seventy-seven thousand dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July
1, 2001, seventeen million one hundred eighty-eight thousand dollars
for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002, thirty-one million
seven hundred fifty-five thousand dollars for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2003, twenty-eight million six hundred twenty-two thousand
dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2005, and twenty-eight
million six hundred twenty-two thousand dollars for each biennium
thereafter, as required by RCW 82.24.020(3); and
(c) To the water quality account under RCW 70.146.030, two million
two hundred three thousand five hundred dollars for the state fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2001, four million two hundred forty-four
thousand dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002,
eight million one hundred eighty-two thousand dollars for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2003, seven million eight hundred eighty-five
thousand dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2005, and seven
million eight hundred eighty-five thousand dollars for each biennium
thereafter, as required by RCW 82.24.027(2)(a).
((During the 2001-2003 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the health services account such amounts as reflect the
excess fund balance of the account.)) The legislature may transfer
moneys from the health services account to the state general fund for
purposes consistent with this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.520 and 2004 c 276 s 912 are each amended to
read as follows:
The violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8),
66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(9)(a), 82.08.150(5),
82.24.020(2), 82.64.020, and section 420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989
shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for funding services and programs under chapter 271, Laws
of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess., including state
incarceration costs. Funds from the account may also be appropriated
to reimburse local governments for costs associated with implementing
criminal justice legislation including chapter 338, Laws of 1997.
((During the 2003-2005 biennium, funds from the account may also be
used for costs associated with providing grants to local governments in
accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997, funding drug offender
treatment services in accordance with RCW 70.96A.350, maintenance and
operating costs of the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs jail reporting system, maintenance and operating costs of the
juvenile rehabilitation administration's client activity tracking
system, civil indigent legal representation, multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces, and grants to community networks under chapter
70.190 RCW by the family policy council.)) The legislature may transfer
to the state general fund such amounts as represent the excess balance
of the account.

--- END ---