BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95L.005 and 1993 c 118 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(1) Phosphorus loading of surface waters can stimulate the growth
of weeds and algae, and that such growth can have adverse
environmental, health, and aesthetic effects;
(2) Household detergents contribute to phosphorus loading, and that
a limit on detergents containing phosphorus can significantly reduce
the discharge of phosphorus into the state's surface and ground waters;
(3) Household detergents containing no or very low phosphorus are
readily available and that over thirty percent of the United States
population lives in areas with a ban on detergents containing
phosphorus; ((and))
(4) Phosphorus limits on household detergents can significantly
reduce treatment costs at those sewage treatment facilities that remove
phosphorus from the waste stream; and
(5) While significant reductions of phosphorus from laundry
detergent have been accomplished, similar progress in reducing
phosphorus contributions from dishwashing detergents has not been
achieved.
It is therefore the intent of the legislature to impose a statewide
limit on the phosphorus content of household detergents.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95L.020 and 1993 c 118 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1994, a person may not sell or distribute for
sale a laundry detergent that contains 0.5 percent or more phosphorus
by weight.
(2) After July 1, ((1994)) 2008, a person may not sell or
distribute for sale a dishwashing detergent that contains ((8.7)) 0.5
percent or more phosphorous by weight.
(3) This section does not apply to the sale or distribution of
detergents for commercial and industrial uses.

--- END ---