BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is a
large, unmet, and increasing need for affordable housing in the urban
and rural areas of Washington. The legislature finds also that while
this need goes unmet, many households in single-family residential
areas are becoming smaller as people live longer, remain unmarried
longer, and have fewer children. Additionally, numerous household
budgets are under financial pressure, and many senior property owners
are having increasing difficulties paying for health care services,
home maintenance, and other costs. The result of these trends is that
considerable amounts of underutilized space exist within single-family
houses and on single-family lots, while financial pressures are
simultaneously diminishing qualities of life for many people.
(2) The legislature further finds that the growth management act
requires increased housing densities in single-family areas, and that
the rising costs accommodating growth, coupled with insufficient
revenues for needed public facilities, make infill within developed
areas an economic necessity for local governments. The legislature
therefore finds that the expanded creation and use of accessory
dwelling units has a significant potential to provide much-needed
affordable rental housing, while also providing benefits to existing
property owners and their communities.
(3) The legislature declares that it is the intent of this act to
examine methods to: (a) Increase the supply of affordable housing
without government subsidies or providing additional public facilities;
(b) identify regulatory or other barriers that thwart the potential
benefits of accessory dwelling units; (c) encourage moderately priced
rental housing and housing opportunities in single-family residential
areas for people in various life-cycle stages; and (d) provide
homeowners with options to utilize their property for extra income, in
close proximity with family members, caregivers, and persons offering
companionship.
(4) The legislature therefore convenes a joint select committee to
examine ways of increasing affordable rental housing through accessory
dwelling units.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) The joint select committee on
accessory dwelling units is established, with members as provided in
this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(b) In addition, the department of community, trade, and economic
development shall cooperate with the committee and maintain a liaison
representative, who is a nonvoting member. The department shall
cooperate with the committee and provide information as the chair may
reasonably request.
(c) The committee shall choose its chair from among its membership.
The legislator appointed from the majority caucus of the house of
representatives shall convene the initial meeting of the committee.
(2) The committee shall examine ways of increasing affordable
rental housing through accessory dwelling units by:
(a) Reviewing accessory dwelling unit ordinances adopted by
jurisdictions planning under RCW 36.70A.040;
(b) Considering policies pertaining to the siting of accessory
dwelling units, including policies permitting the units to be sited on
all parcels where single-family residences are allowed; and
(c) Considering policies pertaining to occupant requirements,
allowable floor areas, off-street parking, processing related permits,
unit registration, and applicable state and local codes.
(3) The committee, when appropriate, may consult with individuals
from the public and private sectors or ask those individuals to
establish one or more advisory committees. The committee, at a
minimum, must consult with individuals representing cities, counties,
low-income housing advocates, developers, realtors, planners,
environmental conservation interests, and the general public. Members
of advisory committees are not entitled to expense reimbursement.
(4) Staff support for the committee is provided by senate committee
services and the house of representatives office of program research.
(5) Legislative members of the committee shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(6) The expenses of the committee are paid jointly by the senate
and the house of representatives. Committee expenditures are subject
to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the
house of representatives executive rules committee, or their successor
committees.
(7) The committee shall report its findings and recommendations to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007.
(8) This section expires December 1, 2007.

--- END ---