BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that protecting the
public's health is essential and that the threat of a pandemic outbreak
of a disease is ongoing and growing. The legislature also finds that
the public health system as defined in RCW 43.70.575 is essential to
fulfilling the state's responsibility to protect the health and safety
of its citizens. The legislature further finds that local public
health departments lack adequate resources even as their duties
increase. Rather than risk catastrophic loss of life, the legislature
further finds that local public health departments must immediately be
given the resources to effectively implement the specific public health
improvement standards concerning threats to our drinking water and food
supplies, communicable disease, and other first-responder duties unique
to local public health departments, pursuant to the requirements in RCW
43.70.520.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The public health improvement account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from strategic contribution payments received
by the state of Washington in accordance with the settlement of the
state's legal action against tobacco product manufacturers shall be
deposited in the account. The legislature may make additional
appropriations to the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used to fund
programs and activities undertaken by the department of health, county
public health departments, and public health districts to achieve the
local public health standards adopted in the public health services
improvement plan pursuant to RCW 43.70.520(8).

Sec. 3 RCW 43.79.480 and 2002 c 365 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Moneys received by the state of Washington in accordance with
the settlement of the state's legal action against tobacco product
manufacturers, exclusive of costs and attorneys' fees, shall be
deposited in the tobacco settlement account created in this section
except as these moneys are sold or assigned under chapter 43.340 RCW.
(2) The tobacco settlement account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the tobacco settlement account may only be
transferred to the health services account for the purposes set forth
in RCW 43.72.900, ((and)) to the tobacco prevention and control account
for purposes set forth in this section, and to the public health
improvement account established under section 2 of this act.
(3) The tobacco prevention and control account is created in the
state treasury. The source of revenue for this account is moneys
transferred to the account from the tobacco settlement account,
investment earnings, donations to the account, and other revenues as
directed by law. Expenditures from the account are subject to
appropriation.

--- END ---