BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
clarify that the state auditor and the joint legislative audit and
review committee are included within the exception to the provisions
prohibiting disclosure of department of social and health services
information. The legislature finds that though these entities were
intended to be included within the exception, a clarification is
necessary to ensure that the state auditor and the joint legislative
audit and review committee have full access to the records of the
department of social and health services.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.04.060 and 1987 c 435 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the protection of applicants and recipients, the department and
the county offices and their respective officers and employees are
prohibited, except as hereinafter provided, from disclosing the
contents of any records, files, papers and communications, except for
purposes directly connected with the administration of the programs of
this title. In any judicial proceeding, except such proceeding as is
directly concerned with the administration of these programs, such
records, files, papers and communications, and their contents, shall be
deemed privileged communications and except for the right of any
individual to inquire of the office whether a named individual is a
recipient of welfare assistance and such person shall be entitled to an
affirmative or negative answer. However, upon written request of a
parent who has been awarded visitation rights in an action for divorce
or separation or any parent with legal custody of the child, the
department shall disclose to him or her the last known address and
location of his or her natural or adopted children. The secretary
shall adopt rules which establish procedures for disclosing the address
of the children and providing, when appropriate, for prior notice to
the custodian of the children. The notice shall state that a request
for disclosure has been received and will be complied with by the
department unless the department receives a copy of a court order which
enjoins the disclosure of the information or restricts or limits the
requesting party's right to contact or visit the other party or the
child. Information supplied to a parent by the department shall be
used only for purposes directly related to the enforcement of the
visitation and custody provisions of the court order of separation or
decree of divorce. No parent shall disclose such information to any
other person except for the purpose of enforcing visitation provisions
of the said order or decree.
The county offices shall maintain monthly at their offices a report
showing the names and addresses of all recipients in the county
receiving public assistance under this title, together with the amount
paid to each during the preceding month.
The provisions of this section shall not apply to duly designated
representatives of approved private welfare agencies, public officials
including the state auditor, members of legislative interim committees
and advisory committees when performing duties directly connected with
the administration of this title, such as regulation and investigation
directly connected therewith, including the joint legislative audit and
review committee: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That any information so obtained
by such persons or groups shall be treated with such degree of
confidentiality as is required by the federal social security law.
It shall be unlawful, except as provided in this section, for any
person, body, association, firm, corporation or other agency to
solicit, publish, disclose, receive, make use of, or to authorize,
knowingly permit, participate in or acquiesce in the use of any lists
or names for commercial or political purposes of any nature. The
violation of this section shall be a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---