BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.70.430 and 2005 c 395 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to administer a Puget Sound crab pot buoy tag program,
the department may charge a fee to holders of a Dungeness crab -- Puget
Sound fishery license to reimburse the department for the production of
Puget Sound crab pot buoy tags and the administration of a Puget Sound
crab pot buoy tag program.
(2) In order to administer a Washington coastal Dungeness crab pot
buoy tag program, the department may charge a fee to holders of a
Dungeness crab -- coastal or a Dungeness crab coastal class B fishery
license and to holders of out-of-state licenses who are issued a pot
certificate by the department to reimburse the department for the
production of Washington coastal crab pot buoy tags and the
administration of a Washington coastal crab pot buoy tag program.
(3) The department shall annually review the costs of crab pot buoy
tag production under this section with the goal of minimizing the per
tag production costs. Any savings in production costs shall be passed
on to the fishers required to purchase crab pot buoy tags under this
section in the form of a lower tag fee.

--- END ---