BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that cities
coterminous with, and comprised solely of, an island in qualifying
counties have unique and valuable qualities that must be preserved.
Recognizing the importance of preserving these qualities, as well as
the continual changes that accompany population growth, the legislature
finds that these island cities must have the authority to determine the
residential densities, within the confines of properly accommodating
growth, that are best suited to retain the agricultural, rural,
residential, and historic character enjoyed by the residents.
The legislature does not intend for the provisions of this act to
affirm, nullify, or otherwise affect decisions by growth management
hearings boards or courts pertaining to required minimum densities in
urban growth areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any city coterminous with, and comprised only of, an island
located in a county with more than two hundred twenty-five thousand
residents and fewer than three hundred twenty-five thousand residents
may determine an urban residential density that is sufficient to
accommodate projected population growth pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a city
coterminous with, and comprised only of, an island in a county with
more than two hundred twenty-five thousand residents and fewer than
three hundred twenty-five thousand residents to establish a uniform
minimum residential density.

--- END ---