BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.160.150 and 1996 c 279 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Funds allocated for transportation costs shall be in addition to
the basic education allocation. The distribution formula developed in
RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.180 shall be for allocation purposes
only and shall not be construed as mandating specific levels of pupil
transportation services by local districts. Operating costs as
determined under RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.180 shall be funded at
one hundred percent or as close thereto as reasonably possible for
transportation of an eligible student to and from school as defined in
RCW 28A.160.160(3). ((In addition, funding shall be provided for
transportation services for students living within one radius mile from
school as determined under RCW 28A.160.180(2).))

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.160.160 and 1996 c 279 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.190, except where
the context shall clearly indicate otherwise, the following definitions
apply:
(1) "Eligible student" means any student served by the
transportation program of a school district or compensated for
individual transportation arrangements authorized by RCW 28A.160.030
((whose route stop is more than one radius mile from the student's
school, except if the student to be transported is disabled under RCW
28A.155.020 and is either not ambulatory or not capable of protecting
his or her own welfare while traveling to or from the school or agency
where special education services are provided, in which case no mileage
distance restriction applies)).
(2) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of public
instruction.
(3) "To and from school" means the transportation of students for
the following purposes:
(a) Transportation to and from route stops and schools;
(b) Transportation to and from schools pursuant to an interdistrict
agreement pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160;
(c) Transportation of students between schools and learning centers
for instruction specifically required by statute; and
(d) Transportation of students with disabilities to and from
schools and agencies for special education services.
Extended day transportation shall not be considered part of
transportation of students "to and from school" for the purposes of
chapter 61, Laws of 1983 1st ex. sess.
(((4) "Transportation services" for students living within one
radius mile from school means school transportation services including
the use of buses, funding of crossing guards, and matching funds for
local and state transportation projects intended to mitigate hazardous
walking conditions. Priority for transportation services shall be
given to students in grades kindergarten through five.))

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.160.180 and 1996 c 279 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each district's annual student transportation allocation shall be
based on differential rates determined by the superintendent of public
instruction in the following manner:
(1) The superintendent shall annually calculate a standard student
mile allocation rate for determining the transportation allocation for
those services provided for in RCW 28A.160.150. "Standard student mile
allocation rate," as used in this chapter, means the per mile
allocation rate for transporting an eligible student. Beginning with
the 2007-08 school year, the standard student mile shall be calculated
for each district using a global positioning system or other similar
technology that enables an allocation that matches actual
transportation distances. The standard student mile allocation rate
may be adjusted to include such additional differential factors as
((distance;)) restricted passenger load; circumstances that require use
of special types of transportation vehicles; student with disabilities
load; and small fleet maintenance.
(2) ((For transportation services for students living within one
radius mile from school, the allocation shall be based on the number of
students in grades kindergarten through five living within one radius
mile as specified in the biennial appropriations act.
(3))) The superintendent of public instruction shall annually
calculate allocation rate(s), which shall include vehicle amortization,
for determining the transportation allocation for transporting students
in district-owned passenger cars, as defined in RCW 46.04.382, pursuant
to RCW 28A.160.010 for services provided for in RCW 28A.160.150 if a
school district deems it advisable to use such vehicles after the
school district board of directors has considered the safety of the
students being transported as well as the economy of utilizing a
district-owned passenger car in lieu of a school bus.
(((4))) (3) Prior to June 1st of each year the superintendent
shall submit to the office of financial management, and the committees
on education and ways and means of the senate and house of
representatives a report outlining the methodology and rationale used
in determining the allocation rates to be used the following year.

--- END ---