BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 31.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds, declares, and intends that:
(1) There exists substantial and growing need in Washington state
to enhance the availability of financial assistance for small business
and to improve the economy of the localities within this state;
(2) The department, which is charged with (a) the regulation of
business development corporations, under this chapter, (b) the
regulation of financial institutions and other financial entities as
defined in this chapter, and (c) nondepository lenders engaged in
guaranteed small business and agricultural lending, under chapters
31.40 and 31.35 RCW, is among those state agencies critical to meeting
the needs addressed in subsection (1) of this section; and
(3) It is necessary to assist the department in meeting the needs
addressed in subsection (1) of this section and to improve its
administration and regulation of this chapter and chapters 31.35 and
31.40 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 31.24.010 and 1963 c 162 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases, unless
differently defined or described, shall have the meanings and
references as follows:
(1) Corporation means a Washington industrial development
corporation created under this chapter.
(2) Financial institution means any banking corporation or trust
company, national banking association, savings and loan association,
insurance company or related corporation, partnership, foundation, or
other institution engaged primarily in lending or investing funds.
(3) Member means any financial institution authorized to do
business within this state which shall undertake to lend money to a
corporation created under this chapter, upon its call, and in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
(4) Board of directors means the board of directors of the
corporation created under this chapter.
(5) Loan limit means for any member, the maximum amount permitted
to be outstanding at one time on loans made by such member to the
corporation, as determined under the provisions of this chapter.))
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means a person who files with the director an
application for organization as, or conversion to doing business as, a
business development company under this chapter, or who is making
application for a material change that requires approval of the
director under this chapter.
(2) "Assessable stock" means any stock or class of stock, or equity
interest or class of equity interest, in a business development company
that:
(a) Has been authorized pursuant to the articles of incorporation
of the business development company as approved by the department;
(b) Has been created pursuant to an authorized plan of assessment;
(c) Has been agreed to by a stockholder pursuant to the
stockholder's subscription or similar agreement; and
(d) Has been disclosed as being subject to assessment on the face
of the stock certificates or certificates of equity interest.
(3) "Board of directors" means the board of directors of a business
development company created under this chapter.
(4) "Borrower" means a person, including a controlling person of
such person, who obtains a qualified loan from a business development
company.
(5) "Business" means a person, including a controlling person of
such person, who obtains a qualified loan or qualified investment, or
both, from a business development company.
(6) "Business development company" means a company created for the
purpose of engaging in any activity authorized by this chapter. A
"business development company" created under this chapter is either:
(a) A "general business development company," which is a business
development company that may engage in any activity authorized by this
chapter; or
(b) A "historic business development company," which is a business
development company organized to encourage and stimulate the
preservation of historic buildings or historic commercial areas or
neighborhoods, and may only engage in activities consistent with the
purposes of the limited charter as set forth in RCW 31.24.190.
(7) "Business development project" means a project controlled by a
business, in which a business development company may make a qualified
investment, qualified loan, or both.
(8) "Control," "controlled," or "controls," in relation to a
borrower or business, has the same meaning as "control of a bank" has
under Federal Reserve Regulation O, 12 C.F.R. Sec. 215.2, as it existed
on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may
be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of
this chapter.
(9) "Controlling person" means a person, including an executive
officer or director as defined in Federal Reserve Regulation O, 12
C.F.R. Sec. 215.2, as it existed on the effective date of this section,
or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule,
consistent with the purposes of this chapter, who controls a borrower
or business.
(10) "Department" means the Washington state department of
financial institutions, or its successor.
(11) "Director" means the director of the department of financial
institutions, unless used in the context of a member of the board of
directors of a business development company created under this chapter.
(12) "Financial institution" means any federally chartered or
state-chartered bank or trust company, savings bank or savings and loan
association, or credit union.
(13) "Insider transaction" means a transaction between a business
development company and a person who is (a) an affiliate of a business
development company or (b) an executive officer, director, or principal
shareholder, or a related interest of, such a person. As used in this
subsection, "affiliate," "executive officer," "director," "principal
shareholder," and "related interest" have the same meaning, in relation
to a business development company, as such terms have in relation to a
member bank pursuant to Federal Reserve Regulation O, 12 C.F.R. Sec.
215.2, as it existed on the effective date of this section, or such
subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule,
consistent with the purposes of this chapter.
(14) "Other financial entity" means an insurance company authorized
to do business in Washington state, or any other company, limited
liability company, partnership, limited partnership, or foundation,
other than a financial institution, engaged as a primary activity in
the business of lending or investing funds, and which holds a charter
or license from an applicable federal or state regulatory authority to
engage in such activity.
(15) "Person" means a natural person, partnership, limited
partnership, limited liability company, corporation, association,
foundation, or other legal or commercial entity.
(16) "Plan of assessment" means a plan for assessment of
stockholders, or a class of stockholders, which is part of the business
plan of a business development company that has been approved by the
department, and which provides for the periodic, equal assessment of
all stockholders, or an affected class of stockholders, according to
their interest in the business development company, as provided for in
section 7 of this act.
(17) "Qualified investment" means any equity investment, or debt
investment other than a qualified loan, authorized by this chapter to
be made by a business development company to a business:
(a) The principal intent of which:
(i) In the case of a general business development company, is to
promote or enhance small business or improvement of the economy of one
or more localities within this state, consistent with the general
intent and purpose of a business development company, as set forth in
section 1 of this act, and with its approved business plan; or
(ii) In the case of a historic business development company, is to
promote and/or enhance the special purpose and intent of a historic
business development company as set forth in RCW 31.24.190, consistent
with its approved business plan; and
(b) Which investment, at the time of its origination, has a
reasonable likelihood of being used for such purpose.
(18) "Qualified loan" means any loan authorized by this chapter to
be made by a business development company to a borrower:
(a) The principal intent of which:
(i) In the case of a general business development company, is to
promote or enhance small business or improvement of the economy of one
or more localities within this state, consistent with the general
intent and purpose of this chapter, and with its approved business
plan; or
(ii) In the case of a historic business development company, is to
promote or enhance the special purpose and intent of a historic
business development company as set forth in RCW 31.24.190, consistent
with its approved business plan; and
(b) Which loan, at the time of its origination, has a reasonable
likelihood of being used for such purpose.
(19) "Qualified loan participant" means a financial institution or
other financial entity, as defined in this section, or any other person
engaged in the business of lending, who participates as a funder of a
qualified participation loan.
(20) "Qualified participation loan" means a loan to a borrower or
business, in relation to a business development project, made, in whole
or in part by qualified loan participants, which has been facilitated,
arranged, or partially funded by a business development company.
(21) "Stock" means, in relation to a business development company,
any stock or equity interest, of whatever class, in a business
development company.
(22) "Stockholder" means, in relation to a stockholder of a
business development company, any person authorized either by Title 23B
RCW to be a shareholder of a corporation or by chapter 25.15 RCW and
this chapter to hold an equity interest in a limited liability company,
and may include, without limitation, a financial institution or other
financial entity.

Sec. 3 RCW 31.24.020 and 1974 ex.s. c 16 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Fifteen or more persons, a majority of whom shall be residents of
this state, who may desire to create an industrial development
corporation under the provisions of this chapter, for the purpose of
promoting, developing and advancing the prosperity and economic welfare
of the state and, to that end, to exercise the powers and privileges
hereinafter provided, may be incorporated by filing in the office of
the secretary of state, as hereinafter provided, articles of
incorporation. The articles of incorporation shall contain:
(1) The name of the corporation, which shall include the words
"Development Corporation of Washington."
(2) The location of the principal office of the corporation, but
such corporation may have offices in such other places within the state
as may be fixed by the board of directors.
(3) The purposes for which the corporation is founded, which shall
be to promote, stimulate, develop and advance the business prosperity
and economic welfare of Washington and its citizens; to encourage and
assist through loans, investments or other business transactions in the
location of new business and industry in this state and to rehabilitate
and assist existing business and industry; to stimulate and assist in
the expansion of all kinds of business activity which will tend to
promote the business development and maintain the economic stability of
this state, provide maximum opportunities for employment, encourage
thrift, and improve the standard of living of citizens of this state;
similarly, to cooperate and act in conjunction with other
organizations, public or private, in the promotion and advancement of
industrial, commercial, agricultural and recreational developments in
this state; and to provide financing for the promotion, development,
and conduct of all kinds of business activity in this state.
(4) The names and post office addresses of the members of the first
board of directors, who, unless otherwise provided by the articles of
incorporation or the bylaws, shall hold office for the first year of
existence of the corporation or until their successors are elected and
have qualified.
(5) Any provision which the incorporators may choose to insert for
the regulation of the business and for the conduct of the affairs of
the corporation and any provision creating, dividing, limiting and
regulating the powers of the corporation, the directors, stockholders
or any class of the stockholders, including, but not limited to a list
of the officers, and provisions governing the issuance of stock
certificates to replace lost or destroyed certificates.
(6) The amount of authorized capital stock and the number of shares
into which it is divided, the par value of each share and the amount of
capital with which it will commence business and, if there is more than
one class of stock, a description of the different classes; the names
and post office addresses of the subscribers of stock and the number of
shares subscribed by each. The aggregate of the subscription shall be
the minimum amount of capital with which the corporation shall commence
business which shall not be less than fifty thousand dollars. The
articles of incorporation may also contain any provision consistent
with the laws of this state for the regulation of the affairs of the
corporation.
(7) The articles of incorporation shall be in writing, subscribed
by not less than five natural persons competent to contract and
acknowledged by each of the subscribers before an officer authorized to
take acknowledgments and filed in the office of the secretary of state
for approval. A duplicate copy so subscribed and acknowledged may also
be filed.
(8) The articles of incorporation shall recite that the corporation
is organized under the provisions of this chapter.
The secretary of state shall not approve articles of incorporation
for a corporation organized under this chapter until a total of at
least ten national banks, state banks, savings banks, industrial
savings banks, federal savings and loan associations, domestic building
and loan associations, or insurance companies authorized to do business
within this state, or any combination thereof, have agreed in writing
to become members of said corporation; and said written agreement shall
be filed with the secretary of state with the articles of incorporation
and the filing of same shall be a condition precedent to the approval
of the articles of incorporation by the secretary of state. Whenever
the articles of incorporation shall have been filed in the office of
the secretary of state and approved by him and all taxes, fees and
charges, have been paid, as required by law, the subscribers, their
successors and assigns shall constitute a corporation, and said
corporation shall then be authorized to commence business, and stock
thereof to the extent herein or hereafter duly authorized may from time
to time be issued.))
(1) Five or more persons, a majority of whom are residents of this
state and three of which are federally insured depository institutions,
who desire to charter a business development company under this
chapter, may incorporate as a business development company by filing
with the director an application for a business development company
charter, which application contains the following:
(a) A cover letter requesting a charter as a business development
company under authority of this chapter, and specifying the purpose of
the requested charter;
(b) A business plan satisfactory to the director, including a plan
of assessment in the event that applicant seeks to assess stockholders,
or a class of stockholders, as provided for in section 7 of this act;
(c) Proposed articles of incorporation, in form and substance
consistent with the requirements of subsection (4) of this section;
(d) Proposed bylaws, in form and substance consistent with the
requirements of this chapter;
(e) A filing fee and application review fee as established by the
director consistent with section 5 of this act; and
(f) All other relevant information as is necessary to satisfy the
director that such proposed business development company has a
reasonable likelihood of (i) fulfilling the purposes of this chapter
and (ii) operating in a safe and sound manner.
(2) In addition to all other requirements of an application, the
director shall not grant final approval of an application for
organization as a business development company under this chapter, and
a business development company shall not commence business, until the
applicant certifies to the satisfaction of the director, that a minimum
amount of initial capital has been subscribed for, which minimum amount
of capital is subject to the determination of the director, who may
consider (a) the intended purpose of initial capital and (b) the
suitability and sufficiency of the amount of initial capital in
relation to the applicant's proposed business plan.
(3) The articles of incorporation must be in writing, signed by all
the incorporators and their representatives and acknowledged before an
officer authorized to take acknowledgments.
(4) The articles of incorporation shall contain:
(a) The name of the business development company, which must
include the word "Development";
(b) A recital that the business development company is organized
under this chapter;
(c) The location of the principal office of the business
development company, but the company may have offices in other places
within the state as may be fixed by the board of directors;
(d) The purposes for which the business development company is
founded, which, except for a historic business development company as
authorized by RCW 31.24.190, are:
(i) To promote, stimulate, develop, and advance the business
prosperity and economic welfare of Washington and its citizens;
(ii) To encourage and assist through financing, investments, or
other business transactions, in the location of new business and
industry in this state and to rehabilitate and assist existing business
and industry;
(iii) To stimulate and assist in the expansion of business activity
which will tend to promote the business development and maintain the
economic stability of this state, provide maximum opportunities for
employment, encourage thrift, and improve the standard of living of
citizens of this state;
(iv) To cooperate and act in conjunction with other organizations,
public or private, in the promotion and advancement of industrial,
commercial, agricultural, and/or recreational developments in this
state; and
(v) To provide financing for the promotion, development, and
conduct of business activity in this state;
(e) The names and mailing addresses of the members of the first
board of directors, who, unless otherwise provided by the articles of
incorporation or the bylaws, shall hold office for the first year of
existence of the business development company or until their successors
are elected and have qualified;
(f) Any provision which the incorporators may choose to insert for
the regulation of the business and for the conduct of the affairs of
the business development company;
(g) Any provision creating, dividing, limiting, and regulating the
powers of the business development company, the directors, stockholders
or any class of the stockholders, including a designation of the
officers, and provisions governing the issuance of stock certificates
to replace lost or destroyed certificates;
(h) The amount of authorized capital stock and the number of shares
into which it is divided, the par value of each share, and the amount
of capital with which it will commence business;
(i) A statement indicating whether capital stock or any class of
capital stock shall be assessable stock as part of a plan of
assessment;
(j) The names and mailing addresses of the subscribers of stock and
the number of shares subscribed by each;
(k) Any other provision consistent with the laws of this state for
the regulation of the affairs of the business development company, and
Title 23B RCW; and
(l) The signatures of each of the incorporators, who must be the
same persons making application for a business development company
charter as identified in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) The director has ninety days from submission of a completed
application to approve it and issue a certificate of authority. If the
director finds that the application is insufficient, the director may
either disapprove the application or respond by specifying in writing
what changes and modifications, consistent with this chapter, will be
necessary to approve such application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 31.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall present the articles of incorporation, after
approval by the director, to the secretary of state for filing.
(2) An applicant is not authorized to commence and maintain
business as a business development company under this chapter until
having received a certificate of authority from the department to
conduct business as a business development company.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 31.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The director may, consistent with the requirements for banks under
Title 30 RCW, collect from an applicant or business development
company, as applicable, application fees, application review fees,
periodic examination fees, and similar fees and charges, as may be
reasonable for the safe and sound regulation and promotion of business
development companies under this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 31.24.030 and 1991 c 72 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
In furtherance of its purposes and in addition to the powers now or
hereafter conferred on business corporations by ((the provisions of))
Title 23B RCW((, the corporation shall,)) and upon limited liability
companies by chapter 25.15 RCW, as applicable, a business development
company has, subject to the restrictions and limitations ((herein
contained, have)) in this section, the following powers:
(1) To assess stockholders, or a class of stockholders, of the
business development company, if authorized by the articles of
incorporation and approved by the department pursuant to a plan of
assessment as provided for in section 7 of this act;
(2) To make qualified loans to borrowers in relation to business
development projects;
(3) To make qualified investments in businesses in relation to
business development projects;
(4) To facilitate and arrange qualified participation loans by
qualified loan participants to borrowers in relation to business
development projects;
(5) To participate in the partial funding of qualified
participation loans;
(6) To elect, appoint, and employ officers, agents, and employees;
(7) To make contracts and incur liabilities for any of the purposes
of the ((corporation: PROVIDED, That the corporation)) business
development company. However, a business development company shall not
incur any secondary liability by way of guaranty or endorsement of the
obligations of any person, firm, ((corporation, joint stock)) company,
association, or trust, or in any other manner((.));
(((2))) (8) To the extent permitted by other applicable law, to
borrow money from ((its members and)) the federal small business
administration and any other similar federal or state agency, for any
of the purposes of ((the corporation)) a business development company;
(9) To borrow money from a financial institution or other financial
entity;
(10) To issue ((therefor its)) bonds, debentures, notes, or other
evidence of indebtedness, whether secured or unsecured, and to secure
the same by mortgage, pledge, deed of trust, or other lien on its
property, franchises, rights, and privileges of every kind and nature
or any part ((thereof)) or interest therein, without securing
stockholder ((or member)) approval((: PROVIDED, That no loan to the
corporation shall be secured in any manner unless all outstanding loans
to the corporation shall be secured equally and ratably in proportion
to the unpaid balance of such loans and in the same manner.
(3) To make loans to any person, firm, corporation, joint-stock
company, association or trust, and to establish and regulate the terms
and conditions with respect to any such loans and the charges for
interest and service connected therewith: PROVIDED, That the
corporation shall not approve any application for a loan unless and
until the person applying for said loan shall show that he has applied
for the loan through ordinary banking channels and that the loan has
been refused by at least one bank or other financial institution.));
(((4))) (11) To purchase, receive, hold, lease, or otherwise
acquire, and to sell, convey, transfer, lease, or otherwise dispose of
real and personal property, together with such rights and privileges as
may be incidental and appurtenant thereto and the use thereof,
including, but not restricted to, any real or personal property
acquired by the ((corporation from time to time)) business development
company in the satisfaction of debts or enforcement of
obligations((.));
(((5))) (12) To acquire the good will, business, rights, real and
personal property, and other assets, or any part thereof, or interest
therein, of any persons, firms, corporations, ((joint-stock companies))
limited liability companies, partnerships, limited partnerships,
associations, or trusts, and to assume, undertake, or pay the
obligations, debts, and liabilities of any such person, firm,
corporation, ((joint-stock company)) limited liability company,
partnership, limited partnership, association, or trust;
(13) To acquire improved or unimproved real estate for the purpose
of constructing industrial plants or other business establishments
thereon or for the purpose of disposing of such real estate to others
for the construction of industrial plants or other business
establishments; and to acquire, construct or reconstruct, alter,
repair, maintain, operate, sell, convey, transfer, lease, or otherwise
dispose of industrial plants or business establishments((.));
(((6))) (14) To acquire, subscribe for, own, hold, sell, assign,
transfer, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of the stock, shares,
bonds, debentures, notes, or other securities and evidences of interest
in, or indebtedness of, any person, firm, ((corporation, joint-stock
company)) limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership,
association, or trust, and while the owner or holder thereof to
exercise all the rights, powers, and privileges of ownership, including
the right to vote thereon((.));
(((7))) (15) To mortgage, pledge, or otherwise encumber any
property, right or things of value, acquired pursuant to the powers
contained in subsections (((4), (5), or (6))) (11), (12), and (14) of
this section, as security for the payment of any part of the purchase
price thereof((.));
(((8))) (16) To cooperate with and avail itself of the facilities
and assistance programs of the United States department of commerce,
the United States department of the treasury, the United States
department of housing and urban development, the department of
community, trade, and economic development, and any other similar state
or federal governmental agencies; and to cooperate with and assist, and
otherwise encourage organizations in the various communities of the
state in the promotion, assistance, and development of the business
prosperity and economic welfare of such communities or of this state or
of any part thereof((.)); and
(((9))) (17) To do all acts and things necessary or convenient to
carry out the powers expressly granted in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 31.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As part of a business plan approved by the department, an
applicant or business development company may seek to maintain capital
for purposes of making qualified investments and qualified loans by
periodically assessing its stockholders, or a class of stockholders,
according to a plan of assessment and as agreed upon by affected
stockholders by subscription or similar agreement.
(2) A plan of assessment may provide for:
(a) Stockholders, or a class of stockholders, making, when called
upon, additional paid-in capital in exchange for additional equity;
and/or
(b) Stockholders, or a class of stockholders, making, when called
upon, loans or other debt financing to the business development company
in exchange for an agreement of repayment.
(3) A plan of assessment shall provide for equal treatment by the
board of directors of all stockholders, or members of a class of
stockholders, subject to assessment.
(4) In the case of the approval of a plan of assessment, or the
examination of the administration of an ongoing plan of assessment, in
which assessable stock is held by a financial institution that is also
regulated by the department, the department may condition its approval
of the implementation or continued administration of a plan of
assessment as to the affected financial institution on whether the
safety and soundness of such financial institution is or may become
unimpaired, or on whether an assessment of such financial institution
has not or will not result, in a material adverse affect on the
classification of such financial institution, or its lending or
investment portfolio. The authority of the department pursuant to this
subsection shall be in addition to all other authority of the
department under this chapter or any other applicable law, and
notwithstanding any other law to the contrary.

Sec. 8 RCW 31.24.070 and 1963 c 162 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The stockholders ((and the members)) of the ((corporation
shall)) business development company have the following powers ((of the
corporation)):
(((1))) (a) To determine the number of and elect directors as
provided in RCW 31.24.090;
(((2))) (b) To make, amend, and repeal bylaws;
(((3))) (c) To amend ((this charter)) the articles of incorporation
as provided in RCW 31.24.080;
(((4))) (d) To dissolve the ((corporation)) company as provided in
RCW 31.24.150;
(((5))) (e) To do all things necessary or desirable to secure aid,
assistance, loans, and other financing from any financial institutions,
and from any agency established under ((the small business investment
act of 1958, public law 85-699, 85th congress, or other similar))
federal laws ((now or hereafter enacted.));
(((6))) (f) To exercise such other ((of the)) powers ((of the
corporation)) consistent with this chapter as may be conferred on the
stockholders ((and the members)) by the bylaws.
(2) As to all matters requiring action by the stockholders ((and
the members)) of the ((corporation, said)) business development
company, the stockholders ((and said members)) shall vote ((separately
thereon by classes)), and, except as otherwise ((herein)) provided,
such matters shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the
votes to which the stockholders present or represented at the meeting
shall be entitled ((and the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes
to which the members present or represented at the meeting shall be
entitled)).
(3) Each stockholder shall have one vote, in person or by proxy,
for each share of capital stock held ((by him, and each member shall
have one vote, in person or by proxy, except that any member having a
loan limit of more than one thousand dollars shall have one additional
vote, in person or by proxy, for each additional one thousand dollars
which such member is authorized to have outstanding on loans to the
corporation at any one time as determined under subsection (3)(b) of
RCW 31.24.050)).
(4) The capital stock of stockholders of a business development
company is nonassessable, unless authorized by the department pursuant
to a plan of assessment which has been approved by the director as
provided for in section 7 of this act.
(5) Except as permitted by a plan of assessment providing for a
class of assessable stock pursuant to section 7 of this act or as may
otherwise be established by rule, all stock is a single class of voting
common stock.
(6) The director may, subject to examination authority, determine
that a policy of declaring dividends for stockholders by a particular
business development company constitutes an unsafe and unsound practice
as to such business development company. If the practice is determined
to be unsafe and unsound, the director may instruct such a business
development company to cease and desist the declaration and grant of
such dividends.
(7) The department may, at the option of the director, adopt rules,
consistent with principles of safety and soundness, that, while not
prohibiting dividends to stockholders in general, may limit the amount
of such dividends and the time and manner of declaring them.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 31.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Unless part of an initial or amended business plan approved by the
director, or as may otherwise be provided by rule adopted pursuant to
RCW 31.24.120(3), the aggregate limit of qualified loans, qualified
investment, and partial funding of qualified participation loans by a
business development company to a single borrower or business, in
relation to a business development project, shall not exceed
twenty-five percent of the combined capital, surplus, and undivided
profits of the business development company.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 31.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A business development company may not be a party to, nor
engage in, an insider transaction, unless such an insider transaction
is approved or ratified by its board of directors, exclusive of the
vote of any interested director.
(2) Any insider transaction is subject to the examination and
enforcement authority of the department under this chapter.

Sec. 11 RCW 31.24.080 and 1994 c 92 s 235 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The articles of incorporation may be amended by the votes of the
stockholders and the members of the corporation, voting separately by
classes, and such amendments shall require approval by the affirmative
vote of two-thirds of the votes to which the stockholders shall be
entitled and two-thirds of the votes to which the members shall be
entitled: PROVIDED, That no amendment of the articles of incorporation
which is inconsistent with the general purposes expressed herein or
which authorizes any additional class of capital stock to be issued, or
which eliminates or curtails the right of the director to examine the
corporation or the obligation of the corporation to make reports as
provided in RCW 31.24.120, shall be made: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That no
amendment of the articles of incorporation which increases the
obligation of a member to make loans to the corporation, or makes any
charge in the principal amount, interest rate, maturity date, or in the
security or credit position of an outstanding loan of a member to the
corporation, or affects a member's right to withdraw from membership as
provided herein, or affects a member's voting rights as provided
herein, shall be made without the consent of each membership affected
by such amendment.
Within thirty days after any meeting at which an amendment of the
articles of incorporation has been adopted, articles of amendment
signed and sworn to by the president, treasurer, and a majority of the
directors, setting forth such amendment and due adoption thereof, shall
be submitted to the secretary of state, who shall examine them and if
he finds that they conform to the requirements of this chapter, shall
so certify and endorse his or her approval thereon. Thereupon, the
articles of amendment shall be filed in the office of the secretary of
state and no such amendment shall take effect until such articles of
amendment shall have been filed as aforesaid.))
(1) The articles of incorporation of a business development company
may be amended by the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the votes to
which the stockholders are entitled, subject to the written approval of
the director.
(2) Within thirty days after an amendment of the articles of
incorporation has been adopted and approved by the director, the
articles of amendment shall be filed in the office of the secretary of
state by the director. An amendment shall not take effect until it has
been so filed.

Sec. 12 RCW 31.24.090 and 1974 ex.s. c 16 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The business and affairs of ((the corporation)) a business
development company shall be managed and conducted by a board of
directors, a president, ((a vice president,)) a secretary, a treasurer,
and such other officers and such agents as the ((corporation)) company
by its bylaws shall authorize. A single authorized individual may
jointly hold the offices of secretary and treasurer. The president and
the treasurer may not be the same person.
(2) The board of directors shall consist of such number, not less
than ((eleven)) five nor more than ((twenty-one)) nine, as shall be
determined in the first instance by the incorporators and thereafter
annually by ((the members and)) the stockholders of the ((corporation))
business development company. The board of directors:
(a) May exercise all the powers of the ((corporation)) business
development company, except ((such as are)) those conferred upon the
stockholders by law or by the bylaws of the ((corporation upon the
stockholders or members and)) business development company; and
(b) Shall choose and appoint all the agents and officers of the
((corporation)) business development company and fill all vacancies
except vacancies in the office of director which shall be filled as
((hereinafter)) provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(3) The board of directors shall be elected in the first instance
by the incorporators and thereafter at the annual meeting, the day and
month of which shall be established by the bylaws ((of the
corporations)), or, if no annual meeting shall be held in the year of
incorporation, then within ninety days after the approval of the
articles of incorporation at a special meeting as ((hereinafter))
provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) At each annual meeting, or at each special meeting held as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, the ((members))
stockholders of ((the corporation)) a business development company
shall elect ((two-thirds)) all of the board of directors ((and the
stockholders shall elect the remaining directors)). The directors
shall hold office until the next annual meeting of the ((corporation))
business development company, or special meeting ((held in lieu of the
annual meeting)). The authority of the directors commences immediately
after the election and continues until their successors are elected and
qualified, unless sooner removed in accordance with the provisions of
the bylaws. Any vacancy in the office of a director ((elected by the
members)) shall be filled by the remaining directors ((elected by the
members, and any vacancy in the office of a director elected by the
stockholders shall be filled by the directors elected by the
stockholders)) at a regular meeting or special meeting called for that
purpose. The director appointed to fill such vacancy shall serve until
the next annual meeting, resignation, or removal according to law.
(5) Directors and officers shall not be responsible for losses
unless the same shall have been occasioned by the ((wilful)) gross
negligence or willful misconduct of such directors and officers.
(6) The board of directors shall conduct regular meetings at least
every quarter and may hold special meetings as called for pursuant to
the bylaws.
(7) Unless otherwise restricted by the articles of incorporation or
bylaws, members of the board of directors of a business development
company or any committee designated by the board of directors may
participate in a meeting of such board or committee by means of a
conference telephone or similar communications equipment, in which all
persons participating in the meeting can hear each other at the same
time. Participation by such means shall constitute presence, in
person, at a meeting.

Sec. 13 RCW 31.24.100 and 1963 c 162 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Each year the corporation shall set apart as earned surplus not
less than ten percent of its net earnings for the preceding fiscal year
until such surplus shall be equal in value to one-half of the amount
paid in on the capital stock then outstanding. Whenever the amount of
surplus established herein shall become impaired, it shall be built up
again to the required amount in the manner provided for its original
accumulation. Net earnings and surplus shall be determined by the
board of directors, after providing for such reserves as said directors
deem desirable, and the determination of the directors made in good
faith shall be conclusive on all persons.))
(1) A business development company shall maintain an amount of
minimum capital, surplus, and undivided profits that, based upon the
determination of the director, shall be deemed safe and sound for each
business development company. However, the minimum ratio of paid-in
capital to total assets, inclusive of all qualified loans and qualified
investments, shall be and remain no less than eight percent.
(2) Subject to subsection (1) of this section, minimum capital,
surplus, undivided profits, and net earnings shall be determined by the
board of directors, subject to the exercise of prudent business
judgment.

Sec. 14 RCW 31.24.110 and 1963 c 162 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The corporation shall not deposit any of its funds in any banking
institution unless such institution has been designated as a depository
by a vote of a majority of the directors present at an authorized
meeting of the board of directors, exclusive of any director who is an
officer or director of the depository so designated. The corporation))
A business development company shall not receive money on deposit.

Sec. 15 RCW 31.24.120 and 1994 c 92 s 236 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The corporation shall be examined at least once annually by the
director and shall make reports of its condition not less than annually
to the director and more frequently upon call of the director, who in
turn shall make copies of such reports available to the state insurance
commissioner and the governor; and the corporation shall also furnish
such other information as may from time to time be required by the
director and secretary of state. The corporation shall pay the actual
cost of the examinations. The director shall exercise the same power
and authority over corporations organized under this chapter as is now
exercised over banks and trust companies by the provisions of the Title
30 RCW, where the provisions of Title 30 RCW are not in conflict with
this chapter.))
(1) The director shall exercise the same power and authority over
business development companies organized under this chapter as
exercised over banks and trust companies under Title 30 RCW, to the
extent Title 30 RCW does not conflict with this chapter.
(2) A business development company shall be examined at least once
every twenty-four months by the director and shall make reports of its
condition not less than annually to the director, and more frequently
in the discretion of the director. The business development company
shall pay the actual cost of the examinations.
(3) To assure the safety and soundness of business development
companies and to fulfill the purposes of this chapter, the director
may, by examination, rule, and interpretation, establish and enforce
safety and soundness and examination standards, for all operations and
activities of and related to business development companies.

Sec. 16 RCW 31.24.130 and 1963 c 162 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The first meeting of ((the corporation)) a business development
company shall be called by a notice signed by three or more of the
incorporators, stating the time, place, and purpose of the meeting, a
copy of which notice shall be mailed, or delivered, to each
incorporator at least five days before the day appointed for the
meeting. ((Said)) The first meeting may be held without such notice
upon agreement in writing to that effect signed by all the
incorporators. ((There shall be recorded in the minutes of the
meeting)) A copy of ((said)) the notice or ((of such)) unanimous
agreement of the incorporators shall be recorded in the minutes of the
first meeting.
(2) At ((such)) the first meeting, the incorporators shall
((organize by the choice, by ballot, of a temporary clerk; by the
adoption of bylaws, by the election by ballot of directors; and by
action upon such other matters within the powers of the corporation as
the incorporators may see fit.)), consistent with Title 23B RCW:
(a) Choose a temporary recording secretary;
(b) Adopt bylaws;
(c) Elect directors; and
(d) Engage in other business within the powers of the business
development company as the incorporators present may see fit.
(3) Upon being sworn in at the first meeting, the temporary ((clerk
shall be sworn and)) recording secretary shall make and attest a record
of the proceedings. ((Ten))
(4) At least five of the incorporators shall ((be)) constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business at a first meeting.

Sec. 17 RCW 31.24.140 and 1963 c 162 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, the
period of duration of ((the corporation)) a business development
company shall be perpetual, subject, however, to the right of the
stockholders ((and the members)) to dissolve the ((corporation prior to
the expiration of said period)) business development company as
provided in RCW 31.24.150.

Sec. 18 RCW 31.24.150 and 1991 c 72 s 50 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The corporation may)) A business development company, upon the
affirmative vote of two-thirds of the votes ((to which)) of the
stockholders entitled to vote their shares, shall ((be entitled and
two-thirds of the votes to which the member shall be entitled))
dissolve ((said corporation)) the business development company as
provided by Title 23B RCW, ((insofar as)) to the extent that Title 23B
RCW is not in conflict with ((the provisions of)) this chapter. Upon
((any)) dissolution of the ((corporation)) business development
company, none of the ((corporation's)) business development company's
assets shall be distributed to the stockholders until all sums due the
((members of the corporation as)) creditors thereof have been paid in
full.

Sec. 19 RCW 31.24.170 and 1963 c 162 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any ((corporation)) business development company organized under
((the provisions of)) this chapter shall be a state development
company, as ((defined in)) authorized under Title V of the small
business investment act of 1958, Public Law 85-699, ((85th congress))
15 U.S.C. Sec. 695, as amended, or any other similar federal
legislation((, and shall be authorized to operate on a statewide
basis)).

Sec. 20 RCW 31.24.190 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 90 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the purposes specified in RCW 31.24.020(((2)
[(3)] an industrial development corporation)) a historic business
development company may be formed for one or more of the following
purposes:
(a) To encourage and stimulate the preservation of historic
buildings or historic commercial areas or neighborhoods by returning
them to economically productive uses which are compatible with or
enhance the historic character of such buildings ((or)), commercial
areas, or neighborhoods;
(b) To stimulate and assist in the development of business or other
activities which have an impact upon the preservation of historic
buildings ((or)), commercial areas, or neighborhoods;
(c) To cooperate and act in conjunction with other organizations,
public or private, in the promotion and advancement of historical
preservation activities; and
(d) To provide financing through loans, investments of other
business transactions for the promotion, development, and conduct of
all kinds of business activity ((which)) that encourages or relates to
historic preservation. ((An industrial development corporation created
to carry out the purposes of this section))
(2) A historic business development company shall not engage in the
broad economic and business promotion activities permitted by ((RCW
31.24.020(3) which are not related to the purposes of this section.
Any such industrial development corporation shall in all other respects
be subject to the provisions of this chapter)) a general business
development company.
(3) A general business development company may, in addition to all
other activities permitted by this chapter, engage in those activities
specifically permitted of a historic business development company
organized under subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 31.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Chapter 30.44 RCW applies to the insolvency and liquidation of a
business development company organized under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 31.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The director has the same power and authority to exercise
supervisory direction and conservatorship of, and to issue cease and
desist orders upon, a business development company organized under this
chapter, as the director has in regard to a bank under Title 30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 31.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to written approval of the director, one or more
general business development companies may merge into or consolidate
with each other consistent with chapter 30.49 RCW.
(2) Upon ninety days advance application to and written approval of
the director, a historic business development company may convert its
charter to that of a general business development company. An
application for conversion shall contain a cover letter requesting
conversion, the proposed articles of amendments and bylaws amendments,
a modified business plan, and other relevant information in form and
substance similar to the requirements of a de novo application for a
general business development company as provided in RCW 31.24.020. In
making a determination of whether to approve or deny such a conversion,
the director shall consider:
(a) The historic performance and safety and soundness of the
historic business development company;
(b) Whether the conversion to a general business development
company will have a likelihood of continuing to fulfill the purposes of
this chapter;
(c) Whether the applicant will have a likelihood of remaining safe
and sound as a general business development company and pursuant to its
proposed modified business plan; and
(d) Whether the proposed conversion would serve, or otherwise not
detract from, the needs and convenience of the community served by the
business development company.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 31.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a
development credit corporation created under chapter 31.20 RCW, or any
other company incorporated under Title 23B RCW, may convert to a
business development company by filing an application with the
department and receiving written approval of the director within ninety
days of the date the application is received.
(2) In addition to all other requirements of a business development
company pursuant to this chapter, the director shall not approve an
application for conversion of a development credit corporation unless:
(a) A minimum of three stockholders of such corporation are
financial institutions;
(b) The majority of outstanding shares of common stock of such
corporation are held by financial institutions;
(c) The articles of incorporation of such a corporation are amended
to conform to the requirements of RCW 31.24.020;
(d) The bylaws of such a corporation are amended to conform to the
requirements of this chapter;
(e) The business plan of the corporation is consistent with the
requirements of this chapter and has been approved by the director; and
(f) The corporation otherwise satisfies the director that all other
requirements of a business development company under this chapter have
been met. However, such a corporation is not required to have had a
minimum of five incorporators at the time it originally was
incorporated with the secretary of state, as provided for in RCW
31.24.020(1).
(3) Upon approval by the director of the corporation's application
for conversion, the amended articles of incorporation, as approved by
the director, shall be filed by the director with the secretary of
state in the same manner provided for the filing of initial articles of
incorporation under section 4 of this act. Such corporation shall not
commence operation as a business development company until the director
has issued such corporation a certificate of authority to conduct
business as a business development company.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 A new section is added to chapter 31.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The existing privileges, immunities, and requirements of
confidentiality and disclosure with respect to examination records and
information obtained by the director in conducting examinations, which
are applicable to banks, as set forth in RCW 30.04.075, apply to
examination records and information obtained by the director in
conducting examinations of business development companies organized
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 A new section is added to chapter 31.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a business
development company organized under this chapter may be chartered as a
limited liability company, or may convert to doing business as a
limited liability company, to the same extent and subject to the same
terms and conditions as permitted for a bank organized under Title 30
RCW, including, without limitation, requirements related to director
approval, operational matters, corporate governance, and restrictions
on complete dissociation. However:
(1) The rights of stockholders, as defined in this chapter,
supersede the provisions of Title 30 RCW to the contrary; and
(2) The limited liability company agreement, or other governing
charter document of the limited liability company, must contain the
same or substantially similar recitals as required in RCW 31.24.020
with respect to business purpose, organizational authority, board of
directors, management, and limitations on liability of directors and
officers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 A new section is added to chapter 31.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An applicant may apply simultaneously for both a business
development company charter, under this chapter, and for a license as
a nondepository lender of federally guaranteed small business loans,
under chapter 31.40 RCW.
(2) An applicant may apply simultaneously for both a business
development company charter, under this chapter, and for a license as
a nondepository lender of guaranteed agricultural loans, under chapter
31.35 RCW.
(3) Notwithstanding any provisions of this chapter or chapter 31.35
or 31.40 RCW, applications presented to the director as set forth in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be considered and
evaluated by the director as one application, and an applicant:
(a) If granted a business development company charter based on a
joint application as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, shall pay fees and charges only as required by this chapter
and be subject to joint and simultaneous application review and
periodic examination; and
(b) If denied a business development company charter when having
made a joint application as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, shall pay fees and charges only as required by this chapter.
(4) An existing business development company organized under this
chapter may apply for either a license, under chapter 31.35 RCW, or a
license, under chapter 31.40 RCW, or both; and, if granted, the
business development company, as a dual licensee, shall then pay fees
and charges only as required by this chapter and be subject to joint
and simultaneous application review and periodic examination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 A new section is added to chapter 31.35 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 27 (2) through (4) of this act supersede any contrary
provision of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 A new section is added to chapter 31.40 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 27 (1), (3), and (4) of this act supersede any contrary
provision of this chapter.

Sec. 30 RCW 31.40.090 and 1994 c 92 s 268 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall examine each licensee not less than once
((each year)) every twenty-four months.
(2) The director may with or without notice and at any time during
regular business hours examine a licensee or a subsidiary of a
licensee.
(3) A director, officer, or employee of a licensee or of a
subsidiary of a licensee being examined by the director or a person
having custody of any of the books, accounts, or records of the
licensee or of the subsidiary shall otherwise facilitate the
examination so far as it is in his or her power to do so.
(4) If in the director's opinion it is necessary in the examination
of a licensee, or of a subsidiary of a licensee, the director may
retain any certified public accountant, attorney, appraiser, or other
person to assist the director. The licensee being examined shall pay
the fees of a person retained by the director under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 A new section is added to chapter 31.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The director has broad administrative authority and discretion to
adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 A new section is added to chapter 31.24 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "business
development company act."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 31.24.040 (Organizations authorized to acquire, hold and
dispose of corporate bonds, securities, stock, etc. -- Membership -- Rights
and powers -- Limitation on stock ownership) and 1963 c 162 s 4;
(2) RCW 31.24.050 (Membership by financial institutions -- Loans to
corporation by members -- Limitations -- Interest) and 1974 ex.s. c 16 s 2,
1973 1st ex.s. c 90 s 1, & 1963 c 162 s 5;
(3) RCW 31.24.060 (Membership -- Duration -- Withdrawal) and 1963 c 162
s 6; and
(4) RCW 31.24.180 (Calendar year adopted as fiscal year) and 1963
c 162 s 18.

--- END ---