BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that effective
communication between patients, their families, and their care givers
regarding their wishes if they become incapacitated results in health
care decisions that are more respectful of patients' desires. Whether
the communication is for end-of-life planning or incapacity resulting
from mental illness, the state must respect those wishes and support
efforts to facilitate such communications and to make that information
available when it is needed.
It is the intent of the legislature to establish an electronic
registry to improve access to health care decision-making documents.
The registry would support, not supplant, the current systems for
advance directives and mental health advance directives by improving
access to these documents. It is the legislature's intent that the
registry would be consulted by health care providers in every instance
where there may be a question about the patient's wishes for periods of
incapacity and the existence of a document that may clarify a patient's
intentions unless the circumstances are such that consulting the
registry would compromise the emergency care of the patient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.122 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of health shall establish and maintain a
statewide health care declarations registry containing the health care
declarations identified in subsection (2) of this section as submitted
by residents of Washington. The department shall digitally reproduce
and store health care declarations in the registry. The department may
establish standards for individuals to submit digitally reproduced
health care declarations directly to the registry, but is not required
to review the health care declarations that it receives to ensure they
comply with the particular statutory requirements applicable to the
document. The department may contract with an organization that meets
the standards identified in this section.
(2)(a) An individual may submit any of the following health care
declarations to the department of health to be digitally reproduced and
stored in the registry:
(i) A directive, as defined by this chapter;
(ii) A durable power of attorney for health care, as authorized in
chapter 11.94 RCW;
(iii) A mental health advance directive, as defined by chapter
71.32 RCW; or
(iv) A form adopted pursuant to the department of health's
authority in RCW 43.70.480.
(b) Failure to submit a health care declaration to the department
of health does not affect the validity of the declaration.
(c) Failure to notify the department of health of a valid
revocation of a health care declaration does not affect the validity of
the revocation.
(d) The entry of a health care directive in the registry under this
section does not:
(i) Affect the validity of the document;
(ii) Take the place of any requirements in law necessary to make
the submitted document legal; or
(iii) Create a presumption regarding the validity of the document.
(3) The department of health shall prescribe a procedure for an
individual to revoke a health care declaration contained in the
registry.
(4) The registry must:
(a) Be maintained in a secure data base that is accessible through
a web site maintained by the department of health;
(b) Send annual electronic messages to individuals that have
submitted health care declarations to request that they review the
registry materials to ensure that it is current;
(c) Provide individuals who have submitted one or more health care
declarations with access to their documents and the ability to revoke
their documents at all times; and
(d) Provide the personal representatives of individuals who have
submitted one or more health care declarations to the registry,
attending physicians, advanced registered nurse practitioners, health
care providers licensed by a disciplining authority identified in RCW
18.130.040 who is acting under the direction of a physician or an
advanced registered nurse practitioner, and health care facilities, as
defined in this chapter or in chapter 71.32 RCW, access to the registry
at all times.
(5) In designing the registry and web site, the department of
health shall ensure compliance with state and federal requirements
related to patient confidentiality.
(6) The department shall provide information to health care
providers and health care facilities on the registry web site regarding
the different federal and Washington state requirements to ascertain
and document whether a patient has an advance directive.
(7) The department of health may accept donations, grants, gifts,
or other forms of voluntary contributions to support activities related
to the creation and maintenance of the health care declarations
registry and statewide public education campaigns related to the
existence of the registry. All funds received shall be transferred to
the health care declarations registry account, created in section 3 of
this act.
(8) The department of health may adopt rules as necessary to
implement this act.
(9) By December 1, 2008, the department shall report to the house
and senate committees on health care the following information:
(a) Number of participants in the registry;
(b) Number of health care declarations submitted by type of
declaration as defined in this section;
(c) Number of health care declarations revoked and the method of
revocation;
(d) Number of providers and facilities, by type, that have been
provided access to the registry;
(e) Actual costs of operation of the registry;
(f) Donations received by the department for deposit into the
health care declarations registry account, created in section 3 of this
act by type of donor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.122 RCW
to read as follows:
The health care declarations registry account is created in the
state treasury. All receipts from donations made under section 2 of
this act, and other contributions and appropriations specifically made
for the purposes of creating and maintaining the registry established
by section 2 of this act and statewide public education campaigns
related to the existence of the registry, shall be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for purposes of the
health care declarations registry.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.122.040 and 1979 c 112 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A directive may be revoked at any time by the declarer, without
regard to the declarer's mental state or competency, by any of the
following methods:
(a) By being canceled, defaced, obliterated, burned, torn, or
otherwise destroyed by the declarer or by some person in the declarer's
presence and by the declarer's direction.
(b) By a written revocation of the declarer expressing
((declarer's)) his or her intent to revoke, signed, and dated by the
declarer. Such revocation shall become effective only upon
communication to the attending physician by the declarer or by a person
acting on behalf of the declarer. The attending physician shall record
in the patient's medical record the time and date when ((said)) the
physician received notification of the written revocation.
(c) By a verbal expression by the declarer of ((declarer's)) his or
her intent to revoke the directive. Such revocation shall become
effective only upon communication to the attending physician by the
declarer or by a person acting on behalf of the declarer. The
attending physician shall record in the patient's medical record the
time, date, and place of the revocation and the time, date, and place,
if different, of when ((said)) the physician received notification of
the revocation.
(d) In the case of a directive that is stored in the health care
declarations registry under section 2 of this act, by an online method
established by the department of health. Failure to use this method of
revocation for a directive that is stored in the registry does not
invalidate a revocation that is made by another method described under
this section.
(2) There shall be no criminal or civil liability on the part of
any person for failure to act upon a revocation made pursuant to this
section unless that person has actual or constructive knowledge of the
revocation except as provided in RCW 70.122.051(4).
(3) If the declarer becomes comatose or is rendered incapable of
communicating with the attending physician, the directive shall remain
in effect for the duration of the comatose condition or until such time
as the declarer's condition renders the declarer able to communicate
with the attending physician.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.32.080 and 2003 c 283 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A principal with capacity may, by written statement by the
principal or at the principal's direction in the principal's presence,
revoke a directive in whole or in part.
(b) An incapacitated principal may revoke a directive only if he or
she elected at the time of executing the directive to be able to revoke
when incapacitated.
(2) The revocation need not follow any specific form so long as it
is written and the intent of the principal can be discerned. In the
case of a directive that is stored in the health care declarations
registry created by section 2 of this act, the revocation may be by an
online method established by the department of health. Failure to use
the online method of revocation for a directive that is stored in the
registry does not invalidate a revocation that is made by another
method described under this section.
(3) The principal shall provide a copy of his or her written
statement of revocation to his or her agent, if any, and to each health
care provider, professional person, or health care facility that
received a copy of the directive from the principal.
(4) The written statement of revocation is effective:
(a) As to a health care provider, professional person, or health
care facility, upon receipt. The professional person, health care
provider, or health care facility, or persons acting under their
direction shall make the statement of revocation part of the
principal's medical record; and
(b) As to the principal's agent, upon receipt. The principal's
agent shall notify the principal's health care provider, professional
person, or health care facility of the revocation and provide them with
a copy of the written statement of revocation.
(5) A directive also may:
(a) Be revoked, in whole or in part, expressly or to the extent of
any inconsistency, by a subsequent directive; or
(b) Be superseded or revoked by a court order, including any order
entered in a criminal matter. A directive may be superseded by a court
order regardless of whether the order contains an explicit reference to
the directive. To the extent a directive is not in conflict with a
court order, the directive remains effective, subject to the provisions
of RCW 71.32.150. A directive shall not be interpreted in a manner
that interferes with: (i) Incarceration or detention by the department
of corrections, in a city or county jail, or by the department of
social and health services; or (ii) treatment of a principal who is
subject to involuntary treatment pursuant to chapter 10.77, 70.96A,
71.05, 71.09, or 71.34 RCW.
(6) A directive that would have otherwise expired but is effective
because the principal is incapacitated remains effective until the
principal is no longer incapacitated unless the principal has elected
to be able to revoke while incapacitated and has revoked the directive.
(7) When a principal with capacity consents to treatment that
differs from, or refuses treatment consented to in, the provisions of
his or her directive, the consent or refusal constitutes a waiver of
that provision and does not constitute a revocation of the provision or
directive unless the principal also revokes the directive or provision.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.122.051 and 1992 c 98 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "provider" means a physician,
advanced registered nurse practitioner, health care provider acting
under the direction of a physician or an advanced registered nurse
practitioner, or health care facility, as defined in this chapter or in
chapter 71.32 RCW, and its personnel.
(2) Any ((physician, health care provider acting under the
direction of a physician, or health facility and its personnel))
provider who participates in good faith in the withholding or
withdrawal of life-sustaining treatment from a qualified patient in
accordance with the requirements of this chapter, shall be immune from
legal liability, including civil, criminal, or professional conduct
sanctions, unless otherwise negligent.
(3) The establishment of a health care declarations registry does
not create any new or distinct obligation for a provider to determine
whether a patient has a health care declaration.
(4) A provider is not subject to civil or criminal liability or
sanctions for unprofessional conduct under the uniform disciplinary
act, chapter 18.130 RCW, when in good faith and without negligence:
(a) The provider provides, does not provide, withdraws, or
withholds treatment to a patient in the absence of actual knowledge of
the existence of a health care declaration stored in the health care
declarations registry established in section 2 of this act;
(b) The provider provides, does not provide, withdraws, or
withholds treatment pursuant to a health care declaration stored in the
health care declarations registry established in section 2 of this act
in the absence of actual knowledge of the revocation of the
declaration;
(c) The provider provides, does not provide, withdraws, or
withholds treatment according to a health care declaration stored in
the health care declarations registry established in section 2 of this
act in good faith reliance upon the validity of the health care
declaration and the declaration is subsequently found to be invalid; or
(d) The provider provides, does not provide, withdraws, or
withholds treatment according to the patient's health care declaration
stored in the health care declarations registry established in section
2 of this act.
(5) Except for acts of gross negligence, willful misconduct, or
intentional wrongdoing, the department of health is not subject to
civil liability for any claims or demands arising out of the
administration or operation of the health care declarations registry
established in section 2 of this act.

--- END ---