BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.08.064 and 2003 c 96 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
There shall be in the counties of Benton and Franklin jointly, six
judges of the superior court; in the county of Clallam, ((two)) three
judges of the superior court; in the county of Jefferson, one judge of
the superior court; in the county of Snohomish, fifteen judges of the
superior court; in the counties of Asotin, Columbia and Garfield
jointly, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Cowlitz,
((four)) five judges of the superior court; in the counties of
Klickitat and Skamania jointly, one judge of the superior court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The additional judicial positions created by
section 1 of this act in Clallam and Cowlitz counties are effective
only if each county through its duly constituted legislative authority
documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement
that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the
state, the expenses of the existing and additional judicial positions
as provided by statute and the state Constitution.

--- END ---