BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context requires otherwise.
(1) "Cigarette" means a product that contains nicotine, is intended
to be burned or heated under ordinary conditions of use, and consists
of or contains:
(a) A roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or in any substance not
containing tobacco;
(b) Tobacco, in any form, that is functional in the product and
that, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the
filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to or
purchased by consumers as a cigarette; or
(c) Any roll of tobacco that is wrapped in a substance containing
tobacco and that, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used
in the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered
to or purchased by consumers as a cigarette described in (a) of this
subsection.
(2) "Distribute" means to do any of the following:
(a) Sell cigarettes or deliver cigarettes for sale by another
person to consumers;
(b) Receive or retain more than one hundred ninety-nine cigarettes
at a place of business where the person receiving or retaining the
cigarettes customarily sells cigarettes or offers cigarettes for sale
to consumers;
(c) Place cigarettes in vending machines;
(d) Sell or accept orders for cigarettes that are to be transported
from a point outside this state to a consumer within this state; or
(e) Buy cigarettes directly from a manufacturer or wholesaler for
resale in this state.
(3) "Fire-safe cigarette" means a reduced ignition strength
cigarette of a variety declared to be fire safe by the state director
of fire protection under section 2 of this act.
(4) "Variety" means a type of cigarette marketed by the
manufacturer as being distinct from other types of cigarettes on the
basis of brand name, length, filter, wrapping, flavoring, or other
characteristics as the state director of fire protection may provide by
rule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The state director of fire protection
shall determine for each variety of cigarette sold or proposed for sale
in this state whether that variety of cigarette is fire safe. The
state director of fire protection may make the determination by
conducting ignition propensity strength testing or by accepting the
results of ignition propensity strength testing conducted by any source
the state director of fire protection recognizes as reliable.
(2) Except as provided in this subsection, ignition propensity
strength testing conducted or relied upon under subsection (1) of this
section must be performed using the Standard Test Method for Measuring
the Ignition Strength of Cigarettes, E2187-04, developed by ASTM
International. The state director of fire protection may conduct or
rely upon an ignition propensity strength testing method developed by
ASTM International as a modification or replacement of the method
designated by this subsection if the state director of fire protection,
by rule, deems the modified or replacement method acceptable. The
conducted or relied upon testing must be conducted on ten layers of
filter paper. The state director of fire protection shall declare a
cigarette variety to be fire safe if not more than twenty-five percent
of the cigarettes tested burned along the full length of the tobacco
portion of the cigarette when subjected to ignition propensity strength
testing.
(3) The state director of fire protection shall issue, keep
current, and make available to the public a list of the cigarette
varieties determined by the state director of fire protection to be
fire safe.
(4) The state director of fire protection, by rule or upon
application, may approve cigarette package or carton markings,
stickers, labeling, or other devices that identify a cigarette variety
as fire safe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A person may not distribute or offer to
sell a cigarette within this state unless the cigarette is of a variety
the state director of fire protection has listed as fire safe under
section 2 of this act. This subsection does not apply to distribution
of, or an offer to sell, cigarettes exempted from state taxation.
(2) A cigarette package or carton may not bear markings, stickers,
labeling, or other devices identifying cigarettes contained in the
package or carton as fire-safe cigarettes unless the cigarettes are of
a variety the state director of fire protection has listed as fire safe
under section 2 of this act. This subsection does not apply if the
cigarettes are in interstate commerce and not intended for distribution
in this state.
(3) The state director of fire protection, an authorized
representative of the state director of fire protection, or any law
enforcement agency may immediately seize and subject to forfeiture any
cigarettes distributed or offered for sale in violation of subsection
(1) of this section and any cigarettes contained in packages or cartons
bearing markings, stickers, labeling, or other devices in violation of
subsection (2) of this section. The state director of fire protection
shall destroy cigarettes seized and forfeited under this subsection.
(4) The state director of fire protection may enter into a
cooperative agreement with any state or local agency that allows the
agency to act as an authorized representative of the state director of
fire protection for enforcement purposes under subsection (3) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The state director of fire protection may
impose a civil penalty for a violation of section 3(1) of this act.
The civil penalty may not exceed:
(1) For a person who distributes or offers to sell cigarettes to a
wholesaler or retailer, ten thousand dollars or five times the value of
the cigarettes involved in the violation, whichever is greater; or
(2) For a person who distributes or offers to sell cigarettes to
the public:
(a) For a distribution or offer of not more than one thousand
cigarettes, five hundred dollars; and
(b) For a distribution or offer of more than one thousand
cigarettes, one thousand dollars or five times the retail value of the
cigarettes involved in the violation, whichever is greater.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 An action may be brought by the attorney
general, at the request of the state director of fire protection, in
the name of the state, to recover civil penalties imposed under section
4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Notwithstanding section 2 of this act,
the state director of fire protection, without conducting testing under
section 2 of this act, shall include in the fire-safe cigarette list
published by the state director of fire protection cigarettes of a
variety sold in this state that were certified prior to the effective
date of this act by the office of fire prevention and control,
department of state, New York state, or a successor to that office, as
complying with cigarette fire safety performance standards required for
cigarettes sold in New York state after June 28, 2004.
(2) The state director of fire protection shall publish an initial
list of cigarette varieties declared to be fire safe under section 2 of
this act no later than twenty days after the effective date of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Section 3(2) of this act is applicable
thirty days after the effective date of this act.
(2)(a) Section 4(1) of this act applies only to violations
occurring thirty or more days after the effective date of this act.
(b) Section 4(2) of this act applies only to violations occurring
on or after January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The cigarette fire safety account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the
imposition of civil penalties under section 4 of this act must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for fire safety, enforcement, and prevention programs. Only the
director of fire protection or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2005 c 424 s 18, 2005 c 402 s 8, 2005
c 215 s 10, and 2005 c 16 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers
conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the produce railcar
pool account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and
exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the
self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account,
the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission
Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing
commission class C purse fund account, the individual development
account program account, the Washington horse racing commission
operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing commission
operating account must be credited to the Washington horse racing
commission class C purse fund account), the cigarette fire safety
account, and the life sciences discovery fund. However, the earnings
to be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 8 and 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---