BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the difficulty in
attracting and retaining top quality graduate students in Washington
state, particularly in the science and technology fields. In order to
promote the growth of research in these fields, the legislature intends
to help colleges and universities raise additional moneys for graduate
fellowships by creating a graduate fellowship trust fund program for
the sciences.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The graduate fellowship trust fund program
for the sciences is established. The purpose of the program is to
assist Washington's state-supported institutions of higher education in
attracting and retaining top quality graduate students in the science
fields.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(2) "Endowment fund" or "local endowment fund" means a fund
established by an institution of higher education or its foundation to
receive the private donations and state matching funds under this
chapter.
(3) "Foundation" means a private, nonprofit corporation that:
(a) Is registered under Title 24 RCW and qualifies as a tax-exempt
entity under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code;
(b) Exists solely for the benefit of one or more institutions of
higher education located in the state of Washington; and
(c) Is registered with the attorney general's office under the
charitable trust act, chapter 11.110 RCW.
(4) "Institution of higher education" means an institution of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 that is in compliance
with conditions adopted by the board for the graduate fellowship trust
fund program, and is accepted by the board for participation in the
graduate fellowship trust fund program.
(5) "Meritorious student" means a student who:
(a) Meets the residency requirements of RCW 28B.15.012(2), as
demonstrated in RCW 28B.15.013;
(b) Is meritorious, as defined by the institution of higher
education that the student attends or by the foundation that is
administering the fellowship; and
(c) Is enrolled as a graduate student in an institution of higher
education.
(6) "Trust fund" means the graduate fellowship trust fund for the
sciences established under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The graduate fellowship trust fund program
for the sciences shall be administered by the board. In consultation
with institutions of higher education and the governor's office, the
board shall establish guidelines for the program. The board's duties
may include, but need not be limited to:
(1) The adoption of rules, deadlines, and procedures;
(2) The adoption of an annual allocation system based on factors
that may include, but need not be limited to: The amount of money
available in the trust fund; the characteristics of potential
participating institutions, including the number of eligible students
enrolled in each institution of higher education, adjusted by each
eligible student's rate of enrollment; the amount of private cash
donations that each potential participating institution of higher
education commits to raise annually for the program; and the amount of
money previously received by each participating institution of higher
education or institutional foundation. Any allocation system shall be
superseded by conditions in any legislative act appropriating funds by
the program;
(3) The adoption of contracts with participating institutions of
higher education and their foundations. The contracts may include any
conditions required of participants by the board. The contracts must
include: (a) Provisions for the protection of state matching moneys
administered by foundations; (b) requirements to provide the board with
the results of a biennial audit of participating foundations; and (c)
requirements to maintain records on the disposition of state and
private matching funds, and to provide an accounting of the number and
characteristics of students assisted through the program;
(4) The adoption of policies that maximize the distribution of the
trust fund and matching moneys to institutions of higher education or
their foundations;
(5) The adoption of a mechanism to reallocate unused funds to
institutions of higher education or foundations that have used their
annual allotment of state matching moneys and have raised additional
private donations for which the state matching funds were not
available; and
(6) The preparation and distribution of periodic reports on the
results of the program. The reports must include an accounting of the
students who have benefited through the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Funds appropriated by the legislature for
the graduate fellowship trust fund program for the sciences must be
deposited in the graduate fellowship trust fund for the sciences,
hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. The trust fund
must be administered by the state treasurer. No appropriation is
required for expenditures from the trust fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Subject to rules adopted by the board:
(1) All institutions of higher education with graduate programs in
the sciences are eligible for state matching funds from the trust fund.
(2) All foundations of institutions of higher education are
eligible for matching funds if the foundations meet the requirements
adopted by the board.
(3) Eligible institutions of higher education and foundations may
apply to the board for twenty-five thousand dollars from the fund when
they can match the state funds with an equal amount of cash donations
from private sources. These donations must be made specifically to the
graduate fellowship trust fund program, and must be donated after July
1, 2006.
(4) Upon an application by an institution of higher education or
its foundation, the board may designate twenty-five thousand dollars
from the trust fund for the endowment fund of the institution of higher
education or foundation.
(5) Once the private donation is received by an institution of
higher education or its foundation, the board must ask the state
treasurer to release the state matching moneys to the local endowment
fund established for graduate fellowships.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The foundation of an institution of higher
education is eligible to receive moneys from the trust fund only if the
foundation and the governing board of the institution of higher
education have entered into a contract approved by the attorney general
that:
(1) Specifies the services to be provided by the foundation;
(2) Provides for the protection of any state matching funds under
the foundation's control that were provided under the program;
(3) Provides for the institution of higher education's assumption
of the ownership, management, and control of program funds if the
foundation ceases to exist, fails to function properly, or fails to
provide the specified services in accordance with the contract; and
(4) Includes any other conditions specified by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The graduate fellowship provided under
this chapter is the property of the institution of higher education or
its foundation and may be named in honor of a donor, benefactor, or
honoree of the institution of higher education or foundation.
(2) The institution of higher education or its foundation is
responsible for soliciting private donations, investing and maintaining
all endowment funds, administering the fellowship, and reporting on the
program to the board upon request. The institution of higher education
or foundation may augment the endowment fund with additional private
donations. The principal of the invested endowment funds must not be
invaded.
(3) The proceeds from the endowment funds may be used to provide
fellowship stipends to be used by the recipient for tuition and fees,
books and supplies, subsistence, research expenses, and other
educationally related costs.
(4) Each institution of higher education or its foundation must
include representatives of the graduate student body when selecting
graduate fellowship recipients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Any private or public money, including all
investment income, deposited in the trust fund or any local endowment
fund for fellowship programs is not subject to collective bargaining.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 2 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---