BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Except as provided under subsection (2)
of this section, the state agency with the largest electricity load in
its service territory must, at the request of the generator to the
agency in writing, purchase all available anaerobic digester power from
their local utility to the extent that it does not exceed the agency's
local annual electricity consumption. State agencies shall pay for
anaerobic digester power at a rate no less than the retail price of a
qualified alternative energy product that their local utility charges
its customers under RCW 19.29A.090.
(2) State agencies are not required to purchase all available
anaerobic digester power from their local utility if their utility is
exempt from offering a qualified alternative energy product.
(3) To the extent that a utility purchases power from an anaerobic
digestion power producer in its service territory, the utility must pay
the anaerobic digestion power producer for electricity produced at a
rate no less than the retail price the utility charges its customers
for a qualified alternative energy product under RCW 19.29A.090 minus
administrative costs.

--- END ---