BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
establish a goal of encouraging the construction and development of
renewable energy in the state of Washington to meet increasing demands
for affordable and reliable electricity. Since electricity supply may
lag behind electricity demand, the result may be a sharp increase in
electricity prices. The legislature finds that it is desirable to
shorten the time it takes to bring new electricity generation to
market. Washington is a leader in the development of renewable energy
technologies and the legislature acknowledges that encouraging the
development of renewable technologies in meeting increased electricity
demand will create jobs for Washington's citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(2) "Consumer-owned utility" includes a municipal electric utility
formed under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title
54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a
cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or
association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, a port district formed
under Title 53 RCW, or a water-sewer district formed under Title 57
RCW, that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to one
or more retail electric customers in the state.
(3) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as in RCW 80.52.030.
(4) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(5) "Distributed generation" means either an electricity generation
system that uses as its fuel an eligible renewable resource or a fuel
cell as defined in RCW 43.19.651, and: (a) Is available on-site and
not from a commercial source; and (b) has a generating capacity of not
more than one hundred kilowatts.
(6) "Electric utility" means a consumer-owned or investor-owned
utility.
(7) "Eligible renewable resources" means:
(a) Electricity generation facilities powered by a renewable
resource, including only those hydroprojects that use the natural
gravity induced by the flow of the river to produce electricity and do
not require the construction of an impounding dam with a large
reservoir that commenced operation after April 1, 1999, and that are
located in the Pacific Northwest; and
(b) Additional power generation achieved, above original design
specifications, at hydroelectric facilities, irrigation pipes, and
canals operating on April 1, 1999, that are located in the Pacific
Northwest, and do not result in any new water diversions.
(8) "Full-requirements customer" means a utility that relies on the
Bonneville power administration for all of the power needed to supply
its total load requirement other than that served by nondispatchable
generating resources totaling no more than six megawatts.
(9) "Governing body" means the board of directors, city council,
commissioners, or board of any consumer-owned utility.
(10) "Integrated resource plan" or "plan" means a plan describing
the mix of generating resources and improvements in the efficient use
of electricity that will meet current and future needs at the lowest
reasonable cost to the utility and its ratepayers.
(11) "Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by
investors that meets the definition in RCW 80.04.010 and is engaged in
distributing electricity to more than one retail electric customer in
the state.
(12) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable certificate of
proof of one megawatt hour of electricity generated from a renewable
resource that: (a)(i) Is located in the Pacific Northwest and
commenced operation after December 1, 2001; or (ii) is located in the
United States portion of the western region as defined by the western
electricity coordinating council or its successor entity and commenced
operation after July 1, 2003; (b) is not powered by fresh water; and
(c) is verified by the renewable energy credit trading system selected
by the department.
(13) "Renewable resources" means electricity generation facilities
fueled by: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar energy; (d) geothermal
energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) biomass energy based on animal waste or
solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field residues, or dedicated
energy crops that do not include wood pieces that have been treated
with chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or
copper-chrome-arsenic; (g) wave or tidal power; or (h) gas from sewage
treatment facilities.
(14) "Retail load" means the amount of kilowatt hours of
electricity delivered by an electric utility to its Washington retail
customers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By December 1, 2007, the department shall
establish a statewide renewable energy goal based on the integrated
resource plans developed under sections 4 through 7 of this act. The
department shall update this goal in 2009, 2013, and 2019 based on the
integrated resource plans developed under sections 4 through 7 of this
act. An electric utility may contribute toward meeting the statewide
goal by increasing the mix of resources it uses to serve its Washington
customers to include a greater percentage of eligible renewable
resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Each electric utility must develop an
integrated resource plan consistent with the provisions of this
section. Such a plan shall be updated on a regular basis and, at a
minimum, must include:
(1) A range of forecasts of future customer demand using methods
that examine the effect of economic forces on the consumption of
electricity and that address changes in the number, type, and
efficiency of electrical end-uses;
(2) An assessment of technically feasible improvements in the
efficient use of electricity, including load management and fuel
switching, as well as currently employed and new policies and programs
needed to obtain the efficiency improvements;
(3) An assessment of technically feasible generating technologies
including but not limited to renewable resources, cogeneration, power
purchases, and thermal resources;
(4) An evaluation comparing the cost-effectiveness of generating
resources with the cost-effectiveness of improvements in the efficient
use of electricity;
(5) The integration of the demand forecasts and resource
evaluations into a long-range integrated resource plan describing the
mix of resources and efficiency measures that will meet current and
future needs at the lowest reasonable cost, including an assessment of
risk associated with fuel price, fuel availability, hedging, and future
environmental regulations, to the utility and its ratepayers;
(6) A short-term plan outlining the specific actions to be taken by
the utility consistent with the long-range integrated resource plan;
and
(7) For all plans subsequent to the initial integrated resource
plan, a progress report that relates the new plan to the previous plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Investor-owned utilities shall submit
integrated resource plans to the commission. The commission shall
establish by rule the requirements for preparation and submission of
integrated resource plans.
(2) The commission may adopt additional rules as necessary to
clarify the requirements of section 4 of this act as they apply to
investor-owned utilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Each consumer-owned utility shall
develop and publish a work schedule for the preparation of an
integrated resource plan. The work schedule shall set forth the
proposed content of the integrated resource plan, the proposed schedule
of preparation, and provisions for public involvement in the
preparation and review of the plan. The governing body of each utility
shall approve an integrated resource plan only after it has provided
public notice and hearing on the proposed plan. Upon approval of its
governing board, each consumer-owned utility shall publish a final
integrated resource plan either as part of an annual report or as a
separate document available to the public.
(2) Each consumer-owned utility shall transmit a copy of its
integrated resource plan to the department by July 31, 2007, and
transmit subsequent plans every two years thereafter.
(3) Consumer-owned utilities may develop integrated resource plans
jointly with other consumer-owned utilities. Data and assessments
included in joint reports must be identifiable to each individual
utility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department shall review the integrated
resource plans of investor-owned and consumer-owned utilities and
prepare a report to the legislature. The report shall include a
statewide summary of utility load forecasts, load/resource balance, and
utility plans for the development of thermal generation, renewable
resources, and efficiency resources. The commission shall provide the
department with data summarizing activities of investor-owned utilities
for use in the department's statewide summary. The department shall
submit the initial report by December 1, 2007, and subsequent reports
every two years thereafter. Where appropriate, the department may
include reports required by this section within the biennial report
required under RCW 43.21F.045.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The renewable energy target for electric
utilities is as follows:
(a) By January 1, 2011, and each year thereafter through December
31, 2015, the percentage of annual retail load represented by eligible
renewable resources or equivalent renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both, equal to the statewide renewable energy goal
percentage established by the department in 2009 under section 3 of
this act.
(b) By January 1, 2016, and each year thereafter through December
31, 2020, the percentage of annual retail load represented by eligible
renewable resources or equivalent renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both, equal to the statewide renewable energy goal
percentage established by the department in 2013 under section 3 of
this act.
(c) By January 1, 2021, and each year thereafter, the percentage of
annual retail load represented by eligible renewable resources or
equivalent renewable energy credits, or a combination of both, equal to
the statewide renewable energy goal percentage established by the
department in 2019 under section 3 of this act.
(2) Nothing in this chapter limits electric utilities from
exceeding this renewable energy target.
(3) In meeting this renewable energy target, an electric utility
may contribute eligible renewable resources even if it also receives
credit or funding from the Bonneville power administration for those
resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 By January 1, 2010, and biennially
thereafter, each electric utility that chooses to contribute toward the
statewide renewable energy target, must report on the renewable energy
it has acquired to meet the target and its annual retail load.
Consumer-owned electric utilities provide this information to the
department and investor-owned utilities provide this information to the
commission. The department shall coordinate with the commission to
include information relating to the investor-owned utilities. The
department shall include this information as part of its biennial
report required under RCW 43.21F.045.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) In meeting the renewable energy target,
an electric utility may contribute eligible renewable resources even if
it also receives credit or funding from the Bonneville power
administration for those resources.
(2) In meeting the renewable energy target, a consumer-owned
utility that is a customer of the Bonneville power administration can
contribute that portion of its load served by eligible renewable
resources that are part of the Bonneville power administration's system
mix. A utility also can contribute credit toward meeting this target
for the portion of environmentally preferred power it purchases from
the Bonneville power administration that meets the definition of an
eligible renewable resource.
(3) An electric utility that offers an optional pricing program
that charges a higher rate for electricity generated from qualified
alternative energy resources under RCW 19.29A.090 may contribute only
the energy generated under such a program that qualifies as eligible
renewable resources toward meeting this statewide renewable energy
target. An electric utility must separately disclose the energy
generated under an optional pricing program.
(4)(a) An electric utility may contribute additional credit toward
meeting the renewable energy target if it acquires eligible renewable
resources physically located in Washington state:
(i) Where the eligible renewable resource commenced construction
after December 31, 2006; and
(ii) Where the electric utility purchased or contracted for the
eligible renewable resource by December 31, 2010.
(b) An electric utility that acquires energy from an eligible
renewable resource that meets the criteria under this section may count
that resource above its base value toward meeting the renewable energy
target according to the following benchmarks:
(i) Energy from an eligible renewable resource purchased or
contracted by December 31, 2006, can be counted at one and one-tenth
times its base value;
(ii) Energy from an eligible renewable resource purchased or
contracted by December 31, 2007, can be counted at one and nine-hundredths times its base value;
(iii) Energy from an eligible renewable resource purchased or
contracted by December 31, 2008, can be counted at one and eight-hundredths times its base value; or
(iv) Energy from an eligible renewable resource purchased or
contracted by December 31, 2009, can be counted at one and seven-hundredths times its base value.
(5)(a) An electric utility may contribute additional credit toward
meeting the renewable energy target if it acquires eligible renewable
resources physically located in Washington state or renewable energy
credits from an eligible renewable resource physically located in
Washington state:
(i) Where the eligible renewable resource commenced construction
after December 31, 2006; and
(ii) Where the renewable energy developer used apprenticeship
programs during construction of the eligible renewable resources.
(b) The apprenticeship programs must be approved by the
apprenticeship council under its authority in chapter 49.04 RCW,
according to the following benchmarks:
(i) Minimum levels of apprenticeship programs shall be ten percent
of total labor hours for projects commencing construction after
December 31, 2008;
(ii) Minimum levels of apprenticeship programs shall be twelve and
one-half percent of total labor hours for projects commencing
construction after December 31, 2015; or
(iii) Minimum levels of apprenticeship programs shall be fifteen
percent of total labor hours for projects commencing construction after
December 31, 2022.
(c) The apprenticeship council will determine if construction of an
eligible renewable resource meets one of the benchmarks listed in (b)
of this subsection.
(d) An electric utility that acquires energy or renewable energy
credits from an eligible renewable resource that meets the criteria
under this section may count that resource at one and two-tenths times
its base value toward meeting the renewable energy target.
(6) An electric utility may contribute eligible distributed
generation towards meeting the renewable energy target if the utility:
(a) Owns the distributed generation facility and the renewable energy
credits produced by the facility; or (b) through contract with a retail
electric customer has purchased the renewable energy credits of a
distributed generation facility.
(7) An electric utility may contribute credit towards meeting the
renewable energy target for resources when the utility also receives
credit or funding for those same resources under a renewable standard
established by federal legislation. However, an electric utility may
not contribute credit towards meeting the renewable energy target for
resources when the utility also receives credit or funding for those
same resources under a renewable standard established by legislation in
another state.
(8) Nothing in this chapter limits electric utilities from
exceeding the renewable energy target.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The secretary of state shall submit this
act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at
the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

--- END ---