BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.60.010 and 2000 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(2) "Customer-generator" means a user of a net metering system.
(3) "Electrical company" means a company owned by investors that
meets the definition of RCW 80.04.010.
(4) "Electric cooperative" means a cooperative or association
organized under chapter 23.86 or 24.06 RCW.
(5) "Electric utility" means any electrical company, public utility
district, irrigation district, port district, electric cooperative, or
municipal electric utility that is engaged in the business of
distributing electricity to retail electric customers in the state.
(6) "Irrigation district" means an irrigation district under
chapter 87.03 RCW.
(7) "Municipal electric utility" means a city or town that owns or
operates an electric utility authorized by chapter 35.92 RCW.
(8) "Net metering" means measuring the difference between the
electricity supplied by an electric utility and the electricity
generated by a customer-generator that is fed back to the electric
utility over the applicable billing period.
(9) "Net metering system" means ((a fuel cell or)) a facility for
the production of electrical energy that:
(a) Uses ((as its fuel either solar, wind, or hydropower))
renewable energy;
(b) Has a generating capacity of not more than ((twenty-five)) one
hundred kilowatts;
(c) Is located on the customer-generator's premises;
(d) Operates in parallel with the electric utility's transmission
and distribution facilities; and
(e) Is intended primarily to offset part or all of the customer-generator's requirements for electricity.
(10) "Port district" means a port district within which an
industrial development district has been established as authorized by
Title 53 RCW.
(11) "Public utility district" means a district authorized by
chapter 54.04 RCW.
(12) "Renewable energy" means resources whose common characteristic
is that they are nondepletable or are naturally replenishable existing
or emerging nonfossil fuel energy sources or technologies, and shall
include but not be limited to the following:
(a) Solar photovoltaic or solar thermal electric energy;
(b) Wind energy;
(c) Ocean thermal, wave, or tidal energy;
(d) Fuel cells;
(e) Landfill gas;
(f) Incremental gains in energy production from capital and
operational improvements in hydroelectric generating facilities;
(g) Run of river hydropower generation;
(h) Hydroelectric generation that does not impede the flow in
naturally flowing water;
(i) Advanced biomass power conversion technologies, such as
gasification using such biomass fuels as wood, agricultural, or food
wastes, energy crops, biogas, biodiesel, or organic refuse-derived
fuel;
(j) Biomass energy using animal waste, solid organic fuels from
wood, forest, or field residues, dedicated energy crops that do not
include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives
such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; and
(k) Lignin in spent pulping liquors.
The following technologies or fuels shall not be considered
renewable energy supplies: Coal, oil, nuclear power, or fuel gases,
excluding fuel gases that are used in a combined heat and power plant
designed to produce both heat and electricity from a single heat
source.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.60.020 and 2000 c 158 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
An electric utility:
(1) Shall offer to make net metering available to eligible
customers-generators on a first-come, first-served basis until the
cumulative generating capacity of net metering systems equals ((0.1))
0.25 percent of the utility's peak demand during 1996((, of which not
less than 0.05 percent shall be attributable to net metering systems
that use as its fuel either solar, wind, or hydropower)). If one or
more utilities are found to be approaching the maximum cumulative
generating capacity of net metering systems allowed under this
subsection, the legislature may review the generation threshold
contained in this section for potential modification. On January 1,
2014, the cumulative generating capacity of net metering systems will
equal 0.5 percent of the utility's peak demand during 1996;
(2) Shall allow net metering systems to be interconnected using a
standard kilowatt-hour meter capable of registering the flow of
electricity in two directions, unless the commission, in the case of an
electrical company, or the appropriate governing body, in the case of
other electric utilities, determines, after appropriate notice and
opportunity for comment:
(a) That the use of additional metering equipment to monitor the
flow of electricity in each direction is necessary and appropriate for
the interconnection of net metering systems, after taking into account
the benefits and costs of purchasing and installing additional metering
equipment; and
(b) How the cost of purchasing and installing an additional meter
is to be allocated between the customer-generator and the utility;
(3) Shall charge the customer-generator a minimum monthly fee that
is the same as other customers of the electric utility in the same rate
class, but shall not charge the customer-generator any additional
standby, capacity, interconnection, or other fee or charge unless the
commission, in the case of an electrical company, or the appropriate
governing body, in the case of other electric utilities, determines,
after appropriate notice and opportunity for comment that:
(a) The electric utility will incur direct costs associated with
interconnecting or administering net metering systems that exceed any
offsetting benefits associated with these systems; and
(b) Public policy is best served by imposing these costs on the
customer-generator rather than allocating these costs among the
utility's entire customer base.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.60.030 and 1998 c 318 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Consistent with the other provisions of this chapter, the net
energy measurement must be calculated in the following manner:
(1) The electric utility shall measure the net electricity produced
or consumed during the billing period, in accordance with normal
metering practices.
(2) If the electricity supplied by the electric utility exceeds the
electricity generated by the customer-generator and fed back to the
electric utility during the billing period, the customer-generator
shall be billed for the net electricity supplied by the electric
utility, in accordance with normal metering practices.
(3) If electricity generated by the customer-generator exceeds the
electricity supplied by the electric utility, the customer-generator:
(a) Shall be billed for the appropriate customer charges for that
billing period, in accordance with RCW 80.60.020; and
(b) Shall be credited for the excess kilowatt-hours generated
during the billing period, with this kilowatt-hour credit appearing on
the bill for the following billing period.
((At the beginning)) On April 30th of each calendar year, any
remaining unused kilowatt-hour credit accumulated during the previous
year shall be granted to the electric utility, without any compensation
to the customer-generator.

Sec. 4 RCW 80.60.040 and 2000 c 158 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A net metering system used by a customer-generator shall
include, at the customer-generator's own expense, all equipment
necessary to meet applicable safety, power quality, and interconnection
requirements established by the national electrical code, national
electrical safety code, the institute of electrical and electronics
engineers, and underwriters laboratories.
(2) The commission, in the case of an electrical company, or the
appropriate governing body, in the case of other electric utilities,
after appropriate notice and opportunity for comment, may adopt by
regulation additional safety, power quality, and interconnection
requirements for customer-generators, including limitations on the
number of customer generators and total capacity of net metering
systems that may be interconnected to any distribution feeder line,
circuit, or network that the commission or governing body determines
are necessary to protect public safety and system reliability.
(3) An electric utility may not require a customer-generator whose
net metering system meets the standards in subsections (1) and (2) of
this section to comply with additional safety or performance standards,
perform or pay for additional tests, or purchase additional liability
insurance. However, an electric utility shall not be liable directly
or indirectly for permitting or continuing to allow an attachment of a
net metering system, or for the acts or omissions of the customer-generator that cause loss or injury, including death, to any third
party.

--- END ---