BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.43.020 and 1995 c 356 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) ((Engineer: The term "engineer" as used in this chapter shall
mean a professional engineer as hereinafter defined.
(2) Professional engineer: The term "professional engineer" within
the meaning and intent of this chapter, shall mean a person who, by
reason of his or her special knowledge of the mathematical and physical
sciences and the principles and methods of engineering analysis and
design, acquired by professional education and practical experience, is
qualified to practice engineering as hereinafter defined, as attested
by his or her legal registration as a professional engineer.
(3) Engineer-in-training: The term "engineer-in-training" as used
in this chapter means a candidate who has: (a) Satisfied the
experience requirements in RCW 18.43.040 for registration; (b)
successfully passed the examination in the fundamental engineering
subjects; and (c) is enrolled by the board as an engineer-in-training.
(4) Engineering: The term "engineering" as used in this chapter
shall mean the "practice of engineering" as hereinafter defined.
(5) Practice of engineering: The term "practice of engineering"
within the meaning and intent of this chapter shall mean any
professional service or creative work requiring engineering education,
training, and experience and the application of special knowledge of
the mathematical, physical, and engineering sciences to such
professional services or creative work as consultation, investigation,
evaluation, planning, design and supervision of construction for the
purpose of assuring compliance with specifications and design, in
connection with any public or private utilities, structures, buildings,
machines, equipment, processes, works, or projects.
A person shall be construed to practice or offer to practice
engineering, within the meaning and intent of this chapter, who
practices any branch of the profession of engineering; or who, by
verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, card, or in any other
way represents himself or herself to be a professional engineer, or
through the use of some other title implies that he or she is a
professional engineer; or who holds himself or herself out as able to
perform, or who does perform, any engineering service or work or any
other professional service designated by the practitioner or recognized
by educational authorities as engineering.
The practice of engineering shall not include the work ordinarily
performed by persons who operate or maintain machinery or equipment.
(6) Land surveyor: The term "land surveyor" as used in this
chapter shall mean a professional land surveyor.
(7) Professional land surveyor: The term "professional land
surveyor" as used in this chapter means a person who, by reason of his
or her special knowledge of the mathematical and physical sciences and
principles and practices of land surveying, which is acquired by
professional education and practical experience, is qualified to
practice land surveying and as attested to by his or her legal
registration as a professional land surveyor.
(8) Land-surveyor-in-training: The term "land-surveyor-in-training" as used in this chapter means a candidate who: (a) Has
satisfied the experience requirements in RCW 18.43.040 for
registration; (b) successfully passes the examination in the
fundamental land surveying subjects; and (c) is enrolled by the board
as a land-surveyor-in-training.
(9) Practice of land surveying: The term "practice of land
surveying" within the meaning and intent of this chapter, shall mean
assuming responsible charge of the surveying of land for the
establishment of corners, lines, boundaries, and monuments, the laying
out and subdivision of land, the defining and locating of corners,
lines, boundaries and monuments of land after they have been
established, the survey of land areas for the purpose of determining
the topography thereof, the making of topographical delineations and
the preparing of maps and accurate records thereof, when the proper
performance of such services requires technical knowledge and skill.
(10) Board: The term)) "Board" ((as used in this chapter shall))
means the state board of registration for professional engineers and
land surveyors, provided for by this chapter.
(2) "Engineer" means a professional engineer as defined in this
section.
(3) "Engineering" means the "practice of engineering" as defined in
this section.
(4) "Engineer-in-training" means a candidate who: (a) Has
satisfied the experience requirements in RCW 18.43.040 for
registration; (b) successfully passes the examination in the
fundamental engineering subjects; and (c) is enrolled by the board as
an engineer-in-training.
(5) "Land surveyor" means a professional land surveyor.
(6) "Land-surveyor-in-training" means a candidate who: (a) Has
satisfied the experience requirements in RCW 18.43.040 for
registration; (b) successfully passes the examination in the
fundamental land surveying subjects; and (c) is enrolled by the board
as a land-surveyor-in-training.
(7)(a) "Practice of engineering" means any professional service or
creative work requiring engineering education, training, and experience
and the application of special knowledge of the mathematical, physical,
and engineering sciences to such professional services or creative work
as consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, design, and
supervision of construction for the purpose of ensuring compliance with
specifications and design, in connection with any public or private
utilities, structures, buildings, machines, equipment, processes,
works, or projects.
(b) A person shall be construed to practice or offer to practice
engineering, within the meaning and intent of this chapter, who
practices any branch of the profession of engineering; or who, by
verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, card, or in any other
way represents himself or herself to be a professional engineer, or
through the use of some other title implies that he or she is a
professional engineer; or who holds himself or herself out as able to
perform, or who does perform, any engineering service or work or any
other professional service designated by the practitioner or recognized
by educational authorities as engineering.
(c) The practice of engineering shall not include the work
ordinarily performed by persons who operate or maintain machinery or
equipment.
(8) "Practice of land surveying" means assuming responsible charge
of and providing, or offering to provide, professional services
involving: Acts of consultation; investigations; testimony evaluation;
planning; preparation of descriptions and reports; mapping; assembling
and interpreting gathered measurements; and information related to one
or more of the following:
(a) Determining the size, shape, and contour of the earth's
surface, any point on the earth, or the position of fixed objects
thereon by means of measuring;
(b) Determining the position of any boundary or nonboundary survey
control monument or reference point thereof, and the setting,
resetting, or replacing of any monument or reference point;
(c) Locating, relocating, establishing, laying out, or retracing
any property line, boundary of any tract of land, road, right-of-way,
or easement;
(d) Locating, relocating, establishing, or laying out any primary
horizontal or vertical control for construction alignment, or any
survey for determining final as-constructed locations;
(e) Making any survey for the subdivision of any real property;
(f) Locating, relocating, laying out, or retracing any lines that
restrict the use of real property;
(g) Creating or modifying the descriptions of the limits of real
property interests. This subsection (8)(g) is not meant to prevent the
transcription of descriptions of existing parcels or interests; and
(h) Creating, preparing, or modifying documents, maps, electronic
data, or computerized data relative to the performance of the
activities in (a) through (g) of this subsection.
(9) "Professional engineer" means a person who, by reason of his or
her special knowledge of the mathematical and physical sciences and the
principles and methods of engineering analysis and design, acquired by
professional education and practical experience, is qualified to
practice engineering as defined in this section, as attested to by his
or her legal registration as a professional engineer.
(10) "Professional land surveyor" means a person who, by reason of
his or her special knowledge of the mathematical and physical sciences
and principles and practices of land surveying, which is acquired by
professional education and practical experience, is qualified to
practice land surveying and as attested to by his or her legal
registration as a professional land surveyor.
(11) "Responsible charge" means the practice of land surveying
performed by the licensee or under the licensee's direct supervision.
(12) "Survey" means to determine and delineate the form, extent,
and position of objects and legal boundaries, such as a tract of land,
by taking linear and angular measurements of the earth's surface, and
by applying the principles of geometry and trigonometry.
(13) "Surveying" means the practice of land surveying as defined in
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.43 RCW
to read as follows:
The review, approval, or examination by a governmental entity of
survey data, documents prepared, or services performed by a person
authorized to practice land surveying must be by, or under the direct
supervision of, another person authorized to practice land surveying.

--- END ---