BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The Washington state combined fund drive is a valuable asset to
the people of the state of Washington, contributing to their health,
education, and well-being;
(b) Charitable contributions by state employees and public agency
retirees contribute significantly to the benefit of charities in
Washington state and around the world;
(c) There is an increasing demand to support charities in
Washington state and around the world;
(d) There are individuals and groups who desire to contribute to
the continued vitality of the Washington state combined fund drive; and
(e) Providing a tax-deductible method for individuals and groups to
contribute is an effective way of increasing available funds to the
charities involved in the Washington state combined fund drive.
(2) It is in the public interest to create a nonprofit foundation
to provide a method for individuals and groups to contribute to the
support of the beneficiaries of the Washington state combined fund
drive.
(3) The purpose of the Washington state combined fund drive
foundation is to solicit support for the combined fund drive, cooperate
with other organizations, and encourage gifts to support and reduce the
administrative cost of the combined fund drive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Foundation" means the Washington state combined fund drive
foundation, created in section 3 of this act.
(2) "Combined fund drive committee" means the authorized group of
individuals appointed by the governor to operate the Washington state
combined fund drive.
(3) "Eligible grant recipients" includes any and all of the
activities of the Washington state combined fund drive committee when
operating the state combined fund drive.
(4) "Eligible projects" means any project, action, or part of any
project or action that serves to provide a benefit to the recipients of
the Washington state combined fund drive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2006, the combined fund drive committee shall
file articles of incorporation in accordance with the Washington
nonprofit corporation act, chapter 24.03 RCW, to establish the
Washington state combined fund drive foundation. The foundation shall
not be an agency, instrumentality, or political subdivision of the
state and shall not disburse public funds.
(2) The Washington state combined fund drive committee and the
combined fund drive program manager may provide administrative support
to the Washington state combined fund drive foundation.
(3) The foundation must have a board of directors consisting of up
to fifteen members. Initial members of the board shall be recommended
by the director of the department of personnel and the combined fund
drive committee for appointment by the governor and collectively have
experience in business, charitable giving, and fund-raising. Initial
appointments must be made by September 30, 2006. Subsequent board
members shall be elected by the general membership of the foundation.
(4) Members of the board serve three-year terms, except for the
initial terms, which must be staggered by the governor to achieve a
balanced mix of terms on the board. Members of the board may serve up
to a maximum of three terms. At the end of a term, a member may
continue to serve until a successor has been elected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As soon as practicable, the board of directors shall organize
themselves and the foundation suitably to carry out the duties of the
foundation, including achieving federal tax status.
(2) The foundation shall actively solicit contributions from
individuals and groups for the benefit of the beneficiaries of the
combined fund drive.
(3) The foundation shall develop criteria for guiding themselves in
either the creation of an endowment, or making of grants to the
Washington state combined fund drive, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Money provided to the Washington state combined fund drive
foundation may not be used to supplant preexisting funding sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---