BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.45.110 and 2003 c 86 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may issue and serve upon a licensee or applicant
a statement of charges if, in the opinion of the director, any licensee
or applicant:
(a) Is engaging or has engaged in an unsafe or unsound financial
practice in conducting the business of a check seller governed by this
chapter;
(b) Is violating or has violated this chapter, including rules,
orders, or subpoenas, any rule adopted under chapter 86, Laws of 2003,
any order issued under chapter 86, Laws of 2003, any subpoena issued
under chapter 86, Laws of 2003, or any condition imposed in writing by
the director or the director's designee in connection with the granting
of any application or other request by the licensee or any written
agreement made with the director;
(c) Is about to do the acts prohibited in (a) or (b) of this
subsection when the opinion that the threat exists is based upon
reasonable cause;
(d) Obtains a license by means of fraud, misrepresentation,
concealment, or through mistake or inadvertence of the director;
(e) Provides false statements or omissions of material information
on the application that, if known, would have allowed the director to
deny the application for the original license;
(f) Fails to pay a fee required by the director or maintain the
required bond;
(g) Commits a crime against the laws of the state of Washington or
any other state or government involving moral turpitude, financial
misconduct, or dishonest dealings;
(h) Knowingly commits or is a party to any material fraud,
misrepresentation, concealment, conspiracy, collusion, trick, scheme,
or device whereby any other person relying upon the word,
representation, or conduct acts to his or her injury or damage;
(i) Converts any money or its equivalent to his or her own use or
to the use of his or her principal or of any other person;
(j) Fails, upon demand by the director or the director's designee,
to disclose any information within his or her knowledge to, or to
produce any document, book, or record in his or her possession for
inspection of, the director or the director's designee;
(k) Commits any act of fraudulent or dishonest dealing, and a
certified copy of the final holding of any court, tribunal, agency, or
administrative body of competent jurisdiction regarding that act is
conclusive evidence in any hearing under this chapter; or
(l) Commits an act or engages in conduct that demonstrates
incompetence or untrustworthiness, or is a source of injury and loss to
the public.
(2) The statement of charges shall be issued under chapter 34.05
RCW. The director or the director's designee may impose the following
sanctions against any licensee or applicant, or any director, officer,
sole proprietor, partner, controlling person, or employee of a licensee
or applicant:
(a) Deny, revoke, suspend, or condition the license;
(b) Order the licensee to cease and desist from practices in
violation of this chapter or practices that constitute unsafe and
unsound financial practices in the sale of checks;
(c) Impose a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars per day for
each day's violation of this chapter;
(d) Order restitution to borrowers or other parties damaged by the
licensee's violation of this chapter or take other affirmative action
as necessary to comply with this chapter; and
(e) Remove from office or ban from participation in the affairs of
any licensee any director, officer, sole proprietor, partner,
controlling person, or employee of a licensee.
(3) In addition to any penalties imposed under subsection (2) of
this section, the director must ban from participation in the affairs
of any licensee any director, officer, sole proprietor, partner,
controlling person, or employee of an entity that engaged in the
business of small loans without being licensed. This ban must be for
a minimum of ten years. It may extend for the lifetime of the banned
person. In determining the length of the ban, the director may
consider the number of consumers, the number of loans, the total amount
loaned, and any other relevant information.
(4) The proceedings to impose the sanctions described in subsection
(2) of this section, including any hearing or appeal of the statement
of charges, are governed by chapter 34.05 RCW.
Unless the licensee personally appears at the hearing or is
represented by a duly authorized representative, the licensee is deemed
to have consented to the statement of charges and the sanctions imposed
in the statement of charges.

--- END ---