BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is
inadequate information to determine the fairness or reasonableness of
fees and interest associated with small loans, also known as payday
loans, regulated under chapter 31.45 RCW.
(2) The director of the department of financial institutions shall
study the economics, business models, and practices associated with the
small loan business operations of lenders with small loan endorsements
under chapter 31.45 RCW. The director must determine break-even points
for small loan businesses included in the study, grouped by size of
operation and/or volume of business, where the revenue from small loan
operations equals the expenses associated with small loan operations.
When making these determinations the director may make reasonable
assumptions as to the expenses to be considered, including but not
limited to the impact of licensing fees, bonds, and assessments under
chapter 31.45 RCW, other fees and taxes, employee medical insurance
expenses, rent, and other business location costs, and advertising
costs.
(3) The director is authorized to request from licensees
information required to complete the study and report to the
legislature. Licensees are required to provide the information
requested. A licensee's unreasonable failure to provide the
information requested by the director shall be grounds for an
enforcement action against the licensee under RCW 31.45.110(1)(j) and
the imposition of the sanctions set forth in RCW 31.45.110(2).
(4) The director must report the findings of this study to the
legislature no later than November 30, 2006. The director may also
study other issues related to small loans and include those issues in
the report. The director may include recommendations based upon the
findings in the report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---