BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is
inadequate information to determine the fairness or reasonableness of
fees and interest associated with small loans, also known as payday
loans. Consumers should be able to access loans at reasonable rates;
no one should have to pay usurious interest rates. While it is unclear
if the current rates associated with payday lending are unfair or
excessive, it is very clear that the rates are high. Under current
law, a borrower using a payday loan often pays annual percentage rates
that result in the loan being paid off multiple times on an annual
basis. For example, a five hundred dollar loan for two weeks could
result in a borrower paying an annual percentage rate of almost four
hundred percent. Paying these types of interest rates can cause a
borrower to need a loan to pay off their loan. By turning to payday
loans again and again, the borrower can become trapped in a debt cycle.
This cycle is most likely to impact people with low incomes who can
least afford to pay high interest rates and have the fewest options in
breaking the debt cycle. While every person must take responsibility
for their actions and decisions, the legislature has a duty to help
protect consumers, particularly the most vulnerable members of our
society. To fulfill this duty, the legislature needs additional
information.

Sec. 2 RCW 31.45.073 and 2003 c 86 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No licensee may engage in the business of making small loans
without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to its license from
the director in accordance with this chapter. An endorsement will be
required for each location where a licensee engages in the business of
making small loans, but a small loan endorsement may authorize a
licensee to make small loans at a location different than the licensed
locations where it cashes or sells checks. A licensee may have more
than one endorsement.
(2) A borrower must be allowed a minimum of thirty days to pay off
a small loan. A licensee may not charge an additional fee or interest
if the borrower pays off the loan within forty-five days. The
termination date of a small loan may not exceed the origination date of
that same small loan by more than forty-five days, including weekends
and holidays, unless the term of the loan is extended by agreement of
both the borrower and the licensee and no additional fee or interest is
charged. The maximum principal amount of any small loan, or the
outstanding principal balances of all small loans made by a licensee to
a single borrower at any one time, may not exceed seven hundred
dollars.
(3) A licensee that has obtained the required small loan
endorsement may charge interest or fees for small loans not to exceed
in the aggregate fifteen percent of the first five hundred dollars of
principal. If the principal exceeds five hundred dollars, a licensee
may charge interest or fees not to exceed in the aggregate ten percent
of that portion of the principal in excess of five hundred dollars. If
a licensee makes more than one loan to a single borrower, and the
aggregated principal of all loans made to that borrower exceeds five
hundred dollars at any one time, the licensee may charge interest or
fees not to exceed in the aggregate ten percent on that portion of the
aggregated principal of all loans at any one time that is in excess of
five hundred dollars. The director may determine by rule which fees,
if any, are not subject to the interest or fee limitations described in
this section. It is a violation of this chapter for any licensee to
knowingly loan to a single borrower at any one time, in a single loan
or in the aggregate, more than the maximum principal amount described
in this section.
(4) In connection with making a small loan, a licensee may advance
moneys on the security of a postdated check. The licensee may not
accept any other property, title to property, or other evidence of
ownership of property as collateral for a small loan. The licensee may
accept only one postdated check per loan as security for the loan. A
licensee may permit a borrower to redeem a postdated check with a
payment of cash or the equivalent of cash. The licensee may disburse
the proceeds of a small loan in cash, in the form of a check, or in the
form of the electronic equivalent of cash or a check.
(5) No person may at any time cash or advance any moneys on a
postdated check or draft in excess of the amount of goods or services
purchased without first obtaining a small loan endorsement to a check
casher or check seller license.

--- END ---