BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to state credit unions with respect
to the use of any article of tangible personal property, service
defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), or extended
warranty, acquired from a federal credit union, foreign credit union,
or out-of-state credit union as a result of a merger or conversion.
(2) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Federal credit union" means a credit union organized and
operating under the laws of the United States.
(b) "Foreign credit union" means a credit union organized and
operating under the laws of another country or other foreign
jurisdiction.
(c) "Out-of-state credit union" means a credit union organized and
operating under the laws of another state or United States territory or
possession.
(d) "State credit union" means a credit union organized and
operating under the laws of this state.

--- END ---