BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.101.085 and 2001 c 167 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to its other powers granted under this chapter, the
commission has authority and power to:
(1) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules as necessary to carry out this
chapter;
(2) Issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with
investigations, hearings, or other proceedings held under this chapter;
(3) Take or cause to be taken depositions and other discovery
procedures as needed in investigations, hearings, and other proceedings
held under this chapter;
(4) Appoint members of a hearings board as provided under RCW
43.101.380;
(5) Enter into contracts for professional services determined by
the commission to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this
chapter;
(6) Grant, deny, or revoke certification of peace officers under
the provisions of this chapter;
(7) Designate individuals authorized to sign subpoenas and
statements of charges under the provisions of this chapter; ((and))
(8) Employ such investigative, administrative, and clerical staff
as necessary for the enforcement of this chapter; and
(9) To grant, deny, or revoke certification of tribal police
officers whose tribal governments have agreed to participate in the
tribal police officer certification process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Tribal governments may voluntarily request certification for
their police officers. Tribal governments requesting certification for
their police officers must enter into a written agreement with the
commission. The agreement must require the tribal law enforcement
agency and its officers to comply with all of the requirements for
granting, denying, and revoking certification as those requirements are
applied to peace officers certified under this chapter and the rules of
the commission.
(2) Officers making application for certification as tribal police
officers shall meet the requirements of this chapter and the rules of
the commission as those requirements are applied to certification of
peace officers. Application for certification as a tribal police
officer shall be accepted and processed in the same manner as those for
certification of peace officers.
(3) For purposes of certification, "tribal police officer" means
any person employed and commissioned by a tribal government to enforce
the criminal laws of that government.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.101.380 and 2001 c 167 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The procedures governing adjudicative proceedings before
agencies under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act,
govern hearings before the commission and govern all other actions
before the commission unless otherwise provided in this chapter. The
standard of proof in actions before the commission is clear, cogent,
and convincing evidence.
(2) ((On all appeals brought)) In all hearings requested under RCW
43.101.155, a five-member hearings panel shall both hear the case and
make the commission's final administrative decision. Members of the
commission or the board on law enforcement training standards and
education may but need not be appointed to the hearings panels. The
commission shall appoint as follows two or more panels to hear appeals
from decertification actions:
(a) When ((an appeal)) a hearing is ((filed)) requested in relation
to decertification of a Washington peace officer who is not a peace
officer of the Washington state patrol, the commission shall appoint to
the panel: (i) One police chief; (ii) one sheriff; (iii) two peace
officers who are at or below the level of first line supervisor, who
are from city or county law enforcement agencies, and who have at least
ten years' experience as peace officers; and (iv) one person who is not
currently a peace officer and who represents a community college or
four-year college or university.
(b) When ((an appeal)) a hearing is ((filed)) requested in relation
to decertification of a peace officer of the Washington state patrol,
the commission shall appoint to the panel: (i) Either one police chief
or one sheriff; (ii) one administrator of the state patrol; (iii) one
peace officer who is at or below the level of first line supervisor,
who is from a city or county law enforcement agency, and who has at
least ten years' experience as a peace officer; (iv) one state patrol
officer who is at or below the level of first line supervisor, and who
has at least ten years' experience as a peace officer; and (v) one
person who is not currently a peace officer and who represents a
community college or four-year college or university.
(c) When a hearing is requested in relation to decertification of
a tribal police officer, the commission shall appoint to the panel (i)
either one chief or one sheriff; (ii) one tribal police chief; (iii)
one peace officer who is at or below the level of first line
supervisor, who is from a city or county law enforcement agency, and
who has at least ten years' experience as a peace officer; (iv) one
tribal police officer who is at or below the level of first line
supervisor, and who has at least ten years' experience as a peace
officer; and (v) one person who is not currently a peace officer and
who represents a community college or four-year college or university.
(d) Persons appointed to hearings panels by the commission shall,
in relation to any decertification matter on which they sit, have the
powers, duties, and immunities, and are entitled to the emoluments,
including travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060, of regular commission members.
(3) Where the charge upon which revocation or denial is based is
that a peace officer was "discharged for disqualifying misconduct," and
the discharge is "final," within the meaning of RCW 43.101.105(((4)))
(1)(d), and the officer received a civil service hearing or arbitration
hearing culminating in an affirming decision following separation from
service by the employer, the hearings panel may revoke or deny
certification if the hearings panel determines that the discharge
occurred and was based on disqualifying misconduct; the hearings panel
need not redetermine the underlying facts but may make this
determination based solely on review of the records and decision
relating to the employment separation proceeding. However, the
hearings panel may, in its discretion, consider additional evidence to
determine whether such a discharge occurred and was based on such
disqualifying misconduct. The hearings panel shall, upon written
request by the subject peace officer, allow the peace officer to
present additional evidence of extenuating circumstances.
Where the charge upon which revocation or denial of certification
is based is that a peace officer "has been convicted at any time of a
felony offense" within the meaning of RCW 43.101.105(((3))) (1)(c), the
hearings panel shall revoke or deny certification if it determines that
the peace officer was convicted of a felony. The hearings panel need
not redetermine the underlying facts but may make this determination
based solely on review of the records and decision relating to the
criminal proceeding. However, the hearings panel shall, upon the
panel's determination of relevancy, consider additional evidence to
determine whether the peace officer was convicted of a felony.
Where the charge upon which revocation or denial is based is under
RCW 43.101.105 (1)((, (2), (5), or (6))) (a), (b), (e), or (f), the
hearings panel shall determine the underlying facts relating to the
charge upon which revocation or denial of certification is based.
(4) The commission's final administrative decision is subject to
judicial review under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---