BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that it is in the
best interest of the state to find innovative and economically
sustainable ways to protect the state's dwindling natural resource
lands from development or other conversion from working lands or
wildlife habitat.
(2) The legislature further finds that working natural resource and
wildlife habitat lands can be conserved through properly functioning
transfer of development rights programs. However, to be successful, a
transfer of development rights program must be established in a fashion
that facilitates an economically robust market in which development
credits from natural resource lands are in demand and can be traded
openly in a market.
(3) The legislature further finds that a number of geographically
limited demonstration projects should be established to create a
template for the protection of natural resources that can be emulated
by other areas within the state. These demonstration projects would
require technical and financial support from a state level that would
create and nourish the transfer of development rights programs both in
their infancy and as a source of ongoing support once the projects are
established. Finally, the demonstration projects should be designed in
such a way that there is capacity for private third-party entities to
facilitate the transfer of credits and ensure a robust market.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of community, trade, and
economic development, in consultation with the department of fish and
wildlife for the identification of wildlife habitat, shall provide
support and funding for a minimum of two county-specific transfer of
development rights demonstration projects. These projects must utilize
a system to facilitate the trade of development credits from natural
resource and habitat lands, including designated or nondesignated farm
lands, forest lands, mineral lands, open spaces, and other land the
county desires to protect from development, to areas of the county more
appropriate for residential or commercial development. Natural
resource and habitat lands from which development credits are
transferred must be forever protected from additional future
development.
(2) Projects established under this section must be under the
direction and administration of the legislative authority of the county
hosting the project, except as the county has delegated administration
responsibilities to a city or cities within the county. However, the
department of community, trade, and economic development must provide
initial funding and guidance along with ongoing financial and technical
assistance.
(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development
may only initiate a demonstration project within counties that are
willing hosts. The number of demonstration projects must be determined
by the amount of funding provided to the department of community,
trade, and economic development. However, at least two projects must
be initiated. The demonstration projects may be established in
counties without a similar program, or may provide funding and
assistance to a county with an existing but underutilized program. Due
to unique geographic conditions, existing land uses, and population
patterns, Kittitas and Snohomish counties must be given the first
option to host one of the demonstration projects.
(4) Funding provided by the department of community, trade, and
economic development may be used for direct financial support to host
counties and for securing private third-party organizations to
administer aspects of the credit trading program.
(5) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall provide the appropriate committees of the legislature with a
status report by December 31, 2006. A final report must be provided to
the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than thirty-six
months after the initiation of the initial demonstration projects.
Both reports must be prepared in coordination with the host counties
and include any suggestions for improving either the demonstration
projects or the tools available to counties for the operation of their
own transfer of development rights programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---