BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Public Service Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,600,000
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
transfer to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for the low-income home energy assistance program. The
department shall not use any of this appropriation for administrative
costs.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.01.080 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 940 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is created in the state treasury a public service revolving
fund. Regulatory fees payable by all types of public service companies
shall be deposited to the credit of the public service revolving fund.
Except for expenses payable out of the pipeline safety account, all
expense of operation of the Washington utilities and transportation
commission shall be payable out of the public service revolving fund.
During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the public service revolving fund to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.
Due to the extraordinarily high winter energy costs, during the
2005-2007 fiscal biennium, no more than seven million six hundred
thousand dollars, as appropriated in section 1 of this act, shall be
payable out of the public service revolving fund to provide energy
assistance to customers in accordance with the low-income energy
assistance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---