BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund
to the department of community, trade, and economic development for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, as a pilot project to contract with
a statewide procurement technical assistance program based in Snohomish
county to expand procurement technical assistance services.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall report to the legislature on the results of the pilot project.
The report shall include the number of businesses served, contracts
written, monetary value of contracts, and a plan for sustainable and
ongoing funding. The department shall report to the appropriate
legislative committees by January 1, 2007.

--- END ---