BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.155 and 1998 c 191 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When purchasing any hunting license, persons under the age of
eighteen shall present certification of completion of a course of
instruction of at least ten hours in the safe handling of firearms,
safety, conservation, and sportsmanship. ((Beginning January 1,
1995,)) All persons purchasing any hunting license for the first time,
if born after January 1, 1972, shall present such certification.
(2) The director may establish a program for training persons in
the safe handling of firearms, conservation, and sportsmanship and
shall prescribe the type of instruction and the qualifications of the
instructors. The director may cooperate with the National Rifle
Association, organized sportsmen's groups, or other public or private
organizations when establishing the training program.
((The director shall prescribe the type of instruction and the
qualifications of the instructors.))
(3) Upon the successful completion of ((the)) a course established
under this section, ((a)) the trainee shall receive a hunter education
certificate signed by an authorized instructor. The certificate is
evidence of compliance with this section.
(4) The director may accept certificates from other states that
persons have successfully completed firearm safety, hunter education,
or similar courses as evidence of compliance with this section.
(5) To encourage the participation of an adequate number of
instructors for the training program, the commission shall develop
nonmonetary incentives available to individuals who commit to serving
as an instructor. The incentives may include additional hunting
opportunities for instructors.

--- END ---