BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall, when reviewing applications for hydraulic
projects under RCW 77.55.021 specifically intended by the applicant to
eliminate or reduce damages to upland properties caused by potential
floods, give equal consideration to protecting fish life, public
safety, and private property.
(2) Any denial or conditioning by the department of a hydraulic
project approval specifically intended by the applicant to eliminate or
reduce damages to upland properties caused by potential floods must be
accompanied by a written analysis, signed by the director, explaining
the denial or condition of the hydraulic project in terms of fish life,
public safety, and private property protection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person who suffers damages to his or her property due to
flooding of a riparian area may bring an action against the department
of fish and wildlife as a state agency, along with a personal action
against the director of the department of fish and wildlife, in a court
of competent jurisdiction for exemplary damages of up to three times
the actual damages sustained in the flooding event, plus reasonable
fees for attorney expenses and expenses incurred in proving flood
damages, if the department of fish and wildlife had, in the ten years
preceding the flood event, denied or unreasonably conditioned a
hydraulic project approval under chapter 77.55 RCW for a hydraulic
project that would have prevented or lessened the flood damage. The
person bringing the action under this section is not required to be the
same person who applied for the denied or conditioned hydraulic project
approval.
(2) The person bringing an action under this section must prove by
a preponderance of the evidence both the value of damages caused
directly or indirectly by the flood event, as well as whether the
completion of the project for which the denial was issued would have
prevented or lessened the flood damage.
(3) In actions where both the department of fish and wildlife as a
public agency and the director of the department of fish and wildlife
as an individual are found liable under this section, both the
department and the director shall be held jointly and severally liable.
(4) All damages due to the person bringing a successful action
under this section by the department of fish and wildlife must be paid
within thirty days of final judgment exclusively from the state
wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170.

Sec. 3 RCW 4.24.470 and 1987 c 212 s 401 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, an appointed or
elected official or member of the governing body of a public agency is
immune from civil liability for damages for any discretionary decision
or failure to make a discretionary decision within his or her official
capacity, but liability shall remain on the public agency for the
tortious conduct of its officials or members of the governing body.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Public agency" means any state agency, board, commission,
department, institution of higher education, school district, political
subdivision, or unit of local government of this state including but
not limited to municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations,
special purpose districts, and local service districts.
(b) "Governing body" means the policy-making body of a public
agency.

Sec. 4 RCW 4.24.490 and 1989 c 413 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, the state shall
indemnify and hold harmless its employees in the amount of any judgment
obtained or fine levied against an employee in any state or federal
court, or in the amount of the settlement of a claim, or shall pay the
judgment, fine, or settlement, if the act or omission that gave rise to
the civil or criminal liability was in good faith and occurred while
the employee was acting within the scope of his or her employment or
duties and the employee is being represented in accordance with RCW
4.92.070.
(2) For purposes of this section "state employee" means a member of
the civil service or an exempt person under chapter 41.06 RCW((, or
higher education personnel under chapter 28B.16 RCW)).

--- END ---