BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 44.20.030 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 32 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
The statute law committee, after ((each and)) every legislative
session, whether regular or ((extraordinary)) special, shall ((cause to
be reproduced or printed)) have available, on demand, for temporary use
separate copies of each act filed in the office of secretary of state
within ten days after the filing thereof.
((The committee shall cause to be reproduced or printed three
thousand copies or such additional number as may be necessary of
temporary bound sets of all acts filed in the office of secretary of
state within seventy-five days after the final adjournment of the
legislature for that year.))

Sec. 2 RCW 44.20.050 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 32 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
When all of the acts of any session of the legislature and
initiative measures enacted by the people since the next preceding
session have been certified to the statute law committee, the code
reviser employed by the statute law committee shall make the proper
headings and index of such acts or laws and, after such work has been
completed, the statute law committee shall have published and bound
((in good buckram at least six hundred copies or such additional))
within seventy-five days after final adjournment of the legislature for
that year as many copies as ((may be)) necessary of such acts and laws,
with such headings and indexes, and such other matter as may be deemed
essential, including a title page showing the session at which such
acts were passed, the date of convening and adjournment of the session,
and any other matter deemed proper, including a certificate by the
secretary of state of such referendum measures as may have been enacted
by the people since the next preceding session.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 40.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The statute law committee, after each legislative session, shall
distribute, sell, or exchange session laws as required under this
section.
(1) One set shall be given to the following: The United States
supreme court library; each state adult correctional institution; each
state mental institution; the state historical society; the state bar
association; the Olympia press corps library; the University of
Washington library; the library of each of the regional universities;
The Evergreen State College library; the Washington State University
library; each county law library; and the municipal reference branch of
the Seattle public library.
(2) One set shall be given to the following upon their request:
Each member of the legislature; each state agency and its divisions;
each state commission, committee, board, and council; each community
college; each assistant attorney general; each member of the United
States senate and house of representatives from this state; each state
official whose office is created by the Constitution; each prosecuting
attorney; and each public library in cities of the first class.
(3) Two sets shall be given to the following: The administrator
for the courts; the library of congress; the law libraries of any
accredited law schools established in this state; and the governor.
(4) Two sets shall be given to the following upon their request:
Each United States district court in the state; and each office and
branch office of the United States district attorneys in this state.
(5) Three sets shall be given to the library of the circuit court
of appeals of the ninth circuit, upon its request.
(6) The following may request, and receive at no charge, as many
sets as are needed for their official business: The senate and house
of representatives; each county auditor, who shall receive and
distribute sets for use by his or her county's officials; the office of
the code reviser; the secretary of the senate; the chief clerk of the
house of representatives; the supreme court; each court of appeals in
the state; the superior courts; the state library; and the state law
library.
(7) Surplus copies of the session laws shall be sold and delivered
by the statute law committee, in which case the price of the bound
volumes shall be sufficient to cover costs. All money received from
the sale of the session law sets shall be paid into the state treasury
for the general fund.
(8) The statute law committee may exchange session law sets for
similar laws or legal materials of other states, territories, and
governments, and make such other distribution of the sets as in its
judgment seems proper.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 40.04.035 (Temporary edition of session laws -- Distribution
and sale) and 1995 c 24 s 2 & 1982 1st ex.s. c 32 s 5; and
(2) RCW 40.04.040 (Permanent edition of session laws -- Distribution,
sale, exchange -- Sale of surplus copies) and 1995 c 24 s 3, 1982 1st
ex.s. c 32 s 1, 1981 c 162 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 94, 1973 c 33 s 1,
1969 c 6 s 8, & 1941 c 150 s 4.

--- END ---