BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.055 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 14 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The department is authorized to establish copayment, deductible, or
coinsurance, or other cost-sharing requirements for recipients of any
medical programs defined in RCW 74.09.010, except that premiums shall
not be imposed on children in households at or below two hundred
percent of the federal poverty level.

--- END ---