BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 82.24.026 (Additional tax imposed--Deposit into accounts) and 2005 c 514 s 1102 are each repealed.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.520 and 2005 c 518 s 937, 2005 c 514 s 1107, and
2005 c 514 s 202 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8),
66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(9)(a), 82.08.150 (5) and
(7)(b)(iii), 82.24.020(2), ((82.24.026(2)(c),)) 82.64.020, and section
420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989 shall be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for funding services and
programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of 1994
sp. sess., including state incarceration costs. Funds from the account
may also be appropriated to reimburse local governments for costs
associated with implementing criminal justice legislation including
chapter 338, Laws of 1997. During the 2003-2005 and 2005-2007
bienniums, funds from the account may also be used for costs associated
with providing grants to local governments in accordance with chapter
338, Laws of 1997, funding drug offender treatment services in
accordance with RCW 70.96A.350, maintenance and operating costs of the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs jail reporting
system, maintenance and operating costs of the juvenile rehabilitation
administration's client activity tracking system, civil indigent legal
representation, multijurisdictional narcotics task forces, transfers to
the health services account, and grants to community networks under
chapter 70.190 RCW by the family policy council.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.146.030 and 2005 c 518 s 940 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The water quality account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be used only in a manner
consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the account shall be
administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
tax receipts as provided in RCW 82.24.027((, 82.24.026(2)(d),
82.26.025,)) and 82.32.390, principal and interest from the repayment
of any loans granted pursuant to this chapter, and any other moneys
appropriated to the account by the legislature.
(2) The department may use or permit the use of any moneys in the
account to make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants to
public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal, local,
or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for water
pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes of
assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water
pollution control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments
made by a public body to a service provider under a service agreement
entered into pursuant to RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this
chapter and for related administrative expenses. For the period July
1, 2005, to June 30, 2007, moneys in the account may be used to process
applications received by the department that seek to make changes to or
transfer existing water rights, for water conveyance projects, and for
grants and technical assistance to public bodies for watershed planning
under chapter 90.82 RCW. No more than three percent of the moneys
deposited in the account may be used by the department to pay for the
administration of the grant and loan program authorized by this
chapter.
(3) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 1997, the
department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of
moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31st of the odd-numbered year. The
report shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description,
and amount of the grant, loan, or both.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act does not affect any existing right
acquired, liability or obligation incurred, or proceeding instituted,
under section 1102, chapter 514, Laws of 2005, including any rule or
order adopted pursuant to section 1102, chapter 514, Laws of 2005,
prior to the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---