BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.150 and 2005 c 514 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each retail
sale of spirits in the original package at the rate of fifteen percent
of the selling price. The tax imposed in this subsection shall apply
to all such sales including sales by the Washington state liquor stores
and agencies, but excluding sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
licensees.
(2) There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each sale of
spirits in the original package at the rate of ten percent of the
selling price on sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies
to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(3) There is levied and shall be collected an additional tax upon
each retail sale of spirits in the original package at the rate of one
dollar and seventy-two cents per liter. The additional tax imposed in
this subsection shall apply to all such sales including sales by
Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(4) An additional tax is imposed equal to fourteen percent
multiplied by the taxes payable under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of
this section.
(5) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of seven cents per liter. The
additional tax imposed in this subsection shall apply to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and
including sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(6)(a) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in
the original package at the rate of ((one and seven-tenths percent of
the selling price through June 30, 1995, two and six-tenths percent of
the selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
and)) three and four-tenths percent of the selling price
((thereafter)). This additional tax applies to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, but
excluding sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(b) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in the
original package at the rate of ((one and one-tenth percent of the
selling price through June 30, 1995, one and seven-tenths percent of
the selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
and)) two and three-tenths percent of the selling price ((thereafter)).
This additional tax applies to all such sales to spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant licensees.
(c) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of ((twenty cents per liter through
June 30, 1995, thirty cents per liter for the period July 1, 1995,
through June 30, 1997, and)) forty-one cents per liter ((thereafter)).
This additional tax applies to all such sales including sales by
Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(d) All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes
under this subsection shall be deposited in the health services account
created under RCW 43.72.900 by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.
(7)(((a) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of
spirits in the original package at the rate of one dollar and thirty-three cents per liter. This additional tax applies to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, but
excluding sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(b) All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes
under this subsection shall be deposited by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month as follows:
(i) 97.5 percent into the general fund;
(ii) 2.3 percent into the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900; and
(iii) 0.2 percent into the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account created under RCW 69.50.520.
(8))) The tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
spirits in the original package.
(((9))) (8) The taxes imposed in this section shall be paid by the
buyer to the seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the
full amount of the tax payable in respect to each taxable sale under
this section. The taxes required by this section to be collected by
the seller shall be stated separately from the selling price and for
purposes of determining the tax due from the buyer to the seller, it
shall be conclusively presumed that the selling price quoted in any
price list does not include the taxes imposed by this section.
(((10))) (9) As used in this section, the terms, "spirits" and
"package" shall have the meaning ascribed to them in chapter 66.04 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.520 and 2005 c 518 s 937, 2005 c 514 s 1107, and
2005 c 514 s 202 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8),
66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(9)(a), 82.08.150(5) ((and
(7)(b)(iii))), 82.24.020(2), 82.24.026(2)(c), 82.64.020, and section
420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989 shall be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for funding services and
programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of 1994
sp. sess., including state incarceration costs. Funds from the account
may also be appropriated to reimburse local governments for costs
associated with implementing criminal justice legislation including
chapter 338, Laws of 1997. During the 2003-2005 and 2005-2007
bienniums, funds from the account may also be used for costs associated
with providing grants to local governments in accordance with chapter
338, Laws of 1997, funding drug offender treatment services in
accordance with RCW 70.96A.350, maintenance and operating costs of the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs jail reporting
system, maintenance and operating costs of the juvenile rehabilitation
administration's client activity tracking system, civil indigent legal
representation, multijurisdictional narcotics task forces, transfers to
the health services account, and grants to community networks under
chapter 70.190 RCW by the family policy council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act does not affect any existing right
acquired, liability or obligation incurred, or proceeding instituted,
under section 201(7), chapter 514, Laws of 2005, including any rule or
order adopted pursuant to section 201(7), chapter 514, Laws of 2005,
prior to the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---