BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.11.020 and 1998 c 292 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to community property rights, upon the death of an
owner the owner's interest in any nonprobate asset specifically
referred to in the owner's will belongs to the testamentary beneficiary
named to receive the nonprobate asset, notwithstanding the rights of
any beneficiary designated before the date of the will.
(2) A general residuary gift in an owner's will, or a will making
general disposition of all of the owner's property, does not entitle
the devisees or legatees to receive nonprobate assets of the owner.
(3) A disposition in a will of the owner's interest in "all
nonprobate assets" or of all of a category of nonprobate asset under
RCW 11.11.010(7), such as "all of my payable on death bank accounts" or
similar language, is deemed to be a disposition of all the nonprobate
assets the beneficiaries of which are designated before the date of the
will.
(4) If the owner designates a beneficiary for a nonprobate asset
after the date of the will, the specific provisions in the will
((does)) that attempt to control the disposition of that asset do not
govern the disposition of that nonprobate asset, even if the subsequent
beneficiary designation is later revoked. If the owner revokes the
later beneficiary designation, ((the prior will does not govern the
disposition of the nonprobate asset)) and there is no other provision
controlling the disposition of the asset, the asset shall be treated as
any other general asset of the owner's estate, subject to disposition
under the other applicable provisions of the will. A beneficiary
designation with respect to an asset that renews without the signature
of the owner is deemed to have been made on the date on which the
account was first opened.

Sec. 2 RCW 11.11.040 and 1998 c 292 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
In transferring nonprobate assets, a personal representative, a
financial institution, or other third party may rely conclusively and
entirely upon the form of the nonprobate asset and the terms of the
nonprobate asset arrangement in effect on the date of death of the
owner, and a personal representative or third party may rely on
information provided by a financial institution or other party who has
possession or control of a nonprobate asset concerning the form of the
nonprobate asset and the terms of the nonprobate asset arrangement in
effect on the date of death of the owner, unless the personal
representative, financial institution, or other third party has actual
knowledge of the existence of a claim by a testamentary beneficiary.
A financial institution or other third party is not required to inquire
as to either the source or ownership of any nonprobate asset in its
possession or under its control, or as to the proposed application of
an asset so transferred. A transfer of a nonprobate asset in
accordance with this section constitutes a complete release and
discharge of the financial institution or other third party from all
claims relating to the nonprobate asset, regardless of whether or not
the transfer is consistent with the actual ownership of the nonprobate
asset.

--- END ---