BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that beavers have
historically played a significant role in maintaining the health of
watersheds in the Pacific Northwest and act as key agents in riparian
ecology. The live trapping and relocating of beavers has long been
recognized as a beneficial wildlife management practice, and has been
successfully utilized to restore and maintain stream ecosystems for
over fifty years. The benefits of active beaver populations include
reduced stream sedimentation, stream temperature moderation, higher
dissolved oxygen levels, overall improved water quality, increased
natural water storage capabilities within watersheds, and reduced
stream velocities. These benefits improve and create habitat for many
other species, including endangered salmon, river otters, sandhill
cranes, trumpeter swans, and other riparian and aquatic species.
Relocating beavers into their historic habitat provides a natural
mechanism for improving the environmental conditions in Washington's
riparian ecosystems without having to resort to governmental regulation
or expensive publically funded engineering projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall offer a beaver relocation permit that
allows the holder or the holder's agent to capture live beavers in the
areas of the state where elevated beaver populations are considered a
nuisance, transport the beavers, and release the live beavers on
property owned or managed by the permit holder. Priority of issuing
permits must be based on properties in which beaver populations are
considered a nuisance.
(2) The department may limit the availability of beaver relocation
permits to areas of the state where:
(a) There is a low probability of released beavers becoming a
nuisance;
(b) Conditions exist for released beavers to improve, maintain, or
manage stream or riparian ecosystem functions; and
(c) There is evidence of historic endemic beaver populations.
(3) The department may condition beaver relocation permits to
maximize the relocation's success and minimize risk. Factors that the
department may condition include:
(a) Stream gradient;
(b) Sufficiency of the water supply;
(c) Stream geomorphology;
(d) Adequacy of a food source;
(e) Proper site elevation and valley width;
(f) Age of the beavers relocated;
(g) Times of year for capture and relocation;
(h) Requirements for the capture, handling, and transport of the
live beavers;
(i) Minimum and maximum numbers of beavers that can be relocated in
one area; and
(j) Requirements for the permit holder to initially provide
supplemental food and lodge building materials.
(4) The department shall provide beaver relocation permits at no
charge to the applicant.
(5) The holder of a beaver relocation permit must either obtain a
trapping license under RCW 77.65.450 or employ a trapper licensed under
RCW 77.65.450 to capture and transport the beavers that are to be
relocated.
(6) Nothing in this section creates any liability against the state
or the beaver relocation permit holder nor authorizes any private right
of action for any damages subsequently caused by beavers released
pursuant to a beaver relocation permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever the department undertakes the trapping of nuisance or
problem-causing beavers, the department must, if the option is
available, capture the beavers with a live trap and work with the
holders of beaver relocation permits issued under section 2 of this act
to relocate the beavers onto properties that have requested their
placement.

--- END ---