BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.92 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that there be an effective
state geological survey that can produce essential information that
provides for the health, safety, and economic well-being of the
citizens.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.92.010 and 1988 c 127 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a geological survey of the state ((which)) that
shall be under the direction of the commissioner of public lands who
shall have general charge of the survey, and shall appoint as
supervisor of the survey a geologist of established reputation, to be
known as the ((supervisor of geology)) state geologist.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.92.020 and 1965 c 8 s 43.92.020 are each amended to
read as follows:
The geological survey shall have for its objects:
(1) An examination of the economic products of the state, ((viz))
including: ((The)) Gold, silver, copper, lead, and iron ores, as well
as building stones, clays, coal, and all mineral substances of value;
(2) An examination and classification of ((the)) soils, and the
study of their adaptability to particular crops;
(3) An investigation and report upon the water supplies, artesian
wells, the water power of the state, gauging the streams, etc., with
reference to their application for irrigation and other purposes;
(4) An examination and report upon the occurrence of different road
building material;
(5) An examination of the physical features of the state with
reference to their practical bearing upon the occupations of the
people;
(6) The preparation of special geological and economic maps to
illustrate the resources of the state;
(7) The preparation of special reports with necessary illustrations
and maps, which shall embrace both the general and detailed description
of the geology and natural resources of the state((,)); and
(8) The consideration of ((such other kindred)) similar scientific
and economic questions ((as)) that, in the judgment of the ((director
shall be)) state geologist, is deemed of value to the people of the
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.92 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the objectives stated in RCW 43.92.020, the
geological survey must conduct and maintain an assessment of seismic,
landslide, and tsunami hazards in Washington. This assessment must
include the identification and mapping of volcanic, seismic, landslide,
and tsunami hazards, an estimation of potential consequences, and the
likelihood of occurrence.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.92.040 and 1965 c 8 s 43.92.040 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The)) Regular and special reports of the geological survey, with
proper illustrations and maps, shall be printed as ((the director may
direct, and the)) directed by the state geologist. All reports shall
be distributed or sold by ((him)) the department of natural resources
as the interests of the state and of science demand((; and)). All
money obtained by the sale of reports under this section shall be paid
into the state treasury.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.92.060 and 1965 c 8 s 43.92.060 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((director)) state geologist may make provisions for
topographic, geologic, and hydrographic surveys of the state in
cooperation with the United States geological survey in such manner as
in ((his)) the opinion of the state geologist will be of the greatest
benefit to the agricultural, industrial, and geological requirements of
the state((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the director of the United
States geological survey ((agrees)) must first agree to expend on the
part of the United States upon such surveys a sum equal to that
expended by the state.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.92.070 and 1965 c 8 s 43.92.070 are each amended to
read as follows:
In order to complete the topographic map of the state and for the
purpose of making more extensive stream measurements, and otherwise
investigating and determining the water supply of the state, the
((director)) state geologist may enter into such agreements with the
director of the United States geological survey as will ((insure))
ensure that the surveys and investigations be carried on in the most
economical manner, and that the maps and data be available for the use
of the public as quickly as possible.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.92.080 and 1965 c 8 s 43.92.080 are each amended to
read as follows:
In order to carry out the purposes of this chapter, all persons
employed ((hereunder)) by the department of natural resources to carry
out the duties of this chapter are authorized to enter and cross all
land within the state ((doing thereby)) as long as no damage is done to
private property.

--- END ---