BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) The state has a compelling interest in preventing fatal motor
vehicle accidents;
(2) There are numerous factors involved in the causation of motor
vehicle accidents, such as the age of the drivers involved, road
conditions, speed of travel, type of vehicles involved, and whether the
drivers were distracted or under the influence of alcohol or drugs;
(3) Drivers involved in accidents and law enforcement officers at
accident scenes are required by law to report detailed information
about the accident to the state patrol. To assist in determining the
cause of accidents, the state patrol files, tabulates, and analyzes all
accident reports and publishes statistical information showing the
number of accidents, the location, the frequency, whether the drivers
involved were distracted at the time, and other relevant information.
Such accident reports and analysis are available to various state
agencies such as the traffic safety commission and the department of
transportation to be used for further analysis relevant to highway
safety;
(4) To help prevent fatal motor vehicle accidents, it is necessary
to analyze and understand the causes of such accidents, including the
role played by alcohol and drugs;
(5) The state's compelling interest in understanding the causes of
and preventing fatal motor vehicle accidents creates a special need
beyond normal law enforcement for the collection of breath or blood
alcohol content from drivers involved in fatal motor vehicle accidents;
and
(6) Because evidence of blood alcohol content diminishes over time,
requiring a warrant before that evidence can be collected would be
impracticable and would frustrate the state's interest in collecting
the information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state and
is involved in a motor vehicle accident in which there is a death or
reasonable likelihood of death to another person shall, at the
direction of a law enforcement officer, submit to a test of his or her
breath or blood for the purpose of determining the alcohol
concentration or presence of any drug in his or her breath or blood.
The person's consent is not required. A law enforcement officer having
reasonable grounds to believe that the person to be tested was driving
or was in actual physical control of the motor vehicle at the time of
the accident shall order the test regardless of whether the person to
be tested was driving or in actual physical control of the motor
vehicle as part of his or her official or employment duties or as a
private citizen.
(2) The law enforcement officer shall forward the results of the
breath or blood alcohol test to the chief of the Washington state
patrol to be used as provided under RCW 46.52.060.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.52.060 and 2005 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the duty of the chief of the Washington state patrol to
file, tabulate, and analyze all accident reports and breath or blood
alcohol concentration test results collected under section 2 of this
act and to publish annually, immediately following the close of each
fiscal year, and monthly during the course of the year, statistical
information based thereon showing the number of accidents, the
location, the frequency, whether any driver involved in the accident
was distracted at the time of the accident and the circumstances
thereof, and other statistical information which may prove of
assistance in determining the cause of vehicular accidents.
Distractions contributing to an accident to be reported must include at
least the following: Not distracted; operating a handheld electronic
telecommunication device; operating a hands-free wireless
telecommunication device; other electronic devices (including, but not
limited to, PDA's, laptop computers, navigational devices, etc.);
adjusting an audio or entertainment system; smoking; eating or
drinking; reading or writing; grooming; interacting with children,
passengers, animals, or objects in the vehicle; other inside
distractions; outside distractions; and distraction unknown.
Such accident reports, breath or blood alcohol concentration test
results, and analysis or reports thereof shall be available to the
director of licensing, the department of transportation, the utilities
and transportation commission, the traffic safety commission, and other
public entities authorized by the chief of the Washington state patrol,
or their duly authorized representatives, for further tabulation and
analysis for pertinent data relating to the regulation of highway
traffic, highway construction, vehicle operators and all other
purposes, and to publish information so derived as may be deemed of
publication value.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.308 and 2005 c 314 s 307 and 2005 c 269 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state is
deemed to have given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW
46.61.506, to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood for the
purpose of determining the alcohol concentration or presence of any
drug in his or her breath or blood if the person: (i) Is arrested for
any offense where, at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has
reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in
actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or was in violation of RCW 46.61.503;
or (ii) is involved in an accident in which there has been a death or
reasonable likelihood of death to another person and the officer has
reasonable grounds to believe the person was driving or in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle at the time of the accident. For
purposes of this subsection (1)(a)(ii), the officer shall order the
test regardless of whether the person to be tested was operating the
motor vehicle as part of his or her official or employment duties or as
a private citizen.
(b) Neither consent nor this section precludes a police officer
from obtaining a search warrant for a person's breath or blood.
(2)(a) The test or tests of breath shall be administered at the
direction of a law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to
believe the person to have been: (i) Driving or in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug ((or the person to have been)); (ii)
driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having
alcohol in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her
system and being under the age of twenty-one; or (iii) driving or in
actual physical control of a motor vehicle involved in an accident in
which there has been a death or reasonable likelihood of death to
another person, as provided in section 2 of this act.
(b) However, in those instances where the person is incapable due
to physical injury, physical incapacity, or other physical limitation,
of providing a breath sample or where the person is being treated in a
hospital, clinic, doctor's office, emergency medical vehicle,
ambulance, or other similar facility or where the officer has
reasonable grounds to believe that the person is under the influence of
a drug, a blood test shall be administered by a qualified person as
provided in RCW 46.61.506(5). The officer shall inform the person of
his or her right to refuse the breath or blood test, and of his or her
right to have additional tests administered by any qualified person of
his or her choosing as provided in RCW 46.61.506. The officer shall
warn the driver, in substantially the following language, that:
(((a))) (i) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's
license, permit, or privilege to drive will be revoked or denied for at
least one year; and
(((b))) (ii) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's
refusal to take the test may be used in a criminal trial; and
(((c))) (iii) If the driver submits to the test and the test is
administered, the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive will
be suspended, revoked, or denied for at least ninety days if the driver
is age twenty-one or over and the test indicates the alcohol
concentration of the driver's breath or blood is 0.08 or more, or if
the driver is under age twenty-one and the test indicates the alcohol
concentration of the driver's breath or blood is 0.02 or more, or if
the driver is under age twenty-one and the driver is in violation of
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504.
(3) Except as provided in this section, the test administered shall
be of the breath only. If an individual is unconscious or is under
arrest for the crime of vehicular homicide as provided in RCW 46.61.520
or vehicular assault as provided in RCW 46.61.522, or if an individual
is under arrest for the crime of driving while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs as provided in RCW 46.61.502, which arrest
results from an accident in which there has been serious bodily injury
to another person, or if an individual was driving or in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle involved in an accident in which
there has been a death or reasonable likelihood of death to another
person, a breath or blood test may be administered without the consent
of the individual ((so arrested)).
(4) Any person who is dead, unconscious, or who is otherwise in a
condition rendering him or her incapable of refusal, shall be deemed
not to have withdrawn the consent provided by subsection (1) of this
section and the test or tests may be administered, subject to the
provisions of RCW 46.61.506, and the person shall be deemed to have
received the warnings required under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) If, following his or her arrest and receipt of warnings under
subsection (2) of this section, the person arrested refuses upon the
request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a test or tests of
his or her breath or blood, no test shall be given except as authorized
under subsection (3) or (4) of this section or as authorized under
section 2 of this act.
(6) If, after arrest and after the other applicable conditions and
requirements of this section have been satisfied, a test or tests of
the person's blood or breath is administered and the test results
indicate that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood
is 0.08 or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or 0.02 or
more if the person is under the age of twenty-one, or the person
refuses to submit to a test, the arresting officer or other law
enforcement officer at whose direction any test has been given, or the
department, where applicable, if the arrest results in a test of the
person's blood, shall:
(a) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of its intention to suspend, revoke, or deny the person's
license, permit, or privilege to drive as required by subsection (7) of
this section;
(b) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of his or her right to a hearing, specifying the steps he or
she must take to obtain a hearing as provided by subsection (8) of this
section;
(c) Mark the person's Washington state driver's license or permit
to drive, if any, in a manner authorized by the department;
(d) Serve notice in writing that the marked license or permit, if
any, is a temporary license that is valid for sixty days from the date
of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event notice is
given by the department following a blood test, or until the
suspension, revocation, or denial of the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive is sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8)
of this section, whichever occurs first. No temporary license is valid
to any greater degree than the license or permit that it replaces; and
(e) Immediately notify the department of the arrest and transmit to
the department within seventy-two hours, except as delayed as the
result of a blood test, a sworn report or report under a declaration
authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 that states:
(i) That the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested
person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or drugs, or both, or was under the age of twenty-one years and
had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
while having an alcohol concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503;
(ii) That after receipt of the warnings required by subsection (2)
of this section the person refused to submit to a test of his or her
blood or breath, or a test was administered and the results indicated
that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.08
or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or was 0.02 or more if
the person is under the age of twenty-one; and
(iii) Any other information that the director may require by rule.
(7) The department of licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report
or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under
subsection (6)(e) of this section, shall suspend, revoke, or deny the
person's license, permit, or privilege to drive or any nonresident
operating privilege, as provided in RCW 46.20.3101, such suspension,
revocation, or denial to be effective beginning sixty days from the
date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event
notice is given by the department following a blood test, or when
sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8) of this section,
whichever occurs first.
(8) A person receiving notification under subsection (6)(b) of this
section may, within thirty days after the notice has been given,
request in writing a formal hearing before the department. The person
shall pay a fee of two hundred dollars as part of the request. If the
request is mailed, it must be postmarked within thirty days after
receipt of the notification. Upon timely receipt of such a request for
a formal hearing, including receipt of the required two hundred dollar
fee, the department shall afford the person an opportunity for a
hearing. The department may waive the required two hundred dollar fee
if the person is an indigent as defined in RCW 10.101.010. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, the hearing is subject to and shall
be scheduled and conducted in accordance with RCW 46.20.329 and
46.20.332. The hearing shall be conducted in the county of the arrest,
except that all or part of the hearing may, at the discretion of the
department, be conducted by telephone or other electronic means. The
hearing shall be held within sixty days following the arrest or
following the date notice has been given in the event notice is given
by the department following a blood test, unless otherwise agreed to by
the department and the person, in which case the action by the
department shall be stayed, and any valid temporary license marked
under subsection (6)(c) of this section extended, if the person is
otherwise eligible for licensing. For the purposes of this section,
the scope of the hearing shall cover the issues of whether a law
enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had
been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug or had been driving or was in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her
system in a concentration of 0.02 or more if the person was under the
age of twenty-one, whether the person was placed under arrest, and (a)
whether the person refused to submit to the test or tests upon request
of the officer after having been informed that such refusal would
result in the revocation of the person's license, permit, or privilege
to drive, or (b) if a test or tests were administered, whether the
applicable requirements of this section were satisfied before the
administration of the test or tests, whether the person submitted to
the test or tests, or whether a test was administered without express
consent as permitted under this section, and whether the test or tests
indicated that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or
blood was 0.08 or more if the person was age twenty-one or over at the
time of the arrest, or 0.02 or more if the person was under the age of
twenty-one at the time of the arrest. The sworn report or report under
a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 submitted by a law
enforcement officer is prima facie evidence that the officer had
reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in
actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or the
person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her system in
a concentration of 0.02 or more and was under the age of twenty-one and
that the officer complied with the requirements of this section.
A hearing officer shall conduct the hearing, may issue subpoenas
for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, and
shall administer oaths to witnesses. The hearing officer shall not
issue a subpoena for the attendance of a witness at the request of the
person unless the request is accompanied by the fee required by RCW
5.56.010 for a witness in district court. The sworn report or report
under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 of the law enforcement
officer and any other evidence accompanying the report shall be
admissible without further evidentiary foundation and the
certifications authorized by the criminal rules for courts of limited
jurisdiction shall be admissible without further evidentiary
foundation. The person may be represented by counsel, may question
witnesses, may present evidence, and may testify. The department shall
order that the suspension, revocation, or denial either be rescinded or
sustained.
(9) If the suspension, revocation, or denial is sustained after
such a hearing, the person whose license, privilege, or permit is
suspended, revoked, or denied has the right to file a petition in the
superior court of the county of arrest to review the final order of
revocation by the department in the same manner as an appeal from a
decision of a court of limited jurisdiction. Notice of appeal must be
filed within thirty days after the date the final order is served or
the right to appeal is waived. Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.334, RALJ
1.1, or other statutes or rules referencing de novo review, the appeal
shall be limited to a review of the record of the administrative
hearing. The appellant must pay the costs associated with obtaining
the record of the hearing before the hearing officer. The filing of
the appeal does not stay the effective date of the suspension,
revocation, or denial. A petition filed under this subsection must
include the petitioner's grounds for requesting review. Upon granting
petitioner's request for review, the court shall review the
department's final order of suspension, revocation, or denial as
expeditiously as possible. The review must be limited to a
determination of whether the department has committed any errors of
law. The superior court shall accept those factual determinations
supported by substantial evidence in the record: (a) That were
expressly made by the department; or (b) that may reasonably be
inferred from the final order of the department. The superior court
may reverse, affirm, or modify the decision of the department or remand
the case back to the department for further proceedings. The decision
of the superior court must be in writing and filed in the clerk's
office with the other papers in the case. The court shall state the
reasons for the decision. If judicial relief is sought for a stay or
other temporary remedy from the department's action, the court shall
not grant such relief unless the court finds that the appellant is
likely to prevail in the appeal and that without a stay the appellant
will suffer irreparable injury. If the court stays the suspension,
revocation, or denial it may impose conditions on such stay.
(10)(a) If a person whose driver's license, permit, or privilege to
drive has been or will be suspended, revoked, or denied under
subsection (7) of this section, other than as a result of a breath or
blood test refusal, and who has not committed an offense for which he
or she was granted a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW,
petitions a court for a deferred prosecution on criminal charges
arising out of the arrest for which action has been or will be taken
under subsection (7) of this section, or notifies the department of
licensing of the intent to seek such a deferred prosecution, then the
license suspension or revocation shall be stayed pending entry of the
deferred prosecution. The stay shall not be longer than one hundred
fifty days after the date charges are filed, or two years after the
date of the arrest, whichever time period is shorter. If the court
stays the suspension, revocation, or denial, it may impose conditions
on such stay. If the person is otherwise eligible for licensing, the
department shall issue a temporary license, or extend any valid
temporary license marked under subsection (6) of this section, for the
period of the stay. If a deferred prosecution treatment plan is not
recommended in the report made under RCW 10.05.050, or if treatment is
rejected by the court, or if the person declines to accept an offered
treatment plan, or if the person violates any condition imposed by the
court, then the court shall immediately direct the department to cancel
the stay and any temporary marked license or extension of a temporary
license issued under this subsection.
(b) A suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this section,
other than as a result of a breath or blood test refusal, shall be
stayed if the person is accepted for deferred prosecution as provided
in chapter 10.05 RCW for the incident upon which the suspension,
revocation, or denial is based. If the deferred prosecution is
terminated, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or
denial reinstated. If the deferred prosecution is completed, the stay
shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial canceled.
(c) The provisions of (b) of this subsection relating to a stay of
a suspension, revocation, or denial and the cancellation of any
suspension, revocation, or denial do not apply to the suspension,
revocation, denial, or disqualification of a person's commercial
driver's license or privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle.
(11) When it has been finally determined under the procedures of
this section that a nonresident's privilege to operate a motor vehicle
in this state has been suspended, revoked, or denied, the department
shall give information in writing of the action taken to the motor
vehicle administrator of the state of the person's residence and of any
state in which he or she has a license.

--- END ---