BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a lack
of common understanding among victim advocates, child welfare
authorities, law enforcement, and the courts in dealing with the
effects of domestic violence on families. Problems raised by domestic
violence are compounded by differing perspectives about how to address
its impact on families. The legislature also finds that discussion and
resolution of these perspectives is essential to the common goal of
protecting children. Efforts to enhance the safety and support of
nonoffending parents lead to increased safety and well-being for
children. The legislature further finds that in cases of child abuse
or neglect, reasonable intervention should include appropriate training
for individuals in agencies involved with domestic violence, routine
screening for domestic violence, and referrals to appropriate services
and relevant intervention for every family member. The legislature
acknowledges the efforts of the Washington state gender and justice
commission in its work on the Washington state coordinated response
protocol project and developing a template for regional and local
protocols for coordinated response to child maltreatment and domestic
violence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department, upon investigation of a report that a child has
been abused or neglected as defined in this chapter, shall make
reasonable efforts to determine whether domestic violence as defined in
RCW 26.50.010 was a contributing factor to the alleged abuse or
neglect.
(2) The department shall, in collaboration with experts in the
field of domestic violence and advocates for victims of domestic
violence, review its current policies and procedures for intake, risk
assessment, referrals, and investigation to determine whether they
provide an adequate and appropriate means of screening cases to
determine the presence, extent, and impact of domestic violence on the
health, safety, and welfare of the children who are the subjects of the
reports of alleged abuse and neglect. The review shall include, but is
not limited to, methods and tools for:
(a) Identifying indicators of domestic violence;
(b) Interviewing techniques that do not increase the risk of danger
to the adult victim of domestic violence or child;
(c) Identifying protective factors and behaviors that may reduce
the risk of harm to the child;
(d) Appropriate interventions and referrals for members of the
family.
(3) The department shall report to the Washington state coordinated
response protocol project by June 1, 2007, regarding the results of its
review and what changes the department made or will be making to
improve its screening and investigation of cases, to determine if
domestic violence is a contributing factor to child abuse or neglect
and any training needed to implement the changes. The Washington state
coordinated response protocol project shall report the information
received from the department to the legislature by July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is encouraged to coordinate with the courts,
local law enforcement agencies, and other agencies and systems that are
involved with domestic violence victims to develop written protocols
for intervening in cases where allegations of child abuse or neglect
and domestic violence co-occur. The protocols shall be consistent with
the template for coordinated response to child maltreatment and
domestic violence developed by the Washington state coordinated
response protocol project. The protocols shall address the
coordination of interventions between the department, local domestic
violence advocacy groups and shelters, courts, local law enforcement
agencies, and any other local agency involved in responding to domestic
violence. Protocols shall be developed and implemented in each region
of the department and may be developed on a county or local basis as
the protocol participants deem necessary.
(2)(a) The Washington state coordinated response protocol project
shall review methods to have comprehensive assessments done of alleged
domestic violence perpetrators in cases with co-occurring allegations
of child abuse or neglect and domestic violence. The review shall
include, but is not limited to:
(i) The methodology, purpose, and effectiveness of such
comprehensive assessments;
(ii) The cost of conducting comprehensive assessments;
(iii) Who shall conduct comprehensive assessments and what training
or professional qualifications shall be required; and
(iv) Potential legal barriers to obtaining comprehensive
assessments on a timely basis.
(b) A primary purpose of comprehensive assessments shall be to hold
the perpetrator of domestic violence accountable for the domestic
violence and any subsequent risk posed by his or her behavior. The
perpetrator of domestic violence shall pay for the comprehensive
assessment, unless the person is otherwise eligible to receive
financial assistance in paying for such services. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to create in any person an entitlement to
services or financial assistance in paying for services.
(3) The protocols required under this section shall be adopted by
July 1, 2007, and submitted to the Washington state coordinated
response protocol project. The project shall regularly report to the
legislature upon the status of adoption of regional or local protocols.
The project shall report to the legislature by July 1, 2007, regarding
the results of the reviews required under subsection (2) of this
section.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.44.020 and 2005 c 512 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington,
juvenile department.
(2) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the
prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public safety,
or the office of the sheriff.
(3) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a
person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and
surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic
medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to provide other
health services. The term "practitioner" includes a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a person who
is being furnished Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner will not be considered, for that reason
alone, a neglected person for the purposes of this chapter.
(4) "Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other
facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment or care.
(5) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(6) "Child" or "children" means any person under the age of
eighteen years of age.
(7) "Professional school personnel" include, but are not limited
to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility
personnel, and school nurses.
(8) "Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a
professional capacity during the regular course of employment in
encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support or education of
children, or providing social services to adults or families, including
mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic violence
programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or agent
of any public or private organization or institution.
(9) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology
under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as
an employee or agent of any public or private organization or
institution.
(10) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter
18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.
(11) "Clergy" means any regularly licensed or ordained minister,
priest, or rabbi of any church or religious denomination, whether
acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any
public or private organization or institution.
(12) "Abuse or neglect" means sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or
injury of a child by any person under circumstances which cause harm to
the child's health, welfare, or safety, excluding conduct permitted
under RCW 9A.16.100; or the negligent treatment or maltreatment of a
child by a person responsible for or providing care to the child. An
abused child is a child who has been subjected to child abuse or
neglect as defined in this section.
(13) "Child protective services section" means the child protective
services section of the department.
(14) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or
encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b)
allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or
pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child by any
person.
(15) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or a
failure to act, or the cumulative effects of a pattern of conduct,
behavior, or inaction, that evidences a serious disregard of
consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a clear and present
danger to a child's health, welfare, or safety. When considering
whether a clear and present danger exists, evidence of a parent's
substance abuse as a contributing factor to negligent treatment or
maltreatment shall be given great weight. The fact that siblings share
a bedroom is not, in and of itself, negligent treatment or
maltreatment. Poverty((,)) or homelessness((, or exposure to domestic
violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010 that is perpetrated against
someone other than the child do [does])) does not constitute negligent
treatment or maltreatment in and of themselves (([itself])). Exposure
to domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010 that is perpetrated
against someone other than a child does not constitute negligent
treatment or maltreatment absent a showing that the exposure is so
severe or ongoing as to cause harm to or create a clear and present
danger of harm to the child's health, welfare, or safety.
(16) "Child protective services" means those services provided by
the department designed to protect children from child abuse and
neglect and safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and
conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect reports.
Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the
alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral
to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of
children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant
to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and
neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a
permanent home. In determining whether protective services should be
provided, the department shall not decline to provide such services
solely because of the child's unwillingness or developmental inability
to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or neglect.
(17) "Malice" or "maliciously" means an evil intent, wish, or
design to vex, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may be
inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of
another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an
act or omission of duty betraying a willful disregard of social duty.
(18) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is defined in
RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.
(19) "Unfounded" means available information indicates that, more
likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur. No unfounded
allegation of child abuse or neglect may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private adoption agency, or any other provider licensed
under chapter 74.15 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 4 of this act takes effect January
1, 2007.

--- END ---