BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) School district boards of directors may find it necessary to
employ school security personnel or to rely upon school resource
officers to preserve a safe and beneficial learning environment;
(b) A school's culture and climate are, in part, determined by the
quality of interaction between the school's employees, students, and
parents, and affect the level of disciplinary activity required within
the school;
(c) There is currently no state licensure available specifically
for school security personnel; and
(d) There are currently no state rules regarding what training and
qualifications school security personnel should possess, and opinions
differ within the field of education regarding the role of school
security professionals in elementary and secondary schools.
(2) The legislature seeks to obtain information and recommendations
from persons within the field of education and school security
regarding, among other things, a model policy for school security,
whether a license for school security personnel should be created, and
what skills and abilities school security personnel should possess to
successfully perform the essential functions of their positions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington school safety center
advisory committee, working with the superintendent of public
instruction, shall convene a work group comprised of representatives
from:
(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(b) The Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American
affairs;
(c) The Washington state commission on African-American affairs;
(d) The Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs;
(e) The governor's office of Indian affairs;
(f) Elementary and secondary school districts, including
administrators, certificated employees, and safety professionals;
(g) Educational service districts;
(h) Law enforcement professionals;
(i) The department of licensing;
(j) The Washington state parent-teacher association;
(k) The Washington schools risk management pool and other
interested risk managers that provide services to school districts in
Washington;
(l) Parents and guardians of school-age children; and
(m) Other individuals with related expertise as deemed appropriate
by the work group.
(2) The work group shall evaluate and make recommendations to the
legislature regarding, at least the following:
(a) A model policy regarding the duties and roles of school
security professionals within the educational environment, including
the use of force by such professionals, that provides necessary
flexibility for schools with different needs and differing demographic,
geographic, cultural, and other characteristics;
(b) What minimum skills and abilities a school security
professional should possess to effectively perform the essential job
functions of such a position, and what minimum training should be
required of school security professionals;
(c) Whether benefit would be gained by developing a school security
license or licenses and, if so, what the minimum requirements for such
licensure should be;
(d) Whether a limited law enforcement commission for school
security professionals should be developed and, if so, what the
essential job functions of and qualifications for such a commission
should be; and
(e) A model policy regarding supervision of school security
professionals.
(3) The work group shall submit to appropriate committees of the
legislature a final report and recommendations regarding the topics in
subsection (2) of this section by November 15, 2006.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2007.

--- END ---