BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent funding is appropriated in the operating budget,
the mental health division of the health and recovery services
administration, in collaboration with the children's administration,
within the department shall establish a pilot program to support
collaborative local efforts to select, implement, and ensure quality
evidence-based mental health services provided to children by December
2006.
(a) The program sites shall be selected through a request for
proposal process which shall begin by July 2006. The pilot program
shall consist of four sites, with at least one site located in eastern
Washington.
(b) The request for proposal shall include the specific criteria
listed in subsection (2) of this section, in order to qualify for the
pilot program. The request for proposal shall include a list of
examples of specific evidence-based mental health service options from
which pilot program sites may choose as the mental health service or
services they will deliver.
(2) Any county, or group of counties, may submit a proposal to be
selected as a pilot site. In order to be considered for a pilot site,
the proposal shall demonstrate how the site will meet the following
criteria. The proposal shall:
(a) Designate the lead agency for the program. The lead agency is
not required to be a state agency or a regional support network. The
lead agency may be any public or private agency capable of meeting the
requirements of this section;
(b) Describe how the lead agency shall work with community partners
to implement the pilot program activities described in this section.
The proposal shall specifically identify the community partners with
whom the agency will be collaborating and the role of the partners.
The community partners must include, at a minimum, representatives of
the local mental health, juvenile justice, and child welfare systems,
as well as representatives of families of children in need of mental
health services. Community partners may, but are not required to,
include representatives from other child-serving systems such as health
care and education;
(c) Identify the areas of potential need based upon input from the
community partners;
(d) Identify the evidence-based mental health service or services
that will be implemented in the area served by the pilot program based
upon community needs and resources. The service or services to be
provided must be selected from a list of evidence-based service options
developed by the department, in consultation with a broadly
representative group of individuals with expertise in children's mental
health services. After evidence-based services have been established,
the department may consider expanding the list of service options to
include promising practices. The department shall consult with a
broadly representative group of individuals with expertise in
children's mental health services to develop the list of promising
practices. In choosing promising practices, the department shall
strongly consider those practices that have shown promise in treating
children of color;
(e) Identify the resources within the community that might support
training for the implementation of the selected evidence-based service
or services; and
(f) Identify resources within the community that are able to
support quality assurance activities to monitor fidelity to the
evidence-based service or services that are implemented, and track
outcomes for children receiving those services.
(3) The department shall utilize one or more agencies or programs
outside of the department to provide support and assistance in
initiating, implementing, and monitoring the pilot program. The
department shall select agencies or programs to provide assistance that
have experience with evidence-based mental health practices for
children to provide support and assistance in all phases of the pilot
program, including initiating, implementing, and monitoring the pilot
program. Support and assistance shall include provider training
related to the evidence-based practices chosen by the pilot program
sites, and quality assurance to ensure adherence to evidence-based
practice.
(4) Beginning in July 2007, the Washington state institute for
public policy shall conduct a study of the pilot program measuring
improvements in the delivery of mental health services to children.
The study shall include, at a minimum, an assessment of the outcomes
and cost-effectiveness of the evidence-based practices implemented
through the program, including consideration of outcomes related to
hospital utilization, residential or out-of-home placements,
utilization of child welfare services, school attendance, and
involvement in the juvenile justice system. The institute shall issue
a report containing its preliminary findings to the legislature by
December 1, 2007, and a final report by December 1, 2008.
(5) Implementation of this program is subject to the availability
of funds.

--- END ---