BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.41.100 and 2001 c 196 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following persons who are residents of this state are
eligible for pool coverage:
(a) Any person who provides evidence of a carrier's decision not to
accept him or her for enrollment in an individual health benefit plan
as defined in RCW 48.43.005, or of the health care authority
administrator's decision not to accept him or her for enrollment in the
basic health plan as a nonsubsidized enrollee, based upon, and within
ninety days of the receipt of, the results of the standard health
questionnaire designated by the board and administered by health
carriers under RCW 48.43.018 or the administrator of the health care
authority under section 3 of this act;
(b) Any person who continues to be eligible for pool coverage based
upon the results of the standard health questionnaire designated by the
board and administered by the pool administrator pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section;
(c) Any person who resides in a county of the state where no
carrier or insurer eligible under chapter 48.15 RCW offers to the
public an individual health benefit plan other than a catastrophic
health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 at the time of application to
the pool, and who makes direct application to the pool; and
(d) Any medicare eligible person upon providing evidence of
rejection for medical reasons, a requirement of restrictive riders, an
up-rated premium, or a preexisting conditions limitation on a medicare
supplemental insurance policy under chapter 48.66 RCW, the effect of
which is to substantially reduce coverage from that received by a
person considered a standard risk by at least one member within six
months of the date of application.
(2) The following persons are not eligible for coverage by the
pool:
(a) Any person having terminated coverage in the pool unless (i)
twelve months have lapsed since termination, or (ii) that person can
show continuous other coverage which has been involuntarily terminated
for any reason other than nonpayment of premiums. However, these
exclusions do not apply to eligible individuals as defined in section
2741(b) of the federal health insurance portability and accountability
act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-41(b));
(b) Any person on whose behalf the pool has paid out one million
dollars in benefits;
(c) Inmates of public institutions and persons whose benefits are
duplicated under public programs. However, these exclusions do not
apply to eligible individuals as defined in section 2741(b) of the
federal health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 (42
U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-41(b));
(d) Any person who resides in a county of the state where any
carrier or insurer regulated under chapter 48.15 RCW offers to the
public an individual health benefit plan other than a catastrophic
health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 at the time of application to
the pool and who does not qualify for pool coverage based upon the
results of the standard health questionnaire, or pursuant to subsection
(1)(d) of this section.
(3) When a carrier or insurer regulated under chapter 48.15 RCW
begins to offer an individual health benefit plan in a county where no
carrier had been offering an individual health benefit plan:
(a) If the health benefit plan offered is other than a catastrophic
health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005, any person enrolled in a pool
plan pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section in that county shall
no longer be eligible for coverage under that plan pursuant to
subsection (1)(c) of this section, but may continue to be eligible for
pool coverage based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire designated by the board and administered by the pool
administrator. The pool administrator shall offer to administer the
questionnaire to each person no longer eligible for coverage under
subsection (1)(c) of this section within thirty days of determining
that he or she is no longer eligible;
(b) Losing eligibility for pool coverage under this subsection (3)
does not affect a person's eligibility for pool coverage under
subsection (1)(a), (b), or (d) of this section; and
(c) The pool administrator shall provide written notice to any
person who is no longer eligible for coverage under a pool plan under
this subsection (3) within thirty days of the administrator's
determination that the person is no longer eligible. The notice shall:
(i) Indicate that coverage under the plan will cease ninety days from
the date that the notice is dated; (ii) describe any other coverage
options, either in or outside of the pool, available to the person;
(iii) describe the procedures for the administration of the standard
health questionnaire to determine the person's continued eligibility
for coverage under subsection (1)(b) of this section; and (iv) describe
the enrollment process for the available options outside of the pool.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.47.020 and 2005 c 188 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of
enrollment and payment for basic health care services, administered by
the plan administrator through participating managed health care
systems, created by this chapter.
(2) "Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan
administrator, who also holds the position of administrator of the
Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Health coverage tax credit program" means the program created
by the Trade Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-210) that provides a federal tax
credit that subsidizes private health insurance coverage for displaced
workers certified to receive certain trade adjustment assistance
benefits and for individuals receiving benefits from the pension
benefit guaranty corporation.
(4) "Health coverage tax credit eligible enrollee" means individual
workers and their qualified family members who lose their jobs due to
the effects of international trade and are eligible for certain trade
adjustment assistance benefits; or are eligible for benefits under the
alternative trade adjustment assistance program; or are people who
receive benefits from the pension benefit guaranty corporation and are
at least fifty-five years old.
(5) "Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any
combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract basic health
care services, as defined by the administrator and rendered by duly
licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled in the
plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized
enrollees provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations
under RCW 70.47.100(7).
(6) "Subsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who is not a full-time
student who has received a temporary visa to study in the United
States; (d) who resides in an area of the state served by a managed
health care system participating in the plan; (e) whose gross family
income at the time of enrollment does not exceed two hundred percent of
the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined
annually by the federal department of health and human services; and
(f) who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular
managed health care system in return for periodic payments to the plan.
To the extent that state funds are specifically appropriated for this
purpose, with a corresponding federal match, "subsidized enrollee" also
means an individual, or an individual's spouse or dependent children,
who meets the requirements in (a) through (d) and (f) of this
subsection and whose gross family income at the time of enrollment is
more than two hundred percent, but less than two hundred fifty-one
percent, of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and
determined annually by the federal department of health and human
services.
(7) "Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who, under section 3 of this
act, is not required to complete the standard health questionnaire or
does not qualify for coverage under the Washington state health
insurance pool based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire; (d) who resides in an area of the state served by a
managed health care system participating in the plan; (((d))) (e) who
chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular managed
health care system; and (((e))) (f) who pays or on whose behalf is paid
the full costs for participation in the plan, without any subsidy from
the plan.
(8) "Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of periodic
payment the administrator makes to a managed health care system on
behalf of a subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost to the
plan of providing the plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the amount
determined to be the subsidized enrollee's responsibility under RCW
70.47.060(2).
(9) "Premium" means a periodic payment((, based upon gross family
income)) which an individual, their employer or another financial
sponsor makes to the plan as consideration for enrollment in the plan
as a subsidized enrollee, a nonsubsidized enrollee, or a health
coverage tax credit eligible enrollee.
(10) "Rate" means the amount, negotiated by the administrator with
and paid to a participating managed health care system, that is based
upon the enrollment of subsidized, nonsubsidized, and health coverage
tax credit eligible enrollees in the plan and in that system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in (a) through (e) of this subsection, the
administrator shall require any person seeking enrollment in the basic
health plan as a nonsubsidized enrollee to complete the standard health
questionnaire designated under chapter 48.41 RCW.
(a) If a person is seeking enrollment in the basic health plan as
a nonsubsidized enrollee due to his or her change of residence from one
geographic area in Washington state to another geographic area in
Washington state where his or her current health plan is not offered,
completion of the standard health questionnaire shall not be a
condition of coverage if application for coverage is made within ninety
days of relocation.
(b) If a person is seeking enrollment in the basic health plan as
a nonsubsidized enrollee:
(i) Because a health care provider with whom he or she has an
established care relationship and from whom he or she has received
treatment within the past twelve months is no longer part of the
provider network under his or her existing Washington individual health
benefit plan; and
(ii) His or her health care provider is part of a managed health
care system's provider network; and
(iii) Application for enrollment in the basic health plan as a
nonsubsidized enrollee under that managed health care system's provider
network is made within ninety days of his or her provider leaving the
previous carrier's provider network; then completion of the standard
health questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage.
(c) If a person is seeking enrollment in the basic health plan as
a nonsubsidized enrollee due to his or her having exhausted
continuation coverage provided under 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1161 et seq.,
completion of the standard health questionnaire shall not be a
condition of coverage if application for coverage is made within ninety
days of exhaustion of continuation coverage. The administrator shall
accept an application without a standard health questionnaire from a
person currently covered by such continuation coverage if application
is made within ninety days prior to the date the continuation coverage
would be exhausted and the effective date of the basic health plan
coverage applied for is the date the continuation coverage would be
exhausted, or within ninety days thereafter.
(d) If a person is seeking enrollment in the basic health plan as
a nonsubsidized enrollee due to his or her receiving notice that his or
her coverage under a conversion contract is discontinued, completion of
the standard health questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage
if application for coverage is made within ninety days of
discontinuation of eligibility under the conversion contract. The
administrator shall accept an application without a standard health
questionnaire from a person currently covered by such conversion
contract if application is made within ninety days prior to the date
eligibility under the conversion contract would be discontinued and the
effective date of the basic health plan coverage applied for is the
date eligibility under the conversion contract would be discontinued,
or within ninety days thereafter.
(e) If a person is seeking enrollment in the basic health plan as
a nonsubsidized enrollee and, but for the number of persons employed by
his or her employer, would have qualified for continuation coverage
provided under 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1161 et seq., completion of the standard
health questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage if: (i)
Application for coverage is made within ninety days of a qualifying
event as defined in 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1163; and (ii) the person had at
least twenty-four months of continuous group coverage immediately prior
to the qualifying event. The administrator shall accept an application
without a standard health questionnaire from a person with at least
twenty-four months of continuous group coverage if application is made
no more than ninety days prior to the date of a qualifying event and
the effective date of the basic health plan coverage applied for is the
date of the qualifying event, or within ninety days thereafter.
(2) If, based upon the results of the standard health
questionnaire, the person qualifies for coverage under the Washington
state health insurance pool, the following shall apply:
(a) The administrator shall not accept the person's application for
enrollment in the basic health plan as a nonsubsidized enrollee; and
(b) Within fifteen business days of receipt of a completed
application, the administrator shall provide written notice of the
decision not to accept the person's application for enrollment in the
basic health plan as a nonsubsidized enrollee to both the person and
the administrator of the Washington state health insurance pool. The
notice to the person shall state that the person is eligible for health
insurance provided by the Washington state health insurance pool, and
shall include information about the Washington state health insurance
pool and an application for such coverage. If the administrator does
not provide or postmark such notice within fifteen business days, the
application for enrollment in the basic health plan as a nonsubsidized
enrollee is deemed approved.

--- END ---