BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to promote the
development of sustainable energy resources, including new energy
technologies, and to improve system reliability by establishing a fund
that can be used to reduce the cost of deploying distributive
generation projects in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the energy policy office of the department
of community, trade, and economic development.
(2) "Distributive generation" means generation below one megawatt
that is connected to the distribution transmission of an electric
utility.
(3) "Renewable energy" means solar energy, wind, ocean thermal
energy, wave or tidal energy, fuel cells, landfill gas and low emission
advanced biomass conversion technologies, and other energy resources
and emerging technologies that have significant potential for
commercialization and that do not involve the combustion of coal,
petroleum or petroleum products, municipal solid waste, or nuclear
fission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All electric and natural gas companies
must collect a system benefit charge from all of the retail electricity
consumers within its service area for a period of ten years. The
monthly charge shall be as follows:
(a) Five cents per month on each account for residential electric
service;
(b) Five cents per month on each account for residential natural
gas service;
(c) Fifty cents per month on each account for nonresidential
electric service that has less than ten megawatts of peak demand during
the previous calendar year;
(d) Thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents per month on each account
for nonresidential electric service that had ten megawatts or greater
of peak demand during the previous calendar year; and
(e) Thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents per month on each account
for nonresidential natural gas service that had ten megawatts or
greater of peak demand during the previous calendar year.
(2) Funds collected by an electric or natural gas company through
system benefit charges must be deposited in the sustainable energy
trust fund, established in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sustainable energy trust fund is created
in the custody of the state treasurer to fund distributive generation
projects as authorized in this chapter. Only the department may
authorize expenditures from the fund. Expenditures from this account
may be used only for purposes of this chapter. Revenue to the fund
consists of system benefits charge money received under section 3 of
this act. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) There is established in the department
a grant program to support sustainable energy projects in the state.
The purpose of the program is to foster the growth, development, and
commercialization of distributive generation projects and related
enterprises and to stimulate demand for distributive generation sources
that serve end use customers in this state.
(2) The department may accept grant proposals and establish a
competitive process for the awarding of grants. In administering the
grant program, the department shall:
(a) Develop criteria for the awarding of grants to qualifying
business, institutions, or individuals;
(b) Make decisions regarding distribution of grant funds and make
grant awards; and
(c) Seek to provide a balance between research grant awards and the
grants that support the manufacture, commercialization, deployment, and
installation of distributive generation technologies.
(3) In the awarding of grants, priority shall be given to proposals
that leverage additional private and public funding resources.
(4) The department may not be a direct recipient of grant awards
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department must establish a peer review
committee to assist the department in matters related to the
sustainable energy trust fund, including, but not limited to,
development of a comprehensive plan and expenditure of funds.
Membership must include staff of the department, scientists, engineers,
and individuals with specific recognized expertise. The peer review
committee must provide to the department an independent review of all
proposals determined to be competitive for a grant award that are
submitted to the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department must establish performance
benchmarks against which the program will be evaluated. The grants
program must be reviewed periodically by the department. The
department must report annually to the appropriate standing committees
of the legislature on grants awarded and as appropriate on program
review conducted by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The department must administer the
sustainable energy grant program.
(2) No more than one percent of the available funds may be used for
administrative costs of the program.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2005 c 424 s 18, 2005 c 402 s 8, 2005
c 215 s 10, and 2005 c 16 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers
conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the produce railcar
pool account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and
exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the
self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account,
the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission
Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing
commission class C purse fund account, the individual development
account program account, the Washington horse racing commission
operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing commission
operating account must be credited to the Washington horse racing
commission class C purse fund account), ((and)) the life sciences
discovery fund, and the sustainable energy trust fund. However, the
earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to
the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---