BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.50.020 and 2001 c 214 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means any person who makes application for a site
certification pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(2) "Application" means any request for approval of a particular
site or sites filed in accordance with the procedures established
pursuant to this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires.
(3) "Person" means an individual, partnership, joint venture,
private or public corporation, association, firm, public service
company, political subdivision, municipal corporation, government
agency, public utility district, or any other entity, public or
private, however organized.
(4) "Site" means any proposed or approved location of an energy
facility.
(5) "Certification" means a binding agreement between an applicant
and the state which shall embody compliance to the siting guidelines,
in effect as of the date of certification, which have been adopted
pursuant to RCW 80.50.040 as now or hereafter amended as conditions to
be met prior to or concurrent with the construction or operation of any
energy facility.
(6) "Associated facilities" means storage, transmission, handling,
or other related and supporting facilities connecting an energy plant
with the existing energy supply, processing, or distribution system,
including, but not limited to, communications, controls, mobilizing or
maintenance equipment, instrumentation, and other types of ancillary
transmission equipment, off-line storage or venting required for
efficient operation or safety of the transmission system and overhead,
and surface or subsurface lines of physical access for the inspection,
maintenance, and safe operations of the transmission facility and new
transmission lines constructed to operate at nominal voltages in excess
of 200,000 volts to connect a thermal power plant to the northwest
power grid: PROVIDED, That common carrier railroads or motor vehicles
shall not be included.
(7) "Transmission facility" means any of the following together
with their associated facilities:
(a) Crude or refined petroleum or liquid petroleum product
transmission pipeline of the following dimensions: A pipeline larger
than six inches minimum inside diameter between valves for the
transmission of these products with a total length of at least fifteen
miles;
(b) Natural gas, synthetic fuel gas, or liquified petroleum gas
transmission pipeline of the following dimensions: A pipeline larger
than fourteen inches minimum inside diameter between valves, for the
transmission of these products, with a total length of at least fifteen
miles for the purpose of delivering gas to a distribution facility,
except an interstate natural gas pipeline regulated by the United
States federal power commission.
(8) "Independent consultants" means those persons who have no
financial interest in the applicant's proposals and who are retained by
the council to evaluate the applicant's proposals, supporting studies,
or to conduct additional studies.
(9) "Thermal power plant" means, for the purpose of certification,
any electrical generating facility using any fuel, including nuclear
materials, for distribution of electricity by electric utilities.
(10) "Energy facility" means an energy plant or transmission
facilities: PROVIDED, That the following are excluded from the
provisions of this chapter:
(a) Facilities for the extraction, conversion, transmission or
storage of water, other than water specifically consumed or discharged
by energy production or conversion for energy purposes; and
(b) Facilities operated by and for the armed services for military
purposes or by other federal authority for the national defense.
(11) "Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council
created by RCW 80.50.030.
(12) "Counsel for the environment" means an assistant attorney
general or a special assistant attorney general who shall represent the
public in accordance with RCW 80.50.080.
(13) "Construction" means on-site improvements, excluding
exploratory work, which cost in excess of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars.
(14) "Energy plant" means the following facilities together with
their associated facilities:
(a) Any stationary thermal power plant with generating capacity of
three hundred fifty thousand kilowatts or more, measured using maximum
continuous electric generating capacity, less minimum auxiliary load,
at average ambient temperature and pressure, and floating thermal power
plants of one hundred thousand kilowatts or more, including associated
facilities. For the purposes of this subsection, "floating thermal
power plants" means a thermal power plant that is suspended on the
surface of water by means of a barge, vessel, or other floating
platform;
(b) Facilities which will have the capacity to receive liquified
natural gas in the equivalent of more than one hundred million standard
cubic feet of natural gas per day, which has been transported over
marine waters;
(c) Facilities which will have the capacity to receive more than an
average of fifty thousand barrels per day of crude or refined petroleum
or liquified petroleum gas which has been or will be transported over
marine waters, except that the provisions of this chapter shall not
apply to storage facilities unless occasioned by such new facility
construction;
(d) Any underground reservoir for receipt and storage of natural
gas as defined in RCW 80.40.010 capable of delivering an average of
more than one hundred million standard cubic feet of natural gas per
day; and
(e) Facilities capable of processing more than twenty-five thousand
barrels per day of petroleum into refined products.
(15) "Land use plan" means a comprehensive plan or land use element
thereof adopted by a unit of local government pursuant to chapter((s))
35.63, 35A.63, ((or)) 36.70, or 36.70A RCW.
(16) "Zoning ordinance" means an ordinance of a unit of local
government regulating the use of land and adopted pursuant to
chapter((s)) 35.63, 35A.63, ((or)) 36.70, or 36.70A RCW or Article XI
of the state Constitution.
(17) "Alternative energy resource" means: (a) Wind; (b) solar
energy; (c) geothermal energy; (d) landfill gas; (e) wave or tidal
action; or (f) biomass energy based on solid organic fuels from wood,
forest, or field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not
include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives
such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.50.075 and 1989 c 175 s 172 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person ((required to file)) filing an application for
certification of an energy facility or an alternative energy resource
facility pursuant to this chapter may apply to the council for an
expedited processing of such an application. The application for
expedited processing shall be submitted to the council in such form and
manner and accompanied by such information as may be prescribed by
council rule. The council may grant an applicant expedited processing
of an application for certification upon finding that((:
(a))) the environmental impact of the proposed energy facility((;
(b) The area potentially affected;
(c) The cost and magnitude of the proposed energy facility; and
(d) The degree to which the proposed energy facility represents a
change in use of the proposed site
are)) is not significant ((enough to warrant a full review of the
application for certification under the provisions of this chapter)) or
will be mitigated to a nonsignificant level under RCW 43.21C.031 and
the project is found under RCW 80.50.090(2) to be consistent and in
compliance with municipal, county, or regional land use plans or zoning
ordinances.
(2) Upon granting an applicant expedited processing of an
application for certification, the council shall not be required to:
(a) Commission an independent study to further measure the
consequences of the proposed energy facility or alternative energy
resource facility on the environment, notwithstanding the other
provisions of RCW 80.50.071; nor
(b) Hold an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act, on the application.
(3) The council shall adopt rules governing the expedited
processing of an application for certification pursuant to this
section.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.50.090 and 2001 c 214 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The council shall conduct an informational public hearing in
the county of the proposed site as soon as practicable but not later
than sixty days after receipt of an application for site certification:
PROVIDED, That the place of such public hearing shall be as close as
practical to the proposed site.
(2) Subsequent to the informational public hearing, the council
shall conduct a public hearing to determine whether or not the proposed
site is consistent and in compliance with municipal, county, or
regional land use plans or zoning ordinances. If it is determined that
the proposed site does conform with existing land use plans or zoning
ordinances in effect as of the date of the application, the municipal,
county, or regional planning authority shall not thereafter change such
land use plans or zoning ordinances so as to affect the proposed site.
(3) Prior to the issuance of a council recommendation to the
governor under RCW 80.50.100 a public hearing, conducted as an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act, shall be held. At such public hearing any person shall
be entitled to be heard in support of or in opposition to the
application for certification.
(4) Additional public hearings shall be held as deemed appropriate
by the council in the exercise of its functions under this chapter.

--- END ---