BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.60.010 and 2000 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(2) "Customer-generator" means a user of a net metering system.
(3) "Distributive generation" means generation below five hundred
kilowatts that is connected to the distribution transmission of an
electric utility.
(4) "Electrical company" means a company owned by investors that
meets the definition of RCW 80.04.010.
(((4))) (5) "Electric cooperative" means a cooperative or
association organized under chapter 23.86 or 24.06 RCW.
(((5))) (6) "Electric utility" means any electrical company, public
utility district, irrigation district, port district, electric
cooperative, or municipal electric utility that is engaged in the
business of distributing electricity to retail electric customers in
the state.
(((6))) (7) "Irrigation district" means an irrigation district
under chapter 87.03 RCW.
(((7))) (8) "Municipal electric utility" means a city or town that
owns or operates an electric utility authorized by chapter 35.92 RCW.
(((8))) (9) "Net metering" means measuring the difference between
the electricity supplied by an electric utility and the electricity
generated by a customer-generator that is fed back to the electric
utility over the applicable billing period.
(((9))) (10) "Net metering system" means a fuel cell or a facility
for the production of electrical energy that:
(a) Uses ((as its fuel either solar, wind, or hydropower))
renewable energy;
(b) Has a generating capacity of not more than ((twenty-five)) five
hundred kilowatts;
(c) Is located on the customer-generator's premises;
(d) Operates in parallel with the electric utility's transmission
and distribution facilities; and
(e) Is intended primarily to offset part or all of the customer-generator's requirements for electricity.
(((10))) (11) "Port district" means a port district within which an
industrial development district has been established as authorized by
Title 53 RCW.
(((11))) (12) "Public utility district" means a district authorized
by chapter 54.04 RCW.
(13) "Renewable energy" means resources whose common characteristic
is that they are nondepletable or are naturally replenishable,
existing, or emerging nonfossil fuel energy sources or technologies,
and shall include but not be limited to the following: Solar
photovoltaic or solar thermal electric energy; wind energy; ocean
thermal, wave, or tidal energy; fuel cells; landfill gas; incremental
gains in energy production from capital improvements in naturally
flowing water and hydroelectric or run of river hydropower generation;
and advanced biomass power conversion technologies, such as
gasification using such biomass fuels as wood, agricultural, or food
wastes, energy crops, biogas, biodiesel, or organic refuse-derived
fuel. The following technologies or fuels shall not be considered
renewable energy supplies: Coal, oil, nuclear power, or fuel gases,
excluding fuel gases that are used in a combined heat and power plant
designed to produce both heat and electricity from a single heat
source.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.60.020 and 2000 c 158 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
An electric utility:
(1) Shall offer to make net metering available to eligible
customers-generators on a first-come, first-served basis until the
cumulative generating capacity of net metering systems equals ((0.1))
0.5 percent of the utility's peak demand during 1996, of which not less
than ((0.05)) 0.25 percent shall be attributable to net metering
systems that use ((as its fuel either solar, wind, or hydropower))
renewable energy;
(2) Shall allow net metering systems to be interconnected if:
(a) By January 2, 2008, the generating capacity is less than one
hundred kilowatts; or
(b) By January 2, 2010, the generating capacity is less than three
hundred kilowatts; or
(c) After January 1, 2010, the generating capacity is less than
three hundred kilowatts, unless the net metering system involves three
phase power lines, in which case generating capacity shall be allowed
up to five hundred kilowatts;
(3) Shall allow net metering systems to be interconnected using a
standard kilowatt-hour meter capable of registering the flow of
electricity in two directions, unless the commission, in the case of an
electrical company, or the appropriate governing body, in the case of
other electric utilities, determines, after appropriate notice and
opportunity for comment:
(a) That the use of additional metering equipment to monitor the
flow of electricity in each direction is necessary and appropriate for
the interconnection of net metering systems, after taking into account
the benefits and costs of purchasing and installing additional metering
equipment; and
(b) How the cost of purchasing and installing an additional meter
is to be allocated between the customer-generator and the utility;
(((3))) (4) Shall charge the customer-generator a minimum monthly
fee that is the same as other customers of the electric utility in the
same rate class, but shall not charge the customer-generator any
additional standby, capacity, interconnection, or other fee or charge
unless the commission, in the case of an electrical company, or the
appropriate governing body, in the case of other electric utilities,
determines, after appropriate notice and opportunity for comment that:
(a) The electric utility will incur direct costs associated with
interconnecting or administering net metering systems that exceed any
offsetting benefits associated with these systems; and
(b) Public policy is best served by imposing these costs on the
customer-generator rather than allocating these costs among the
utility's entire customer base.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.60.030 and 1998 c 318 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Consistent with the other provisions of this chapter, the net
energy measurement must be calculated in the following manner:
(1) The electric utility shall measure the net electricity produced
or consumed during the billing period, in accordance with normal
metering practices.
(2) If the electricity supplied by the electric utility exceeds the
electricity generated by the customer-generator and fed back to the
electric utility during the billing period, the customer-generator
shall be billed for the net electricity supplied by the electric
utility, in accordance with normal metering practices.
(3) If electricity generated by the customer-generator exceeds the
electricity supplied by the electric utility, the customer-generator:
(a) Shall be billed for the appropriate customer charges for that
billing period, in accordance with RCW 80.60.020; and
(b) Shall be credited for the excess kilowatt-hours generated
during the billing period, with this kilowatt-hour credit appearing on
the bill for the following billing period.
((At the beginning)) On April 30th of each calendar year, any
remaining unused kilowatt-hour credit accumulated during the previous
year shall be granted to the electric utility, without any compensation
to the customer-generator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 80.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A customer-generator may solicit power purchase agreements to
sell the customer-generator's output to any other Washington utility to
the extent that transactions are not preempted by federal energy
regulatory commission rule, regulation, or order. The local utility
has the option to match the proposed price or must wheel the qualifying
facility's output at a flat rate price not to exceed one percent of the
value of the power actually delivered under the contracted price. For
purposes of this section, a customer-generator is any renewable energy
generation facility having five hundred kilowatt capacity or less.
(2) A utility is exempt from this section if one percent of its
power originates from distributive generation.
(3) If a utility is exempt under subsection (2) of this section,
the utility must report their exemption to the relevant standing
committees in the legislature.
(4) If one or more utilities are found to be exempt under this
section, the legislature may review the generation thresholds contained
in this section for potential modification.

--- END ---