BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every property and casualty insurance company doing business in
this state, unless otherwise exempted by the domiciliary commissioner,
shall annually submit the opinion of an appointed actuary entitled
"Statement of Actuarial Opinion." This opinion shall be filed in
accordance with the property and casualty annual statement instructions
as adopted by the national association of insurance commissioners.
(2) Every property and casualty insurance company domiciled in this
state that is required to submit a statement of actuarial opinion shall
annually submit an actuarial opinion summary, written by the company's
appointed actuary. This actuarial opinion summary shall be filed in
accordance with the property and casualty annual statement instructions
as adopted by the national association of insurance commissioners and
shall be considered as a document supporting the actuarial opinion
required in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) An insurance company authorized but not domiciled in this state
shall provide the actuarial opinion summary upon request.
(4) An actuarial report and underlying work papers as required by
the property and casualty annual statement instructions as adopted by
the national association of insurance commissioners shall be prepared
to support each actuarial opinion.
(5) If the insurance company fails to provide either a supporting
actuarial report or work papers, or both, at the request of the
commissioner or the commissioner determines that the supporting
actuarial report or work papers provided by the insurance company is
otherwise unacceptable to the commissioner, the commissioner may engage
a qualified actuary at the expense of the company to review the opinion
and the basis for the opinion and prepare the supporting actuarial
report or work papers.
(6) The appointed actuary is not liable for damages to any person,
other than the insurance company, the commissioner, or both, for any
act, error, omission, decision, or conduct with respect to the
actuary's opinion, except in cases of fraud or willful misconduct on
the part of the appointed actuary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The statement of actuarial opinion shall be provided with the
annual statement in accordance with the property and casualty annual
statement instructions as adopted by the national association of
insurance commissioners and shall be treated as a public document.
(2) Documents, materials or other information in the possession or
control of the commissioner that are considered an actuarial report,
work papers, or actuarial opinion summary provided in support of the
opinion, and any other material provided by the insurance company to
the commissioner in connection with the actuarial report, work papers,
or actuarial opinion summary, is confidential by law and privileged, is
not subject to chapter 42.17 or 42.56 RCW, is not subject to subpoena,
and is not subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any
private civil action.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not limit the
commissioner's authority to release the documents to the actuarial
board for counseling and discipline so long as the material is required
for the purpose of professional disciplinary proceedings and the board
establishes procedures satisfactory to the commissioner for preserving
the confidentiality of the documents. Subsection (2) of this section
does not limit the commissioner's authority to use the documents,
materials, or other information in furtherance of any regulatory or
legal action brought as part of the commissioner's official duties.
(4) Neither the commissioner nor any person who received documents,
materials, or other information while acting under the authority of the
commissioner is permitted or required to testify in any private civil
action concerning any confidential documents, materials, or information
subject to subsection (2) of this section.
(5) In order to assist in the performance of the commissioner's
duties, the commissioner:
(a) May share documents, materials, or other information, including
the confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information
subject to subsection (2) of this section with other state, federal,
and international regulatory agencies, with the national association of
insurance commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and with
state, federal, and international law enforcement authorities, provided
that the recipient agrees to maintain the confidentiality and
privileged status of the document, material, or other information and
has the legal authority to maintain confidentiality;
(b) May receive documents, materials, or information, including
otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials, or
information, from the national association of insurance commissioners
and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and from regulatory and law
enforcement officials of other foreign or domestic jurisdictions, and
shall maintain as confidential or privileged any document, material, or
information received with notice or the understanding that it is
confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is
the source of the document, material, or information; and
(c) May enter into agreements governing the sharing and use of
information consistent with this subsection.
(6) A waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of
confidentiality in the documents, materials, or information may not
occur as a result of disclosure to the commissioner under this section
or as a result of sharing as authorized in subsection (5) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Documents, materials, and information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under section 2(2) of this act are confidential and
privileged and not subject to public disclosure under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act may be
known and cited as the property and casualty actuarial opinion law.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.05.250 and 1983 c 85 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each ((authorized)) domestic insurer shall annually, on or
before the first day of March, file with the commissioner a true
statement of its financial condition, transactions, and affairs as of
the thirty-first day of December preceding. The statement forms shall
be in general form and context as approved by the National Association
of Insurance Commissioners for the kinds of insurance to be reported
upon, and as supplemented for additional information required by this
code and by the commissioner. The statement shall be verified by the
oaths of at least two of the insurer's officers.
(2) The annual statement of an alien insurer shall relate only to
its transactions and affairs in the United States unless the
commissioner requires otherwise. The statement shall be verified by
the insurer's United States manager or by its officers duly authorized.
(3) The commissioner shall suspend or revoke the certificate of
authority of any insurer failing to file its annual statement when due
or during any extension of time therefor which the commissioner, for
good cause, may grant.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.05.440 and 1995 c 83 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Company action level event" means any of the following events:
(a) The filing of an RBC report by an insurer indicating that:
(i) The insurer's total adjusted capital is greater than or equal
to its regulatory action level RBC, but less than its company action
level RBC; ((or))
(ii) If a life and disability insurer, the insurer has total
adjusted capital that is greater than or equal to its company action
level RBC, but less than the product of its authorized control level
RBC and 2.5 and has a negative trend; or
(iii) If a property and casualty insurer, the insurer has total
adjusted capital that is greater than or equal to its company action
level RBC but less than the product of its authorized control level RBC
and 3.0 and met the trend test determined in accordance with the trend
test calculation included in the RBC instructions;
(b) The notification by the commissioner to the insurer of an
adjusted RBC report that indicates an event in (a) of this subsection,
provided the insurer does not challenge the adjusted RBC report under
RCW 48.05.460; or
(c) If, under RCW 48.05.460, an insurer challenges an adjusted RBC
report that indicates an event in (a) of this subsection, the
notification by the commissioner to the insurer that the commissioner
has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer's challenge.
(2) In the event of a company action level event, the insurer shall
prepare and submit to the commissioner an RBC plan that:
(a) Identifies the conditions that contribute to the company action
level event;
(b) Contains proposals of corrective actions that the insurer
intends to take and would be expected to result in the elimination of
the company action level event;
(c) Provides projections of the insurer's financial results in the
current year and at least the four succeeding years, both in the
absence of proposed corrective actions and giving effect to the
proposed corrective actions, including projections of statutory
operating income, net income, capital, and surplus. The projections
for both new and renewal business might include separate projections
for each major line of business and separately identify each
significant income, expense, and benefit component;
(d) Identifies the key assumptions impacting the insurer's
projections and the sensitivity of the projections to the assumptions;
and
(e) Identifies the quality of, and problems associated with, the
insurer's business, including but not limited to its assets,
anticipated business growth and associated surplus strain,
extraordinary exposure to risk, mix of business, and use of
reinsurance, if any, in each case.
(3) The RBC plan shall be submitted:
(a) Within forty-five days of the company action level event; or
(b) If the insurer challenges an adjusted RBC report under RCW
48.05.460, within forty-five days after notification to the insurer
that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer's
challenge.
(4) Within sixty days after the submission by an insurer of an RBC
plan to the commissioner, the commissioner shall notify the insurer
whether the RBC plan may be implemented or is, in the judgment of the
commissioner, unsatisfactory. If the commissioner determines the RBC
plan is unsatisfactory, the notification to the insurer shall set forth
the reasons for the determination, and may set forth proposed revisions
that will render the RBC plan satisfactory. Upon notification from the
commissioner, the insurer shall prepare a revised RBC plan, that may
incorporate by reference any revisions proposed by the commissioner,
and shall submit the revised RBC plan to the commissioner:
(a) Within forty-five days after the notification from the
commissioner; or
(b) If the insurer challenges the notification from the
commissioner under RCW 48.05.460, within forty-five days after a
notification to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing,
rejected the insurer's challenge.
(5) In the event of a notification by the commissioner to an
insurer that the insurer's RBC plan or revised RBC plan is
unsatisfactory, the commissioner may, subject to the insurer's rights
to a hearing under RCW 48.05.460, specify in the notification that the
notification constitutes a regulatory action level event.
(6) Every domestic insurer that files an RBC plan or revised RBC
plan with the commissioner shall file a copy of the RBC plan or revised
RBC plan with the insurance commissioner in any state in which the
insurer is authorized to do business if:
(a) The state has an RBC provision substantially similar to RCW
48.05.465(1); and
(b) The insurance commissioner of that state has notified the
insurer of its request for the filing in writing, in which case the
insurer shall file a copy of the RBC plan or revised RBC plan in that
state no later than the later of:
(i) Fifteen days after the receipt of notice to file a copy of its
RBC plan or revised plan with the state; or
(ii) The date on which the RBC plan or revised RBC plan is filed
under subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.43.045 and 1997 c 231 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every health plan delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed by a
health carrier on and after January 1, 1996, shall:
(1) Permit every category of health care provider to provide health
services or care for conditions included in the basic health plan
services to the extent that:
(a) The provision of such health services or care is within the
health care providers' permitted scope of practice; and
(b) The providers agree to abide by standards related to:
(i) Provision, utilization review, and cost containment of health
services;
(ii) Management and administrative procedures; and
(iii) Provision of cost-effective and clinically efficacious health
services.
(2) Annually report the names and addresses of all officers,
directors, or trustees of the health carrier during the preceding year,
and the amount of wages, expense reimbursements, or other payments to
such individuals, unless substantially similar information is filed
with the commissioner or the national association of insurance
commissioners. This requirement does not apply to a foreign or alien
insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW that files a
supplemental compensation exhibit in its annual statement as required
by law.

Sec. 8 RCW 48.44.095 and 1997 c 212 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every domestic health care service contractor shall annually,
on or before the first day of March, file with the commissioner a
statement verified by at least two of the principal officers of the
health care service contractor showing its financial condition as of
the last day of the preceding calendar year. The statement shall be in
such form as is furnished or prescribed by the commissioner. The
commissioner may for good reason allow a reasonable extension of the
time within which such annual statement shall be filed.
(2) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section, every health care service contractor that is registered in
this state shall annually, on or before March 1st of each year, file
with the national association of insurance commissioners a copy of its
annual statement, along with those additional schedules as prescribed
by the commissioner for the preceding year. The information filed with
the national association of insurance commissioners shall be in the
same format and scope as that required by the commissioner and shall
include the signed jurate page and the actuarial certification. Any
amendments and addendums to the annual statement filing subsequently
filed with the commissioner shall also be filed with the national
association of insurance commissioners.
(3) Coincident with the filing of its annual statement and other
schedules, each health care service contractor shall pay a reasonable
fee directly to the national association of insurance commissioners in
an amount approved by the commissioner to cover the costs associated
with the analysis of the annual statement.
(4) Foreign health care service contractors that are domiciled in
a state that has a law substantially similar to subsection (2) of this
section are considered to be in compliance with this section.
(5) In the absence of actual malice, members of the national
association of insurance commissioners, their duly authorized
committees, subcommittees, and task forces, their delegates, national
association of insurance commissioners employees, and all other persons
charged with the responsibility of collecting, reviewing, analyzing,
and dissimilating the information developed from the filing of the
annual statement shall be acting as agents of the commissioner under
the authority of this section and shall not be subject to civil
liability for libel, slander, or any other cause of action by virtue of
their collection, review, analysis, or dissimilation of the data and
information collected for the filings required under this section.
(6) The commissioner may suspend or revoke the certificate of
registration of any health care service contractor failing to file its
annual statement or pay the fees when due or during any extension of
time therefor which the commissioner, for good cause, may grant.

Sec. 9 RCW 48.46.080 and 1997 c 212 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every domestic health maintenance organization shall annually,
on or before the first day of March, file with the commissioner a
statement verified by at least two of the principal officers of the
health maintenance organization showing its financial condition as of
the last day of the preceding calendar year.
(2) Such annual report shall be in such form as the commissioner
shall prescribe and shall include:
(a) A financial statement of such organization, including its
balance sheet and receipts and disbursements for the preceding year,
which reflects at a minimum;
(i) All prepayments and other payments received for health care
services rendered pursuant to health maintenance agreements;
(ii) Expenditures to all categories of health care facilities,
providers, insurance companies, or hospital or medical service plan
corporations with which such organization has contracted to fulfill
obligations to enrolled participants arising out of its health
maintenance agreements, together with all other direct expenses
including depreciation, enrollment, and commission; and
(iii) Expenditures for capital improvements, or additions thereto,
including but not limited to construction, renovation, or purchase of
facilities and capital equipment;
(b) The number of participants enrolled and terminated during the
report period. Every employer offering health care benefits to their
employees through a group contract with a health maintenance
organization shall furnish said health maintenance organization with a
list of their employees enrolled under such plan;
(c) The number of doctors by type of practice who, under contract
with or as an employee of the health maintenance organization,
furnished health care services to consumers during the past year;
(d) A report of the names and addresses of all officers, directors,
or trustees of the health maintenance organization during the preceding
year, and the amount of wages, expense reimbursements, or other
payments to such individuals for services to such organization. For
partnership and professional service corporations, a report shall be
made for partners or shareholders as to any compensation or expense
reimbursement received by them for services, other than for services
and expenses relating directly for patient care;
(e) Such other information relating to the performance of the
health maintenance organization or the health care facilities or
providers with which it has contracted as reasonably necessary to the
proper and effective administration of this chapter, in accordance with
rules and regulations; and
(f) Disclosure of any financial interests held by officers and
directors in any providers associated with the health maintenance
organization or any provider of the health maintenance organization.
(3) The commissioner may for good reason allow a reasonable
extension of the time within which such annual statement shall be
filed.
(4) In addition to the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, every health maintenance organization that is registered
in this state shall annually, on or before March 1st of each year, file
with the national association of insurance commissioners a copy of its
annual statement, along with those additional schedules as prescribed
by the commissioner for the preceding year. The information filed with
the national association of insurance commissioners shall be in the
same format and scope as that required by the commissioner and shall
include the signed jurate page and the actuarial certification. Any
amendments and addendums to the annual statement filing subsequently
filed with the commissioner shall also be filed with the national
association of insurance commissioners.
(5) Coincident with the filing of its annual statement and other
schedules, each health maintenance organization shall pay a reasonable
fee directly to the national association of insurance commissioners in
an amount approved by the commissioner to cover the costs associated
with the analysis of the annual statement.
(6) Foreign health maintenance organizations that are domiciled in
a state that has a law substantially similar to subsection (4) of this
section are considered to be in compliance with this section.
(7) In the absence of actual malice, members of the national
association of insurance commissioners, their duly authorized
committees, subcommittees, and task forces, their delegates, national
association of insurance commissioners employees, and all other persons
charged with the responsibility of collecting, reviewing, analyzing,
and dissimilating the information developed from the filing of the
annual statement shall be acting as agents of the commissioner under
the authority of this section and shall not be subject to civil
liability for libel, slander, or any other cause of action by virtue of
their collection, review, analysis, or dissimilation of the data and
information collected for the filings required under this section.
(8) The commissioner may suspend or revoke the certificate of
registration of any health maintenance organization failing to file its
annual statement or pay the fees when due or during any extension of
time therefor which the commissioner, for good cause, may grant.
(9) No person shall knowingly file with any public official or
knowingly make, publish, or disseminate any financial statement of a
health maintenance organization which does not accurately state the
health maintenance organization's financial condition.

Sec. 10 RCW 48.125.090 and 2004 c 260 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement must comply
with the reporting requirements of this section.
(2) Every arrangement holding a certificate of authority from the
commissioner must file its financial statements as required by this
title and by the commissioner in accordance with the accounting
practices and procedures manuals as adopted by the national association
of insurance commissioners, unless otherwise provided by law.
(3) Every arrangement must comply with the provisions of chapters
48.12 and 48.13 RCW.
(4) Every domestic arrangement holding a certificate of authority
shall((,)) annually, on or before the first day of March, file with the
commissioner a true statement of its financial condition, transactions,
and affairs as of the thirty-first day of December of the preceding
year. The statement forms must be those forms approved by the national
association of insurance commissioners for health insurance. The
statement must be verified by the oaths of at least two officers of the
arrangement. Additional information may be required by this title or
by the request of the commissioner.
(5) Every arrangement must report their annual and other statements
in the same manner required of other insurers by rule of the
commissioner.
(6) The arrangement must file with the commissioner a copy of the
arrangement's internal revenue service form 5500 together with all
attachments to the form, at the time required for filing the form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 48.05.490 (RBC reports for 1995 -- Requirements) and 1995 c
83 s 13; and
(2) RCW 48.43.365 (RBC report for 1998 calendar year) and 1998 c
241 s 14.

Sec. 12 RCW 52.30.020 and 1979 c 151 s 164 are each amended to
read as follows:
Wherever a fire protection district has been organized which
includes within its area or is adjacent to, buildings and equipment,
except those leased to a nontax exempt person or organization, owned by
the legislative or administrative authority of a state agency or
institution or a municipal corporation, the agency or institution or
municipal corporation involved shall contract with such district for
fire protection services necessary for the protection and safety of
personnel and property pursuant to the provisions of chapter 39.34
RCW((, as now or hereafter amended)): PROVIDED, That nothing in this
section shall be construed to require that any state agency,
institution, or municipal corporation contract for services which are
performed by the staff and equipment of such state agency, institution,
or municipal corporation: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this
section shall apply to state agencies or institutions or municipal
corporations which are receiving fire protection services by contract
from another municipality, city, town, or other entities: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That school districts shall receive fire protection services
from the fire protection districts in which they are located without
the necessity of executing a contract for such fire protection
services: PROVIDED FURTHER, That prior to September 1, 1974, the
superintendent of public instruction, the ((insurance commissioner))
chief of the Washington state patrol through the director of fire
protection, the director of financial management, and the executive
director of the Washington fire commissioners association, or their
designees, shall develop criteria to be used by the ((insurance
commissioner)) chief of the Washington state patrol through the
director of fire protection in establishing uniform rates governing
payments to fire districts by school districts for fire protection
services. On or before September 1, 1974, the ((insurance
commissioner)) chief of the Washington state patrol through the
director of fire protection shall establish such rates to be payable by
school districts on or before January 1st of each year commencing
January 1, 1975, payable July 1, 1975: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That
beginning with the 1975-77 biennium and in each biennium thereafter the
superintendent of public instruction shall present in ((his)) the
budget submittal to the governor an amount sufficient to reimburse
affected school districts for the moneys necessary to pay the costs of
the uniform rates established by the ((insurance commissioner)) chief
of the Washington state patrol through the director of fire protection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 RCW 48.48.030, 48.48.040, 48.48.045,
48.48.050, 48.48.060, 48.48.065, 48.48.070, 48.48.080, 48.48.090,
48.48.110, 48.48.140, 48.48.150, and 48.48.160 are each recodified as
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

Sec. 14 RCW 48.24.030 and 2005 c 223 s 13 and 2005 c 222 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Insurance under any group life insurance policy issued under
RCW 48.24.020, 48.24.050, 48.24.060, 48.24.070, or 48.24.090 may be
extended to insure the spouse and dependent children, or any class or
classes thereof, of each insured employee or member who so elects, in
amounts in accordance with a plan that precludes individual selection
by the employees or members or by the employer or labor union or
trustee, and which insurance on the life of any one family member
including a spouse shall not be in excess of the amount on the life of
the insured employee or member.
Premiums for the insurance on the family members shall be paid by
the policyholder, either from the employer's funds, funds contributed
to him or her, employee's funds, trustee's funds, or labor union funds.
(2) A spouse insured under this section has the same conversion
right as to the insurance on his or her life as is vested in the
employee or member under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 48.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All Washington state licensed insurance agents who sell federal
flood insurance policies must comply with the minimum training
requirements of section 207 of the flood insurance reform act of 2004,
and basic flood education as outlined at 70 C.F.R. Sec. 52117, or such
later requirements as are published by the federal emergency management
agency.
(2) Licensed insurers shall demonstrate to the commissioner, upon
request, that their licensed and appointed agents who sell federal
flood insurance policies have complied with the minimum federal flood
insurance training requirements.

Sec. 16 RCW 48.43.005 and 2004 c 244 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless otherwise specifically provided, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adjusted community rate" means the rating method used to
establish the premium for health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially
demonstrated differences in utilization or cost attributable to
geographic region, age, family size, and use of wellness activities.
(2) "Basic health plan" means the plan described under chapter
70.47 RCW, as revised from time to time.
(3) "Basic health plan model plan" means a health plan as required
in RCW 70.47.060(2)(((d))) (e).
(4) "Basic health plan services" means that schedule of covered
health services, including the description of how those benefits are to
be administered, that are required to be delivered to an enrollee under
the basic health plan, as revised from time to time.
(5) "Catastrophic health plan" means:
(a) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering a
single enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, one thousand five hundred dollars and an
annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan (other
than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least three thousand
dollars; and
(b) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering more
than one enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, three thousand dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan (other than for
premiums) for covered benefits of at least five thousand five hundred
dollars; or
(c) Any health benefit plan that provides benefits for hospital
inpatient and outpatient services, professional and prescription drugs
provided in conjunction with such hospital inpatient and outpatient
services, and excludes or substantially limits outpatient physician
services and those services usually provided in an office setting.
(6) "Certification" means a determination by a review organization
that an admission, extension of stay, or other health care service or
procedure has been reviewed and, based on the information provided,
meets the clinical requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness,
level of care, or effectiveness under the auspices of the applicable
health benefit plan.
(7) "Concurrent review" means utilization review conducted during
a patient's hospital stay or course of treatment.
(8) "Covered person" or "enrollee" means a person covered by a
health plan including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder,
beneficiary of a group plan, or individual covered by any other health
plan.
(9) "Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal spouse
and unmarried dependent children who qualify for coverage under the
enrollee's health benefit plan.
(10) "Eligible employee" means an employee who works on a full-time
basis with a normal work week of thirty or more hours. The term
includes a self-employed individual, including a sole proprietor, a
partner of a partnership, and may include an independent contractor, if
the self-employed individual, sole proprietor, partner, or independent
contractor is included as an employee under a health benefit plan of a
small employer, but does not work less than thirty hours per week and
derives at least seventy-five percent of his or her income from a trade
or business through which he or she has attempted to earn taxable
income and for which he or she has filed the appropriate internal
revenue service form. Persons covered under a health benefit plan
pursuant to the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1986
shall not be considered eligible employees for purposes of minimum
participation requirements of chapter 265, Laws of 1995.
(11) "Emergency medical condition" means the emergent and acute
onset of a symptom or symptoms, including severe pain, that would lead
a prudent layperson acting reasonably to believe that a health
condition exists that requires immediate medical attention, if failure
to provide medical attention would result in serious impairment to
bodily functions or serious dysfunction of a bodily organ or part, or
would place the person's health in serious jeopardy.
(12) "Emergency services" means otherwise covered health care
services medically necessary to evaluate and treat an emergency medical
condition, provided in a hospital emergency department.
(13) "Enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing" means amounts paid to
health carriers directly providing services, health care providers, or
health care facilities by enrollees and may include copayments,
coinsurance, or deductibles.
(14) "Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or on
behalf of a covered person regarding: (a) Denial of payment for
medical services or nonprovision of medical services included in the
covered person's health benefit plan, or (b) service delivery issues
other than denial of payment for medical services or nonprovision of
medical services, including dissatisfaction with medical care, waiting
time for medical services, provider or staff attitude or demeanor, or
dissatisfaction with service provided by the health carrier.
(15) "Health care facility" or "facility" means hospices licensed
under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW,
rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020, psychiatric
hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed
under chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers licensed under
chapter 71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment centers licensed
under chapter 70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical
facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, drug and alcohol treatment
facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A RCW, and home health agencies
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and includes such facilities if
owned and operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the
state and such other facilities as required by federal law and
implementing regulations.
(16) "Health care provider" or "provider" means:
(a) A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to
practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing
health care services in this state consistent with state law; or
(b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this
subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her employment.
(17) "Health care service" means that service offered or provided
by health care facilities and health care providers relating to the
prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.
(18) "Health carrier" or "carrier" means a disability insurer
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service
contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.
(19) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means any policy,
contract, or agreement offered by a health carrier to provide, arrange,
reimburse, or pay for health care services except the following:
(a) Long-term care insurance governed by chapter 48.84 RCW;
(b) Medicare supplemental health insurance governed by chapter
48.66 RCW;
(c) Coverage supplemental to the coverage provided under chapter
55, Title 10, United States Code;
(d) Limited health care services offered by limited health care
service contractors in accordance with RCW 48.44.035;
(((d))) (e) Disability income;
(((e))) (f) Coverage incidental to a property/casualty liability
insurance policy such as automobile personal injury protection coverage
and homeowner guest medical;
(((f))) (g) Workers' compensation coverage;
(((g))) (h) Accident only coverage;
(((h))) (i) Specified disease and hospital confinement indemnity
when marketed solely as a supplement to a health plan;
(((i))) (j) Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans;
(((j))) (k) Dental only and vision only coverage; and
(((k))) (l) Plans deemed by the insurance commissioner to have a
short-term limited purpose or duration, or to be a student-only plan
that is guaranteed renewable while the covered person is enrolled as a
regular full-time undergraduate or graduate student at an accredited
higher education institution, after a written request for such
classification by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the
insurance commissioner.
(20) "Material modification" means a change in the actuarial value
of the health plan as modified of more than five percent but less than
fifteen percent.
(21) "Preexisting condition" means any medical condition, illness,
or injury that existed any time prior to the effective date of
coverage.
(22) "Premium" means all sums charged, received, or deposited by a
health carrier as consideration for a health plan or the continuance of
a health plan. Any assessment or any "membership," "policy,"
"contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a health
carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the
premium. "Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing.
(23) "Review organization" means a disability insurer regulated
under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service contractor as
defined in RCW 48.44.010, or health maintenance organization as defined
in RCW 48.46.020, and entities affiliated with, under contract with, or
acting on behalf of a health carrier to perform a utilization review.
(24) "Small employer" or "small group" means any person, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, political subdivision, sole
proprietor, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged in
business that, on at least fifty percent of its working days during the
preceding calendar quarter, employed at least two but no more than
fifty eligible employees, with a normal work week of thirty or more
hours, the majority of whom were employed within this state, and is not
formed primarily for purposes of buying health insurance and in which
a bona fide employer-employee relationship exists. In determining the
number of eligible employees, companies that are affiliated companies,
or that are eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of
taxation by this state, shall be considered an employer. Subsequent to
the issuance of a health plan to a small employer and for the purpose
of determining eligibility, the size of a small employer shall be
determined annually. Except as otherwise specifically provided, a
small employer shall continue to be considered a small employer until
the plan anniversary following the date the small employer no longer
meets the requirements of this definition. A self-employed individual
or sole proprietor must derive at least seventy-five percent of his or
her income from a trade or business through which the individual or
sole proprietor has attempted to earn taxable income and for which he
or she has filed the appropriate internal revenue service form 1040,
schedule C or F, for the previous taxable year except for a self-employed individual or sole proprietor in an agricultural trade or
business, who must derive at least fifty-one percent of his or her
income from the trade or business through which the individual or sole
proprietor has attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she
has filed the appropriate internal revenue service form 1040, for the
previous taxable year. A self-employed individual or sole proprietor
who is covered as a group of one on the day prior to June 10, 2004,
shall also be considered a "small employer" to the extent that
individual or group of one is entitled to have his or her coverage
renewed as provided in RCW 48.43.035(6).
(25) "Utilization review" means the prospective, concurrent, or
retrospective assessment of the necessity and appropriateness of the
allocation of health care resources and services of a provider or
facility, given or proposed to be given to an enrollee or group of
enrollees.
(26) "Wellness activity" means an explicit program of an activity
consistent with department of health guidelines, such as, smoking
cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse,
appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle
safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition education for the
purpose of improving enrollee health status and reducing health service
costs.

Sec. 17 RCW 48.22.030 and 2004 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Underinsured motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle with respect
to the ownership, maintenance, or use of which either no bodily injury
or property damage liability bond or insurance policy applies at the
time of an accident, or with respect to which the sum of the limits of
liability under all bodily injury or property damage liability bonds
and insurance policies applicable to a covered person after an accident
is less than the applicable damages which the covered person is legally
entitled to recover.
(2) No new policy or renewal of an existing policy insuring against
loss resulting from liability imposed by law for bodily injury, death,
or property damage, suffered by any person arising out of the
ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle shall be issued with
respect to any motor vehicle registered or principally garaged in this
state unless coverage is provided therein or supplemental thereto for
the protection of persons insured thereunder who are legally entitled
to recover damages from owners or operators of underinsured motor
vehicles, hit-and-run motor vehicles, and phantom vehicles because of
bodily injury, death, or property damage, resulting therefrom, except
while operating or occupying a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, and
except while operating or occupying a motor vehicle owned or available
for the regular use by the named insured or any family member, and
which is not insured under the liability coverage of the policy. The
coverage required to be offered under this chapter is not applicable to
general liability policies, commonly known as umbrella policies, or
other policies which apply only as excess to the insurance directly
applicable to the vehicle insured.
(3) Except as to property damage, coverage required under
subsection (2) of this section shall be in the same amount as the
insured's third party liability coverage unless the insured rejects all
or part of the coverage as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
Coverage for property damage need only be issued in conjunction with
coverage for bodily injury or death. Property damage coverage required
under subsection (2) of this section shall mean physical damage to the
insured motor vehicle unless the policy specifically provides coverage
for the contents thereof or other forms of property damage.
(4) A named insured or spouse may reject, in writing, underinsured
coverage for bodily injury or death, or property damage, and the
requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not
apply. If a named insured or spouse has rejected underinsured
coverage, such coverage shall not be included in any supplemental or
renewal policy unless a named insured or spouse subsequently requests
such coverage in writing. The requirement of a written rejection under
this subsection shall apply only to the original issuance of policies
issued after July 24, 1983, and not to any renewal or replacement
policy. When a named insured or spouse chooses a property damage
coverage that is less than the insured's third party liability coverage
for property damage, a written rejection is not required.
(5) The limit of liability under the policy coverage may be defined
as the maximum limits of liability for all damages resulting from any
one accident regardless of the number of covered persons, claims made,
or vehicles or premiums shown on the policy, or premiums paid, or
vehicles involved in an accident.
(6) The policy may provide that if an injured person has other
similar insurance available to him under other policies, the total
limits of liability of all coverages shall not exceed the higher of the
applicable limits of the respective coverages.
(7)(a) The policy may provide for a deductible of not more than
three hundred dollars for payment for property damage when the damage
is caused by a hit-and-run driver or a phantom vehicle.
(b) In all other cases of underinsured property damage coverage,
the policy may provide for a deductible of not more than one hundred
dollars.
(8) For the purposes of this chapter, a "phantom vehicle" shall
mean a motor vehicle which causes bodily injury, death, or property
damage to an insured and has no physical contact with the insured or
the vehicle which the insured is occupying at the time of the accident
if:
(a) The facts of the accident can be corroborated by competent
evidence other than the testimony of the insured or any person having
an underinsured motorist claim resulting from the accident; and
(b) The accident has been reported to the appropriate law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours of the accident.
(9) An insurer who elects to write motorcycle or motor-driven cycle
insurance in this state must provide information to prospective
insureds about the coverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 4 of this act take
effect December 31, 2007.

--- END ---