BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A court shall impose electronic monitoring as a condition of
community custody for an offender sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712, or an
offender convicted of a violation of RCW 9A.44.130(10)(a), unless the
court finds electronic monitoring impracticable or inappropriate given
the individual circumstances of the offender.
(2) A court may impose electronic monitoring as a condition of
community custody for an offender convicted of any sex offense not
included in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The department shall carry out any electronic monitoring
ordered under this section using the most appropriate technology given
the individual circumstances of the offender. The department may
require an offender to pay all or part of the costs for electronic
monitoring imposed under this section dependent upon the offender's
ability to pay.
(4) As used in this section, "electronic monitoring" means the
monitoring of an offender using an electronic offender tracking system
including, but not limited to, a system using radio frequency or active
or passive global positioning system technology.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.505 and 2002 c 290 s 17, 2002 c 289 s 6, and
2002 c 175 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose
punishment as provided in this chapter.
(2)(a) The court shall impose a sentence as provided in the
following sections and as applicable in the case:
(i) Unless another term of confinement applies, the court shall
impose a sentence within the standard sentence range established in RCW
9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517;
(ii) RCW 9.94A.700 and 9.94A.705, relating to community placement;
(iii) RCW 9.94A.710 and 9.94A.715, relating to community custody;
(iv) RCW 9.94A.545, relating to community custody for offenders
whose term of confinement is one year or less;
(v) RCW 9.94A.570, relating to persistent offenders;
(vi) RCW 9.94A.540, relating to mandatory minimum terms;
(vii) RCW 9.94A.650, relating to the first-time offender waiver;
(viii) RCW 9.94A.660, relating to the drug offender sentencing
alternative;
(ix) RCW 9.94A.670, relating to the special sex offender sentencing
alternative;
(x) RCW 9.94A.712, relating to certain sex offenses;
(xi) RCW 9.94A.535, relating to exceptional sentences;
(xii) RCW 9.94A.589, relating to consecutive and concurrent
sentences;
(xiii) Section 1 of this act, relating to electronic monitoring of
sex offenders.
(b) If a standard sentence range has not been established for the
offender's crime, the court shall impose a determinate sentence which
may include not more than one year of confinement; community
restitution work; until July 1, 2000, a term of community supervision
not to exceed one year and on and after July 1, 2000, a term of
community custody not to exceed one year, subject to conditions and
sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.710 (2) and (3); and/or other
legal financial obligations. The court may impose a sentence which
provides more than one year of confinement if the court finds reasons
justifying an exceptional sentence as provided in RCW 9.94A.535.
(3) If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty
days or less, the court may, in its discretion, specify that the
sentence be served on consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence
requiring more than thirty days of confinement shall be served on
consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule court-ordered
intermittent sentences as space permits.
(4) If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial
obligation, it shall be imposed as provided in RCW 9.94A.750,
9.94A.753, 9.94A.760, and 43.43.7541.
(5) Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.750(4) and 9.94A.753(4), a
court may not impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or
community supervision, community placement, or community custody which
exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as provided in chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(6) The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all
confinement time served before the sentencing if that confinement was
solely in regard to the offense for which the offender is being
sentenced.
(7) The court shall order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.750
and 9.94A.753.
(8) As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce
crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions as provided in
this chapter.
(9) The court may order an offender whose sentence includes
community placement or community supervision to undergo a mental status
evaluation and to participate in available outpatient mental health
treatment, if the court finds that reasonable grounds exist to believe
that the offender is a mentally ill person as defined in RCW 71.24.025,
and that this condition is likely to have influenced the offense. An
order requiring mental status evaluation or treatment must be based on
a presentence report and, if applicable, mental status evaluations that
have been filed with the court to determine the offender's competency
or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may order
additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.
(10) In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require
the offender to serve the partial confinement in work release, in a
program of home detention, on work crew, or in a combined program of
work crew and home detention.
(11) In sentencing an offender convicted of a crime of domestic
violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, if the offender has a minor
child, or if the victim of the offense for which the offender was
convicted has a minor child, the court may, as part of any term of
community supervision, community placement, or community custody, order
the offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator program
approved under RCW 26.50.150.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.715 and 2003 c 379 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department for a sex offense not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712, a
violent offense, any crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or
a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or
after July 1, 2000, the court shall in addition to the other terms of
the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody for the
community custody range established under RCW 9.94A.850 or up to the
period of earned release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2),
whichever is longer. The community custody shall begin: (a) Upon
completion of the term of confinement; (b) at such time as the offender
is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2); or (c) with regard to
offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660, upon failure to complete or
administrative termination from the special drug offender sentencing
alternative program. Except as provided in RCW 9.94A.501, the
department shall supervise any sentence of community custody imposed
under this section.
(2)(a) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions of
community custody shall include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4).
The conditions may also include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(5).
The court may also order the offender to participate in rehabilitative
programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct reasonably related to
the circumstances of the offense, the offender's risk of reoffending,
or the safety of the community, and the department shall enforce such
conditions pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.
(b) As part of any sentence that includes a term of community
custody imposed under this subsection, the court shall also require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department under
RCW 9.94A.720. The department shall assess the offender's risk of
reoffense and may establish and modify additional conditions of the
offender's community custody based upon the risk to community safety.
In addition, the department may require the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct,
((and)) to obey all laws, or to submit to electronic monitoring as
defined in section 1 of this act. The department shall notify local
law enforcement whenever electronic monitoring is imposed under this
subsection or section 1 of this act. The department shall carry out
any electronic monitoring imposed under section 1 of this act using the
most appropriate technology given the individual circumstances of the
offender.
(c) The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to
those ordered by the court and may not contravene or decrease court
imposed conditions. The department shall notify the offender in
writing of any such conditions or modifications. In setting,
modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the
department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.
(3) If an offender violates conditions imposed by the court or the
department pursuant to this section during community custody, the
department may transfer the offender to a more restrictive confinement
status and impose other available sanctions as provided in RCW
9.94A.737 and 9.94A.740.
(4) Except for terms of community custody under RCW 9.94A.670, the
department shall discharge the offender from community custody on a
date determined by the department, which the department may modify,
based on risk and performance of the offender, within the range or at
the end of the period of earned release, whichever is later.
(5) At any time prior to the completion or termination of a sex
offender's term of community custody, if the court finds that public
safety would be enhanced, the court may impose and enforce an order
extending any or all of the conditions imposed pursuant to this section
for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for the crime as it
is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a condition
extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of
the sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.631 and may be punishable as
contempt of court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040. If the court
extends a condition beyond the expiration of the term of community
custody, the department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender's compliance with the condition.
(6) Within the funds available for community custody, the
department shall determine conditions and duration of community custody
on the basis of risk to community safety, and shall supervise offenders
during community custody on the basis of risk to community safety and
conditions imposed by the court. The secretary shall adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this subsection.
(7) By the close of the next business day after receiving notice of
a condition imposed or modified by the department, an offender may
request an administrative review under rules adopted by the department.
The condition shall remain in effect unless the reviewing officer finds
that it is not reasonably related to any of the following: (a) The
crime of conviction; (b) the offender's risk of reoffending; or (c) the
safety of the community.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The department, monitoring agency, local law enforcement, and any
employee of the department, monitoring agency, or law enforcement
acting within the scope of his or her employment are immune from civil
liability resulting from acts or omissions relating to electronic
monitoring of offenders under this act, unless the department or
employee acted with gross negligence or in bad faith.

--- END ---