BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In a prosecution for rape of a child in the first degree or
child molestation in the first degree, the prosecuting attorney shall
file a special allegation that the defendant was unknown to the victim
prior to the commission of the offense whenever sufficient admissible
evidence exists, which, when considered with the most plausible,
reasonably foreseeable defense that could be raised under the evidence,
would justify a finding by a reasonable and objective fact-finder that
the defendant was unknown to the victim prior to the commission of the
offense.
(2) Once a special allegation has been made under this section, the
state has the burden to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the
defendant was unknown to the victim prior to the commission of the
offense. If a jury is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant
guilty, also find a special verdict as to whether the defendant was
unknown to the victim prior to the commission of the offense. If no
jury is had, the court shall make a finding of fact as to whether the
defendant was unknown to the victim prior to the commission of the
offense.
(3) The prosecuting attorney shall not withdraw a special
allegation filed under this section without the approval of the court
through an order of dismissal of the allegation. The court may not
dismiss the special allegation unless it finds that the order is
necessary to correct an error in the initial charging decision or that
there are evidentiary problems that make proving the special allegation
doubtful.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In a prosecution for rape in the first degree, rape in the
second degree, indecent liberties by forcible compulsion, or kidnapping
in the first degree where a special allegation has been made under RCW
9.94A.835, the prosecuting attorney shall file a special allegation
that the victim of the offense was under fifteen years of age at the
time of the offense whenever sufficient admissible evidence exists,
which, when considered with the most plausible, reasonably foreseeable
defense that could be raised under the evidence, would justify a
finding by a reasonable and objective fact-finder that the victim was
under fifteen years of age at the time of the offense.
(2) Once a special allegation has been made under this section, the
state has the burden to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the victim
was under fifteen years of age at the time of the offense. If a jury
is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also find a
special verdict as to whether the victim was under the age of fifteen
at the time of the offense. If no jury is had, the court shall make a
finding of fact as to whether the victim was under the age of fifteen
at the time of the offense.
(3) The prosecuting attorney shall not withdraw a special
allegation filed under this section without the approval of the court
through an order of dismissal of the allegation. The court may not
dismiss the special allegation unless it finds that the order is
necessary to correct an error in the initial charging decision or that
there are evidentiary problems that make proving the special allegation
doubtful.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.712 and 2005 c 436 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender who is not a persistent offender shall be sentenced
under this section if the offender:
(a) Is convicted of:
(i) Rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a
child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion;
(ii) Any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual
motivation: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the
second degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second
degree, assault of a child in the first degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or
(iii) An attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection
(1)(a);
committed on or after September 1, 2001; or
(b) Has a prior conviction for an offense listed in RCW
9.94A.030(33)(b), and is convicted of any sex offense which was
committed after September 1, 2001.
For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), failure to register is not
a sex offense.
(2) An offender convicted of rape of a child in the first or second
degree or child molestation in the first degree who was seventeen years
of age or younger at the time of the offense shall not be sentenced
under this section.
(3)(a) Upon a finding that the offender is subject to sentencing
under this section, the court shall impose a sentence to a maximum term
((consisting of the statutory maximum sentence for the offense)) and a
minimum term ((either within the standard sentence range for the
offense, or outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW
9.94A.535, if the offender is otherwise eligible for such a sentence)).
(b) The maximum term shall consist of the statutory maximum
sentence for the offense.
(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, the
minimum term shall be either within the standard sentence range for the
offense, or outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW
9.94A.535, if the offender is otherwise eligible for such a sentence.
(ii) If the offense that caused the offender to be sentenced under
this section was rape of a child in the first degree or child
molestation in the first degree, and there has been a finding that the
defendant was unknown to the victim prior to the offense under section
1 of this act, the minimum term shall be either the maximum of the
standard sentence range or twenty-five years, whichever is greater. If
the offense that caused the offender to be sentenced under this section
was rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree, indecent
liberties by forcible compulsion, or kidnapping in the first degree
with a finding of sexual motivation, and there has been a finding that
the victim was under the age of fifteen at the time of the offense
under section 2 of this act, the minimum term shall be either the
maximum of the standard range for the offense or twenty-five years,
whichever is greater.
(d) A minimum sentence imposed under (c)(ii) of this subsection
shall not affect an offender's eligibility for the special sex offender
sentencing alternative under RCW 9.94A.670 if the offender is otherwise
eligible for the sentencing alternative.
(4) A person sentenced under subsection (3) of this section shall
serve the sentence in a facility or institution operated, or utilized
under contract, by the state.
(5) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department under this section, the court shall, in addition to the
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody
under the supervision of the department and the authority of the board
for any period of time the person is released from total confinement
before the expiration of the maximum sentence.
(6)(a)(i) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions
of community custody shall include those provided for in RCW
9.94A.700(4). The conditions may also include those provided for in
RCW 9.94A.700(5). The court may also order the offender to participate
in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct
reasonably related to the circumstances of the offense, the offender's
risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community, and the department
and the board shall enforce such conditions pursuant to RCW 9.94A.713,
9.95.425, and 9.95.430.
(ii) If the offense that caused the offender to be sentenced under
this section was an offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section
and the victim of the offense was under eighteen years of age at the
time of the offense, the court shall, as a condition of community
custody, prohibit the offender from residing in a community protection
zone.
(b) As part of any sentence under this section, the court shall
also require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the
board under RCW 9.94A.713 and 9.95.420 through 9.95.435.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.712 and 2004 c 176 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender who is not a persistent offender shall be sentenced
under this section if the offender:
(a) Is convicted of:
(i) Rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a
child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion;
(ii) Any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual
motivation: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the
second degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second
degree, assault of a child in the first degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or
(iii) An attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection
(1)(a);
committed on or after September 1, 2001; or
(b) Has a prior conviction for an offense listed in RCW
9.94A.030(32)(b), and is convicted of any sex offense which was
committed after September 1, 2001.
For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), failure to register is not
a sex offense.
(2) An offender convicted of rape of a child in the first or second
degree or child molestation in the first degree who was seventeen years
of age or younger at the time of the offense shall not be sentenced
under this section.
(3)(a) Upon a finding that the offender is subject to sentencing
under this section, the court shall impose a sentence to a maximum term
((consisting of the statutory maximum sentence for the offense)) and a
minimum term ((either within the standard sentence range for the
offense, or outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW
9.94A.535, if the offender is otherwise eligible for such a sentence)).
(b) The maximum term shall consist of the statutory maximum
sentence for the offense.
(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, the
minimum term shall be either within the standard sentence range for the
offense, or outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW
9.94A.535, if the offender is otherwise eligible for such a sentence.
(ii) If the offense that caused the offender to be sentenced under
this section was rape of a child in the first degree or child
molestation in the first degree, and there has been a finding that the
defendant was unknown to the victim prior to the offense under section
1 of this act, the minimum term shall be either the maximum of the
standard sentence range or twenty-five years, whichever is greater. If
the offense that caused the offender to be sentenced under this section
was rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree, indecent
liberties by forcible compulsion, or kidnapping in the first degree
with a finding of sexual motivation, and there has been a finding that
the victim was under the age of fifteen at the time of the offense
under section 2 of this act, the minimum term shall be either the
maximum of the standard range for the offense or twenty-five years,
whichever is greater.
(d) A minimum sentence imposed under (c)(ii) of this subsection
shall not affect an offender's eligibility for the special sex offender
sentencing alternative under RCW 9.94A.670 if the offender is otherwise
eligible for the sentencing alternative.
(4) A person sentenced under subsection (3) of this section shall
serve the sentence in a facility or institution operated, or utilized
under contract, by the state.
(5) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department under this section, the court shall, in addition to the
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody
under the supervision of the department and the authority of the board
for any period of time the person is released from total confinement
before the expiration of the maximum sentence.
(6)(a) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions of
community custody shall include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4).
The conditions may also include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(5).
The court may also order the offender to participate in rehabilitative
programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct reasonably related to
the circumstances of the offense, the offender's risk of reoffending,
or the safety of the community, and the department and the board shall
enforce such conditions pursuant to RCW 9.94A.713, 9.95.425, and
9.95.430.
(b) As part of any sentence under this section, the court shall
also require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the
board under RCW 9.94A.713 and 9.95.420 through 9.95.435.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---