BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall, in consultation with the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, conduct a pilot project to
evaluate the effectiveness and cost of electronically monitoring sex
offenders using an active global positioning system. The department
shall electronically monitor, using an active global positioning system
or similar system that is designed to actively monitor, identify, and
timely report a person's location, all offenders who:
(a) Are serving a term of community custody on or after the
effective date of this act;
(b) Are required to register under RCW 9A.44.130 pursuant to a
conviction for a sex offense committed against a victim under the age
of eighteen; and
(c) Have been designated as risk level three or have registered as
lacking a fixed residence.
(2) By December 1, 2007, the department must report to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature the results of the
pilot project. The report shall include the following information:
(a) The availability of active global positioning system
technology, including a description of the system used and the
alternatives that are available and appropriate for monitoring sex
offenders;
(b) The limitations and reliability of the technology, including
geographic or weather-based limitations and the rate of false alarms;
(c) Any training that is required for department staff or persons
subject to monitoring;
(d) The advisability and feasibility of expanding the monitoring
requirement to other populations of sex offenders, including a
description of the populations that should be monitored, if any;
(e) The costs of the monitoring, including equipment costs,
monitoring fees, and any changes to department staffing levels;
(f) The ability of monitored persons to pay for the costs of the
monitoring;
(g) The rate of loss or damage of monitoring equipment, and the
reasons the equipment was lost or damaged; and
(h) Any other information the department deems appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The department and any employee of the department acting within the
scope of his or her employment are immune from civil liability
resulting from acts or omissions relating to information gathered on
offenders using an active global positioning system under section 1 of
this act, unless the department or the employee acted with gross
negligence or in bad faith.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---