BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Before the beginning of the 2006-07
school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall request
flexibility from the United States department of education to conduct
a pilot project with a limited number of local school districts
regarding the academic assessments administered for the purpose of
complying with P.L. 107-110, the no child left behind act of 2001. The
superintendent shall request the flexibility to pilot, with no more
than six school districts and for a specified length of time, an
assessment other than the Washington assessment of student learning in
grades three, five, six, and eight for reading and mathematics. The
purpose of the pilot project is to determine whether a different
assessment provides greater local control and flexibility while
maintaining the testing standards and continuity of student performance
measurement expected by the federal law.
(2) In selecting the assessment for the pilot project and
developing the request for flexibility, the superintendent of public
instruction shall work with local school directors, district and school
administrators, teachers, principals, other school staff, and parents.
All districts in the pilot project shall use the same assessment.
(3) School districts in the pilot project shall be of varying sizes
and geographic locations, including urban, suburban, and rural areas,
and shall enroll ethnically and economically diverse student
populations.
(4) If the request for flexibility is granted, the superintendent
shall revise the Washington state accountability plan required under
section 1111 of P.L. 107-110 to incorporate the pilot project into the
plan, and school districts participating in the pilot project shall not
be required to administer the Washington assessment of student learning
in grades three, five, six, and eight in reading and mathematics during
the pilot project. At the end of the pilot project, the superintendent
shall evaluate whether the assessment under the pilot project can be
used on a statewide basis to comply with P.L. 107-110 and shall forward
findings and recommendations to the legislature and to the United
States department of education.

--- END ---