BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of:
(a) Used farm machinery and equipment to a farmer; or
(b) Replacement parts for, or services rendered in respect to, farm
machinery and equipment used by a farmer.
(2) A person claiming an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. An exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The exemption authorized in this section only applies to the
tax levied in RCW 82.08.020 and does not apply to any sales and use tax
authorized in chapter 82.14 RCW.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Farmer" and "agricultural products" have the meanings provided
in RCW 82.04.213.
(b) "Farm machinery and equipment" means machinery and equipment
designed for the purpose of growing, raising, or producing agricultural
products.
(c) "Services" means labor for repairs, maintenance, or the
replacement of parts, for machinery and equipment.
(d) "Used farm machinery and equipment" means farm machinery and
equipment that:
(i) Has been previously sold at retail and has been subjected to
tax under this chapter;
(ii) Has been previously used and has been subjected to tax under
chapter 82.12 RCW;
(iii) Has previously sold at retail in any other state of the
United States, any political subdivision thereof, the District of
Columbia, or any foreign country or political subdivision thereof.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use by a farmer of:
(a) Used farm machinery and equipment; or
(b) Replacement parts for, or services rendered in respect to, farm
machinery and equipment.
(2) The exemption authorized in this section only applies to taxes
levied under the provisions of this chapter and does not apply to any
sales and use tax authorized in chapter 82.14 RCW.
(3) The definitions and recordkeeping requirements in section 1 of
this act apply to this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.020 and 2005 c 514 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) A retail sale consisting solely of the sale of tangible
personal property shall be deemed to have occurred at the retail outlet
at or from which delivery is made to the consumer;
(2) A retail sale consisting essentially of the performance of
personal, business, or professional services shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place at which such services were primarily performed,
except that for the performance of a tow truck service, as defined in
RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed to have occurred at the
place of business of the operator of the tow truck service;
(3) A retail sale consisting of the rental of tangible personal
property shall be deemed to have occurred (a) in the case of a rental
involving periodic rental payments, at the place of primary use by the
lessee during the period covered by each payment, or (b) in all other
cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;
(4) A retail sale within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a
retail sale of taxable personal property to be installed by the seller
shall be deemed to have occurred at the place where the labor and
services involved were primarily performed;
(5)(a) A retail sale consisting of the providing to a consumer of
telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than a sale of
tangible personal property under subsection (1) of this section or a
rental of tangible personal property under subsection (3) of this
section or a sale of mobile telecommunications services, shall be
deemed to have occurred at the situs of the telephone or other
instrument through which the telephone service is rendered;
(b) A retail sale consisting of the providing of telecommunications
services shall be sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520;
(6) A retail sale of linen and uniform supply services is deemed to
occur as provided in RCW 82.08.0202;
(7) A retail sale consisting of an extended warranty shall be
deemed to have occurred at the business location of the seller if the
extended warranty is received by the purchaser at that location. If an
extended warranty is not received by the purchaser at the business
location of the seller, a retail sale of an extended warranty shall be
deemed to have occurred at the location where receipt by the buyer
occurs;
(8) "City" means a city or town;
(9) "Persons who are taxable by the state," or similar language,
means those persons required to collect and remit state sales or use
tax to the department, or would be required to do the same if not for
a state sales or use tax exemption exempting the sale or use from state
sales or use taxes.
(10) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04,
82.08 and 82.12 RCW, ((as now or hereafter amended,)) insofar as
applicable, ((shall)) have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under authority of this chapter;
(((10))) (11) "Taxable event" ((shall)) means any retail sale, or
any use, upon which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08 or
82.12 RCW, ((as they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That)) or any retail sale, or any use, upon which a state tax
in chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW is not applicable due to a state sales or
use tax exemption, if the provisions describing the sales or use tax
exemption explicitly exempt only the state portion of the sales or use
tax. The term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant to RCW
82.08.150((, as now or hereafter amended));
(((11))) (12) "Treasurer or other legal depository" shall mean the
treasurer or legal depository of a county or city.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.14.020 and 2005 c 514 s 112 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) A retail sale consisting solely of the sale of tangible
personal property shall be deemed to have occurred at the retail outlet
at or from which delivery is made to the consumer;
(2) A retail sale consisting essentially of the performance of
personal, business, or professional services shall be deemed to have
occurred at the place at which such services were primarily performed,
except that for the performance of a tow truck service, as defined in
RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed to have occurred at the
place of business of the operator of the tow truck service;
(3) A retail sale consisting of the rental of tangible personal
property shall be deemed to have occurred (a) in the case of a rental
involving periodic rental payments, at the primary place of use by the
lessee during the period covered by each payment, or (b) in all other
cases, at the place of first use by the lessee;
(4) A retail sale within the scope of RCW 82.04.050(2), and a
retail sale of taxable personal property to be installed by the seller
shall be deemed to have occurred at the place where the labor and
services involved were primarily performed;
(5) A retail sale consisting of the providing of telecommunications
services shall be sourced in accordance with RCW 82.32.520;
(6) A retail sale of linen and uniform supply services is deemed to
occur as provided in RCW 82.08.0202;
(7) A retail sale consisting of an extended warranty shall be
deemed to have occurred at the business location of the seller if the
extended warranty is received by the purchaser at that location. If an
extended warranty is not received by the purchaser at the business
location of the seller, a retail sale of an extended warranty shall be
deemed to have occurred at the location where receipt by the buyer
occurs;
(8) "City" means a city or town;
(9) "Persons who are taxable by the state," or similar language,
means those persons required to collect and remit state sales or use
tax to the department, or would be required to do the same if not for
a state sales or use tax exemption exempting the sale or use from state
sales or use taxes.
(10) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04,
82.08 and 82.12 RCW, ((as now or hereafter amended,)) insofar as
applicable, ((shall)) have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under authority of this chapter;
(((10))) (11) "Taxable event" ((shall)) means any retail sale, or
any use, upon which a state tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08 or
82.12 RCW, ((as they now exist or may hereafter be amended: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That)) or any retail sale, or any use, upon which a state tax
in chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW is not applicable due to a state sales or
use tax exemption, if the provisions describing the sales or use tax
exemption explicitly exempt only the state portion of the sales or use
tax. The term shall not include a retail sale taxable pursuant to RCW
82.08.150((, as now or hereafter amended));
(((11))) (12) "Treasurer or other legal depository" shall mean the
treasurer or legal depository of a county or city.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.14.070 and 2003 c 168 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the intent of this chapter that any local sales and use tax
adopted pursuant to this chapter be identical to the state sales and
use tax, unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, and with other
local sales and use taxes adopted pursuant to this chapter. It is
further the intent of this chapter that the local sales and use tax
shall be imposed upon an individual taxable event simultaneously with
the imposition of the state sales or use tax upon the same taxable
event, unless the taxable event is specifically excluded from the state
portion of the sales or use tax. The rule making powers of the state
department of revenue contained in RCW 82.08.060 and 82.32.300 shall be
applicable to this chapter. The department shall, as soon as
practicable, and with the assistance of the appropriate associations of
county prosecutors and city attorneys, draft a model resolution and
ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Section 3 of this act expires on the
date chapter 67, Laws of 2002 becomes null and void.
(2) Section 4 of this act takes effect on the date chapter 67, Laws
of 2002 becomes null and void.

--- END ---