BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.185 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that Washington is experiencing an affordable
housing crisis and that this crisis is growing exponentially every year
as the population of the state expands and housing values increase at
a rate that far exceeds most households' proportionate increase in
income. The legislature further finds that while the rapid increase in
housing values has exacerbated the affordable housing crisis, the
phenomena has also dramatically benefited the state's general fund, the
growth of which is directly attributable to increased proceeds from the
real estate excise tax.
The fiscal and societal costs of the lack of adequate affordable
housing are high for both the public and private sectors. However, the
legislature finds that while real estate generates large amounts of
revenue, current levels of funding for affordable housing programs are
inadequate to meet the housing needs of many low-income Washington
households.
Therefore, the legislature declares that a portion of the increased
revenue generated from the real estate excise tax must be used to
support affordable housing programs that assist low-income households
obtain and retain housing.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.45.060 and 2005 c 450 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property
at the rate of one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the
selling price. An amount equal to six and one-tenth percent of the
proceeds of this tax to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the
public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050. An amount
equal to one and six-tenths percent of the proceeds of this tax to the
state treasurer shall be deposited in the city-county assistance
account created in RCW 43.08.290.
(2) Of amounts deposited into the general fund pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section, the legislature may authorize a
transfer of up to twenty-five million dollars for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2006, into the Washington housing trust fund created in
RCW 43.185.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.185 RCW
to read as follows:
The application process and distribution procedure for the
allocation of funds are the same as the competitive application process
and distribution procedure for the housing trust fund, described in
this chapter and chapter 43.185A RCW, except for the funds applied to
the homeless families services fund created in RCW 43.330.167, dollars
appropriated to weatherization administered through the energy
matchmaker program, dollars appropriated for housing vouchers for
homeless persons, victims of domestic violence, and low-income persons
or seasonal farm workers, and dollars appropriated to any program to
provide financial assistance for grower-provided on-farm housing for
low-income migrant or seasonal farm workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.185A
RCW to read as follows:
The application process and distribution procedure for the
allocation of funds are the same as the competitive application process
and distribution procedure described in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing--Home
Security Fund (06-4-851)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $8,100,000 of the appropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for the backlog, as defined by the
department, of projects determined by the department to be eligible
under chapter 43.185 or 43.185A RCW.
(2) $1,500,000 of the appropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for short-term, long-term, or
emergency housing vouchers for homeless persons, victims of domestic
violence, low-income persons, or seasonal farm workers. The department
shall establish guidelines for housing voucher programs.
(a) Housing vouchers for low-income persons or seasonal farm
workers are specifically to be used for: (i) Privately owned and
operated rental units, including single-family homes; or (ii) on-farm
housing units. Housing and rental units for which farm worker housing
vouchers may be used must meet temporary worker housing standards, when
applicable. Housing voucher programs shall be administered by local
public housing authorities or other local organizations.
(b) Housing vouchers for homeless persons and victims of domestic
violence shall be administered by local public housing authorities,
other local organizations with existing housing voucher programs,
homeless shelters, or domestic violence shelters.
Any of this appropriation that is unspent on June 30, 2007, shall
be added to the amount appropriated for the backlog identified in
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) $4,500,000 of the appropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for weatherization administered
through the energy matchmakers program.
(4) $1,250,000 of the appropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely to promote development of safe and
affordable housing units for persons eligible for services from the
division of developmental disabilities within the department of social
and health services.
(5) $500,000 of the appropriation from the Washington housing trust
account is provided solely for shelters, transitional housing, or other
housing facilities for victims of domestic violence.
(6) $4,000,000 of the appropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for farm worker housing projects and
programs to meet the full spectrum of housing needs of Washington's
farm workers and their families. The department shall work with
stakeholders representing a diversity of farm worker housing interests
to develop a strategic plan in implementing this provision.
(7) $1,000,000 of the appropriation from the Washington housing
trust account is provided solely for mobile home preservation.
(8) $4,000,000 of the appropriation from the homeless families
services fund is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.330.167,
but limited to residents living in housing subject to a regulatory
agreement related to rent and/or income restrictions.
(9) $150,000 of the appropriation from the Washington housing trust
account is provided solely for a program to assist individuals and
communities in the home-buying process, including, but not limited to:
Homebuyer education classes, credit and budget counseling, financial
literacy training, and down payment assistance programs. The
department shall contract with a nonprofit organization as defined
under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code or similar
successor provision that has experience and expertise in addressing
language access barriers in the home-buying process to implement this
program.
(10) Appropriations in this section shall be included in the
calculation of annual funds available for determining the
administrative costs of the department, which shall not exceed five
percent of the annual funds available for the housing assistance
program and the affordable housing program as authorized under RCW
43.185.050 and 43.185A.030.

Appropriation:
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000,000
Homeless Families Services Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.185 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must report annually by December 31st the
accomplishments of this act to the appropriate committees of the
legislature. The report must include statewide information as well as
information that is county and city specific. Performance measures
must be determined by the department, with required input from the
appropriate committees of the legislature, by December 31, 2006.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.185C.010 and 2005 c 484 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(3) "Homeless person" means an individual living outside or in a
building not meant for human habitation or which they have no legal
right to occupy, in an emergency shelter, or in a temporary housing
program which may include a transitional and supportive housing program
if habitation time limits exist. This definition includes substance
abusers, mentally ill people, and sex offenders who are homeless.
(4) "Washington homeless census" means an annual statewide census
conducted as a collaborative effort by towns, cities, counties,
community-based organizations, and state agencies, with the technical
support and coordination of the department, to count and collect data
on all homeless individuals in Washington.
(5) "Homeless housing account" means the state treasury account
receiving the state's portion of income from revenue from the sources
established by RCW 36.22.179.
(6) "Homeless housing grant program" means the vehicle by which
competitive grants are awarded by the department, utilizing moneys from
the homeless housing account, to local governments for programs
directly related to housing homeless individuals and families,
addressing the root causes of homelessness, preventing homelessness,
collecting data on homeless individuals, and other efforts directly
related to housing homeless persons.
(7) "Local government" means a county government in the state of
Washington or a city government, if the legislative authority of the
city affirmatively elects to accept the responsibility for housing
homeless persons within its borders.
(8) "Housing continuum" means the progression of individuals along
a housing-focused continuum with homelessness at one end and
homeownership at the other.
(9) "Local homeless housing task force" means a voluntary local
committee created to advise a local government on the creation of a
local homeless housing plan and participate in a local homeless housing
program. It must include a representative of the county, a
representative of the largest city located within the county, at least
one homeless or formerly homeless person, such other members as may be
required to maintain eligibility for federal funding related to housing
programs and services and if feasible, a representative of a private
nonprofit organization with experience in low-income housing.
(10) "Long-term private or public housing" means subsidized and
unsubsidized rental or owner-occupied housing in which there is no
established time limit for habitation of less than two years.
(11) "Interagency council on homelessness" means a committee
appointed by the governor and consisting of, at least, ((the director
of)) policy level representatives of the following entities: (a) The
department of community, trade, and economic development; (b) the
((secretary of the)) department of corrections; (c) the ((secretary of
the)) department of social and health services; (d) the ((director of
the)) department of veterans affairs; and (e) the ((secretary of the))
department of health.
(12) "Performance measurement" means the process of comparing
specific measures of success against ultimate and interim goals.
(13) "Community action agency" means a nonprofit private or public
organization established under the economic opportunity act of 1964.
(14) "Housing authority" means any of the public corporations
created by chapter 35.82 RCW.
(15) "Homeless housing program" means the program authorized under
this chapter as administered by the department at the state level and
by the local government or its designated subcontractor at the local
level.
(16) "Homeless housing plan" means the ten-year plan developed by
the county or other local government to address housing for homeless
persons.
(17) "Homeless housing strategic plan" means the ten-year plan
developed by the department, in consultation with the interagency
council on homelessness and the affordable housing advisory board.
(18) "Washington homeless client management information system"
means a data base of information about homeless individuals in the
state used to coordinate resources to assist homeless clients to obtain
and retain housing and reach greater levels of self-sufficiency or
economic independence when appropriate, depending upon their individual
situations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The interagency council on homelessness, as defined in RCW
43.185C.010, shall be convened not later than August 31, 2006, and
shall meet at least two times each year and report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature annually by December 31st on its
activities.
(2) The interagency council on homelessness shall work to create
greater levels of interagency coordination and to coordinate state
agency efforts with the efforts of state and local entities addressing
homelessness.
(3) The interagency council shall seek to:
(a) Align homeless-related housing and supportive service policies
among state agencies;
(b) Identify ways in which providing housing with appropriate
services can contribute to cost savings for state agencies;
(c) Identify policies and actions that may contribute to
homelessness or interfere with its reduction;
(d) Review and improve strategies for discharge from state
institutions that contribute to homelessness;
(e) Recommend policies to either improve practices or align
resources, or both, including those policies requested by the
affordable housing advisory board or through state and local housing
plans; and
(f) Ensure that the housing status of people served by state
programs is collected in consistent formats available for analysis.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.63A.655 and 1999 c 267 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to improve services for the homeless, the department,
within amounts appropriated by the legislature for this specific
purpose, shall implement ((a)) the Washington homeless client
management information system for the ongoing collection and ((analysis
of)) updates of information about all homeless individuals in the
state.
(2) Information about homeless individuals for the Washington
homeless client management information system shall come from the
Washington homeless census and from state agencies and community
organizations providing services to homeless individuals and families.
(3) The Washington homeless client management information system
shall serve as an online information and referral system to enable
local governments and providers to connect homeless persons in the data
base with available housing and other support services. Local
governments shall develop a capacity for continuous case management,
including independent living plans, when appropriate, to assist
homeless persons.
(4) The information in the Washington homeless client management
information system will also provide the department with the
information to consolidate and analyze data about the extent and nature
of homelessness in Washington state, giving emphasis to information
about the extent and nature of homelessness in Washington state among
families with children.
(5) The system may be merged with other data gathering and
reporting systems and shall:
(a) Protect the right of privacy of individuals;
(b) Provide for consultation and collaboration with all relevant
state agencies including the department of social and health services,
experts, and community organizations involved in the delivery of
services to homeless persons; and
(c) Include related information held or gathered by other state
agencies.
(((2))) (6) Within amounts appropriated by the legislature, for
this specific purpose, the department shall evaluate the information
gathered and disseminate the analysis and the evaluation broadly, using
appropriate computer networks as well as written reports.
(7) The Washington homeless client management information system
shall be implemented by December 31, 2009, and updated with new
homeless client information at least annually.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall conduct a study to evaluate the potential
development of a voluntary statewide, low-income household housing
waiting list data base that would include information on all low-income
households requesting housing assistance for the purpose of connecting
such households with appropriate housing opportunities. The study
shall investigate and evaluate the following:
(a) The anticipated benefits of such a statewide waiting list to
low-income households and low-income housing providers;
(b) The cost of implementing and maintaining the data base; and
(c) Best practices from other states or from counties in other
states that currently have a similar data base.
The department shall report the results of this study to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2007.
(2) This section expires December 31, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.185A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department shall create or purchase, and implement by
December 31, 2009, a master affordable housing data base that includes
specific information about existing affordable rental housing stock in
the state of Washington. The data base shall be maintained and
continually updated by the department, and the department may
cross-reference and exchange information between this data base and
other existing state housing data bases.
(2) The data base shall include information on all rental units
that meet the affordable housing definition and have received or
continue to receive funding from the federal, state, or local
government, or other nonprofit organization or financing through the
Washington housing finance commission. The department shall encourage
private landlords to voluntarily submit information about private
rental units that are affordable for low-income households to be
included in the data base.
(3) The data base shall include information about rental units that
shall be determined by the department. However, the data base must
include, at a minimum, measures for quality, cost, safety, and size.
(4) Other state agencies, local governments, local public agencies,
including water and sewer districts, housing authorities, and other
housing organizations shall cooperate with the department to create and
update the affordable housing data base by providing to the department
any requested existing information about rental housing units within
the jurisdiction.
(5) The data base shall be searchable by the department, local
governments, community housing organizations, including housing
authorities, and the public according to housing characteristics
determined by the department including, at a minimum, location, cost,
and size. The data base will be utilized for data collection about
Washington's affordable rental housing stock and will also serve as a
low-income housing referral system to connect low-income households
seeking housing with appropriate and available units.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 43.185A
RCW to read as follows:
The department, the housing finance commission, the affordable
housing advisory board, and all local governments, housing authorities,
and other nonprofits receiving state housing funds or financing through
the housing finance commission shall, by December 31, 2006, and
annually thereafter, review current housing reporting requirements
related to housing programs and services and give recommendations to
streamline and simplify all planning and reporting requirements to the
department of community, trade, and economic development, which will
compile and present the recommendations annually to the legislature.
The entities listed in this section shall also give recommendations for
additional legislative actions that could promote affordable housing
and end homelessness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 RCW 43.63A.655 is recodified as a section
in chapter 43.185C RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 6 of this act expire
July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Unless a transfer of at least twenty-five
million dollars from the general fund to the Washington housing trust
fund as created in RCW 43.185.030 for the purposes of this act,
referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June
30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

--- END ---