BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that as the duties and
responsibilities of the office of lieutenant governor have continued to
incrementally increase, they have been distributed among various
noncorresponding chapters in statute. The legislature further finds
that by consolidating the duties and responsibilities of the office of
lieutenant governor under one chapter, it keeps our statutes consistent
among the different statewide elected offices and greater facilitates
the understanding of the role of the office of lieutenant governor and
its many statutorily defined duties and responsibilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new chapter is added to Title 43 RCW to be
named the "Office of Lieutenant Governor" and consisting of sections 3
through 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The lieutenant governor has the following
duties:
(1) The lieutenant governor serves as president of the senate.
(2) In addition to the events prescribed under the state
Constitution, the lieutenant governor performs the duties of the
governor when the governor is out of the state pursuant to RCW
43.06.040 and 43.06.050. When the lieutenant governor is called to
perform the duties of the governor, he or she is compensated according
to RCW 43.03.027.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The lieutenant governor serves as president
of the senate and is responsible for making appointments to, and
serving on, the committees and boards as set forth in this section.
(1) The lieutenant governor serves on the following boards and
committees:
(a) Capitol furnishings preservation committee, RCW 27.48.040;
(b) Washington higher education facilities authority, RCW
28B.07.030;
(c) Productivity board, also known as the employee involvement and
recognition board, RCW 41.60.015;
(d) State finance committee, RCW 43.33.010;
(e) State capitol committee, RCW 43.34.010;
(f) Washington health care facilities authority, RCW 70.37.030;
(g) State medal of merit nominating committee, RCW 1.40.020; and
(h) Medal of valor committee, RCW 1.60.020.
(2) The lieutenant governor appoints members to the following
boards and committees:
(a) Organized crime advisory board, RCW 43.43.858;
(b) Civil legal aid oversight committee, RCW 2.53.010;
(c) Office of public defense advisory committee, RCW 2.70.030;
(d) Washington state gambling commission, RCW 9.46.040;
(e) Sentencing guidelines commission, RCW 9.94A.860;
(f) State building code council, RCW 19.27.070;
(g) Women's history consortium board of advisors, RCW 27.34.365;
(h) Financial literacy public-private partnership, RCW 28A.300.450;
(i) Joint administrative rules review committee, RCW 34.05.610;
(j) Capital projects advisory review board, RCW 39.10.800;
(k) Select committee on pension policy, RCW 41.04.276;
(l) Legislative ethics board, RCW 42.52.310;
(m) Washington citizens' commission on salaries, RCW 43.03.305;
(n) Oral history advisory committee, RCW 43.07.230;
(o) State council on aging, RCW 43.20A.685;
(p) State investment board, RCW 43.33A.020;
(q) Capitol campus design advisory committee, RCW 43.34.080;
(r) Washington state arts commission, RCW 43.46.015;
(s) Information services board, RCW 43.105.032;
(t) K-20 educational network board, RCW 43.105.800;
(u) Municipal research council, RCW 43.110.010;
(v) Washington council for the prevention of child abuse and
neglect, RCW 43.121.020;
(w) PNWER-Net working subgroup under chapter 43.147 RCW;
(x) Community economic revitalization board, RCW 43.160.030;
(y) Washington economic development finance authority, RCW
43.163.020;
(z) Tourism development advisory committee, RCW 43.330.095;
(aa) Life sciences discovery fund authority, RCW 43.350.020;
(bb) Legislative children's oversight committee, RCW 44.04.220;
(cc) Joint legislative audit and review committee, RCW 44.28.010;
(dd) Joint committee on energy supply and energy conservation, RCW
44.39.015;
(ee) Legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
RCW 44.48.010;
(ff) Agency council on coordinated transportation, RCW 47.06B.020;
(gg) Manufactured housing task force, RCW 59.22.090;
(hh) Washington horse racing commission, RCW 67.16.014;
(ii) Correctional industries board of directors, RCW 72.09.080;
(jj) Joint committee on veterans' and military affairs, RCW
73.04.150;
(kk) Washington state parks centennial advisory committee, RCW
79A.75.010;
(ll) Puget Sound council, RCW 90.71.030;
(mm) Joint legislative committee on water supply during drought,
RCW 90.86.020;
(nn) Statute law committee, RCW 1.08.001; and
(oo) Joint legislative oversight committee on trade policy, RCW
44.55.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following sections are each recodified
as sections in chapter 43.-- RCW (created in section 2 of this act):
(1) RCW 44.04.270, legislative international trade account;
(2) RCW 44.52.010, legislative committee on economic development;
(3) RCW 44.52.020, legislative committee on economic development;
(4) RCW 44.52.030, legislative committee on economic development;
(5) RCW 44.52.040, legislative committee on economic development;
(6) RCW 44.52.050, legislative committee on economic development;
(7) RCW 44.52.060, legislative committee on economic development;
(8) RCW 44.52.070, legislative committee on economic development;
(9) RCW 44.52.900, legislative committee on economic development;
(10) RCW 44.52.901, legislative committee on economic development;
and
(11) RCW 43.342.010 and 43.342.020, association of Washington
generals.

--- END ---