BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Bird" includes, but is not limited to, any species of
waterfowl such as goose, duck, or the cross breed commonly known as the
mulard.
(2) "Foie gras" means the liver of a bird that has been
specifically fed to produce a large, fatty liver.
(3) "Force-feeding" means any process, whether implemented by hand
or machine, of feeding a bird that causes the bird to ingest more food
than a typical bird of the same species would consume voluntarily.
Force-feeding methods include, but are not limited to, delivering feed
through a tube or other devise inserted into the bird's esophagus.
(4) "Person" includes, but is not limited to, individuals,
partnerships, corporations, associations, and retail and restaurant
establishments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A person may not force-feed a bird, or hire
another person to force-feed a bird, for the purposes of enlarging the
bird's liver beyond normal size. This section does not apply if the
person force-feeds a bird for the purpose of improving the bird's
health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A person may not sell or offer to sell any
foie gras or any product containing foie gras unless the foie gras or
product containing foie gras originated from a state or other
jurisdiction that prohibits the practice of force-feeding birds to
produce foie gras.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any person who violates this chapter is
subject to a civil penalty of one thousand dollars per violation for
each day the violation continues. Moneys collected under this section
shall be deposited into the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act takes effect January
1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 69 RCW.

--- END ---