BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state parks
and recreation commission has identified over three hundred million
dollars in projects to eliminate the backlog of deferred maintenance
projects, improve state park facilities, and provide new investments to
implement the state park's centennial 2013 plan. The legislature
further finds that significant investments in state parks facilities
are necessary to protect public health and safety, reduce current
operating and maintenance costs, improve basic park services, and
protect valuable cultural and natural resources. The legislature
further finds that revenues to the youth athletic facilities account to
fund local parks projects have not materialized. Therefore, the
legislature finds that new revenue sources are needed to support state
and local parks for the benefit of all Washington citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state parks centennial account is created in the state
treasury. Expenditures from the account require an appropriation and
may be made only for implementation of the state parks' 2013 centennial
plan and for capital improvements of the state parks system.
(2) The account retains its own interest earnings. The principal
of the account may not be invaded and only the interest earnings may be
appropriated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state investment board has the full power to invest,
reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment moneys in the
state parks centennial account created in section 2 of this act. All
investment and operating costs associated with the investment of money
shall be paid pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the
exception of these expenses, the earnings from the investment of the
money shall be retained by the fund.
(2) All investments made by the state investment board shall be
made with the exercise of that degree of judgment and care pursuant to
RCW 43.33A.140 and the investment policies established by the state
investment board.
(3) As deemed appropriate by the state investment board, moneys in
the fund may be commingled for investment with other funds subject to
investment by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.33A RCW
to read as follows:
Under section 3 of this act, the state investment board shall
invest moneys in the state parks centennial account established in
section 2 of this act with full power to establish investment policies
for the fund.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.99N.060 and 2000 c 137 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The stadium and exhibition center account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the taxes imposed
under RCW 82.14.0494 and distributions under RCW 67.70.240(5) shall be
deposited into the account. Only the director of the office of
financial management or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. An appropriation is not required
for expenditures from this account.
(2) Until bonds are issued under RCW 43.99N.020, up to five million
dollars per year beginning January 1, 1999, shall be used for the
purposes of subsection (3)(b) of this section, all remaining moneys in
the account shall be transferred to the public stadium authority,
created under RCW 36.102.020, to be used for public stadium authority
operations and development of the stadium and exhibition center.
(3) After bonds are issued under RCW 43.99N.020, all moneys in the
stadium and exhibition center account shall be used exclusively for the
following purposes in the following priority:
(a) On or before June 30th of each year, the office of financial
management shall accumulate in the stadium and exhibition center
account an amount at least equal to the amount required in the next
succeeding twelve months for the payment of principal of and interest
on the bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020;
(b) An additional reserve amount not in excess of the expected
average annual principal and interest requirements of bonds issued
under RCW 43.99N.020 shall be accumulated and maintained in the
account, subject to withdrawal by the state treasurer at any time if
necessary to meet the requirements of (a) of this subsection, and,
following any withdrawal, reaccumulated from the first tax revenues and
other amounts deposited in the account after meeting the requirements
of (a) of this subsection; and
(c) On or before June 30th of each year, the balance, if any, or at
least five hundred thousand dollars, shall be transferred to the youth
athletic facility account under subsection (4) of this section.
Any revenues derived from the taxes authorized by RCW 36.38.010(5)
and 36.38.040 or other amounts that if used as provided under (a) and
(b) of this subsection would cause the loss of any tax exemption under
federal law for interest on bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 shall be
deposited in and used exclusively for the purposes of the youth
athletic facility account and shall not be used, directly or
indirectly, as a source of payment of principal of or interest on bonds
issued under RCW 43.99N.020, or to replace or reimburse other funds
used for that purpose.
(4) Any moneys in the stadium and exhibition center account not
required or permitted to be used for the purposes described in
subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section shall be deposited in the
youth athletic facility account hereby created in the state treasury.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for purposes of grants
or loans to cities, counties, metropolitan park districts, and
qualified nonprofit organizations for community outdoor athletic
facilities. Only the director of the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures. The athletic facility grants or loans may be used for
acquiring, developing, equipping, maintaining, and improving community
outdoor athletic facilities. Funds shall be divided equally between
the development of new community outdoor athletic facilities, the
improvement of existing community outdoor athletic facilities, and the
maintenance of existing community outdoor athletic facilities. Cities,
counties, and qualified nonprofit organizations must submit proposals
for grants or loans from the account. To the extent that funds are
available, cities, counties, and qualified nonprofit organizations must
meet eligibility criteria as established by the director of the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation. The grants and loans
shall be awarded on a competitive application process and the amount of
the grant or loan shall be in proportion to the population of the city
or county for where the community outdoor athletic facility is located.
Grants or loans awarded in any one year need not be distributed in that
year. The director of the interagency committee for outdoor recreation
may expend up to one and one-half percent of the moneys deposited in
the account created in this subsection for administrative purposes.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.84.092 and 2005 c 514 s 1106, 2005 c 353 s 4, 2005
c 339 s 23, 2005 c 314 s 110, 2005 c 312 s 8, and 2005 c 94 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the emergency reserve fund, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the freight mobility investment account, the health
services account, the public health services account, the health system
capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the regional transportation investment district
account, the resource management cost account, the rural Washington
loan fund, the site closure account, the small city pavement and
sidewalk account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the state parks centennial account, the
supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington
bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---