BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that there are
specific skills and a body of knowledge that each student needs to
chart a course through middle school, high school, and posthigh school
options. Each student needs active involvement from parents and at
least one supportive adult in the school who knows the student well and
cares about the student's progress and future. Effective guidance and
counseling programs are essential to creating a learning environment
where staff, students, and their families work cooperatively to create
a personalized educational experience for every student. To empower
and motivate all students and parents to take a greater role in
charting the students' own educational experiences, the legislature
intends to strengthen schools' guidance, counseling, and planning
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature encourages each middle school, junior high
school, and high school to implement a comprehensive guidance,
counseling, and planning program for all students. The purpose of the
program is to support students as they navigate their education and
plan their future; encourage an ongoing and personal relationship
between each student and an adult in the school; and involve parents in
students' educational decisions and plans.
(2) A comprehensive guidance, counseling, and planning program is
a program that contains at least the following components:
(a) A curriculum intended to provide the skills and knowledge
students need to select courses, explore options, plan for their
future, and take steps to implement their plans. The curriculum may
include such topics as analysis of students' test results; assessments
of student interests and aptitude; goal-setting skills; planning for
high school course selection; independent living skills; and
postsecondary options and how to access them;
(b) Regular meetings between each student and a teacher or
counselor who serves as an advisor and mentor throughout the student's
enrollment at the school;
(c) Student-led conferences with the student's parents, guardians,
or family members and the student's advisor for the purpose of
demonstrating the student's accomplishments; identifying weaknesses;
planning and selecting courses; and setting long-term goals; and
(d) Data collection that allows schools to monitor students'
progress.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Subject to the availability of funds
appropriated for this purpose, the superintendent of public instruction
shall:
(a) Develop and disseminate the curriculum for the comprehensive
guidance, counseling, and planning program under section 2 of this act
to all school districts no later than the beginning of the 2006-07
school year;
(b) Develop and disseminate electronic student planning tools and
a software package to analyze the impact of the implementation of the
program on student performance;
(c) Develop and conduct regional training seminars for teachers on
the curriculum and on counseling and mentoring skills;
(d) Monitor and evaluate implementation of the program during the
fall of 2006 in order to revise and improve the curriculum by the
spring of 2007; and
(e) Allocate grants to selected schools for the purpose of
implementing the program. The superintendent shall develop and publish
the grant selection criteria, number of awards, and award amounts. The
first round of at least twenty-five grant recipients shall be selected
and notified by September 2006. The second round of at least seventy-five grant recipients shall be selected and notified by January 2007.
The purpose of the grants is to provide time for school staff to plan
and integrate the comprehensive program into their schools. To the
extent possible, the superintendent shall include representation from
school districts of varying sizes and from different geographic regions
of the state in the grant allocation.
(2) By January 1, 2009, the superintendent of public instruction
shall report to the education committees of the legislature regarding
the impact of comprehensive guidance, counseling, and planning programs
on student performance.

--- END ---