BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
diesel fuel to a farm fuel user for nonhighway use. This exemption is
available only if the buyer provides the seller with an exemption
certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. Fuel
used for space or water heating for human habitation is not exempt
under this section.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.213 and this subsection apply to
this section.
(a) "Diesel fuel" is defined as provided in 26 U.S.C. 4083, as
amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2006.
(b) "Farm fuel user" means: (i) A farmer; or (ii) a person who
provides horticultural services for farmers, such as soil preparation
services, crop cultivation services, and crop harvesting services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
nonhighway use of diesel fuel by a farm fuel user. Fuel used for space
or water heating for human habitation is not exempt under this section.
(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---