BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.545 and 2003 c 379 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 9.94A.650, on all sentences of
confinement for one year or less, in which the offender is convicted of
a sex offense, a violent offense, a crime against a person under RCW
9.94A.411, or felony violation of chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW or an
attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit such a crime, the court
may impose up to one year of community custody, subject to conditions
and sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.715 and 9.94A.720. The
conditions of a term of community custody imposed under this section
shall include a requirement that the offender reside in the county in
which he or she was convicted. An offender shall be on community
custody as of the date of sentencing. However, during the time for
which the offender is in total or partial confinement pursuant to the
sentence or a violation of the sentence, the period of community
custody shall toll.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.712 and 2005 c 436 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender who is not a persistent offender shall be sentenced
under this section if the offender:
(a) Is convicted of:
(i) Rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a
child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion;
(ii) Any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual
motivation: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the
second degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second
degree, assault of a child in the first degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or
(iii) An attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection
(1)(a);
committed on or after September 1, 2001; or
(b) Has a prior conviction for an offense listed in RCW
9.94A.030(33)(b), and is convicted of any sex offense which was
committed after September 1, 2001.
For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), failure to register is not
a sex offense.
(2) An offender convicted of rape of a child in the first or second
degree or child molestation in the first degree who was seventeen years
of age or younger at the time of the offense shall not be sentenced
under this section.
(3) Upon a finding that the offender is subject to sentencing under
this section, the court shall impose a sentence to a maximum term
consisting of the statutory maximum sentence for the offense and a
minimum term either within the standard sentence range for the offense,
or outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW 9.94A.535, if
the offender is otherwise eligible for such a sentence.
(4) A person sentenced under subsection (3) of this section shall
serve the sentence in a facility or institution operated, or utilized
under contract, by the state.
(5) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department under this section, the court shall, in addition to the
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody
under the supervision of the department and the authority of the board
for any period of time the person is released from total confinement
before the expiration of the maximum sentence.
(6)(a)(i) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions
of community custody shall include those provided for in RCW
9.94A.700(4). The conditions of community custody shall also include
a requirement that the offender reside in the county in which he or she
was convicted. The conditions may also include those provided for in
RCW 9.94A.700(5). The court may also order the offender to participate
in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct
reasonably related to the circumstances of the offense, the offender's
risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community, and the department
and the board shall enforce such conditions pursuant to RCW 9.94A.713,
9.95.425, and 9.95.430.
(ii) If the offense that caused the offender to be sentenced under
this section was an offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section
and the victim of the offense was under eighteen years of age at the
time of the offense, the court shall, as a condition of community
custody, prohibit the offender from residing in a community protection
zone.
(b) As part of any sentence under this section, the court shall
also require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the
board under RCW 9.94A.713 and 9.95.420 through 9.95.435.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.712 and 2004 c 176 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender who is not a persistent offender shall be sentenced
under this section if the offender:
(a) Is convicted of:
(i) Rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a
child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape
of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion;
(ii) Any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual
motivation: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the
second degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second
degree, assault of a child in the first degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or
(iii) An attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection
(1)(a);
committed on or after September 1, 2001; or
(b) Has a prior conviction for an offense listed in RCW
9.94A.030(32)(b), and is convicted of any sex offense which was
committed after September 1, 2001.
For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), failure to register is not
a sex offense.
(2) An offender convicted of rape of a child in the first or second
degree or child molestation in the first degree who was seventeen years
of age or younger at the time of the offense shall not be sentenced
under this section.
(3) Upon a finding that the offender is subject to sentencing under
this section, the court shall impose a sentence to a maximum term
consisting of the statutory maximum sentence for the offense and a
minimum term either within the standard sentence range for the offense,
or outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW 9.94A.535, if
the offender is otherwise eligible for such a sentence.
(4) A person sentenced under subsection (3) of this section shall
serve the sentence in a facility or institution operated, or utilized
under contract, by the state.
(5) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department under this section, the court shall, in addition to the
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody
under the supervision of the department and the authority of the board
for any period of time the person is released from total confinement
before the expiration of the maximum sentence.
(6)(a) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions of
community custody shall include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4).
The conditions of community custody shall also include a requirement
that the offender reside in the county in which he or she was
convicted. The conditions may also include those provided for in RCW
9.94A.700(5). The court may also order the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct
reasonably related to the circumstances of the offense, the offender's
risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community, and the department
and the board shall enforce such conditions pursuant to RCW 9.94A.713,
9.95.425, and 9.95.430.
(b) As part of any sentence under this section, the court shall
also require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the
board under RCW 9.94A.713 and 9.95.420 through 9.95.435.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.715 and 2003 c 379 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department for a sex offense not sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712, a
violent offense, any crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or
a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or
after July 1, 2000, the court shall in addition to the other terms of
the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody for the
community custody range established under RCW 9.94A.850 or up to the
period of earned release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2),
whichever is longer. The community custody shall begin: (a) Upon
completion of the term of confinement; (b) at such time as the offender
is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.728 (1) and (2); or (c) with regard to
offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.660, upon failure to complete or
administrative termination from the special drug offender sentencing
alternative program. Except as provided in RCW 9.94A.501, the
department shall supervise any sentence of community custody imposed
under this section.
(2)(a) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions of
community custody shall include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4).
The conditions of community custody shall also include a requirement
that the offender reside in the county in which he or she was
convicted. The conditions may also include those provided for in RCW
9.94A.700(5). The court may also order the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct
reasonably related to the circumstances of the offense, the offender's
risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community, and the department
shall enforce such conditions pursuant to subsection (6) of this
section.
(b) As part of any sentence that includes a term of community
custody imposed under this subsection, the court shall also require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department under
RCW 9.94A.720. The department shall assess the offender's risk of
reoffense and may establish and modify additional conditions of the
offender's community custody based upon the risk to community safety.
In addition, the department may require the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs, or otherwise perform affirmative conduct, and
to obey all laws.
(c) The department may not impose conditions that are contrary to
those ordered by the court and may not contravene or decrease court
imposed conditions. The department shall notify the offender in
writing of any such conditions or modifications. In setting,
modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the
department shall be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.
(3) If an offender violates conditions imposed by the court or the
department pursuant to this section during community custody, the
department may transfer the offender to a more restrictive confinement
status and impose other available sanctions as provided in RCW
9.94A.737 and 9.94A.740.
(4) Except for terms of community custody under RCW 9.94A.670, the
department shall discharge the offender from community custody on a
date determined by the department, which the department may modify,
based on risk and performance of the offender, within the range or at
the end of the period of earned release, whichever is later.
(5) At any time prior to the completion or termination of a sex
offender's term of community custody, if the court finds that public
safety would be enhanced, the court may impose and enforce an order
extending any or all of the conditions imposed pursuant to this section
for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for the crime as it
is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a condition
extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of
the sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.631 and may be punishable as
contempt of court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040. If the court
extends a condition beyond the expiration of the term of community
custody, the department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender's compliance with the condition.
(6) Within the funds available for community custody, the
department shall determine conditions and duration of community custody
on the basis of risk to community safety, and shall supervise offenders
during community custody on the basis of risk to community safety and
conditions imposed by the court. The secretary shall adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this subsection.
(7) By the close of the next business day after receiving notice of
a condition imposed or modified by the department, an offender may
request an administrative review under rules adopted by the department.
The condition shall remain in effect unless the reviewing officer finds
that it is not reasonably related to any of the following: (a) The
crime of conviction; (b) the offender's risk of reoffending; or (c) the
safety of the community.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.720 and 2003 c 379 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in RCW 9.94A.501, all offenders sentenced
to terms involving community supervision, community restitution,
community placement, or community custody shall be under the
supervision of the department and shall follow explicitly the
instructions and conditions of the department. The department may
require an offender to perform affirmative acts it deems appropriate to
monitor compliance with the conditions of the sentence imposed. The
department may only supervise the offender's compliance with payment of
legal financial obligations during any period in which the department
is authorized to supervise the offender in the community under RCW
9.94A.501.
(b) The instructions shall include, at a minimum, reporting as
directed to a community corrections officer, remaining within
prescribed geographical boundaries, notifying the community corrections
officer of any change in the offender's address or employment, and
paying the supervision fee assessment. For an offender beginning his
or her term of community supervision, community placement, or community
custody on or after the effective date of this section, the
instructions shall include residing in the county in which the offender
was convicted unless such an instruction would contravene a condition
of the offender's sentence.
(c) For offenders sentenced to terms involving community custody
for crimes committed on or after June 6, 1996, the department may
include, in addition to the instructions in (b) of this subsection, any
appropriate conditions of supervision, including but not limited to,
prohibiting the offender from having contact with any other specified
individuals or specific class of individuals.
(d) For offenders sentenced to terms of community custody for
crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department may impose
conditions as specified in RCW 9.94A.715.
The conditions authorized under (c) of this subsection may be
imposed by the department prior to or during an offender's community
custody term. If a violation of conditions imposed by the court or the
department pursuant to RCW 9.94A.710 occurs during community custody,
it shall be deemed a violation of community placement for the purposes
of RCW 9.94A.740 and shall authorize the department to transfer an
offender to a more restrictive confinement status as provided in RCW
9.94A.737. At any time prior to the completion of an offender's term
of community custody, the department may recommend to the court that
any or all of the conditions imposed by the court or the department
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.710 or 9.94A.715 be continued beyond the
expiration of the offender's term of community custody as authorized in
RCW 9.94A.715 (3) or (5).
The department may require offenders to pay for special services
rendered on or after July 25, 1993, including electronic monitoring,
day reporting, and telephone reporting, dependent upon the offender's
ability to pay. The department may pay for these services for
offenders who are not able to pay.
(2) No offender sentenced to terms involving community supervision,
community restitution, community custody, or community placement under
the supervision of the department may own, use, or possess firearms or
ammunition. Offenders who own, use, or are found to be in actual or
constructive possession of firearms or ammunition shall be subject to
the violation process and sanctions under RCW 9.94A.634, 9.94A.737, and
9.94A.740. "Constructive possession" as used in this subsection means
the power and intent to control the firearm or ammunition. "Firearm"
as used in this subsection has the same definition as in RCW 9.41.010.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.95.110 and 2003 c 218 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board may permit an offender convicted of a crime committed
before July 1, 1984, to leave the buildings and enclosures of a state
correctional institution on parole, after such convicted person has
served the period of confinement fixed for him or her by the board,
less time credits for good behavior and diligence in work: PROVIDED,
That in no case shall an inmate be credited with more than one-third of
his or her sentence as fixed by the board.
The board may establish rules and regulations under which an
offender may be allowed to leave the confines of a state correctional
institution on parole, and may return such person to the confines of
the institution from which he or she was paroled, at its discretion.
The board shall require an offender paroled on or after the effective
date of this section to reside in the county in which he or she was
convicted unless to do so would contravene a condition of the
offender's sentence.
(2) The board may permit an offender convicted of a crime committed
on or after September 1, 2001, and sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712, to
leave a state correctional institution on community custody according
to the provisions of RCW 9.94A.712, 9.94A.713, 72.09.335, and 9.95.420
through 9.95.440. The person may be returned to the institution
following a violation of his or her conditions of release to community
custody pursuant to the hearing provisions of RCW 9.95.435.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.94A.505 and 2002 c 290 s 17, 2002 c 289 s 6, and
2002 c 175 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose
punishment as provided in this chapter.
(2)(a) The court shall impose a sentence as provided in the
following sections and as applicable in the case:
(i) Unless another term of confinement applies, the court shall
impose a sentence within the standard sentence range established in RCW
9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517;
(ii) RCW 9.94A.700 and 9.94A.705, relating to community placement;
(iii) RCW 9.94A.710 and 9.94A.715, relating to community custody;
(iv) RCW 9.94A.545, relating to community custody for offenders
whose term of confinement is one year or less;
(v) RCW 9.94A.570, relating to persistent offenders;
(vi) RCW 9.94A.540, relating to mandatory minimum terms;
(vii) RCW 9.94A.650, relating to the first-time offender waiver;
(viii) RCW 9.94A.660, relating to the drug offender sentencing
alternative;
(ix) RCW 9.94A.670, relating to the special sex offender sentencing
alternative;
(x) RCW 9.94A.712, relating to certain sex offenses;
(xi) RCW 9.94A.535, relating to exceptional sentences;
(xii) RCW 9.94A.589, relating to consecutive and concurrent
sentences.
(b) If a standard sentence range has not been established for the
offender's crime, the court shall impose a determinate sentence which
may include not more than one year of confinement; community
restitution work; until July 1, 2000, a term of community supervision
not to exceed one year and on and after July 1, 2000, a term of
community custody not to exceed one year, subject to conditions and
sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.710 (2) and (3); and/or other
legal financial obligations. The court may impose a sentence which
provides more than one year of confinement if the court finds reasons
justifying an exceptional sentence as provided in RCW 9.94A.535.
(3) If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty
days or less, the court may, in its discretion, specify that the
sentence be served on consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence
requiring more than thirty days of confinement shall be served on
consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule court-ordered
intermittent sentences as space permits.
(4) If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial
obligation, it shall be imposed as provided in RCW 9.94A.750,
9.94A.753, 9.94A.760, and 43.43.7541.
(5) Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.750(4) and 9.94A.753(4), a
court may not impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or
community supervision, community placement, or community custody which
exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as provided in chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(6) The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all
confinement time served before the sentencing if that confinement was
solely in regard to the offense for which the offender is being
sentenced.
(7) The court shall order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.750
and 9.94A.753.
(8) As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce
crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions as provided in
this chapter.
(9) The court may order an offender whose sentence includes
community placement or community supervision to undergo a mental status
evaluation and to participate in available outpatient mental health
treatment, if the court finds that reasonable grounds exist to believe
that the offender is a mentally ill person as defined in RCW 71.24.025,
and that this condition is likely to have influenced the offense. An
order requiring mental status evaluation or treatment must be based on
a presentence report and, if applicable, mental status evaluations that
have been filed with the court to determine the offender's competency
or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may order
additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.
(10) In any sentence of partial confinement((,)):
(a) The court may require the offender to serve the partial
confinement in work release, in a program of home detention, on work
crew, or in a combined program of work crew and home detention; and
(b) The court shall require that the work release, home detention,
work crew, or combined program of work crew and home detention be
served in the county in which the offender was convicted.
(11) In sentencing an offender convicted of a crime of domestic
violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, if the offender has a minor
child, or if the victim of the offense for which the offender was
convicted has a minor child, the court may, as part of any term of
community supervision, community placement, or community custody, order
the offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator program
approved under RCW 26.50.150.

Sec. 8 RCW 9.94A.680 and 2002 c 175 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Alternatives to total confinement are available for offenders
with sentences of one year or less. These alternatives include the
following sentence conditions that the court may order as substitutes
for total confinement:
(((1))) (a) One day of partial confinement may be substituted for
one day of total confinement;
(((2))) (b) In addition, for offenders convicted of nonviolent
offenses only, eight hours of community restitution may be substituted
for one day of total confinement, with a maximum conversion limit of
two hundred forty hours or thirty days. Community restitution hours
must be completed within the period of community supervision or a time
period specified by the court, which shall not exceed twenty-four
months, pursuant to a schedule determined by the department; and
(((3))) (c) For offenders convicted of nonviolent and nonsex
offenses, the court may authorize county jails to convert jail
confinement to an available county supervised community option and may
require the offender to perform affirmative conduct pursuant to RCW
9.94A.607.
(2) For sentences of nonviolent offenders for one year or less, the
court shall consider and give priority to available alternatives to
total confinement and shall state its reasons in writing on the
judgment and sentence form if the alternatives are not used.
(3) The court shall require that any alternative to total
confinement ordered under this section be served in the county in which
the offender was convicted.

Sec. 9 RCW 9.94A.728 and 2004 c 176 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and
committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of
the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the
sentence except as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (2) of this
section, the term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and promulgated by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction in which the offender is confined. The earned release
time shall be for good behavior and good performance, as determined by
the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency
shall not credit the offender with earned release credits in advance of
the offender actually earning the credits. Any program established
pursuant to this section shall allow an offender to earn early release
credits for presentence incarceration. If an offender is transferred
from a county jail to the department, the administrator of a county
jail facility shall certify to the department the amount of time spent
in custody at the facility and the amount of earned release time. An
offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after July 23,
1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good time credits
or earned release time for that portion of his or her sentence that
results from any deadly weapon enhancements.
(a) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In the
case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex
offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 2003,
the aggregate earned release time may not exceed ten percent of the
sentence.
(b)(i) In the case of an offender who qualifies under (b)(ii) of
this subsection, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed fifty
percent of the sentence.
(ii) An offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time under this subsection (1)(b) if he or
she:
(A) Is classified in one of the two lowest risk categories under
(b)(iii) of this subsection;
(B) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
and
(C) Has no prior conviction for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor).
(iii) For purposes of determining an offender's eligibility under
this subsection (1)(b), the department shall perform a risk assessment
of every offender committed to a correctional facility operated by the
department who has no current or prior conviction for a sex offense, a
violent offense, a crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411,
a felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020, a
violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary), a violation of, or
an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.401 by
manufacture or delivery or possession with intent to deliver
methamphetamine, or a violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled
substance to a minor). The department must classify each assessed
offender in one of four risk categories between highest and lowest
risk.
(iv) The department shall recalculate the earned release time and
reschedule the expected release dates for each qualified offender under
this subsection (1)(b).
(v) This subsection (1)(b) applies retroactively to eligible
offenders serving terms of total confinement in a state correctional
facility as of July 1, 2003.
(vi) This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to offenders convicted
after July 1, 2010.
(c) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence;
(2)(a) A person convicted of a sex offense or an offense
categorized as a serious violent offense, assault in the second degree,
vehicular homicide, vehicular assault, assault of a child in the second
degree, any crime against persons where it is determined in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.602 that the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed before July 1, 2000, may become
eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the department, for
transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned release time
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(b) A person convicted of a sex offense, a violent offense, any
crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or a felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or after July 1, 2000, may
become eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the
department, for transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned
release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(c) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community placement or community
custody terms eligible for release to community custody status in lieu
of earned release shall provide an approved residence and living
arrangement prior to release to the community;
(d) The department may deny transfer to community custody status in
lieu of earned release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
if the department determines an offender's release plan, including
proposed residence location and living arrangements, may violate the
conditions of the sentence or conditions of supervision, place the
offender at risk to violate the conditions of the sentence, place the
offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk to victim safety or
community safety. The department's authority under this section is
independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence or statutory
provision regarding conditions for community custody or community
placement;
(e) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(4)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section;
(3) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an
authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may
leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections
officer or officers;
(4)(a) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical
placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:
(i) The offender has a medical condition that is serious enough to
require costly care or treatment;
(ii) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or
she is physically incapacitated due to age or the medical condition;
and
(iii) Granting the extraordinary medical placement will result in
a cost savings to the state.
(b) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without
the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an
extraordinary medical placement.
(c) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all
offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic
monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's
medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's
medical care. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the
monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed.
(d) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement
under this subsection at any time;
(5) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons
board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health
problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or
other extraordinary circumstances;
(6) No more than the final six months of the sentence may be served
in partial confinement designed to aid the offender in finding work and
reestablishing himself or herself in the community. An offender
beginning a term of partial confinement authorized under this section
on or after the effective date of this section shall serve the partial
confinement in the county in which he or she was convicted;
(7) The governor may pardon any offender;
(8) The department may release an offender from confinement any
time within ten days before a release date calculated under this
section; and
(9) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to
completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as
provided in RCW 9.94A.870.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an offender
sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as subject to a
mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not be released
from total confinement before the completion of the listed mandatory
minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless allowed
under RCW 9.94A.540, however persistent offenders are not eligible for
extraordinary medical placement.

Sec. 10 RCW 9.94A.731 and 2003 c 254 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender sentenced to a term of partial confinement shall be
confined in the facility for at least eight hours per day or, if
serving a work crew sentence shall comply with the conditions of that
sentence as set forth in RCW 9.94A.030(31) and 9.94A.725. The offender
shall be required as a condition of partial confinement to report to
the facility at designated times. During the period of partial
confinement, an offender may be required to comply with crime-related
prohibitions and affirmative conditions imposed by the court or the
department pursuant to this chapter.
(2) An offender in a county jail ordered to serve all or part of a
term of less than one year in work release, work crew, or a program of
home detention who violates the rules of the work release facility,
work crew, or program of home detention or fails to remain employed or
enrolled in school may be transferred to the appropriate county
detention facility without further court order but shall, upon request,
be notified of the right to request an administrative hearing on the
issue of whether or not the offender failed to comply with the order
and relevant conditions. Pending such hearing, or in the absence of a
request for the hearing, the offender shall serve the remainder of the
term of confinement as total confinement. This subsection shall not
affect transfer or placement of offenders committed to the department.
(3) Participation in work release shall be conditioned upon the
offender attending work or school at regularly defined hours and
abiding by the rules of the work release facility.
(4) An offender beginning a term of partial confinement on or after
the effective date of this section shall serve the term of partial
confinement in the county in which he or she was convicted unless doing
so would contravene the conditions of the offender's sentence.

Sec. 11 RCW 9.94A.650 and 2002 c 175 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies to offenders who have never been
previously convicted of a felony in this state, federal court, or
another state, and who have never participated in a program of deferred
prosecution for a felony, and who are convicted of a felony that is
not:
(a) Classified as a violent offense or a sex offense under this
chapter;
(b) Manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to manufacture
or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II that
is a narcotic drug or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV;
(c) Manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to deliver a
methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers as
defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2); or
(d) The selling for profit of any controlled substance or
counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except
leaves and flowering tops of marihuana.
(2) In sentencing a first-time offender the court may waive the
imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range and impose
a sentence which may include up to ninety days of confinement in a
facility operated or utilized under contract by the county and a
requirement that the offender refrain from committing new offenses.
The sentence may also include a term of community supervision or
community custody as specified in subsection (3) of this section,
which, in addition to crime-related prohibitions, may include
requirements that the offender perform any one or more of the
following:
(a) Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;
(b) Undergo available outpatient treatment for up to the period
specified in subsection (3) of this section, or inpatient treatment not
to exceed the standard range of confinement for that offense;
(c) Pursue a prescribed, secular course of study or vocational
training;
(d) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's
address or employment;
(e) Report as directed to a community corrections officer; or
(f) Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided
in RCW 9.94A.030 and/or perform community restitution work.
(3) The terms and statuses applicable to sentences under subsection
(2) of this section are:
(a) For sentences imposed on or after July 25, 1999, for crimes
committed before July 1, 2000, up to one year of community supervision.
If treatment is ordered, the period of community supervision may
include up to the period of treatment, but shall not exceed two years;
and
(b) For crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, up to one year
of community custody unless treatment is ordered, in which case the
period of community custody may include up to the period of treatment,
but shall not exceed two years. Any term of community custody imposed
under this section is subject to conditions and sanctions as authorized
in this section and in RCW 9.94A.715 (2) and (3). The conditions of
the community custody must include a requirement that the offender
reside in the county in which he or she was convicted.
(4) The department shall discharge from community supervision any
offender sentenced under this section before July 25, 1999, who has
served at least one year of community supervision and has completed any
treatment ordered by the court.

Sec. 12 RCW 9.94A.670 and 2004 c 176 s 4 and 2004 c 38 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply to this section only.
(a) "Sex offender treatment provider" or "treatment provider" means
a certified sex offender treatment provider or a certified affiliate
sex offender treatment provider as defined in RCW 18.155.020.
(b) "Substantial bodily harm" means bodily injury that involves a
temporary but substantial disfigurement, or that causes a temporary but
substantial loss or impairment of the function of any body part or
organ, or that causes a fracture of any body part or organ.
(c) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as
a result of the crime charged. "Victim" also means a parent or
guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or guardian
is the perpetrator of the offense.
(2) An offender is eligible for the special sex offender sentencing
alternative if:
(a) The offender has been convicted of a sex offense other than a
violation of RCW 9A.44.050 or a sex offense that is also a serious
violent offense;
(b) The offender has no prior convictions for a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030 or any other felony sex offenses in this or
any other state;
(c) The offender has no prior adult convictions for a violent
offense that was committed within five years of the date the current
offense was committed;
(d) The offense did not result in substantial bodily harm to the
victim;
(e) The offender had an established relationship with, or
connection to, the victim such that the sole connection with the victim
was not the commission of the crime; and
(f) The offender's standard sentence range for the offense includes
the possibility of confinement for less than eleven years.
(3) If the court finds the offender is eligible for this
alternative, the court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or
the offender, may order an examination to determine whether the
offender is amenable to treatment.
(a) The report of the examination shall include at a minimum the
following:
(i) The offender's version of the facts and the official version of
the facts;
(ii) The offender's offense history;
(iii) An assessment of problems in addition to alleged deviant
behaviors;
(iv) The offender's social and employment situation; and
(v) Other evaluation measures used.
The report shall set forth the sources of the examiner's
information.
(b) The examiner shall assess and report regarding the offender's
amenability to treatment and relative risk to the community. A
proposed treatment plan shall be provided and shall include, at a
minimum:
(i) Frequency and type of contact between offender and therapist;
(ii) Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and
description of planned treatment modalities;
(iii) Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living
conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members
and others;
(iv) Anticipated length of treatment; and
(v) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and affirmative
conditions, which must include, to the extent known, an identification
of specific activities or behaviors that are precursors to the
offender's offense cycle, including, but not limited to, activities or
behaviors such as viewing or listening to pornography or use of alcohol
or controlled substances.
(c) The court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the
state shall order, a second examination regarding the offender's
amenability to treatment. The examiner shall be selected by the party
making the motion. The offender shall pay the cost of any second
examination ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be indigent
in which case the state shall pay the cost.
(4) After receipt of the reports, the court shall consider whether
the offender and the community will benefit from use of this
alternative, consider whether the alternative is too lenient in light
of the extent and circumstances of the offense, consider whether the
offender has victims in addition to the victim of the offense, consider
whether the offender is amenable to treatment, consider the risk the
offender would present to the community, to the victim, or to persons
of similar age and circumstances as the victim, and consider the
victim's opinion whether the offender should receive a treatment
disposition under this section. The court shall give great weight to
the victim's opinion whether the offender should receive a treatment
disposition under this section. If the sentence imposed is contrary to
the victim's opinion, the court shall enter written findings stating
its reasons for imposing the treatment disposition. The fact that the
offender admits to his or her offense does not, by itself, constitute
amenability to treatment. If the court determines that this
alternative is appropriate, the court shall then impose a sentence or,
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.712, a minimum term of sentence, within the
standard sentence range. If the sentence imposed is less than eleven
years of confinement, the court may suspend the execution of the
sentence and impose the following conditions of suspension:
(a) The court shall order the offender to serve a term of
confinement of up to twelve months or the maximum term within the
standard range, whichever is less. The court may order the offender to
serve a term of confinement greater than twelve months or the maximum
term within the standard range based on the presence of an aggravating
circumstance listed in RCW 9.94A.535(((2))) (3). In no case shall the
term of confinement exceed the statutory maximum sentence for the
offense. The court may order the offender to serve all or part of his
or her term of confinement in partial confinement. An offender
sentenced to a term of confinement under this subsection is not
eligible for earned release under RCW 9.92.151 or 9.94A.728.
(b) The court shall place the offender on community custody for the
length of the suspended sentence, the length of the maximum term
imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.712, or three years, whichever is
greater, and require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed
by the department under RCW 9.94A.720. The terms of the community
custody must include a requirement that the offender reside in the
county in which he or she was convicted.
(c) The court shall order treatment for any period up to five years
in duration. The court, in its discretion, shall order outpatient sex
offender treatment or inpatient sex offender treatment, if available.
A community mental health center may not be used for such treatment
unless it has an appropriate program designed for sex offender
treatment. The offender shall not change sex offender treatment
providers or treatment conditions without first notifying the
prosecutor, the community corrections officer, and the court. If any
party or the court objects to a proposed change, the offender shall not
change providers or conditions without court approval after a hearing.
(d) As conditions of the suspended sentence, the court shall impose
specific prohibitions and affirmative conditions relating to the known
precursor activities or behaviors identified in the proposed treatment
plan under subsection (3)(b)(v) of this section or identified in an
annual review under subsection (7)(b) of this section.
(5) As conditions of the suspended sentence, the court may impose
one or more of the following:
(a) Crime-related prohibitions;
(b) Require the offender to devote time to a specific employment or
occupation;
(c) Require the offender to remain within prescribed geographical
boundaries and notify the court or the community corrections officer
prior to any change in the offender's address or employment;
(d) Require the offender to report as directed to the court and a
community corrections officer;
(e) Require the offender to pay all court-ordered legal financial
obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030;
(f) Require the offender to perform community restitution work; or
(g) Require the offender to reimburse the victim for the cost of
any counseling required as a result of the offender's crime.
(6) At the time of sentencing, the court shall set a treatment
termination hearing for three months prior to the anticipated date for
completion of treatment.
(7)(a) The sex offender treatment provider shall submit quarterly
reports on the offender's progress in treatment to the court and the
parties. The report shall reference the treatment plan and include at
a minimum the following: Dates of attendance, offender's compliance
with requirements, treatment activities, the offender's relative
progress in treatment, and any other material specified by the court at
sentencing.
(b) The court shall conduct a hearing on the offender's progress in
treatment at least once a year. At least fourteen days prior to the
hearing, notice of the hearing shall be given to the victim. The
victim shall be given the opportunity to make statements to the court
regarding the offender's supervision and treatment. At the hearing,
the court may modify conditions of community custody including, but not
limited to, crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions
relating to activities and behaviors identified as part of, or relating
to precursor activities and behaviors in, the offender's offense cycle
or revoke the suspended sentence.
(8) At least fourteen days prior to the treatment termination
hearing, notice of the hearing shall be given to the victim. The
victim shall be given the opportunity to make statements to the court
regarding the offender's supervision and treatment. Prior to the
treatment termination hearing, the treatment provider and community
corrections officer shall submit written reports to the court and
parties regarding the offender's compliance with treatment and
monitoring requirements, and recommendations regarding termination from
treatment, including proposed community custody conditions. The court
may order an evaluation regarding the advisability of termination from
treatment by a sex offender treatment provider who may not be the same
person who treated the offender under subsection (4) of this section or
any person who employs, is employed by, or shares profits with the
person who treated the offender under subsection (4) of this section
unless the court has entered written findings that such evaluation is
in the best interest of the victim and that a successful evaluation of
the offender would otherwise be impractical. The offender shall pay
the cost of the evaluation. At the treatment termination hearing the
court may: (a) Modify conditions of community custody, and either (b)
terminate treatment, or (c) extend treatment in two-year increments for
up to the remaining period of community custody.
(9)(a) If a violation of conditions other than a second violation
of the prohibitions or affirmative conditions relating to precursor
behaviors or activities imposed under subsection (4)(d) or (7)(b) of
this section occurs during community custody, the department shall
either impose sanctions as provided for in RCW 9.94A.737(2)(a) or refer
the violation to the court and recommend revocation of the suspended
sentence as provided for in subsections (6) and (8) of this section.
(b) If a second violation of the prohibitions or affirmative
conditions relating to precursor behaviors or activities imposed under
subsection (4)(d) or (7)(b) of this section occurs during community
custody, the department shall refer the violation to the court and
recommend revocation of the suspended sentence as provided in
subsection (10) of this section.
(10) The court may revoke the suspended sentence at any time during
the period of community custody and order execution of the sentence if:
(a) The offender violates the conditions of the suspended sentence, or
(b) the court finds that the offender is failing to make satisfactory
progress in treatment. All confinement time served during the period
of community custody shall be credited to the offender if the suspended
sentence is revoked.
(11) The offender's sex offender treatment provider may not be the
same person who examined the offender under subsection (3) of this
section or any person who employs, is employed by, or shares profits
with the person who examined the offender under subsection (3) of this
section, unless the court has entered written findings that such
treatment is in the best interests of the victim and that successful
treatment of the offender would otherwise be impractical. Examinations
and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be
conducted by certified sex offender treatment providers or certified
affiliate sex offender treatment providers under chapter 18.155 RCW
unless the court finds that:
(a) The offender has already moved to another state or plans to
move to another state for reasons other than circumventing the
certification requirements; or
(b)(i) No certified sex offender treatment providers or certified
affiliate sex offender treatment providers are available for treatment
within a reasonable geographical distance of the offender's home; and
(ii) The evaluation and treatment plan comply with this section and
the rules adopted by the department of health.
(12) If the offender is less than eighteen years of age when the
charge is filed, the state shall pay for the cost of initial evaluation
and treatment.

Sec. 13 RCW 9.94A.660 and 2005 c 460 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender is eligible for the special drug offender
sentencing alternative if:
(a) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a violent
offense or sex offense and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4);
(b) The offender has no current or prior convictions for a sex
offense at any time or violent offense within ten years before
conviction of the current offense, in this state, another state, or the
United States;
(c) For a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act under
chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense involved only a small quantity of
the particular controlled substance as determined by the judge upon
consideration of such factors as the weight, purity, packaging, sale
price, and street value of the controlled substance;
(d) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not
become subject to a deportation order during the period of the
sentence;
(e) The standard sentence range for the current offense is greater
than one year; and
(f) The offender has not received a drug offender sentencing
alternative more than once in the prior ten years before the current
offense.
(2) A motion for a sentence under this section may be made by the
court, the offender, or the state. If the sentencing court determines
that the offender is eligible for this alternative, the court may order
an examination of the offender. The examination shall, at a minimum,
address the following issues:
(a) Whether the offender suffers from drug addiction;
(b) Whether the addiction is such that there is a probability that
criminal behavior will occur in the future;
(c) Whether effective treatment for the offender's addiction is
available from a provider that has been licensed or certified by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and
health services; and
(d) Whether the offender and the community will benefit from the
use of the alternative.
(3) The examination report must contain:
(a) Information on the issues required to be addressed in
subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) A proposed treatment plan that must, at a minimum, contain:
(i) A proposed treatment provider that has been licensed or
certified by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the
department of social and health services;
(ii) The recommended frequency and length of treatment, including
both residential chemical dependency treatment and treatment in the
community;
(iii) A proposed monitoring plan, including any requirements
regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by
family members and others; and
(iv) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and affirmative
conditions.
(4) After receipt of the examination report, if the court
determines that a sentence under this section is appropriate, the court
shall waive imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range
and impose a sentence consisting of either a prison-based alternative
under subsection (5) of this section or a residential chemical
dependency treatment-based alternative under subsection (6) of this
section. The residential chemical dependency treatment-based
alternative is only available if the midpoint of the standard range is
twenty-four months or less.
(5) The prison-based alternative shall include:
(a) A period of total confinement in a state facility for one-half
of the midpoint of the standard sentence range. During incarceration
in the state facility, offenders sentenced under this subsection shall
undergo a comprehensive substance abuse assessment and receive, within
available resources, treatment services appropriate for the offender.
The treatment services shall be designed by the division of alcohol and
substance abuse of the department of social and health services, in
cooperation with the department of corrections;
(b) The remainder of the midpoint of the standard range as a term
of community custody which must include appropriate substance abuse
treatment in a program that has been approved by the division of
alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and health
services. If the department finds that conditions have been willfully
violated, the offender may be reclassified to serve the remaining
balance of the original sentence. An offender who fails to complete
the program or who is administratively terminated from the program
shall be reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her
sentence as ordered by the sentencing court;
(c) Crime-related prohibitions including a condition not to use
illegal controlled substances;
(d) A requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to
monitor that status; and
(e) A term of community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.715 to be
imposed upon failure to complete or administrative termination from the
special drug offender sentencing alternative program. The terms of any
period of community custody imposed under this section must include a
requirement that the offender reside in the county in which he or she
was convicted.
(6) The residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative
shall include:
(a) A term of community custody equal to one-half of the midpoint
of the standard sentence range or two years, whichever is greater,
conditioned on the offender entering and remaining in residential
chemical dependency treatment certified under chapter 70.96A RCW for a
period set by the court between three and six months. If the court
imposes a term of community custody, the department shall, within
available resources, make chemical dependency assessment and treatment
services available to the offender during the term of community
custody. The court shall impose, as conditions of community custody,
treatment and other conditions as proposed in the plan under subsection
(3)(b) of this section. The department may impose conditions and
sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.715 (2), (3), (6), and (7),
9.94A.737, and 9.94A.740. The court shall schedule a progress hearing
during the period of residential chemical dependency treatment, and
schedule a treatment termination hearing for three months before the
expiration of the term of community custody;
(b) Before the progress hearing and treatment termination hearing,
the treatment provider and the department shall submit written reports
to the court and parties regarding the offender's compliance with
treatment and monitoring requirements, and recommendations regarding
termination from treatment. At the hearing, the court may:
(i) Authorize the department to terminate the offender's community
custody status on the expiration date determined under (a) of this
subsection; or
(ii) Continue the hearing to a date before the expiration date of
community custody, with or without modifying the conditions of
community custody; or
(iii) Impose a term of total confinement equal to one-half the
midpoint of the standard sentence range, followed by a term of
community custody under RCW 9.94A.715;
(c) If the court imposes a term of total confinement under (b)(iii)
of this subsection, the department shall, within available resources,
make chemical dependency assessment and treatment services available to
the offender during the terms of total confinement and community
custody.
(7) If the court imposes a sentence under this section, the court
may prohibit the offender from using alcohol or controlled substances
and may require that the monitoring for controlled substances be
conducted by the department or by a treatment alternatives to street
crime program or a comparable court or agency-referred program. The
offender may be required to pay thirty dollars per month while on
community custody to offset the cost of monitoring. In addition, the
court may impose any of the following conditions:
(a) Devote time to a specific employment or training;
(b) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the
court or the community corrections officer before any change in the
offender's address or employment;
(c) Report as directed to a community corrections officer;
(d) Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations;
(e) Perform community restitution work;
(f) Stay out of areas designated by the sentencing court;
(g) Such other conditions as the court may require such as
affirmative conditions.
(8)(a) The court may bring any offender sentenced under this
section back into court at any time on its own initiative to evaluate
the offender's progress in treatment or to determine if any violations
of the conditions of the sentence have occurred.
(b) If the offender is brought back to court, the court may modify
the terms of the community custody or impose sanctions under (c) of
this subsection.
(c) The court may order the offender to serve a term of total
confinement within the standard range of the offender's current offense
at any time during the period of community custody if the offender
violates the conditions of the sentence or if the offender is failing
to make satisfactory progress in treatment.
(d) An offender ordered to serve a term of total confinement under
(c) of this subsection shall receive credit for any time previously
served under this section.
(9) If an offender sentenced to the prison-based alternative under
subsection (5) of this section is found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation order, a hearing shall be held
by the department unless waived by the offender, and, if the department
finds that the offender is subject to a valid deportation order, the
department may administratively terminate the offender from the program
and reclassify the offender to serve the remaining balance of the
original sentence.
(10) An offender sentenced under this section shall be subject to
all rules relating to earned release time with respect to any period
served in total confinement.
(11) Costs of examinations and preparing treatment plans under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section may be paid, at the option of
the county, from funds provided to the county from the criminal justice
treatment account under RCW 70.96A.350.

Sec. 14 RCW 72.02.100 and 1988 c 143 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person serving a sentence for a term of confinement in a state
correctional facility for convicted felons, pursuant to court
commitment, who is thereafter released upon an order of parole of the
indeterminate ((sentencing)) sentence review board, or who is
discharged from custody upon expiration of sentence, or who is ordered
discharged from custody by a court of appropriate jurisdiction, shall
be entitled to retain his or her earnings from labor or employment
while in confinement and shall be supplied by the superintendent of the
state correctional facility with suitable and presentable clothing((,))
and the sum of forty dollars for subsistence((, and transportation by
the least expensive method of public transportation not to exceed the
cost of one hundred dollars to his place of residence or the place
designated in his parole plan, or to the place from which committed if
such person is being discharged on expiration of sentence, or
discharged from custody by a court of appropriate jurisdiction)):
PROVIDED, That up to sixty additional dollars may be made available to
the parolee for necessary personal and living expenses upon application
to and approval by such person's community corrections officer. If in
the opinion of the superintendent suitable arrangements have been made
to provide the person to be released with suitable clothing ((and/or
the expenses of transportation)), the superintendent may consent to
such arrangement. If the superintendent has reasonable cause to
believe that the person to be released has ample funds, with the
exception of earnings from labor or employment while in confinement, to
assume the expenses of clothing((, transportation,)) or the expenses
for which payments made pursuant to RCW 72.02.100 or 72.02.110 or any
one or more of such expenses, the person released shall be required to
assume such expenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 72.02 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall transport any adult offender released from
confinement in a state correctional facility to the county in which he
or she was convicted unless a court of competent jurisdiction has
ordered that the offender reside or be released in another county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

--- END ---