BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.01.010 and 1961 c 307 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created and established a state commission to be
known and designated as the Washington utilities and transportation
commission, and in this chapter referred to as the commission.
The commission shall be composed of three members appointed by the
governor, with the consent of the senate. Not more than two members of
said commission shall belong to the same political party.
((The members of the first commission to be appointed after taking
effect of this section shall be appointed for terms beginning April 1,
1951, and expiring as follows: One commissioner for the term expiring
January 1, 1953; one commissioner for the term expiring January 1,
1955; one commissioner for the term expiring January 1, 1957. Each of
the commissioners shall hold office until his successor is appointed
and qualified. Upon the expiration of the terms of the three
commissioners first to be appointed as herein provided,)) Each
((succeeding)) commissioner shall be appointed and hold office for the
term of six years. ((One of such commissioners to be designated by))
The governor((,)) shall((,)) designate one of the commissioners to be
chair of the commission during the term of the ((appointing))
governor((, be the chairman of the commission)).
Each commissioner shall receive a salary as may be fixed by the
governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040.
Any member of the commission may be removed for inefficiency,
malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges
filed by the governor, who shall transmit such written charges to the
member accused and to the chief justice of the supreme court. The
chief justice shall thereupon designate a special tribunal composed of
three judges of the superior court to hear and adjudicate the charges.
Such tribunal shall fix the time, place and procedure for the hearing,
and the hearing shall be public. The decision of such tribunal shall
be final and not subject to review.
If the tribunal specified herein finds the charges of the governor
to be true, the governor shall have the right to immediately remove the
commissioner from office, to declare the position of the commissioner
vacant, and appoint another commissioner to the position in accordance
with the provisions of the law.
Any vacancy arising in the office of commissioner shall be filled
by appointment by the governor, and, except for persons appointed as
pro tempore commissioners, an appointee selected to fill ((such)) a
vacancy shall hold office for the balance of the full term for which
his or her predecessor on the commission was appointed.
If a vacancy occurs while the senate is not in session, the
governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of
the senate, when he or she shall present to the senate his or her
nomination or nominations for the office to be filled.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.01.030 and 1961 c 14 s 80.01.030 are each amended
to read as follows:
The commission shall appoint and employ a secretary and such
accounting, engineering, expert and clerical assistants, and such other
qualified assistants as may be necessary to carry on the administrative
work of the commission.
The secretary shall be the custodian of the commission's official
seal, and shall keep full and accurate minutes of all transactions,
proceedings and determinations of the commission and perform such other
duties as may be required by the commission.
The commission may deputize one or more of its assistants to
perform, in the name of the commission, such duties of the commission
as it deems expedient. The commission may, by rule or order, delegate
to designated assistants any of the powers and duties vested in or
imposed upon the commission by law except matters governed by chapter
34.05 RCW; however, a matter may not be delegated to a person who has
worked as an advocate on the same docket. Delegated powers and duties
may be exercised in the name of the commission. The commission by rule
shall implement a process by which notice shall be provided of matters
designated for delegation. Any such matter shall be heard or reviewed
by commissioners at the request of any commissioner or any affected
person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 80.01 RCW
to read as follows:
When a commissioner has heard all or a substantial part of an
adjudicative proceeding and leaves office before entry of a final order
in the proceeding, at the request of the remaining commissioners the
commissioner leaving office may be appointed by the governor as
commissioner pro tempore to complete the proceeding. A proceeding is
completed when the commission enters a final order purporting to
resolve all contested issues therein, from which no party seeks
clarification or reconsideration, or upon entry of an order on
clarification or reconsideration, even though the order is subject to
a petition for judicial review. A commissioner pro tempore shall
receive a reasonable compensation to be fixed by the remaining members
of the commission.

Sec. 4 RCW 80.01.050 and 1995 c 331 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of any business, for the performance of any duty, or for
the exercise of any power of the commission, and may hold hearings at
any time or place within or without the state. A quorum of
commissioners need not affirm any matter delegated under RCW 80.01.030.
Any investigation, inquiry, or hearing which the commission has power
to undertake or to hold may be undertaken or held by or before any
commissioner or any ((employee designated and authorized by the
commission)) administrative law judge as provided in RCW 80.01.060.
All investigations, inquiries, and hearings of the commission, and all
findings, orders, or decisions, made by a commissioner or
administrative law judge, when approved and confirmed by the commission
or allowed to become final pursuant to RCW 80.01.060 and filed in its
office, shall be ((and be deemed to be)) the orders or decisions of the
commission.

Sec. 5 RCW 80.01.060 and 1995 c 331 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may ((designate employees of the commission as
hearing examiners,)) appoint administrative law judges((, and review
judges)) when it deems such action necessary for its general
administration. The ((designated employees have power to))
administrative law judges may administer oaths, ((to)) issue subpoenas
for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, waybills,
books, accounts, documents, and testimony, ((to)) examine witnesses,
make findings of probable cause and issue complaints in the name of the
commission, and ((to)) receive testimony in any inquiry, investigation,
hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under such rules as
the commission may adopt. The administrative law judges appointed
under this subsection are not subject to chapter 41.06 RCW; however,
they are subject to discipline and termination, for cause, by the
executive secretary of the commission. Upon written request of the
person so disciplined or terminated, the executive secretary shall
state the reasons for such action in writing. The person affected has
a right of review by the superior court of Thurston county on petition
for reinstatement or other remedy filed within thirty days of receipt
of the written reasons.
(2) In general rate increase filings by a natural gas, electric, or
telecommunications company, the ((designated employee)) administrative
law judges may preside, but may not enter an initial order unless
expressly agreed to in writing by the company making the filing. In
all other cases, the ((designated employee)) administrative law judge
may enter an initial order including findings of fact and conclusions
of law in accordance with RCW 34.05.461(1)(a) and (c) and (3) through
(9) or 34.05.485. RCW 34.05.461 (1)(b) and (2) do not apply to entry
of orders under this section. ((The designated employee))
(3) Administrative law judges may not enter final orders, except
that the commission may designate persons by rule to preside and enter
final orders in emergency adjudications under RCW 34.05.479. Initial
orders of administrative law judges shall become final on the day
following expiration of the time established by the commission for
filing a petition for administrative review, unless, within that time,
a party petitions for administrative review or the commission notifies
parties that it will review the initial order on its own motion.
(((3))) (4) If the ((designated employee)) administrative law judge
does not enter an initial order as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, then a majority of the members of the commission who are to
enter the final order must hear or review substantially all of the
record submitted by any party.

--- END ---