BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 8.04.070 and 1988 c 202 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time and place appointed for hearing the petition, or to
which the hearing may have been adjourned, if the court has
satisfactory proof that all parties interested in the lands, real
estate, premises, or other property described in the petition have been
duly served with the notice, and is further satisfied by competent
proof that the contemplated use for which the lands, real estate,
premises, or other property are sought to be appropriated is really
necessary for the public use of the state, it shall make and enter an
order, to be recorded in the minutes of the court, and which order
shall be final unless appellate review thereof is sought within five
days after entry thereof, adjudicating that the contemplated use for
which the lands, real estate, premises or other property are sought to
be appropriated is really a public use of the state.
(2) Private property shall only be taken by the state for a public
use. The term "public use" shall only mean the possession, occupation,
or enjoyment of the property by the general public or by the state, or
a county, city, town, or other municipality; or the use of land for the
creation or functioning of public utilities or common carriers such as
railroads, utilities, or toll roads; or the acquisition of property to
cure a concrete harmful effect of the current use of the land,
including the removal of public nuisances or structures that are beyond
repair or unfit for human habitation or use; or the acquisition of
abandoned property; or the redevelopment or rehabilitation of blighted
areas.
(3) The taking of private property by the state for economic
development does not constitute a public use where the primary purpose
of such development is for an increase in tax base, tax revenues,
employment, or general economic health.

Sec. 2 RCW 8.08.020 and 1949 c 79 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
((Any condemnation, appropriation or disposition intended in RCW
8.08.010 through 8.08.080 shall be deemed and held to be for a county
purpose and public use within the meaning of RCW 8.08.010 through
8.08.080 when it is directly or indirectly, approximately or remotely
for the general benefit or welfare of the county or of the inhabitants
thereof.))
(1) The condemnation of private property by a county through
eminent domain proceedings under this chapter is authorized only where
such condemnation is for a public use.
(2) The term "public use" shall only mean the possession,
occupation, or enjoyment of the property by the general public or by
the state, or a county, city, town, or other municipality; or the use
of land for the creation or functioning of public utilities or common
carriers such as railroads, utilities, or toll roads; or the
acquisition of property to cure a concrete harmful effect of the
current use of the land, including the removal of public nuisances or
structures that are beyond repair or unfit for human habitation or use;
or the acquisition of abandoned property; or the redevelopment or
rehabilitation of blighted areas.
(3) The taking of private property by a county for economic
development does not constitute a public use where the primary purpose
of such development is for an increase in the tax base, tax revenues,
employment, or general economic health.

Sec. 3 RCW 8.12.030 and 1915 c 154 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every city and town and each unclassified city and town within
the state of Washington, is hereby authorized and empowered to condemn
land and property, including state, county and school lands and
property for streets, avenues, alleys, highways, bridges, approaches,
culverts, drains, ditches, public squares, public markets, city and
town halls, jails and other public buildings, and for the opening and
widening, widening and extending, altering and straightening of any
street, avenue, alley or highway, and to damage any land or other
property for any such purpose or for the purpose of making changes in
the grade of any street, avenue, alley or highway, or for the
construction of slopes or retaining walls for cuts and fills upon real
property abutting on any street, avenue, alley or highway now ordered
to be, or such as shall hereafter be ordered to be opened, extended,
altered, straightened or graded, or for the purpose of draining swamps,
marshes, tidelands, tide flats or ponds, or filling the same, within
the limits of such city, and to condemn land or property, or to damage
the same, either within or without the limits of such city for public
parks, drives and boulevards, hospitals, pesthouses, drains and sewers,
garbage crematories and destructors and dumping grounds for the
destruction, deposit or burial of dead animals, manure, dung, rubbish,
and other offal, and for aqueducts, reservoirs, pumping stations and
other structures for conveying into and through such city a supply of
fresh water, and for the purpose of protecting such supply of fresh
water from pollution, and to condemn land and other property and damage
the same for such and for any other public use after just compensation
having been first made or paid into court for the owner in the manner
prescribed by this chapter.
(2) Private property shall only be taken by a city or town for a
public use. In addition to the uses listed in subsection (1) of this
section, the term "public use" shall only mean the possession,
occupation, or enjoyment of the property by the general public or by
the city, town, or other municipality; or the use of land for the
creation or functioning of public utilities or common carriers such as
railroads, utilities, or toll roads; or the acquisition of property to
cure a concrete harmful effect of the current use of the land,
including the removal of public nuisances or structures that are beyond
repair or unfit for human habitation or use; or the acquisition of
abandoned property; or the redevelopment or rehabilitation of blighted
areas.
(3) The taking of private property by a city or town for economic
development does not constitute a public use where the primary purpose
of such development is for an increase in the tax base, tax revenues,
employment, or general economic health.

Sec. 4 RCW 8.20.070 and 1927 c 88 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) At the time and place appointed for hearing said petition, or
to which the same may have been adjourned, if the court or judge
thereof shall have satisfactory proof that all parties interested in
the land, real estate, premises, or other property described in said
petition, have been duly served with said notice as above prescribed,
and shall be further satisfied by competent proof that the contemplated
use for which the land, real estate, premises or other property sought
to be appropriated is really a public use, or is for a private use for
a private way of necessity, and that the public interest requires the
prosecution of such enterprise, or the private use is for a private way
of necessity, and that the land, real estate, premises, or other
property sought to be appropriated are required and necessary for the
purposes of such enterprise, the court or judge thereof may make an
order, to be recorded in the minutes of said court, directing that a
jury be summoned, or called, in the manner provided by law, to
ascertain the compensation which shall be made for the land, real
estate, premises, or other property sought to be appropriated, unless
a jury be waived as in other civil cases in courts of record, in the
manner prescribed by law.
(2) Private property shall only be taken by a corporate or
governmental entity for a public use. The term "public use" shall only
mean the possession, occupation, or enjoyment of the property by the
general public or by the state, or a county, city, town, or other
municipality; or the use of land for the creation or functioning of
public utilities or common carriers such as railroads, utilities, or
toll roads; or the acquisition of property to cure a concrete harmful
effect of the current use of the land, including the removal of public
nuisances or structures that are beyond repair or unfit for human
habitation or use; or the acquisition of abandoned property; or the
redevelopment or rehabilitation of blighted areas.
(3) The taking of private property by a corporate or governmental
entity for economic development does not constitute a public use where
the primary purpose of such development is for an increase in the tax
base, tax revenues, employment, or general economic health.

--- END ---