BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 78.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a written cost-reimbursement
agreement with an applicant, permit holder, or project operator to
recover from the applicant, permit holder, or project operator the
reasonable costs incurred by the department in carrying out the
requirements of this chapter, as they relate to permit coordination,
environmental review, application review, technical studies in support
of permit processing, or orders issued by the oil and gas supervisor
and permit compliance. Cost-reimbursement agreements are considered an
interim measure until oil and gas development activities necessitate
additional department staffing resources. Cost-reimbursement
agreements must be initiated at the request of an applicant for the
purpose of assisting the department in expediting and facilitating the
permitting and compliance processes. The cost-reimbursement agreement
must identify the specific tasks, costs, and schedule for work to be
conducted under the agreement.
(2) The written cost-reimbursement agreement must be negotiated
with the applicant, permit holder, or project operator. Under the
provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, funds from the applicant,
permit holder, or project operator must be used by the department to
contract with a third party to carry out the work covered by the
cost-reimbursement agreement.
(3) The department shall, in developing and implementing the
cost-reimbursement agreement, ensure that the department reviews and
oversees the work performed by the third party, including the actual
issuance of permits and reviewing reports and taking final action
related to permit compliance. These actions are considered to be the
work of the department, included in application fees, and not paid for
by the agreement. Final decisions that involve policy matters must be
made by the department and not by the consultant. The billing process
must provide for accurate time and cost accounting and may include a
billing cycle that provides for progress payments. The restrictions of
chapter 42.52 RCW apply to any cost-reimbursement agreement, and to any
person hired as a result of a cost-reimbursement agreement.

--- END ---