BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature continues to support high
academic standards for Washington public school students and recognizes
that the Washington assessment of student learning is an assessment
tool and not the standard. The legislature finds that Washington's
academic assessment system, including the essential academic learning
requirements, grade level expectations, and Washington assessment of
student learning, has been continuously under development since the
enactment of the state's education reform law in 1993. Since the
passage of the federal no child left behind act in 2001, there has been
rapid implementation of additional components to the state assessment
system. As a result, a comprehensive analysis of Washington's
assessment system following the implementation of the no child left
behind act of 2001 has not been conducted. There has also not been
adequate attention paid to how the system affects the authority and
control of locally elected school directors. Therefore, the
legislature intends to commission a comprehensive review of
Washington's academic assessment system and ensure additional local
flexibility within that system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall design and conduct a request for proposal for a
comprehensive and independent review of the Washington assessment of
student learning. The review shall cover the content areas of reading,
mathematics, writing, and science, at all grade levels.
(2) The review shall address the following topics:
(a) A description of the full cost to the state and local school
districts of developing, maintaining, scoring, test storage, appeal
processing, parent review, and other tasks associated with
administering the Washington assessment of student learning;
(b) A comparison of the costs of the Washington assessment of
student learning and the costs of assessment systems in other states;
(c) An analysis of the ability of the Washington assessment of
student learning to provide teachers and parents with real-time
diagnostic information about individual students' academic performance
so that instructional support and intervention strategies can
immediately focus on specific knowledge and skills needing improvement;
(d) An analysis of whether and to what extent test questions on the
Washington assessment of student learning disproportionately favor or
disadvantage any specific group of students, including students with
different learning styles, racial or ethnic backgrounds, or gender; and
(e) An evaluation of alternative assessment tools to the Washington
assessment of student learning, a comparison of their costs, and the
extent to which the alternatives meet, or could be made to meet, the
following criteria:
(i) Measure student performance and achievement of the Washington
essential academic learning requirements and grade level expectations;
(ii) Provide teachers and parents with real-time diagnostic
information about individual students' academic performance so that
instructional support and intervention strategies can immediately focus
on specific knowledge and skills needing improvement; and
(iii) Meet federal requirements for assessments used to determine
adequate yearly progress under P.L. 107-110, the no child left behind
act of 2001.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide all
available data necessary for the joint legislative audit and review
committee and its contractor to conduct the review under this section.
The contractor shall submit study protocols for approval by the
committee to ensure adequate confidentiality and security of student
scores and other data and information pertaining to the Washington
assessment of student learning.
(4) The joint legislative audit and review committee and its
contractor shall submit a report containing the results of the review
of the alternative assessment tools to the Washington assessment of
student learning by September 30, 2006, and a final report covering the
other subjects reviewed under this section to the education committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2007.

--- END ---