BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.655.200 and 2005 c 217 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The legislature finds that the mandatory norm-referenced
student assessments eliminated under chapter 217, Laws of 2005 provide
information that teachers and parents use to improve student
learning.)) In the absence of mandatory, statewide, norm-referenced
assessments, the legislature intends to permit school districts to
offer norm-referenced assessments at the districts' own expense
((and)), make diagnostic tools available ((that provide information
that is at least as valuable as the information eliminated under
chapter 217, Laws of 2005)), and require annual diagnostic assessments
to improve student achievement.
(2) In addition to the diagnostic assessments required under
subsection (5) of this section, school districts may, at their own
expense, administer norm-referenced assessments to students.
(3) By September 1, 2005, subject to available funds, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall post on its web site for
voluntary use by school districts, a guide of diagnostic assessments.
The assessments in the guide, to the extent possible, shall include the
characteristics listed in subsection (4)(((a) through (e))) of this
section.
(4) By September 1, 2006, ((subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose,)) the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall make available to school
districts diagnostic assessments that help improve student learning.
To the greatest extent possible, the assessments shall be:
(a) Aligned to the state's grade level expectations;
(b) Individualized to each student's performance level;
(c) Administered efficiently to provide results either immediately
or within two weeks;
(d) Capable of measuring individual student growth over time;
((and))
(e) Cost-effective; and
(f) Capable of providing nationally norm-referenced results.
(5) Beginning with the 2006-07 school year, school districts shall
administer annual diagnostic assessments to all students in the third,
fifth, sixth, eighth, and ninth grades in the content areas of reading,
mathematics, and science. School districts shall select the diagnostic
assessments from those made available by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction under subsection (4) of this
section. Results of the assessments and relevant student, school, and
district characteristics shall be compiled by the superintendent of
public instruction to permit research and analysis.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction is
encouraged to offer at ((their)) statewide and regional staff
development activities training opportunities that would assist
practitioners in:
(a) The interpretation of diagnostic assessments; and
(b) Application of instructional strategies that will increase
student learning based on diagnostic assessment data.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.195 and 2005 c 217 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If students' scores on the test or assessments under RCW
28A.655.070 or 28A.655.200 indicate that students need help in
identified areas, the school district shall evaluate its instructional
practices and make appropriate adjustments.
(2) Each school district shall notify the parents of each student
of their child's performance on the test and assessments conducted
under this chapter or RCW 28A.655.200.

--- END ---