BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies to individuals who apply for an initial
license under this chapter on or after the effective date of this
section.
(2) The department shall adopt rules:
(a) To require a state background check through the state patrol on
each applicant for an initial license. The background check may be
fingerprint-based at the discretion of the department; and
(b) To specify those situations where a background check under (a)
of this subsection is inadequate and an applicant for an initial
license must obtain an electronic fingerprint-based national background
check through the state patrol and federal bureau of investigation.
Situations where a background check is inadequate may include instances
where an applicant has lived out-of-state recently or where the
applicant has a criminal record in Washington.
(3) The background check required under subsection (2) of this
section must be completed before the license is issued.
(4) The department shall:
(a) Require the applicant to submit full sets of fingerprints if
necessary to complete the background check;
(b) Require the applicant to submit any fees, except as precluded
by RCW 43.70.110, and other information required by the state patrol;
(c) Notify the applicant of the results of the background check;
and
(d) Restrict use of the background check results to determining the
individual's suitability for a license.
(5) When deciding whether or not to issue a license, the
disciplining authority shall consider the results of a background check
that reveal a conviction for any criminal offense that constitutes
unprofessional conduct under this chapter or the chapters specified in
RCW 18.130.040(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies to license holders.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to require a review of the
federal national practitioner data bank and the federal healthcare
integrity and protection data bank for each license holder for a
profession that is covered by either of these data banks.
(3) The department shall establish a schedule for conducting the
reviews in subsection (2) of this section. The schedule shall require
all license holders to have a review conducted within four years of the
effective date of this section and at least every four years
thereafter. If three successive reviews conducted at regular intervals
over the following twelve years show that no reports that constitute
unprofessional conduct under this chapter or the chapters specified in
RCW 18.130.040(2) have been reported, no further reviews are required
unless the department has probable cause to believe that such a review
is warranted.
(4) The department shall:
(a) Require the license holder to submit any fees or information
necessary to complete a review required by subsection (2) of this
section;
(b) Restrict use of the results of any review to determining the
individual's suitability for a license.
(5) The disciplining authority shall initiate appropriate
disciplinary actions against an individual if a review required by
subsection (2) of this section and any subsequent investigation reveals
activity that constitutes unprofessional conduct under this chapter or
the chapters specified in RCW 18.130.040(2).
(6) The license holder shall report to the disciplining authority
and to the individual's employer any conviction occurring after the
effective date of this section for a criminal offense that constitutes
unprofessional conduct under this chapter or the chapters specified in
RCW 18.130.040(2). The report must be made within fourteen days of the
conviction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this act limits the authority of the disciplining
authority to investigate the suitability of an individual for holding
a license.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.130.310 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 313 are each
amended to read as follows:
Subject to RCW 40.07.040, the disciplinary authority shall submit
a biennial report to the legislature on its proceedings during the
biennium, detailing the number of complaints made, investigated, and
adjudicated and manner of disposition. In addition, the report shall
provide data on the department's background check and health
professional data bank review activities conducted under sections 1 and
2 of this act and the effectiveness of those activities in identifying
potential license holders who may not be qualified to practice safely.
The report may include recommendations for improving the disciplinary
process, including proposed legislation. The department shall develop
a uniform report format.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
To implement this act, the department may increase application and
renewal fees by amounts that exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Section 1 of this act takes effect July
1, 2007.
(2) Section 2 of this act takes effect January 1, 2008.

--- END ---