BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is
inadequate information to determine the fairness or reasonableness
regarding the use of consumer credit histories for personal insurance
transactions. These histories, also known as insurance scores, are
regulated under RCW 48.19.035.
The legislature further finds consumers continue to be confused as
to how and why credit histories affect their personal insurance
eligibility and premiums.
It is known that the federal trade commission is currently studying
the issue of credit-based insurance scores and its effect on consumers.
The insurance commissioner is directed to obtain this report when
completed, and review the findings as they may apply to Washington
consumers and make any recommendations to the legislature necessary to
protect Washington consumers no later than one hundred eighty days
after receipt of the federal trade commission report.

--- END ---