BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
No candidate for state office may solicit or accept contributions
from a political committee, a person required to be registered with the
commission as a lobbyist under RCW 42.17.150, or a person meeting the
definition of a lobbyist's employer under RCW 42.17.020 during the
period beginning on the thirtieth day before the date a regular
legislative session convenes and continuing thirty days past the date
of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on the date a
special legislative session convenes and continuing through the date
that session adjourns.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2007.

--- END ---