BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The sale of real property is exempt from tax under this chapter
if the person claiming the exemption: (a) Occupied the property as a
principal place of residence on the date military relocation orders
were issued that require the seller, or seller's spouse, to relocate
for continued active duty service; (b) purchased the residence within
the three years preceding the date of issuance of the military
relocation orders; (c) sold the property within the twelve months
following the issuance of the military relocation orders; (d) sold the
property with a selling price that was no more than eight percent
greater than the purchase price paid by the person claiming the
exemption; and (e) was an active duty member of the military on the
date the property was sold, or the person's spouse was an active duty
member on such date.
(2)(a) When a real estate tax affidavit is submitted to the county
treasurer and the affidavit specifies the exemption under this section,
the treasurer may request to verify, or maintain copies of, documents
required in accordance with (b) of this subsection.
(b) The person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section including, but not limited to: (i) The permanent change of
station orders, or other documentation substantiating military
relocation orders; (ii) the instrument of sale or conveyance and real
estate excise tax affidavit substantiating the seller's purchase and
price of the residence within the three years preceding the date of
issuance of the military relocation orders; (iii) documentation
indicating active duty status in the military on the date the property
was sold; (iv) the seller's Washington state driver's license and
certificate of vehicle license registration, if the seller owns and
operates a vehicle; and (v) the seller's voter registration card, or
other documentation indicating that the seller is registered to vote in
the state of Washington, if the seller is registered to vote.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) This act expires on the first day of the
month that is at least twenty days after the occurrence of either of
the following:
(a) Ten years from the effective date of this act has elapsed; or
(b) The number of active duty members in all branches of the armed
forces in Iraq is less than twenty thousand.
(2) The department of revenue shall make the determination that
this act has expired under subsection (1) of this section. After the
department has made this determination, the department shall notify the
county treasurers that the exemption is no longer available. To
facilitate the determination under subsection (1)(b) of this section,
the department may rely on its determination of the best available
listing of United States forces deployed in Iraq. The department shall
not modify or revoke a determination under this section.

--- END ---