BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "State" means the state of Washington and all departments,
supervisors, commissioners, and agencies thereof.
(2) "Municipality" means every city, county, town, district, or
other public agency thereof that is authorized by law to require the
execution of public work.
(3) "Contract" means a contract in writing for the execution of
public work for a fixed or determinable amount and a contract for the
purchase of materials, supplies, goods, wares, or merchandise duly
awarded after advertisement and competitive bid.
(4) "Offshore items" means those items procured from sources beyond
the territorial boundaries of the United States including Alaska and
Hawaii.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 When competitive bids are solicited for
public contract, the solicitation shall set forth, in addition to the
terms and specifications thereof, a requirement that the bidder shall
furnish, upon completion of the contract, a statement certified by the
bidder setting forth the nature and source of offshore items in excess
of two thousand five hundred dollars that have been used in the
performance of the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The director of general administration,
through the division of purchasing, regarding all contracts to which
the state is a party, and the responsible purchasing officers of each
municipality, regarding all contracts to which the municipality is a
party, shall keep the certificates required by section 2 of this act
and shall maintain them in an orderly fashion. The certificates shall
be available for examination by the public. They shall be kept for a
period of five years from the date of their receipt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies to solicitations issued on
or after July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

--- END ---