BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the efficient use
of state resources for the public good requires effective oversight of
state contracts for goods and services. The legislature further finds
that information about the performance of these contracts from those in
the private sector who have contracted with the state is necessary for
effective oversight of these contracts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
A contract for the purchase of goods or services entered into with
a private sector contractor must contain a clause substantially
including the following requirement: The contractor agrees to identify
and make reasonably available an employee of the contractor who is
knowledgeable about this contract to appear before, and to answer
questions of, the Washington state legislature about the performance of
this contract's obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
taxpayer business contractor act.

--- END ---