BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Any individual who resides in this state and pays a state or local
tax assessed pursuant to state law is eligible to receive any service
offered to individuals under a program funded in whole or in part by
state or local funds, if otherwise eligible under such program.

--- END ---