BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.370 and 1995 c 397 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission is empowered to:
(1) Adopt, promulgate, amend, and rescind suitable administrative
rules to carry out the policies and purposes of this chapter, which
rules shall be adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. Any rule relating to
campaign finance, political advertising, or related forms that would
otherwise take effect after June 30th of a general election year shall
take effect no earlier than the day following the general election in
that year;
(2) Appoint and set, within the limits established by the committee
on agency officials' salaries under RCW 43.03.028, the compensation of
an executive director who shall perform such duties and have such
powers as the commission may prescribe and delegate to implement and
enforce this chapter efficiently and effectively. The commission shall
not delegate its authority to adopt, amend, or rescind rules nor shall
it delegate authority to determine whether an actual violation of this
chapter has occurred or to assess penalties for such violations;
(3) Prepare and publish such reports and technical studies as in
its judgment will tend to promote the purposes of this chapter,
including reports and statistics concerning campaign financing,
lobbying, financial interests of elected officials, and enforcement of
this chapter;
(4) Make from time to time, on its own motion, audits and field
investigations;
(5) Make public the time and date of any formal hearing set to
determine whether a violation has occurred, the question or questions
to be considered, and the results thereof;
(6) Administer oaths and affirmations, issue subpoenas, and compel
attendance, take evidence and require the production of any books,
papers, correspondence, memorandums, or other records relevant or
material for the purpose of any investigation authorized under this
chapter, or any other proceeding under this chapter;
(7) Adopt and promulgate a code of fair campaign practices;
(8) Relieve, by rule, candidates or political committees of
obligations to comply with the provisions of this chapter relating to
election campaigns, if they have not received contributions nor made
expenditures in connection with any election campaign of more than one
thousand dollars;
(9) Adopt rules prescribing reasonable requirements for keeping
accounts of and reporting on a quarterly basis costs incurred by state
agencies, counties, cities, and other municipalities and political
subdivisions in preparing, publishing, and distributing legislative
information. The term "legislative information," for the purposes of
this subsection, means books, pamphlets, reports, and other materials
prepared, published, or distributed at substantial cost, a substantial
purpose of which is to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation. The state auditor in his or her regular examination of
each agency under chapter 43.09 RCW shall review the rules, accounts,
and reports and make appropriate findings, comments, and
recommendations in his or her examination reports concerning those
agencies;
(10) After hearing, by order approved and ratified by a majority of
the membership of the commission, suspend or modify any of the
reporting requirements of this chapter in a particular case if it finds
that literal application of this chapter works a manifestly
unreasonable hardship and if it also finds that the suspension or
modification will not frustrate the purposes of the chapter. The
commission shall find that a manifestly unreasonable hardship exists if
reporting the name of an entity required to be reported under RCW
42.17.241(1)(g)(ii) would be likely to adversely affect the competitive
position of any entity in which the person filing the report or any
member of his or her immediate family holds any office, directorship,
general partnership interest, or an ownership interest of ten percent
or more. Any suspension or modification shall be only to the extent
necessary to substantially relieve the hardship. The commission shall
act to suspend or modify any reporting requirements only if it
determines that facts exist that are clear and convincing proof of the
findings required under this section. Requests for renewals of
reporting modifications may be heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding
as set forth in RCW 34.05.482 through 34.05.494 and in accordance with
the standards established in this section. No initial request may be
heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding and no request for renewal may
be heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding if the initial request was
granted more than three years previously or if the applicant is holding
an office or position of employment different from the office or
position held when the initial request was granted. The commission
shall adopt administrative rules governing the proceedings. Any
citizen has standing to bring an action in Thurston county superior
court to contest the propriety of any order entered under this section
within one year from the date of the entry of the order; and
(11) Revise, at least once every five years but no more often than
every two years, the monetary reporting thresholds and reporting code
values of this chapter, except for the monetary values established in
RCW 42.17.640. The revisions shall be only for the purpose of
recognizing economic changes as reflected by an inflationary index
recommended by the office of financial management. The revisions shall
be guided by the change in the index for the period commencing with the
month of December preceding the last revision and concluding with the
month of December preceding the month the revision is adopted. As to
each of the three general categories of this chapter (reports of
campaign finance, reports of lobbyist activity, and reports of the
financial affairs of elected and appointed officials), the revisions
shall equally affect all thresholds within each category. Revisions
shall be adopted as rules under chapter 34.05 RCW. The first revision
authorized by this subsection shall reflect economic changes from the
time of the last legislative enactment affecting the respective code or
threshold through December 1985;
(12) Develop and provide to filers a system for certification of
reports required under this chapter which are transmitted by facsimile
or electronically to the commission. Implementation of the program is
contingent on the availability of funds.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17.640 and 2005 c 445 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person, other than a bona fide political party or a caucus
political committee, may make contributions to a candidate for ((a
state legislative)) public office that in the aggregate exceed
((seven)) five hundred dollars ((or to a candidate for a state office
other than a state legislative office that in the aggregate exceed one
thousand four hundred dollars)) for each election cycle in which the
candidate is on the ballot or appears as a write-in candidate.
Contributions made with respect to a primary may not be made after the
date of the primary. However, contributions to a candidate or a
candidate's authorized committee may be made with respect to a primary
until thirty days after the primary, subject to the following
limitations: (a) The candidate lost the primary; (b) the candidate's
authorized committee has insufficient funds to pay debts outstanding as
of the date of the primary; and (c) the contributions may only be
raised and spent to satisfy the outstanding debt. Contributions made
with respect to a general election may not be made after the final day
of the applicable election cycle.
(2) ((No person, other than a bona fide political party or a caucus
political committee, may make contributions to a state official against
whom recall charges have been filed, or to a political committee having
the expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall of the
state official, during a recall campaign that in the aggregate exceed
seven hundred dollars if for a state legislative office or one thousand
four hundred dollars if for a state office other than a state
legislative office)) For purposes of this section, an election means a
primary, special, general, or recall election. Contributions made to
one election shall not be counted toward any of the limitations that
apply to the candidate or to contributions made to the candidate for
another election.
(3)(a) ((Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section,)) No bona
fide political party or caucus political committee may make
contributions to a candidate ((during)) for an election ((cycle)) that
in the aggregate exceed (i) ((seventy)) fifty cents multiplied by the
number of eligible registered voters in the jurisdiction from which the
candidate is elected if the contributor is a caucus political committee
or the governing body of a state organization, or (ii) ((thirty-five))
twenty-five cents multiplied by the number of registered voters in the
jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected if the contributor is
a county central committee or a legislative district committee.
(b) No candidate may accept contributions from a county central
committee or a legislative district committee during an election cycle
that when combined with contributions from other county central
committees or legislative district committees would in the aggregate
exceed ((thirty-five)) twenty-five cents times the number of registered
voters in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected.
(c) No elected public official against whom recall charges have
been filed, no authorized committee of the official, and no political
committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of
the recall of an elected public official may accept contributions from
a county central committee or a legislative district committee during
an election cycle that when combined with contributions from other
county central committees or legislative district committees would in
the aggregate exceed twenty-five cents multiplied by the number of
registered voters in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is
elected.
(4)(((a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, no bona
fide political party or caucus political committee may make
contributions to a state official against whom recall charges have been
filed, or to a political committee having the expectation of making
expenditures in support of the state official, during a recall campaign
that in the aggregate exceed (i) seventy cents multiplied by the number
of eligible registered voters in the jurisdiction entitled to recall
the state official if the contributor is a caucus political committee
or the governing body of a state organization, or (ii) thirty-five
cents multiplied by the number of registered voters in the jurisdiction
from which the candidate is elected if the contributor is a county
central committee or a legislative district committee.
(b) No state official against whom recall charges have been filed,
no authorized committee of the official, and no political committee
having the expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall
of a state official may accept contributions from a county central
committee or a legislative district committee during an election cycle
that when combined with contributions from other county central
committees or legislative district committees would in the aggregate
exceed thirty-five cents multiplied by the number of registered voters
in the jurisdiction from which the candidate is elected.
(5))) For purposes of determining contribution limits under
subsection((s)) (3) ((and (4))) of this section, the number of eligible
registered voters in a jurisdiction is the number at the time of the
most recent general election in the jurisdiction.
(((6) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this
section,)) (5) No person ((other than an individual, bona fide
political party, or caucus political committee)) may make contributions
reportable under this chapter to a caucus political committee, a bona
fide political party, or a political committee, that in the aggregate
exceed seven hundred dollars in a calendar year ((or to a bona fide
political party that in the aggregate exceed three thousand five
hundred dollars in a calendar year)). This subsection does not apply
to loans made in the ordinary course of business.
(((7))) (6) For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, a
contribution to the authorized political committee of a candidate, or
of ((a state)) an elected public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, is considered to be a contribution to the candidate or
((state)) public official.
(((8))) (7) A contribution received within the twelve-month period
after a recall election concerning a ((state)) public office is
considered to be a contribution during that recall campaign if the
contribution is used to pay a debt or obligation incurred to influence
the outcome of that recall campaign.
(((9) The contributions allowed by subsection (2) of this section
are in addition to those allowed by subsection (1) of this section, and
the contributions allowed by subsection (4) of this section are in
addition to those allowed by subsection (3) of this section.
(10) RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790 apply to a special election
conducted to fill a vacancy in a state office. However, the
contributions made to a candidate or received by a candidate for a
primary or special election conducted to fill such a vacancy shall not
be counted toward any of the limitations that apply to the candidate or
to contributions made to the candidate for any other primary or
election.
(11))) (8) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this section,
no corporation or business entity not doing business in Washington
state, no labor union with fewer than ten members who reside in
Washington state, and no political committee that has not received
contributions of ten dollars or more from at least ten persons
registered to vote in Washington state during the preceding one hundred
eighty days may make contributions reportable under this chapter to a
candidate, to ((a state)) an elected public official against whom
recall charges have been filed, or to a political committee having the
expectation of making expenditures in support of the recall of the
official. This subsection does not apply to loans made in the ordinary
course of business.
(((12) Notwithstanding the other subsections of this section, no
county central committee or legislative district committee may make
contributions reportable under this chapter to a candidate, state
official against whom recall charges have been filed, or political
committee having the expectation of making expenditures in support of
the recall of a state official if the county central committee or
legislative district committee is outside of the jurisdiction entitled
to elect the candidate or recall the state official.
(13))) (9) No person may accept contributions that exceed the
contribution limitations provided in this section.
(((14))) (10) The following contributions are exempt from the
contribution limits of this section:
(a) An expenditure or contribution earmarked for voter
registration, for absentee ballot information, for precinct caucuses,
for get-out-the-vote campaigns, for precinct judges or inspectors, for
sample ballots, or for ballot counting, all without promotion of or
political advertising for individual candidates; or
(b) An expenditure by a political committee for its own internal
organization or fund raising without direct association with individual
candidates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
A corporation or labor organization shall not use general treasury
funds for the purpose of making contributions or expenditures to
influence an election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 42.17.690 (Changing monetary limits) and
1993 c 2 s 9 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---