BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.257 and 1991 c 194 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a landlord uses a tenant screening service, then the
landlord may only charge for the costs incurred for using the tenant
screening service under this section. If a landlord conducts his or
her own screening of tenants, then the landlord may charge his or her
actual costs in obtaining the background information, but the amount
may not exceed the customary costs charged by a screening service in
the general area. The landlord's actual costs may include any fees or
other charges required to obtain the background information, and costs
incurred for long distance phone calls and ((for time spent calling
landlords, employers, and financial institutions)) facsimiles.
(2) A landlord may not charge a prospective tenant for the cost of
obtaining background information under this section unless the landlord
first notifies the prospective tenant in writing of what a tenant
screening entails, the prospective tenant's rights to dispute the
accuracy of information provided by the tenant screening service or
provided by the entities listed on the tenant application who will be
contacted for information concerning the tenant, and the name and
address of the tenant screening service used by the landlord.
(3) Nothing in this section requires a landlord to disclose
information to a prospective tenant that was obtained from a tenant
screening service or from entities listed on the tenant application
which is not required under the federal fair credit reporting act, 15
U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.
(4) Landlords must produce, upon request, proof of order and
payment for any background information for which a tenant was charged.
Proof may be in the form of a receipt, email confirmation, or other
document produced by a screening service or from entities listed on the
tenant application. The document must mention the tenant's name and
social security number or date of birth.
(5) Any landlord who violates this section may be liable to the
prospective tenant for an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars.
The prevailing party may also recover court costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---