BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that citizens demand
and deserve accountability of all public programs and activities,
including public education. Legislation enacted in 2005 required all
state agencies to implement a quality management, accountability, and
performance system to improve public services. School districts should
likewise be expected to demonstrate to the public through quantifiable
and measurable means that they are improving their performance,
implementing sound management practices, and achieving greater
accountability in the use of the public tax dollars that are entrusted
to them.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW under the subchapter heading "program evaluation" to read as
follows:
(1) Each school district shall, within available funds, develop and
implement a quality management, accountability, and performance system
to improve the educational and support services it provides.
(2) Each board of directors shall ensure that district and school
administrators, teachers, and staff at all levels are engaged in the
system and shall provide the training necessary for successful
implementation.
(3) Each school district shall, within available funds, ensure that
its quality management, accountability, and performance system:
(a) Uses strategic planning to establish goals, objectives, and
activities consistent with the fundamental mission of public schools;
(b) Engages parents and community members in establishing and
improving service delivery systems;
(c) Includes clear, relevant, and easy-to-understand measures for
each activity;
(d) Gathers, monitors, and analyzes activity data;
(e) Uses the data to evaluate the effectiveness of programs,
educational services, and support services and to improve efficiency
and reduce costs;
(f) Establishes performance goals and expectations for employees
that reflect the district's objectives and provides for regular
assessments of employee performance;
(g) Where performance is not meeting intended objectives, holds
regular problem-solving sessions to develop and implement a plan for
addressing gaps; and
(h) Allocates resources based on strategies to improve performance.
(4) A school district quality management, accountability, and
performance system shall include but is not limited to the following
quality indicators:
(a) Student scores on the Washington assessment of student
learning;
(b) High school completion and dropout rates;
(c) Employment and wage rates for high school graduates for three
years after graduation; and
(d) Participation in postsecondary education for high school
graduates for three years after graduation.
(5) Each school district shall conduct a yearly assessment of its
quality management, accountability, and performance system.
(6) Each school district shall report annually to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction on the quality indicators under
subsection (4) of this section. The reports shall be included on the
school district's and the superintendent's web sites.
(7) Starting no later than 2009, and at least once every three
years thereafter, each school district shall apply to the Washington
quality award council under RCW 43.06.335 for an independent assessment
of its quality management, accountability, and performance system. The
purpose of the assessment is to recognize best practices and identify
improvement opportunities.

--- END ---