BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.58.010 and 1987 c 128 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner may reimburse the secretary of the department
of housing and urban development under the provisions of Section
1223(a)(1) of the Urban Property Protection and Reinsurance Act of 1968
(Public Law 90-448) for losses reinsured by the secretary of the
department of housing and urban development and occurring in this state
on or after August 1, 1968. After receipt by the state treasurer of a
statement requesting reimbursement from the secretary of the department
of housing and urban development and upon certification promptly made
by the commissioner of insurance, hereafter referred to as the
commissioner, of the correctness of the amount thereof, the
commissioner is hereby authorized to provide for an assessment upon
insurers authorized to do business in this state in amounts sufficient
to pay reimbursement to the secretary of the department of housing and
urban development: PROVIDED, That the amount assessed each insurer
shall be in the same proportion that the premiums written by each
insurer in this state bear to the aggregate premiums written in this
state by all insurance companies on those lines for which reinsurance
was available in this state from the secretary of the department of
housing and urban development during the preceding calendar year.
(2) In the event any insurer fails, by reason of insolvency, to pay
any assessment as provided herein, the amount assessed each insurer, as
computed under subsection (1) of this section, shall be immediately
recalculated excluding therefrom the insolvent insurer so that its
assessment is, in effect, assumed and redistributed among the remaining
insurers.
(3) When assessments as provided herein are made, the individual
insurer, after having paid the full amount assessed against the
insurer, may deduct from future premium tax liabilities an amount not
to exceed twenty percent per annum until such deductions equal the
amount of the assessment levied against the insurer.
(4) This section shall cease to be of any force and effect upon
termination of the Urban Property Protection and Reinsurance Act of
1968 (Public Law 90-448), except that obligations incurred pursuant to
the provisions of this section shall not be impaired by the expiration
of the same.
(5) Notwithstanding the termination of the Urban Property
Protection and Reinsurance Act of 1968 (Public Law 90-448), the
commissioner is ((authorized)) required to continue in force the
program developed in response to that act, the Washington essential
property insurance inspection and placement program, in order to
provide essential property insurance within the state where it cannot
be obtained through the normal insurance market. The Washington
essential property insurance inspection and placement program must
apply to all counties within Washington state.

--- END ---