BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.47.060 and 2004 c 192 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator has the following powers and duties:
(1)(a) To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered
basic health care services, including physician services, inpatient and
outpatient hospital services, prescription drugs and medications, and
other services that may be necessary for basic health care. In
addition, the administrator may, to the extent that funds are
available, offer as basic health plan services chemical dependency
services, mental health services, and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services
shall increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by
more than five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office
of financial management. All subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in
any participating managed health care system under the Washington basic
health plan shall be entitled to receive covered basic health care
services in return for premium payments to the plan. The schedule of
services shall emphasize proven preventive and primary health care and
shall include all services necessary for prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care. However, with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees
who are eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal services through the
medical assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator
shall not contract for such services except to the extent that such
services are necessary over not more than a one-month period in order
to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the
managed care provider. The schedule of services shall also include a
separate schedule of basic health care services for children, eighteen
years of age and younger, for those subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees who choose to secure basic coverage through the plan only for
their dependent children. In designing and revising the schedule of
services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines for assessing
health services under the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW 48.47.030,
and such other factors as the administrator deems appropriate.
(b) To the extent that the administrator adopts, by rule,
preexisting condition limitations as part of the benefit package, any
such rule must allow an enrollee to credit a period of continued
participation in a community-based program established to provide
access to health services for uninsured persons against the time period
of their preexisting conditions limitation. To receive a credit
against a preexisting condition limitation period, the enrollee must
have continuously participated in the community-based program for at
least three months before submitting a basic health plan application.
For the purposes of this subsection, "community-based program
established to provide access to health services to uninsured persons"
means a program that enrolls low-income uninsured persons for a defined
period of time, and refers those persons to health care providers and
facilities who have agreed to provide primary care, specialty care, and
other health services needed to address the person's health care needs
without compensation or expectation of compensation to persons enrolled
in the program.
(2)(a) To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due
the administrator from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross
family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and the
ages of all family members. The enrollment of children shall not
require the enrollment of their parent or parents who are eligible for
the plan. The structure of periodic premiums shall be applied to
subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals pursuant to
subsection (11) of this section and to the share of the cost of the
plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees
pursuant to subsection (12) of this section.
(b) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees
shall be in an amount equal to the cost charged by the managed health
care system provider to the state for the plan plus the administrative
cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under
RCW 48.14.0201.
(c) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. Premiums due from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees must be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to
the state for the plan, plus the administrative cost of providing the
plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201. The
administrator will consider the impact of eligibility determination by
the appropriate federal agency designated by the Trade Act of 2002
(P.L. 107-210) as well as the premium collection and remittance
activities by the United States internal revenue service when
determining the administrative cost charged for health coverage tax
credit eligible enrollees.
(d) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior
approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other
amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by
arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the
administrator. The administrator shall establish a mechanism for
receiving premium payments from the United States internal revenue
service for health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees.
(e) To develop, as an offering by every health carrier providing
coverage identical to the basic health plan, as configured on January
1, 2001, a basic health plan model plan with uniformity in enrollee
cost-sharing requirements.
(3) To evaluate, with the cooperation of participating managed
health care system providers, the impact on the basic health plan of
enrolling health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The
administrator shall issue to the appropriate committees of the
legislature preliminary evaluations on June 1, 2005, and January 1,
2006, and a final evaluation by June 1, 2006. The evaluation shall
address the number of persons enrolled, the duration of their
enrollment, their utilization of covered services relative to other
basic health plan enrollees, and the extent to which their enrollment
contributed to any change in the cost of the basic health plan.
(4) To end the participation of health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees in the basic health plan if the federal government reduces or
terminates premium payments on their behalf through the United States
internal revenue service.
(5) To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing
due a managed health care system from subsidized, nonsubsidized, and
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The structure shall
discourage inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care services,
and may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing
mechanisms, but shall not be so costly to enrollees as to constitute a
barrier to appropriate utilization of necessary health care services.
(6) To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as
to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes.
Whenever the administrator finds that there is danger of such an
overexpenditure, the administrator shall close enrollment until the
administrator finds the danger no longer exists. Such a closure does
not apply to health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees who receive
a premium subsidy from the United States internal revenue service as
long as the enrollees qualify for the health coverage tax credit
program.
(7) To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as
defined in RCW 70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who
qualify may be based on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the
administrator.
(8) To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery
of services and availability of the plan to residents of the state,
subject to the limitations contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act
appropriating funds for the plan.
(9) To solicit and accept applications from managed health care
systems, as defined in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic
health care providers under the plan for subsidized enrollees,
nonsubsidized enrollees, or health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees. The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered
basic health care services are available to any enrollee of the plan
from among a selection of two or more participating managed health care
systems. In adopting any rules or procedures applicable to managed
health care systems and in its dealings with such systems, the
administrator shall consider and make suitable allowance for the need
for health care services and the differences in local availability of
health care resources, along with other resources, within and among the
several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed
health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who
become eligible for medical assistance may, at their option, continue
to receive services from their existing providers within the managed
health care system if such providers have entered into provider
agreements with the department of social and health services.
(10) To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized,
nonsubsidized, and health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees,
deposit them in the basic health plan operating account, keep records
of enrollee status, and authorize periodic payments to managed health
care systems on the basis of the number of enrollees participating in
the respective managed health care systems.
(11) To accept applications from individuals residing in areas
served by the plan, on behalf of themselves and their spouses and
dependent children, for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan
as subsidized, nonsubsidized, or health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees, to establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for
enrollees as may be necessary, and to determine, upon application and
on a reasonable schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of
any enrollee, eligibility due to current gross family income for
sliding scale premiums. Funds received by a family as part of
participation in the adoption support program authorized under RCW
26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall not be counted toward
a family's current gross family income for the purposes of this
chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income or income changes
accurately, the administrator shall have the authority either to bill
the enrollee for the amounts overpaid by the state or to impose civil
penalties of up to two hundred percent of the amount of subsidy
overpaid due to the enrollee incorrectly reporting income. The
administrator shall adopt rules to define the appropriate application
of these sanctions and the processes to implement the sanctions
provided in this subsection, within available resources. No subsidy
may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current gross family
income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW
70.47.110, who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care
services under chapter 74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their
enrollment for no apparent good cause, the administrator may establish
appropriate rules or requirements that are applicable to such
individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in the plan.
(12) To accept applications from business owners on behalf of
themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent children, as
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in an area served by
the plan. The administrator may require all or the substantial
majority of the eligible employees of such businesses to enroll in the
plan and establish those procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly
enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed health care system.
The administrator may require that a business owner pay at least an
amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its portion
of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for
medicare who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic
health care coverage and services from a managed care system
participating in the plan. The administrator shall adjust the amount
determined to be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees whenever
the amount negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed health care system or systems is modified or the administrative
cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.
(13) To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed
health care system in return for the provision of covered basic health
care services to enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of
covered basic health care services will be the same or actuarially
equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates negotiated with
participating managed health care systems may vary among the systems.
In negotiating rates with participating systems, the administrator
shall consider the characteristics of the populations served by the
respective systems, economic circumstances of the local area, the need
to conserve the resources of the basic health plan trust account, and
other factors the administrator finds relevant.
(14) To monitor the provision of covered services to enrollees by
participating managed health care systems in order to assure enrollee
access to good quality basic health care, to require periodic data
reports concerning the utilization of health care services rendered to
enrollees in order to provide adequate information for evaluation, and
to inspect the books and records of participating managed health care
systems to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter. In
requiring reports from participating managed health care systems,
including data on services rendered enrollees, the administrator shall
endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed health care systems and
to the plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such reporting
requirements with other state agencies, such as the insurance
commissioner and the department of health, to minimize duplication of
effort.
(15) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private employer-based health care coverage and to take appropriate measures consistent
with state and federal statutes that will discourage the reduction of
such coverage in the state.
(16) To develop a program of proven preventive health measures and
to integrate it into the plan wherever possible and consistent with
this chapter.
(17) To provide, consistent with available funding, assistance for
rural residents, underserved populations, and persons of color.
(18) In consultation with appropriate state and local government
agencies, to establish criteria defining eligibility for persons
confined or residing in government-operated institutions.
(19) To administer the premium discounts provided under RCW
48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii) pursuant to a contract with the Washington
state health insurance pool.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The administrator shall provide a report on
the impacts of section 1 of this act to the governor and the health
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on or before November
15, 2009. Issues addressed in the report must include, but are not
limited to:
(1) The number of persons who have enrolled in the basic health
plan following a period of participation in a community-based program
established to provide access to health services for uninsured persons;
(2) The average number of months of credit that have been applied
to the preexisting condition waiting period for persons who enrolled in
the basic health plan following a period of participation in a
community-based program established to provide access to health
services for uninsured persons;
(3) The health services utilization and costs associated with
persons who enrolled in the basic health plan following a period of
participation in a community-based program established to provide
access to health services for uninsured persons, as compared to health
services utilization and costs associated with other basic health plan
enrollees; and
(4) The overall cost impact, if any, on basic health plan rates
that can be attributed to providing credits against preexisting
conditions limitations for persons who enrolled in the basic health
plan following a period of participation in a community-based program
established to provide access to health services for uninsured persons.

--- END ---