BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is
compelling evidence demonstrating that infants and young children who
experience high-quality early care and learning programs are more self-confident and have better language skills, a greater ability to
regulate their behavior, and more advanced cognitive developments.
These outcomes are inextricably linked to school readiness and a
child's overall success in school and beyond. The legislature finds
also that there has been an increase in the manifestation of
significant emotional and behavioral problems of children in preschool
and other early childhood settings. Growing numbers of young children
are being expelled from child-care settings because their behaviors
create additional responsibilities for caregivers who may not have
adequate support or training to appropriately manage the challenges
presented by such behaviors. The legislature finds further that
children's behavioral and mental health is critical to school readiness
and when left untreated, behavioral and mental health issues create the
potential of significant damage and life-long consequences. The
legislature finds that behavioral and mental health consultation in
child-care settings can provide information, education, and support for
caregivers, administrators, and parents to enable them to identify and
work more effectively with children presenting difficult behaviors or
other challenges. The legislature intends to promote the integration
of behavioral and mental health services into early care and education
settings as a means of early intervention to prevent more serious,
long-term consequences and to promote quality child care continuity and
school readiness for more children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The child care mental health
consultation pilot program is established. The pilot program shall be
administered by the department of early learning or, if the cabinet-level department of early learning is not established by the effective
date of this act, by the division of child care and early learning
within the department of social and health services. The pilot program
shall promote the integration of research-based and best practices for
infants and young children presenting behavioral concerns into the
child-care setting through a collaborative approach to supporting
children and their families.
(2) The pilot program shall consist of at least two communities
selected by the administering agency on the basis of need as determined
by:
(a) The relative availability or unavailability of comparable
services locally; and
(b) The risk factors in the community, including but not limited
to, elevated child-care expulsion rates, poverty, homelessness,
uninsured families or children, child abuse or neglect, parental mental
illness or chemical dependency, adolescent parents, community violence,
and limited support services.
(3) Funding shall be contracted to the local child-care resource
and referral network, public health department, or another community-based organization with knowledge or expertise in child development and
child-care programs. Contracted agencies shall be responsible for:
(a) Coordinating with the community to develop a program model
consistent with the legislative intent in section 1 of this act and the
description of program structure in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) Hiring mental health consultants knowledgeable in infant and
early childhood development;
(c) Supervising the work of mental health consultants;
(d) Responding to requests from providers for consultation
services;
(e) Maintaining information required for evaluation of program
outcomes;
(f) Managing funds;
(g) Ensuring equitable access to services for all child-care
providers in the community; and
(h) Reporting to the administering agency which shall brief the
appropriate committees of the legislature.
(4) The pilot program shall provide a structure for mental health
consultants to:
(a) Consult with caregivers on-site or with case management teams
around solving specific problems with an individual child or family;
(b) Observe children in the child-care setting to assess
functioning relationships with peers and caregivers, and the
appropriateness of the setting and program for the child's needs;
(c) Meet on-site or at home with parents to gather and share
information and provide developmental guidance and referrals, including
but not limited to referrals to clinical services and other services
for families and children;
(d) Provide support and guidance to child-care staff to promote the
behavioral health and well-being of infants and young children in their
care through structured opportunities for training, team building,
communication, and problem solving that is person-centered and
strengths-based; and
(e) Coordinate with specialists in public health, infant and
toddler early intervention, infant mental health, and others involved
with the care and well-being of young children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire July 1,
2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---