BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For offenders convicted of a violent offense, the upper limit
of the standard sentencing range shall be advisory only. However,
without limiting the sentencing discretion of the judge, in cases in
which the prosecutor seeks an aggravated sentence, the prosecutor must
assert a statutory aggravating factor. Notwithstanding any other law,
the maximum sentence that a court may impose for a violent offense
where the lower limit of the standard sentencing range is more than
twelve months is the maximum sentence for the current offense under
chapter 9A.20 RCW, or twice the upper limit of the standard sentencing
range, whichever is less; the maximum sentence that a court may impose
for all other violent offenses is twice the upper limit of the standard
range or twelve months, whichever is less. This provision shall not
apply to any offender sentenced under RCW 9.94A.712.
(2) In making its determination of the sentence length to be
imposed, the court shall consider the risk assessment prepared by the
department of corrections, the presentence report, and other materials
provided by the offender, and any information provided by the victim or
victims of the crime.
(3) A sentence imposed under this section shall be a determinate
sentence unless it is imposed on an offender sentenced under RCW
9.94A.712. The sentence may be appealed by the offender or the state
as set forth in RCW 9.94A.585 (2) through (6).

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.480 and 2002 c 290 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A current, newly created or reworked judgment and sentence
document for each felony sentencing shall record any and all
recommended sentencing agreements or plea agreements and the sentences
for any and all felony crimes kept as public records under RCW
9.94A.475 shall contain the clearly printed name and legal signature of
the sentencing judge. The judgment and sentence document as defined in
this section shall also provide additional space for the sentencing
judge's reasons, if any, for going either above or below the
presumptive or advisory sentence range for any and all felony crimes
covered as public records under RCW 9.94A.475. Both the sentencing
judge and the prosecuting attorney's office shall each retain or
receive a completed copy of each sentencing document as defined in this
section for their own records.
(2) The sentencing guidelines commission shall be sent a completed
copy of the judgment and sentence document upon conviction for each
felony sentencing under subsection (1) of this section and shall
compile a yearly and cumulative judicial record of each sentencing
judge in regards to his or her sentencing practices for any and all
felony crimes involving:
(a) Any violent offense as defined in this chapter;
(b) Any most serious offense as defined in this chapter;
(c) Any felony with any deadly weapon special verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(d) Any felony with any deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both; and/or
(e) The felony crimes of possession of a machine gun, possessing a
stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful
possession of a firearm in the first or second degree, and/or use of a
machine gun in a felony.
(3) The sentencing guidelines commission shall compare each
individual judge's sentencing practices to the standard ((or)),
presumptive, or advisory sentence range for any and all felony crimes
listed in subsection (2) of this section for the appropriate offense
level as defined in RCW 9.94A.515 or 9.94A.518, offender score as
defined in RCW 9.94A.525, and any applicable deadly weapon enhancements
as defined in RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both. These comparative
records shall be retained and made available to the public for review
in a current, newly created or reworked official published document by
the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) Any and all felony sentences which are either above or below
the standard ((or)), presumptive, or advisory sentence range in
subsection (3) of this section shall also mark whether the prosecuting
attorney in the case also recommended a similar sentence, if any, which
was either above or below the standard, presumptive, or advisory
sentence range and shall also indicate if the sentence was in
conjunction with an approved alternative sentencing option including a
first-time offender waiver, sex offender sentencing alternative, or
other prescribed sentencing option.
(5) If any completed judgment and sentence document as defined in
subsection (1) of this section is not sent to the sentencing guidelines
commission as required in subsection (2) of this section, the
sentencing guidelines commission shall have the authority and shall
undertake reasonable and necessary steps to assure that all past,
current, and future sentencing documents as defined in subsection (1)
of this section are received by the sentencing guidelines commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---