BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.60.040 and 1997 c 271 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Person" includes one or more individuals, partnerships,
associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives, legal
representatives, trustees and receivers, or any group of persons; it
includes any owner, lessee, proprietor, manager, agent, or employee,
whether one or more natural persons; and further includes any political
or civil subdivisions of the state and any agency or instrumentality of
the state or of any political or civil subdivision thereof;
(2) "Commission" means the Washington state human rights
commission;
(3) "Employer" includes any person acting in the interest of an
employer, directly or indirectly, who employs eight or more persons,
and does not include any religious or sectarian organization not
organized for private profit;
(4) "Employee" does not include any individual employed by his or
her parents, spouse, or child, or in the domestic service of any
person;
(5) "Labor organization" includes any organization which exists for
the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning
grievances or terms or conditions of employment, or for other mutual
aid or protection in connection with employment;
(6) "Employment agency" includes any person undertaking with or
without compensation to recruit, procure, refer, or place employees for
an employer;
(7) "Marital status" means the legal status of being married,
single, separated, divorced, or widowed;
(8) "National origin" includes "ancestry";
(9) "Full enjoyment of" includes the right to purchase any service,
commodity, or article of personal property offered or sold on, or by,
any establishment to the public, and the admission of any person to
accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of
public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, without acts
directly or indirectly causing persons of any particular race, creed,
color, sex, national origin, or with any sensory, mental, or physical
disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
disabled person, to be treated as not welcome, accepted, desired, or
solicited;
(10) "Any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or
amusement" includes, but is not limited to, any place, licensed or
unlicensed, kept for gain, hire, or reward, or where charges are made
for admission, service, occupancy, or use of any property or
facilities, whether conducted for the entertainment, housing, or
lodging of transient guests, or for the benefit, use, or accommodation
of those seeking health, recreation, or rest, or for the burial or
other disposition of human remains, or for the sale of goods,
merchandise, services, or personal property, or for the rendering of
personal services, or for public conveyance or transportation on land,
water, or in the air, including the stations and terminals thereof and
the garaging of vehicles, or where food or beverages of any kind are
sold for consumption on the premises, or where public amusement,
entertainment, sports, or recreation of any kind is offered with or
without charge, or where medical service or care is made available, or
where the public gathers, congregates, or assembles for amusement,
recreation, or public purposes, or public halls, public elevators, and
public washrooms of buildings and structures occupied by two or more
tenants, or by the owner and one or more tenants, or any public library
or educational institution, or schools of special instruction, or
nursery schools, or day care centers or children's camps: PROVIDED,
That nothing contained in this definition shall be construed to include
or apply to any institute, bona fide club, or place of accommodation,
which is by its nature distinctly private, including fraternal
organizations, though where public use is permitted that use shall be
covered by this chapter; nor shall anything contained in this
definition apply to any educational facility, columbarium, crematory,
mausoleum, or cemetery operated or maintained by a bona fide religious
or sectarian institution;
(11) "Real property" includes buildings, structures, dwellings,
real estate, lands, tenements, leaseholds, interests in real estate
cooperatives, condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and
incorporeal, or any interest therein;
(12) "Real estate transaction" includes the sale, appraisal,
brokering, exchange, purchase, rental, or lease of real property,
transacting or applying for a real estate loan, or the provision of
brokerage services;
(13) "Dwelling" means any building, structure, or portion thereof
that is occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a
residence by one or more families, and any vacant land that is offered
for sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of any such
building, structure, or portion thereof;
(14) "Sex" means gender;
(15) "Aggrieved person" means any person who: (a) Claims to have
been injured by an unfair practice in a real estate transaction; or (b)
believes that he or she will be injured by an unfair practice in a real
estate transaction that is about to occur;
(16) "Complainant" means the person who files a complaint in a real
estate transaction;
(17) "Respondent" means any person accused in a complaint or
amended complaint of an unfair practice in a real estate transaction;
(18) "Credit transaction" includes any open or closed end credit
transaction, whether in the nature of a loan, retail installment
transaction, credit card issue or charge, or otherwise, and whether for
personal or for business purposes, in which a service, finance, or
interest charge is imposed, or which provides for repayment in
scheduled payments, when such credit is extended in the regular course
of any trade or commerce, including but not limited to transactions by
banks, savings and loan associations or other financial lending
institutions of whatever nature, stock brokers, or by a merchant or
mercantile establishment which as part of its ordinary business permits
or provides that payment for purchases of property or service therefrom
may be deferred;
(19) "Families with children status" means one or more individuals
who have not attained the age of eighteen years being domiciled with a
parent or another person having legal custody of such individual or
individuals, or with the designee of such parent or other person having
such legal custody, with the written permission of such parent or other
person. Families with children status also applies to any person who
is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal custody of any
individual who has not attained the age of eighteen years;
(20) "Covered multifamily dwelling" means: (a) Buildings
consisting of four or more dwelling units if such buildings have one or
more elevators; and (b) ground floor dwelling units in other buildings
consisting of four or more dwelling units;
(21) "Premises" means the interior or exterior spaces, parts,
components, or elements of a building, including individual dwelling
units and the public and common use areas of a building;
(22) "Dog guide" means a dog that is trained or in training for the
purpose of guiding blind persons or a dog that is trained or in
training for the purpose of assisting hearing impaired persons;
(23) "Service animal" means an animal that is trained or in
training for the purpose of assisting or accommodating a disabled
person's sensory, mental, or physical disability.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.60.215 and 1997 c 271 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be an unfair practice for any person or the person's agent
or employee to commit an act which directly or indirectly results in
any distinction, restriction, or discrimination, or the requiring of
any person to pay a larger sum than the uniform rates charged other
persons, or the refusing or withholding from any person the admission,
patronage, custom, presence, frequenting, dwelling, staying, or lodging
in any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement,
except for conditions and limitations established by law and applicable
to all persons, regardless of race, creed, color, national origin, sex,
the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use
of a trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled person, or the
use of a dog guide in training or service animal in training by a
trainer: PROVIDED, That this section shall not be construed to require
structural changes, modifications, or additions to make any place
accessible to a disabled person except as otherwise required by law:
PROVIDED, That behavior or actions constituting a risk to property or
other persons can be grounds for refusal and shall not constitute an
unfair practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW
to read as follows:
A person using or training a dog guide or service animal in a place
of public accommodation is liable for any damages caused by the dog
guide or service animal to the place of public accommodation.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.84.020 and 1997 c 271 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of this chapter, the term "dog guide" means a dog
that is trained or in training for the purpose of guiding blind persons
or a dog trained or in training for the purpose of assisting hearing
impaired persons.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.84.021 and 1997 c 271 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of this chapter, "service animal" means an animal
that is trained or in training for the purposes of assisting or
accommodating a disabled person's sensory, mental, or physical
disability.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.84.060 and 1997 c 271 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any pedestrian who is not totally or
partially blind to use a white cane or any pedestrian who is not
totally or partially blind or is not hearing impaired, other than a dog
guide trainer, to use a dog guide or any pedestrian who is not
otherwise physically disabled, other than a service animal trainer, to
use a service animal in any of the places, accommodations, or
conveyances listed in RCW 70.84.010 for the purpose of securing the
rights and privileges accorded by the chapter to totally or partially
blind, hearing impaired, or otherwise physically disabled people.

--- END ---