BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.32.030 and 2003 c 282 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following practices, acts, and operations are excepted from the
operation of the provisions of this chapter:
(1) The rendering of dental relief in emergency cases in the
practice of his or her profession by a physician or surgeon, licensed
as such and registered under the laws of this state, unless the
physician or surgeon undertakes to or does reproduce lost parts of the
human teeth in the mouth or to restore or to replace in the human mouth
lost or missing teeth;
(2) The practice of dentistry in the discharge of official duties
by dentists in the United States federal services on federal
reservations, including but not limited to the armed services, coast
guard, public health service, veterans' bureau, or bureau of Indian
affairs;
(3) Dental schools or colleges approved under RCW 18.32.040, and
the practice of dentistry by students in accredited dental schools or
colleges approved by the commission, when acting under the direction
and supervision of a Washington state-licensed dentist who is a member
of a dental school faculty;
(4) The practice of dentistry by licensed dentists of other states
or countries while appearing as clinicians at meetings of the
Washington state dental association, or component parts thereof, or at
meetings sanctioned by them, or other groups approved by the
commission;
(5) The use of roentgen and other rays for making radiographs or
similar records of dental or oral tissues, under the supervision of a
licensed dentist or physician;
(6) The making, repairing, altering, or supplying of artificial
restorations, substitutions, appliances, or materials for the
correction of disease, loss, deformity, malposition, dislocation,
fracture, injury to the jaws, teeth, lips, gums, cheeks, palate, or
associated tissues or parts; providing the same are made, repaired,
altered, or supplied pursuant to the written instructions and order of
a licensed dentist which may be accompanied by casts, models, or
impressions furnished by the dentist, and the prescriptions shall be
retained and filed for a period of not less than three years and shall
be available to and subject to the examination of the secretary or the
secretary's authorized representatives;
(7) The removal of deposits and stains from the surfaces of the
teeth, the application of topical preventative or prophylactic agents,
and the polishing and smoothing of restorations, when performed or
prescribed by a dental hygienist licensed under the laws of this state;
(8) A qualified and licensed physician and surgeon or osteopathic
physician and surgeon extracting teeth or performing oral surgery
pursuant to the scope of practice under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW;
(9) The performing of dental operations or services by persons not
licensed under this chapter when performed under the supervision of a
licensed dentist: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That such nonlicensed person shall
in no event perform the following dental operations or services unless
permitted to be performed by the person under this chapter or chapters
18.29, 18.57, 18.71, and 18.79 RCW as it applies to registered nurses
and advanced registered nurse practitioners:
(a) Any removal of or addition to the hard or soft tissue of the
oral cavity;
(b) Any diagnosis of or prescription for treatment of disease,
pain, deformity, deficiency, injury, or physical condition of the human
teeth or jaws, or adjacent structure;
(c) Any administration of general or injected local anaesthetic of
any nature in connection with a dental operation, including intravenous
sedation;
(d) Any oral prophylaxis;
(e) The taking of any impressions of the teeth or jaw or the
relationships of the teeth or jaws, for the purpose of fabricating any
intra-oral restoration, appliance, or prosthesis.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.32.215 and 2003 c 57 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant holding a valid license and currently engaged in
practice in another state may be granted a license without examination
required by this chapter, on the payment of any required fees, if the
applicant is a graduate of a dental college, school, or dental
department of an institution approved by the commission under RCW
18.32.040(1). The commission may also require the applicant to: (1)
File with the commission documentation certifying the applicant is
licensed to practice in another state; and (2) provide information as
the commission deems necessary pertaining to the conditions and
criteria of the Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW, and to
demonstrate to the commission a knowledge of Washington law pertaining
to the practice of dentistry. Dentists applying for licensure without
examination, who were licensed by a state prior to Washington's
requirement to pass the national board dental examination, are exempted
from any requirement to take and pass this examination. "Currently
engaged in practice" shall mean engaged in clinical practice no less
than two of the last three years for a minimum of two hundred eighty-eight hours per year.

--- END ---