BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In recognition of the complex issues that
are raised by the addition of specialty hospitals in communities
throughout the nation, the federal government established an eighteen-month moratorium that effectively prevented the establishment of any
new physician-owned specialty hospitals reimbursed under medicare and
other federal health programs. During the moratorium several federal
agencies and private research organizations reviewed the potential
impacts of these types of hospitals on the health care system. Among
the recommendations, the medicare payment advisory commission urged the
continuation of the federal moratorium through January 1, 2007.
In Washington state a task force has been convened to review the
certificate of need program and report to the legislature by November
2006. This task force will be providing recommendations on several
topics specific to Washington state's certificate of need program
including the appropriate coverage of specialty hospitals under the
program. The legislature finds that it would be premature to take any
action with respect to the regulation of specialty hospitals before the
issuance of the task force report.

Sec. 2 2005 c 39 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) From January 1, 2005, until July 1, ((2006)) 2007, no specialty
hospital in which a physician, or an immediate family member of a
physician, has an ownership or investment interest shall be granted a
license under chapter 70.41 RCW.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Specialty hospital" means a subclass of hospital that is
primarily or exclusively engaged in the care and treatment of one of
the following categories: (i) Patients with a cardiac condition; (ii)
patients with an orthopedic condition; (iii) patients receiving a
surgical procedure; and (iv) any other specialized category of services
that the secretary of health and human services designates as a
specialty hospital.
(b) An ownership or investment interest in a specialty hospital may
be through equity, debt, or other means and includes an interest in an
entity that holds an ownership or investment interest in a specialty
hospital.

Sec. 3 2005 c 39 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
This act expires July 1, ((2006)) 2007.

--- END ---