BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.010 and 2005 c 213 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a traffic infraction for any person to drive or move, or
for ((the)) a vehicle owner to cause or knowingly permit to be driven
or moved, on any highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles
((which)) that:
(a) Is in such unsafe condition as to endanger any person((, or
which does not contain those parts or));
(b) Is not at all times equipped with such lamps and other
equipment in proper working condition and adjustment as required ((in))
by this chapter or ((in regulations)) by rules issued by ((the chief
of)) the Washington state patrol((, or which is equipped in any
manner));
(c) Contains any parts in violation of this chapter or ((the state
patrol's regulations, or)) rules issued by the Washington state patrol.
(2) It is a traffic infraction for any person to do any act
forbidden or fail to perform any act required under this chapter or
((the state patrol's regulations)) rules issued by the Washington state
patrol.
(((2))) (3) Nothing contained in this chapter or the state patrol's
regulations shall be construed to prohibit the use of additional parts
and accessories on any vehicle not inconsistent with the provisions of
this chapter or the state patrol's regulations.
(((3))) (4) The provisions of the chapter and the state patrol's
regulations with respect to equipment on vehicles shall not apply to
implements of husbandry, road machinery, road rollers, or farm tractors
except as herein made applicable.
(((4))) (5) No owner or operator of a farm tractor, self-propelled
unit of farm equipment, or implement of husbandry shall be guilty of a
crime or subject to penalty for violation of RCW 46.37.160 as now or
hereafter amended unless such violation occurs on a public highway.
(((5))) (6) It is a traffic infraction for any person to sell or
offer for sale vehicle equipment which is required to be approved by
the state patrol as prescribed in RCW 46.37.005 unless it has been
approved by the state patrol.
(((6))) (7) The provisions of this chapter with respect to
equipment required on vehicles shall not apply to motorcycles or motor-driven cycles except as herein made applicable.
(((7))) (8) This chapter does not apply to off-road vehicles used
on nonhighway roads.
(((8))) (9) This chapter does not apply to vehicles used by the
state parks and recreation commission exclusively for park maintenance
and operations upon public highways within state parks.
(((9))) (10) Notices of traffic infraction issued to commercial
drivers under the provisions of this chapter with respect to equipment
required on commercial motor vehicles shall not be considered for
driver improvement purposes under chapter 46.20 RCW.
(((10))) (11) Whenever a traffic infraction is chargeable to the
owner or lessee of a vehicle under subsection (1) of this section, the
driver shall not be arrested or issued a notice of traffic infraction
unless the vehicle is registered in a jurisdiction other than
Washington state, or unless the infraction is for an offense that is
clearly within the responsibility of the driver.
(((11))) (12) Whenever the owner or lessee is issued a notice of
traffic infraction under this section the court may, on the request of
the owner or lessee, take appropriate steps to make the driver of the
vehicle, or any other person who directs the loading, maintenance, or
operation of the vehicle, a codefendant. If the codefendant is held
solely responsible and is found to have committed the traffic
infraction, the court may dismiss the notice against the owner or
lessee.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.37.070 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) After January 1, 1964, every motor vehicle, trailer,
semitrailer, and pole trailer shall be equipped with two or more stop
lamps meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.200, except that passenger
cars manufactured or assembled prior to January 1, 1964, shall be
equipped with at least one such stop lamp. On a combination of
vehicles, only the stop lamps on the rearmost vehicle need actually be
seen from the distance specified in RCW 46.37.200(1).
(2) After January 1, 1960, every motor vehicle, trailer,
semitrailer and pole trailer shall be equipped with electric turn
signal lamps meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.200(2), except that
passenger cars, trailers, semitrailers, pole trailers, and trucks less
than eighty inches in width, manufactured or assembled prior to January
1, 1953, need not be equipped with electric turn signal lamps.
(3) Every passenger car manufactured or assembled after September
1, 1985; and every passenger truck, passenger van, or passenger sports
utility vehicle manufactured or assembled after September 1, 1993, must
be equipped with a rear center high-mounted stop lamp meeting the
requirements of RCW 46.37.200(3).

Sec. 3 RCW 46.37.200 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 17 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Any vehicle may be equipped and when required under this
chapter shall be equipped with a stop lamp or lamps on the rear of the
vehicle which shall display a red or amber light, or any shade of color
between red and amber, visible from a distance of not less than one
hundred feet and on any vehicle manufactured or assembled after January
1, 1964, three hundred feet to the rear in normal sunlight, and which
shall be actuated upon application of a service brake, and which may
but need not be incorporated with one or more other rear lamps.
(2) Any vehicle may be equipped and when required under RCW
46.37.070(2) shall be equipped with electric turn signals which shall
indicate an intention to turn by flashing lights showing to the front
and rear of a vehicle or on a combination of vehicles on the side of
the vehicle or combination toward which the turn is to be made. The
lamps showing to the front shall be mounted on the same level and as
widely spaced laterally as practicable and, when signaling, shall emit
amber light: PROVIDED, That on any vehicle manufactured prior to
January 1, 1969, the lamps showing to the front may emit white or amber
light, or any shade of light between white and amber. The lamp showing
to the rear shall be mounted on the same level and as widely spaced
laterally as practicable, and, when signaling, shall emit a red or
amber light, or any shade of color between red and amber. Turn signal
lamps shall be visible from a distance of not less than five hundred
feet to the front and rear in normal sunlight. Turn signal lamps may,
but need not be, incorporated in other lamps on the vehicle.
(3) Any vehicle may be equipped and when required under this
chapter shall be equipped with a center high-mounted stop lamp mounted
on the center line of the rear of the vehicle. These stop lamps shall
display a red light visible from a distance of not less than three
hundred feet to the rear in normal sunlight, and shall be actuated upon
application of a service brake, and may not be incorporated with any
other rear lamps.

--- END ---