BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
computer hardware, computer peripherals, or software, not otherwise
eligible for exemption under RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.08.975, used
primarily in the development, design, and engineering of commercial
airplanes or components of such airplanes, or to sales of or charges
made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing the
computer hardware, computer peripherals, or software. The exemption is
available only when the buyer provides the seller with an exemption
certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Commercial airplane" and "component" have the meanings in RCW
82.32.550.
(b) "Peripherals" includes keyboards, monitors, mouse devices, and
other accessories that operate outside of the computer, excluding
cables, conduit, wiring, and other similar property.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of computer hardware, computer peripherals, or software, not
otherwise eligible for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565 or 82.12.975,
used primarily in the development, design, and engineering of
commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes, or to the use of
labor and services rendered in respect to installing the computer
hardware, computer peripherals, or software.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Commercial airplane" and "component" have the meanings in RCW
82.32.550.
(b) "Peripherals" includes keyboards, monitors, mouse devices, and
other accessories that operate outside of the computer, excluding
cables, conduit, wiring, and other similar property.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person for qualified preproduction development
expenditures occurring after the effective date of this section.
(2) The credit is equal to the amount of qualified preproduction
development expenditures of a person, multiplied by the rate of 1.5
percent.
(3) The credit shall be taken against taxes due for the same
calendar year in which the qualified preproduction development
expenditures are incurred. Credits may not be carried over. The
credit for each calendar year may not exceed the amount of tax
otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year. Refunds may
not be granted in the place of a credit.
(4) Any person entitled to the credit in this section as a result
of qualified preproduction development conducted under contract may
assign all or any portion of the credit to the person contracting for
the performance of the qualified preproduction development.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Aeronautics" means the study of flight and the science of
building and operating commercial aircraft.
(b) "Preproduction development" means research, design, and
engineering activities performed in relation to the development of a
product, product line, model, or model derivative, including prototype
development, testing, and certification. The term includes the
discovery of technological information, the translating of
technological information into new or improved products, processes,
techniques, formulas, or inventions, and the adaptation of existing
products and models into new products or new models, or derivatives of
products or models. The term does not include manufacturing activities
or other production-oriented activities. The term does not include
surveys and studies, social science and humanities research, market
research or testing, quality control, sale promotion and service,
computer software developed for internal use, and research in areas
such as improved style, taste, and seasonal design.
(c) "Qualified preproduction development" means preproduction
development performed within this state in the field of aeronautics.
(d) "Qualified preproduction development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined by the department, benefits,
supplies, and computer expenses, directly incurred in qualified
preproduction development by a person claiming the credit provided in
this section. The term does not include amounts paid to a person other
than a public educational or research institution to conduct qualified
preproduction development. The term does not include capital costs and
overhead, such as expenses for land, structures, or depreciable
property.
(6) Credit may not be claimed for expenditures for which a credit
is claimed under RCW 82.04.4452 or 82.04.4461.
(7) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person claiming the credit under section 3 of this act
shall file a complete annual survey with the department. The survey is
due by March 31st following any year in which a credit is claimed. The
department may extend the due date for timely filing of annual surveys
under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590. The survey shall
include the amount of the tax credit claimed, the qualified
preproduction development expenditures during the calendar year for
which the credit is claimed, whether the credit has been assigned under
section 3(4) of this act and who assigned the credit, the number of new
products or research projects by general classification, and the number
of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with the qualified
preproduction development activities for which a credit was claimed.
The survey shall also include the following information for employment
positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(b) As part of the annual survey, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the tax credit program.
(c) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the tax credit claimed, is deemed taxpayer information under RCW
82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax credit claimed is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request, except as provided in (d) of this
subsection. If the amount of the tax credit as reported on the survey
is different than the amount actually claimed on the taxpayer's tax
returns or otherwise allowed by the department, the amount actually
claimed or allowed may be disclosed.
(d) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax credit claimed on
the taxpayer's returns or otherwise allowed by the department is less
than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the survey may
request the department to treat the tax credit amount as confidential
under RCW 82.32.330.
(3) If a person fails to submit a complete annual survey under
subsection (2) of this section by the due date or any extension under
RCW 82.32.590, the department shall declare the amount of taxes against
which a credit was claimed for that year to be immediately due and
payable. The department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on
the taxes against which the credit was claimed. Interest shall be
assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under this
chapter, retroactively to the date the credit was claimed, and shall
accrue until the taxes against which the credit was claimed are repaid.
(4) The department shall use the information from the annual survey
required under subsection (2) of this section to prepare summary
descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than three taxpayers
shall be included in any category. The department shall report these
statistics to the legislature each year by September 1st.
(5) In conjunction with the reports due under RCW 82.32.545, by
November 1, 2010, and November 1, 2023, the fiscal committees of the
house of representatives and the senate, in consultation with the
department, shall report to the legislature on the effectiveness of the
credit authorized in section 3 of this act in regard to keeping
Washington competitive. The report shall measure the effect of the
credit authorized in section 3 of this act on job retention, net jobs
created for Washington residents, company growth, diversification of
the state's economy, cluster dynamics, and other factors as the
committees select. The reports shall include a discussion of
principles to apply in evaluating whether the legislature should
reenact the credit authorized in section 3 of this act.
(6) A person who is subject to the requirements in RCW 82.32.545 is
not required to file a complete annual survey under this section if the
person timely files the annual report required by RCW 82.32.545.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.04.250 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person ((except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260
(5) or (13), 82.04.272, or subsection (2) of this section)) engaging
within this state in the business of making sales at retail, except
persons taxable as retailers under other provisions of this chapter, as
to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by
the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (11) or
subsection (3) of this section, as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(3) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, that is classified by the federal aviation administration
as a FAR part 145 certificated repair station with airframe and
instrument ratings and limited ratings for nondestructive testing,
radio, Class 3 Accessory, and specialized services, as to such persons,
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
gross proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of
.2904 percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources, the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who reports taxes under RCW 82.04.250(3) shall file
a complete annual survey with the department. The survey is due by
March 31st following any year in which a person reports taxes under RCW
82.04.250(3). The department may extend the due date for timely filing
of annual surveys under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590. The
survey shall include the amount of tax reduced under the preferential
rate in RCW 82.04.250(3). The survey shall also include the following
information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(b) As part of the annual survey, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the preferential tax rate in RCW
82.04.250(3).
(c) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the tax reduced under the preferential rate in RCW 82.04.250(3), is
deemed taxpayer information under RCW 82.32.330. Information on the
amount of tax reduced is not subject to the confidentiality provisions
of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request,
except as provided in (d) of this subsection. If the amount of the tax
reduced as reported on the survey is different than the amount actually
reduced based on the taxpayer's excise tax returns or otherwise allowed
by the department, the amount actually reduced may be disclosed.
(d) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax reduction is less
than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the survey may
request the department to treat the amount of the tax reduction as
confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(3) If a person fails to submit a complete annual survey under
subsection (2) of this section by the due date or any extension under
RCW 82.32.590, the department shall declare the amount of taxes reduced
under the preferential rate in RCW 82.04.250(3) for that year to be
immediately due and payable. The department shall assess interest, but
not penalties, on the taxes. Interest shall be assessed at the rate
provided for delinquent excise taxes under this chapter, retroactively
to the date the reduced taxes were due, and shall accrue until the
amount of the reduced taxes is repaid.
(4) The department shall use the information from the annual survey
required under subsection (2) of this section to prepare summary
descriptive statistics by category. The department shall report these
statistics to the legislature each year by September 1st.
(5) By November 1, 2010, the fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and the senate, in consultation with the department,
shall report to the legislature on the effectiveness of the
preferential tax rate provided in RCW 82.04.250(3) in regard to keeping
Washington competitive. The report shall measure the effect of the
preferential tax rate provided in RCW 82.04.250(3) on job retention,
net jobs created for Washington residents, company growth,
diversification of the state's economy, cluster dynamics, and other
factors as the committees select. The report shall include a
discussion of principles to apply in evaluating whether the legislature
should extend the preferential tax rate provided in RCW 82.04.250(3).
(6) This section expires December 31, 2012.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.32.330 and 2005 c 326 s 1 and 2005 c 274 s 361 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Disclose" means to make known to any person in any manner
whatever a return or tax information;
(b) "Return" means a tax or information return or claim for refund
required by, or provided for or permitted under, the laws of this state
which is filed with the department of revenue by, on behalf of, or with
respect to a person, and any amendment or supplement thereto, including
supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are supplemental to,
or part of, the return so filed;
(c) "Tax information" means (i) a taxpayer's identity, (ii) the
nature, source, or amount of the taxpayer's income, payments, receipts,
deductions, exemptions, credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax
liability deficiencies, overassessments, or tax payments, whether taken
from the taxpayer's books and records or any other source, (iii)
whether the taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be examined or
subject to other investigation or processing, (iv) a part of a written
determination that is not designated as a precedent and disclosed
pursuant to RCW 82.32.410, or a background file document relating to a
written determination, and (v) other data received by, recorded by,
prepared by, furnished to, or collected by the department of revenue
with respect to the determination of the existence, or possible
existence, of liability, or the amount thereof, of a person under the
laws of this state for a tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or
other imposition, or offense: PROVIDED, That data, material, or
documents that do not disclose information related to a specific or
identifiable taxpayer do not constitute tax information under this
section. Except as provided by RCW 82.32.410, nothing in this chapter
shall require any person possessing data, material, or documents made
confidential and privileged by this section to delete information from
such data, material, or documents so as to permit its disclosure;
(d) "State agency" means every Washington state office, department,
division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency;
(e) "Taxpayer identity" means the taxpayer's name, address,
telephone number, registration number, or any combination thereof, or
any other information disclosing the identity of the taxpayer; and
(f) "Department" means the department of revenue or its officer,
agent, employee, or representative.
(2) Returns and tax information shall be confidential and
privileged, and except as authorized by this section, neither the
department of revenue nor any other person may disclose any return or
tax information.
(3) This section does not prohibit the department of revenue from:
(a) Disclosing such return or tax information in a civil or
criminal judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:
(i) In respect of any tax imposed under the laws of this state if
the taxpayer or its officer or other person liable under Title 82 RCW
is a party in the proceeding; or
(ii) In which the taxpayer about whom such return or tax
information is sought and another state agency are adverse parties in
the proceeding;
(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the
director shall prescribe by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW, such return or tax information regarding a taxpayer to such
taxpayer or to such person or persons as that taxpayer may designate in
a request for, or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person,
at the taxpayer's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a
request for information or assistance made by the taxpayer to such
other person: PROVIDED, That tax information not received from the
taxpayer shall not be so disclosed if the director determines that such
disclosure would compromise any investigation or litigation by any
federal, state, or local government agency in connection with the civil
or criminal liability of the taxpayer or another person, or that such
disclosure would identify a confidential informant, or that such
disclosure is contrary to any agreement entered into by the department
that provides for the reciprocal exchange of information with other
government agencies which agreement requires confidentiality with
respect to such information unless such information is required to be
disclosed to the taxpayer by the order of any court;
(c) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been either issued or filed and remains outstanding for
a period of at least ten working days. The department shall not be
required to disclose any information under this subsection if a
taxpayer: (i) Has been issued a tax assessment; (ii) has been issued
a warrant that has not been filed; and (iii) has entered a deferred
payment arrangement with the department of revenue and is making
payments upon such deficiency that will fully satisfy the indebtedness
within twelve months;
(d) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been filed with a court of record and remains
outstanding;
(e) Publishing statistics so classified as to prevent the
identification of particular returns or reports or items thereof;
(f) Disclosing such return or tax information, for official
purposes only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state
agency, or to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing
with matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of
industry or the professions;
(g) Permitting the department of revenue's records to be audited
and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and
employees;
(h) Disclosing any such return or tax information to a peace
officer as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for
official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a
search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure
is for the purpose of criminal tax enforcement. A peace officer or
county prosecuting attorney who receives the return or tax information
may disclose that return or tax information only for use in the
investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the court
proceeding for which the return or tax information originally was
sought;
(i) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the proper
officer of the internal revenue service of the United States, the
Canadian government or provincial governments of Canada, or to the
proper officer of the tax department of any state or city or town or
county, for official purposes, but only if the statutes of the United
States, Canada or its provincial governments, or of such other state or
city or town or county, as the case may be, grants substantially
similar privileges to the proper officers of this state;
(j) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the Department
of Justice, including the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco ((and)), Firearms
((of the Department of the Treasury)) and Explosives within the
Department of Justice, the Department of Defense, the Immigration and
Customs Enforcement and the Customs and Border Protection agencies of
the United States ((Customs Service)) Department of Homeland Security,
the Coast Guard of the United States, and the United States Department
of Transportation, or any authorized representative thereof, for
official purposes;
(k) Publishing or otherwise disclosing the text of a written
determination designated by the director as a precedent pursuant to RCW
82.32.410;
(l) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other tax
information, the taxpayer name, entity type, business address, mailing
address, revenue tax registration numbers, North American industry
classification system or standard industrial classification code of a
taxpayer, and the dates of opening and closing of business. This
subsection shall not be construed as giving authority to the department
to give, sell, or provide access to any list of taxpayers for any
commercial purpose;
(m) Disclosing such return or tax information that is also
maintained by another Washington state or local governmental agency as
a public record available for inspection and copying under the
provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW or is a document maintained by a court
of record not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;
(n) Disclosing such return or tax information to the United States
department of agriculture for the limited purpose of investigating food
stamp fraud by retailers;
(o) Disclosing to a financial institution, escrow company, or title
company, in connection with specific real property that is the subject
of a real estate transaction, current amounts due the department for a
filed tax warrant, judgment, or lien against the real property;
(p) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted
liability as a successor under RCW 82.32.140 return or tax information
pertaining to the specific business of the taxpayer to which the person
has succeeded; ((or))
(q) Disclosing such return or tax information in the possession of
the department relating to the administration or enforcement of the
real estate excise tax imposed under chapter 82.45 RCW, including
information regarding transactions exempt or otherwise not subject to
tax; or
(r) Disclosing the least amount of return or tax information
necessary for the reports required in section 6 (4) and (5) of this act
when the number of taxpayers included in the reports or any part of the
reports cannot be classified to prevent the identification of taxpayers
or particular returns, reports, tax information, or items in the
possession of the department.
(4)(a) The department may disclose return or taxpayer information
to a person under investigation or during any court or administrative
proceeding against a person under investigation as provided in this
subsection (4). The disclosure must be in connection with the
department's official duties relating to an audit, collection activity,
or a civil or criminal investigation. The disclosure may occur only
when the person under investigation and the person in possession of
data, materials, or documents are parties to the return or tax
information to be disclosed. The department may disclose return or tax
information such as invoices, contracts, bills, statements, resale or
exemption certificates, or checks. However, the department may not
disclose general ledgers, sales or cash receipt journals, check
registers, accounts receivable/payable ledgers, general journals,
financial statements, expert's workpapers, income tax returns, state
tax returns, tax return workpapers, or other similar data, materials,
or documents.
(b) Before disclosure of any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4), the department shall, through written
correspondence, inform the person in possession of the data, materials,
or documents to be disclosed. The correspondence shall clearly
identify the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The
department may not disclose any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4) until the time period allowed in (c) of this
subsection has expired or until the court has ruled on any challenge
brought under (c) of this subsection.
(c) The person in possession of the data, materials, or documents
to be disclosed by the department has twenty days from the receipt of
the written request required under (b) of this subsection to petition
the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides for
injunctive relief. The court shall limit or deny the request of the
department if the court determines that:
(i) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure are
cumulative or duplicative, or are obtainable from some other source
that is more convenient, less burdensome, or less expensive;
(ii) The production of the data, materials, or documents sought
would be unduly burdensome or expensive, taking into account the needs
of the department, the amount in controversy, limitations on the
petitioner's resources, and the importance of the issues at stake; or
(iii) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure
contain trade secret information that, if disclosed, could harm the
petitioner.
(d) The department shall reimburse reasonable expenses for the
production of data, materials, or documents incurred by the person in
possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed.
(e) Requesting information under (b) of this subsection that may
indicate that a taxpayer is under investigation does not constitute a
disclosure of tax return or tax information under this section.
(5) Any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information
in the course of his or her employment with the department of revenue
and any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information as
provided under subsection (3)(f), (g), (h), (i), (j), or (n) of this
section, who discloses any such return or tax information to another
person not entitled to knowledge of such return or tax information
under the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If
the person guilty of such violation is an officer or employee of the
state, such person shall forfeit such office or employment and shall be
incapable of holding any public office or employment in this state for
a period of two years thereafter.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.32.590 and 2005 c 514 s 1001 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey under RCW 82.04.4452, section 4 of this act, or
section 6 of this act by the due date was the result of circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department shall extend the
time for filing the survey. Such extension shall be for a period of
thirty days from the date the department issues its written
notification to the taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under
this section. The department may grant additional extensions as it
deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey by the due date was the result of circumstances
beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department shall be guided by
rules adopted by the department for the waiver or cancellation of
penalties when the underpayment or untimely payment of any tax was due
to circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.32.600 and 2005 c 514 s 1002 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file surveys under RCW 82.04.4452, section
4 of this act, or section 6 of this act must electronically file with
the department all surveys, returns, and any other forms or information
the department requires in an electronic format as provided or approved
by the department((, unless the department grants relief under
subsection (2) of this section)). As used in this section, "returns"
has the same meaning as "return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(2) ((Upon request, the department may relieve a person of the
obligations in subsection (1) of this section if the person's taxes
have been reduced a cumulative total of less than one thousand dollars
from all of the credits, exemptions, or preferential business and
occupation tax rates, for which a person is required to file an annual
survey under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.535, 82.32.545, 82.32.570,
82.32.560, 82.60.070, or 82.63.020.
(3) Persons who no longer qualify for relief under subsection (2)
of this section will be notified in writing by the department and must
comply with subsection (1) of this section by the date provided in the
notice.
(4))) Any survey, return, or any other form or information required
to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format.
(3) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.04.4463 and 2005 c 514 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for property taxes and leasehold excise taxes paid during the
calendar year.
(2) The credit is equal to:
(a)(i)(A) Property taxes paid on new buildings, and land upon which
this property is located, built after December 1, 2003, and used
exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such
airplanes; and
(B) Leasehold excise taxes paid with respect to a building built
after January 1, 2006, the land upon which the building is located, or
both, if the building is used exclusively in manufacturing commercial
airplanes or components of such airplanes; or
(ii) Property taxes attributable to an increase in assessed value
due to the renovation or expansion, after December 1, 2003, of a
building used exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes; and
(b) An amount equal to property taxes paid on machinery and
equipment exempt under RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 and acquired
after December 1, 2003, multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the
fraction is the total taxable amount subject to the tax imposed under
RCW 82.04.260(((13))) (11) and the denominator of the fraction is the
total taxable amount subject to the tax imposed under all manufacturing
classifications in chapter 82.04 RCW, required to be reported on the
person's returns for the calendar year before the calendar year in
which the credit under this section is earned. No credit is available
under this subsection (2)(b) if either the numerator or the denominator
of the fraction is zero. If the fraction is greater than or equal to
nine-tenths, then the fraction is rounded to one. For purposes of this
subsection, "returns" means the combined excise tax returns for the
calendar year.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "commercial passenger
airplane" and "component" have the meanings given in RCW 82.32.550.
(4) A person taking the credit under this section is subject to all
the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. In addition, the person must
report as required under RCW 82.32.545. A credit earned during one
calendar year may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred
in a subsequent calendar year, but may not be carried over a second
year. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(5) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person taking the credit under this section must report as required
under RCW 82.32.545.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 10 of this act applies with respect
to leasehold excise taxes paid on or after January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 9 of this act take
effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 10 and 11 of this act take effect
January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Section 5 of this act expires July 1, 2011.

--- END ---