BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.33.010 and 1984 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The legislature finds that the purpose of adoption is to provide
stable homes for children. Adoptions should be handled efficiently,
but the rights of all parties must be protected. The guiding principle
must be determining what is in the best interest of the child.)) It is
the intent of the legislature to ensure that children whose parents are
unable to provide for their care are placed with safe and stable
families through the process of adoption. Placement of such children
with qualified families is presumed to be in the best interest of the
child. The purpose of adoption is to find a safe and stable family for
each child, not the reverse. It is the intent of the legislature that
adoptions be handled efficiently and equitably with the rights of all
parties protected. Under no circumstances shall adoptions be delayed,
denied, or given preferential treatment based upon the race of the
child or prospective adoptive parents. Nor shall any adoption-related
fees be based upon the race or physical characteristics of the child,
nor of the ability of the prospective adoptive parents to pay the
adoption-related fees.
The legislature intends for all adoption-related fees to be fully
disclosed by prospective adoptive parents to the court and approved
prior to the granting of the adoption petition.
The legislature intends to eliminate any artificial barriers to
adoption, such as fees exceeding the actual cost of the adoption-related services provided.
It is the intent of the legislature to establish a fund to assist
prospective adoptive parents in meeting the actual costs of adopting a
child.
It is the intent of the legislature that this chapter be used only
as a means for placing children in adoptive homes and not as a means
for parents to avoid responsibility for their children unless the
department, an agency, or a prospective adoptive parent is willing to
assume the responsibility for the child.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.33.045 and 1995 c 270 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
An adoption shall not be delayed ((or)), denied, or given
preferential treatment on the basis of the race, color, or national
origin of the adoptive parent or the child involved. ((However, when
the department or an agency considers whether a)) An adoption placement
((option)) with a qualified family is presumed to be in a child's best
interests((,)). The department or agency may consider the cultural,
ethnic, or racial background of the child and the capacity of
prospective adoptive parents to meet the needs of a child of this
background, unless to do so would result in a delay or denial of
placement with an otherwise qualified family. Under no circumstances
shall an adoption be delayed, denied, or given preferential treatment
based on the ability of the prospective adoptive parents to pay for
adoption-related fees. This provision shall not apply to or affect the
application of the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. Sec.
1901 et seq.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.33.150 and 1984 c 155 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An adoption proceeding is initiated by filing with the court a
petition for adoption. The petition shall be filed by the prospective
adoptive parent.
(2) A petition for adoption shall contain the following
information:
(a) The name and address of the petitioner;
(b) The name, if any, gender, and place and date of birth, if
known, of the adoptee;
(c) A statement that the child is or is not an Indian child covered
by the Indian Child Welfare Act; and
(d) The name and address of the department or any agency, legal
guardian, or person having custody of the child.
(3) The written consent to adoption of any person, the department,
or agency which has been executed shall be filed with the petition.
(4) The petition shall be signed under penalty of perjury by the
petitioner. If the petitioner is married, the petitioner's spouse
shall join in the petition.
(5) If a preplacement report prepared pursuant to RCW 26.33.190 has
not been previously filed with the court, the preplacement report shall
be filed with the petition for adoption.
(6) If a financial disclosure statement as described in section 5
of this act has not been previously filed with the court, the financial
disclosure statement shall be filed with the petition for adoption.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.33.190 and 1991 c 136 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person may at any time request an agency, the department,
an individual approved by the court, or a qualified salaried court
employee to prepare a preplacement report. A certificate signed under
penalty of perjury by the person preparing the report specifying his or
her qualifications as required in this chapter shall be attached to or
filed with each preplacement report and shall include a statement of
training or experience that qualifies the person preparing the report
to discuss relevant adoption issues. A person may have more than one
preplacement report prepared. All preplacement reports shall be filed
with the court in which the petition for adoption is filed.
(2) The preplacement report shall be a written document setting
forth all relevant information relating to the fitness of the person
requesting the report as an adoptive parent. The report shall be based
on a study which shall include an investigation of the home
environment, family life, health, facilities, and resources of the
person requesting the report. The report shall include a list of the
sources of information on which the report is based. The report shall
include a recommendation as to the fitness of the person requesting the
report to be an adoptive parent. The report shall also verify that the
following issues were discussed with the prospective adoptive parents:
(a) The concept of adoption as a lifelong developmental process and
commitment;
(b) The potential for the child to have feelings of identity
confusion and loss regarding separation from the birth parents;
(c) Disclosure of the fact of adoption to the child;
(d) The child's possible questions about birth parents and
relatives; and
(e) The relevance of the child's racial, ethnic, and cultural
heritage.
(3) All preplacement reports shall include an investigation of the
conviction record, pending charges, or disciplinary board final
decisions of prospective adoptive parents. The investigation shall
include an examination of state and national criminal identification
data provided by the Washington state patrol criminal identification
system as described in chapter 43.43 RCW.
(4) An agency, the department, or a court approved individual may
charge a reasonable fee based on the time spent in conducting the study
and preparing the preplacement report. The court may set a reasonable
fee for conducting the study and preparing the report when a court
employee has prepared the report. An agency, the department, a court
approved individual, or the court may reduce or waive the fee ((if the
financial condition of the person requesting the report so warrants)).
An agency's, the department's, or court approved individual's((,)) fee
((is subject to review by the court upon request of the person
requesting the report)) must be included in the prospective adoptive
parents' financial disclosure statement consistent with section 5 of
this act.
(5) The person requesting the report shall designate to the agency,
the department, the court approved individual, or the court in writing
the county in which the preplacement report is to be filed. If the
person requesting the report has not filed a petition for adoption, the
report shall be indexed in the name of the person requesting the report
and a cause number shall be assigned. A fee shall not be charged for
filing the report. The applicable filing fee may be charged at the
time a petition governed by this chapter is filed. Any subsequent
preplacement reports shall be filed together with the original report.
(6) A copy of the completed preplacement report shall be delivered
to the person requesting the report.
(7) A person may request that a report not be completed. A
reasonable fee may be charged for the value of work done.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 26.33 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to a preplacement report as provided in RCW 26.33.190
and a post-placement report as provided in RCW 26.33.200, the
prospective adoptive parents shall file a financial disclosure
statement with the court. The financial disclosure statement shall
itemize any and all adoption-related fees paid or anticipated to be
paid by the prospective adoptive parents. Itemized fees shall include
any and all adoption-related fees including but not limited to medical,
legal, preplacement report, and post-placement report adoption-related
fees. The financial disclosure statement shall disclose the fee amount
and date paid, to whom the fee was paid, services provided, and whether
any fees were reduced or waived. The financial disclosure statement
shall be filed with the court consistent with RCW 26.33.150(6). The
court shall review the financial disclosure statement and either
approve all adoption-related fees or reduce or waive the fees as the
court deems appropriate, prior to entering a decree of adoption.

Sec. 6 RCW 26.33.240 and 1987 c 170 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After the reports required by RCW 26.33.190, section 5 of this
act, and 26.33.200 have been filed, the court shall schedule a hearing
on the petition for adoption upon request of the petitioner for
adoption. Notice of the date, time, and place of hearing shall be
given to the petitioner and any person or agency whose consent to
adoption is required under RCW 26.33.160, unless the person or agency
has waived in writing the right to receive notice of the hearing. If
the child is an Indian child, notice shall also be given to the child's
tribe. Notice shall be given in the manner prescribed by RCW
26.33.310.
(2) Notice of the adoption hearing shall also be given to any
person who or agency which has prepared a preplacement report. The
notice shall be given in the manner prescribed by RCW 26.33.230.
(3) If the court determines, after review of the petition,
preplacement and post-placement reports, and other evidence introduced
at the hearing, that all necessary consents to adoption are valid or
have been dispensed with pursuant to RCW 26.33.170 and that the
adoption is in the best interest of the adoptee, and, in the case of an
adoption of an Indian child, that the adoptive parents are within the
placement preferences of 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915 or good cause to the
contrary has been shown on the record, the court shall enter a decree
of adoption pursuant to RCW 26.33.250.
(4) If the court determines the petition should not be granted
because the adoption is not in the best interest of the child, the
court shall make appropriate provision for the care and custody of the
child.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 26.33 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The adoption expense assistance account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Expenditures from the account shall be
made exclusively to assist prospective adoptive parents in the payment
of adoption-related fees under this chapter. The account is subject to
the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation
is not required for expenditures. Only the secretary of social and
health services or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account.
(2) The department of social and health services shall solicit and
may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources
for deposit to the adoption expense assistance account, as well as
legislative appropriations to the account.
(3) By rule, the department of social and health services shall
establish eligibility criteria for distribution of funds from the
account for assistance to prospective adoptive parents, using a sliding
scale based solely on the economic need of the prospective adoptive
parents. Funds shall be distributed once annually unless the funds in
the account are sufficient to allow additional distributions.
Distributions from the account shall not exceed the investment earnings
of the account; the account principal shall not be expended.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2005 c 424 s 18, 2005 c 402 s 8, 2005
c 215 s 10, and 2005 c 16 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
adoption expense assistance account, the agricultural local fund, the
American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the foster care scholarship
endowment fund, the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the
students with dependents grant account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the contract harvesting revolving account,
the Washington state combined fund drive account, the commemorative
works account, the Washington international exchange scholarship
endowment fund, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund,
the energy account, the fair fund, the fruit and vegetable inspection
account, the future teachers conditional scholarship account, the game
farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the
juvenile accountability incentive account, the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local tourism
promotion account, the produce railcar pool account, the rural
rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the
youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the
sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's trust fund, the
Washington horse racing commission Washington bred owners' bonus fund
account, the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund
account, the individual development account program account, the
Washington horse racing commission operating account (earnings from the
Washington horse racing commission operating account must be credited
to the Washington horse racing commission class C purse fund account),
and the life sciences discovery fund. However, the earnings to be
distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---