BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.180 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2007, the Washington state housing finance
commission shall create and implement a veteran homeownership
downpayment assistance program to work in conjunction with the
commission's housing finance programs. The program will assist the
following individuals purchase a home:
(a) Washington state residents who are veterans, as defined by RCW
41.04.007;
(b) Members and former members of the Washington national guard and
reserve; and
(c) Never remarried spouses and dependent children of deceased
veterans, as defined by RCW 41.04.007.
(2) The commission shall adopt rules providing procedures to assure
that the downpayment assistance program is available for qualified
veterans in a fair and equitable manner.

--- END ---