BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Placental and umbilical cord blood is recognized as a viable
and more accessible alternative to bone marrow in many medical
therapies. Science has discovered ways to treat many types of cancer,
blood, and immune disorders through the use of stem cells from
placental and umbilical cord blood. Placental and umbilical cord blood
is currently used to treat such diseases as leukemia and over sixty
other fatal immune system diseases;
(2) In the United States there are approximately fifty thousand
units of usable placental and umbilical cord blood, however, at least
one hundred fifty thousand units are needed in order to meet the
nation's demands. While over one thousand cord blood transplants have
occurred around the world, it is estimated that with an adequate supply
of placental and umbilical cord blood over eleven thousand patients
could receive life-saving treatment in the United States every year;
(3) There is an urgent need to dramatically increase the racial and
ethnic diversity of the supply of placental and umbilical cord blood to
improve the possibility of finding compatible donors in all racial and
ethnic communities in Washington; and
(4) Washington state is home to several large medical research
institutions and an expanding biomedical research industry. Over
thirty years ago the pioneering work of nobel laureate, E. Donnall
Thomas, and his colleagues at the Fred Hutchinson cancer research
center made bone marrow transplantation a reality. The use of
placental and umbilical cord blood promises to build upon this legacy
as well as lead to other new medical therapies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of health shall establish two pilot programs to
allow consenting expectant mothers, delivering in a hospital licensed
under chapter 70.41 RCW, to donate, to a public blood bank, placental
and umbilical cord blood following childbirth. One pilot program shall
be located in eastern Washington and the other in western Washington.
The department shall administer the pilot project in coordination with
blood bank resources currently operating in the state.
(2) The pilot projects shall:
(a) Increase accessibility to placental and cord blood donation
programs and public blood banks;
(b) Facilitate the receipt, storage, and distribution of donated
placental and umbilical cord blood for use by appropriate patients and,
where the donated blood is not suitable for use by patients, for
research in projects approved by an institutional review board; and
(c) Increase awareness about placental and umbilical cord donation
among expectant parents and health care providers, including in racial
and ethnic communities where there are difficulties finding compatible
donors.
(3) The department of health shall report to the legislature by
December 1, 2008, on the results of the pilot projects, including
information on donations received and the use of those donations for
patients and for research. The report shall also include
recommendations for expanding access to public blood banks, increasing
awareness among expectant parents and health care providers, and
promoting donations in diverse communities.
(4) The department of health shall create a work group to provide
advice and consultation in developing, implementing, and evaluating the
pilot project and comment on the department's report. This work group
shall consist of patients, health care providers, hospital
administrators, blood bank administrators, and representatives of
biomedical research institutions.

--- END ---