BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.611 and 2004 c 271 s 151 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state as chief election officer shall make
reasonable rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW not inconsistent
with the federal and state election laws to effectuate any provision of
this title and to facilitate the execution of its provisions in an
orderly, timely, and uniform manner relating to any federal, state,
county, city, town, and district elections. To that end the secretary
shall assist local election officers by devising uniform forms and
procedures.
In addition to the rule-making authority granted otherwise by this
section, the secretary of state shall make rules governing the
following provisions:
(1) The maintenance of voter registration records;
(2) The preparation, maintenance, distribution, review, and filing
of precinct maps;
(3) Standards for the design, layout, and production of ballots;
(4) The examination and testing of voting systems for
certification;
(5) The source and scope of independent evaluations of voting
systems that may be relied upon in certifying voting systems for use in
this state;
(6) Standards and procedures for the acceptance testing of voting
systems by counties;
(7) Standards and procedures for testing the programming of vote
tallying software for specific primaries and elections;
(8) Standards and procedures for the preparation and use of each
type of certified voting system including procedures for the operation
of counting centers where vote tallying systems are used;
(9) Standards and procedures to ensure the accurate tabulation and
canvassing of ballots;
(10) Consistency among the counties of the state in the preparation
of ballots, the operation of vote tallying systems, and the canvassing
of primaries and elections;
(11) Procedures to ensure the secrecy of a voter's ballot when a
small number of ballots are counted at the polls or at a counting
center;
(12) The use of substitute devices or means of voting when a voting
device at the polling place is found to be defective, the counting of
votes cast on the defective device, the counting of votes cast on the
substitute device, and the documentation that must be submitted to the
county auditor regarding such circumstances;
(13) Procedures for the transportation of sealed containers of
voted ballots or sealed voting devices;
(14) The acceptance and filing of documents via electronic
facsimile;
(15) Voter registration applications and records;
(16) The use of voter registration information in the conduct of
elections;
(17) The coordination, delivery, and processing of voter
registration records accepted by driver licensing agents or the
department of licensing;
(18) The coordination, delivery, and processing of voter
registration records accepted by agencies designated by the governor to
provide voter registration services;
(19) Procedures to receive and distribute voter registration
applications by mail;
(20) Procedures for a voter to change his or her voter registration
address within a county by telephone;
(21) Procedures for a voter to change the name under which he or
she is registered to vote;
(22) Procedures for canceling dual voter registration records and
for maintaining records of persons whose voter registrations have been
canceled;
(23) Procedures for the electronic transfer of voter registration
records between county auditors and the office of the secretary of
state;
(24) Procedures and forms for declarations of candidacy;
(25) Procedures and requirements for the acceptance and filing of
declarations of candidacy by electronic means;
(26) Procedures for the circumstance in which two or more
candidates have a name similar in sound or spelling so as to cause
confusion for the voter;
(27) Filing for office;
(28) The order of positions and offices on a ballot;
(29) Sample ballots;
(30) Independent evaluations of voting systems;
(31) The testing, approval, and certification of voting systems;
(32) The testing of vote tallying software programming;
(33) Standards and procedures to prevent fraud and to facilitate
the accurate processing and canvassing of absentee ballots and mail
ballots, including standards for the approval and implementation of
hardware and software for automated signature verification systems;
(34) Standards and procedures to guarantee the secrecy of absentee
ballots and mail ballots;
(35) Uniformity among the counties of the state in the conduct of
absentee voting and mail ballot elections;
(36) Standards and procedures to accommodate out-of-state voters,
overseas voters, and service voters;
(37) The tabulation of paper ballots before the close of the polls;
(38) The accessibility of polling places and registration
facilities that are accessible to elderly and disabled persons;
(39) The aggregation of precinct results if reporting the results
of a single precinct could jeopardize the secrecy of a person's ballot;
(40) Procedures for conducting a statutory recount;
(41) Procedures for filling vacancies in congressional offices if
the general statutory time requirements for availability of absentee
ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures cannot be
met;
(42) Procedures for the statistical sampling of signatures for
purposes of verifying and canvassing signatures on initiative,
referendum, and recall election petitions;
(43) Standards and deadlines for submitting material to the office
of the secretary of state for the voters' pamphlet;
(44) Deadlines for the filing of ballot titles for referendum bills
and constitutional amendments if none have been provided by the
legislature;
(45) Procedures for the publication of a state voters' pamphlet;
(46) Procedures for conducting special elections regarding nuclear
waste sites if the general statutory time requirements for availability
of absentee ballots, certification, canvassing, and related procedures
cannot be met;
(47) Procedures for conducting partisan primary elections;
(48) Standards and procedures for the proper conduct of voting
during the early voting period to provide accessability for the blind
or visually impaired;
(49) Standards for voting technology and systems used by the state
or any political subdivision to be accessible for individuals with
disabilities, including nonvisual accessibility for the blind and
visually impaired, in a manner that provides the same opportunity for
access and participation, including privacy and independence, as other
voters;
(50) All data formats for transferring voter registration data on
electronic or machine-readable media for the purpose of administering
the statewide voter registration list required by the Help America Vote
Act (P.L. 107-252);
(51) Defining the interaction of electronic voter registration
election management systems employed by each county auditor to maintain
a local copy of each county's portion of the official state list of
registered voters;
(52) Provisions and procedures to implement the state-based
administrative complaint procedure as required by the Help America Vote
Act (P.L. 107-252); and
(53) Facilitating the payment of local government grants to local
government election officers or vendors.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.12.080 and 2003 c 111 s 308 are each amended to
read as follows:
No voting device shall be approved by the secretary of state unless
it:
(1) Secures to the voter secrecy in the act of voting;
(2) Permits the voter to vote for any person for any office and
upon any measure that he or she has the right to vote for;
(3) Permits the voter to vote for all the candidates of one party
((or in part for the candidates of one or more other parties));
(4) Correctly registers all votes cast for any and all persons and
for or against any and all measures;
(5) Provides that a vote for more than one candidate cannot be cast
by one single operation of the voting device or vote tally system
except when voting for president and vice president of the United
States; and
(6) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, has
been tested((,)) and certified((, and used in at least one other state
or election jurisdiction)) by an independent testing authority
designated by the United States election assistance commission.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.12.101 and 2004 c 271 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall not approve a vote tallying system
unless it:
(1) Correctly counts votes on ballots on which the proper number of
votes have been marked for any office or issue;
(2) Ignores votes marked for any office or issue where more than
the allowable number of votes have been marked, but correctly counts
the properly voted portions of the ballot;
(3) Accumulates a count of the specific number of ballots tallied
for each precinct, total votes by candidate for each office, and total
votes for and against each issue of the ballot in that precinct;
(4) Produces precinct and cumulative totals in printed form; and
(5) Except for functions or capabilities unique to this state, has
been tested((,)) and certified((, and used in at least one other state
or election jurisdiction)) by an independent testing authority
designated by the United States election assistance commission.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.40.110 and 2005 c 243 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes for
any primary or election may begin upon receipt. The tabulation of
absentee ballots must not commence until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of
the primary or election.
(2) All received absentee return envelopes must be placed in secure
locations from the time of delivery to the county auditor until their
subsequent opening. After opening the return envelopes, the county
canvassing board shall place all of the ballots in secure storage until
after 8:00 p.m. of the day of the primary or election. Absentee
ballots that are to be tabulated on an electronic vote tallying system
may be taken from the inner envelopes and all the normal procedural
steps may be performed to prepare these ballots for tabulation.
(3) Before opening a returned absentee ballot, the canvassing
board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the postmark,
statement, and signature on the return envelope that contains the
security envelope and absentee ballot. They shall verify that the
voter's signature on the return envelope is the same as the signature
of that voter in the registration files of the county. Verification
may be conducted by an automated verification system approved by the
secretary of state. A variation between the signature of the voter on
the return envelope and the signature of that voter in the registration
files due to the substitution of initials or the use of common
nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and handwriting are
clearly the same. For registered voters casting absentee ballots, the
date on the return envelope to which the voter has attested determines
the validity, as to the time of voting for that absentee ballot if the
postmark is missing or is illegible. For out-of-state voters, overseas
voters, and service voters stationed in the United States, the date on
the return envelope to which the voter has attested determines the
validity as to the time of voting for that absentee ballot. ((For any
absentee ballot, a variation between the signature of the voter on the
return envelope and the signature of that voter in the registration
files due to the substitution of initials or the use of common
nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and handwriting are
clearly the same.))

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.46.020 and 2004 c 267 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Disability access voting period" means the period of time starting
twenty days before an election until ((one day before)) the day of the
election.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.46.110 and 2004 c 267 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
((At the discretion of the county auditor,)) In-person disability
access voting ((may take place during the period)) must be available
starting twenty days before the day of a primary or election and ending
the day ((before)) of the election. During this period, the county
auditor must make available a voting system certified by the secretary
of state for disability access. The auditor shall maintain a system or
systems to prevent multiple voting. ((The end of the disability access
voting period in each county will be determined by the auditor's need
and ability to print and distribute poll books to the polls in order to
prevent multiple voting.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 29A.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the elimination of polling places
resulting from the transition to vote by mail creates barriers that
restrict the ability of many voters with disabilities from achieving
the independence and privacy in voting provided by the accessible
voting devices required under the help America vote act. Counties
adopting a vote by mail system must take appropriate steps to mitigate
these impacts and to address the obligation to provide voters with
disabilities an equal opportunity to vote independently and privately,
to the extent that this can be achieved without incurring undue
administrative and financial burden.
(2) Each county shall establish and maintain an advisory committee
that includes persons with diverse disabilities and persons with
expertise in providing accommodations for persons with disabilities.
The committee shall assist election officials in developing a plan to
identify and implement changes to improve the accessibility of
elections for voters with disabilities. The plan shall include
recommendations for the following:
(a) The number of polling places that will be maintained in order
to ensure that people with disabilities have reasonable access to
accessible voting devices, and a written explanation for how the
determination was made;
(b) The locations of polling places, drop-off facilities, voting
centers, and other election-related functions necessary to maximize
accessibility to persons with disabilities;
(c) Outreach to voters with disabilities on the availability of
disability accommodation, including in-person disability access voting;
(d) Transportation of voting devices to locations convenient for
voters with disabilities in order to ensure reasonable access for
voters with disabilities; and
(e) Implementation of the provisions of the help America vote act
related to persons with disabilities.
Counties must update the plan at least annually. The election
review staff of the secretary of state shall review and evaluate the
plan in conformance with the review procedure identified in RCW
29A.04.570.
(3) Counties may form a joint advisory committee to develop the
plan identified in subsection (2) of this section if the total
population of the joining counties does not exceed thirty thousand, and
the counties are geographically adjacent.

--- END ---