BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
All high schools in the state shall include in their health and
fitness curriculum instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation based
on up-to-date instructional methods and materials. A high school may
collaborate with local agencies such as police or fire departments or
community organizations such as the Red Cross to offer the instruction.

--- END ---