BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to confront the
problem of insurance fraud in this state by making a concerted effort
to detect insurance fraud, reduce the occurrence of fraud through
criminal enforcement and deterrence, require restitution of
fraudulently obtained insurance benefits and expenses incurred by an
insurer in investigating fraudulent claims, and reduce the amount of
premium dollars used to pay fraudulent claims. The primary focus of
the insurance fraud program is on organized fraudulent activities
committed against insurance companies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Insurance fraud" means an act or omission committed by a
person who, knowingly, and with intent to defraud, commits, or conceals
any material information concerning, one or more of the following:
(a) Presenting, causing to be presented, or preparing with
knowledge or belief that it will be presented to or by an insurer,
broker, or its agent, false information as part of, in support of, or
concerning a fact material to one or more of the following:
(i) An application for the issuance or renewal of an insurance
policy;
(ii) The rating of an insurance policy or contract;
(iii) A claim for payment or benefit pursuant to an insurance
policy;
(iv) Premiums paid on an insurance policy;
(v) Payments made in accordance with the terms of an insurance
policy; or
(vi) The reinstatement of an insurance policy;
(b) Willful embezzlement, abstracting, purloining, or conversion of
moneys, funds, premiums, credits, or other property of an insurer or
person engaged in the business of insurance; or
(c) Attempting to commit, aiding or abetting in the commission of,
or conspiracy to commit the acts or omissions specified in this
subsection.
The definition of insurance fraud is for illustrative purposes only
under this chapter to describe the nature of the behavior to be
reported and investigated, and is not intended in any manner to create
or modify the definition of any existing criminal acts nor to create or
modify the burdens of proof in any criminal prosecution brought as a
result of an investigation under this chapter.
(2) "Insurer" means an insurance company authorized under chapter
48.05 RCW, a health care service contractor registered under chapter
48.44 RCW, and a health care maintenance organization registered under
chapter 48.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) There is established an insurance fraud
program within the office of the insurance commissioner. The
commissioner may employ supervisory, legal, and investigative personnel
for the program, who must be qualified by training and experience in
the areas of detection, investigation, or prosecution of fraud in which
the insurance industry is a victim. The chief of the fraud program is
a full-time position that is appointed by the commissioner. The chief
serves at the pleasure of the commissioner. The commissioner shall
provide office space, equipment, supplies, investigators, clerical
staff, and other staff that are necessary for the program to carry out
its duties and responsibilities under this chapter.
(2) The commissioner may fund one or more state patrol officers to
work with the insurance fraud program and the funding for the officers
must be paid out of the budget of the insurance fraud program.
(3) The commissioner may fund one or more assistant attorney
generals and support staff to work with the insurance fraud program and
the funding for the assistant attorney generals and support staff must
be paid out of the budget of the insurance fraud program.
(4) The commissioner may make grants to or reimburse local
prosecuting attorneys to assist in the prosecution of insurance fraud.
The grants must be paid out of the budget of the insurance fraud
program. The commissioner may investigate and seek prosecution of
crimes involving insurance fraud upon the request of or with the
concurrence of the county prosecuting attorney of the jurisdiction in
which the offense has occurred. Before such a prosecution, the
commissioner and the county in which the offense occurred shall reach
an agreement regarding the payment of all costs, including expert
witness fees, and defense attorneys' fees associated with any such
prosecution.
(5) Staff levels for this program, until June 30, 2010, shall not
exceed 8.0 full-time equivalents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The annual cost of operating the fraud
program is funded from the insurance commissioner's regulatory account
under RCW 48.02.190 subject to appropriation by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The commissioner may:
(a) Employ and train personnel to achieve the purposes of this
chapter and to employ legal counsel, investigators, auditors, and
clerical support personnel and other personnel as the commissioner
determines necessary from time to time to accomplish the purposes of
this chapter;
(b) Initiate inquiries and conduct investigations when the
commissioner has cause to believe that insurance fraud has been, is
being, or is about to be committed;
(c) Conduct independent examinations of alleged insurance fraud;
(d) Review notices, reports, or complaints of suspected insurance
fraud activities from federal, state, and local law enforcement and
regulatory agencies, persons engaged in the business of insurance, and
any other person to determine whether the reports require further
investigation;
(e) Share records and evidence with federal, state, or local law
enforcement or regulatory agencies, and enter into interagency
agreements;
(f) Conduct investigations outside this state. If the information
the commissioner seeks to obtain is located outside this state, the
person from whom the information is sought may make the information
available to the commissioner to examine at the place where the
information is located. The commissioner may designate
representatives, including officials of the state in which the matter
is located, to inspect the information on behalf of the commissioner,
and the commissioner may respond to similar requests from officials of
other states;
(g) Administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel
their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any
books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other
documents or records that the commissioner deems relevant or material
to an inquiry concerning insurance fraud;
(h) Report incidents of alleged insurance fraud disclosed by its
investigations to the appropriate prosecutorial authority, including
but not limited to the attorney general and to any other appropriate
law enforcement, administrative, regulatory, or licensing agency;
(i) Assemble evidence, prepare charges, and work closely with any
prosecutorial authority having jurisdiction to pursue prosecution of
insurance fraud; and
(j) Undertake independent studies to determine the extent of
fraudulent insurance acts.
(2) The fraud program investigators who have obtained certification
as a peace officer under RCW 43.101.095 have the powers and status of
a limited authority Washington peace officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Any insurer or licensee of the
commissioner that has reasonable belief that an act of insurance fraud
which is or may be a crime under Washington law has been, is being, or
is about to be committed shall furnish and disclose the knowledge and
information to the commissioner or the national insurance crime bureau,
the national association of insurance commissioners, or similar
organization, who shall disclose the information to the commissioner,
and cooperate fully with any investigation conducted by the
commissioner.
(2) Any person that has a reasonable belief that an act of
insurance fraud which is or may be a crime under Washington law has
been, is being, or is about to be committed; or any person who
collects, reviews, or analyzes information concerning insurance fraud
which is or may be a crime under Washington law may furnish and
disclose any information in its possession concerning such an act to
the commissioner or to an authorized representative of an insurer that
requests the information for the purpose of detecting, prosecuting, or
preventing insurance fraud.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Documents, materials, or other
information as described in subsection (3), (4), or both of this
section are exempt from public inspection and copying under chapters
42.17 and 42.56 RCW. The commissioner is authorized to use such
documents, materials, or other information in the furtherance of any
regulatory or legal action brought as a part of the commissioner's
official duties.
(2) The commissioner:
(a) May share documents, materials, or other information, including
the documents, materials, or information subject to subsection (1) of
this section, with (i) the national association of insurance
commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, (ii) regulatory and
law enforcement officials of other states and nations, the federal
government, and international authorities, (iii) the national insurance
crime bureau, and (iv) an insurer with respect to whom the suspected
fraudulent claim may be perpetrated;
(b) May receive documents, materials, or information from (i) the
national association of insurance commissioners and its affiliates and
subsidiaries, (ii) regulatory and law enforcement officials of other
states and nations, the federal government, and international
authorities, (iii) the national insurance crime bureau, and (iv) an
insurer with respect to whom the suspected fraudulent claim may be
perpetrated and any such documents, materials, or information as
described in subsection (3), (4), or both of this section are exempt
from public inspection and copying; and
(c) May enter into agreements governing the sharing and use of
information consistent with this subsection.
(3) Specific investigative and law enforcement records obtained by
the commissioner, the nondisclosure of which is essential to effective
law enforcement or for the protection of any person's right to privacy,
are exempt under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime obtained by the commissioner or investigative or
law enforcement agencies under this chapter, if disclosure would
endanger any person's life, physical safety, or property, is exempt
under subsection (1) of this section. If at the time the documents,
materials, or information are provided to the commissioner or
investigative or law enforcement agencies under this chapter, and the
victim or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure,
their desire governs.
(5) No waiver of an existing privilege or claim of confidentiality
in the documents, materials, or information may occur as a result of
disclosure to the commissioner under this section or as a result of
sharing documents, materials, or information as authorized in
subsection (2) of this section.
(6) Documents, materials, or other information that is in the
possession of persons other than the commissioner that would otherwise
not be confidential by law or privileged do not become confidential by
law or privileged by providing the documents, materials, or other
information to the commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 In a criminal prosecution for any crime
under Washington law in which the insurance company is a victim, the
insurance company is entitled to be considered as a victim in any
restitution ordered by the court under RCW 9.94A.753, as part of the
criminal penalty imposed against the defendant convicted for such a
violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This chapter does not:
(1) Preempt the authority or relieve the duty of any other general
authority law enforcement agencies to investigate, examine, and
prosecute suspected violations of law;
(2) Prevent or prohibit a person from voluntarily disclosing any
information concerning insurance fraud to any law enforcement agency
other than the commissioner; or
(3) Limit any of the powers granted elsewhere in this title to the
commissioner to investigate and examine possible violations of the law
and to take appropriate action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 No later than six months after the
effective date of this section, or when the insurer has used all its
existing paper application and claim forms which were in its possession
on the effective date of this section, whichever is later, all
applications for insurance, and all claim forms regardless of the form
of transmission provided and required by an insurer or required by law
as condition of payment of a claim, must contain a statement,
permanently affixed to the application or claim form, that clearly
states in substance the following:
"It is a crime to knowingly provide false, incomplete, or
misleading information to an insurance company for the purpose of
defrauding the company. Penalties include imprisonment, fines, and
denial of insurance benefits."
The lack of a statement required in this section does not
constitute a defense in any criminal prosecution nor any civil action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The commissioner shall appoint an insurance
fraud advisory board. The board shall consist of nine members. Four
members shall be representatives from the insurance industry doing
business in this state, at least one of which shall be from a
Washington domestic insurer, two members shall represent consumers, one
member shall represent the national insurance crime bureau or successor
organization, one member shall represent prosecutors, and one member
shall represent other law enforcement agencies. The members of the
board serve four-year terms and until their successors are appointed
and qualified. Three of the original members must be appointed to
serve an initial term of four years, two must be appointed to serve an
initial term of three years, two must be appointed to serve an initial
term of two years, and two must be appointed to serve an initial term
of one year. The members of the board receive no compensation. The
board shall advise the commissioner and the legislature with respect to
the effectiveness, resources allocated to the fraud program, the source
of the funding for the program, and before June 30, 2010, if the
staffing level restriction in section 3(5) of this act should be
renewed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The commissioner shall prepare an annual
report of the activities of the fraud program. The report shall be
submitted to the legislature no later than March 1st for the prior
calendar year. The report shall, at a minimum, include information as
to the number of cases reported to the commissioner, the number of
cases referred for prosecution, the number of convictions obtained, the
amount of money recovered, and any recommendations of the insurance
advisory board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The commissioner may adopt rules to
implement and administer this chapter.

Sec. 14 RCW 48.50.070 and 2000 c 254 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any licensed insurance agent, any licensed insurance broker, or any
insurer or person acting in the insurer's behalf, health maintenance
organization or person acting in behalf of the health maintenance
organization, health care service contractor or person acting in behalf
of the health care service contractor, or any authorized agency which
releases information, whether oral or written, to the commissioner, the
national insurance crime bureau, the national association of insurance
commissioners, other law enforcement agent or agency, or another
insurer under RCW 48.50.030, 48.50.040, 48.50.050, ((or)) 48.50.055, or
section 6 of this act is immune from liability in any civil or criminal
action, suit, or prosecution arising from the release of the
information, unless actual malice on the part of the agent, broker,
insurer, health care maintenance organization, health care service
contractor, or authorized agency against the insured is shown.

Sec. 15 RCW 48.50.075 and 1995 c 285 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
In denying a claim, an insurer, health maintenance organization, or
health care service contractor who relies upon a written opinion from
an authorized agency specifically enumerated in RCW 48.50.020(1) (a)
through (g) that criminal activity that is related to that claim is
being investigated, or a crime has been charged, and that the claimant
is a target of the investigation or has been charged with a crime, is
not liable for bad faith or other noncontractual theory of damages as
a result of this reliance.
Immunity under this section shall exist only so long as the
incident for which the claimant may be responsible is under active
investigation or prosecution, or the authorized agency states its
position that the claim includes or is a result of criminal activity in
which the claimant was a participant.

Sec. 16 RCW 10.93.020 and 2002 c 128 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "General authority Washington law enforcement agency" means any
agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political
subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, and any
agency, department, or division of state government, having as its
primary function the detection and apprehension of persons committing
infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws in general, as
distinguished from a limited authority Washington law enforcement
agency, and any other unit of government expressly designated by
statute as a general authority Washington law enforcement agency. The
Washington state patrol and the department of fish and wildlife are
general authority Washington law enforcement agencies.
(2) "Limited authority Washington law enforcement agency" means any
agency, political subdivision, or unit of local government of this
state, and any agency, department, or division of state government,
having as one of its functions the apprehension or detection of persons
committing infractions or violating the traffic or criminal laws
relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to, the
state departments of natural resources and social and health services,
the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission, the state
parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and transportation
commission, the state liquor control board, the office of the insurance
commissioner, and the state department of corrections.
(3) "General authority Washington peace officer" means any full-time, fully compensated and elected, appointed, or employed officer of
a general authority Washington law enforcement agency who is
commissioned to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington
generally.
(4) "Limited authority Washington peace officer" means any full-time, fully compensated officer of a limited authority Washington law
enforcement agency empowered by that agency to detect or apprehend
violators of the laws in some or all of the limited subject areas for
which that agency is responsible. A limited authority Washington peace
officer may be a specially commissioned Washington peace officer if
otherwise qualified for such status under this chapter.
(5) "Specially commissioned Washington peace officer", for the
purposes of this chapter, means any officer, whether part-time or full-time, compensated or not, commissioned by a general authority
Washington law enforcement agency to enforce some or all of the
criminal laws of the state of Washington, who does not qualify under
this chapter as a general authority Washington peace officer for that
commissioning agency, specifically including reserve peace officers,
and specially commissioned full-time, fully compensated peace officers
duly commissioned by the states of Oregon or Idaho or any such peace
officer commissioned by a unit of local government of Oregon or Idaho.
A reserve peace officer is an individual who is an officer of a
Washington law enforcement agency who does not serve such agency on a
full-time basis but who, when called by the agency into active service,
is fully commissioned on the same basis as full-time peace officers to
enforce the criminal laws of the state.
(6) "Federal peace officer" means any employee or agent of the
United States government who has the authority to carry firearms and
make warrantless arrests and whose duties involve the enforcement of
criminal laws of the United States.
(7) "Agency with primary territorial jurisdiction" means a city or
town police agency which has responsibility for police activity within
its boundaries; or a county police or sheriff's department which has
responsibility with regard to police activity in the unincorporated
areas within the county boundaries; or a statutorily authorized port
district police agency or four-year state college or university police
agency which has responsibility for police activity within the
statutorily authorized enforcement boundaries of the port district,
state college, or university.
(8) "Primary commissioning agency" means (a) the employing agency
in the case of a general authority Washington peace officer, a limited
authority Washington peace officer, an Indian tribal peace officer, or
a federal peace officer, and (b) the commissioning agency in the case
of a specially commissioned Washington peace officer (i) who is
performing functions within the course and scope of the special
commission and (ii) who is not also a general authority Washington
peace officer, a limited authority Washington peace officer, an Indian
tribal peace officer, or a federal peace officer.
(9) "Primary function of an agency" means that function to which
greater than fifty percent of the agency's resources are allocated.
(10) "Mutual law enforcement assistance" includes, but is not
limited to, one or more law enforcement agencies aiding or assisting
one or more other such agencies through loans or exchanges of personnel
or of material resources, for law enforcement purposes.

Sec. 17 RCW 42.56.400 and 2005 c 274 s 420 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following information relating to insurance and financial
institutions is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals
that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed
with the board under RCW 7.68.110;
(2) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW;
(3) The names and individual identification data of all viators
regulated by the insurance commissioner under chapter 48.102 RCW;
(4) Information provided under RCW 48.30A.045 through 48.30A.060;
(5) Information provided under RCW 48.05.510 through 48.05.535,
48.43.200 through 48.43.225, 48.44.530 through 48.44.555, and 48.46.600
through 48.46.625;
(6) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business;
(7) Examination reports and information obtained by the department
of financial institutions from banks under RCW 30.04.075, from savings
banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW
33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from check cashers
and sellers under RCW 31.45.030(3), and from securities brokers and
investment advisers under RCW 21.20.100, all of which is confidential
and privileged information;
(8) Information provided to the insurance commissioner under RCW
48.110.040(3);
(9) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.02.065, all of which are confidential and
privileged; ((and))
(10) Confidential proprietary and trade secret information provided
to the commissioner under RCW 48.31C.020 through 48.31C.050 and
48.31C.070; and
(11) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW
to read as follows:
Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under section 7 of this act are exempt from disclosure
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Sections 1 through 13 and 19 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---