BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that state law
requires criminal background checks of unlicensed child care providers
for the purpose of approval for receiving reimbursement under the
working connections child care program. However, the legislature finds
that background checks are generally limited to criminal conviction
histories. The results of criminal background checks are more complete
when supplemented by an applicant's history of child abuse or neglect.
The legislature declares that there is no right or entitlement to
receive or to be approved to provide state subsidized child care. The
legislature also finds that the safety of children is a compelling
state interest and that additional safeguards are necessary in the
approval for receipt of child care subsidies by unlicensed child care
providers to ensure the safety of Washington's children. In order to
provide the safest environment for children, the division must be
provided with known information regarding an applicant's history of
child abuse or neglect when an applicant seeks approval for receipt of
child care subsidies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to Title 74 RCW to
read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Administration" means the children's administration within the
department of social and health services.
(b) "Applicant" means an applicant, other than a child care
provider licensed under this title, for reimbursement under the working
connections child care program.
(c) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(d) "Division" means the division of child care and early learning
within the department.
(e) "Reimbursement" means payment to an applicant for child care
services on behalf of a child who qualifies for state subsidized child
care under the working connections child care program.
(2) Before approving an applicant for reimbursement, the division
shall review records within the administration regarding child abuse or
neglect by the applicant, if any. The department shall adopt rules for
the sharing of information consistent with the legislative intent of
this act. Rules shall include a provision for responding to an
applicant's request for approval for reimbursement within twenty days.
(3) Information reviewed under this section shall be used by the
division only for the purpose of approving an applicant's
qualifications for receipt of reimbursement. Except as otherwise
provided by law, the division shall not disclose the information to any
person, other than the applicant, who is not directly involved in the
process of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for reimbursement.
A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(4) Beginning September 1, 2006, the department shall not expunge
information about founded complaints of child abuse or neglect from any
records or documents in its investigative or any other files. This
subsection does not restrict the expungement of information about
unfounded allegations of child abuse or neglect under RCW 26.44.031.
(5) This section does not prevent the division from requesting or
requiring an applicant to provide information other than that described
in this section.
(6) An applicant shall not be approved for reimbursement if any of
the following apply:
(a) The applicant's parental rights have been terminated under
chapter 13.34 RCW; or
(b) A referral regarding child abuse or neglect by the applicant
has resulted in a founded complaint.
(7) Beginning July 1, 2007, in addition to the criteria in
subsection (6) of this section, an applicant shall not be approved for
reimbursement if within the six years preceding the applicant's request
for approval two or more referrals regarding child abuse or neglect
have resulted in an inconclusive finding.
(8) At the conclusion of the division's background investigation,
an applicant has the right to review his or her file in which the
applicant is named as the subject of an allegation of child abuse or
neglect, and to attach rebuttals to any documents as the applicant
deems necessary. Rebuttal documents shall be disclosed in the same
manner as the documents to which they are attached. This section does
not provide a right to access information that would otherwise be
redacted by the administration for the purpose of maintaining
confidentiality of persons reporting alleged child abuse or neglect or
of children who are the alleged victims of abuse or neglect. The
provisions of this subsection do not supersede the protections provided
individuals under the state whistleblower laws in chapter 42.41 RCW.

--- END ---