BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.36.104 and 2004 c 271 s 126 are each amended to
read as follows:
Partisan primaries must be conducted using either((:)) a
consolidated ballot format or a physically separate ballot format.
(1) A consolidated ballot format ((that)) must include((s)) a major
political party identification check-off box that allows a voter to
select from a list of the major political parties the major political
party with which the voter chooses to affiliate. It must also include
a check-off box that allows the voter to indicate that he or she is
voting only the nonpartisan races and ballot measures. The
consolidated ballot must include all partisan races, nonpartisan races,
and ballot measures to be voted on at that primary((; or)).
(2) A physically separate ballot format ((that)) must include((s
both)) all party ballots and a nonpartisan ballot. A party ballot must
be specific to a particular major political party and may include only
the partisan offices to be voted on at that primary and the names of
candidates for those partisan offices who designated that same major
political party in their declarations of candidacy. The nonpartisan
ballot must include all nonpartisan races and ballot measures to be
voted on at that primary.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.36.106 and 2004 c 271 s 127 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the consolidated ballot format is used, the major political
party identification check-off box must appear on the primary ballot
before all offices and ballot measures. Clear and concise instructions
to the voter must be prominently displayed immediately before the list
of major political parties, and must include:
(a) A question asking the voter to indicate the major political
party with which the voter chooses to affiliate or if the voter prefers
to vote nonpartisan races and ballot measures only;
(b) A statement that, for a major political party candidate, only
votes cast by voters who choose to affiliate with that same major
political party will be tabulated and reported;
(c) A statement that votes cast for a major political party
candidate by a voter who chooses to affiliate with a different major
political party will not be tabulated or reported;
(d) A statement that votes cast for a major political party
candidate by a voter who fails to select a major political party
affiliation will not be tabulated or reported;
(e) A statement that votes cast for a major political party
candidate by a voter who selects more than one major political party
with which to affiliate will not be tabulated or reported; ((and))
(f) A statement that the party identification option will not
affect votes cast for candidates for nonpartisan offices, or for or
against ballot measures; and
(g) A statement that votes cast for partisan races will not be
tabulated or reported if a voter checks the box indicating that he or
she is voting only the nonpartisan races and ballot measures.
(2) If the physically separate ballot format is used, clear and
concise instructions to the voter must be prominently displayed, and
must include:
(a) A statement explaining that only one party ballot and one
nonpartisan ballot may be voted;
(b) A statement explaining that if more than one party ballot is
voted, none of the party ballots will be tabulated or reported;
(c) A statement explaining that a voter's affiliation with a major
political party will be inferred from the act of voting the party
ballot for that major political party; and
(d) A statement explaining that every eligible registered voter may
vote a nonpartisan ballot, regardless of any party affiliation on the
part of the voter.

--- END ---