BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that too many students
graduate from high school and find themselves academically unprepared
for postsecondary study, including students who thought they were
enrolled in a college preparatory program while in high school. The
legislature further finds that some students, particularly those whose
parents did not attend college, do not pursue postsecondary study
because they are unaware they have the potential to succeed in higher
education. Therefore, the legislature intends to make college
placement tests widely available in high schools and encourage high
school students, their parents, and their teachers to use the tests as
a tool for planning and preparing for their future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall reimburse school
districts, from funds appropriated for this purpose, for college
placement tests that districts annually offer to students in tenth or
eleventh grade. Districts shall encourage but may not require students
to take the test. A district intending to offer a college placement
test under this section shall consult with a local community or
technical college or other public institution of higher education in
the region before selecting a test.
(2) Students in home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW
may participate with students at the public school in college placement
tests offered by a district. If the district is reimbursed for the
college placement test under this section, students in home-based
instruction shall not be charged for participating in the test.
(3) The college placement tests shall serve to assist students,
parents, and teachers in the planning and selection of appropriate high
school courses and to gauge student readiness for postsecondary study,
including dual enrollment programs. Results of the tests and relevant
student, school, and district characteristics shall be compiled by the
superintendent of public instruction to permit research and analysis,
including analysis using the unique student identifier, and shall be
made available to the parents of those students tested. Aggregate
results shall be made available to the public and the legislature.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "college placement test"
means a test designed to provide diagnostic information comparing a
student's knowledge and skills in a particular content area to the
knowledge and skills typically required for postsecondary study in that
area and used to place students into appropriate levels of
postsecondary courses.

--- END ---