BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.305.140 and 1990 c 33 s 267 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the state
board of education may grant waivers to school districts from the
provisions of RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.220 on the basis that
such waiver or waivers are necessary to implement successfully a local
plan to provide for all students in the district an effective education
system that is designed to enhance the educational program for each
student. The local plan may include alternative ways to provide
effective educational programs for students who experience difficulty
with the regular education program.
(2) The state board of education shall not grant waivers from the
provisions of RCW 28A.150.220(3) requiring one hundred eighty school
days per school year. Waivers of RCW 28A.150.220(3) granted before the
effective date of this section expire at the end of the 2005-06 school
year unless such expiration constitutes an abrogation of a collective
bargaining agreement or contract within the school district, in which
case the waiver may continue until the expiration date previously
approved by the state board.
(3) The state board shall adopt criteria to evaluate the need for
the waiver or waivers.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.180 and 1995 c 208 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education, where appropriate, or the
superintendent of public instruction, where appropriate, may grant
waivers to districts from the provisions of statutes or rules relating
to((: The length of the school year;)) student-to-teacher ratios((;))
and other administrative rules that in the opinion of the state board
of education or the opinion of the superintendent of public instruction
may need to be waived in order for a district to implement a plan for
restructuring its educational program or the educational program of
individual schools within the district.
(2) School districts may use the application process in RCW
28A.305.140 ((or 28A.300.138)) to apply for the waivers under
((subsection (1) of)) this section.
(((3) The joint select committee on education restructuring shall
study which waivers of state laws or rules are necessary for school
districts to implement education restructuring. The committee shall
study whether the waivers are used to implement specific essential
academic learning requirements and student learning goals. The
committee shall study the availability of waivers under the schools for
the twenty-first century program created by chapter 525, Laws of 1987,
and the use of those waivers by schools participating in that program.
The committee shall also study the use of waivers authorized under RCW
28A.305.140. The committee shall report its findings to the
legislature by December 1, 1997.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 28A.305.145 (Application process for
waivers under RCW 28A.305.140) and 1993 c 336 s 302 are each repealed.

--- END ---