BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.210
RCW to read as follows:
Subject to funding provided by the state expressly for the purposes
of this section, each school district board of directors shall:
(1) Provide for an automatic external defibrillator to be located
in each public school in the district; and
(2) Comply with the requirements of RCW 70.54.310, including
training of personnel, use of the defibrillator, and notification of
the local emergency medical services organization about the location of
the defibrillator.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---