BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
For each high school student who was not successful on any or all
of the content areas of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning, either initially or after subsequent retakes of the
assessment:
(1) The school district shall prepare the student learning plan
required under RCW 28A.655.061 before the end of the school year in
which the assessment scores are returned;
(2) The school district shall arrange a student-led conference for
the student's parent or guardian to discuss the remedial extended
learning activities the district will provide under section 2 of this
act and explain the student's level of risk of not graduating on time
if the student does not participate in remediation assistance. To the
maximum extent possible, student-led conferences shall be facilitated
by a teacher or counselor who has been assigned as the student's mentor
for the duration of the student's enrollment in the school;
(3) If the student is in out-of-home care as defined by RCW
13.34.030, the school district shall include the student's social
worker assigned from the department of social and health services in
the student-led conference.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Moneys appropriated for the purpose of providing remediation
for students who were not successful on any or all of the content areas
of the high school Washington assessment of student learning shall be
allocated to school districts by the superintendent of public
instruction in accordance with the biennial appropriations act. School
districts shall expend the funds on remedial extended learning
activities as provided in this section.
(a) Remedial extended learning activities may include summer
school, before and after school programs, Saturday classes, skill
seminars, assessment preparation, intensive courses during the school
year, and in-school or out-of-school tutoring.
(b) Remedial extended learning activities may occur on the school
campus, via the internet using the digital learning commons or other
providers of online courses and materials, or at other locations and
times that meet student needs.
(c) Within available funds, any student who was not successful on
any or all of the content areas of the high school Washington
assessment of student learning may participate in remedial extended
learning activities.
(d) Funding shall be provided based on students served in remedial
extended learning activities. Expenditures for planning and
preparatory time are permitted only in accordance with the omnibus
appropriations act.
(e) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute
school year allocations of funds appropriated for the purposes of this
section according to the monthly apportionment schedule in RCW
28A.510.250.
(2) School districts shall administer preremediation and
postremediation assessments to students served in remedial extended
learning activities under this section. Districts shall collect
student-level data on preremediation and postremediation assessment
results, the student's subsequent results on the Washington assessment
of student learning or alternative assessment, and relevant student
characteristics to permit analysis of the effectiveness of remedial
extended learning activities. The office of the superintendent shall
issue data collection guidelines to assist school districts.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.230.195 and 2005 c 217 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If students' scores on the test or assessments under RCW
28A.655.070 indicate that students need help in identified areas, the
school district shall evaluate its instructional practices and make
appropriate adjustments.
(2) Each school district shall notify the parents or guardians of
each student of their child's performance on the test and assessments
conducted under this chapter. If a student is in out-of-home care as
defined by RCW 13.34.030, the district shall also notify the assigned
social worker from the department of social and health services.
(3) Notification to the parent, guardian, or assigned social worker
of the assessment results for a student who was not successful on any
or all of the content areas of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning shall include the following additional information:
(a) A description of the specific skill areas in which the student
needs improvement;
(b) The student's level of risk of not graduating on time;
(c) The availability and importance of remedial extended learning
activities and how to access these programs;
(d) Information about the next available opportunity for the
student to retake the assessment, possible alternative assessments, and
other options for high school completion;
(e) Information about how the parent or guardian can view a copy of
the assessment and compare it to the student's results; and
(f) Contact information for an individual at the student's school
who can provide assistance and answer questions.
(4) Beginning with the 2009 assessment, the notice to parents of
the results of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning shall include the student's responses compared to the correct
responses to test questions and information about how the parent can
obtain a copy of the assessment. A school district shall provide an
electronic or paper copy of the assessment on request. However, if
specific funding for the purpose of this subsection (4) is not provided
in the omnibus appropriations act, by June 30, 2006, a school district
is not obligated to comply with this subsection (4).

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2004 c 19 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (11) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for
each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045, acquisition of the certificate is required for graduation
from a public high school but is not the only requirement for
graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a
student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more
content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement,
then the student may retake the assessment in the content area up to
four times at no cost to the student. If the student successfully
meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the
student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once
objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection
(11) of this section, a student may use the objective alternative
assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully meets the
state standards for that content area if the student has retaken the
Washington assessment of student learning at least once. If the
student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement. The student's transcript shall note whether the
certificate of academic achievement was acquired by means of the
Washington assessment of student learning or by an alternative
assessment.
(4) Beginning with the graduating class of 2010, a student must
meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content
areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the Washington
assessment of student learning or the objective alternative assessments
in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) Beginning with the graduating class of 2006, the highest scale
score and level achieved in each content area on the high school
Washington assessment of student learning shall be displayed on a
student's transcript. In addition, beginning with the graduating class
of 2008, each student shall receive a scholar's designation on his or
her transcript for each content area in which the student achieves
level four the first time the student takes that content area
assessment.
(8) Beginning in 2006, school districts must make available to
students the following options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(9) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(10) Subject to available funding, the superintendent shall pilot
opportunities for retaking the high school assessment beginning in the
2004-05 school year. Beginning no later than September 2006,
opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year shall be
available to each school district.
(11) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop options for implementing objective alternative assessments,
which may include an appeals process, for students to demonstrate
achievement of the state academic standards. The objective alternative
assessments shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and knowledge
that the student must demonstrate on the Washington assessment of
student learning and be objective in its determination of student
achievement of the state standards. Before any objective alternative
assessments are used by a student to demonstrate that the student has
met the state standards in a content area required to obtain a
certificate, the legislature shall formally approve the use of any
objective alternative assessments through the omnibus appropriations
act or by statute or concurrent resolution.
(12) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(13) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for students as provided in this subsection (13) and section 1 of
this act.
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content
areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during the
previous school year. The plan shall include the courses,
competencies, and other steps needed to be taken by the student to meet
state academic standards and stay on track for graduation. This
requirement shall be phased in as follows:
(i) Beginning no later than the 2004-05 school year ninth grade
students as described in this subsection (13)(a) shall have a plan.
(ii) Beginning no later than the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter eighth grade students as described in this subsection
(13)(a) shall have a plan.
(iii) The parent or guardian shall be notified, preferably through
a parent conference, of the student's results on the Washington
assessment of student learning, actions the school intends to take to
improve the student's skills in any content area in which the student
was unsuccessful, strategies to help them improve their student's
skills, and the content of the student's plan.
(iv) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.
(b) Beginning with the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter, all fifth grade students who were not successful in one or
more of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment of
student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of a student described in this
subsection (13)(b) shall be notified, preferably through a parent
conference, of the student's results on the Washington assessment of
student learning, actions the school intends to take to improve the
student's skills in any content area in which the student was
unsuccessful, and provide strategies to help them improve their
student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.655.070 and 2005 c 497 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
essential academic learning requirements that identify the knowledge
and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do
based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student
assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and
requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the state
board of education.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Periodically revise the essential academic learning
requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the
maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four
and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the essential
academic learning requirements; and
(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning
requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the
grade level content expectations to be assessed on the Washington
assessment of student learning and used for state or federal
accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and
identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an
emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content
expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content
expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of
expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing
depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and
reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven
working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content
expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing
the Washington assessment of student learning.
(3) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to
develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the
content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in
the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if
each student has mastered the essential academic learning requirements
identified in subsection (1) of this section. School districts shall
administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment system
shall include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.
(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the
essential academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments,
then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential
academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.
(5)(a) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not mastered the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.
(b) Assessments measuring the essential academic learning
requirements in the content area of science shall be available for
mandatory use in middle schools and high schools by the 2003-04 school
year and for mandatory use in elementary schools by the 2004-05 school
year unless the legislature takes action to delay or prevent
implementation of the assessment.
(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics
shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to
determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content
areas from one school year to the next.
(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide
educational support to individual students, the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance
information as possible within the constraints of the assessment
system's item bank. Beginning with the 2009 assessment, the
superintendent shall release the complete high school assessment,
including the correct responses, concurrently with the release of the
assessment results and shall post the assessment and responses on the
superintendent's internet web site. However, the superintendent is not
obligated to release the complete high school assessment if specific
funding for the release is not provided in the omnibus appropriations
act by June 30, 2006. The superintendent shall also provide to school
districts:
(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may
provide additional achievement information for individual students; and
(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to
evaluate the academic status of individual students particularly
students who were not successful on one or more of the content areas of
the high school Washington assessment of student learning. The tools
shall be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly
and easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily
shared with parents and students.
(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(11) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments under this section.
(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(13) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site
lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts,
and health and fitness.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.655.200 and 2005 c 217 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The legislature finds that the mandatory norm-referenced
student assessments eliminated under chapter 217, Laws of 2005 provide
information that teachers and parents use to improve student
learning.)) In the absence of mandatory, statewide, norm-referenced
assessments, the legislature intends to permit school districts to
offer norm-referenced assessments ((at the districts' own expense
and)), make diagnostic tools available ((that provide information that
is at least as valuable as the information eliminated under chapter
217, Laws of 2005)), and provide funding for diagnostic assessments for
early intervention before the high school Washington assessment of
student learning.
(2) In addition to the diagnostic assessments provided under
subsection (5) of this section, school districts may, at their own
expense, administer norm-referenced assessments to students.
(3) By September 1, 2005, subject to available funds, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall post on its web site for
voluntary use by school districts, a guide of diagnostic assessments.
The assessments in the guide, to the extent possible, shall include the
characteristics listed in subsection (4)(((a) through (e))) of this
section.
(4) ((By September 1, 2006, subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose)) Beginning September 1, 2007,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make
available to school districts diagnostic assessments that help improve
student learning. To the greatest extent possible, the assessments
shall be:
(a) Aligned to the state's grade level expectations;
(b) Individualized to each student's performance level;
(c) Administered efficiently to provide results either immediately
or within two weeks;
(d) Capable of measuring individual student growth over time and
allowing student progress to be compared to other students across the
country; ((and))
(e) Readily available to parents; and
(f) Cost-effective.
(5) Beginning with the 2006-07 school year, the superintendent of
public instruction shall reimburse school districts, from funds
appropriated for this purpose, for administration of diagnostic
assessments in grades nine and ten for the purpose of identifying
academic weaknesses and developing targeted instructional strategies to
assist students before the high school Washington assessment of student
learning.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction is
encouraged to offer at ((their)) statewide and regional staff
development activities training opportunities that would assist
practitioners in:
(a) The interpretation of diagnostic assessments; and
(b) Application of instructional strategies that will increase
student learning based on diagnostic assessment data.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose,
the superintendent of public instruction shall negotiate statewide
contracts with providers of online courses, materials, and diagnostic
assessments to provide remedial extended learning activities and
preremediation and postremediation assessments under section 2 of this
act. The superintendent shall act as a broker between school districts
that elect to use the courses, materials, or assessments offered by a
provider and the provider in order to facilitate contract negotiations,
ensure consistent and equitable contract terms, and reduce
administrative burden on both parties. Nothing in this section prevents
a school district from independently negotiating contracts with
providers of online courses, materials, or diagnostic assessments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 28A.230.195 is recodified as a new
section in chapter 28A.655 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---