BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
protect the public to ensure that only federal, state, and local law
enforcement and emergency personnel, public or private, have access to
emergency equipment and vehicles.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.37.195 and 1990 c 94 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a public
agency, business, entity, or person shall not sell or give emergency
vehicle lighting equipment or other equipment to a person who may not
lawfully operate the lighting equipment or other equipment on the
public streets and highways. Prior to selling or giving an emergency
vehicle to a person or entity that is not a public law enforcement or
emergency agency within or outside the state, public law enforcement or
emergency agency in another country, or private ambulance business
within or outside the state, the seller or donor must remove all
emergency lighting as defined in rules by the Washington state patrol,
radios, and any other emergency equipment from the vehicles that was
not originally installed by the original vehicle manufacturer. If the
equipment is not retained or transferred to another public law
enforcement or emergency agency within or outside the state, public law
enforcement or emergency agency in another country, or private
ambulance business within or outside the state, the equipment must be
dismantled with the individual parts being recycled or destroyed prior
to being disposed of. The agency must also remove all decals, state
and local designated law enforcement colors, and stripes that were not
installed by the original vehicle manufacturer.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the sale or
donation to a broker specializing in the resale of emergency vehicles,
or a charitable organization, intending to deliver the vehicle or
equipment to a public law enforcement or emergency agency within or
outside the state, public law enforcement or emergency agency in
another country, or private ambulance business within or outside the
state, is allowed with the emergency equipment still installed and
intact. If the broker or charitable organization sells or donates the
emergency vehicle to a person or entity that is not a public law
enforcement or emergency agency, or private ambulance business, the
broker or charitable organization must remove the equipment and
designations and shall be accountable and responsible for the removal
of the equipment and designations not installed on the vehicle by the
original vehicle manufacturer. Equipment not sold or donated to a
public law enforcement or emergency agency, or a private ambulance
business, must be removed and transferred, destroyed, or recycled in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---