BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within existing funds, the state auditor must establish a toll-free telephone line that is available to public employees and members
of the public to recommend measures to improve efficiency in state
government and to report waste, inefficiency, or abuse by state
agencies, state employees, or persons under contract with state
agencies.
(2) The state auditor must prepare information that explains the
purpose of the hotline, and the hotline telephone number must be
prominently displayed in the information. Hotline information must be
posted in all state offices in locations where it is most likely to be
seen by the public. The state auditor must publicize the availability
of the toll-free hotline through print and electronic media.
(3) The state auditor must designate staff to be responsible for
processing recommendations for improving efficiency and reports of
waste, inefficiency, or abuse received through the hotline. The state
auditor must conduct an initial review of each recommendation for
efficiency and report of waste, inefficiency, or abuse made by public
employees and members of the public. Following the initial review, the
state auditor must determine which reports require further
investigation and assign the investigation to qualified staff.
(4) The identity of a person making a report through the hotline,
or by e-mail through the state auditor's web site, is confidential at
all times unless the person making a report consents to disclosure by
written waiver, or until the investigation described in subsection (3)
of this section is complete. All documents related to the report and
subsequent investigation are also confidential until completion of the
investigation.
(5) The state auditor must prepare a written determination of the
results of the investigation performed, including any background
information that the auditor deems necessary. The state auditor must
report publicly the conclusions of each investigation and recommend
ways to correct any deficiency and to improve efficiency. The reports
must be distributed to the affected state agencies.
(6) The state auditor must provide an annual overview and update of
hotline investigations, including the results and efficiencies
achieved, to the legislature and to the appropriate legislative
committees.

--- END ---