BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Washington's quality of life, standard of living, and social
and economic opportunity all depend on the vitality of the state's
economy;
(b) Economic development tries to reinforce the natural way by
which strong foundations in the areas of human resources, capital
resources, technology, tax and regulatory, advanced physical
infrastructure, information and communication infrastructure, and
quality of life strengthen the economy;
(c) The strength and vitality of the state's economy depends on the
competitiveness of the state's industry clusters;
(d) Industry clusters can become a powerful magnet for businesses
to locate in an area and create a spawning ground for start-up
companies;
(e) Industry clusters create large, diverse pools of experienced
workers, attract suppliers who tend to congregate in their vicinity for
increased efficiency, and foster a competitive spirit that stimulates
growth and innovative strategic alliances; and
(f) The state must first identify and understand the industry
clusters before strategies can be developed to enhance their
competitive position in the world.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to establish an industry
cluster-based approach to economic development as a component of a
statewide strategy to address economic growth and quality of life
issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of community, trade, and economic development,
or its successor agency, shall work with industry associations and
organizations to identify industry clusters on a regional and statewide
basis. The industry clusters may include, but are not limited to,
aerospace, agriculture, food processing, forest products, business
services, financial services, health and biomedical, software, digital
and interactive media, transportation and distribution, and
microelectronics.
(2) In the identification of industry clusters, the department's
activities may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Conducting focus group discussions, facilitating meetings, and
conducting studies to identify industry clusters, members of an
industry cluster, the current state of the industry cluster, and issues
of common concern of the industry cluster;
(b) Supporting industry cluster associations, publication of
cluster association directories, and related efforts to encourage the
entry of new firms into the industry cluster; and
(c) Providing methods for electronic communication and information
dissemination among firms within industry clusters.
(3) A competitive grant program, administered by the department, is
created to assist communities to develop, in partnerships, regional
economic development and industry cluster strategies and conduct
related cluster market strategies.
(a) Applicants must include organizations from at least two
counties. Eligible organizations include, but are not limited to,
local governments, economic development councils, chambers of commerce,
federally recognized Indian tribes, work force development councils,
and educational institutions. Applicants should also include
participants from the local business community.
(b) There must be financial participation of the partner
organizations in order to be eligible for the grant program.
(c) Grant money may be used to fund organizational activities
necessary to develop the partnership's regional economic development
and industry cluster strategies, and related marketing strategies.
Administrative costs are limited to ten percent of any appropriation
for the purposes of this act.
(d) The maximum amount of a grant is one hundred thousand dollars.
(e) A maximum of one hundred thousand dollars total can go to King,
Pierce, Kitsap, and Snohomish counties combined.
(f) The competitive grant program expires June 30, 2007.
(4) As used in this section, "industry cluster" means a geographic
concentration of interdependent competitive firms that do business with
each other. "Industry cluster" also includes firms that sell inside
and outside of the geographic region as well as support firms that
supply raw materials, components, and business services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall report to the governor and the fiscal and
economic development committees of the house and senate no later than
January 1, 2008, on the results of the activities undertaken under
section 2 of this act. The report shall include, but not be limited
to:
(1) The industry clusters identified under section 2 of this act;
the number of firms, employment and wage levels in each cluster
identified, and an assessment of the competitiveness of each cluster;
(2) The number and description of new firms entered into each
cluster as a result of the department's activities under section 2 of
this act;
(3) A summary of the issues of common concern identified in the
focus group discussions conducted under section 2(2) of this act;
(4) A list containing information on applicants and grant awards
under section 2(3) of this act, a description of the process used for
solicitation of grant applications, and the criteria used in the
selection of grantees.

--- END ---