BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.21.241 and 2005 c 6 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "mental health services"
means medically necessary outpatient and inpatient services provided to
treat mental disorders covered by the diagnostic categories listed in
the most current version of the diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, published by the American psychiatric association, on
July 24, 2005, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
insurance commissioner by rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter
6, Laws of 2005, with the exception of the following categories, codes,
and services: (a) Substance related disorders; (b) life transition
problems, currently referred to as "V" codes, and diagnostic codes 302
through 302.9 as found in the diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, 4th edition, published by the American psychiatric
association; (c) skilled nursing facility services, home health care,
residential treatment, and custodial care; and (d) court ordered
treatment unless the insurer's medical director or designee determines
the treatment to be medically necessary.
(2) All group disability insurance contracts and blanket disability
insurance contracts providing health benefit plans that provide
coverage for medical and surgical services shall provide:
(a) For all group health benefit plans ((established or renewed on
or after)) for groups other than small groups, as defined in RCW
48.43.005 delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed on or after
January 1, 2006, ((for groups of more than fifty employees)) coverage
for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(b) For all group health benefit plans ((established or renewed on
or after)) for groups other than small groups, as defined in RCW
48.43.005 delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed on or after
January 1, 2008, ((for groups of more than fifty employees)) coverage
for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison. If the health benefit plan imposes a maximum out-of-pocket
limit or stop loss, it shall be a single limit or stop loss for
medical, surgical, and mental health services; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(c) For all group health benefit plans ((established or renewed on
or after)) for groups other than small groups, as defined in RCW
48.43.005 delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed on or after July
1, 2010, ((for groups of more than fifty employees)) coverage for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison. If the health benefit plan imposes a maximum out-of-pocket
limit or stop loss, it shall be a single limit or stop loss for
medical, surgical, and mental health services. If the health benefit
plan imposes any deductible, mental health services shall be included
with medical and surgical services for the purpose of meeting the
deductible requirement. Treatment limitations or any other financial
requirements on coverage for mental health services are only allowed if
the same limitations or requirements are imposed on coverage for
medical and surgical services; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(3) In meeting the requirements of subsection (2)(a) and (b) of
this section, health benefit plans may not reduce the number of mental
health outpatient visits or mental health inpatient days below the
level in effect on July 1, 2002.
(4) This section does not prohibit a requirement that mental health
services be medically necessary as determined by the medical director
or designee, if a comparable requirement is applicable to medical and
surgical services.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the
management of mental health services.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.44.341 and 2005 c 6 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "mental health services"
means medically necessary outpatient and inpatient services provided to
treat mental disorders covered by the diagnostic categories listed in
the most current version of the diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, published by the American psychiatric association, on
July 24, 2005, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
insurance commissioner by rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter
6, Laws of 2005, with the exception of the following categories, codes,
and services: (a) Substance related disorders; (b) life transition
problems, currently referred to as "V" codes, and diagnostic codes 302
through 302.9 as found in the diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, 4th edition, published by the American psychiatric
association; (c) skilled nursing facility services, home health care,
residential treatment, and custodial care; and (d) court ordered
treatment unless the health care service contractor's medical director
or designee determines the treatment to be medically necessary.
(2) All health service contracts providing health benefit plans
that provide coverage for medical and surgical services shall provide:
(a) For all group health benefit plans ((established or renewed on
or after)) for groups other than small groups, as defined in RCW
48.43.005 delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed on or after
January 1, 2006, ((for groups of more than fifty employees)) coverage
for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(b) For all group health benefit plans ((established or renewed on
or after)) for groups other than small groups, as defined in RCW
48.43.005 delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed on or after
January 1, 2008, ((for groups of more than fifty employees)) coverage
for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison. If the health benefit plan imposes a maximum out-of-pocket
limit or stop loss, it shall be a single limit or stop loss for
medical, surgical, and mental health services; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(c) For all group health benefit plans ((established or renewed on
or after)) for groups other than small groups, as defined in RCW
48.43.005 delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed on or after July
1, 2010, ((for groups of more than fifty employees)) coverage for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison. If the health benefit plan imposes a maximum out-of-pocket
limit or stop loss, it shall be a single limit or stop loss for
medical, surgical, and mental health services. If the health benefit
plan imposes any deductible, mental health services shall be included
with medical and surgical services for the purpose of meeting the
deductible requirement. Treatment limitations or any other financial
requirements on coverage for mental health services are only allowed if
the same limitations or requirements are imposed on coverage for
medical and surgical services; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(3) In meeting the requirements of subsection (2)(a) and (b) of
this section, health benefit plans may not reduce the number of mental
health outpatient visits or mental health inpatient days below the
level in effect on July 1, 2002.
(4) This section does not prohibit a requirement that mental health
services be medically necessary as determined by the medical director
or designee, if a comparable requirement is applicable to medical and
surgical services.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the
management of mental health services.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.46.291 and 2005 c 6 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "mental health services"
means medically necessary outpatient and inpatient services provided to
treat mental disorders covered by the diagnostic categories listed in
the most current version of the diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, published by the American psychiatric association, on
July 24, 2005, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
insurance commissioner by rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter
6, Laws of 2005, with the exception of the following categories, codes,
and services: (a) Substance related disorders; (b) life transition
problems, currently referred to as "V" codes, and diagnostic codes 302
through 302.9 as found in the diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders, 4th edition, published by the American psychiatric
association; (c) skilled nursing facility services, home health care,
residential treatment, and custodial care; and (d) court ordered
treatment unless the health maintenance organization's medical director
or designee determines the treatment to be medically necessary.
(2) All health benefit plans offered by health maintenance
organizations that provide coverage for medical and surgical services
shall provide:
(a) For all group health benefit plans ((established or renewed on
or after)) for groups other than small groups, as defined in RCW
48.43.005 delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed on or after
January 1, 2006, ((for groups of more than fifty employees)) coverage
for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(b) For all group health benefit plans ((established or renewed on
or after)) for groups other than small groups, as defined in RCW
48.43.005 delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed on or after
January 1, 2008, ((for groups of more than fifty employees)) coverage
for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison. If the health benefit plan imposes a maximum out-of-pocket
limit or stop loss, it shall be a single limit or stop loss for
medical, surgical, and mental health services; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(c) For all group health benefit plans ((established or renewed on
or after)) for groups other than small groups, as defined in RCW
48.43.005 delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed on or after July
1, 2010, ((for groups of more than fifty employees)) coverage for:
(i) Mental health services. The copayment or coinsurance for
mental health services may be no more than the copayment or coinsurance
for medical and surgical services otherwise provided under the health
benefit plan. Wellness and preventive services that are provided or
reimbursed at a lesser copayment, coinsurance, or other cost sharing
than other medical and surgical services are excluded from this
comparison. If the health benefit plan imposes a maximum out-of-pocket
limit or stop loss, it shall be a single limit or stop loss for
medical, surgical, and mental health services. If the health benefit
plan imposes any deductible, mental health services shall be included
with medical and surgical services for the purpose of meeting the
deductible requirement. Treatment limitations or any other financial
requirements on coverage for mental health services are only allowed if
the same limitations or requirements are imposed on coverage for
medical and surgical services; and
(ii) Prescription drugs intended to treat any of the disorders
covered in subsection (1) of this section to the same extent, and under
the same terms and conditions, as other prescription drugs covered by
the health benefit plan.
(3) In meeting the requirements of subsection (2)(a) and (b) of
this section, health benefit plans may not reduce the number of mental
health outpatient visits or mental health inpatient days below the
level in effect on July 1, 2002.
(4) This section does not prohibit a requirement that mental health
services be medically necessary as determined by the medical director
or designee, if a comparable requirement is applicable to medical and
surgical services.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the
management of mental health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---