BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.160.030 and 2006 c 2 s 3 (Initiative Measure No.
901) are each amended to read as follows:
Except as authorized by a waiver under section 2 of this act, no
person may smoke in a public place or in any place of employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.160 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of revenue shall issue waivers from the
requirements of this chapter as provided for in this section.
(2) If a public or private business, club, charitable bingo hall,
cigar store, or hookah lounge can document an economic loss of ten
percent or more of the gross revenue for thirty days, it may apply to
the department of revenue for a waiver of RCW 70.160.030. If the
business can show a decline of ten percent or more and the other
requirements under this section are met, the waiver must be granted.
The waiver may be granted for the entire building or for a section of
the building such as a smoking room.
(3) No one under the age of eighteen may be allowed into any area
of any building in which a waiver is granted and no waiver may be given
to any business primarily catering to children under the age of
eighteen, such as a skating rink.
(4) The business or club must submit with the waiver application a
fee of two hundred fifty dollars to cover the costs to the state of
administering the waiver under this section.
(5) Businesses or clubs granted a waiver under this section must
notify their local health department and post signs conspicuously at
all entrances to the area and building where smoking is to be allowed
so that all employees, patrons, members, or customers are informed that
smoking is allowed.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.160.070 and 2006 c 2 s 7 (Initiative Measure No.
901) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person intentionally violating this chapter by smoking in
a public place or place of employment, or any person removing,
defacing, or destroying a sign required by this chapter, is subject to
a civil fine of up to one hundred dollars. Any person passing by or
through a public place while on a public sidewalk or public right of
way has not intentionally violated this chapter. Local ((law
enforcement agencies)) health departments shall enforce this section by
issuing a notice of infraction to be assessed in the same manner as
traffic infractions. The provisions contained in chapter 46.63 RCW for
the disposition of traffic infractions apply to the disposition of
infractions for violation of this subsection except as follows:
(a) The provisions in chapter 46.63 RCW relating to the provision
of records to the department of licensing in accordance with RCW
46.20.270 are not applicable to this chapter; and
(b) The provisions in chapter 46.63 RCW relating to the imposition
of sanctions against a person's driver's license or vehicle license are
not applicable to this chapter.
The form for the notice of infraction for a violation of this
subsection shall be prescribed by rule of the supreme court.
(2) When a local health department employee observes a
violation((s)) of RCW 70.160.050 ((occur)), a warning shall first be
given to the owner or other person in charge. Any subsequent violation
is subject to a civil fine of up to one hundred dollars. Each day upon
which a violation occurs or is permitted to continue constitutes a
separate violation.
(3) Local health departments shall enforce RCW 70.160.050 regarding
the duties of owners or persons in control of public places and places
of employment by either of the following actions:
(a) Serving notice requiring the correction of any violation; or
(b) Calling upon the city or town attorney or county prosecutor
((or local health department attorney)) to maintain an action for an
injunction to enforce RCW 70.160.050, to correct a violation, and to
assess and recover a civil penalty for the violation.
(4) Local health departments may not delegate the authority granted
to them under this chapter to any outside nongovernmental agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.160 RCW
to read as follows:
Health departments may not issue fines or take other legal actions
based solely on a reported violation of this chapter. The health
department employee must witness the violation and it must be shown by
clear and convincing evidence that the business owner or designated
employee has made no attempt to comply with this chapter. For purposes
of this chapter, if the owner, lessee, or other person in charge can
document that they have notified the person or persons that they are in
violation of this chapter and that they must cease smoking, the owner,
lessee, or other person in charge has complied with the intent of this
chapter and may not be found in violation of RCW 70.160.050.

--- END ---