BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.45 RCW
to read as follows:
The pension funding stabilization account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for payment of unfunded
liabilities of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the
teachers' retirement system plan 1 in existence on July 1, 2005, as
employer contributions for members of the public employees' retirement
system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees'
retirement system, or the public safety employees' retirement system.
The account may not be used to pay for any new benefit or for any
benefit increase that takes effect after July 1, 2005. An increase
that is provided in accordance with a formula that is in existence on
July 1, 2005, is not considered a benefit increase for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---