BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By the end of the 2006-07 school year, teachers who meet the
criteria under this section must pass the subject area assessment
required of new certificate applicants under RCW 28A.410.220(2) in one
or more core academic subject areas as described in subsection (3) of
this section in order to be considered a highly qualified teacher under
P.L. 107-110, the no child left behind act of 2001.
(2) This section applies only to teachers who:
(a) At the beginning of the 2006-07 school year, have fewer than
twelve years of experience as measured by the statewide salary
allocation schedule under rules adopted by the superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Have primary responsibility for instruction in one or more of
the core academic subject areas; and
(c) Have not attained certification by the national board for
professional teaching standards.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "core academic subject areas"
means language arts, reading, English, science, mathematics, history,
government, geography, economics, the arts, civics, or a world
language. Middle and high school teachers must pass the subject area
assessment in each core academic subject area taught by the teacher.
Elementary teachers must pass the subject area assessment for
elementary teachers that assesses knowledge and teaching skills in
reading, writing, mathematics, and other areas of the basic elementary
school curriculum.
(4) The professional educator standards board may grant a waiver of
the requirement under this section if the board determines a teacher
has passed an equivalent subject area assessment for certification in
another state.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall establish the
definitions for a highly qualified teacher in conformance with P.L.
107-110 for teachers who do not meet the criteria of this section. The
superintendent shall also establish the definitions for a highly
qualified special education teacher in conformance with P.L. 108-446,
the individuals with disabilities education improvement act.

--- END ---