BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in 2003, the
United States ranked below at least ten other countries in the
mathematics scores of elementary and middle school students on the
trends in international mathematics and science study (TIMSS)
assessment. Since 1995, there has been little or no change in the
performance of our nation's students in mathematics. Conversely,
students from the nation of Singapore continually score at the very top
of students in other countries on the TIMSS assessment, and their
scores are well above the international average. The legislature
further finds that a key reason for the high level of performance of
Singapore students is a coherent, sequenced mathematics curriculum that
focuses on the core skills of mathematical problem solving. Therefore,
the legislature intends to adopt, on a statewide basis, the syllabus
and curriculum framework used by primary and secondary schools in
Singapore.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.070 and 2005 c 497 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
essential academic learning requirements that identify the knowledge
and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do
based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student
assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and
requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the state
board of education.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Periodically revise the essential academic learning
requirements, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW
28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the
maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goal four
and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the essential
academic learning requirements; and
(b) Review and prioritize the essential academic learning
requirements and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the
grade level content expectations to be assessed on the Washington
assessment of student learning and used for state or federal
accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and
identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an
emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content
expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content
expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of
expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing
depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and
reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven
working days, shall post on its web site any grade level content
expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing
the Washington assessment of student learning. The essential academic
learning requirements and grade level content expectations in the
content area of mathematics shall comply with section 3 of this act.
(3) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to
develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the
content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in
the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if
each student has mastered the essential academic learning requirements
identified in subsection (1) of this section. School districts shall
administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment system
shall include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures. By the 2008-09 school year,
the statewide academic assessment system in the content area of
mathematics shall be designed to assess student mastery of the
essential academic learning requirements under section 3 of this act.
(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the
essential academic learning requirements or the statewide assessments,
then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate
to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential
academic learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.
(5)(a) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results
under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate
instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational
support for students who have not mastered the essential academic
learning requirements at the appropriate periods in the student's
educational development.
(b) Assessments measuring the essential academic learning
requirements in the content area of science shall be available for
mandatory use in middle schools and high schools by the 2003-04 school
year and for mandatory use in elementary schools by the 2004-05 school
year unless the legislature takes action to delay or prevent
implementation of the assessment.
(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics
shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to
determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content
areas from one school year to the next.
(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide
educational support to individual students, the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance
information as possible within the constraints of the assessment
system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school
districts:
(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may
provide additional achievement information for individual students; and
(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to
evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall
be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and
easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily
shared with parents and students.
(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall
integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.
(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall
be integrated in the essential academic learning requirements and
assessments for goals one and two.
(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly
related to the essential academic learning requirements, and are not
biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic
backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.
(11) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of special education students when developing the
assessments under this section.
(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the
unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments
under this section.
(13) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's web site
lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts,
and health and fitness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
The essential academic learning requirements and grade level
content expectations in mathematics shall focus on mathematical problem
solving. Through a planned and sequenced curriculum framework,
students shall learn the basic mathematical concepts and knowledge
needed for solving problems; develop and perform a range of
manipulative skills when solving problems; gain thinking and problem
solving skills and apply them to mathematical problems; and develop
confidence in using mathematics. In developing the essential academic
learning requirements and grade level content expectations in
mathematics, the superintendent of public instruction shall incorporate
the content, syllabus, sequence, and curriculum framework implemented
by the ministry of education in Singapore for use in primary and
secondary grades. The essential academic learning requirements and
grade level content expectations under this section shall be fully
implemented in all public schools by the 2008-09 school year.

--- END ---