BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.85.010 and 1986 c 136 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Accredited" means accredited by an accrediting agency
recognized by the United States department of education.
(2) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(((2))) (3) "Degree" means any designation, appellation, letters,
or words including but not limited to "associate," "bachelor,"
"master," "doctor," or "fellow" which signify or purport to signify
satisfactory completion of the requirements of an academic program of
study beyond the secondary school level.
(((3))) (4) "Degree-granting institution" means an entity that
offers educational credentials, instruction, or services prerequisite
to or indicative of an academic or professional degree beyond the
secondary level.
(5) "Grant" means award, bestow, confer, convey, sell, or give.
(6) "Offer," in addition to its usual meanings, means advertise,
publicize, or solicit.
(7) "Operate" includes but is not limited to the following:
(a) Offering courses in person, by correspondence, or by electronic
media at or to any Washington location for degree credit;
(b) Granting or offering to grant degrees in Washington;
(c) Maintaining or advertising a Washington location, mailing
address, computer server, or telephone number, for any purpose, other
than for contact with the institution's former students for any
legitimate purpose related to the students having attended the
institution.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.85.020 and 2005 c 274 s 246 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board:
(a) Shall adopt by rule, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW,
minimum standards for degree-granting institutions concerning granting
of degrees, quality of education, unfair business practices, financial
stability, and other necessary measures to protect citizens of this
state against substandard, fraudulent, or deceptive practices. The
rules ((may)) shall require that an institution operating in
Washington:
(i) Be accredited ((or be making progress toward accreditation by
an accrediting agency recognized by the United States department of
education. The board shall adopt the rules in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW));
(ii) Have applied for accreditation and such application is pending
before the accrediting agency; or
(iii) Have been granted a waiver by the board waiving the
requirement of accreditation;
(b) May investigate any entity the board reasonably believes to be
subject to the jurisdiction of this chapter. In connection with the
investigation, the board may administer oaths and affirmations, issue
subpoenas and compel attendance, take evidence, and require the
production of any books, papers, correspondence, memorandums, or other
records which the board deems relevant or material to the
investigation. The board, including its staff and any other authorized
persons, may conduct site inspections, the cost of which shall be borne
by the institution, and examine records of all institutions subject to
this chapter;
(c) Shall develop an interagency agreement with the work force
training and education coordinating board to regulate degree-granting
private vocational schools with respect to degree and nondegree
programs; and
(d) Shall develop and disseminate information to the public about
entities that sell or award degrees without requiring appropriate
academic achievement at the postsecondary level, including but not
limited to, a description of the substandard and potentially fraudulent
practices of these entities, and advice about how the public can
recognize and avoid the entities. To the extent feasible, the
information shall include links to additional resources that may assist
the public in identifying specific institutions offering substandard or
fraudulent degree programs.
(2) Financial disclosures provided to the board by degree-granting
private vocational schools are not subject to public disclosure under
chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.85.040 and 2004 c 96 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((An institution or person shall not advertise, offer, sell, or
award a degree or any other type of educational credential unless the
student has enrolled in and successfully completed a prescribed program
of study, as outlined in the institution's publications. This
prohibition shall not apply to honorary credentials clearly designated
as such on the front side of the diploma or certificate and awarded by
institutions offering other educational credentials in compliance with
state law)) No person may offer or grant a false or misleading degree
or other document that purports to confer a degree that is false or
misleading.
(a) For purposes of this subsection, a degree or other document
that purports to confer a degree is false or misleading if it states or
suggests that the person named in the degree or document has completed
the requirements of an academic or professional program of study in a
particular field beyond the secondary level, but the person in fact has
not completed the requirements of such a program of study.
(b) Any person or entity that violates this subsection is subject
to a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars for each
violation. The penalty may be imposed by the board or by any court of
competent jurisdiction.
(2) No exemption or waiver granted under this chapter is permanent.
The board shall periodically review exempted degree-granting
institutions and degree-granting institutions granted a waiver, and
continue exemptions or waivers only if an institution meets the
statutory or board requirements for exemption or waiver in effect on
the date of the review.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, this
chapter shall not apply to:
(a) Any public college, university, community college, technical
college, or institute operating as part of the public higher
educational system of this state;
(b) Institutions that have been accredited by an accrediting
association recognized by the agency for the purposes of this chapter:
PROVIDED, That those institutions meet minimum exemption standards
adopted by the agency; and PROVIDED FURTHER, That an institution,
branch, extension, or facility operating within the state of Washington
which is affiliated with an institution operating in another state must
be a separately accredited member institution of any such accrediting
association to qualify for this exemption;
(c) Institutions of a religious character, but only as to those
education programs devoted exclusively to religious or theological
objectives if the programs are represented in an accurate manner in
institutional catalogs and other official publications;
(d) Honorary credentials clearly designated as such on the front
side of the diploma or certificate awarded by institutions offering
other educational credentials in compliance with state law; or
(e) Institutions not otherwise exempt which offer only workshops or
seminars and institutions offering only credit-bearing workshops or
seminars lasting no longer than three calendar days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.85 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Unless the person clearly specifies in writing that the degree
was awarded or conferred by an institution not authorized by the board
or accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States
department of education, no person may in writing claim or represent to
have a degree or other document that purports to evidence participation
in or completion of courses or a program of study if the degree or
document was not issued by:
(a) An accredited degree-granting institution;
(b) An entity authorized as a degree-granting institution by the
board;
(c) An entity exempt from the requirement of authorization as a
degree-granting institution by the board;
(d) An entity that has been granted a waiver by the board from the
requirement of authorization by the board; or
(e) A foreign degree-granting institution.
(2) As used in this section, "foreign degree-granting institution"
means a public or private college or university, either profit or
nonprofit, that:
(a) Is domiciled in a foreign country;
(b) Offers in its country of domicile credentials, instruction, and
services prerequisite to the obtaining of an academic or professional
degree granted by such college or university; and
(c) Is authorized under the laws or regulations of its country of
domicile to operate a degree-granting institution in that country.
(3) Any person or entity that violates this section is subject to
a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars for each
violation. The penalty may be imposed by the board or by any court of
competent jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---