BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning February 1, 2007, and each February 1st thereafter, the
governor must report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
on tribal community impact contributions made pursuant to class III
gaming compacts entered into under RCW 9.46.360. The report must
include, at a minimum, the amount of funds contributed, the
distribution of those amounts, and an analysis of compliance with
compact provisions requiring such contributions, including a
description of methods used to verify compliance.

--- END ---