BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 2 through
6 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Allegedly responsible party" means a health care provider
alleged by the claimant to be responsible for at least some portion of
an injury to the claimant resulting from alleged professional
negligence in the provision of health care.
(2) "Amount recovered" means the total compensation, including the
reasonable value of nonmonetary compensation, that an attorney has
obtained on behalf of a claimant through settlement, arbitration, or
judgment, minus the reasonable costs and expenses incurred by the
attorney in prosecuting or settling the claim.
(3) "Claimant" means any natural person who, in his or her own
right, or vicariously, is seeking compensation in connection with a
claim under this chapter for personal injury or wrongful death as a
result of alleged professional negligence in the provision of health
care.
(4) "Collateral source" means compensation or benefits paid or
payable to the claimant or on the claimant's behalf, to compensate the
claimant for the injury complained of, regardless of the right of
recoupment of any other entity, through subrogation, trust agreement,
lien, or otherwise.
(5) "Contingent fee" means compensation, however calculated, that
is payable only if an amount is recovered.
(6) "Early settlement offer" means a settlement offer made in
accordance with section 2 of this act.
(7) "Economic damages" has the meaning provided in RCW 4.56.250.
(8) "Entity" includes an individual or person.
(9) "Noneconomic damages" has the meaning provided in RCW 4.56.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any civil action for damages brought under this chapter
against a health care provider based on alleged professional
negligence, an allegedly responsible party may make an early settlement
offer at any time prior to one hundred twenty days after the claim is
filed with a court. To qualify as an early settlement offer, the offer
must include a good faith offer to compensate the claimant for the
claimant's current and future economic damages suffered as a result of
the allegedly responsible party's act or omission, less collateral
source benefits available to the claimant, and for reasonable hourly
attorneys' fees for the claimant. The early settlement offer must be
in writing and communicated to the claimant by certified mail. The
offer must remain open for acceptance for a minimum of thirty days from
the date the offer is received by the claimant.
(2) An allegedly responsible party may amend or issue an additional
early settlement offer prior to one hundred twenty days after the
action is commenced. The claimant may extend the time for receiving
the offer beyond this period.
(3) An attorney who receives an early settlement offer shall
provide a true and complete copy of the offer to his or her client.
(4) A claimant who agrees in writing to an early settlement offer
may not bring or continue a civil action, based on the same alleged
professional negligence, against the allegedly responsible party who
made the early settlement offer or any other allegedly responsible
parties who joined in the early settlement offer under subsection (5)
of this section.
(5) An offer under subsection (1) of this section may include other
allegedly responsible parties who were involved in the events that gave
rise to the civil action, regardless of the theory of liability on
which the claim is based, with their consent. If, after an early
settlement offer is made and accepted, the participants in the offer
dispute their relative contributions to the payments to be made to the
claimant, such disputes shall be resolved through binding arbitration
in accordance with chapter 7.04 RCW.
(6) The claimant may reject an offer of compensation made under
subsection (1) of this section and elect to bring or maintain a civil
action for damages. Upon rejection of an offer of compensation that
complies with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the
claimant may recover damages in the civil action only if the claimant
proves by clear and convincing evidence that the allegedly responsible
party caused the injury by reckless, willful, or wanton conduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An attorney who represents a person alleging personal injury or
death resulting from professional negligence in the provision of health
care, and who represents the person on a contingent-fee basis, shall
send a demand for compensation by certified mail to each allegedly
responsible party prior to commencing a court action. In the event
that multiple allegedly responsible parties are known to the attorney,
a demand must be sent on the same date to each party. The demand must
specify the amount of compensation sought and must set forth the
material facts, documentary evidence, and other information relevant to
the demand, including:
(a) The name and address of the claimant or of the person on whose
behalf the claim is being made;
(b) A brief description of how the injury or loss occurred;
(c) The names and, if known, the addresses and telephone numbers of
all known witnesses to the injury or loss;
(d) Copies of photographs in the claimant's possession which relate
to the injury or loss;
(e) The basis for claiming that the party to whom the demand is
addressed is responsible or partially responsible for the injury or
loss;
(f) A description of the nature of the injury or loss, including
the dates and nature of the care or services provided, and the names
and addresses of all physicians and other health care providers that
provided medical care or services to the claimant or injured party;
(g) Medical records relating to the injury, including those
involving a prior injury or preexisting medical condition which would
be discoverable by the allegedly responsible party during the course of
litigation or, in lieu thereof, executed releases authorizing the
allegedly responsible party to obtain the records directly from those
health care providers who provided treatment to the claimant; and
(h) Documentation of any medical expenses, lost wages, personal
losses, and other economic and noneconomic damages suffered as a
consequence of the injury or loss.
(2) The attorney shall mail copies of each demand to the claimant
and to each allegedly responsible party.
(3) A claimant's attorney who learns of an additional allegedly
responsible party after making a demand for compensation under
subsection (1) of this section shall send a demand for compensation to
the newly discovered allegedly responsible party and simultaneously
mail a copy of the demand to each of the other allegedly responsible
parties and to the claimant.
(4) In the event that a claimant's attorney learns of an additional
allegedly responsible party more than ninety days after making a demand
for compensation under subsection (1) of this section, the attorney
shall not be required to send a demand to that party nor do the fee
limitations imposed under section 5 (1) and (2) of this act apply with
regard to an amount recovered from that party, except as provided by
this subsection. An attorney who fails as a result of a breach of the
standard of care to learn of an additional allegedly responsible party
within ninety days of sending a demand for compensation to another
allegedly responsible party shall not collect a fee in excess of that
allowed under section 5 (1) and (2) of this act with respect to an
amount recovered from the additional allegedly responsible party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
An allegedly responsible party is under no obligation to issue a
response to a demand for compensation made under section 3 of this act.
The fact that a demand for compensation was or was not made, the fact
that an early settlement offer was or was not made, and the amount of
any demand or settlement offer made are inadmissible at a trial arising
from the injury or loss.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An attorney who represents a claimant who has accepted an early
settlement offer under section 2 of this act shall not collect an
amount as compensation for the attorney's services that is more than
the attorney's reasonable hourly fees for the services performed.
(2) An attorney who represents a claimant who has rejected or
failed to accept an early settlement offer shall not collect a
contingent fee that is greater than twenty percent of the amount of the
early settlement offer plus the percentage of the amount recovered in
excess of the early settlement offer as was agreed to by the claimant
and the attorney.
(3) A claimant's attorney who has failed to make a demand for
compensation under section 3 of this act, or who has omitted from the
demand any information required under section 3 of this act of a
material nature which the attorney had in his or her possession, or
which was readily available to him or her, or of which the attorney had
knowledge, shall not collect a contingent fee greater than twenty
percent of the amount recovered.
(4) A claimant's attorney who has failed to provide his or her
client a true and complete copy of an early settlement offer received
by the attorney, as required under section 2 of this act, shall not
collect a contingent fee greater than twenty percent of the amount
recovered.
(5) An attorney shall disclose, plainly and in writing, to
claimants whom the attorney proposes to represent on a contingent-fee
basis: (a) The fee limitations imposed by this section; and (b) the
fact that such limitations are maximum limits and that the attorney and
claimant may negotiate a lower fee.
The attorney shall also provide to each claimant a copy of this
act.
(6) The fee limitations imposed by this section may not be waived.
(7) This section applies to all attorneys practicing in this state,
including attorneys prosecuting claims filed in federal court, to the
maximum extent permitted by federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW
to read as follows:
A fiduciary relationship applies with respect to a fee agreement
between an attorney and a claimant.

Sec. 7 RCW 7.70.070 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The court shall, in any action under this chapter, determine
the reasonableness of each party's attorneys fees. The court shall
take into consideration the following:
(((1))) (a) The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty
of the questions involved, and the skill requisite to perform the legal
service properly;
(((2))) (b) The likelihood, if apparent to the client, that the
acceptance of the particular employment will preclude other employment
by the lawyer;
(((3))) (c) The fee customarily charged in the locality for similar
legal services;
(((4))) (d) The amount involved and the results obtained;
(((5))) (e) The time limitations imposed by the client or by the
circumstances;
(((6))) (f) The nature and length of the professional relationship
with the client;
(((7))) (g) The experience, reputation, and ability of the lawyer
or lawyers performing the services;
(((8))) (h) Whether the fee is fixed or contingent.
(2) An attorney's contingency fee is limited to the maximum
permissible fee allowed under section 5 of this act.

--- END ---