BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.40.050 and 2003 c 111 s 1005 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As provided in this section, county auditors shall provide
special absentee ballots to be used for state primary or state general
elections. An auditor shall provide a special absentee ballot only to
a registered voter who completes an application stating that she or he
will be unable to vote and return a regular absentee ballot by normal
mail delivery within the period provided for regular absentee ballots.
The application for a special absentee ballot may not be filed
earlier than ninety days before the applicable state primary or general
election. The special absentee ballot will list the offices and
measures, if known, scheduled to appear on the state primary or general
election ballot. The voter may use the special absentee ballot to
write in the name of any eligible candidate for each office and vote on
any measure.
(2) With any special absentee ballot issued under this section, the
county auditor shall include a listing of any candidates who have filed
before the time of the application for offices that will appear on the
ballot at that primary or election and a list of any issues that have
been referred to the ballot before the time of the application.
(3) Write-in votes on special absentee ballots must be counted in
the same manner provided by law for the counting of other write-in
votes. The county auditor shall process and canvass the special
absentee ballots provided under this section in the same manner as
other absentee ballots under this chapter and chapter 29A.60 RCW.
However, a special absentee ballot of an overseas voter or a service
voter may not be counted:
(a) In the case of a ballot submitted by an overseas voter who is
not a service voter, if the ballot is submitted from any location in
the United States;
(b) If the application of the overseas voter or service voter does
not include the overseas voter or service voter's name, complete
residence address, date of birth, and a signature attesting to the
truth of the information provided on the application;
(c) If the application of the overseas voter or service voter for
a regular absentee ballot is received by the county auditor after the
later date of:
(i) The deadline for receipt of such application; or
(ii) The date that is thirty days before the general or special
election; or
(d) If a regular absentee ballot of an overseas voter or service
voter is received by the county auditor by the deadline for receipt of
other absentee ballots under this chapter and chapter 29A.60 RCW.
(4) A voter who requests a special absentee ballot under this
section may also request an absentee ballot under RCW 29A.40.020(4).
If the regular absentee ballot is properly voted and returned, the
special absentee ballot is void, and the county auditor shall reject it
in whole when special absentee ballots are canvassed.

--- END ---