BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.216 and 2004 c 271 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor of each county shall be ex officio the
supervisor of all primaries and elections, general or special, and ((it
shall be)) the county ((auditor's duty to)) auditor must: Provide
places for holding ((such)) primaries and elections; ((to)) establish
procedures that address potential conflicts of interest for a person
administrating or conducting elections; appoint the precinct election
officers and ((to)) provide for their compensation; ((to)) provide the
supplies and materials necessary for the conduct of elections to the
precinct election officers; and ((to)) publish and post notices of
calling ((such)) primaries and elections in the manner provided by law.
The notice of a primary held in an even-numbered year must indicate
that the office of precinct committee officer will be on the ballot.
The auditor shall also apportion to each city, town, or district, and
to the state of Washington in the odd-numbered year, its share of the
expense of such primaries and elections. This section does not apply
to general or special elections for any city, town, or district that is
not subject to RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330, but all such elections
must be held and conducted at the time, in the manner, and by the
officials (with such notice, requirements for filing for office, and
certifications by local officers) as provided and required by the laws
governing such elections.

--- END ---