BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.410 and 2003 c 111 s 146 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every city, town, and district is liable for its proportionate
share of the costs when such elections are held in conjunction with
other elections held under RCW ((29A.04.320)) 29A.04.321 and
29A.04.330. The proportionate share of each city, town, and district
shall not include any costs associated with a revote due to county
error in elections.
Whenever any city, town, or district holds any primary or election,
general or special, on an isolated date, all costs of such elections
must be borne by the city, town, or district concerned.
The purpose of this section is to clearly establish that the county
is not responsible for any costs involved in the holding of any city,
town, or district election, except when a revote is necessary due to
errors made by the county.
In recovering such election expenses, including a reasonable pro-ration of administrative costs, the county auditor shall certify the
cost to the county treasurer with a copy to the clerk or auditor of the
city, town, or district concerned. Upon receipt of such certification,
the county treasurer shall make the transfer from any available and
appropriate city, town, or district funds to the county current expense
fund or to the county election reserve fund if such a fund is
established. Each city, town, or district must be promptly notified by
the county treasurer whenever such transfer has been completed.
However, in those districts wherein a treasurer, other than the county
treasurer, has been appointed such transfer procedure does not apply,
but the district shall promptly issue its warrant for payment of
election costs.

--- END ---