BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.68.110 and 2003 c 111 s 1711 are each amended to
read as follows:
((No)) An election ((may)) must be set aside on account of illegal
votes((, unless it appears that an amount)) if the number of illegal
votes ((has been given to)) exceeds the margin of victory of the person
whose right is being contested((, that, if taken from that person,
would reduce the number of the person's legal votes below the number of
votes given to some other person for the same office, after deducting
therefrom the illegal votes that may be shown to have been given to the
other person)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an election is rendered void under RCW 29A.68.120, a special
election must be held between the candidates who were on the ballot for
that election. The special election must be held on a date provided
for in RCW 29A.04.321 as determined by the official empowered by state
law to issue the original certificate of election.
(2)(a) If the election rendered void is a general election and the
special election cannot be held before the beginning of the term of the
contested office, the office must be temporarily filled until the
special election is held and the results are certified. The office
will be filled according to RCW 29A.60.221 with the top two vote
getters, without regard to illegal votes, participating in the lot
procedure as if they had tied in the election.
(b) If the election rendered void is a primary election, the
candidate to be declared nominated and placed on the general election
ballot will be determined according to RCW 29A.60.221 with the top two
vote getters, without regard to illegal votes, participating in the lot
procedure as if they had tied in the election.
(3) If a candidate in the void election has been found by the
superior court to have participated in improper conduct or the
procurement of illegal votes, he or she may not be put on the ballot
for the special election under subsection (1) of this section and may
not participate in the lot procedure under subsection (2) of this
section.

--- END ---