BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.07.050 and 2005 c 172 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is no privilege under RCW 7.07.030 for a mediation
communication that is:
(a) In an agreement evidenced by a record signed by all parties to
the agreement;
(b) Made during a session of a mediation which is open, or is
required by law to be open, to the public;
(c) A threat or statement of a plan to inflict bodily injury or
commit a crime of violence;
(d) Intentionally used to plan a crime, attempt to commit or commit
a crime, or to conceal an ongoing crime or ongoing criminal activity;
(e) Sought or offered to prove or disprove a claim or complaint of
professional misconduct or malpractice filed against a mediator;
(f) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
sought or offered to prove or disprove a claim or complaint of
professional misconduct or malpractice filed against a mediation party,
nonparty participant, or representative of a party based on conduct
occurring during a mediation; or
(g) Sought or offered to prove or disprove abuse, neglect,
abandonment, or exploitation in a proceeding in which a child or adult
protective services agency is a party, unless the public agency
participates in the child or adult protection mediation.
(2) There is no privilege under RCW 7.07.030 if a court finds,
after a hearing in camera, that the party seeking discovery or the
proponent of the evidence has shown that the evidence is not otherwise
available, that there is a need for the evidence that substantially
outweighs the interest in protecting confidentiality, and that the
mediation communication is sought or offered in:
(a) A criminal court proceeding involving a felony; or
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
a proceeding to prove a claim to rescind or reform or a defense to
avoid liability on a contract arising out of the mediation.
(3) A mediator may not be compelled to provide evidence of a
mediation communication referred to in subsection (1)(f) or (2)(b) of
this section.
(4) If a mediation communication is not privileged under subsection
(1) or (2) of this section, only the portion of the communication
necessary for the application of the exception from nondisclosure may
be admitted. Admission of evidence under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section does not render the evidence, or any other mediation
communication, discoverable or admissible for any other purpose.
(5) Records of mediation communications that are privileged under
this chapter are exempt from the requirements of chapter ((42.17))
42.56 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.53.9018 and 2005 c 18 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every registrant or licensee must file a semiannual report on
forms provided by the department setting forth the number of tons of
commercial feed distributed in or into this state. The report must be
filed regardless of the amount of feed distributed or inspection fees
owed. The report must include:
(a) The name and mailing address of the registrant or licensee;
(b) The physical address of the registrant or licensee;
(c) The name, contact information, and signature of the person
filing the report;
(d) The total number of tons distributed in or into this state;
(e) The total number of tons on which the registrant or licensee is
paying;
(f) If the registrant or licensee is not paying inspection fees on
all commercial feed he or she distributed in or into this state,
information regarding the registrants or licensees that are responsible
for paying the inspection fees and the number of tons involved; and
(g) Other information required by the department by rule.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) through (5) of this
section, each initial distributor or responsible buyer must pay to the
department an inspection fee on all commercial feed distributed by such
person during the reporting period. The inspection fee must accompany
the report required in subsection (1) of this section. The inspection
fee shall be not less than four cents nor more than twelve cents per
ton as prescribed by the department by rule. These fees shall be used
for enforcement and administration of this chapter and its rules.
(3) The initial distributor is not required to pay an inspection
fee for commercial feed he or she distributed to a responsible buyer.
(4) In a situation where a responsible buyer is distributing to
another responsible buyer, the inspection fee must be paid by the last
responsible buyer to distribute the commercial feed.
(5) The initial distributor or responsible buyer is not required to
pay an inspection fee for: (a) Pet food and specialty pet food
distributed in packages weighing less than ten pounds; (b) distribution
of bona fide experimental feeds on which accurate records and
experimental programs are maintained; (c) commercial feed distributed
to points outside this state; and (d) food processing byproducts from
fruit, vegetable, or potato processing plants, freezing or dehydrating
facilities, or juice or jelly preserving plants.
(6) Tonnage will be reported and inspection fees will be paid on
(a) byproducts or products of sugar refineries; and (b) materials used
in the preparation of pet foods and specialty pet food.
(7)(a) Each person made responsible by this chapter for filing a
report or paying inspection fees must do so according to the following
schedule:
(i) For the period January 1st through June 30th of each year, the
report and inspection fees are due on July 31st of that year; and
(ii) For the period July 1st through December 31st of each year,
the report and inspection fees are due on January 31st of the following
year.
(b) If a complete report is not received by the due date or the
appropriate inspection fees are not received by the due date, the
person responsible for filing the report or paying the inspection fee
must pay a late fee equal to fifteen percent of the inspection fee owed
or fifty dollars, whichever is greater.
(c) The department may cancel the registration of a person's
commercial feed or may cancel a person's commercial feed license if
that person fails to pay the late fee. The applicant or licensee may
request a hearing as authorized under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(8) If inspection fees are owed, the minimum inspection fee is
twelve dollars and fifty cents.
(9) For the purpose of verifying the accuracy of reports and
payment of appropriate inspection fees, the department may examine, at
reasonable times, a registrant's or licensee's distribution records and
may require each registrant or licensee to maintain records or file
additional reports. These records must be maintained in usable
condition by the registrant or licensee for a period of three years
unless by rule this retention period is extended and must be submitted
to the department upon request.
(10) The report required by subsection (1) of this section shall
not be a public record, and any information given in such report which
would reveal the business operation of the person making the report is
exempt from public disclosure under chapter ((42.17)) 42.56 RCW, and
information obtained by the department from other governmental agencies
or other sources that is used to verify information received in the
report is exempt from public disclosure under chapter ((42.17)) 42.56
RCW. However, this subsection does not prevent the use of information
concerning the business operation of a person if any action, suit, or
proceeding instituted under the authority of this chapter, including
any civil action for collection of unpaid inspection fees, which action
is hereby authorized and which shall be as an action at law in the name
of the director of the department.
(11) Any commercial feed obtained by a consumer or contract feeder
outside the jurisdiction of this state and brought into this state for
use is subject to all the provisions of this chapter, including
inspection fees.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.20.390 and 2005 c 33 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To ensure the proper delivery of services and the maintenance
and improvement in quality of care through self-review, any boarding
home licensed under this chapter may maintain a quality assurance
committee that, at a minimum, includes:
(a) A licensed registered nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW;
(b) The administrator; and
(c) Three other members from the staff of the boarding home.
(2) When established, the quality assurance committee shall meet at
least quarterly to identify issues that may adversely affect quality of
care and services to residents and to develop and implement plans of
action to correct identified quality concerns or deficiencies in the
quality of care provided to residents.
(3) To promote quality of care through self-review without the fear
of reprisal, and to enhance the objectivity of the review process, the
department shall not require, and the long-term care ombudsman program
shall not request, disclosure of any quality assurance committee
records or reports, unless the disclosure is related to the committee's
compliance with this section, if:
(a) The records or reports are not maintained pursuant to statutory
or regulatory mandate; and
(b) The records or reports are created for and collected and
maintained by the committee.
(4) If the boarding home refuses to release records or reports that
would otherwise be protected under this section, the department may
then request only that information that is necessary to determine
whether the boarding home has a quality assurance committee and to
determine that it is operating in compliance with this section.
However, if the boarding home offers the department documents generated
by, or for, the quality assurance committee as evidence of compliance
with boarding home requirements, the documents are protected as quality
assurance committee documents under subsections (6) and (8) of this
section when in the possession of the department. The department is
not liable for an inadvertent disclosure, a disclosure related to a
required federal or state audit, or disclosure of documents incorrectly
marked as quality assurance committee documents by the facility.
(5) Good faith attempts by the committee to identify and correct
quality deficiencies shall not be used as a basis for sanctions.
(6) Information and documents, including the analysis of complaints
and incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and
maintained by, a quality assurance committee are not subject to
discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no
person who was in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who
participated in the creation, collection, or maintenance of information
or documents specifically for the committee shall be permitted or
required to testify as to the content of such proceedings or the
documents and information prepared specifically for the committee.
This subsection does not preclude:
(a) In any civil action, the discovery of the identity of persons
involved in the care that is the basis of the civil action whose
involvement was independent of any quality improvement committee
activity;
(b) In any civil action, the testimony of any person concerning the
facts which form the basis for the institution of such proceedings of
which the person had personal knowledge acquired independently of their
participation in the quality assurance committee activities.
(7) A quality assurance committee under subsection (1) of this
section, RCW 70.41.200, 74.42.640, 4.24.250, or 43.70.510 may share
information and documents, including the analysis of complaints and
incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and
maintained by, the committee, with one or more other quality assurance
committees created under subsection (1) of this section, RCW 70.41.200,
74.42.640, 4.24.250, or 43.70.510 for the improvement of the quality of
care and services rendered to boarding home residents. Information and
documents disclosed by one quality assurance committee to another
quality assurance committee and any information and documents created
or maintained as a result of the sharing of information and documents
shall not be subject to the discovery process and confidentiality shall
be respected as required by subsections (6) and (8) of this section,
RCW 43.70.510(4), 70.41.200(3), 4.24.250(1), and 74.42.640 (7) and (9).
The privacy protections of chapter 70.02 RCW and the federal health
insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 and its
implementing regulations apply to the sharing of individually
identifiable patient information held by a coordinated quality
improvement program. Any rules necessary to implement this section
shall meet the requirements of applicable federal and state privacy
laws.
(8) Information and documents, including the analysis of complaints
and incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and
maintained by, a quality assurance committee are exempt from disclosure
under chapter ((42.17)) 42.56 RCW.
(9) Notwithstanding any records created for the quality assurance
committee, the facility shall fully set forth in the resident's
records, available to the resident, the department, and others as
permitted by law, the facts concerning any incident of injury or loss
to the resident, the steps taken by the facility to address the
resident's needs, and the resident outcome.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.60.165 and 2005 c 243 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the voter neglects to sign the outside envelope of an
absentee or provisional ballot, the auditor shall notify the voter by
telephone and advise the voter of the correct procedures for completing
the unsigned affidavit. If the auditor is not able to provide the
information personally to the voter by telephone, then the voter must
be contacted by first class mail and advised of the correct procedures
for completing the unsigned affidavit. Leaving a voice mail message
for the voter is not to be considered as personally contacting the
voter. In order for the ballot to be counted, the voter must either:
(a) Appear in person and sign the envelope no later than the day
before the certification of the primary or election; or
(b) Sign a copy of the envelope provided by the auditor, and return
it to the auditor no later than the day before the certification of the
primary or election.
(2)(a) If the handwriting of the signature on an absentee or
provisional ballot envelope is not the same as the handwriting of the
signature on the registration file, the auditor shall notify the voter
by telephone and advise the voter of the correct procedures for
updating his or her signature on the voter registration file. If the
auditor is not able to provide the information personally to the voter
by telephone, then the voter must be contacted by first class mail and
advised of the correct procedures for completing the unsigned
affidavit. Leaving a voice mail message for the voter is not to be
considered as personally contacting the voter. In order for the ballot
to be counted, the voter must either:
(i) Appear in person and sign a new registration form no later than
the day before the certification of the primary or election; or
(ii) Sign a copy of the affidavit provided by the auditor and
return it to the auditor no later than the day before the certification
of the primary or election. If the signature on the copy of the
affidavit does not match the signature on file, the voter must appear
in person and sign a new registration form no later than the day before
the certification of the primary or election in order for the ballot to
be counted.
(b) If the signature on an absentee or provisional ballot envelope
is not the same as the signature on the registration file because the
name is different, the ballot may be counted as long as the handwriting
is clearly the same. The auditor shall send the voter a change-of-name
form under RCW 29A.08.440 and direct the voter to complete the form.
(c) If the signature on an absentee or provisional ballot envelope
is not the same as the signature on the registration file because the
voter used initials or a common nickname, the ballot may be counted as
long as the surname and handwriting are clearly the same.
(3) A voter may not cure a missing or mismatched signature for
purposes of counting the ballot in a recount.
(4) A record must be kept of all ballots with missing and
mismatched signatures. The record must contain the date on which the
voter was contacted or the notice was mailed, as well as the date on
which the voter signed the envelope, a copy of the envelope, a new
registration form, or a change-of-name form. That record is a public
record under chapter ((42.17)) 42.56 RCW and may be disclosed to
interested parties on written request.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.31.405 and 2005 c 432 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as set forth in this section, proceedings, hearings,
notices, correspondence, reports, records, and other information in the
possession of the commissioner relating to the supervision of any
insurer under this chapter are confidential and are not subject to
chapter ((42.17)) 42.56 RCW, are not subject to subpoena, and are not
subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil
action, except as provided by this section. However, the commissioner
is authorized to use the documents, materials, or other information in
the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought as part of
the commissioner's official duties.
(2) The employees of the commissioner have access to these
proceedings, hearings, notices, correspondence, reports, records, or
information as permitted by the commissioner. Neither the commissioner
nor any person who received documents, materials, or other information
while acting under the authority of the commissioner is permitted or
required to testify in any private civil action concerning any
confidential documents, materials, or information subject to subsection
(1) of this section.
(3) The commissioner may share the notices, correspondence,
reports, records, or information with other state, federal, and
international regulatory agencies, with the national association of
insurance commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and with
state, federal, and international law enforcement authorities, if the
commissioner determines that the disclosure is necessary or proper for
the enforcement of the laws of this or another state of the United
States, and provided that the recipient agrees to maintain the
confidentiality of the documents, material, or other information. No
waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality may
occur as a result of the sharing of documents, materials, or other
information under this subsection.
(4) The commissioner may open the proceedings or hearings or make
public the notices, correspondence, reports, records, or other
information if the commissioner deems that it is in the best interest
of the public or in the best interest of the insurer or its insureds,
creditors, or the general public. However, the determination of
whether to disclose any confidential information at the public
proceedings or hearings is subject to applicable law.
(5) This section does not apply to hearings, notices,
correspondence, reports, records, or other information obtained upon
the appointment of a receiver for the insurer by a court of competent
jurisdiction.

Sec. 6 RCW 42.56.250 and 2005 c 274 s 405 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following employment and licensing information is exempt from
public inspection and copying under this chapter:
(1) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
to administer a license, employment, or academic examination;
(2) All applications for public employment, including the names of
applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect
to an applicant;
(3) The residential addresses ((or)), residential telephone
numbers, personal wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail
addresses, social security numbers, and emergency contact information
of employees or volunteers of a public agency, and the names, dates of
birth, residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, personal
wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail addresses, social
security numbers, and emergency contact information of dependents of
employees or volunteers of a public agency that are held by any public
agency in personnel records, public employment related records, or
volunteer rosters, or are included in any mailing list of employees or
volunteers of any public agency. For purposes of this subsection,
"employees" includes independent provider home care workers as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240;
(4) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency
employee: (a) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by
the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in
connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
against the person; and (b) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed;
(5) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency
conducting a current investigation of a possible unfair practice under
chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other federal, state,
or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment; and
(6) Except as provided in RCW 47.64.220, salary and employee
benefit information collected under RCW 47.64.220(1) and described in
RCW 47.64.220(2).

Sec. 7 RCW 42.56.270 and 2005 c 274 s 407 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and 43.168 RCW,
or during application for economic development loans or program
services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011; ((and))
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
community, trade, and economic development:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development pursuant to RCW 43.330.050(8) and 43.330.080(4); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the office of the governor in connection with the
siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that
person's business and until a siting decision is made, identifying
information of any person supplying information under this subsection
and the locations being considered for siting, relocation, or expansion
of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of community, trade, and
economic development based on information as described in (a)(i) of
this subsection, any work product is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of community, trade, and economic development from a
person connected with siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or
relocation of that person's business, information described in (a)(ii)
of this subsection will be available to the public under this chapter;
and
(13) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information.

Sec. 8 RCW 42.56.330 and 2005 c 274 s 413 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following information relating to public utilities and
transportation is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095;
(2) The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of
the customers of a public utility contained in the records or lists
held by the public utility of which they are customers, except that
this information may be released to the division of child support or
the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another
state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order;
(3) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service; however, these records may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides;
(4) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons;
(5) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes and other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose this information to a person, employer,
educational institution, or other entity that is responsible, in whole
or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit
pass or other fare payment media, or to the news media when reporting
on public transportation or public safety. This information may also
be disclosed at the agency's discretion to governmental agencies or
groups concerned with public transportation or public safety;
(6) Records of any person that belong to a public utility district
or a municipally owned electrical utility, unless the law enforcement
authority provides the public utility district or municipally owned
electrical utility with a written statement in which the authority
states that it suspects that the particular person to whom the records
pertain has committed a crime and the authority has a reasonable belief
that the records could determine or help determine whether the
suspicion might be true. Information obtained in violation of this
subsection is inadmissible in any criminal proceeding; ((and))
(7) Any information obtained by governmental agencies that is
collected by the use of a motor carrier intelligent transportation
system or any comparable information equipment attached to a truck,
tractor, or trailer; however, the information may be given to other
governmental agencies or the owners of the truck, tractor, or trailer
from which the information is obtained. As used in this subsection,
"motor carrier" has the same definition as provided in RCW 81.80.010;
and
(8) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transponders or other technology to facilitate payment of
tolls. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form as long as
the data does not contain any personally identifying information. For
these purposes aggregate data may include the census tract of the
account holder as long as any individual personally identifying
information is not released. Personally identifying information may be
released to law enforcement agencies only for toll enforcement
purposes. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies for other purposes only if the request is
accompanied by a court order.

Sec. 9 RCW 42.56.360 and 2005 c 274 s 416 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following health care information is exempt from disclosure
under this chapter:
(a) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090;
(b) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420;
(c) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee under RCW
43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250, or by a quality assurance committee pursuant to RCW 74.42.640
or 18.20.390, regardless of which agency is in possession of the
information and documents;
(d)(i) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310;
(ii) If a request for such information is received, the submitting
entity must be notified of the request. Within ten business days of
receipt of the notice, the submitting entity shall provide a written
statement of the continuing need for confidentiality, which shall be
provided to the requester. Upon receipt of such notice, the department
of health shall continue to treat information designated under this
subsection (1)(d) as exempt from disclosure;
(iii) If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality;
(e) Records of the entity obtained in an action under RCW 18.71.300
through 18.71.340;
(f) Except for published statistical compilations and reports
relating to the infant mortality review studies that do not identify
individual cases and sources of information, any records or documents
obtained, prepared, or maintained by the local health department for
the purposes of an infant mortality review conducted by the department
of health under RCW 70.05.170; and
(g) Complaints filed under chapter 18.130 RCW after July 27, 1997,
to the extent provided in RCW 18.130.095(1).
(2) Chapter 70.02 RCW applies to public inspection and copying of
health care information of patients.

Sec. 10 RCW 74.15.310 and 2005 c 473 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and maintain a toll-free
telephone number, and an interactive web-based system through which
persons may obtain information regarding child day-care centers and
family day-care providers. This number shall be available twenty-four
hours a day for persons to request information. The department shall
respond to recorded messages left at the number within two business
days. The number shall be published in reasonably available printed
and electronic media. The number shall be easily identifiable as a
number through which persons may obtain information regarding child
day-care centers and family day-care providers as set forth in this
section.
(2) Through the toll-free telephone line established by this
section, the department shall provide information to callers about:
(a) Whether a day-care provider is licensed; (b) whether a day-care
provider's license is current; (c) the general nature of any
enforcement against the providers; (d) how to report suspected or
observed noncompliance with licensing requirements; (e) how to report
alleged abuse or neglect in a day care; (f) how to report health,
safety, and welfare concerns in a day care; (g) how to receive follow-up assistance, including information on the office of the family and
children's ombudsman; and (h) how to receive referral information on
other agencies or entities that may be of further assistance to the
caller.
(3) Beginning in January 2006, the department shall print the toll-free number established by this section on the face of new licenses
issued to child day-care centers and family day-care providers.
(4) This section shall not be construed to require the disclosure
of any information that is exempt from public disclosure under chapter
((42.17)) 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 11 RCW 74.15.320 and 2005 c 473 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every child day-care center and family day-care provider shall
prominently post the following items, clearly visible to parents and
staff:
(a) The license issued under this chapter;
(b) The department's toll-free telephone number established by RCW
74.15.310;
(c) The notice of any pending enforcement action. The notice must
be posted immediately upon receipt. The notice must be posted for at
least two weeks or until the violation causing the enforcement action
is corrected, whichever is longer;
(d) A notice that inspection reports and any notices of enforcement
actions for the previous three years are available from the licensee
and the department; and
(e) Any other information required by the department.
(2) The department shall disclose, upon request, the receipt,
general nature, and resolution or current status of all complaints on
record with the department after July 24, 2005, against a child day-care center or family day-care provider that result in an enforcement
action.
This section shall not be construed to require the disclosure of
any information that is exempt from public disclosure under chapter
((42.17)) 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 12 RCW 74.15.330 and 2005 c 473 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every child day-care center and family day-care provider shall
have readily available for review by the department, parents, and the
public a copy of each inspection report and notice of enforcement
action received by the center or provider from the department for the
past three years. This subsection only applies to reports and notices
received on or after July 24, 2005.
(2) The department shall make available to the public during
business hours all inspection reports and notices of enforcement
actions involving child day-care centers and family day-care providers
consistent with chapter ((42.17)) 42.56 RCW. The department shall
include in the inspection report a statement of the corrective measures
taken by the center or provider.

Sec. 13 RCW 74.42.640 and 2005 c 33 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To ensure the proper delivery of services and the maintenance
and improvement in quality of care through self-review, each facility
may maintain a quality assurance committee that, at a minimum,
includes:
(a) The director of nursing services;
(b) A physician designated by the facility; and
(c) Three other members from the staff of the facility.
(2) When established, the quality assurance committee shall meet at
least quarterly to identify issues that may adversely affect quality of
care and services to residents and to develop and implement plans of
action to correct identified quality concerns or deficiencies in the
quality of care provided to residents.
(3) To promote quality of care through self-review without the fear
of reprisal, and to enhance the objectivity of the review process, the
department shall not require, and the long-term care ombudsman program
shall not request, disclosure of any quality assurance committee
records or reports, unless the disclosure is related to the committee's
compliance with this section, if:
(a) The records or reports are not maintained pursuant to statutory
or regulatory mandate; and
(b) The records or reports are created for and collected and
maintained by the committee.
(4) The department may request only information related to the
quality assurance committee that may be necessary to determine whether
a facility has a quality assurance committee and that it is operating
in compliance with this section.
(5) Good faith attempts by the committee to identify and correct
quality deficiencies shall not be used as a basis for imposing
sanctions.
(6) If the facility offers the department documents generated by,
or for, the quality assurance committee as evidence of compliance with
nursing facility requirements, the documents are protected as quality
assurance committee documents under subsections (7) and (9) of this
section when in the possession of the department. The department is
not liable for an inadvertent disclosure, a disclosure related to a
required federal or state audit, or disclosure of documents incorrectly
marked as quality assurance committee documents by the facility.
(7) Information and documents, including the analysis of complaints
and incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and
maintained by, a quality assurance committee are not subject to
discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no
person who was in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who
participated in the creation, collection, or maintenance of information
or documents specifically for the committee shall be permitted or
required to testify in any civil action as to the content of such
proceedings or the documents and information prepared specifically for
the committee. This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil
action, the discovery of the identity of persons involved in the care
that is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent
of any quality improvement committee activity; and (b) in any civil
action, the testimony of any person concerning the facts which form the
basis for the institution of such proceedings of which the person had
personal knowledge acquired independently of their participation in the
quality assurance committee activities.
(8) A quality assurance committee under subsection (1) of this
section, RCW 18.20.390, 70.41.200, 4.24.250, or 43.70.510 may share
information and documents, including the analysis of complaints and
incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and
maintained by, the committee, with one or more other quality assurance
committees created under subsection (1) of this section, RCW 18.20.390,
70.41.200, 4.24.250, or 43.70.510 for the improvement of the quality of
care and services rendered to nursing facility residents. Information
and documents disclosed by one quality assurance committee to another
quality assurance committee and any information and documents created
or maintained as a result of the sharing of information and documents
shall not be subject to the discovery process and confidentiality shall
be respected as required by subsections (7) and (9) of this section,
RCW 18.20.390 (6) and (8), 43.70.510(4), 70.41.200(3), and 4.24.250(1).
The privacy protections of chapter 70.02 RCW and the federal health
insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 and its
implementing regulations apply to the sharing of individually
identifiable patient information held by a coordinated quality
improvement program. Any rules necessary to implement this section
shall meet the requirements of applicable federal and state privacy
laws.
(9) Information and documents, including the analysis of complaints
and incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and
maintained by, a quality assurance committee are exempt from disclosure
under chapter ((42.17)) 42.56 RCW.
(10) Notwithstanding any records created for the quality assurance
committee, the facility shall fully set forth in the resident's
records, available to the resident, the department, and others as
permitted by law, the facts concerning any incident of injury or loss
to the resident, the steps taken by the facility to address the
resident's needs, and the resident outcome.
(11) A facility operated as part of a hospital licensed under
chapter 70.41 RCW may maintain a quality assurance committee in
accordance with this section which shall be subject to the provisions
of subsections (1) through (10) of this section or may conduct quality
improvement activities for the facility through a quality improvement
committee under RCW 70.41.200 which shall be subject to the provisions
of RCW 70.41.200(9).

Sec. 14 RCW 90.64.190 and 2005 c 510 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
This section applies to dairies, AFOs, and CAFOs, not required to
apply for a permit. Information in plans, records, and reports
obtained by state and local agencies from livestock producers under
chapter 510, Laws of 2005 regarding (1) number of animals; (2) volume
of livestock nutrients generated; (3) number of acres covered by the
plan or used for land application of livestock nutrients; (4) livestock
nutrients transferred to other persons; and (5) crop yields shall be
disclosable in response to a request for public records under chapter
((42.17)) 42.56 RCW only in ranges that provide meaningful information
to the public while ensuring confidentiality of business information.
The department of agriculture shall adopt rules to implement this
section in consultation with affected state and local agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Records of mediation communications that are privileged under
chapter 7.07 RCW are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The following sections are each recodified
as new sections in chapter 42.56 RCW:
RCW 42.17.253;
RCW 42.17.31922;
RCW 42.17.31923.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---