BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The right to privacy is a personal and fundamental right
protected by Article 1, section 7 of the Washington state Constitution
and by the United States Constitution. All individuals have a right of
privacy in information pertaining to them.
(2) Easy access to the information found on drivers' licenses and
other similar identification documents facilitates the crime of
identity theft, a crime that is a major concern in Washington.
(3) Washington has previously recognized the importance of
protecting the confidentiality and privacy of an individual's personal
information contained in identification documents such as drivers'
licenses.
(4) The inclusion in identification documents of contactless
integrated circuits or other devices that broadcast data or enable data
to be scanned secretly and remotely will greatly magnify the potential
risk to individual privacy, safety, and economic well-being that can
occur from unauthorized interception and use of personal information.
The inclusion of those devices will also make it possible for any
person or entity with access to a reader to engage in the secret
tracking of Washingtonians on an unprecedented scale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.192 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
(2) "Contactless integrated circuit" means a data carrying unit,
such as an integrated circuit or computer chip that can be read
remotely.
(3) "Identification document" means any document or device
containing personal information that an individual uses alone or in
conjunction with other information to establish his or her identity.
Identification documents specifically include, but are not limited to,
the following:
(a) Drivers' licenses or identicards;
(b) Identification cards for employees or contractors;
(c) Identification cards issued by educational institutions;
(d) Health insurance or benefit cards;
(e) Benefit cards issued in conjunction with any
government-supported aid program;
(f) Licenses, certificates, registration, or other similar
documents issued by the department of licensing or necessary to engage
in a regulated business or profession; and
(g) Library cards issued by any public library.
(4) "Local agency" includes every county, city, town, municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district,
or any office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or
agency thereof, or other local public agency.
(5) "Personal information" includes any of the following: An
individual's name, address, telephone number, e-mail address, date of
birth, race, religion, ethnicity, nationality, photograph, fingerprint
or other biometric image of the individual, social security number, or
any other personal identifier or number.
(6) "Remotely" means that no physical contact between the
integrated circuit or device and a reader is necessary in order to
transmit data.
(7) "State agency" includes every state office, department,
division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency.
(8) "Unique identifier number" means a number associated with the
identification document, but not otherwise related to the individual
which the document identifies. A unique identifier number may not be
based on the individual's social security number or any other personal
identifier associated with the individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.192 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No identification document created, mandated, or issued by any
state or local agency shall contain a contactless integrated circuit or
other device that can broadcast personal information or enable personal
information to be scanned remotely.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply in the following
circumstances:
(a) The identification document is to be given to:
(i) A person who is incarcerated in the state prison or a county
jail, detained in a juvenile facility, or housed in a mental health
facility, pursuant to a court order after having been charged with a
crime, or to a person pursuant to court-ordered electronic monitoring;
(ii) A driver for use on a toll road or bridge for the specific
purpose of collecting funds for the use of that road or bridge; or
(iii) A patient who is in the care of a government-operated
hospital, ambulatory surgery center, or oncology or dialysis clinic,
and the identification document is valid for only a single episode of
care and is removed from the patient at the time the patient is
discharged, with a new unique identifier number being assigned if the
patient returns for a new episode of care;
(b) The identification document does not contain, transmit, or
enable the remote scanning of any personal information other than an
encrypted unique identifier number;
(c) The identification document shall use technology to resist
cloning and spoofing; and
(d) Except for documents described in (a)(i) of this subsection,
the issuing entity shall communicate in writing to the person to whom
the identification document is issued all of the following:
(i) That the identification document contains a circuit or device
that can broadcast a unique identifier number or enable that number to
be scanned remotely without his or her knowledge;
(ii) That countermeasures, such as shield devices, may be used to
help one control the risk that his or her unique identifier number will
be broadcast or scanned remotely without his or her knowledge; and
(iii) The types of locations of all scanners and readers used or
intended to be used by the issuing authority or by any other entity
known to that authority to read the unique identifier number on the
identification document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 19.192 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No person or entity shall use radio waves to remotely scan or
attempt to remotely scan a person's identification document without the
knowledge of that person.
(2) A person or entity who violates this section is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor.
(3) Any person who, directly or by means of a detective agency or
any other agent, violates the provisions of this section shall be
subject to legal action for damages, to be brought by a person claiming
that his or her identification document was scanned. A person so
injured shall be entitled to actual damages, including mental pain and
suffering endured by him or her on account of violation of the
provisions of this section, or liquidated damages computed at the rate
of one hundred dollars a day for each day of violation, not to exceed
one thousand dollars, and a reasonable attorneys' fee and other costs
of litigation.

--- END ---