BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.320.160 and 2005 c 274 s 244 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School districts must, at the first opportunity but in all
cases within forty-eight hours of receiving a report alleging sexual
misconduct by a school employee, notify the parents of a student
alleged to be the victim, target, or recipient of the misconduct.
School districts shall provide parents with information regarding their
rights under the public records act, chapter 42.56 RCW, to request the
public records regarding school employee discipline. This information
shall be provided to all parents on an annual basis.
(2)(a) All documented information maintained by a public school
district relating to complaints against or investigations of any school
district employee for alleged or actual sexual abuse, harassment,
physical abuse, or any other allegation of misconduct involving a
student, is subject to disclosure, except as follows: Names,
addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and any other information
that would reasonably lead to the identification of the victims or
witnesses named in the documented information must be redacted before
disclosure.
(b) As used in this subsection (2), documented information includes
correspondence, writing, notes, statements, and records of school board
or other administrative action considered or taken, regardless of
physical form or characteristics.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.070 and 2005 c 274 s 284 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each agency, in accordance with published rules, shall make
available for public inspection and copying all public records, unless
the record falls within the specific exemptions of subsection (6) of
this section, this chapter, or other statute which exempts or prohibits
disclosure of specific information or records. To the extent required
to prevent an unreasonable invasion of personal privacy interests
protected by this chapter, an agency shall delete identifying details
in a manner consistent with this chapter when it makes available or
publishes any public record; however, in each case, the justification
for the deletion shall be explained fully in writing.
(2) For informational purposes, each agency shall publish and
maintain a current list containing every law, other than those listed
in this chapter, that the agency believes exempts or prohibits
disclosure of specific information or records of the agency. An
agency's failure to list an exemption shall not affect the efficacy of
any exemption.
(3) Each local agency shall maintain and make available for public
inspection and copying a current index providing identifying
information as to the following records issued, adopted, or promulgated
after January 1, 1973:
(a) Final opinions, including concurring and dissenting opinions,
as well as orders, made in the adjudication of cases;
(b) Those statements of policy and interpretations of policy,
statute, and the Constitution which have been adopted by the agency;
(c) Administrative staff manuals and instructions to staff that
affect a member of the public;
(d) Planning policies and goals, and interim and final planning
decisions;
(e) Factual staff reports and studies, factual consultant's reports
and studies, scientific reports and studies, and any other factual
information derived from tests, studies, reports, or surveys, whether
conducted by public employees or others; ((and))
(f) Correspondence, and materials referred to therein, by and with
the agency relating to any regulatory, supervisory, or enforcement
responsibilities of the agency, whereby the agency determines, or
opines upon, or is asked to determine or opine upon, the rights of the
state, the public, a subdivision of state government, or of any private
party; and
(g) Documented information maintained by a public school district
relating to complaints against or investigations of any school district
employee for alleged or actual sexual abuse, harassment, physical
abuse, or any other allegation of misconduct involving a student.
(4) A local agency need not maintain such an index, if to do so
would be unduly burdensome, but it shall in that event:
(a) Issue and publish a formal order specifying the reasons why and
the extent to which compliance would unduly burden or interfere with
agency operations; and
(b) Make available for public inspection and copying all indexes
maintained for agency use.
(5) Each state agency shall, by rule, establish and implement a
system of indexing for the identification and location of the following
records:
(a) All records issued before July 1, 1990, for which the agency
has maintained an index;
(b) Final orders entered after June 30, 1990, that are issued in
adjudicative proceedings as defined in RCW 34.05.010 and that contain
an analysis or decision of substantial importance to the agency in
carrying out its duties;
(c) Declaratory orders entered after June 30, 1990, that are issued
pursuant to RCW 34.05.240 and that contain an analysis or decision of
substantial importance to the agency in carrying out its duties;
(d) Interpretive statements as defined in RCW 34.05.010 that were
entered after June 30, 1990; and
(e) Policy statements as defined in RCW 34.05.010 that were entered
after June 30, 1990.
Rules establishing systems of indexing shall include, but not be
limited to, requirements for the form and content of the index, its
location and availability to the public, and the schedule for revising
or updating the index. State agencies that have maintained indexes for
records issued before July 1, 1990, shall continue to make such indexes
available for public inspection and copying. Information in such
indexes may be incorporated into indexes prepared pursuant to this
subsection. State agencies may satisfy the requirements of this
subsection by making available to the public indexes prepared by other
parties but actually used by the agency in its operations. State
agencies shall make indexes available for public inspection and
copying. State agencies may charge a fee to cover the actual costs of
providing individual mailed copies of indexes.
(6) A public record may be relied on, used, or cited as precedent
by an agency against a party other than an agency and it may be invoked
by the agency for any other purpose only if:
(a) It has been indexed in an index available to the public; or
(b) Parties affected have timely notice (actual or constructive) of
the terms thereof.
(7) Each agency shall establish, maintain, and make available for
public inspection and copying a statement of the actual per page cost
or other costs, if any, that it charges for providing photocopies of
public records and a statement of the factors and manner used to
determine the actual per page cost or other costs, if any.
(a) In determining the actual per page cost for providing
photocopies of public records, an agency may include all costs directly
incident to copying such public records including the actual cost of
the paper and the per page cost for use of agency copying equipment.
In determining other actual costs for providing photocopies of public
records, an agency may include all costs directly incident to shipping
such public records, including the cost of postage or delivery charges
and the cost of any container or envelope used.
(b) In determining the actual per page cost or other costs for
providing copies of public records, an agency may not include staff
salaries, benefits, or other general administrative or overhead
charges, unless those costs are directly related to the actual cost of
copying the public records. Staff time to copy and mail the requested
public records may be included in an agency's costs.
(8) An agency need not calculate the actual per page cost or other
costs it charges for providing photocopies of public records if to do
so would be unduly burdensome, but in that event: The agency may not
charge in excess of fifteen cents per page for photocopies of public
records or for the use of agency equipment to photocopy public records
and the actual postage or delivery charge and the cost of any container
or envelope used to mail the public records to the requestor.
(9) This chapter shall not be construed as giving authority to any
agency, the office of the secretary of the senate, or the office of the
chief clerk of the house of representatives to give, sell or provide
access to lists of individuals requested for commercial purposes, and
agencies, the office of the secretary of the senate, and the office of
the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall not do so unless
specifically authorized or directed by law: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That
lists of applicants for professional licenses and of professional
licensees shall be made available to those professional associations or
educational organizations recognized by their professional licensing or
examination board, upon payment of a reasonable charge therefor:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That such recognition may be refused only for a good
cause pursuant to a hearing under the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW,
the Administrative Procedure Act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---