BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.04 RCW
to read as follows:
During the signature verification process, the county auditor must
conduct random audits of verified signatures on batches of ballots for
quality control purposes.
(1) The random audits must be performed:
(a) Before the outer envelope of a ballot is opened;
(b) On at least five percent of the total ballots cast; and
(c) By any qualified person other than the initial signature
verifier, including an employee of the county auditor or an authorized
independent auditor.
(2) A record of each audit performed must be made, and must include
the date of the audit, the name of the auditor, and the audit results.
Political party representatives must be offered an opportunity to
observe and be present at the time an audit is conducted.
(3) An audit report must be compiled and be made available for
public inspection at the time of election certification. The report
must include:
(a) The total number of signatures verified, including signatures
not audited;
(b) After the initial signature verification process, the total
number of signatures found to be a match and the total number of
signatures found to not match;
(c) If the signature verification process requires that a second
person review any signatures found to not match by the initial
reviewer, the total number of signatures initially found to not match
that the second reviewer:
(i) Disagrees with the initial finding and determines that the
signature is a match; and
(ii) Agrees with the initial finding and determines that the
signature is not a match;
(d) As a result of the auditing process, the number of signatures
initially found to be a match that were determined to not match;
(e) The number of signatures sent to the canvassing board for a
final determination of whether the signatures match; and
(f) The findings of the canvassing board on all signatures sent to
it for a final determination of whether the signatures match.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The names of election personnel who verify a voter's signature or
who determine that a signature does not match must be recorded and
maintained in such a manner as to allow identification of the person
who made that determination at any time after the determination is
made.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.04.530 and 2005 c 243 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall:
(1) Establish and operate, or provide by contract, training and
certification programs for state and county elections administration
officials and personnel, including training on the various types of
election law violations and discrimination, and training programs for
political party observers which conform to the rules for such programs
established under RCW 29A.04.630;
(2) Establish guidelines, in consultation with state and local law
enforcement or certified document examiners, for signature verification
processes. All election personnel assigned to verify signatures must
receive training on the guidelines;
(3) Establish guidelines for conducting random signature
verification audits;
(4) Administer tests for state and county officials and personnel
who have received such training and issue certificates to those who
have successfully completed the training and passed such tests;
(((4))) (5) Maintain a record of those individuals who have
received such training and certificates; and
(((5))) (6) Provide the staffing and support services required by
the board created under RCW 29A.04.510.

--- END ---