BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.09.435 and 2005 c 385 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The citizen advisory board is created to improve efficiency,
effectiveness, and accountability in state government.
(2) The board shall consist of ten members as follows:
(a) One member shall be the state auditor or his or her designee,
who shall be a nonvoting member;
(b) One member shall be the legislative auditor or his or her
designee, who shall be a nonvoting member;
(c) One member shall be the director of the office of financial
management or his or her designee, who shall be a nonvoting member;
(d) Four of the members shall be selected by the governor as
follows: Each major caucus of the house of representatives and the
senate shall submit a list of three names. The lists may not include
the names of members of the legislature or employees of the state. The
governor shall select a person from each list provided by each caucus;
and
(e) The governor shall select three citizen members who are not
state employees.
(3) The board shall elect a chair. The legislative auditor, the
state auditor, and the director of the office of financial management
may not serve as chair.
(4) Appointees shall be individuals who have a basic understanding
of state government operations with knowledge and expertise in
performance management, quality management, strategic planning,
performance assessments, or closely related fields.
(5) Members selected under subsection (2)(d) and (e) of this
section shall serve for terms of four years, with the terms expiring on
June 30th on the fourth year of the term. However, in the case of the
initial members, two members shall serve four-year terms, two members
shall serve three-year terms, and one member shall serve a two-year
term, with each of the terms expiring on June 30th of the applicable
year. Appointees may be reappointed to serve more than one term.
(6) The office of the state auditor shall provide clerical,
technical, and management personnel to the board to serve as the
board's staff.
(7) The board shall meet at least once a quarter and may hold
additional meetings at the call of the chair or by a majority vote of
the members of the board.
(8) The members of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.220 and reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The citizen advisory board shall advise the governor regarding
agency performance and outcome measures.
(2) The board shall develop a schedule and common methodology for
conducting ongoing performance and outcome measure reviews of all state
agencies and programs. The reviews shall include, but not be limited
to, the following:
(a) Determining whether the performance and outcome measures are
consistent with legislative mandates, strategic plans, mission
statements, and goals and objectives;
(b) Examining how agency management uses the measures to manage
resources in an efficient and effective manner;
(c) Assessing how performance benchmarks are established for the
purpose of assessing overall performance compared to external standards
and benchmarks;
(d) Examining how an analysis of the measurement data is used to
make planning and operational improvements;
(e) Determining how performance and outcome measures are used in
the budget planning, development, and allotment processes;
(f) Reviewing how performance data are reported to and used by the
legislature;
(g) Assessing whether the performance measure data are reliable and
collected in a uniform and timely manner; and
(h) Making recommendations as necessary.
(3) The board may contract for the performance reviews with private
entities or with the joint legislative audit and review committee.
(4) The board shall solicit comments on preliminary performance and
outcome measure reviews from the reviewed agency. Those comments must
be included in the final report. Final reports on performance and
outcome measure reviews shall be submitted to the governor, the joint
legislative audit and review committee, the state auditor, the
appropriate committees of the legislature, and the public. Final
reports must be posted on the internet.
(5) Based on the results of a performance and outcome measure
review, the board may recommend to the governor, the joint legislative
audit and review committee, and the state auditor that a full
performance audit of an agency be undertaken.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW
to read as follows:
An agency reviewed under RCW 43.09.435 (as recodified by this act)
is responsible for any follow-up and corrective action identified in
the review. The reviewed agency must submit a plan for addressing any
findings and recommendations identified in the final report. The plan
shall include the name of the contact person responsible for each
action, the action planned, and the anticipated completion date. If
the reviewed agency does not agree with the findings and
recommendations or believes action is not required, then the action
plan must include an explanation and specific reasons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 43.09.435 and 43.09.460 are recodified
as new sections in chapter 43.06 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.09.430 (Performance audits -- Definitions) and 2005 c 385
s 2;
(2) RCW 43.09.440 (Performance audits -- Collaboration with joint
legislative audit and review committee -- Criteria -- Statewide performance
review -- Contracting out -- Release of audit reports) and 2005 c 385 s 5;
(3) RCW 43.09.445 (Performance audits -- Local jurisdictions) and
2005 c 385 s 6;
(4) RCW 43.09.450 (Performance audits -- Audit of performance audit
program) and 2005 c 385 s 8;
(5) RCW 43.09.455 (Performance audits -- Follow-up and corrective
action -- Progress reports) and 2005 c 385 s 9;
(6) RCW 43.09.460 (Performance audits -- Appropriation -- Budget
request) and 2005 c 385 s 11;
(7) RCW 43.88.162 (State auditor's powers and duties--Performance
audits) and 2005 c 385 s 7; and
(8) RCW 2.56.200 (Performance audits) and 2005 c 385 s 10.

--- END ---