BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.08.830 and 2003 c 111 s 255 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any registered voter may request that the registration of
another voter be canceled if he or she believes that the voter does not
meet the requirements of Article VI, section 1 of the state
Constitution ((or)), that voter no longer maintains a legal voting
residence at the address shown on his or her registration record, or
the voter has duplicate registrations. The challenger shall file with
the county auditor a signed affidavit subject to the penalties of
perjury, to the effect that to his or her personal knowledge and belief
another registered voter does not actually reside at the address as
given on his or her registration record or is otherwise not a qualified
voter and that the voter in question is not protected by the provisions
of Article VI, section 4, of the Constitution of the state of
Washington. The person filing the challenge must furnish the address
at which the challenged voter actually resides, except when the address
does not exist, the address is not a residential address, or the voter
has moved without a forwarding address.
(2) Any such challenge of a voter's registration and right to vote
made less than thirty days before a primary or election, special or
general, shall be administered under RCW 29A.08.820. The county
auditor shall notify the challenged voter and the precinct election
officers in the voter's precinct that a challenge has been filed,
provide the name of the challenger, and instruct both the precinct
election officers and the voter that, in the event the challenged voter
desires to vote at the ensuing primary or election, a challenged ballot
will be provided. The voter shall also be informed that the status of
his or her registration and the disposition of any challenged ballot
will be determined by the county canvassing board in the manner
provided by RCW 29A.08.820. The county auditor must inform the
challenged voter on the final disposition of his or her ballot. If the
challenged voter does not vote at the ensuing primary or election, the
challenge shall be processed in the same manner as challenges made more
than thirty days prior to the primary or election under RCW 29A.08.840.

--- END ---