BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
State employees called to active duty with any branch of the United
States military shall return to work with credit for the periodic
increment date for that time served on active military duty. For
purposes of this section, "periodic increment date" has the same
meaning as defined in WAC 357-28-050 as it exists on the effective date
of this section.

--- END ---