BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the purpose of
provisional ballots is to allow properly registered and eligible voters
to cast a ballot when certain circumstances occur that might otherwise
prevent such voters from casting their vote, such as an election
official error, a lost or misplaced absentee ballot, or a voter's
failure to bring proper identification to his or her home polling
place. The legislature further finds that provisional ballots are not
intended to be used as a means of voting at a polling place other than
at one's home polling place or to allow any of the voter registration
requirements to be circumvented. The legislature intends for each
provisional ballot to be investigated by the canvassing board, as
provided for in this act, and that all qualifying provisional ballots,
or portions thereof, be counted.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.60.195 and 2005 c 243 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before certification of the primary or election, the ((county
auditor)) canvassing board must examine and investigate all received
provisional ballots to determine whether the ballot can be counted. A
provisional ballot may not be counted unless the canvassing board first
finds all of the following to be true:
(a) At least fifteen days before the election, the voter who cast
the ballot was properly registered to vote at their place of residence;
(b) The ballot was cast in the voter's home polling place;
(c) The ballot style voted was correct for the voter's residence;
(d) The signature requirements of RCW 29A.60.165 have been met;
(e) The voter has not cast another ballot in the same election; and
(f) At least one of the following is true:
(i) The voter was omitted from the poll book due to an error or
omission by an election official;
(ii) A properly requested absentee ballot was not received by the
voter or was lost or misplaced by the voter, and the voter signed a
sworn statement that he or she did not cast the absentee ballot and
that, to the best of his or her personal knowledge, no other person
cast the absentee ballot;
(iii) The voter was unable to produce valid identification as
required by RCW 29A.44.205 at his or her home polling place; or
(iv) The ballot was cast under a court order after the polls
closed, as permitted by RCW 29A.44.265.
(2) A provisional ballot failing to meet the conditions specified
in subsection (1)(a) through (f) of this section shall not be
transferred to any other polling place, precinct, county, or state.
(3) The county auditor shall ((provide)) promptly notify each
voter, by telephone and mail, that the voter's ballot was rejected and
will not be counted, including a brief statement explaining why the
ballot was not counted. The auditor shall make the disposition of
((the)) each provisional ballot and, if ((the)) a ballot was not
counted, the reason why it was not counted, on a free access system
such as a toll-free telephone number, web site, mail, or other means.
The auditor must notify the voter in accordance with RCW 29A.60.165
when the envelope is unsigned or when the signatures do not match.
(4) Every voter whose ballot has been rejected under subsection (1)
of this section must be given an opportunity to present evidence to the
canvassing board explaining why the ballot should be counted. If the
voter does not present persuasive evidence sufficient to reverse the
canvassing board's decision before certification, the canvassing
board's decision rejecting the ballot stands and the ballot will not be
counted. If the ballot style is the only remaining defect in the
provisional ballot, the canvassing board must determine whether any
votes cast on the ballot are entitled to be counted and must process
the ballot by duplicating the permitted votes onto a ballot of the
correct ballot style for the voter's place of residence. Rejected
ballots may not be cured during a recount.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "home polling place" means
the polling place serving the precinct in which a voter resides on
election day.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.08.625 and 2003 c 111 s 240 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A voter whose registration has been made inactive under this
chapter and who offers to vote at an ensuing election before two
federal elections have been held must be allowed to vote a regular
ballot and the voter's registration restored to active status.
(2) A voter whose registration has been properly canceled under
this chapter shall vote a provisional ballot. The voter shall mark the
provisional ballot in secrecy, the ballot placed in a security
envelope, the security envelope placed in a provisional ballot
envelope, and the reasons for the use of the provisional ballot noted.
(3) Upon receipt of such a voted provisional ballot the auditor
shall investigate the circumstances surrounding the original
cancellation. If he or she determines that the cancellation was in
error, the voter's registration must be immediately reinstated, and the
voter's provisional ballot must be ((counted)) forwarded to the
canvassing board for review under RCW 29A.60.195. If the original
cancellation was not in error, the voter must be afforded the
opportunity to reregister at his or her correct address, and the
voter's provisional ballot must not be counted.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.08.113 and 2005 c 246 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a voter who registered by mail indicates on the voter
registration form that he or she does not have a Washington state
driver's license, Washington state identification card, or Social
Security number, he or she must provide one of the following forms of
identification the first time he or she votes after registering:
(a) Valid photo identification;
(b) A valid enrollment card of a federally recognized Indian tribe
in Washington state;
(c) A copy of a current utility bill;
(d) A current bank statement;
(e) A copy of a current government check;
(f) A copy of a current paycheck; or
(g) A government document that shows both the name and address of
the voter.
(2) If the voter fails to provide one of the above forms of
identification prior to or at the time of voting, the ballot must be
treated as a provisional ballot regardless of whether the voter is
voting at a poll site or by mail. The ballot may only be counted if
the voter's signature on the outside envelope matches the signature in
the voter registration records and the ballot has not been otherwise
rejected under RCW 29A.60.195.
(3) The requirements of this section do not apply to an out-of-state, overseas, or service voter who registers to vote by signing the
return envelope of the absentee ballot.

--- END ---