BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Residential address" or "traditional address" means the place
where the voter resides.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.08.112 and 2005 c 246 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person registering to vote, who meets all the qualifications of
a registered voter in the state of Washington, shall be disqualified
because of a nontraditional address being used as a residence address.
Voters who have a traditional address must provide their traditional
address for voter registration purposes, and they may not choose to use
a nontraditional address as an alternate address. Voters using such an
address will be registered and assigned to a precinct based on the
location provided. Voters without a traditional address will be
registered at the county courthouse, city hall, or other public
building near the area that the voter considers his or her residence.
Registering at a nontraditional address will not disqualify a voter
from requesting ongoing absentee voter status if the voter designates
a valid mailing address.
For the purposes of this section, "nontraditional address" includes
shelters, parks, or other identifiable locations that the voter deems
to be his or her residence.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.08.107 and 2005 c 246 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of state must review the information provided by
each voter registration applicant to ensure that the provided driver's
license number, state identification card number, or last four digits
of the Social Security number match the information maintained by the
Washington department of licensing or the Social Security
administration. If a match cannot be made, the secretary of state or
county auditor must correspond with the applicant to resolve the
discrepancy.
(2) If the applicant fails to respond to any correspondence
required in this section to confirm information provided on a voter
registration application within forty-five days, the applicant will not
be registered to vote. The secretary of state shall forward the
application to the appropriate county auditor for document storage.
(3) Only after the secretary of state has confirmed that the
provided driver's license number, state identification card number, or
last four digits of the applicant's Social Security number match
existing records with the Washington department of licensing or the
Social Security administration, or determined that the applicant does
not have a driver's license number, state identification card number,
or Social Security number may the applicant be placed on the official
list of registered voters.
(4) In order to prevent duplicate registration records, all
complete voter registration applications must be screened against
existing voter registration records in the official statewide voter
registration list. If a match of an existing record is found in the
official list, the record must be updated with the new information
provided on the application. If the new information indicates that the
voter has changed his or her county of residence, the application must
be forwarded to the voter's new county of residence for processing.
(5) At least annually, the secretary of state shall search the
residential addresses of all voter registration records in the voter
registration data base for major public building addresses throughout
the state. For purposes of this subsection, "major public buildings"
includes city, county, state, and federal administrative buildings,
courthouses, and police stations.
(a) For each search result, the secretary of state shall determine
whether the voter is properly registered at the major public building
under a lawful program that permits the voter to use a nontraditional
address as his or her residential address, such as the address
confidentiality program as defined in chapter 40.24 RCW.
(b) If it appears that the voter has improperly listed a public
building as a residence for purposes of voter registration, the
secretary of state shall send notice by certified mail to the voter of
the apparent improper residential address. The notice shall provide
that the voter must respond within thirty days of the date of the
notice by providing the secretary of state with: (i) The voter's
actual residential address, or (ii) evidence that he or she is properly
registered at the major public building. The notice shall also advise
the voter of the penalties for providing false information on an
application for voter registration.
(c) If the voter fails to respond within thirty days to the
secretary of state's satisfaction, the secretary of state shall forward
a copy of all relevant information to the prosecuting authorities.

--- END ---