BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Interested party" means the driver or drivers involved in a
vehicular accident, or the legal guardians of the driver or drivers;
the parent of a minor driver; any person injured in a vehicular
accident; the owner of vehicles or property damaged in a vehicular
accident; or any authorized representative, attorney, or insurer of
such an interested party.
(2) "Noninterested party" means any person other than an interested
party.
(3) "Personal information" means name, address, telephone number,
date of birth, driver's license number, and social security number of
an interested party.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.52.080 and 1979 c 158 s 162 are each amended to
read as follows:
All required accident reports and supplemental reports and copies
thereof shall be without prejudice to the reporting individual ((so
reporting)), and shall be for the confidential use of the county
prosecuting attorney ((and)), the chief of police or county sheriff, as
the case may be, ((and)) the director of licensing ((and)), the chief
of the Washington state patrol, and other officer or commission as
authorized by law, except ((that any such)) as provided in this
section.
(1) Upon the request of an interested party, any authorized officer
shall disclose to the interested party the names and addresses of
persons reported as involved in an accident or as witnesses thereto,
the vehicle license plate numbers and descriptions of vehicles
involved, and the date, time, and location of an accident((, to any
person who may have a proper interest therein, including the driver or
drivers involved, or the legal guardian thereof, the parent of a minor
driver, any person injured therein, the owner of vehicles or property
damaged thereby, or any authorized representative of such an interested
party, or the attorney or insurer thereof)).
(2) Upon the request of a noninterested party, any authorized
officer shall disclose only the vehicle license plate numbers and
descriptions of vehicles involved, and the date, time, and location of
the accident. Personal information included in all such reports may
not be disclosed to a noninterested party.
(3) No such accident report or copy thereof shall be used as
evidence in any trial, civil or criminal, arising out of an accident,
except that any officer above named for receiving accident reports
shall furnish, upon demand of any person who has, or who claims to
have, made such a report, or, upon demand of any court, a certificate
showing that a specified accident report has or has not been made to
the chief of the Washington state patrol solely to prove a compliance
or a failure to comply with the requirement that such a report be made
in the manner required by law: PROVIDED, That the reports may be used
as evidence when necessary to prosecute charges filed in connection
with a violation of RCW 46.52.088.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.52.083 and 1965 ex.s. c 119 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
All of the factual data submitted in report form by the officers,
together with the signed statements of all witnesses, except the
reports signed by the drivers involved in the accident, shall be made
available upon request to ((the)) interested parties ((named in RCW
46.52.080)). If such reports are provided to noninterested parties,
all personal information shall be redacted before disclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 46.52.080 and 46.52.083 are each
recodified as new sections in chapter 42.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---