BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.04.530 and 2005 c 243 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall:
(1) Establish and operate, or provide by contract, training and
certification programs for state and county elections administration
officials and personnel, including training on the various types of
election law violations and discrimination, and training programs for
political party observers which conform to the rules for such programs
established under RCW 29A.04.630;
(2)(a) Establish guidelines, in consultation with state and local
law enforcement or certified document examiners, for signature
verification processes. The guidelines shall include the following
information:
(i) When a person attempts to imitate another person's signature,
he or she typically attempts to copy the most obvious features, such as
size, capital letters, and slant and, as a result, heightened scrutiny
should be given to unusual ways of writing;
(ii) When a person attempts to imitate another person's signature,
such an attempt typically includes indications of a lack of fluency,
such as: Writing that is stilted; has tremor; has unnatural stops and
starts; has patching where the writer goes back and attempts to repair
what was previously written; or lacks regularity or consistency;
(iii) Natural writing often has pressure that alternates, such as
light upstrokes and dark downstrokes;
(iv) In evaluating spacing, the reviewer must consider: The amount
of horizontal space taken up by each letter; space between letters,
punctuation, and words; height or size of letters, including
proportions relating to uppercase letters, lowercase letters, and lower
loops; and placement of the signature on any signature line and whether
the signature is indented on the line; and
(v) In evaluating the form of the signature, the reviewer must
consider the shape of letters and punctuation, including strokes that
begin and end a word or letter, strokes that connect letters to each
other, and the shape and placement of other strokes.
(b) All election personnel assigned to verify signatures must
receive training on the guidelines;
(3) Administer tests for state and county officials and personnel
who have received such training and issue certificates to those who
have successfully completed the training and passed such tests;
(4) Maintain a record of those individuals who have received such
training and certificates; and
(5) Provide the staffing and support services required by the board
created under RCW 29A.04.510.

--- END ---