BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
In counties using optical scan counting devices, before
certification of any election or machine recount, the county auditor
must conduct an audit of the votes counted by the optical scan counting
devices used in the county. This audit must be conducted using the
following process:
(1) The county auditor must determine the number that equals two
percent of the registered voters in the county.
(2) The county canvassing board must select, by lot, precincts for
audit until the total number of voters in the selected precincts
combined exceeds two percent of the registered voters in the county.
The selection, by lot, shall be conducted in public at the close of
voting on election day.
(3) At the close of voting on election day and after precincts have
been selected, the county auditor then selects, by lot, from all races
and issues, three to audit manually in each selected precinct for a
manual recount. The selection, by lot, shall be conducted in public.
During the ballot processing, the auditor shall direct that ballots be
identified and sorted by precinct to facilitate the audit process, and
for any potential recounts, during the initial machine count.
(4) The county canvassing board must determine the date, time, and
place or places at which the manual audit count will be conducted and
announce these to the public at least seventy-two hours before the
count. Manual audit counts are open to the public subject to
reasonable and equitable guidelines adopted by the canvassing board.
(5) At the time and place established for the audit count, the
canvassing board or its duly authorized representatives, in the
presence of all witnesses in attendance, will open the sealed
containers containing the ballots to be recounted and hand count the
votes for the offices or issues selected for the audit. Ballots must
be handled only by the members of the canvassing board or their duly
authorized representatives. At no time may any person observing the
audit handle a ballot or make a record of information on the ballots.
(6) If there is a difference between the machine count and the
manual count, the results of the manual count will be the official
count for the election for the affected races or issues in the selected
precincts. The auditor must document and explain the reason for any
difference between the counts. If the difference between the machine
count and the manual count cannot be explained by any other reason than
a machine counting error, any party, candidate, or person representing
either side of a ballot measure appearing on any ballot in the county
may request a complete recount of votes for the race or ballot measure
under chapter 29A.64 RCW without any charge to the requestor.
(7) Results of the audit, including the machine and manual counts
for each audited precinct and race and explanation of any differences
must be published on the county auditor's internet web site and be
available in writing and in electronic form upon request.

--- END ---