BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.210 and 2001 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the application and proper fee for original
vehicle license, the director shall make a recheck of the application
and in the event that there is any error in the application it may be
returned to the county auditor or other agent to effectively secure the
correction of such error, who shall return the same corrected to the
director.
(2) Application for the renewal of a vehicle license shall be made
to the director or his agents, including county auditors, by the
registered owner on a form prescribed by the director. Each renewal
notice shall, in addition to the total amount due, itemize the amount
of each license fee and excise tax due and indicate for each, which
jurisdiction imposed the tax or fee, and for voter approved taxes
and/or fees include the term "voter approved" in the description. The
application must be accompanied by the payment of such license fees and
excise tax as may be required by law. Such application shall be
handled in the same manner and the fees transmitted to the state
treasurer in the same manner as in the case of an original application.
Any such application which upon validation becomes a renewal
certificate need not have entered upon it the name of the lien holder,
if any, of the vehicle concerned.
(3) Persons expecting to be out of the state during the normal
renewal period of a vehicle license may secure renewal of such vehicle
license and have license plates or tabs preissued by making application
to the director or his agents upon forms prescribed by the director.
The application must be accompanied by such license fees, and excise
tax as may be required by law.
(4) Application for the annual renewal of a vehicle license number
plate to the director or the director's agents shall not be required
for those vehicles owned, rented, or leased by the state of Washington,
or by any county, city, town, school district, or other political
subdivision of the state of Washington or a governing body of an Indian
tribe located within this state and recognized as a governmental entity
by the United States department of the interior.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to vehicle registrations
that are due or become due on or after July 1, 2007.

--- END ---