BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.57.020 and 2002 c 363 s 2 and 2002 c 218 s 25 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A public facilities district is authorized to acquire,
construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, finance, and
operate one or more regional centers or existing minor league baseball
stadiums, or both. For purposes of this chapter, "regional center"
means a convention, conference, or special events center, or any
combination of facilities, and related parking facilities, serving a
regional population constructed, improved, or rehabilitated after July
25, 1999, at a cost of at least ten million dollars, including debt
service. "Regional center" also includes an existing convention,
conference, or special events center, and related parking facilities,
serving a regional population, that is improved or rehabilitated after
July 25, 1999, where the costs of improvement or rehabilitation are at
least ten million dollars, including debt service. A "special events
center" is a facility, available to the public, used for community
events, sporting events, trade shows, and artistic, musical,
theatrical, or other cultural exhibitions, presentations, or
performances. A regional center is conclusively presumed to serve a
regional population if state and local government investment in the
construction, improvement, or rehabilitation of the regional center is
equal to or greater than ten million dollars. "Minor league baseball
stadium" means any public facility existing and in use on the effective
date of this act in which a minor league baseball team affiliated with
a major league baseball club has operated for at least a portion of the
previous two years.
(2) A public facilities district may enter into contracts with any
city or town for the purpose of exercising any powers of a community
renewal agency under chapter 35.81 RCW.
(3) A public facilities district may impose charges and fees for
the use of its facilities, and may accept and expend or use gifts,
grants, and donations for the purpose of a regional center.
(4) A public facilities district may impose charges, fees, and
taxes authorized in RCW 35.57.040, and use revenues derived therefrom
for the purpose of paying principal and interest payments on bonds
issued by the public facilities district to construct a regional
center.
(5) Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil, or merit
service system, a public facilities district may contract with a public
or private entity for the operation or management of its public
facilities.
(6) A public facilities district is authorized to use the
supplemental alternative public works contracting procedures set forth
in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the design, construction,
reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of any regional center.
(7) A city or town in conjunction with any special agency,
authority, or other district established by a county or any other
governmental agency is authorized to use the supplemental alternative
public works contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in
connection with the design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or
alteration of any regional center funded in whole or in part by a
public facilities district.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.57.040 and 1999 c 165 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of directors of the public facilities district may
impose the following for the purpose of funding a regional center or
minor league baseball stadium, or both:
(a) Charges and fees for the use of any of its facilities;
(b) Admission charges under RCW 35.57.100;
(c) Vehicle parking charges under RCW 35.57.110; and
(d) Sales and use taxes authorized under RCW 82.14.048 and
82.14.390.
(2) The board may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and
donations for the purpose of a regional center or minor league baseball
stadium, or both. The revenue from the charges, fees, and taxes
imposed under this section shall be used only for the purposes
authorized by this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.57.100 and 1999 c 165 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
A public facility district may levy and fix a tax of not more than
one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof to be paid by the person
who pays an admission charge to a regional center or minor league
baseball stadium. This includes a tax on persons who are admitted free
of charge or at reduced rates if other persons pay a charge or a
regular higher charge for the same privileges or accommodations.
The term "admission charge" includes:
(1) A charge made for season tickets or subscriptions;
(2) A cover charge, or a charge made for use of seats and tables
reserved or otherwise, and other similar accommodations;
(3) A charge made for food and refreshment if free entertainment,
recreation, or amusement is provided;
(4) A charge made for rental or use of equipment or facilities for
purposes of recreation or amusement; if the rental of the equipment or
facilities is necessary to the enjoyment of a privilege for which a
general admission is charged, the combined charges shall be considered
as the admission charge;
(5) Automobile parking charges if the amount of the charge is
determined according to the number of passengers in the automobile.

Sec. 4 RCW 35.57.110 and 1999 c 165 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
A public facility district may levy and fix a tax on any vehicle
parking charges imposed at any parking facility that is owned or leased
by the public facility district as part of a regional center or minor
league baseball stadium. No county or city or town within which the
regional center is located may impose a tax of the same or similar kind
on any vehicle parking charges at the facility. For the purposes of
this section, "vehicle parking charges" means only the actual parking
charges exclusive of taxes and service charges and the value of any
other benefit conferred. The tax authorized under this section shall
be at the rate of not more than ten percent.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.14.390 and 2002 c 363 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
governing body of a public facilities district created before July 31,
2002, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW that commences construction of
a new regional center, or improvement or rehabilitation of an existing
new regional center, before January 1, 2004, or that commences
remodeling or reconstruction of an existing minor league baseball
stadium and related parking facilities before January 1, 2008, may
impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this
chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and
shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the public facilities district. The rate of tax shall not
exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public facilities
district.
(3) No tax may be collected under this section before August 1,
2000. The tax imposed in this section shall expire when the bonds
issued for the construction of the regional center and related parking
facilities are retired, but not more than twenty-five years after the
tax is first collected. The tax may be extended for a period not to
exceed ten years in order to retire bonds issued for the remodeling or
reconstruction of a minor league baseball stadium and related parking
facilities.
(4) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the
purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount
from other public or private sources equal to thirty-three percent of
the amount collected under this section, provided that amounts
generated from nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 35.57
RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 36.100 RCW
shall not constitute a public or private source. For the purpose of
this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited to
cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or
improvement of the regional center or minor league baseball stadium, or
both, land that is donated and used for the siting of the regional
center, cash or in-kind contributions from public or private
foundations, or amounts attributed to private sector partners as part
of a public and private partnership agreement negotiated by the public
facilities district.
(5) The combined total tax levied under this section shall not be
greater than 0.033 percent. If both a public facilities district
created under chapter 35.57 RCW and a public facilities district
created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this section, the
tax imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter 35.57
RCW shall be credited against the tax imposed by a public facilities
district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.
(6) A public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW
is not eligible to impose the tax under this section if the legislative
authority of the county where the public facilities district is located
has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---