BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends that inspections
performed under the Washington industrial safety and health act ensure
safe and healthful working conditions for every person working in the
state of Washington. Inspections must follow the mandates of Article
II, section 35 of the state Constitution, and equal or exceed the
requirements prescribed by the occupational safety and health act of
1970 (Public Law 91-596, 84 Stat. 1590). The legislature also intends
that the inspections comply with the fourth and fourteenth amendments
to the United States Constitution and Article I, section 7 of the state
Constitution.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.17.070 and 1973 c 80 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsections (2) through (5) of this section, the
director, or his or her authorized representative, in carrying out his
or her duties under this chapter, upon the presentation of appropriate
credentials to the owner, manager, operator, or ((agent in charge)) on-site person in charge of the worksite, is authorized:
(((1))) (a) To enter without delay and at all reasonable times the
factory, plant, establishment, construction site, or other area,
workplace, or environment where work is performed by an employee of an
employer; and
(((2))) (b) To inspect, survey, and investigate during regular
working hours and at other reasonable times, and within reasonable
limits and in a reasonable manner, any such workplace and all pertinent
conditions, structures, machines, apparatus, devices, equipment, and
materials therein, and to question privately any such employer, owner,
operator, agent, or employee((;)).
(((3))) (2) In making inspections and making investigations under
this chapter the director may require the attendance and testimony of
witnesses and the production of evidence under oath. Witnesses shall
be paid the same fees and mileage that are paid witnesses in the
superior courts. In the case of contumacy, failure, or refusal of any
person to obey such an order, any superior court within the
jurisdiction of which such person is found, or resides, or transacts
business, upon the application of the director, shall have jurisdiction
to issue to such person an order requiring such person to appear to
produce evidence if, as, and when so ordered, and to give testimony
relating to the matter under investigation or in question, and any
failure to obey such order of the court may be punished by said court
as a contempt thereof.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section or section
3 of this act, the director or his or her authorized representative
shall obtain consent from the owner, manager, operator, or his or her
on-site person in charge of the worksite when entering any worksite
located on private property to carry out his or her duties under this
chapter. Solely for the purpose of requesting the consent required by
this section, the director or his or her authorized representative
shall, in a safe manner, enter a worksite at an entry point designated
by the employer or, in the event no entry point has been designated, at
a reasonably recognizable entry point.
(4) This section does not prohibit the director or his or her
authorized representative from taking action consistent with a
recognized exception to the warrant requirements of the federal and
state Constitutions.
(5) This section does not require advance notice of an inspection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW
to read as follows:
The director may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a
search warrant authorizing access to any factory, plant, establishment,
construction site, or other area, workplace, or environment where work
is performed by an employee of an employer. The court may upon such
application issue a search warrant for the purpose requested.

--- END ---