BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.52.010 and 2002 c 341 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Emergency management" or "comprehensive emergency management"
means the preparation for and the carrying out of all emergency
functions, other than functions for which the military forces are
primarily responsible, to mitigate, prepare for, respond to, and
recover from emergencies and disasters, and to aid victims suffering
from injury or damage, resulting from disasters caused by all hazards,
whether natural, technological, or human caused, and to provide support
for search and rescue operations for persons and property in distress.
However, "emergency management" or "comprehensive emergency management"
does not mean preparation for emergency evacuation or relocation of
residents in anticipation of nuclear attack.
(2) "Local organization for emergency services or management" means
an organization created in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter by state or local authority to perform local emergency
management functions.
(3) "Political subdivision" means any county, city or town.
(4) "Emergency worker" means any person, including but not limited
to an architect registered under chapter 18.08 RCW or a professional
engineer registered under chapter 18.43 RCW, who is registered with a
local emergency management organization or the department and holds an
identification card issued by the local emergency management director
or the department for the purpose of engaging in authorized emergency
management activities or is an employee of the state of Washington or
any political subdivision thereof who is called upon to perform
emergency management activities.
(5) "Injury" as used in this chapter shall mean and include
accidental injuries and/or occupational diseases arising out of
emergency management activities.
(6)(a) "Emergency or disaster" as used in all sections of this
chapter except RCW 38.52.430 shall mean an event or set of
circumstances which: (i) Demands immediate action to preserve public
health, protect life, protect public property, or to provide relief to
any stricken community overtaken by such occurrences, or (ii) reaches
such a dimension or degree of destructiveness as to warrant the
governor declaring a state of emergency pursuant to RCW 43.06.010.
(b) "Emergency" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means an incident that
requires a normal police, coroner, fire, rescue, emergency medical
services, or utility response as a result of a violation of one of the
statutes enumerated in RCW 38.52.430.
(7) "Search and rescue" means the acts of searching for, rescuing,
or recovering by means of ground, marine, or air activity any person
who becomes lost, injured, or is killed while outdoors or as a result
of a natural, technological, or human caused disaster, including
instances involving searches for downed aircraft when ground personnel
are used. Nothing in this section shall affect appropriate activity by
the department of transportation under chapter 47.68 RCW.
(8) "Executive head" and "executive heads" means the county
executive in those charter counties with an elective office of county
executive, however designated, and, in the case of other counties, the
county legislative authority. In the case of cities and towns, it
means the mayor in those cities and towns with mayor-council or
commission forms of government, where the mayor is directly elected,
and it means the city manager in those cities and towns with council
manager forms of government. Cities and towns may also designate an
executive head for the purposes of this chapter by ordinance.
(9) "Director" means the adjutant general.
(10) "Local director" means the director of a local organization of
emergency management or emergency services.
(11) "Department" means the state military department.
(12) "Emergency response" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means a public
agency's use of emergency services during an emergency or disaster as
defined in subsection (6)(b) of this section.
(13) "Expense of an emergency response" as used in RCW 38.52.430
means reasonable costs incurred by a public agency in reasonably making
an appropriate emergency response to the incident, but shall only
include those costs directly arising from the response to the
particular incident. Reasonable costs shall include the costs of
providing police, coroner, fire fighting, rescue, emergency medical
services, or utility response at the scene of the incident, as well as
the salaries of the personnel responding to the incident.
(14) "Public agency" means the state, and a city, county, municipal
corporation, district, town, or public authority located, in whole or
in part, within this state which provides or may provide fire fighting,
police, ambulance, medical, or other emergency services.
(15) "Incident command system" means: (a) An all-hazards, on-scene
functional management system that establishes common standards in
organization, terminology, and procedures; provides a means (unified
command) for the establishment of a common set of incident objectives
and strategies during multiagency/multijurisdiction operations while
maintaining individual agency/jurisdiction authority, responsibility,
and accountability; and is a component of the national interagency
incident management system; or (b) an equivalent and compatible all-hazards, on-scene functional management system.
(16) "Radio communications service company" has the meaning
ascribed to it in RCW 82.14B.020.
(17) "Disaster medical assistance team" means any volunteer team
designed to provide medical care during an emergency or disaster or
other event that is formed as a response team under the guidance of the
national disaster medical system which consists of professional and
paraprofessional medical personnel and logistical and administration
personnel who have been certified by the federal government to serve on
such a team.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In the event of an emergency or disaster or if there is
reasonable cause to believe that an emergency or disaster is imminent,
the governor may call a Washington disaster medical assistance team
into state service.
(2) A member of a disaster medical assistance team called into
state service shall be afforded all the protections of this chapter,
including the right to workers' compensation and death benefits, if the
member provides direct medical care to a victim of an emergency or
disaster or provides other support services during an emergency or
disaster.
(3) The disaster medical assistance team shall provide the
department with the names of all members of the disaster medical
assistance team, as well as their assignments, contact information,
employer's name, employer's contact information, and any other
information that the department determines is necessary. The
information shall be provided to the department no later than two weeks
after a member joins the disaster medical assistance team. In the
event that the disaster medical assistance team is called into service
by the governor, the department shall promptly notify the employer of
each member of the team.
(4) The department may adopt any rules necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
(5) In the event of a federal disaster occurring concurrently with
a state disaster, the federal government shall have the first right to
call the disaster medical assistance team into service.
(6) The department shall pursue an agreement with the federal
government to allow the disaster medical assistance team to use the
equipment and supplies available for federal service to be used in
response to a call to service by the governor. If an agreement is
executed under this subsection and there is any use of the federal
equipment and supplies, the governor shall include a request for funds
necessary to reimburse the federal government in the next budget
submission to the legislature. In the event that reimbursement to the
federal government is necessary prior to the adoption of the next
budget, the governor may reimburse the federal government in the manner
described in RCW 38.24.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No act or omission by a member of a disaster medical assistance
team while engaged in a covered activity shall impose any liability for
civil damages resulting from such an act or omission upon:
(a) The member of the disaster medical assistance team;
(b) The supervisor or supervisors of the member of the disaster
medical assistance team;
(c) Any health care facility or their officers or employees;
(d) The owner of the property or vehicle where the act or omission
may have occurred during the covered activity;
(e) The local disaster medical assistance team that the member of
the disaster medical assistance team is affiliated with; or
(f) The state or any state or local governmental entity.
(2) The immunity in subsection (1) of this section applies only
when the member of the disaster medical assistance team was engaged in
a covered activity:
(a) Without compensation or expectation of compensation;
(b) Within the scope of their assigned duties; and
(c) Under the direction of the local disaster medical assistance
team that the member of the disaster medical assistance team is
affiliated with.
(3) The immunity in subsection (1) of this section does not apply
to any act or omission that constitutes gross negligence or willful or
wanton misconduct.
(4) For purposes of this section, "covered activity" means
providing assistance or transportation during an emergency or disaster
whether such assistance or transportation is provided at the scene of
the emergency or disaster, an alternative care site, a hospital, or
while in route to or from such sites or between sites.

Sec. 4 RCW 38.24.010 and 2005 c 9 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
All bills, claims and demands for military purposes shall be
certified or verified and audited in the manner prescribed by
regulations promulgated by the governor and shall be paid by the state
treasurer from funds available for that purpose. In all cases where
the organized militia, or any part of the organized militia, or a
disaster medical assistance team as defined in RCW 38.52.010 is called
into the service of the state to perform duties under RCW 38.08.040,
except for anticipated planning, training, exercises, and other
administrative duties that are not of an emergent nature, or to respond
to an emergency or disaster as defined in RCW 38.52.010, warrants for
allowed pay and expenses for such services or compensation for injuries
or death or reimbursement for equipment and supplies shall be drawn
upon the general fund of the state treasury and paid out of any moneys
in said fund not otherwise appropriated. All such warrants shall be
the obligation of the state and shall bear interest at the legal rate
from the date of their presentation for payment.

--- END ---