BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.230.180 and 1980 c 96 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, if the
board of directors of a school district provides access to the campus
and the student information directory to persons or groups which make
students aware of occupational or educational options, the board shall
provide access on the same basis to official recruiting representatives
of the military forces of the state and the United States for the
purpose of informing students of educational and career opportunities
available in the military.
(2)(a) It is the intent of the legislature that a school district,
in adopting a policy pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, not
purposefully exclude any military recruiter from access to information.
It is further the intent of the legislature, in the interest of student
confidentiality, that school districts minimize the release of student
telephone numbers and other directory information in the absence of
express parental consent. The legislature finds that the nondisclosure
of student telephone numbers and other directory information reduces
the possibility of harassment of students and their families by
organizations that receive student directory information.
(b) A school district that requires the parent or guardian of a
high school student to provide current emergency information to the
student's school of attendance shall include a notice in the request
for emergency information that does all of the following:
(i) Informs the parent or legal guardian and the student of their
right to request, pursuant to 20 U.S.C. Sec. 7908(a)(2), that the
student's name, address, and telephone listing not be released to
military recruiters without the prior written consent of the student's
parent or guardian, or the student if the student is eighteen years of
age or older; and
(ii) Allows the parent, legal guardian, or student to indicate on
the request form that he or she chooses not to have the student's name,
address, and telephone number released to military recruiters.
(c) A request made pursuant to (b) of this subsection shall not
prohibit a high school from releasing student information to
postsecondary educational institutions or prospective employers.
(d) The school district shall provide the notice required by (b) of
this subsection in English and whatever other languages the school
district uses in its request to parents and guardians for emergency
information.

--- END ---