BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that certain threats
to public health do not respect the jurisdictional boundaries of local
public health districts and departments. Such threats require an
efficient, well-coordinated response by local health jurisdictions in
order to protect the health of local residents as well as the health of
all Washingtonians. These threats place demands on public health to be
more vigilant than ever and to respond quickly and decisively. Rapid
responses of substantial magnitude are no longer a goal for the future,
but a necessity for preserving the health of society.
For over a decade, the public health improvement plan process has
brought state and local health jurisdictions together to achieve a
partnership that has produced standards of quality and best practices
that are a national model. The standards developed by the public
health improvement partnership have focused largely on formal
documentation of administrative processes by state and local health
jurisdictions. This is the necessary first step to measuring the
performance of public health, but is not yet sufficient for measuring
the outcomes of these improvements in public health operations.
Performance measures are needed immediately to ascertain the extent to
which the residents of the state of Washington have a consistent and
adequate level of protection from communicable diseases such as avian
influenza and tuberculosis. Performance measures are also urgently
needed to assure Washington residents of an adequate and consistent
statewide response to public health emergencies such as those that will
result from a major earthquake, terrorist attack, or pandemic disease
outbreak.
The legislature recognizes the magnitude of the demands placed on
public health in today's society and the strides that it has made
toward holding itself accountable for the way in which it performs.
The legislature finds that enhanced funding and enhanced performance
measures are immediately necessary in order for public health to
perform at levels that will protect all of the residents of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Local health jurisdiction" means a local health department as
established under chapter 70.05 RCW, a combined city-county health
department as established under chapter 70.08 RCW, or a health district
established under chapter 70.05 or 70.46 RCW.
(3) "Performance measure" means a standard that establishes a
benchmark against which a local health jurisdiction's performance can
be measured that is as closely associated with a desired outcome as
possible.
(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The secretary shall:
(1) By December 1, 2006, develop a limited set of key performance
measures for emergency preparedness and protection from communicable
disease. The performance measures must provide a means to assess
operations of the department and each local health jurisdiction with
respect to providing an adequate and consistent level of statewide
protection for the residents of the state in the event of an emergency
that threatens public health or an outbreak of communicable disease.
In developing these measures, the secretary shall consider performance
measures developed by government agencies and private organizations.
The secretary shall attempt to develop these performance measures in
categories consistent with the process standards applicable to
emergency preparedness and protection from communicable disease as
identified in the public health improvement plan under RCW 43.70.520
and 43.70.580.
(2) Develop a process for assessing the compliance of the
department and each local health jurisdiction with the performance
measures developed under subsection (1) of this section at least
biannually;
(3) Determine timely and appropriate remedial measures as provided
in section 5 of this act for any local health jurisdiction found not to
be in substantial compliance with the performance measures developed
under subsection (1) of this section;
(4) Review spending plans submitted by local health jurisdictions
under section 4 of this act for meeting performance measures developed
under subsection (1) of this section; and
(5) Notify the governor immediately when funds for local health
jurisdictions are inadequate for jurisdictions to maintain substantial
compliance with the performance measures developed under subsection (1)
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Each local health jurisdiction must
substantially comply with the performance measures established under
section 3 of this act by July 1, 2007, and maintain such substantial
compliance.
(2) Each local health jurisdiction must develop a spending plan
that details the necessary and appropriate expenditures it will incur
to achieve and maintain substantial compliance with the performance
measures under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Within ninety days of a determination by
the department that a local health jurisdiction has failed to
substantially comply with the performance measures developed under
section 3 of this act, the secretary must determine appropriate
remedial measures to achieve compliance from the local health
jurisdiction. The secretary must submit a notice of noncompliance to
the local health jurisdiction specifying the actions that the
jurisdiction must take to achieve compliance, together with any interim
actions that may be required to protect public health while the local
health jurisdiction achieves compliance with the performance measure.
(2) When a local health jurisdiction receives a notice of
noncompliance under subsection (1) of this section, the local health
officer or administrative officer appointed under RCW 70.05.040 must
submit a plan of correction to the secretary within two weeks. The
plan of correction shall specify the actions that the local health
jurisdiction will take to achieve compliance.
(3) Upon receiving a plan of correction from a local health
jurisdiction, the secretary must review the plan for adequacy and
either approve the plan or direct the local health jurisdiction to make
changes and resubmit it.
(4) If a local health jurisdiction fails to submit an acceptable
plan of correction or fails to comply with the terms of an approved
plan of correction, the secretary may order that additional remedial
measures be imposed including any of the following:
(a) Assignment of a monitor of the operations of the local health
jurisdiction;
(b) Censure or reprimand;
(c) Suspension or refund of payments provided to the local health
jurisdiction under section 6 of this act; or
(d) Removal of the local health officer or administrative officer
as specified in RCW 70.05.120.
(5) The department shall not issue a notice of noncompliance in any
instance where the secretary has notified the governor of the
inadequacy of funds under section 3 of this act and the local health
jurisdiction's failure to substantially comply with the performance
measures developed under section 3 of this act is the result of this
inadequacy of funds.
(6) The remedial measures in this section do not preclude the
secretary from exercising any other authority available to him or her.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department shall allocate funds
appropriated for the purpose of supporting local health jurisdictions
in meeting the performance measures for emergency preparedness and
protection from communicable disease established in section 3 of this
act. Funds shall not be distributed until the standards have been
finalized. Thereupon, the funds shall be distributed based on the
spending plans submitted by local health jurisdictions under section 4
of this act. If there are insufficient moneys to fund all plans, the
department must prioritize spending requests within each plan as
necessary in a manner the secretary believes is most likely to produce
a consistent level of public health protection from communicable
disease and preparedness for public health emergencies.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.05.120 and 2003 c 53 s 350 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any local health officer or administrative officer appointed
under RCW 70.05.040, if any, who shall refuse or neglect to obey or
enforce the provisions of chapters 70.05, 70.24, and 70.46 RCW or the
rules, regulations or orders of the state board of health or who shall
refuse or neglect to make prompt and accurate reports to the state
board of health, or who continuously fails to submit an acceptable plan
of correction or fails to comply with the terms of an approved plan of
correction under chapter 70.-- RCW (sections 1 through 6 of this act),
may be removed as local health officer or administrative officer by the
state board of health, or the secretary of health in the case of a
failure to submit or comply with a plan of correction under this act,
and shall not again be reappointed except with the consent of the state
board of health. Any person may complain to the state board of health
concerning the failure of the local health officer or administrative
officer to carry out the laws or the rules and regulations concerning
public health, and the state board of health shall, if a preliminary
investigation so warrants, call a hearing to determine whether the
local health officer or administrative officer is guilty of the alleged
acts. Such hearings shall be held pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 34.05 RCW, and the rules and regulations of the state board of
health adopted thereunder.
(2) Any member of a local board of health who shall violate any of
the provisions of chapters 70.05, 70.24, and 70.46 RCW or refuse or
neglect to obey or enforce any of the rules, regulations or orders of
the state board of health made for the prevention, suppression or
control of any dangerous contagious or infectious disease or for the
protection of the health of the people of this state, is guilty of a
misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not less than ten
dollars nor more than two hundred dollars.
(3) Any physician who shall refuse or neglect to report to the
proper health officer or administrative officer within twelve hours
after first attending any case of contagious or infectious disease or
any diseases required by the state board of health to be reported or
any case suspicious of being one of such diseases, is guilty of a
misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not less than ten
dollars nor more than two hundred dollars for each case that is not
reported.
(4) Any person violating any of the provisions of chapters 70.05,
70.24, and 70.46 RCW or violating or refusing or neglecting to obey any
of the rules, regulations or orders made for the prevention,
suppression and control of dangerous contagious and infectious diseases
by the local board of health or local health officer or administrative
officer or state board of health, or who shall leave any isolation
hospital or quarantined house or place without the consent of the
proper health officer or who evades or breaks quarantine or conceals a
case of contagious or infectious disease or assists in evading or
breaking any quarantine or concealing any case of contagious or
infectious disease, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction
thereof shall be subject to a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars
nor more than one hundred dollars or to imprisonment in the county jail
not to exceed ninety days or to both fine and imprisonment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The sum of twenty million dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the department of health
for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---