BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.52.530 and 2002 c 341 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The enhanced 911 advisory committee is created to advise and assist
the state enhanced 911 coordinator in coordinating and facilitating the
implementation and operation of enhanced 911 throughout the state. The
director shall appoint members of the committee who represent diverse
geographical areas of the state and include state residents who are
members of the national emergency number association, the associated
public communications officers Washington chapter, the Washington state
fire chiefs association, the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs, the Washington state council of fire fighters, the
Washington state council of police officers, the Washington ambulance
association, the state fire protection policy board, the Washington
fire commissioners association, the Washington state patrol, the
association of Washington cities, the Washington state association of
counties, the utilities and transportation commission or commission
staff, a representative of a voice over internet protocol company, and
an equal number of representatives of large and small local exchange
telephone companies and large and small radio communications service
companies offering commercial mobile radio service in the state.
((This section expires December 31, 2006.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW
to read as follows:
On an annual basis, the enhanced 911 advisory committee shall
provide an update on the status of enhanced 911 service in the state to
the appropriate committees in the legislature.

--- END ---