BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.120 and 1985 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Each)) Every member of the governing body who attends a
meeting of such governing body where action is taken in violation of
any provision of this chapter applicable to him or her, with knowledge
of the fact that the meeting is in violation thereof, or who otherwise
intentionally violates any provision of this chapter, is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.
(2) Every member of the governing body who otherwise violates any
provision of this chapter shall be subject to personal liability in the
form of a civil penalty in the amount of one hundred dollars. The
civil penalty shall be assessed by a judge of the superior court and an
action to enforce this penalty may be brought by any person. ((A
violation of this chapter does not constitute a crime and assessment of
the civil penalty by a judge shall not give rise to any disability or
legal disadvantage based on conviction of a criminal offense.
(2))) (3) Any person who prevails against a public agency in any
action in the courts for a violation of this chapter shall be awarded
all costs, including reasonable attorney fees, incurred in connection
with such legal action. Pursuant to RCW 4.84.185, any public agency
who prevails in any action in the courts for a violation of this
chapter may be awarded reasonable expenses and attorney fees upon final
judgment and written findings by the trial judge that the action was
frivolous and advanced without reasonable cause.

--- END ---