BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Relying on foreign oil hurts our state's economy, citizens, and
businesses;
(2) Experts tell us that the global oil shortage will only worsen,
making the three dollars per gallon gasoline of summer 2005 seem
affordable;
(3) Instead of leaving our economy at the mercy of global events,
and the policies of foreign nations, Washington state should adopt a
policy of energy independence;
(4) Each year, citizens and businesses in Washington state spend
nine billion dollars on gasoline and diesel, with those funds drained
from the state economy;
(5) The energy freedom program is meant to lead Washington state
toward energy independence;
(6) The biofuels industry is a new and developing industry now
limited by the availability of capital for construction of facilities
for converting farm products into energy and fuels; and
(7) For biofuels to be economically viable in Washington, it will
be necessary to grow dedicated crops, construct crushers near
Washington farms, and build refineries to create fuel.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to reduce
Washington's dependence on imported oil, expand renewable fuel
production and use in Washington, help citizens and business conserve
energy, and promote sustainable rural economic development by creating
new jobs and stimulating business and economic activity in local
communities across Washington.
To accomplish this, the energy freedom program is established to
stimulate strategic investment in facilities, infrastructure, and
technologies that will advance Washington's move toward energy
independence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to 2005 c 488
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Energy Freedom Program (06-2-852)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The appropriation is provided solely for low-interest loans
to political subdivisions for renewable energy projects including the
development of biofuel oilseed crushers, supporting infrastructure, and
facilities. The political subdivision may negotiate an appropriate
agreement with the bioenergy industry for the use of the oilseed
crushers, supporting infrastructure, and facilities.
(b) For purposes of this section, political subdivision means any
port district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any
other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the
state.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Recommendation

Spokane conservation district $2,750,000

Odessa public development authority $2,750,000

Port of Columbia county $2,750,000

Port of Sunnyside $750,000

Total $9,000,000

(3) All other project funds must be disbursed prior to energy
freedom loans, except where required on a matching basis by other
federal or state programs.
(4) Future loan repayments shall be deposited into the energy
freedom account created in section 3 of this act.
(5) It is the intent of the legislature to provide loans for the
development of a Washington state biodiesel industry based on
Washington grown oilseed. The legislature is aware that in the
development of this industry, the start-up process may necessitate the
use of other oilseeds until Washington state growers plant sufficient
crops to support this industry. The legislature also understands the
realities of weather and market conditions in this process. The
conversion to maximum Washington grown oilseed must be accomplished as
quickly as possible. The political subdivision shall: (a) Develop a
plan for outreach to local growers and an estimate of when maximum
Washington state oilseed-based production will be reached; (b) develop
a goal for the political subdivision to return a portion of the biofuel
to local oilseed producers; and (c) report this information to the
department of community, trade, and economic development by December 1,
2006. The department shall report on the implementation of this
section by January 1, 2007, to the appropriate committees of the
legislature.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW
to read as follows:
The energy freedom account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from appropriations made to the account, proceeds from other
lawful sources, and loan payments of principal and interest derived
from loans made under section 2 of this act must be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for loans and grants to
political subdivisions for renewable energy and biofuel development
projects and activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---