BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.660 and 2005 c 445 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) A contribution by a political committee with funds that have
all been contributed by one person who exercises exclusive control over
the distribution of the funds of the political committee is a
contribution by the controlling person.
(2) Two or more entities are treated as a single entity if one of
the two or more entities is a subsidiary, branch, or department of a
corporation that is participating in an election campaign or making
contributions, or a local unit or branch of a trade association, labor
union, or collective bargaining association that is participating in an
election campaign or making contributions. All contributions made by
a person or political committee whose contribution or expenditure
activity is financed, maintained, or controlled by a trade association,
labor union, collective bargaining organization, or the local unit of
a trade association, labor union, or collective bargaining organization
are considered made by the trade association, labor union, collective
bargaining organization, or local unit of a trade association, labor
union, or collective bargaining organization.
(3) Two or more limited liability companies are treated as a single
entity for contribution purposes if one of the two or more entities is
participating in an election campaign or making contributions and two
or more members of the entities are the same person.
(4) The commission shall adopt rules to carry out this section and
is not subject to the time restrictions of RCW 42.17.370(1).

--- END ---