BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 101 2005 c 518 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,411,000))
$30,261,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,900,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,311,000))
$61,161,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (((2))) $25,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for the
children's and family services task force established in Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5872 (family/children's department). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 102 2005 c 518 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,085,000))
$6,094,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,346,000))
$6,389,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,431,000))
$12,483,000

Sec. 103 2005 c 518 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,011,000))
$2,013,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,020,000))
$2,022,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,031,000))
$4,035,000

Sec. 104 2005 c 518 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,866,000))
$13,906,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,358,000))
$14,376,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,224,000))
$28,282,000

Sec. 105 2005 c 518 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,657,000))
$19,922,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,081,000))
$21,567,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,106,000))
$50,936,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,641,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($115,485,000))
$118,066,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for court-appointed special
advocates in dependency matters. The administrator for the courts,
after consulting with the association of juvenile court administrators
and the association of court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad
litem programs, shall distribute the funds to volunteer court-appointed
special advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The distribution of
funding shall be based on the number of children who need volunteer
court-appointed special advocate representation and shall be equally
accessible to all volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian
ad litem programs. The administrator for the courts shall not retain
more than six percent of total funding to cover administrative or any
other agency costs.
(2) $3,000,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for school district petitions to
juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and
28A.225.035. The office of the administrator for the courts shall
develop an interagency agreement with the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to allocate the funding provided in this
subsection. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be
based on the number of petitions filed.
(3) $13,224,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to county juvenile
court administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children
in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The office of the
administrator for the courts shall not retain any portion of these
funds to cover administrative costs. The office of the administrator
for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators,
shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula
shall neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition
processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average
per-petition processing costs.
(4) The distributions made under subsection (3) of this section and
distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made
pursuant to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate
reimbursement for costs for any new programs or increased level of
service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.
(5) Each fiscal year during the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate
ways and means committee no later than 60 days after a fiscal year
ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for
the purpose of distributing funds.
(6) $82,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $82,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1112 (creating an additional superior court position). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts in this subsection
shall lapse.
(7) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1854 (driving privilege) and Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5454 (court operations). If neither bill is enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 106 2005 c 518 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,490,000))
$4,776,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,078,000))
$26,204,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,175,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,743,000))
$44,155,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to expand the parent
representation project in dependency and termination cases.
(2) Amounts provided from the public safety and education account
appropriation in this section include funding for investigative
services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.
(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section and in Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5454, the office may, at its
discretion, implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1542 (indigent
defense services).

Sec. 107 2005 c 518 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,883,000))
$3,083,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,832,000))
$3,232,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,705,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,987,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,407,000))
$14,007,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,783,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $2,732,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, $4,705,000 of the public safety and education
account--state appropriation, and $2,987,000 of the violence reduction
and drug enforcement account--state appropriation are contingent upon
enactment of Substitute House Bill No. 1747 (civil legal services). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, these appropriations shall be
made to the department of community, trade, and economic development
and are provided solely for the purpose of civil legal services.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are contingent upon enactment of Substitute House Bill
No. 1747 (civil legal services). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the appropriation shall be made to the department of
community, trade, and economic development and is provided solely for
a general farm organization with members in every county of the state
to develop and administer an alternative dispute resolution system for
disputes between farmers and farm workers.

Sec. 108 2005 c 518 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,600,000))
$5,595,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,279,000))
$5,764,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,364,000))
$1,366,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $508,000
Salmon Recovery Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,184,000))
$4,193,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve
Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,935,000))
$21,610,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,112,000 of the water quality account appropriation and
$1,150,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided
solely for the Puget Sound water quality action team to implement the
Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan action items PSAT-01 through
PSAT-06.
(2) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $200,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for one-time corrective actions to address Hood canal's
dissolved oxygen problems, the Puget Sound conservation and recovery
plan action item PSAT-07.
(3) As described in section 129(7) of this act, the Puget Sound
water quality action team shall make recommendations and report on
monitoring activities related to salmon recovery.
(4) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1152 (early learning council). If House Bill No. 1152 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(5) For the governor's funding request pursuant to RCW 74.39A.300
to be submitted to the legislature by December 20, 2006, it is the
intent of the legislature to consider a fringe benefits funding request
that provides health care benefits substantially equivalent in cost to
those available to individual providers pursuant to chapter 25, Laws of
2003 1st sp. sess.
(6) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely as a grant to the Hood Canal
Coordinating Council to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2097 (management program for Hood Canal). ((If Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2097 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.))
(7) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a review of ocean policy
issues in cooperation with individuals with appropriate expertise and
the departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and natural resources.
By December 31, 2005, the governor's office shall identify the
recommendations of the U.S. commission on ocean policy appropriate for
immediate implementation. By December 31, 2006, the governor's office
shall provide a report: (a) Summarizing the condition of the state's
ocean resources and their contribution to the state's character,
quality of life, and economic viability; (b) recommending improvements
in coordination among state agencies and other jurisdictions; (c)
recommending measures to protect and manage ocean resources; (d)
recommending measures to finance ocean protection, management, and
development programs; and (e) recommending legislation regarding ocean
resources or policy.
(8) $508,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation is
provided solely for the oil spill advisory council established in
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5432 (oil spill oversight
council). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 109 2005 c 518 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $752,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($766,000))
$768,000
((General Fund--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000))
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,519,000))
$1,523,000

Sec. 110 2005 c 518 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,989,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,009,000))
$2,013,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,998,000))
$4,012,000

Sec. 111 2005 c 518 s 119 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,102,000))
$20,194,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,323,000))
$17,627,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,092,000))
$7,099,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($125,000))
$207,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,127,000))
$8,210,000
Department of Personnel Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($719,000))
$721,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,138,000))
$12,398,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,009,000))
$53,010,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($111,635,000))
$119,532,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,296,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2) $1,999,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,403,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the verification of initiative
and referendum petitions, maintenance of related voter registration
records, and the publication and distribution of the voters and
candidates pamphlet.
(3) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $118,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for legal advertising of state
measures under RCW 29.27.072.
(4)(a) $2,028,004 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $2,063,772 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2005-07 biennium. The funding level
for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in
this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind,
in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The
office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once
all criteria in (a) and (b) of this subsection have been satisfactorily
documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(5) $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $173,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for the implementation of House Bill No.
1749 (county election procedures). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims in
Washington State Democratic Party, et al. v. Sam S. Reed, et al.,
United States District Court Western District of Washington at Tacoma
Cause No. C00-5419FDB and related appeal. The expenditure of this
appropriation is contingent on the release of all claims in the case
and related appeal, and total settlement costs shall not exceed the
appropriation in this subsection.

Sec. 112 2005 c 518 s 120 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $277,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($289,000))
$292,000
Pension Fund Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($566,000))
$570,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office shall assist the department of
personnel on providing the government-to-government training sessions
for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The
training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal
issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the
training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the
participants of each session. The department of personnel shall be
responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training,
including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

Sec. 113 2005 c 518 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN-PACIFIC-AMERICAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $235,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($238,000))
$239,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($473,000))
$475,000

Sec. 114 2005 c 518 s 122 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER
State Treasurer's Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,124,000))
$14,174,000

Sec. 115 2005 c 518 s 123 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,884,000))
$852,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,441,000))
$741,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,952,000))
$14,011,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,277,000))
$15,608,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Audits of school districts by the division of municipal
corporations shall include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a)
Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience and education of the
district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.
(2) $731,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $727,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for staff and related costs to
verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for
state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state
funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state
funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is
not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits;
and to assist the state special education safety net committee when
requested.
(3) The office shall report to the office of financial management
and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature detailed
information on risk-based auditing, its theory, and its application for
the audits performed on Washington state government. The report shall
include an explanation of how the office identifies, measures, and
prioritizes risk, the manner in which the office uses these factors in
the planning and execution of the audits of Washington state
government, and the methods and procedures used in the conduct of the
risk-based audits themselves. The report is due no later than December
1, 2005.
(4) (($1,130,000)) $100,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006((, $1,695,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and $2,000 of the state
auditing services revolving account--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 are)) is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1064 (government performance). ((If
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1064 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))
(5) $16,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided for a review of special education excess cost
accounting and reporting requirements. The state auditor's office
shall coordinate this work with the joint legislative audit and review
committee's review of the special education excess cost accounting
methodology and expenditure reporting requirements. The state
auditor's review shall include an examination of whether school
districts are (a) appropriately implementing the excess cost accounting
methodology; (b) consistently charging special education expenses to
the special education and basic education programs; (c) appropriately
determining the percentage of expenditures that should be charged to
the special education and basic education programs; and (d)
appropriately and consistently reporting special education
expenditures. The results of this review will be included in the joint
legislative audit and review committee's report issued in January 2006.

Sec. 116 2005 c 518 s 124 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $137,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($206,000))
$207,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($343,000))
$344,000

Sec. 117 2005 c 518 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,223,000))
$5,489,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,156,000))
$5,331,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,973,000))
$3,175,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,303,000))
$2,307,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,313,000))
$1,315,000
Health Services Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $762,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($185,970,000))
$191,083,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($203,208,000))
$209,753,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.

Sec. 118 2005 c 518 s 126 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $719,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($714,000))
$716,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,433,000))
$1,439,000

Sec. 119 2005 c 518 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,123,000))
$66,754,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,151,000))
$39,025,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($246,886,000))
$257,475,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,229,000))
$12,236,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,439,000))
$5,443,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,395,000))
$3,430,000
Tourism Development and Promotion Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($213,000))
$345,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,130,000))
$1,133,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,808,000))
$1,809,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,362,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,231,000))
$7,234,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,570,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,009,000))
$32,866,000
Homeless Families Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($614,000))
$616,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($442,006,000))
$439,231,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,838,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
technology center for work essential to the mission of the Washington
technology center and conducted in partnership with universities. The
center shall not pay any increased indirect rate nor increases in other
indirect charges above the absolute amount paid during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium.
(2) $5,902,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for the justice assistance grant program, to be
distributed in state fiscal year 2006 as follows:
(a) $2,064,000 to local units of government to continue
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;
(b) $330,000 to the department to continue the drug prosecution
assistance program in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces;
(c) $675,000 to the Washington state patrol for coordination,
investigative, and supervisory support to the multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces and for methamphetamine education and response;
(d) $20,000 to the department for tribal law enforcement;
(e) $345,000 to the department to continue domestic violence legal
advocacy;
(f) $60,000 to the department for community-based advocacy services
to victims of violent crime, other than sexual assault and domestic
violence;
(g) $351,000 to the department of social and health services,
division of alcohol and substance abuse, for juvenile drug courts in
eastern and western Washington;
(h) $626,000 to the department of social and health services to
continue youth violence prevention and intervention projects;
(i) $97,000 to the department to continue evaluation of this grant
program;
(j) $290,000 to the office of financial management for criminal
history records improvement;
(k) $580,000 to the department for required grant administration,
monitoring, and reporting on justice assistance grant programs; and
(l) $464,000 to the department for distribution to small
municipalities.
These amounts represent the maximum justice assistance grant
expenditure authority for each program. No program may expend justice
assistance grant funds in excess of the amounts provided in this
subsection. If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this
subsection become available, whether from prior or current fiscal year
distributions, the department shall hold these moneys in reserve and
may not expend them without specific appropriation. These moneys shall
be carried forward and applied to the pool of moneys available for
appropriation for programs and projects in the succeeding fiscal year.
As part of its budget request for the succeeding year, the department
shall estimate and request authority to spend any justice assistance
grant funds.
(3) $3,600,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the justice assistance grant program, to be
distributed in state fiscal year 2007 as follows:
(a) $2,013,000 to local units of government to continue
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;
(b) $330,000 to the department to continue the drug prosecution
assistance program in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces;
(c) $675,000 to the Washington state patrol for coordination,
investigative, and supervisory support to the multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces;
(d) $110,000 to the department to support the governor's council on
substance abuse;
(e) $97,000 to the department to continue evaluation of the justice
assistance grant program;
(f) $360,000 to the department for required grant administration,
monitoring, and reporting on justice assistance grant programs; and
(g) $15,000 to the department for a tribal and local law
enforcement statewide summit.
(4) $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to fund domestic violence legal
advocacy, in recognition of reduced federal grant funding.
(((4))) (5) $28,848,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 ((and $29,941,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are)) is provided solely for
providing early childhood education assistance. Of ((these)) this
amount((s)), $1,497,000 ((in each fiscal year)) is provided solely to
increase the number of children receiving education, and $1,052,000
((in fiscal year 2006 and $2,146,000 in fiscal year 2007 are)) is
provided solely for a targeted vendor rate increase.
(((5))) (6) Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW
43.63A.600, the mortgage and rental assistance program, shall be
remitted to the department, including any current revolving account
balances. The department shall contract with a lender or contract
collection agent to act as a collection agent of the state. The lender
or contract collection agent shall collect payments on outstanding
loans, and deposit them into an interest-bearing account. The funds
collected shall be remitted to the department quarterly. Interest
earned in the account may be retained by the lender or contract
collection agent, and shall be considered a fee for processing payments
on behalf of the state. Repayments of loans granted under this chapter
shall be made to the lender or contract collection agent as long as the
loan is outstanding, notwithstanding the repeal of the chapter.
(((6))) (7) $1,288,000 of the Washington housing trust account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed House
Bill No. 1074. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amounts in this subsection shall lapse.
(((7))) (8) $725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for food banks to obtain and
distribute additional nutritious food; and purchase equipment to
transport and store perishable products.
(((8))) (9) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the community services
block grant program to help meet current service demands that exceed
available community action resources.
(((9))) (10) $215,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for matching funds for a federal
economic development administration grant awarded to the city of Kent
to conduct a feasibility study and economic analysis for the
establishment of a center for advanced manufacturing.
(((10))) (11) $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for the department to compile a
report on housing stock in Washington state to identify areas of
potentially high risk for child lead exposure. This report shall
include an analysis of existing data regarding the ages of housing
stock in specific regions and an analysis of data regarding actual lead
poisoning cases, which shall be provided by the department of health's
childhood lead poisoning surveillance program.
(((11))) (12) $150,000 of general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for the Cascade land conservancy to
develop and implement a plan for regional conservation within King,
Kittitas, Pierce, and Snohomish counties.
(((12))) (13) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for the support, including safety
and security costs, of the America's freedom salute to be held in the
Vancouver, Washington area.
(((13))) (14) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to Snohomish county for a law
enforcement and treatment methamphetamine pilot program. $250,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $250,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are
provided solely to the Pierce county alliance's methamphetamine family
services treatment program and safe streets of Tacoma's methamphetamine
prevention service.
(((14))) (15) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for one pilot project to promote the study and
implementation of safe neighborhoods through community planning.
(((15))) (16) $287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $288,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for Walla Walla community
college to establish the water and environmental studies center to
provide workforce education and training, encourage innovative
approaches and practices that address environmental and cultural
issues, and facilitate the Walla Walla watershed alliance role in
promoting communication leading to cooperative conservation efforts
that effectively address urban and rural water and environmental
issues.
(((16))) (17) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for work with the northwest food
processors association on the food processing cluster development
project.
(((17))) (18) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the northwest agriculture
incubator project, which will support small farms in economic
development.
(((18))) (19) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to the department of
community, trade, and economic development as the final appropriation
for the youth assessment center in Pierce county for activities
dedicated to reducing the rate of incarceration of juvenile offenders.
(((19))) (20) $235,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $235,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
small business incubator program. $250,000 must be distributed as
grants and must be matched by an equal amount of private funds.
(((20))) (21) The department shall coordinate any efforts geared
towards the 2010 Olympics with the regional effort being conducted by
the Pacific northwest economic region, a statutory committee.
(((21))) (22) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for HistoryLink to expand its
free, noncommercial online encyclopedia service on state and local
history.
(((22))) (23) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for Women's Hearth, a
nonprofit program serving the Spokane area's homeless and low-income
women.
(24) If a bill creating the department of early learning is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, $424,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 shall lapse.

Sec. 120 2005 c 518 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($573,000))
$579,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($517,000))
$523,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,090,000))
$1,105,000

Sec. 121 2005 c 518 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,993,000))
$17,742,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,050,000))
$19,581,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,550,000))
$23,555,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,216,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,064,000))
$62,665,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the public works assistance account appropriation
is provided solely for an inventory and evaluation of the most
effective way to organize the state public infrastructure programs and
funds. The inventory and evaluation shall be delivered to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2005.
(2)(a) $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for an advisory council to study
residential services for persons with developmental disabilities. The
study shall identify a preferred system of services and a plan to
implement the system within four years. Recommendations shall be
provided on the services that best address client needs in different
regions of the state and on the preferred system by January 1, 2006.
The office of financial management may contract for specialized
services to complete the study.
(b) The advisory council shall consist of thirteen members.
Members appointed by the governor, include one representative from each
of the governor's office or the office of financial management, the
department of social and health services, the Washington state
disabilities council, two labor organizations, the community
residential care providers, residents of residential habilitation
centers, individuals served by community residential programs, and
individuals with developmental disabilities who reside or resided in
residential habilitation centers. The advisory council shall also
include two members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives representing the majority and
minority caucuses and two members of the senate appointed by the
president of the senate representing the majority and minority
caucuses. Legislative members of the advisory group shall be
reimbursed in accordance with RCW 44.04.120, and nonlegislative members
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 44.04.120. Staff support shall be
provided by the department of social and health services, the
developmental disabilities council, the office of financial management,
the house of representatives office of program research, and senate
committee services.
(3) $1,041,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $706,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5441 (studying early
learning, K-12, and higher education). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided to the office of regulatory assistance and is
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) This amount is provided solely for the enhanced planning and
permit pilot program; and
(b) Regulatory assistance is to select two local government
planning and permitting offices to participate in an enhanced permit
assistance pilot program. Such enhancement may include, but is not
limited to:
(i) Creation of local and state interagency planning and permit
review teams;
(ii) Use of advanced online planning and permit applications;
(iii) Using loaned executives; and
(iv) Additional technical assistance and guidance for permit
applicants.
(5) $303,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $255,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1970 (government management). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(6) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Engrossed House Bill No. 1242 (budgeting outcomes and priorities). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) The department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife,
the department of natural resources, the conservation commission, and
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall make
recommendations to improve or eliminate monitoring activities related
to salmon recovery and watershed health. The agencies shall coordinate
with the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and
consult with the office of financial management in determining the
scope and contents of the report.
The agencies shall prepare a report detailing all new activity and
updating all previously identified activity within the comprehensive
monitoring strategy. The report shall identify the monitoring activity
being performed and include: The purpose of the monitoring activity,
when the activity started, who uses the information, how often it is
accessed, what costs are incurred by fund, what frequency is used to
collect data, what geographic location is used to collect data, where
the information is stored, and what is the current status and cost by
fund source of the data storage systems.
The agencies shall provide a status report summarizing progress to
the governor's forum on monitoring and watershed health and the office
of financial management by March 1, 2006. A final report to the
governor's monitoring forum, the office of financial management, and
the appropriate legislative fiscal committees shall be submitted no
later than September 1, 2006.
(8) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided to the office of financial management for the
purpose of contracting with the Washington State University and
University of Washington policy consensus center to provide project
coordination for the office of financial management, the department of
agriculture, the conservation commission, and the department of
community, trade, and economic development to work with farmers,
ranchers, and other interested parties to identify potential
agricultural pilot projects that both enhance farm income and improve
protection of natural resources.
(9) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the office of regulatory
assistance to implement activities supporting the governor's regulatory
improvement program including deployment of interagency permit teams,
a business portal, programmatic permits, and an alternative mitigation
program.

Sec. 122 2005 c 518 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,490,000))
$29,595,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $103,000 of the administrative hearing
revolving account--state appropriation is provided solely to determine,
in collaboration with other state agencies, the best mechanism of
digital recording for the office of administrative hearings, the manner
of conversion from tape recording to digital recording, and the
purchase of digital recording devices.

Sec. 123 2005 c 518 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,323,000))
$26,888,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,634,000))
$1,656,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,957,000))
$28,544,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall coordinate with the
governor's office of Indian affairs on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal
government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal
historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal
governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through
a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department
shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the
training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the
training.

Sec. 124 2005 c 518 s 132 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY
Lottery Administrative Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,087,000))
$24,160,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section may not
be expended by the Washington state lottery for any purpose associated
with a lottery game offered through any interactive electronic device,
including the internet.

Sec. 125 2005 c 518 s 133 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($247,000))
$248,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($485,000))
$487,000

Sec. 126 2005 c 518 s 134 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $237,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($240,000))
$241,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($477,000))
$479,000

Sec. 127 2005 c 518 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE PERSONNEL APPEALS BOARD
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,043,000))
$1,119,000

Sec. 128 2005 c 518 s 136 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS -- OPERATIONS
Dependent Care Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($416,000))
$413,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,056,000))
$45,935,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,472,000))
$46,348,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $13,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1327,
chapter 65, Laws of 2005 (purchasing service credit).
(2) $10,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1269,
chapter 21, Laws of 2005 (law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2 service credit purchase).
(3) $55,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1270 (law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2
postretirement employment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $26,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1319,
chapter 62, Laws of 2005 (law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 1 ex-spouse benefits).
(5) $46,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1325,
chapter 64, Laws of 2005 (military service credit purchase).
(6) $79,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1329,
chapter 67, Laws of 2005 (law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 1 reduced survivor benefit).
(7) $56,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1936
(emergency medical technician membership in law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 service). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(8) $16,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5522 (purchasing
service credit lost due to injury). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 129 2005 c 518 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD
State Investment Board Expense Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,020,000))
$16,123,000

Sec. 130 2005 c 518 s 138 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($90,065,000))
$90,147,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($91,207,000))
$90,801,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,609,000))
$5,627,000
Real Estate Excise Tax Grant Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $447,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($187,076,000))
$191,117,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, and $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1315 (modifying disclosure requirements for the purposes of
the real estate excise tax). If House Bill No. 1315 is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $7,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2006 and $2,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5101 (renewable energy). If Substitute Senate Bill No.
5101 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed House
Bill No. 1241 (modifying vehicle licensing and registration penalties).
If Engrossed House Bill No. 1241 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $1,390,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, and $1,240,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the department to employ
strategies to enhance current revenue enforcement activities.
(5) $5,121 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2006 is provided solely to satisfy two claims to estate property,
pursuant to RCW 11.76.245.

Sec. 131 2005 c 518 s 139 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,362,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,211,000))
$1,213,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,573,000))
$2,581,000

Sec. 132 2005 c 518 s 141 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,186,000))
$3,196,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $180,000 of the OMWBE enterprises account
appropriation is provided solely for management of private sector
grants and coordination of support services to small businesses in the
state. It is the intent of the legislature that this amount be funded
from new grant revenues and business fees.

Sec. 133 2005 c 518 s 142 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $321,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($233,000))
$232,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,640,000))
$3,641,000
General Administration Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,045,000))
$32,163,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,239,000))
$36,358,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $75,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for the
implementation of House Bill No. 1830 (alternative public works). If
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1830 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 134 2005 c 518 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,612,000))
$3,621,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $684,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,296,000))
$4,655,000

Sec. 135 2005 c 518 s 144 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($673,000))
$1,513,000
Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,253,000))
$40,554,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,926,000))
$42,067,000

Sec. 136 2005 c 518 s 145 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
Certified Public Accountants' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,962,000))
$2,236,000

Sec. 137 2005 c 518 s 146 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($282,000))
$283,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the death investigation
account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial
assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations.
The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding
these funds for multiple death investigations involving an
unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving
multiple jurisdictions.

Sec. 138 2005 c 518 s 147 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION
Horse Racing Commission Operating Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,009,000))
$5,027,000

Sec. 139 2005 c 518 s 148 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,739,000))
$1,735,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,706,000))
$1,702,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,832,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($154,080,000))
$158,026,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($170,357,000))
$174,302,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) As authorized under RCW 66.16.010, the liquor control board
shall add an equivalent surcharge of $0.42 per liter on all retail
sales of spirits, excluding licensee, military and tribal sales,
effective no later than July 1, 2005. The intent of this surcharge is
to generate additional revenues for the state general fund in the
2005-07 biennium.
(2) $154,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the lease of state vehicles from the department
of general administration's motor pool.
(3) $2,228,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for costs associated with the installation of a wide
area network that connects all of the state liquor stores and the
liquor control board headquarters.
(4) $186,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for an alcohol education staff coordinator and
associated alcohol educational resources targeted toward middle school
and high school students.
(5) $2,261,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for replacement of essential computer equipment,
improvement of security measures, and improvement to the core
information technology infrastructure.
(6) $2,800,000 of the liquor control board construction and
maintenance account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
certificate of participation to fund the expansion of the liquor
distribution center.
(7) $3,233,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for upgrades to material handling system and
warehouse management system software and equipment, and associated
staff to increase the liquor distribution center's shipping capacity.
(8) $2,746,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for additional state liquor store and retail
business analysis staff. The additional liquor store staff will be
deployed to those stores with the greatest potential for increased
customer satisfaction and revenue growth. The liquor control board,
using the new retail business analysis staff and, if needed, an
independent consultant, will analyze the impact of additional staff on
customer satisfaction and revenue growth and make recommendations that
will increase the effectiveness and efficiency of all the liquor
control board's retail-related activities. Using best practices and
benchmarks from comparable retail organizations, the analysis will
evaluate and make recommendations, at a minimum, on the following
issues: Optimal staffing levels and store locations and numbers of
stores (both state liquor stores and contract liquor stores); options
for an improved retail organizational structure; strategies to increase
the retail decision-making capacity; and resources required for
enhanced internal organizational support of the retail activities. In
support of this evaluation, a survey shall be employed to gauge
customer satisfaction with state and contract liquor store services.
A written evaluation with recommendations shall be submitted to the
governor and the legislative fiscal committees by October 1, 2006.
(9) $187,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $122,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate
Bill No. 6097 (tobacco products enforcement). If Senate Bill No. 6097
is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(10) $1,435,000 of the liquor revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1379 (liquor retail plan). If Substitute House Bill No.
1379 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 140 2005 c 518 s 149 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Public Service Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,436,000))
$28,546,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,877,000))
$2,894,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,535,000))
$1,539,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,848,000))
$32,979,000

Sec. 141 2005 c 518 s 150 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS
Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'
Administrative Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($768,000))
$930,000

Sec. 142 2005 c 518 s 151 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,084,000))
$10,141,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,362,000))
$10,672,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($165,970,000))
$215,322,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,766,000))
$34,771,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,277,000))
$1,633,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,008,000))
$6,510,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($314,000))
$315,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,713,000))
$6,722,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,127,000))
$27,736,000
Military Department Rental and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $378,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($270,001,000))
$314,246,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($2,277,000)) $1,633,000 of the disaster response account--state appropriation and (($11,008,000)) $6,510,000 of the disaster
response account -- federal appropriation may be spent only on disasters
declared by the governor and with the approval of the office of
financial management. The military department shall submit a report
quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative
fiscal committees detailing information on the disaster response
account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the
account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting
date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2005-07
biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.
(2) (($6,713,000)) $6,722,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--state appropriation and (($29,127,000)) $27,736,000 of the Nisqually
earthquake account -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
response and recovery costs associated with the February 28, 2001,
earthquake. The military department shall submit a report quarterly to
the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing earthquake recovery costs, including: (a)
Estimates of total costs; (b) incremental changes from the previous
estimate; (c) actual expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining
costs to be paid; and (e) estimates of future payments by biennium.
This information shall be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and
by amount paid on behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The
military department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office
of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2005-07 biennium based on current revenue and
expenditure patterns.
(3) (($127,586,000)) $173,612,659 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided solely for homeland security, subject to the
following conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee;
(b) This amount shall not be allotted until a spending plan is
reviewed by the governor's domestic security advisory group and
approved by the office of financial management;
(c) The department shall submit a quarterly report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; incremental changes from the
previous estimate, planned and actual homeland security expenditures by
the state and local governments with this federal funding; and matching
or accompanying state or local expenditures; and
(d) The department shall submit a report by December 1st of each
year to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing homeland security revenues and expenditures for
the previous fiscal year by county and legislative district.
(4) $867,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the Cowlitz county 911 communications
center for the purpose of purchasing or reimbursing the purchase of
interoperable radio communication technology to improve disaster
response in the Mount St. Helens area.
(5) No funds from sources other than fees from voice over internet
protocol (VOIP) providers may be used to implement technologies
specific to the integration of VOIP 911 with E-911. The military
department, in conjunction with the department of revenue, shall
propose methods for assuring the collection of an appropriate enhanced
911 excise tax from VOIP 911 providers and shall report their
recommendations to the legislature by November 1, 2005.

Sec. 143 2005 c 518 s 152 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,776,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,824,000))
$2,830,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,945,000))
$2,953,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,545,000))
$8,575,000

Sec. 144 2005 c 518 s 153 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE GROWTH PLANNING HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,571,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,587,000))
$1,590,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,158,000))
$3,169,000

((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $9,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the
Western Board to relocate. If the Western Board does not relocate by
June 30, 2006, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 145 2005 c 518 s 154 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
State Convention and Trade Center Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,512,000
State Convention and Trade Center Operating
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,470,000))
$46,491,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($76,982,000))
$77,003,000

Sec. 146 2005 c 518 s 155 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $549,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,446,000))
$1,450,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,559,000))
$2,566,000

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 201 2005 c 518 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($251,005,000))
$259,947,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($266,350,000))
$287,598,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($421,401,000))
$435,217,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,345,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,754,000))
$10,755,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,510,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $699,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($951,420,000))
$997,471,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,271,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $2,271,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $1,584,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the category of services titled
"intensive family preservation services."
(2) $701,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $701,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to contract for the operation of
one pediatric interim care facility. The facility shall provide
residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three
months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current
foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The
department shall not require case management as a condition of the
contract.
(3) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $322,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the
training, consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster,
and adoptive parents of children through age three in need of special
care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except that each
program may serve up to three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs, preference
shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing
pediatric interim care program.
(4) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2004 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2005 are provided solely for a foster parent retention
program. This program is directed at foster parents caring for
children who act out sexually.
(5) The providers for the 31 HOPE beds shall be paid a $1,000 base
payment per bed per month, and reimbursed for the remainder of the bed
cost only when the beds are occupied.
(6) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures. The
department shall adjust adoption support benefits to account for the
availability of the new federal adoption support tax credit for special
needs children. The department shall report annually by October 1st to
the appropriate committees of the legislature on the specific efforts
taken to contain costs.
(7) (($3,837,000)) $4,211,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006, (($6,352,000)) $12,216,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and
(($4,370,000)) $7,043,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for reforms to the child protective services and
child welfare services programs, including ((30-day)) improvement in
achieving face-to-face contact for children ((in out-of-home care)) in
30 days, improved timeliness of child protective services
investigations, ((an enhanced in-home child welfare services program,))
and education specialist services. The department shall report by
December 1st of each year on the implementation status of the
enhancements, including the hiring of new staff, and the outcomes of
the reform efforts. The information provided shall include a progress
report on items in the child and family services review program
improvement plan and areas identified for improvement in the Braam
lawsuit settlement.
(8) Within amounts appropriated in this section, priority shall be
given to proven intervention models, including evidence-based
prevention and early intervention programs identified by the Washington
institute for public policy and the department. The department shall
include information on the number, type, and outcomes of the evidence-based programs being implemented in its reports on child welfare reform
efforts.
(9) $177,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the state association of
children's advocacy centers. Funds may be used for (a) children's
advocacy centers that meet the national children's alliance
accreditation standards for full membership, and are members in good
standing; (b) communities in the process of establishing a center; and
(c) the state association of children's advocacy centers. A 50 percent
match will be required of each center receiving state funding.
(10) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a street youth program in
Spokane.
(11) $4,672,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $4,672,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for secure crisis residential
centers.
(12) $572,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006((, $572,000)) and $1,144,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007((, and $1,144,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation)) are provided solely for section 305 of
Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders treatment) for chemical
dependency specialist services.
(13) $3,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5922 (child neglect). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, these amounts shall lapse.
(14) $1,345,000 of the domestic violence prevention account
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 374,
Laws of 2005.

Sec. 202 2005 c 518 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,552,000))
$78,153,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($81,760,000))
$78,891,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,998,000))
$5,537,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,098,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,385,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,621,000))
$5,516,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $449,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($211,414,000))
$208,029,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $706,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation is provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $6,156,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts
provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county
impacts associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
and shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $1,020,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,030,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $5,345,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation are provided solely to implement
community juvenile accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws
of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection
may be used solely for community juvenile accountability grants,
administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the
grants.
(4) $2,997,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation is provided solely to implement alcohol and
substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders.
The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on
a competitive basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision
of services approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse.
The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for
evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and
shall assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) For the purposes of a pilot project, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall provide a block grant, rather than
categorical funding, for consolidated juvenile services, community
juvenile accountability act grants, the chemically dependent
disposition alternative, and the special sex offender disposition
alternative to the Pierce county juvenile court. To evaluate the
effect of decategorizing funding for youth services, the juvenile court
shall do the following:
(a) Develop intermediate client outcomes according to the risk
assessment tool (RAT) currently used by juvenile courts and in
coordination with the juvenile rehabilitation administration;
(b) Track the number of youth participating in each type of
service, intermediate outcomes, and the incidence of recidivism within
twenty-four months of completion of services;
(c) Track similar data as in (b) of this subsection with an
appropriate comparison group, selected in coordination with the
juvenile rehabilitation administration and the family policy council;
(d) Document the process for managing block grant funds on a
quarterly basis, and provide this report to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the family policy council; and
(e) Provide a process evaluation to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the family policy council by June 20, 2006, and a
concluding report by June 30, 2007. The court shall develop this
evaluation in consultation with the juvenile rehabilitation
administration, the family policy council, and the Washington state
institute for public policy.
(6) $319,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $678,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to establish a reinvesting in
youth pilot program. Participation shall be limited to three counties
or groups of counties, including one charter county with a population
of over eight hundred thousand residents and at least one county or
group of counties with a combined population of three hundred thousand
residents or less.
(a) Only the following intervention service models shall be funded
under the pilot program: (i) Functional family therapy; (ii)
multi-systemic therapy; and (iii) aggression replacement training.
(b) Subject to (c) of this subsection, payments to counties in the
pilot program shall be sixty-nine percent of the average service model
cost per youth times the number of youth engaged by the selected
service model. For the purposes of calculating the average service
model cost per engaged youth for a county, the following costs will be
included: Staff salaries, staff benefits, training, fees, quality
assurance, and local expenditures on administration.
(c) Distribution of moneys to the charter county with a population
of over eight hundred thousand residents shall be based upon the number
of youth that are engaged by the intervention service models, up to six
hundred thousand dollars for the biennium. The department may
distribute the remaining grant moneys to the other counties selected to
participate in the pilot program.
(d) The department shall provide recommendations to the legislature
by June 30, 2006, regarding a cost savings calculation methodology, a
funds distribution formula, and criteria for service model eligibility
for use if the reinvesting in youth program is continued in future
biennia.
(e) $248,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $496,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to reimburse counties for local
juvenile disposition alternatives implemented pursuant to House Bill
No. 2073 (juvenile sentencing) and Senate Bill No. 5719 (community
commitment). The juvenile rehabilitation administration, in
consultation with the juvenile court administrators, shall develop an
equitable distribution formula for the funding provided in this
subsection, and negotiate contracts that would avoid the cost of a
youth kept in the community costing more than serving the youth in a
juvenile rehabilitation institution and parole program on an average
daily population basis. The juvenile rehabilitation administration may
adjust the funding level provided in this subsection in the event that
utilization rates of the disposition alternatives are lower than the
level anticipated by the total appropriation to the juvenile
rehabilitation administration in this section. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall report to the appropriate policy
and fiscal committees of the legislature on the use of the disposition
alternatives and revocations by December 1, 2006. If either bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 203 2005 c 518 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH
PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($261,430,000))
$261,541,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($269,285,000))
$268,829,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($336,771,000))
$336,983,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,970,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($869,456,000))
$869,324,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(((b))) (a) $103,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and $103,400,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for persons and
services not covered by the medicaid program. The department shall
distribute these amounts among the regional support networks according
to a formula that, consistent with RCW 71.24.035(13), assures
continuation of fiscal year ((2003)) 2005 levels of nonmedicaid service
in each regional support network area for the following service
categories in the following priority order: (i) Crisis and commitment
services; (ii) community inpatient services; and (iii) residential care
services, including personal care and emergency housing assistance.
The remaining amounts shall be distributed based upon a formula that
incorporates each regional support network's percentage of the state's
population. In consultation with regional support networks and other
interested groups, the department shall report to the joint legislative
and executive task force by September 2006 on options for modifying the
allocation formula to assure equitable statewide access to essential
nonmedicaid services.
(((c))) (b) From the general fund--state appropriations in this
subsection, the secretary of social and health services shall assure
that regional support networks reimburse the aging and disability
services administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid
personal care services that enrolled regional support network consumers
use because of their psychiatric disability.
(((d))) (c) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the
department shall contract with the Clark county regional support
network for development and operation of a project demonstrating
collaborative methods for providing intensive mental health services in
the school setting for severely emotionally disturbed children who are
medicaid eligible. Project services shall be delivered by teachers and
teaching assistants who qualify as, or who are under the supervision
of, mental health professionals meeting the requirements of chapter
275-57 WAC. The department shall increase medicaid payments to the
regional support network by the amount necessary to cover the necessary
and allowable costs of the demonstration, not to exceed the upper
payment limit specified for the regional support network in the
department's medicaid waiver agreement with the federal government
after meeting all other medicaid spending requirements assumed in this
subsection. The regional support network shall provide the required
nonfederal share of the increased medicaid payment provided for
operation of this project.
(((e))) (d) $3,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $3,375,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to establish a
base community psychiatric hospitalization payment rate. The base
payment rate shall be $400 per indigent patient day at hospitals that
accept commitments under the involuntary treatment act, and $550 per
medicaid patient day at free-standing psychiatric hospitals that accept
commitments under the involuntary treatment act. The department shall
allocate these funds among the regional support networks to reflect
projected expenditures at the enhanced payment level by hospital and
region.
(((f))) (e) At least $902,000 of the federal block grant funding
appropriated in this subsection shall be used for the continued
operation of the mentally ill offender pilot program.
(((g))) (f) $2,146,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006, $4,408,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007, and $4,559,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for a vendor rate increase to
regional support networks for medicaid and nonmedicaid services, to the
extent that: Amounts provided in this subsection (1) to serve medicaid
clients through regional support networks are sufficient to ensure
compliance with federally approved actuarially sound medicaid rate
ranges in every rate category. If such amounts are not sufficient to
ensure compliance, funds provided in this subsection (1)(((g))) (f)
shall first be applied to address any noncompliant rate category;
remaining amounts shall be allocated among the regional support
networks by applying a uniform percentage of increase across regional
support networks.
(((h))) (g) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for mental
health services for mentally ill offenders while confined in a county
or city jail and for facilitating access to programs that offer mental
health services upon mentally ill offenders' release from confinement.
These amounts shall supplement, and not supplant, local or other
funding or in-kind resources currently being used for these purposes.
The department is authorized to transfer such amounts as are necessary,
which are not to exceed $418,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $418,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007, to the economic
services program for the purposes of implementing section 12 of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1290 (community mental
health) related to reinstating and facilitating access to mental health
services upon mentally ill offenders' release from confinement.
(((i))) (h) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for grants for
innovative mental health service delivery projects. Such projects may
include, but are not limited to, clubhouse programs and projects for
integrated health care and behavioral health services for general
assistance recipients. These amounts shall supplement, and not
supplant, local or other funding currently being used for activities
funded under the projects authorized in this subsection.
(((j))) (i) The department is authorized to continue to expend
federal block grant funds, and special purpose federal grants, through
direct contracts, rather than through contracts with regional support
networks; and to distribute such funds through a formula other than the
one established pursuant to RCW 71.24.035(13).
(((k))) (j) The department is authorized to continue to contract
directly, rather than through contracts with regional support networks,
for children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(((l))) (k) $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006, $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007, and $4,500,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of
community residential and support services for persons who are older
adults or who have co-occurring medical and behavioral disorders and
who have been discharged or diverted from a state psychiatric hospital.
These funds shall be used to serve individuals whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, who no longer
require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of
care, and who no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment. Coordination of these services will be done in partnership
between the mental health program and the aging and disability services
administration. The funds are not subject to the standard allocation
formula applied in accordance with RCW 71.24.035(13)(a).
(((m))) (l) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided to continue performance-based
incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services
for individuals with severe mental illness who have been discharged
from the state hospitals. These funds will be used to enhance
community residential and support services provided by regional support
networks through other state and federal funding.
(((n))) (m) $539,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 is provided solely to assist with the one-time start-up costs of two evaluation and treatment facilities. Funding for
ongoing program operations shall be from existing funds that would
otherwise be expended upon short-term treatment in state or community
hospitals.
(((o))) (n) $550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for ((a pilot project that
provides integrated care through a facility specializing in long-term
rehabilitation services for people with chronic mental illness who are
chronically medically-compromised. This project is to be implemented
in coordination with and under the auspices of a regional support
network)) enhancing rates to a facility that (i) is a licensed nursing
home; (ii) is considered to be an "Institution for Mental Diseases"
under centers for medicare and medicaid services criteria; (iii)
specializes in long-term rehabilitation services for people with
chronic mental illness who are chronically medically-compromised; and
(iv) provides services to a minimum of 48 consumers funded by a
regional support network. These amounts shall be provided in
coordination with and under the auspices of a regional support network
and shall enhance, and not supplant, other funding or in-kind resources
currently being used for these purposes. These funds shall be used to
cover costs incurred throughout fiscal year 2006 and fiscal year 2007
and ensure adequate compensation for extra medical care services,
personal care services, and other incidental costs that are not fully
covered in the current rate paid to the facility.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($104,749,000))
$112,730,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($110,534,000))
$120,274,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($150,115,000))
$142,822,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,632,000))
$30,352,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $965,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($395,030,000))
$407,143,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state mental hospitals may use funds appropriated in this
subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $3,725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to operate at least one more
forensic ward at western state hospital than was operational in
December 2004, and to employ professional staff in addition to those
assigned in December 2004 to conduct outpatient evaluations of
competency to stand trial.
(c) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood on September 1 of each year for police services provided by
the city at western state hospital and adjacent areas.

(3) CIVIL COMMITMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,322,000))
$41,084,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,551,000))
$44,638,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($89,873,000))
$85,851,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $643,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $994,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,209,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,846,000))
$4,847,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $40,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement the request for proposal process required
by House Bill No. 1290 (community mental health). If House Bill No.
1290 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, these amounts shall lapse.
(b) $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to develop and to train community
mental health staff in the use of the integrated chemical
dependency/mental health screening and assessment system and tool
required by section 601 of Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders
treatment). If section 601 of Senate Bill No. 5763 is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, these amounts shall lapse.

(5) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,620,000))
$2,923,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,550,000))
$2,902,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,671,000))
$10,634,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,841,000))
$16,478,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $164,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the institute for public policy to continue the
longitudinal analysis directed in chapter 334, Laws of 2001 (mental
health performance audit), and, to the extent funds are available
within these amounts, to build upon the evaluation of the impacts of
chapter 214, Laws of 1999 (mentally ill offenders).
(b) $2,151,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the purposes of complying with and
satisfaction of a final court order and judgment in Pierce County, et
al v. State of Washington and State of Washington Department of Social
and Health Services, et al, Thurston County Superior Court Cause No.
03-2-00918-8.
(c) $520,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims in
County of Spokane, a Washington municipal entity v. State of Washington
Department of Social and Health Services and Dennis Braddock, the
Secretary of the Department of Social and Health Services, in his
official capacity, Thurston County Superior Court Cause No. 03-2-01268-5. The expenditure of this amount is contingent on the release of all
claims in the case, and total settlement costs shall not exceed the
amount provided in this subsection. If the settlement is not executed
by June 30, 2006, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 204 2005 c 518 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($299,027,000))
$297,332,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($311,869,000))
$309,053,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($505,414,000))
$502,107,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $904,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,117,214,000))
$1,109,534,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The entire health services account appropriation, (($213,000))
$622,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006,
(($400,000)) $949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and (($600,000)) $1,556,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits for
agency home care workers who are employed through state contracts for
at least twenty hours a week. The ((per worker per month)) state
contribution ((per agency)) to the cost of health care benefits per
participating worker per month shall be no greater than (($380.06))
$449.00 in fiscal year 2006 and (($413.14)) $498.00 in fiscal year
2007.
(b) Individuals receiving family support or high school transition
payments as supplemental security income (SSI) state supplemental
payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance under RCW
74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental payments.
(c) $516,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,563,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $2,078,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for community residential and support
services. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for (i)
residents of residential habilitation centers who are able to be
adequately cared for in community settings and who choose to live in
those community settings; (ii) clients without residential services who
are at immediate risk of institutionalization or in crisis; (iii)
children who are aging out of other state services; and (iv) current
home and community-based waiver program clients who have been assessed
as having an immediate need for increased services. The department
shall ensure that the average cost per day for all program services
other than start-up costs shall not exceed $300. In order to maximize
the number of clients served and ensure the cost-effectiveness of the
waiver programs, the department will strive to limit new client
placement expenditures to 90 percent of the budgeted daily rate. If
this can be accomplished, additional clients may be served with excess
funds provided the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not
exceed the amounts estimated. The department shall electronically
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days
following each fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served with
these additional community services, where they were residing, what
kinds of services they were receiving prior to placement, and the
actual expenditures for all community services to support these
clients.
(d) $579,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,531,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $2,110,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for expanded community services for
persons with developmental disabilities who also have community
protection issues. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for
(i) clients being diverted or discharged from the state psychiatric
hospitals; (ii) clients participating in the dangerous mentally ill
offender program; (iii) clients participating in the community
protection program; and (iv) mental health crisis diversion
outplacements. The department shall ensure that the average cost per
day for all program services other than start-up costs shall not exceed
$300. In order to maximize the number of clients served and ensure the
cost-effectiveness of the waiver programs, the department will strive
to limit new client placement expenditures to 90 percent of the
budgeted daily rate. If this can be accomplished, additional clients
may be served with excess funds if the total projected carry-forward
expenditures do not exceed the amounts estimated. The department shall
implement the four new waiver programs such that decisions about
enrollment levels and the amount, duration, and scope of services
maintain expenditures within appropriations. The department shall
electronically report to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
within 45 days following each fiscal year quarter, the number of
persons served with these additional community services, where they
were residing, what kinds of services they were receiving prior to
placement, and the actual expenditures for all community services to
support these clients.
(e) $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of a
flexible family support pilot program for families who are providing
care and support for family members with developmental disabilities.
The program shall provide funding for support services such as respite
care, training and counseling, assistive technologies, transition
services, and assistance with extraordinary household expenses.
(i) To receive funding, an individual must: (A) Be eligible for
services from the division of developmental disabilities; (B) live with
his or her family; (C) not live independently or with a spouse; (D) not
receive paid services through the division, including medicaid personal
care and medicaid waiver services; and (E) have gross household income
of less than or equal to four hundred percent of the federal poverty
level.
(ii) The department shall determine individual funding awards based
on the following criteria: (A) Documented need for services, with
priority given to individuals in crisis or at immediate risk of needing
institutional services, individuals who transition from high school
without employment or day program opportunities, individuals cared for
by a single parent, and individuals with multiple disabilities; (B)
number and ages of family members and their relation to the individual
with developmental disabilities; (C) gross annual household income; and
(D) availability of state funds.
Funding awards may be made as one-time awards or on a renewable
basis. Renewable awards shall be for a period of twelve months for the
biennium. Awards shall be based upon the criteria provided in this
subsection, but shall be within the following limits: Maximum of
$4,000 per year for an individual whose gross annual household income
is up to 100 percent of the federal poverty level; maximum of $3,000
per year for an individual whose gross annual household income is up to
200 percent of the federal poverty level; maximum of $2,000 per year
for an individual whose gross annual household income is up to 300
percent of the federal poverty level; and maximum of $1,000 per year
for an individual whose gross annual household income is up to 400
percent of the federal poverty level. Of the amounts provided in this
subsection, $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for one-time awards.
(iii) Eligibility for, and the amount of, renewable awards and one-time awards shall be redetermined annually and shall correspond with
the application of the department's mini-assessment tool. At the end
of each award period, the department must redetermine eligibility for
funding, including increases or reductions in the level of funding, as
appropriate.
(iv) By November 1, 2006, the department shall provide
recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature on strategies for integrating state-funded family support
programs, including, if appropriate, the flexible family support pilot
program, into a single program. The department shall also provide a
status report on the flexible family support pilot program, which shall
include the following information: The number of applicants for
funding; the total number of awards; the number and amount of both
annual and one-time awards, broken down by household income levels; and
the purpose of the awards.
(v) The department shall manage enrollment and award levels so as
to not exceed the amounts appropriated for this purpose.
(f) $840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,979,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $1,219,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for employment and day services.
Priority consideration for this new funding shall be young adults with
developmental disabilities living with their family who need employment
opportunities and assistance after high school graduation. Services
shall be provided for both waiver and nonwaiver clients.
(g) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $2,000,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided for implementation of the administrative
rate standardization. These amounts are in addition to any vendor rate
increase adopted by the legislature.
(h) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for services to community clients provided
by licensed professionals at the state residential habilitation
centers. The division shall submit claims for reimbursement for
services provided to clients living in the community with medical
assistance or third-party health coverage, as appropriate, and shall
implement a system for billing clients without coverage. The
department shall provide a report by December 1, 2006, to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the number of clients
served, services provided, and expenditures and revenues associated
with those services.
(i) $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $65,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $130,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for supplemental compensation increases for direct care
workers employed by home care agencies in recognition of higher labor
market cost pressures experienced by agencies subject to collective
bargaining obligations. In order for a specific home care agency to be
eligible for such increases, home care agencies shall submit the
following to the department:
(i) Proof of a legally binding, written commitment to increase the
compensation of agency home care workers; and
(ii) Proof of the existence of a method of enforcement of the
commitment, such as arbitration, that is available to the employees or
their representative, and proof that such a method is expeditious, uses
a neutral decision maker, and is economical for the employees.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($76,062,000))
$76,606,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,545,000))
$78,782,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($152,479,000))
$153,751,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,000,000))
$11,236,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $457,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($319,086,000))
$320,832,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The developmental disabilities program is
authorized to use funds appropriated in this section to purchase goods
and supplies through direct contracting with vendors when the program
determines it is cost-effective to do so.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,457,000))
$2,312,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,068,000))
$1,924,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,034,000))
$3,014,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,559,000))
$7,267,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $578,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $578,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the purpose of developing
and implementing a consistent needs assessment instrument for use on
all clients with developmental disabilities. In developing the
instrument, the department shall develop a process for collecting data
on family income for minor children with developmental disabilities and
all individuals who are receiving state-only funded services. The
department shall ensure that this information is captured as part of
the client assessment process.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,668,000))
$22,408,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,696,000))
$22,438,000

Sec. 205 2005 c 518 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($604,891,000))
$612,170,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($623,448,000))
$642,240,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,264,939,000))
$1,293,218,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,939,000))
$18,386,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,888,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $317,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,517,105,000))
$2,571,219,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire health services account appropriation, (($610,000))
$7,726,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2006, (($610,000)) $10,741,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007, and (($5,552,000)) $22,769,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for health care
benefits for agency home care workers who are employed through state
contracts for at least twenty hours a week. The ((per worker per
month)) state contribution ((per agency)) to the cost of health care
benefits per participating worker per month shall be no greater than
(($380.06)) $449.00 in fiscal year 2006 and (($413.14)) $498.00 in
fiscal year 2007. The department, in consultation with the home care
quality authority and other affected parties, is directed to examine
how the state incorporates health care costs when it sets reimbursement
rates for all agency and independent home care workers caring for state
subsidized clients. The department shall recommend options to the
office of financial management by October 1, 2006.
(2) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $149.14 for
fiscal year 2006 and shall not exceed $153.50 for fiscal year 2007.
(3) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue certificates of capital authorization that result in up to $16
million of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in
fiscal year 2006; up to $16 million of increased asset value completed
and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2007; and up to $16 million of
increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year
2008.
(4) Adult day health services shall not be considered a duplication
of services for persons receiving care in long-term care settings
licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW.
(5) In accordance with chapter 74.39 RCW, the department may
implement two medicaid waiver programs for persons who do not qualify
for such services as categorically needy, subject to federal approval
and the following conditions and limitations:
(a) One waiver program shall include coverage of care in community
residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver shall not exceed 600
persons at any time.
(b) The second waiver program shall include coverage of in-home
care. Enrollment in this second waiver shall not exceed 200 persons at
any time.
(c) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on each of the
two medically needy waivers, on monthly management reports.
(d) If it is necessary to establish a waiting list for either
waiver because the budgeted number of enrollment opportunities has been
reached, the department shall track how the long-term care needs of
applicants assigned to the waiting list are met.
(6) $1,413,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $2,887,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $4,305,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase compensation for direct
care workers employed by home care agencies by 27 cents per hour on
July 1, 2005, and by an additional 23 cents per hour on July 1, 2006.
The amounts in this subsection also include the funds needed for the
employer share of unemployment and social security taxes on the amount
of the increase.
(7) $1,786,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,804,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
chore services program.
(8) The department shall establish waiting lists to the extent
necessary to assure that annual expenditures on the community options
program entry systems (COPES) program do not exceed appropriated
levels. In establishing and managing any such waiting list, the
department shall assure priority access to persons with the greatest
unmet needs, as determined by department assessment processes.
(9) $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $8,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $101,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to expand the number of boarding homes that receive
exceptional care rates for persons with Alzheimer's disease and related
dementias who might otherwise require nursing home care. The
department may expand the number of licensed boarding home facilities
that specialize in caring for such conditions by up to 85 beds in
fiscal year 2006 and up to 150 beds in fiscal year 2007.
(10) $305,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $377,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the senior farmer's market
nutrition program.
(((12))) (11) $109,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006, $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, and $198,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1220 (long-term care financing). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((13))) (12) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for area agencies on aging, or
entities with which area agencies on aging contract, to provide a
kinship navigator for grandparents and other kinship caregivers of
children in both western and eastern Washington.
(a) Kinship navigator services shall include but not be limited to
assisting kinship caregivers with understanding and navigating the
system of services for children in out-of-home care while reducing
barriers faced by kinship caregivers when accessing services.
(b) In providing kinship navigator services, area agencies on aging
shall give priority to helping kinship caregivers maintain their
caregiving role by helping them access existing services and supports,
thus keeping children from entering foster care.
(((14))) (13) $435,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006, (($435,000)) $523,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and (($870,000)) $958,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for
supplemental compensation increases for direct care workers employed by
home care agencies in recognition of higher labor market cost pressures
experienced by agencies subject to collective bargaining obligations.
In order for a specific home care agency to be eligible for such
increases, home care agencies shall submit the following to the
department:
(i) Proof of a legally binding, written commitment to increase the
compensation of agency home care workers; and
(ii) Proof of the existence of a method of enforcement of the
commitment, such as arbitration, that is available to the employees or
their representative, and proof that such a method is expeditious, uses
a neutral decision maker, and is economical for the employees.

Sec. 206 2005 c 518 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($483,166,000))
$487,758,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($501,081,000))
$560,280,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,246,447,000))
$1,245,422,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,466,000))
$27,535,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,138,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,262,160,000))
$2,322,133,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($273,333,000)) $275,749,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006, (($273,333,000)) $334,121,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and
(($1,020,292,000)) $905,232,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst
program. Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the
department shall:
(a) Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are
designed to achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW
74.08A.410. Outcome data regarding job retention and wage progression
shall be reported quarterly to appropriate fiscal and policy committees
of the legislature for families who leave assistance, measured after 12
months, 24 months, and 36 months. The department shall also report the
percentage of families who have returned to temporary assistance for
needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months; and
(b) Submit a report by October 1, 2005, to the fiscal committees of
the legislature containing a spending plan for the WorkFirst program.
The plan shall identify how spending levels in the 2005-2007 biennium
will be adjusted to stay within available federal grant levels and the
appropriated state-fund levels.
(2) (($75,833,000)) $73,479,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and (($74,358,000)) $80,220,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided
solely for cash assistance and other services to recipients in the
general assistance--unemployable program. Within these amounts:
(a) The department may expend funds for services that assist
recipients to obtain employment and reduce their dependence on public
assistance, provided that expenditures for these services and cash
assistance do not exceed the funds provided. Mental health, substance
abuse, and vocational rehabilitation services may be provided to
recipients whose incapacity is not severe enough to qualify for
services through a regional support network, the alcoholism and drug
addiction treatment and support act, or the division of vocational
rehabilitation to the extent that those services are necessary to
eliminate or minimize barriers to employment;
(b) The department shall review the general assistance caseload to
identify recipients that would benefit from assistance in becoming
naturalized citizens, and thus be eligible to receive federal
supplemental security income benefits. Those cases shall be given high
priority for naturalization funding through the department;
(c) The department shall identify general assistance recipients who
are or may be eligible to receive health care coverage or services
through the federal veteran's administration and assist recipients in
obtaining access to those benefits; and
(d) The department shall report by November of each year to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the progress and outcomes
of these efforts.
(3) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall increase the state supplemental payment by $10 per month for SSI
clients who reside in nursing facilities, residential habilitation
centers, or state hospitals and who receive a personal needs allowance
and decrease other state supplemental payments.
(4) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $10,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a subsidy rate increase for
child care providers. Of this amount, $500,000 per year shall be
targeted for child care providers in urban areas of region 1 and
$500,000 per year shall be targeted for one or more tiered-reimbursement pilot projects.

Sec. 207 2005 c 518 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND
SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,235,000))
$57,323,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,956,000))
$66,920,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($110,175,000))
$138,143,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($633,000))
$634,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,500,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,842,000
Problem Gambling Treatment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,500,000))
$1,350,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,081,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($303,922,000))
$331,832,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($1,500,000)) $1,350,000 of the problem gambling treatment
account appropriation is provided solely for the program established in
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1031 (problem gambling). If
legislation creating the account is not enacted by June 30, 2005, this
amount shall lapse.
(2) $1,339,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,338,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the parent child assistance
program, including an expansion of services to southwestern Washington.
The department shall contract with the University of Washington and
community-based providers in Spokane, Yakima, and southwestern
Washington for the provision of this program. For all contractors,
indirect charges for administering the program shall not exceed ten
percent of the total contract amount. The amounts provided in this
subsection are sufficient to fund section 303 of Senate Bill No. 5763
(mental disorders treatment).
(3) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for vendor rate adjustments for
residential treatment providers for chemical dependency services.
(4) $465,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $934,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, $1,319,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, and
$700,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation are provided solely for vendor rate adjustments for
residential treatment providers. To the extent that a portion of this
funding is sufficient to maintain sufficient residential treatment
capacity, remaining amounts may then be used to provide vendor rate
adjustments to other types of providers as prioritized by the
department in order to maintain or increase treatment capacity.
(5) $1,916,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $4,278,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for integrated pilot programs as
required by section 203 of Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders
treatment). If section 203 of Senate Bill No. 5763 is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for intensive case management
pilot programs as required by section 220 of Senate Bill No. 5763
(mental disorders treatment). If section 220 of Senate Bill No. 5763
is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) $159,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $140,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $161,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for development of the integrated chemical
dependency/mental health screening and assessment tool required by
section 601 of Senate Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders treatment), and
associated training and quality assurance. If section 601 of Senate
Bill No. 5763 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 208 2005 c 518 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,481,212,000))
$1,456,630,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,596,101,000))
$1,573,570,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,036,615,000))
$4,031,989,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($636,942,000))
$724,188,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,767,870,000))
$7,803,500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the department estimates that expenditures for the medical
assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the department shall
take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or
elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total
program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.
(2) The department shall continue to extend medicaid eligibility to
children through age 18 residing in households with incomes below 200
percent of the federal poverty level.
(3) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the department is authorized to disregard recoveries by
Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined
in RCW 48.104.030.
(4) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to continue podiatry services for medicaid-eligible adults.
(5) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to provide an adult dental benefit that is equivalent to the
benefit provided in the 2003-05 biennium.
(6) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $6,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental
payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The
public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the
required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the
payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules.
It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental
to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated
and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the
legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall
not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues
retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments.
(7) (($1,660,000)) $2,221,000 of the health services account
appropriation, (($4,361,000)) $5,402,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation, (($1,350,000)) $1,590,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006, and (($1,351,000)) $1,591,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided
solely for grants to rural hospitals. The department shall distribute
the funds under a formula that provides a relatively larger share of
the available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a disproportionate
share of low-income and medically indigent patients and (b) have
relatively smaller net financial margins, to the extent allowed by the
federal medicaid program.
(8) (($22,081,000)) $21,092,000 of the health services account
appropriation and (($20,714,000)) $19,725,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for grants to nonrural
hospitals. The department shall distribute the funds under a formula
that provides a relatively larger share of the available funding to
hospitals that (a) serve a disproportionate share of low-income and
medically indigent patients and (b) have relatively smaller net
financial margins, to the extent allowed by the federal medicaid
program.
(9) In response to the federal directive to eliminate
intergovernmental transfer transactions effective June 30, 2005, the
department is directed to implement the inpatient hospital certified
public expenditures program for the 2005-07 biennium. The program
shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated
by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or
state psychiatric institutions. Hospitals in the program shall be paid
and shall retain (a) one hundred percent of the federal portion of each
medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by the medical
assistance administration; and (b) one hundred percent of the federal
portion of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment
allowable under federal regulations. Medicaid fee-for-service claim
amounts shall be established by applying the department's ratio of
costs to charges payment methodology. The department shall provide
participating hospitals with the information and instructions needed by
the hospital to certify the public expenditures required to qualify for
the federal portions of both the medicaid inpatient fee-for-service
payments and the disproportionate share hospital payments. In the
event that any part of the program including, but not limited to,
allowable certified public expenditures, is disallowed by the federal
government, the department shall not seek recoupment of payments from
the hospitals, provided the hospitals have complied with the directions
of the department for participation in the program. The legislature
intends that hospitals in the program receive no less in combined state
and federal payments than they would have received under the
methodology that was in place during fiscal year 2005. The department
shall therefore make additional grant payments, not to exceed the
amounts provided in this subsection, to hospitals whose total payments
under the program would otherwise be less than the total state and
federal payments they would have received under the methodology in
effect during fiscal year 2005. (($37,034,000)) $48,142,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006, (($37,552,000))
$46,352,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2007, (($8,300,000 of the emergency medical services and trauma care
systems trust account--state appropriation,)) $8,234,000 of the health
services account--state appropriation, and (($45,450,000)) $11,328,000
of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for new
state grant and upper payment limit programs for the participating
hospitals.
(10) (($4,372,000)) $4,077,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006, (($4,014,000)) $4,847,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and
(($65,112,000)) $70,100,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
are provided solely for development and implementation of a replacement
system for the existing medicaid management information system.
(11) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $225,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to contract for an independent
analysis of the medical assistance administration's current system for
establishing hospital inpatient payment rates, and for recommendations
on a new or updated system. The department shall submit an interim
report of study findings by December 1, 2005, and a final report by
November 15, 2006. The interim report shall include a comparison of
the strengths and weaknesses of the current rate-setting system
relative to those used by other state, federal, and private payers.
The final report shall include recommendations on the design and
implementation of a new or updated system that will promote equity
among hospitals, access to quality care and improved health outcomes
for patients, and cost-control and efficiency for taxpayers. The study
should make use of complete and current cost data from a wide variety
of hospitals, recognize unique aspects of hospital service delivery
structures and medicaid payment systems in Washington, recognize
impacts on productivity and quality of care that may result from
hospital compensation, recruitment, and retention policies, and provide
opportunities for comment and participation by key interest groups in
the identification and assessment of alternatives.
(12) Payment rates for hospital inpatient and outpatient services
shall be increased by an average of 1.3 percent effective July 1, 2005,
and by an average of an additional 1.3 percent effective July 1, 2006.
The inpatient increases shall be provided only on the portion of a
hospital's rate that excludes medical education and outlier costs, and
shall be allocated so that hospitals with lower costs of care
(excluding medical education and outlier costs) receive larger
percentage increases than those with higher costs of care. The
inpatient increases shall be allocated in three percentage increments,
with the lowest-cost hospitals receiving the largest percentage rate
increase, highest-cost hospitals receiving the smallest percentage
increase, and medium-cost hospitals receiving the average of the
highest and the lowest percentage rate increase. Increases shall not
be provided to those hospitals that are certified as critical access.
Sufficient funds are appropriated in this section for Healthy Options
contractors to increase hospital payment rates commensurate with the
increases in fee-for-service payment rates.
(13) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the department shall
provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if
eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.
(14) The medical assistance administration is authorized to use
funds appropriated in this section to purchase goods and supplies
through direct contracting with vendors when the administration
determines it is cost-effective to do so.
(15) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(16) By October 1, 2005, the department shall recommend to the
governor and legislature at least two pilot project designs which seem
likely to reduce avoidable emergency room utilization at no net cost to
the state within the projects' first eighteen months of operation.
(17) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department
shall participate in the health technology assessment program required
in section 213(6) of this act.
(18) The department is also required to participate in the joint
health purchasing project described in section 213(7) of this act.
(19) The department shall, within available resources, continue
operation of the medical care services care management pilot project
for clients receiving general assistance benefits in King and Pierce
counties. The project may use a full or partial capitation model that
includes a mechanism for shared savings. The department shall provide
a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1,
2006, on costs, savings, and any outcomes or quality measures
associated with the pilot programs during the first year of operation.
(20) By October 1, 2005, the department shall report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the potential fiscal and
programmatic costs and benefits associated with an expansion of managed
care pilot programs to SSI and other eligible medicaid elderly and
disabled persons.
(((22))) (21) By November 15, 2006, the department of social and
health services, in consultation with the department of revenue and the
health care authority, shall report to the health care and fiscal
committees of the legislature on options for providing financial
incentives for private practice physicians to serve uninsured,
medicare, and medicaid patients. The report shall include an
assessment of the relative costs and effectiveness of strategies
including, but not limited to, tax credits and payment rate increases.
The report shall further suggest alternative mechanisms and thresholds
for varying tax credits and payment enhancements according to the
extent to which a provider serves uninsured, medicare, and medicaid
patients.

Sec. 209 2005 c 518 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,202,000))
$11,159,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,350,000))
$11,278,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,908,000))
$86,623,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $440,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,791,000))
$1,792,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($111,691,000))
$111,323,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The division of vocational rehabilitation
shall maintain support for existing clubhouse programs at the 2003-2005
level.

Sec. 210 2005 c 518 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,933,000))
$34,649,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,910,000))
$28,305,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,489,000))
$61,584,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $810,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,452,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,791,000))
$1,793,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,345,000))
$. . . . . .
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($120,730,000))
$129,893,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild
project through the governor's juvenile justice advisory committee.
(2) $2,452,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation and $1,791,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account--state appropriation are provided solely for the
family policy council.
(3) $3,195,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $639,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $3,834,000 of the general--fund federal appropriation
are provided solely to implement the 2005-07 home care worker
collective bargaining agreement.
(((4) $1,345,000 of the domestic violence prevention account is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 1314 (domestic violence prevention). If legislation creating
the account is not enacted by June 30, 2005, this amount shall lapse.))

Sec. 211 2005 c 518 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER
AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,381,000))
$49,540,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,380,000))
$50,017,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,103,000))
$45,831,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($137,864,000))
$145,388,000

Sec. 212 2005 c 518 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $427,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,140,000))
$3,792,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,394,000))
$33,044,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($171,000))
$345,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($456,207,000))
$453,449,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($488,912,000))
$491,057,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205
and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents and home
care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(2) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals which are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
which choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(3) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(4) $19,108,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
is provided solely for funding for health care services provided
through local community clinics.
(5) $391,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5471,
chapter 129, Laws of 2005 (drug purchasing consortium).
(6) The health care authority shall conduct a health technology
assessment pilot project to evaluate scientific evidence regarding
current and evolving health care procedures, services and technology.
The pilot shall be a joint effort of the departments of social and
health services, labor and industries, corrections, and veteran's
affairs and the health care authority. Upon completion of assessment
of a procedure, service or technology, the agencies shall make every
effort, consistent with federal and state law, to jointly decide: (a)
On coverage of the procedure, service or technology by each agency, and
(b) if covered, the guidelines or criteria that will be applied to
medical necessity decisions.
(7) The departments of social and health services, labor and
industries and the health care authority, in collaboration with
affected health care providers, facilities, and contracted health
plans, shall design and implement a joint health purchasing project
that links payment to health care provider or facility performance,
particularly where such performance is expected to improve patient
outcomes or where there are wide variations in clinical practice used
to treat a condition or illness. The purchasing effort shall utilize
evidence-based performance measures that are designed to improve
quality of care and yield measurable and significant savings. The
project shall include payment mechanisms that create incentives to
improve quality of care. On or before December 1, 2006, the agencies
shall report to relevant policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature on the status of the purchasing project, including actual
and anticipated savings.
(8) $395,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1689
(dental residency program). If Substitute House Bill No. 1689 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(9) $250,000 of the health services account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1688 (certificate of need program). If Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1688 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $316,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
and $15,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for a study of electronic medical records systems pursuant to
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5064 (electronic medical records). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(11) $427,000 of the general fund--state appropriation, $401,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation, $205,000 of the state health
care authority administrative account--state appropriation, $174,000 of
the medical aid account--state appropriation, and $31,000 of the health
services account--state appropriation are provided solely for the
establishment of a centralized evidence based medicine system.
Participating agencies will be the medical assistance administration in
the department of social and health services, labor and industries,
HCA's uniform medical plan, the department of corrections, and the
department of veterans' affairs.
(12) $735,000 of the state health care authority administrative
account--state appropriation is provided solely to, with approval of
the public employees' benefits board, add a new plan to the public
employee medical benefits options designed to emphasize the governor's
five strategies for improving health and containing costs including:
Evidence-based medicine, consumer education and wellness, management of
chronic care, access to information about cost and quality, and use of
electronic data.
(13) $450,000 of the state health care authority administrative
account--state appropriation is provided solely for an on-line employee
health assessment tool.
(14) $500,000 of the state health care authority administrative
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the health care
authority to develop pilot grants to provide reimbursement,
administrative, or quality incentives to providers who adopt health
information technologies.

Sec. 213 2005 c 518 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,596,000))
$2,623,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,634,000))
$2,668,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,741,000))
$1,748,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,971,000))
$7,052,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The commission shall submit a report by
December 1st of each year to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees detailing any changes in existing federal
revenues for the remainder of the current fiscal year and changes in
projections of federal revenue for the upcoming fiscal year.

Sec. 214 2005 c 518 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,399,000))
$16,452,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,398,000))
$16,451,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,817,000))
$32,923,000

Sec. 215 2005 c 518 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,003,000))
$19,099,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
((Private/Local)) State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,611,000))
$19,707,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) During the 2005-2007 biennium, the criminal justice training
commission is authorized to raise existing fees charged for firearms
certification for security guards in excess of the fiscal growth factor
established pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary, to meet the
actual costs of conducting the certification programs and the
appropriation levels in this section.
(2) $100,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for support of the coalition of small
police agencies major crimes task force. The purpose of this task
force is to pool its resources and to establish an efficient and
cooperative approach in addressing major violent crimes.
(3) Amounts provided within this section are sufficient to
implement the provisions of section 2 of House Bill No. 1136
(electronic monitoring system).

Sec. 216 2005 c 518 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,554,000))
$7,553,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,648,000))
$7,645,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,277,000))
$28,908,000
Public Safety and Education Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($808,000))
$810,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,743,000))
$35,851,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,836,000))
$1,827,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,664,000))
$2,673,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($206,490,000))
$209,113,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,621,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($205,011,000))
$207,967,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,185,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,657,000))
$1,675,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,324,000))
$3,357,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($525,846,000))
$534,244,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $700,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$699,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the construction of a computer system to collect data from
self-insured employers and are contingent on the passage of Substitute
House Bill No. 1310 (workers compensation reporting) on mandatory
electronic data reporting by self-insured employers. If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(2) (($27,227,000)) $28,908,000 of the public safety and education
account--state appropriation, and $10,000,000 of the public safety and
education account--federal appropriation are provided solely for the
crime victims' compensation program, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Reimbursement shall be provided throughout the 2005-2007
biennium for full reimbursement of sexual assault forensic exams at
workers' compensation rates; and
(b) In accordance with RCW 7.68.015, it is the policy of the state
that the department of labor and industries operate the crime victims'
compensation program within the amounts provided for this program in
this subsection.
(3) $200,000 of the accident account--state appropriation is
provided solely to reimburse the department of agriculture for the
agricultural worker pesticide handling and application training
program.
(4) $71,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation and
$71,000 of the accident account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the review of payment of medical bills and authorization for
medical procedures by self-insurers.
(5) The department is required to participate in the health
technology assessment program required in section 213(6) of this act.
(6) The department is also required to participate in the joint
health purchasing project described in section 213(7) of this act.
(7) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $8,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1393 (older mobile homes). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(8) $182,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$623,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to ((expand the Spokane center of occupational health and
education to include Yakima county. The Spokane center of occupational
health will recruit and train approximately one hundred sixty
physicians in Yakima county on best practices for occupational medicine
and work with labor and business to improve quality and outcomes of
medical care provided to injured workers)) (a) expand services in the
centers of occupational health and education (COHE) in Spokane and
Renton; (b) add two additional COHE locations in the state; and (c)
include Yakima county in the Spokane COHE.
(9) $158,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$158,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1856 (annual audits of
the state industrial insurance fund). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) The department shall delay the costs associated with
implementation of phase II of its indirect cost allocation plan for the
public works administration account until July 1, 2007.

Sec. 217 2005 c 518 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,092,000))
$1,212,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,096,000))
$1,325,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,188,000))
$2,541,000

Sec. 218 2005 c 518 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,918,000))
$1,917,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,880,000))
$1,882,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,808,000))
$3,819,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department shall participate in the health technology
assessment program required in section 213(6) of this act.
(b) The department shall participate in the joint health purchasing
project described in section 213(7) of this act.
(c) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided for the department to conduct a feasibility study
of a veterans' cemetery in eastern Washington. The study shall include
location, acquisition costs, projection of continued operations costs,
and revenue sources for acquisition and operations. A final report of
the findings shall be submitted no later than December 15, 2005.
(d) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5539 (veterans conservation corps). If Senate Bill No. 5539 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, these amounts shall lapse.

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,811,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,809,000))
$3,317,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $343,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,016,000))
$2,018,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,979,000))
$8,500,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the development of a public service
announcement outreach campaign directed at returning veterans from
Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation Enduring Freedom.
(b) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the post traumatic stress
counseling program expansion to address the needs of veterans returning
from Iraq and Afghanistan.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,259,000))
$6,072,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,238,000))
$6,861,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,436,000))
$35,475,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,338,000))
$27,397,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $187,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($74,271,000))
$75,992,000

Sec. 219 2005 c 518 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($919,000))
$724,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,093,000))
$1,289,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,034,000))
$1,167,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,046,000))
$3,182,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature encourages the home care
quality authority to move forward with implementation of a statewide
referral registry system by use of any existing and future agency
administrative moneys and by seeking other means of funding, including
grants and additional funding resources.

Sec. 220 2005 c 518 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,090,000))
$63,853,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,485,000))
$64,021,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($455,467,000))
$465,750,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($101,479,000))
$105,629,000
Hospital Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,615,000))
$2,621,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,659,000))
$53,353,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,578,000))
$12,579,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,907,000))
$2,917,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,158,000))
$16,179,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,098,000))
$1,099,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,680,000))
$3,693,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,843,000))
$2,852,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,790,000))
$1,798,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,806,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,306,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($275,000))
$277,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,101,000))
$43,146,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,677,000))
$52,684,000
((Patient Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $641,000))
Temporary Worker Housing Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($878,625,000))
$898,680,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department or any successor agency is authorized to raise
existing fees charged for the clandestine drug lab program, the
drinking water program, radioactive materials license fees, X-ray
facility registration fees, shellfish commercial paralytic shellfish
poisoning fees, the water recreation program, the wastewater management
program, newborn specialty clinic fees, acute care hospitals,
psychiatric hospitals, child birth centers, correctional medical
facilities, alcoholism hospitals, and the midwifery program, in excess
of the fiscal growth factor pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary,
to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation
levels in this section. However, the department may not raise existing
fees charged for the midwifery program by more than twenty percent over
the biennium.
(2) $1,363,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2006
appropriation, $1,363,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2007
appropriation, and $676,000 of the general fund--local appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound
conservation and recovery plan and agency action items, DOH-01, DOH-02,
DOH-03, and DOH-04.
(3) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive,
and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not
anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require
expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated
unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services
authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(4) $383,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $317,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $600,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation are provided solely to assist counties in marine areas
complete on-site sewage system management plans and electronic data
bases to inventory on-site sewage systems.
(5) $60,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5470 (prescription importation). If Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5470 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $268,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 2266 (precursor drugs). If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2266 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) $42,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No.
1168 (prescription reimportation). If Second Substitute House Bill No.
1168 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(8) (($82,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $641,000 of the patient safety account appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1291 (patient safety practices). If Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1291 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9))) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the department to implement a
multi-year pilot project covering Adams, Chelan, Douglas, Grant and
Franklin counties for persons with household income at or below 200
percent of the federal poverty level who are ineligible for family
planning services through the medicaid program. Individuals who will
be served under the pilot program include women who have never been
pregnant, are not currently pregnant, or are beyond the family planning
extension period allowed for first steps program eligibility. It is
anticipated that the pilot program will serve approximately 500 women.
The department will provide a preliminary report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by January 1, 2006, and a final report by
January 1, 2007.
(((10))) (9) $462,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation is provided solely to support specialty clinics that
provide treatment services to children that are identified with one of
the five heritable or metabolic disorders added to the newborn
screening panel by the state board of health in 2003.
(((11))) (10) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the farmers' market
nutrition program of the special supplemental nutrition program for
women, infants and children. It is anticipated that these funds will
enable the department to expand 2004 participation levels by 8,000
persons annually.
(((12))) (11) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the infertility prevention
project to implement effective prevention strategies designed to reduce
the prevalence of chlamydia and gonorrhea and their potentially
debilitating complications.
(((13))) (12) With funds appropriated in this section, the medical
advisory committee to the early detection breast and cervical cancer
screening program shall study and recommend strategies for adopting
emerging technologies and best practices from the national, state, and
local levels in the field of early prevention and detection for breast
and cervical cancer, and assist the early detection breast and cervical
cancer screening program in implementing policy that follows the best
practices of high quality health care for clinical, diagnostic,
preventative, pathologic, radiological, and oncology services. The
committee will report its recommendations to the legislature by
December 15, 2006.
(((14))) (13) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely to develop and implement best
practices in preventative health care for children. The department and
the kids get care program of public health - Seattle and King county
will work in collaboration with local health care agencies to
disseminate strategic interventions that are focused on evidence-based
best practices for improving health outcomes in children and saving
health-care costs.
(((15))) (14) $48,000 of the health professions account
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1075 (nursing quality commission). If Substitute House Bill
No. 1075 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((16))) (15) $74,000 of the health professions account
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1137 (physical therapy). If Substitute House Bill No. 1137 is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((17))) (16) $109,000 of the health professions account
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No.
1546 (naturopathic physicians). If House Bill No. 1546 is not enacted
by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((18))) (17) $80,000 of the health professions account
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1689 (dental health services). If Substitute House Bill No.
1689 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((19))) (18) $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1605 (soil contamination).
If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1605 is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((20))) (19) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1951 (vision exams for children). If Substitute House
Bill No. 1951 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(((21))) (20) $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 5049 (mold in residential units). If Engrossed Senate
Bill No. 5049 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(((22))) (21) $26,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of Senate
Bill No. 5311 (autism task force). If Senate Bill No. 5311 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((23))) (22) $168,000 of the health services account appropriation
is provided solely for a two-year pilot project under which parents
have the option to choose vaccines which do not contain mercury.

Sec. 221 2005 c 518 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,282,000))
$52,389,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,838,000))
$49,976,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,022,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,768,000))
$2,774,000
((Industrial Insurance Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000))
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $245,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($97,937,000))
$106,432,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $11,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for phase three of the department's
offender-based tracking system replacement project. This amount is
conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of section
902 of this act.
(b) $26,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1402 (offender travel or transfer). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($516,992,000))
$526,037,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($545,816,000))
$555,395,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,424,000))
$3,447,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,984,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,269,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,070,216,000))
$1,090,132,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) For the acquisition of properties and facilities, the
department of corrections is authorized to enter into financial
contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the purposes
indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.
This authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option
to purchase or lease-purchase work release beds in facilities
throughout the state for $8,561,000.
(b) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as recovery
of costs.
(c) The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership
program at the Washington corrections center for women at a level at
least equal to that provided in the 1995-97 biennium.
(d) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(e) During the 2005-07 biennium, when contracts are established or
renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to
inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.
(f) The department shall participation in the health technology
assessment program required in section 213(6) of this act. The
department shall also participate in the joint health purchasing
project described in section 213(7) of this act.
(g) The Harborview medical center shall provide inpatient and
outpatient hospital services to offenders confined in department of
corrections facilities at a rate no greater than the average rate that
the department has negotiated with other community hospitals in
Washington state.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,210,000))
$92,716,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($81,646,000))
$91,236,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,736,000))
$16,796,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $449,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($180,592,000))
$201,197,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(b) $268,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $484,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1402 (offender travel or transfer). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(c) $122,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $82,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1136 (electronic monitoring system). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $838,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $882,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,720,000))
$1,723,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $110,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for
transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts
provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and
technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties in
developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient
offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,839,000))
$37,159,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,838,000))
$38,465,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,677,000))
$75,624,000

Sec. 222 2005 c 518 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,887,000))
$1,926,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,939,000))
$1,965,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,326,000))
$15,748,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,232,000))
$19,724,000

Sec. 223 2005 c 518 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $864,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($861,000))
$863,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,725,000))
$1,731,000

Sec. 224 2005 c 518 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($259,865,000))
$260,228,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,857,000))
$31,966,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($199,217,000))
$200,058,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,946,000))
$16,866,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,411,000))
$24,491,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($530,416,000))
$533,729,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,087,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
This amount is provided to replace obsolete information technology
infrastructure.
(2) $12,735,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized for state choice administrative functions.
The department shall submit recommendations by September 1, 2007, to
the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees for options reducing the costs of the state choice
administrative functions for the 2007-2009 biennium. If these options
require any statutory changes, the department shall submit agency
request legislation to the appropriate legislative policy committees
and fiscal committees by December 15, 2007.
(3) $2,300,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to continue implementation of chapter 4, Laws
of 2003 2nd sp. sess. and for implementation costs relating to
Engrossed House Bill No. 2255 (unemployment insurance).
(4) $4,578,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from funds made available to
the state by section 903(d) of the Social Security Act (Reed Act).
These funds are authorized to provide direct services to unemployment
insurance claimants and providing job search review.

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 301 2005 c 518 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $471,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($478,000))
$479,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($859,000))
$862,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,808,000))
$1,814,000

Sec. 302 2005 c 518 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,648,000))
$40,561,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,344,000))
$39,990,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($73,911,000))
$74,678,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,287,000))
$13,290,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,646,000))
$2,778,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,084,000))
$3,442,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,456,000))
$1,312,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,067,000))
$15,081,000
State Drought Preparedness Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($221,000))
$225,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving
Account (Water Supply Facilities) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($384,000))
$386,000
Vessel Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,876,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($655,000))
$656,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,021,000))
$28,085,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $357,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,142,000))
$2,153,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,169,000))
$86,091,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($379,000))
$380,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,258,000))
$5,274,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,909,000))
$32,815,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,883,000))
$2,889,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $504,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($851,000))
$853,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,153,000))
$5,171,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,199,000))
$11,206,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,219,000))
$11,117,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,679,000))
$2,922,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,534,000))
$2,144,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,079,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($413,000))
$485,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,995,000))
$2,357,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $186,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($386,860,000))
$397,860,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,526,196 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $2,526,195 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007, $366,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation,
$2,581,000 of the state toxics account -- state appropriation, $540,806
of the water quality account -- state appropriation, $3,748,220 of the
water quality permit account -- state appropriation, and $705,000 of the
oil spill prevention account are provided solely for the implementation
of the Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action
items DOE-01, DOE-02, DOE-04, DOE-06, DOE-07, DOE-08, and DOE-09.
(2) As described in section 129(7) of this act, the department
shall make recommendations and report on monitoring activities related
to salmon recovery.
(3) $4,054,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely for methamphetamine lab clean-up activities.
(4) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the Puget Sound conservation and
recovery plan action item UW-02 through a contract with the University
of Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(5) $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for shoreline grants to local
governments to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6012 (shoreline
management), chapter 262, Laws of 2003.
(6) $156,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to expand the department's pilot
program for processing 401 water quality certification projects to a
statewide process and timeline to meet improved permit processing
accountability and timelines, which will result in 90 percent of
routine certifications occurring within 90 days of application, and
acknowledgement of receipt of the application being sent within 10
days.
(7) Fees approved by the department of ecology in the 2005-07
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(8) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to support water measurement and
water storage components of the Columbia River Initiative Program.
(9) (($661,000 of the reclamation account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5831 (well construction
fees). If the bill is enacted by June 30, 2005, $150,000 from the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $150,000
from the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007
provided in this section shall lapse. If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the amount provided from the reclamation account in this
subsection shall lapse.
(10))) $509,000 of the freshwater aquatic algae control account--state is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5699 (aquatic invasive species). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((11))) (10) $250,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1605 (soil contamination). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((12))) (11) $200,000 of the water quality account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with
the state conservation commission to provide statewide coordination and
support for coordinated resource management.
(12) The department shall assist the office of regulatory
assistance in implementing activities consistent with the governor's
regulatory improvement program. The department shall support and
provide expertise to facilitate, coordinate, and simplify citizen and
business interactions so as to improve state regulatory processes
involving state, local, and federal stakeholders.

Sec. 303 2005 c 518 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,527,000))
$34,816,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,669,000))
$34,695,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,738,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,110,000))
$1,109,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($225,000))
$220,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,805,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,480,000))
$38,702,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($117,317,000))
$118,039,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in
the 2005-07 biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $191,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound
conservation and recovery plan and agency action item PRC-02.
(4) $185,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account--state
appropriation is provided solely to develop a plan for public education
and tourist orientation and interpretation at selected state park sites
along the route of the ice age floods from Spokane to the Pacific
ocean.

Sec. 304 2005 c 518 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,401,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,414,000))
$1,417,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,455,000))
$18,462,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $254,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,176,000))
$2,196,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $809,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,983,000))
$25,014,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) As described in section 129(7) of this act, the department
shall make recommendations and report on monitoring activities related
to salmon recovery.
(2) $16,025,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of the forest and fish agreement
rules. These funds will be passed through to the department of natural
resources and the department of fish and wildlife.
(3) During the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, any county that purchased
land before 1978 for off-road vehicle sports park recreation pursuant
to 1972 ex.s. c 153 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 34 may discharge its
contractual obligations for state-funded capital improvements on those
lands if by no later than June 30, 2007:
(a) It sells on the open market, at the highest price achievable,
all such lands and related facilities and equipment. After deducting
reasonable expenses for the cost of sale, all remaining funds will be
deposited within thirty days of closing to the nonhighway and off-road
vehicle activities program account in the office of the state
treasurer. Any funds derived from such sale shall be expended in
accordance with RCW 46.09.170(2)(d)(ii)(A) in the same manner as funds
the committee receives from RCW 46.09.110 and shall be used for off-road vehicle recreation facilities in areas west of the crest of the
Cascade Mountains with preference for developing a new off-road vehicle
sports park; or
(b) With the consent of the interagency committee, it gives all
such lands and related facilities and equipment to a state or local
agency. The state or local agency must agree to make the lands
available for purposes related to motorized off-road vehicle
recreation. The agency will not be responsible for contractual
obligations for previous state-funded capital improvements on those
lands. The interagency committee may award a one time noncompetitive
grant to the agency for renovation and other capital improvements and
for initial operating costs. If a transfer of property under this
subsection (b) is not approved prior to June 30, 2006, then the
property shall be sold according to (a) of this subsection.
(4) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the biodiversity strategy.
(5) $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for coordination of federal,
state, tribal, local, and private aquatic monitoring efforts. The
department shall provide a memorandum to the office of financial
management and legislative fiscal committees in January of every year
which specifies performance measures to reduce redundancy, increase
efficiency, and help meet the goals and objectives of the various
entities involved in monitoring and if these performance measures were
met.

Sec. 305 2005 c 518 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,057,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,064,000))
$1,066,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,121,000))
$2,128,000

Sec. 306 2005 c 518 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,235,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,253,000))
$2,256,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,175,000))
$4,178,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,663,000))
$8,922,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $197,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $197,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action item CC-01.
(2) As described in section 129(7) of this act, the department
shall make recommendations and report on monitoring activities related
to salmon recovery.
(3) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 1462 (relating to funding for conservation districts). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 307 2005 c 518 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,751,000))
$45,782,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,545,000))
$45,837,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,261,000))
$49,100,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,025,000))
$36,089,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $392,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,813,000))
$5,820,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,547,000))
$3,753,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,898,000))
$2,904,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,776,000))
$61,935,000
Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,966,000))
$33,029,000
Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,379,000))
$10,386,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,147,000))
$2,883,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,858,000))
$8,863,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($468,000))
$469,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $588,000
Environmental Excellence Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery
Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,755,000))
$2,755,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,040,000))
$1,043,000
((Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000))
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $411,000
((Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000))
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $528,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $248,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($302,171,000))
$313,580,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) As described in section 129(7) of this act, the department
shall make recommendations and report on monitoring activities related
to salmon recovery.
(2) $1,556,714 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,556,713 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action items DFW-01 through DFW-06, DFW-08 through DFW-12, and DFW-16.
(3) $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(4) The department shall support the activities of the aquatic
nuisance species coordination committee to foster state, federal,
tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues.
The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that are
introduced.
(5) The department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to
protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and
steelhead. Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall provide support to the department of health to enforce state
shellfish harvest laws.
(6) $180,000 of the wildlife account -- state appropriation is
provided solely to test deer and elk for chronic wasting disease and to
document the extent of swan lead poisoning. Of this amount, $65,000 is
provided solely to document the extent of swan lead poisoning and to
begin environmental cleanup.
(7) The department shall provide quarterly status reports to the
office of financial management regarding the replacement of the
Washington interactive licensing system and the implementation of the
hydraulic permit management system.
(8) The department shall prepare a report detailing the hydraulic
permit approval program applications and project types. The department
shall coordinate with the office of financial management in determining
the contents of the report. At minimum, the report shall include
permits by applicant (name, state, local, federal, tribal entity,
etc.), project type (pamphlet, minor, medium, major, extension,
revision, etc.) and project location (county and water resource
inventory area). The department shall submit the report to the office
of financial management and legislative fiscal committees no later than
September 1, 2006.
(9) $700,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely for environmental data quality and access projects in support of
state salmon recovery efforts. The department shall coordinate
planning and implementation of all activities with the department of
information services and the governor's salmon recovery office. The
department shall make certain that any activity using these funds is
consistent with recommendations to be submitted (per section 405,
chapter 488, Laws of 2005) in the joint report to the legislature and
office of financial management on December 1, 2006.
(10) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
Army Corps of Engineers.
(((10))) (11) $72,000 of the state wildlife account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1211
(multiple season big game permit). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(12) (($750,000)) $528,000 of the ((freshwater aquatic algae
control)) aquatic invasive species prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5699
(preventing and controlling aquatic invasive species and algae). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(13) $703,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to purchase six purse seine and three gill
net licenses to meet the provisions of the United States/Canada salmon
treaty.
(((15))) (14) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for chum salmon production at
Minter creek hatchery.
(((16))) (15) $45,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and $45,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the
management of Canada goose seasons to increase the number of hunting
days in southwest Washington.
(((17))) (16) $46,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation
is provided solely to increase the number of courses providing the
hunter education training program created in RCW 77.32.155. The
department shall reduce the current backlog of applicants waiting to
take the training program and provide for a stable supply of training
program courses in order to avoid future backlogs.
(((18))) (17) $481,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation
is provided solely to continued operation of the Naselle Hatchery
during the 2005-07 biennium. This will increase production by 3
million Chinook, 1 million Coho, and 30,000 trout.
(((20))) (18) $223,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5227 (wildlife harvest
reports). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) The department shall assist the office of regulatory
assistance in implementing activities consistent with the governor's
regulatory improvement program. The department shall support and
provide expertise to facilitate, coordinate, and simplify citizen and
business interactions so as to improve state regulatory processes
involving state, local, and federal stakeholders.
(20) $601,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for fire suppression and remediation
activities on department lands and facilities that were impacted during
the 2005 fire season. Funding shall be used for seeding, planting
vegetation, fertilizing, weed control, and the establishment of water
bars and other erosion control measures.
(21) $55,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $266,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $319,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation
are provided solely for the continued operation of the Nemah,
Mossyrock, Omak, Colville, Arlington, and Columbia Basin hatcheries
during the 2005-07 biennium. Funding shall be used to offset the
increased cost of utilities, fuel, fish feed, and mitigation
obligations previously funded from local sources. The department shall
consult with the appropriate natural resource and fiscal committees of
the legislature prior to submitting a 2007-09 budget proposal that
changes current hatchery operations, production, and/or maintenance to
the office of financial management. Unless specifically authorized by
the legislature, the department shall not close any hatchery facility
currently in operation.
(((21))) (22) $4,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1210 (temporary fishing
license). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 308 2005 c 518 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,220,000))
$40,818,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,757,000))
$52,128,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,202,000))
$15,215,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,275,000))
$1,276,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,441,000))
$54,697,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,986,000))
$4,001,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,436,000))
$2,447,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,344,000))
$8,451,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,941,000))
$86,332,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,841,000))
$2,098,000
Disaster Response Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,630,000))
$2,636,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($652,000))
$1,321,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,155,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($555,000))
$556,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,137,000))
$1,138,000
Agricultural College Trust Management
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,962,000))
$1,966,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $136,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($280,568,000))
$282,405,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) As described in section 129(7) of this act, the department
shall make recommendations and report on monitoring activities related
to salmon recovery.
(2) $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $18,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $1,652,050 of the aquatic lands enhancement account
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action items DNR-01 and
DNR-02.
(3) $138,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1896 (geoduck harvest). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount in the subsection shall lapse.
(4) (($953,000)) $972,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and (($950,000)) $994,000 of the general fund--
state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for
deposit into the agricultural college trust management account and are
provided solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington
State University's agricultural college trust lands.
(5) (($10,635,000)) $11,124,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006, (($13,635,000)) $12,982,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and $5,000,000
of the disaster response account -- state appropriation are provided
solely for emergency fire suppression. Of these amounts, up to
$250,000 may be expended for staff and other necessary resources to
design and implement a fire data-collection system that includes
financial- and performance-management information for fires over 10
acres in size.
None of the general fund and disaster response account amounts
provided in this subsection may be used to fund agency indirect and
administrative expenses. Agency indirect and administrative costs
shall be allocated among the agency's remaining accounts and
appropriations.
(6) $582,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for spartina control.
(7) Fees approved by the board of natural resources in the 2005-07
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(8) $9,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year ((2006)) 2007 and $2,000,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement
account--state appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of
settling those claims identified in ((the consent decree and settlement
agreement in)) U.S., et al. v. State of Washington, et al.
Subproceeding No. 89-3 (Shellfish), United States District Court for
the Western District of Washington at Seattle, Case No. C70-9213. The
expenditure of this appropriation is contingent on ((the release of
those claims in this subproceeding. In the event that the federal
government does not appropriate $22,000,000 for this purpose by June
30, 2006,)) a settlement agreement that includes the state of
Washington as a party to the agreement which is fully executed by June
29, 2007, and a consent decree entered by June 29, 2007, by the United
States District Court for the Western District of Washington settling
and releasing the identified treaty claims to harvest shellfish
previously negotiated in the settlement agreement. By June 29, 2007,
the release of claims associated with the settlement agreement and
consent decree must be fully effective and there must be no unfulfilled
contingencies that could cause the settlement agreement or consent
decree to be vacated at some future date if not fulfilled. In the
event that these contingencies are not met, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $2,155,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to meet its obligations with the
U.S. environmental protection agency for the clean-up of Commencement
Bay and other sites.
(10) The department shall not develop the Gull Harbor facility
without first submitting a master plan to the appropriate committees of
the legislature. The plan shall ensure continued public access to the
waterfront. The plan shall also examine alternative locations to the
Gull Harbor site that would colocate marine equipment for all state
agencies needing water access in Thurston county. The report shall be
submitted by December 1, 2006.
(11) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006, $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007, and $500,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation are provided solely for a report on the future of
Washington forests. The purpose of the report is to examine economic,
recreational, and environmental trends influencing the forest products
industry and secondary manufacturing sectors in Washington state. The
department shall contract with the University of Washington college of
forestry resources. The college shall consult with the University of
Washington economics department for the section on investment returns
from granted lands. The report shall contain the following parts:
(a) An update of the 1992 timber supply study for Washington state
that was conducted by the University of Washington. The update may be
accomplished by reviewing the most recent similar data available in
existing reports, examining a sample of the original 1992 study sample
of lands, and through other existing data sources that may reveal
relevant trends and changes since 1992.
(b) An independent assessment of the economic contribution of the
forest products industry, and secondary manufacturing sectors, to the
state. This assessment will also examine some of the macroeconomic
trends likely to affect the industry in the future.
(c) A comparison of the competitive position of Washington's forest
products industry globally, and with other leading forest products
states, or regions, of the United States. This evaluation should
compare the relative tax burden for growing and harvesting timber
between the states or regions and the relative cost of adhering to
regulations, and identify the competitive advantages of each state or
region.
(d) An assessment of the trends and dynamics that commercial and
residential development play in the conversion of the state's forests
to nonforestry uses. The assessment will involve gathering relevant
data, reviewing that data, and analyzing the relationship between
development and the conversion of forest land uses.
(e) Recommendations on: (i) Policy changes that would enhance the
competitive position of Washington's forest products industry in
Washington state; (ii) policy changes that would, to the extent
possible, ensure that a productive forest land base continues to be
managed for forest products, recreation, and environmental and other
public benefits into the future; and (iii) policy changes that would
enhance the recreational opportunities on working forest lands in the
state.
(f) Based on the information derived from (a) through (d) of this
subsection, an assessment of the expected rate of return from state
granted lands. This section of the reports shall also review reports
prepared by the department over the past ten years that describe the
investment returns from granted lands. The review of these previous
reports shall compare and critique the methodology and indicators used
to report investment returns. The review shall recommend appropriate
measures of investment returns from granted lands.
(g) Analyze and recommend policies and programs to assist Cascade
foothills area landowners and communities in developing and
implementing innovative approaches to retaining traditional forestry
while at the same time accommodating new uses that strengthen the
economic and natural benefits from forest lands. For the purposes of
this section, the Cascade foothills area generally encompasses the
nonurbanized lands within the Cascade mountain range and drainages
lying between three hundred and three thousand feet above mean sea
level, and located within Whatcom, Skagit, Snohomish, King, Pierce,
Thurston, and Lewis counties.
(12) $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year ((2005)) 2006 and $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year ((2006)) 2007 are provided solely to compensate the
forest board trust for a portion of the lease to the Crescent
television improvement district consistent with RCW 79.13.520.
(13) The department shall develop a multiyear work plan and
schedule for mapping all applicable areas of the state for landslide
hazards and earthquake hazards. The work plan and schedule shall be
based on a carryforward funding level, and shall be submitted to the
office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by June 30, 2006.

Sec. 309 2005 c 518 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,000,000))
$12,483,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,443,000))
$10,983,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,608,000))
$10,634,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,986,000))
$1,990,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($968,000))
$972,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,416,000))
$3,555,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,072,000))
$41,307,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $37,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $37,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for implementation of the Puget
Sound conservation and recovery plan and agency action item WSDA-01.
(2) Fees and assessments approved by the department in the 2005-07
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055.
(3) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department, in
addition to the authority provided in RCW 17.26.007, may enter into
agreements with federal agencies to eradicate spartina from private
lands that may provide a source of reinfestation to public lands.
(4) $36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for an economic impact study of
fairs in the state of Washington.
(5) $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $13,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for indemnity payments for poultry
that are ordered by the department to be slaughtered or destroyed.
(6) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for market promotion and trade
barrier grants.
(7) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the small farm and direct
marketing program.
(8) $466,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to complete a database application that
would consolidate program information and enable the department to more
effectively respond to a food safety or animal disease emergency.
(9) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement the Washington wine
brand campaign.
(10) The department shall consult with affected agricultural
industries before fees for fruit and vegetable inspections may be
raised. The consultation shall include a review of current inspection
services, the cost of providing those services, and the discontinuation
of unnecessary services.

Sec. 310 2005 c 518 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($861,000))
$864,000

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 401 2005 c 518 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,886,000))
$1,821,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,787,000))
$1,731,000
Architects' License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($728,000))
$715,000
Cemetery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($224,000))
$220,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,179,000))
$3,217,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,583,000))
$7,605,000
Master License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,593,000))
$11,563,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,936,000))
$2,861,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000
Real Estate Appraiser Commission
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,345,000))
$1,566,000
Business and Professions Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,927,000))
$8,958,000
Real Estate Research Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($301,000))
$321,000
((Wildlife Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000))
Funeral Directors and Embalmers
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($534,000))
$531,000
Geologists' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,000))
$47,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,405,000))
$41,521,000

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In accordance with RCW 43.24.086, it is
the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of each
professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully
borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business. For
each licensing program covered by RCW 43.24.086, the department shall
set fees at levels sufficient to fully cover the cost of administering
the licensing program, including any costs associated with policy
enhancements funded in the 2005-07 fiscal biennium. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, during the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the department may
increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the increases
are necessary to fully fund the costs of the licensing programs.
(2) $7,685,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is subject to enactment of Substitute House Bill No. 1394
(business and professions account). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2005, the appropriations out of this account shall be made from the
general fund.
(3) $1,653,000 of the master license account--state appropriation
is subject to enactment of House Bill No. 2131 (master licensing
service). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $34,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 are subject to enactment of House Bill No. 1241 (vehicle
licensing and registration). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $180,000 of the real estate appraiser commission account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5274
(real estate appraisers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 402 2005 c 518 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,089,000))
$37,573,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,702,000))
$30,182,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,356,000))
$4,364,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($595,000))
$596,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,615,000))
$4,628,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,941,000))
$4,963,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $573,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,883,000))
$2,895,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,154,000))
$1,157,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,550,000))
$7,560,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($468,000))
$469,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $313,000
Fingerprint Identification
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,257,000))
$6,270,000
Disaster Response Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
((DNA Data Base Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000))
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($102,001,000))
$102,246,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of state
fire marshal to exclusively review K-12 construction documents for fire
and life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the
intent of this appropriation to provide these services only to those
districts that are located in counties without qualified review
capabilities.
(2) $222,000 of the aquatic invasive species prevention account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5699 (aquatic invasive species).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed House
Bill No. 1241 (vehicle licensing and registration). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
Sec. 501 2005 c 518 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

(1) STATE AGENCY OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,946,000))
$13,385,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,870,000))
$15,951,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,248,000))
$23,149,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,064,000))
$52,553,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) (($10,836,000)) $10,769,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and (($10,910,000)) $10,504,000 of
the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided
solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. Within the amounts provided in
this subsection, the superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary
accomplishments of four students who have demonstrated a strong
understanding of the civics essential learning requirements to receive
the Daniel J. Evans civic education award. The students selected for
the award must demonstrate understanding through completion of at least
one of the classroom-based civics assessment models developed by the
superintendent of public instruction, and through leadership in the
civic life of their communities. The superintendent shall select two
students from eastern Washington and two students from western
Washington to receive the award, and shall notify the governor and
legislature of the names of the recipients.
(b) $428,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $428,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities.
(c) $509,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $504,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the Washington professional educator standards board. Within the
amounts provided in this subsection, the Washington professional
educator standards board shall pursue the implementation of recent
study recommendations including: (i) Revision of teacher mathematics
endorsement competencies and alignment of teacher tests to the updated
competencies, and (ii) development of mathematics specialist
endorsement.
(d) (($100,000)) $607,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 ((is)) and $592,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for increased
attorney general fees related to School Districts' Alliance for
Adequate Funding of Special Education et al. v. State of Washington et
al., Thurston County Superior Court Cause No. 04-2-02000-7.
(e) $950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for replacement of the
apportionment system, which includes the processes that collect school
district budget and expenditure information, staffing characteristics,
and the student enrollments that drive the funding process.
(f)(i) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction and the department of health to collaborate and
develop a work group to assess school nursing services in class I
school districts. The work group shall consult with representatives
from the following groups: School nurses, schools, students, parents,
teachers, health officials, and administrators. The work group shall:
(A) Study the need for additional school nursing services by
gathering data about current school nurse-to-student ratios in each
class I school district and assessing the demand for school nursing
services by acuity levels and the necessary skills to meet those
demands. The work group also shall recommend to the legislature best
practices in school nursing services, including a dedicated,
sustainable funding model that would best meet the current and future
needs of Washington's schools and contribute to greater academic
success of all students. The work group shall make recommendations for
school nursing services, and may examine school nursing services by
grade level. The work group shall assess whether funding for school
nurses should continue as part of basic education; and
(B) In collaboration with managed care plans that contract with the
department of social and health services medical assistance
administration to provide health services to children participating in
the medicaid and state children's health insurance program, identify
opportunities to improve coordination of and access to health services
for low-income children through the use of school nurse services. The
work group shall evaluate the feasibility of pooling school district
and managed care plan funding to finance school nurse positions in
school districts with high numbers of low-income children.
(ii) The office of superintendent of public instruction shall
report the work group's findings and plans for implementation to the
legislature by February 1, 2006.
(g) $78,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $78,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to provide direct services and
support to schools around an integrated, interdisciplinary approach to
instruction in conservation, natural resources, sustainability, and
human adaptation to the environment. Specific integration efforts will
focus on science, math, and the social sciences. Integration between
basic education and career and technical education, particularly
agricultural and natural sciences education, is to be a major element.
(h) $2,896,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the creation of a statewide data base
of longitudinal student information. This amount is conditioned on the
department satisfying the requirements in section 902, chapter 518,
Laws of 2005.

(2) STATEWIDE PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,192,000))
$16,692,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,155,000))
$10,665,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,465,000))
$57,648,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,812,000))
$85,005,000

The appropriations in this subsection are provided solely for the
statewide programs specified in this subsection and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) A maximum of $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $2,541,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
a corps of nurses located at educational service districts, as
determined by the superintendent of public instruction, to be
dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to
students, health education, and training for school staff.
(ii) A maximum of $96,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for the school
safety center in the office of the superintendent of public instruction
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(A) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models of
school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(B) The school safety center advisory committee shall develop a
training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all
school safety personnel.
(iii) A maximum of $100,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $100,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
a school safety training program provided by the criminal justice
training commission. The commission, in collaboration with the school
safety center advisory committee, shall provide the school safety
training for all school administrators and school safety personnel,
including school safety personnel hired after the effective date of
this section.
(iv) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
solely for the safety center advisory committee to develop and
distribute a pamphlet to promote internet safety for children,
particularly in grades seven through twelve. The pamphlet shall be
posted on the superintendent of public instruction's web site. To the
extent possible, the pamphlet shall be distributed in schools
throughout the state and in other areas accessible to youth, including
but not limited to libraries and community centers.
(v) (($11,600,000)) $10,344,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for safe and drug free schools and
communities grants for drug and violence prevention activities and
strategies.
(vi) A maximum of $146,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $146,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for a nonviolence
and leadership training program provided by the institute for community
leadership. The program shall provide a request for proposal process,
with up to 80 percent funding, for nonviolence leadership workshops
serving at least 12 school districts with direct programming in 36
elementary, middle, and high schools throughout Washington state.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
A maximum of $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $1,939,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for K-20
telecommunications network technical support in the K-12 sector to
prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization
of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the
network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced
technical support for the network.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $787,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $799,000 of
the fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided solely for the special
services pilot projects. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall allocate these funds to the district or districts
participating in the pilot program according to the provisions of RCW
28A.630.015.
(ii) A maximum of $548,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $548,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for alternative
certification routes. Funds may be used by the professional educator
standards board to continue existing alternative-route grant programs
and to create new alternative-route programs in regions of the state
with service shortages.
(iii) A maximum of $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $31,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for operation of
the Cispus environmental learning center.
(iv) A maximum of $1,224,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $1,224,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
in-service training and educational programs conducted by the Pacific
Science Center.
(v) A maximum of $1,079,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $1,079,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
the Washington state leadership assistance for science education reform
(LASER) regional partnership coordinated at the Pacific Science Center.
(vi) A maximum of $97,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $97,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided to support
vocational student leadership organizations.
(vii) A maximum of $146,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $146,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for
the Washington civil liberties education program.
(viii) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the
Washington state achievers scholarship program. The funds shall be
used to support community involvement officers that recruit, train, and
match community volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers
scholars.
(ix) (($1,521,000)) $1,911,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for the advanced placement fee program to
increase opportunities for low-income students and under-represented
populations to participate in advanced placement courses and to
increase the capacity of schools to provide advanced placement courses
to students.
(x) (($8,292,000)) $5,532,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for comprehensive school reform demonstration
projects to provide grants to low-income schools for improving student
achievement through adoption and implementation of research-based
curricula and instructional programs.
(xi) (($19,587,000)) $24,490,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for 21st century learning center grants,
providing after-school and inter-session activities for students.
(xii) $383,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $294,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Lorraine Wojahn dyslexia
pilot reading program in up to five school districts.
(xiii) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for developing and disseminating
curriculum and other materials documenting women's role in World War
II.
(xiv) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for incentive grants for districts to
develop preapprenticeship programs. Grant awards up to $10,000 each
shall be used to support the program's design, school/business/labor
agreement negotiations, and recruiting high school students for
preapprenticeship programs in the building trades and crafts.
(xv) $410,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the dissemination of the Navigation
101 curriculum to all districts, including the development and
dissemination of electronic student planning tools and the development
of a software package to use to analyze the impact of the
implementation of Navigation 101 on student performance.
(xvi) $6,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 is provided solely for one-time grants to school
districts to offset extraordinary rate increases for natural gas,
propane, and heating oil.

Sec. 502 2005 c 518 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,180,957,000))
$4,193,063,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,243,010,000))
$4,277,883,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,422,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,423,967,000))
$8,499,368,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2005-06 and
2006-07 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (d) through (f) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (c) through
(f) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) 49 certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-3;
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 4-12; and
(iv) An additional 4.2 certificated instructional staff units for
grades K-3 and an additional 7.2 certificated instructional staff units
for grade 4. Any funds allocated for the additional certificated units
provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be considered as basic
education funding;
(A) Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of
the amount required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established
under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the district
documents an actual ratio in grades K-4 equal to or greater than 53.2
certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent
students. For any school district documenting a lower certificated
instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff ratio
achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;
(B) Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per
one thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate
up to 1.3 of the 53.2 funding ratio to employ additional classified
instructional assistants assigned to basic education classrooms in
grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a district's staff ratio under
this section, funds used by the district to employ additional
classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual
certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional classified
instructional assistants, for the purposes of this subsection, shall be
determined using the 1989-90 school year as the base year;
(C) Any district maintaining a ratio in grades K-4 equal to or
greater than 53.2 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students may use allocations generated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of that required to maintain the
minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ
additional basic education certificated instructional staff or
classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) shall only be expended to reduce class
size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated instructional
funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent
vocational students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) Indirect cost charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic
education and vocational enhancement allocations of state funds;
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(h) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2005-06 and 2006-07
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(d) through (h) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each three certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
sixty average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
((10.90)) 11.21 percent in the 2005-06 school year and ((11.90)) 13.02
percent in the 2006-07 school year for certificated salary allocations
provided under subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of ((14.57))
14.07 percent in the 2005-06 school year and ((15.82)) 15.95 percent in
the 2006-07 school year for classified salary allocations provided
under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (h) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$9,112 per certificated staff unit in the 2005-06 school year and a
maximum of (($9,285)) $9,540 per certificated staff unit in the 2006-07
school year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $22,377 per certificated
staff unit in the 2005-06 school year and a maximum of (($22,802))
$23,429 per certificated staff unit in the 2006-07 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $17,362 per certificated
staff unit in the 2005-06 school year and a maximum of (($17,692))
$18,178 per certificated staff unit in the 2006-07 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $531.09 for the 2005-06 and
2006-07 school years per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely
for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall
be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio
between the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and
the number of actual basic education certificated instructional staff
reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of (($7,621,000))
$7,642,000 outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2006
and 2007 as follows:
(a) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $513,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2006
and a maximum of (($523,000)) $537,000 may be expended in fiscal year
2007;
(b) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,035,000 may be expended for the 2006 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,035,000 for the 2007 fiscal year;
(c) A maximum of (($365,000)) $371,000 may be expended for school
district emergencies;
(d) A maximum of $485,000 each fiscal year may be expended for
programs providing skills training for secondary students who are
enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at
a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in
those programs; and
(e) $394,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $787,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for incentive grants to encourage
school districts to increase enrollment in vocational skills centers.
Up to $500 for each full-time equivalent student may be proportionally
distributed to a school district or school districts increasing skills
centers enrollment above the levels in the 2004-05 school year. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop
criteria for awarding incentive grants pursuant to this subsection.
The total amount allocated pursuant to this subsection shall be limited
to $1,181,000 for the 2005-07 biennium.
(10) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 5.2 percent from the 2004-05 school year to the
2005-06 school year and ((3.4)) 5.2 percent from the 2005-06 school
year to the 2006-07 school year.
(11) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

Sec. 503 2005 c 518 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- BASIC EDUCATION
EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION. (1) The following calculations determine the
salaries used in the general fund allocations for certificated
instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff units
under section 502 of this act:
(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units
shall be determined for each district by multiplying the district's
certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 12E
by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP Document
1Sb; and
(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units
and classified staff units for each district shall be based on the
district's certificated administrative and classified salary allocation
amounts shown on LEAP Document 12E.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "LEAP Document 1Sb" means the computerized tabulation
establishing staff mix factors for certificated instructional staff
according to education and years of experience, as developed by the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on ((March
18,)) December 8, 2005, at ((10:00)) 12:00 hours; and
(b) "LEAP Document 12E" means the computerized tabulation of 2005-06 and 2006-07 school year salary allocations for certificated
administrative staff and classified staff and derived and total base
salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed by the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on ((April
6,)) December 8, 2005, at ((10:00)) 12:00 hours.
(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors shall be applied to salary
adjustments at a rate of ((10.26)) 10.57 percent for school year 2005-06 and ((11.26)) 12.38 percent for school year 2006-07 for certificated
staff and for classified staff ((11.07)) 10.57 percent for school year
2005-06 and ((12.32)) 12.45 percent for the 2006-07 school year.
(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary
allocation schedules for certificated instructional staff are
established for basic education salary allocations:

K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2005-06 School Year

Years of MA+90

Service
BA
BA+15
BA+30
BA+45
BA+90
BA+135
MA
MA+45
or PHD

0 30,383 31,204 32,054 32,906 35,640 37,401 36,426 39,161 40,924

1 30,792 31,624 32,485 33,375 36,137 37,889 36,831 39,594 41,345

2 31,181 32,022 32,892 33,850 36,605 38,375 37,239 39,994 41,764

3 31,583 32,431 33,311 34,299 37,049 38,861 37,626 40,373 42,187

4 31,977 32,862 33,747 34,770 37,536 39,361 38,031 40,796 42,623

5 32,384 33,273 34,167 35,247 38,002 39,864 38,442 41,199 43,061

6 32,802 33,672 34,596 35,729 38,472 40,344 38,864 41,607 43,478

7 33,536 34,420 35,356 36,551 39,334 41,258 39,655 42,437 44,362

8 34,612 35,543 36,502 37,796 40,616 42,611 40,899 43,720 45,714

9 36,707 37,713 39,054 41,940 44,002 42,156 45,044 47,106

10 38,938 40,376 43,301 45,432 43,479 46,405 48,535

11 41,737 44,726 46,900 44,840 47,830 50,003

12 43,055 46,189 48,428 46,255 49,292 51,532

13 47,688 49,993 47,720 50,791 53,096

14 49,194 51,618 49,227 52,396 54,721

15 50,474 52,961 50,507 53,758 56,144

16 or more 51,483 54,019 51,517 54,833 57,266

((K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2006-07 School Year

Years of MA+90

Service
BA
BA+15
BA+30
BA+45
BA+90
BA+135
MA
MA+45
or PHD

0 30,900 31,735 32,599 33,466 36,247 38,038 37,046 39,827 41,620

1 31,316 32,162 33,038 33,942 36,752 38,534 37,458 40,268 42,048

2 31,712 32,566 33,451 34,426 37,228 39,028 37,873 40,674 42,475

3 32,121 32,983 33,878 34,883 37,679 39,523 38,266 41,060 42,905

4 32,521 33,421 34,321 35,362 38,174 40,031 38,678 41,491 43,348

5 32,935 33,840 34,748 35,846 38,649 40,543 39,097 41,900 43,794

6 33,360 34,245 35,185 36,337 39,127 41,031 39,526 42,315 44,218

7 34,107 35,005 35,957 37,173 40,003 41,960 40,330 43,159 45,116

8 35,201 36,148 37,123 38,439 41,307 43,336 41,594 44,464 46,492

9 37,332 38,355 39,718 42,654 44,751 42,873 45,810 47,908

10 39,601 41,063 44,038 46,205 44,219 47,194 49,361

11 42,448 45,487 47,698 45,603 48,644 50,853

12 43,788 46,975 49,252 47,042 50,131 52,409

13 48,499 50,844 48,532 51,655 54,000

14 50,031 52,496 50,065 53,287 55,652

15 51,333 53,862 51,366 54,673 57,099

16 or more 52,359 54,938 52,393 55,766 58,241))

K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2006-07 School Year

Years of MA+90

Service
BA
BA+15
BA+30
BA+45
BA+90
BA+135
MA
MA+45
or PHD

0 31,203 32,046 32,919 33,794 36,602 38,411 37,410 40,218 42,028

1 31,623 32,477 33,362 34,275 37,113 38,911 37,826 40,663 42,461

2 32,023 32,886 33,779 34,764 37,593 39,410 38,244 41,073 42,891

3 32,436 33,306 34,210 35,225 38,049 39,910 38,641 41,463 43,325

4 32,840 33,749 34,658 35,708 38,549 40,424 39,057 41,898 43,773

5 33,258 34,171 35,089 36,198 39,028 40,940 39,480 42,311 44,223

6 33,687 34,581 35,530 36,694 39,510 41,433 39,913 42,730 44,651

7 34,442 35,349 36,310 37,538 40,396 42,371 40,725 43,582 45,559

8 35,546 36,503 37,487 38,816 41,712 43,761 42,002 44,900 46,947

9 37,698 38,731 40,108 43,072 45,190 43,293 46,259 48,377

10 39,989 41,466 44,470 46,658 44,653 47,657 49,845

11 42,864 45,933 48,166 46,051 49,121 51,352

12 44,217 47,436 49,735 47,503 50,622 52,922

13 48,975 51,343 49,007 52,162 54,529

14 50,522 53,011 50,556 53,810 56,198

15 51,836 54,390 51,870 55,209 57,659

16 or more 52,873 55,477 52,907 56,313 58,812

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer
to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate
degree.
(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before
the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be
counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection,
the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:
(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and
(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.
(b) "MA" means a masters degree.
(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.
(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and
28A.415.023.
(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by
any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine
compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and
LEAP documents referenced in this act, or any replacement schedules and
documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(7) The certificated instructional staff base salary specified for
each district in LEAP Document 12E and the salary schedules in
subsection (4)(a) of this section include two learning improvement
days. A school district is eligible for the learning improvement day
funds only if the learning improvement days have been added to the 180-day contract year. If fewer days are added, the additional learning
improvement allocation shall be adjusted accordingly. The additional
days shall be limited to specific activities identified in the state
required school improvement plan related to improving student learning
that are consistent with education reform implementation, and shall not
be considered part of basic education. The principal in each school
shall assure that the days are used to provide the necessary school-wide, all staff professional development that is tied directly to the
school improvement plan. The school principal and the district
superintendent shall maintain documentation as to their approval of
these activities. The length of a learning improvement day shall not
be less than the length of a full day under the base contract. The
superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that school districts
adhere to the intent and purposes of this subsection.
(8) The salary allocation schedules established in this section are
for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2)
and subsection (7) of this section.

Sec. 504 2005 c 518 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($73,981,000))
$74,308,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($186,968,000))
$222,916,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $470,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($864,000))
$973,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,334,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($262,283,000))
$300,001,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($135,669,000)) $170,089,000 is provided for a cost of living
adjustment of 1.2 percent effective September 1, 2005, and another
((1.7)) 2.7 percent effective September 1, 2006, for state formula
staff units. The appropriations include associated incremental fringe
benefit allocations at rates of ((10.26)) 10.57 percent for the 2005-06
school year and ((11.26)) 12.38 percent for the 2006-07 school year for
certificated staff and ((11.07)) 10.57 percent for the 2005-06 school
year and ((12.32)) 12.45 percent for the 2006-07 school year for
classified staff.
(a) The appropriations in this section include the increased
portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant
state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Increases for
general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this
act. Increases for special education result from increases in each
district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
502 and 503 of this act.
(b) The appropriations in this section provide cost of living and
incremental fringe benefit allocations based on formula adjustments as
follows:

School Year

2005-06 2006-07

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) (($0.28))
$0.27 (($0.68))
$0.91

Highly Capable (per formula student) $2.96 (($7.26))
$9.87

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) (($7.92))
$7.94 (($19.44))
$26.44

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $1.69 (($4.14))
$5.63

(c) The appropriations in this section include (($251,000))
$252,000 for fiscal year 2006 and (($676,000)) $893,000 for fiscal year
2007 for salary increase adjustments for substitute teachers.
(2) (($126,614,000)) $129,912,000 is provided for adjustments to
insurance benefit allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance
benefit allocations is $582.47 per month for the 2005-06 and 2006-07
school years. The appropriations in this section provide for a rate
increase to $629.07 per month for the 2005-06 school year and
(($679.39)) $682.54 per month for the 2006-07 school year. The
adjustments to health insurance benefit allocations are at the
following rates:

School Year

2005-06 2006-07

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.42 (($0.88))
$0.91

Highly Capable (per formula student) (($2.89))
$2.88 (($5.97))
$6.16

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $7.54 (($15.69))
$16.20

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $1.49 (($3.11))
$3.21

(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

Sec. 505 2005 c 518 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($242,170,000))
$246,305,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($248,575,000))
$251,290,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $713,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($490,745,000))
$498,308,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $796,000 of this fiscal year 2006 appropriation
and a maximum of (($812,000)) $834,000 of the fiscal year 2007
appropriation may be expended for regional transportation coordinators
and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure
that data submitted by school districts for state transportation
funding shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual
transportation activity of each district.
(3) $5,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $5,000 of the
fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided solely for the
transportation of students enrolled in "choice" programs.
Transportation shall be limited to low-income students who are
transferring to "choice" programs solely for educational reasons.
(4) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of (($41.51)) $42.52 per weighted mile in the 2005-06 school year and (($42.01)) $42.38 per weighted mile in the 2006-07
school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided in
section 504 of this act. Included in the 2005-06 school year rate is
a one-time increase of $1.12 to offset extraordinary increases in the
price of diesel fuel. Allocations for transportation of students
transported more than one radius mile shall be based on weighted miles
as determined by superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the
per mile reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the
formulas adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
Allocations for transportation of students living within one radius
mile shall be based on the number of enrolled students in grades
kindergarten through five living within one radius mile of their
assigned school multiplied by the per mile reimbursement rate for the
school year multiplied by 1.29.
(5) For busses purchased between July 1, 2005, and June 30, 2007,
the office of superintendent of public instruction shall provide
reimbursement funding to a school district only after the
superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was
purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or
a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote
based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195. The competitive specifications shall meet
federal motor vehicle safety standards, minimum state specifications as
established by rule by the superintendent, and supported options as
determined by the superintendent in consultation with the regional
transportation coordinators of the educational service districts.
(6) Beginning with the 2005-06 school year, the superintendent of
public instruction shall base depreciation payments for school district
buses on the five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate
category of bus. In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the
depreciation payment shall be based on the current state price. The
superintendent may include a weighting or other adjustment factor in
the averaging formula to ease the transition from the current-price
depreciation system to the average depreciation system. Prior to
making any depreciation payment in the 2005-06 school year, the
superintendent shall notify the office of financial management and the
fiscal committees of the legislature of the specific depreciation
formula to be used. The replacement cost shall be based on the lowest
bid in the appropriate bus category for that school year. A maximum of
$50,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation may be expended for
software programming costs associated with the implementation of this
subsection.

Sec. 506 2005 c 518 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,147,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,159,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($288,774,000))
$270,423,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($295,080,000))
$276,729,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for state matching money for federal
child nutrition programs.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $100,000 of the 2007 fiscal year appropriation are
provided for summer food programs for children in low-income areas.
(3) $47,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $59,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to reimburse school districts for
school breakfasts served to students enrolled in the free or reduced
price meal program pursuant to House Bill No. 1771 (requiring school
breakfast programs in certain schools). If House Bill No. 1771 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec. 507 2005 c 518 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($460,032,000))
$465,529,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($471,961,000))
$478,988,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($435,464,000))
$435,666,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,222,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,367,457,000))
$1,383,405,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall use the
excess cost methodology developed and implemented for the 2001-02
school year using the S-275 personnel reporting system and all related
accounting requirements to ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The S-275 and accounting changes in effect since the 2001-02
school year shall supercede any prior excess cost methodologies and
shall be required of all school districts.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
and federal funds to school districts based on two categories: The
optional birth through age two program for special education eligible
developmentally delayed infants and toddlers, and the mandatory special
education program for special education eligible students ages three to
twenty-one. A "special education eligible student" means a student
receiving specially designed instruction in accordance with a properly
formulated individualized education program.
(5)(a) For the 2005-06 and 2006-07 school years, the superintendent
shall make allocations to each district based on the sum of:
(i) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of
developmentally delayed infants and toddlers ages birth through two,
multiplied by the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(ii) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment multiplied by the funded enrollment percent
determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, multiplied by
the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district shall be
based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment" means the resident enrollment including students enrolled
through choice (RCW 28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts
(RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding students residing in another district
enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program (RCW
28A.225.250).
(b) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding the birth through age
two enrollment, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
Each district's general fund -- state funded special education
enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment
percent or 12.7 percent.
(7) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with subsection
(6)(b) of this section, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student
shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units.
(8) To the extent necessary, $18,940,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation and (($28,698,000)) $29,081,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided for safety net awards for districts
with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the
amounts provided in subsection (5) of this section. If safety net
awards exceed the amount appropriated in this subsection (8), the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds
necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds shall be awarded by the
state safety net oversight committee subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special
education exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas.
In the determination of need, the committee shall also consider
additional available revenues from federal sources. Differences in
program costs attributable to district philosophy, service delivery
choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for safety
net awards.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(d) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 1999.
(e) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(10) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor who shall be nonvoting
members of the committee; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.
(11) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund--state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(12) A maximum of $1,000,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for projects to provide special education
students with appropriate job and independent living skills, including
work experience where possible, to facilitate their successful
transition out of the public school system. The funds provided by this
subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.
(13) A maximum of $100,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation shall be expended to create a special education ombudsman
program within the office of superintendent of public instruction. The
purpose of the program is to provide support to parents, guardians,
educators, and students with disabilities. The program will provide
information to help families and educators understand state laws,
rules, and regulations, and access training and support, technical
information services, and mediation services. The ombudsman program
will provide data, information, and appropriate recommendations to the
office of superintendent of public instruction, school districts,
educational service districts, state need projects, and the parent and
teacher information center.
(14) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(15) A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation may be expended by the superintendent for projects
related to use of inclusion strategies by school districts for
provision of special education services.
(16) $1,400,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation shall be
expended for one-time grants to school districts for the start-up costs
of implementing web-based programs that assist schools in meeting state
and federal requirements regarding individualized education plans.
(17) The superintendent, consistent with the new federal IDEA
reauthorization, shall continue to educate school districts on how to
implement a birth-to-three program and review the cost effectiveness
and learning benefits of early intervention.
(18) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund -- state funds allocated under
this program; however, carry over funds shall be expended in the
special education program.

Sec. 508 2005 c 518 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE
DISTRICTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,694,000))
$3,691,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,724,000))
$3,711,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,418,000))
$7,430,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.310.340, may
receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct
school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education
rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

Sec. 509 2005 c 518 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT
ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($174,465,000))
$173,446,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($182,702,000))
$184,774,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($357,167,000))
$358,220,000

Sec. 510 2005 c 518 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,084,000))
$18,099,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,673,000))
$18,309,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,757,000))
$36,436,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $219,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $219,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to maintain at least one
certificated instructional staff and related support services at an
institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support
one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish
the educational program. The following types of institutions are
included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, and programs for
juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 511 2005 c 518 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY
CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,860,000))
$6,893,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,926,000))
$6,958,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,786,000))
$13,895,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for school district programs for highly capable
students shall be distributed at a maximum rate of (($347.24)) $347.93
per funded student for the 2005-06 school year and (($349.48)) $351.98
per funded student for the 2006-07 school year, exclusive of salary and
benefit adjustments pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of
funded students shall be a maximum of two percent of each district's
full-time equivalent basic education enrollment.
(3) $170,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $170,000 of
the fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided for the centrum program
at Fort Worden state park.
(4) $90,000 of the fiscal year 2006 appropriation and $90,000 of
the fiscal year 2007 appropriation are provided for the Washington
destination imagination network and future problem-solving programs.

Sec. 512 2005 c 518 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,076,000))
$45,212,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,427,000))
$46,730,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($123,345,000))
$147,807,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($206,848,000))
$239,773,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) ASSESSMENT
(($19,810,000)) $21,946,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006, (($16,105,000)) $21,491,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007, and
(($16,111,000)) $18,560,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
are provided solely for development and implementation of the
Washington assessments of student learning (WASL), including
development and implementation of retake assessments for high school
students who are not successful in one or more content areas of the
WASL and development of alternative assessments or appeals procedures
to implement the certificate of academic achievement. The
superintendent of public instruction shall report quarterly on the
progress on development of alternative assessments or appeals
procedures. Within these amounts, the superintendent of public
instruction shall contract for the early return of 10th grade student
WASL results, on or around June 10th of each year. $100,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 is provided
solely to (a) investigate the use of existing mathematics assessments
in languages other than English as possible means of measuring tenth
grade essential academic learnings and standards, including examining
the content and rigor of the assessments as well as their reliability
and validity; (b) estimate the cost of translating the tenth grade
mathematics WASL into other languages and scoring these assessments
should they be implemented; and (c) develop recommendations for (a) and
(b) of this subsection.
(2) MATH REMEDIATION
The purpose of this subsection (2) is to strengthen high school
student performance in meeting the state standards in mathematics.
(a) Included in the general fund--state amounts provided in
subsection (1) of this section is $2,350,000 which is provided solely
for the development of a new tenth grade mathematics assessment tool
that: (i) Presents the mathematics essential learnings in segments for
assessment; (ii) is comparable in content and rigor to the tenth grade
mathematics WASL when all segments are considered together; (iii) is
reliable and valid; and (iv) can be used to determine a student's
academic performance level.
(b) $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for the development of WASL knowledge and
skill learning modules to assist students performing at tenth grade
Level 1 in mathematics.
(c) $330,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for development of mathematics knowledge
and skill learning modules to teach middle and high school students
specific skills that have been identified as areas of difficulty for
tenth grade students. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop materials for classroom use and for tutorial
learning activities.
(d) $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for development of web-based applications
of the curriculum and materials produced under (b) and (c) of this
subsection as well as mathematics knowledge and skill modules and
materials previously developed by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction. The products are to be designed as on-line courses
for students needing Level 1 instruction; learning modules accessible
to classroom teachers for incorporation into classroom instruction;
tutorials that can be used as WASL assessment skill refreshers and as
tutor-guided and parent-guided learning modules; and on-line practice
WASLs with supporting item scoring information and student response
examples.
(3) PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT
(a) $548,000 of the fiscal year 2006 general fund -- state
appropriation and $548,000 of the fiscal year 2007 general fund -- state
appropriation are provided solely for training of paraprofessional
classroom assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom
assistants as provided in RCW 28A.415.310.
(b) $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,348,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for mentor teacher assistance,
including state support activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and
28A.415.260, and for a mentor academy. Up to $200,000 of the amount in
this subsection may be used each fiscal year to operate a mentor
academy to help districts provide effective training for peer mentors.
Funds for the teacher assistance program shall be allocated to school
districts based on the number of first year beginning teachers.
(c) $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $705,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(d) $3,010,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $4,018,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for salary bonuses for teachers
who attain certification by the national board for professional
teaching standards, subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(i) Teachers who hold a valid certificate from the national board
during the 2005-06 or 2006-07 school years shall receive an annual
bonus not to exceed $3,500 in each of these school years in which they
hold a national board certificate.
(ii) The annual bonus shall be paid in a lump sum amount and shall
not be included in the definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW
41.32.010(10).
(e) (($90,399,000)) $98,761,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high
quality teachers and principals under Title II of the no child left
behind act.
(((3))) (4) SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT
(a) $338,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $338,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a principal support program.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction may contract
with an independent organization to administer the program. The
program shall include: (i) Development of an individualized
professional growth plan for a new principal or principal candidate;
and (ii) participation of a mentor principal who works over a period of
between one and three years with the new principal or principal
candidate to help him or her build the skills identified as critical to
the success of the professional growth plan. Within the amounts
provided, $25,000 per year shall be used to support additional
participation of secondary principals.
(b) $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for focused assistance. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct
educational audits of low-performing schools and enter into performance
agreements between school districts and the office to implement the
recommendations of the audit and the community. Each educational audit
shall include recommendations for best practices and ways to address
identified needs and shall be presented to the community in a public
meeting to seek input on ways to implement the audit and its
recommendations.
(c) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for a high school and school
district improvement program modeled after the office of the
superintendent of public instruction's existing focused assistance
program in (b) of this subsection. The state funding for this
improvement program will match an equal amount committed by a nonprofit
foundation in furtherance of a jointly funded program.
(d) A maximum of $250,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and a maximum of $250,000 of the general fund--
state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided for summer
accountability institutes offered by the superintendent of public
instruction. The institutes shall provide school district staff with
training in the analysis of student assessment data, information
regarding successful district and school teaching models, research on
curriculum and instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve
instruction in reading, mathematics, language arts, social studies,
including civics, and guidance and counseling. The superintendent of
public instruction shall emphasize issues of high school reform and
mathematics instruction when offering summer institute programs
supported by funds provided in this subsection.
(e) $515,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $515,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for the evaluation of reading and
mathematics textbooks, other instructional materials, and diagnostic
tools to determine the extent to which they are aligned with the state
standards. A scorecard of the analysis shall be made available to
school districts. The superintendent shall also develop and
disseminate information on essential components of comprehensive,
school-based math and reading programs and shall develop and
disseminate grade level expectations for reading and math which shall
include professional development modules and web-based materials.
(f) $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,764,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the mathematics helping corps
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(i) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical
mathematics assistance statewide, the superintendent of public
instruction shall employ mathematics school improvement specialists to
provide assistance to schools and districts. The specialists shall be
hired by and work under the direction of a statewide school improvement
coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall not be
permanent employees of the superintendent of public instruction.
(ii) The school improvement specialists shall provide the
following:
(A) Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data
and develop improvement plans based on those data;
(B) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their
performance on the Washington assessment of student learning and other
assessments emphasizing the performance on the mathematics assessments;
(C) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the
essential academic learning requirements emphasizing the academic
learning requirements for mathematics, the Washington assessment of
student learning, and meets the needs of diverse learners;
(D) Assistance in the identification and implementation of
research-based instructional practices in mathematics;
(E) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional
strategies and classroom-based assessment for mathematics;
(F) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community
involvement programs emphasizing mathematics; and
(G) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to
improve student mathematics learning.
(g) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the improvement of reading
achievement and implementation of research-based reading models. The
superintendent shall evaluate reading curriculum programs and other
instructional materials to determine the extent to which they are
aligned with state standards. A report of the analyses shall be made
available to school districts. The superintendent shall report to
districts the assessments that are available to screen and diagnose
reading difficulties, and shall provide training on how to implement a
reading assessment system. Resources may also be used to disseminate
grade level expectations and develop professional development modules
and web-based materials.
(h) (($16,758,000)) $30,401,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for the reading first program under Title I
of the no child left behind act.
(((4))) (5) STUDENT SUPPORTS
(a) $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $2,500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the meals for kids program
under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155.
(b) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 ((and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are)) is provided solely for an early reading grant
program for community-based initiatives that develop prereading and
early reading skills through parental and community involvement, public
awareness, coordination of resources, and partnerships with local
school districts. Grant awards shall include funding for one-time
start up costs for local affiliates and a one-time partial payment of
school district dues to local affiliates of up to 30 percent of the per
student dues amount. Grant applications shall include:
(i) Strategies for parental involvement emphasizing ages birth to
five and outreach to diverse communities;
(ii) Evidence of collaboration with, and support from, local school
districts, and how the activities funded in the grant are complementary
to the reading improvement efforts of local school districts;
(iii) A plan for community participation and coordination of
resources including in-kind and financial support by public and private
sector partners;
(iv) Measurable goals and evaluation methodology to determine
impact;
(v) Integration of reading strategies from the Washington state
early learning and development benchmarks;
(vi) A plan for marketing and public relations;
(vii) Strategies for sustaining the program when grant funding is
no longer available; and
(viii) Evidence of district commitment to reading improvement,
aligned curriculum, progress monitoring, and time-on-task.
(c) $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps.
The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are implementing
comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more
schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs. Grants
provided under this section may be used by school districts for
expenditures from September 2005 through August 31, 2007.
(d) $3,594,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $3,594,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for grants to school districts to
provide a continuum of care for children and families to help children
become ready to learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall
contain local plans designed collaboratively with community service
providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area in which
the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible.
Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.
(((5))) (6) TECHNOLOGY
(a) $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,959,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for improving technology
infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district technology
development, promoting standards for school district technology,
promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.
The superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate a process to
facilitate the evaluation and provision of online curriculum courses to
school districts which includes the following: Creation of a general
listing of the types of available online curriculum courses; a survey
conducted by each regional educational technology support center of
school districts in its region regarding the types of online curriculum
courses desired by school districts; a process to evaluate and
recommend to school districts the best online courses in terms of
curriculum, student performance, and cost; and assistance to school
districts in procuring and providing the courses to students.
(b) $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $126,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided for the development and posting of web-based instructional tools, assessment data, and other information that
assists schools and teachers implementing higher academic standards.

Sec. 513 2005 c 518 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($59,673,000))
$58,318,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,535,000))
$61,478,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,561,000))
$51,741,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $503,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($168,769,000))
$172,040,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of (($757.72))
$759.58 per eligible bilingual student in the 2005-06 school year and
(($763.70)) $770.40 in the 2006-07 school year, exclusive of salary and
benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act.
(3) The superintendent may withhold up to 1.5 percent of the school
year allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section,
and adjust the per eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this
section accordingly, solely for the central provision of assessments as
provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2).
(4) $70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section are
provided solely to develop a system for the tracking of current and
former transitional bilingual program students.
(5) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for migrant education under Title I Part C and English
language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III
of the elementary and secondary education act.

Sec. 514 2005 c 518 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,434,000))
$65,018,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,367,000))
$64,494,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,605,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($343,227,000))
$348,351,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $553,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($498,633,000))
$503,021,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund -- state and education legacy trust account
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions
and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of (($184.29)) $184.69 per funded student
for the 2005-06 school year and (($186.03)) $188.14 per funded student
for the 2006-07 school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided under section 504 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the following as appropriate:
(i) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12
for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch in the prior school year; and
(ii) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch exceeded forty percent, subtract forty percent from
the district's percentage and multiply the result by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior school
year.
(d) In addition to amounts allocated in (b) and (c) of this
subsection, an additional amount shall be allocated to a school
district for each school year in which the district's allocation is
less than the amount the district received for the general fund--state
learning assistance program allocation in the 2004-05 school year. The
amount of the allocation in this section shall be sufficient to
maintain the 2004-05 school year allocation.
(2) Increases in a school district's allocation above the 2004-05
school year level shall be directed to grades nine through ((twelve))
ten. ((Districts are encouraged to offer remediation courses in the
summer for students who fail the tenth grade WASL.))
(3) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(4) Small school districts are encouraged to make the most
efficient use of the funding provided by using regional educational
service district cooperatives to hire staff, provide professional
development activities, and implement reading and mathematics programs
consistent with research-based guidelines provided by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(5) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund -- state or education legacy trust
funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be
expended for the learning assistance program.
(6) School districts are encouraged to coordinate the use of these
funds with other federal, state, and local sources to serve students
who are below grade level and to make efficient use of resources in
meeting the needs of students with the greatest academic deficits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--PROMOTING ACADEMIC
SUCCESS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,034,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,198,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $296,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,528,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The amounts appropriated in this section are provided solely
for remediation for students who have not met standard in one or more
content areas of the WASL in the spring of their tenth grade year and
on each retake thereafter. The funds may be used for extended learning
activities, including summer school, before and after school, Saturday
classes, skill seminars, assessment preparation, and in-school or out-of-school tutoring. Extended learning activities may occur on the
school campus, via the internet, or at other locations and times that
meet student needs. Funds allocated under this section shall not be
considered basic education funding.
(2) School district allocations for promoting academic success
programs shall be calculated as follows:
(a) A district's student units shall be the number of content area
assessments (reading, writing, and mathematics) on which students were
more than one standard error of measurement from meeting standard on
the Washington assessment of student learning for the current classes
of eleventh and twelfth grade students. Districts with at least one
but less than 20 student units needing remediation shall be counted as
having 20 student units for the purposes of the allocations in (b) and
(c)(A) of this subsection.
(b) Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries and
benefits shall be determined using formula-generated staff units
calculated pursuant to this subsection. Seventy-four hours of
certificated instructional staff units are allocated per 13.0 student
units as calculated under (a) of this subsection. Allocations for
salaries and benefits for the staff units calculated under this
subsection shall be calculated in the same manner as provided under
section 503 of this act. Salary and benefit increase funding for staff
units generated under this section is included in section 504 of this
act.
(c) The following additional allocations are provided per student
unit, as calculated in (a) of this subsection:
(A) $12.50 for maintenance, operations, and transportation;
(B) $12.00 for pre- and post-remediation assessments;
(C) $17.00 per reading remediation student unit;
(D) $8.00 per mathematics remediation student unit; and
(E) $8.00 per writing remediation student unit.
(d) Funding shall be provided for students served in promoting
academic success programs beginning July 2006.
(e) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute
school year allocations according to the monthly apportionment schedule
defined in RCW 28A.510.250.
(3) School districts shall report annually to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction on the use of these funds,
including the types of assistance selected by students, the number of
students receiving each type of assistance, and the impact on WASL test
scores.
(4) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided for competitive innovation grants awarded to
schools and school districts for implementing high school remediation
programs that are unique in program delivery, program accessibility,
program content, or a combination of these factors and that serve
students who have not achieved success on the tenth grade WASL.
(5) School districts may carry over from one year to the next up to
10 percent of funds allocated under this program; however, carryover
funds shall be expended for promoting academic success programs.

Sec. 516 2005 c 518 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT
PROGRAM
Student Achievement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($629,356,000))
$630,267,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of $300.00 per FTE student for the 2005-06 school year and $375.00 per FTE student for the 2006-07 school year.
For the purposes of this section, FTE student refers to the annual
average full-time equivalent enrollment of the school district in
grades kindergarten through twelve for the prior school year, as
reported to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by
August 31st of the previous school year.
(2) The appropriation is allocated for the following uses as
specified in RCW 28A.505.210:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school; or
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection (2).
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute the
school year allocation according to the monthly apportionment schedule
defined in RCW 28A.510.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,090,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,370,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $29,941,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for providing early childhood education
assistance. Of this amount, $1,497,000 is provided solely to increase
the number of children receiving education and $2,146,000 is provided
solely for a targeted vendor rate increase.
(2) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for an early reading grant program for
community-based initiatives that develop prereading and early reading
skills through parental and community involvement, public awareness,
coordination of resources, and partnerships with local school
districts. Grant awards shall include funding for one-time start up
costs for local affiliates and a one-time partial payment of school
district dues to local affiliates of up to 30 percent of the per
student dues amount. Grant applications shall include:
(a) Strategies for parental involvement emphasizing ages birth to
five and outreach to diverse communities;
(b) Evidence of collaboration with, and support from, local school
districts, and how the activities funded in the grant are complementary
to the reading improvement efforts of local school districts;
(c) A plan for community participation and coordination of
resources including in-kind and financial support by public and private
sector partners;
(d) Measurable goals and evaluation methodology to determine
impact;
(e) Integration of reading strategies from the Washington state
early learning and development benchmarks;
(f) A plan for marketing and public relations;
(g) Strategies for sustaining the program when grant funding is no
longer available; and
(h) Evidence of district commitment to reading improvement, aligned
curriculum, progress monitoring, and time-on-task.
(3) If a bill creating the department of early learning is not
enacted by June 30, 2006, the appropriations for the department of
early learning in this section shall lapse and shall be appropriated as
follows:
(a) FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY TRADE AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,941,000
This appropriation is provided solely for providing early childhood
education assistance. Of this amount, $1,497,000 is provided solely to
increase the number of children receiving education and $2,146,000 is
provided solely for a targeted vendor rate increase.
(b) FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--STATE AGENCY
OPERATIONS
General Fund--State Appropriations (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
This appropriation is provided solely for an early reading grant
program for community-based initiatives that develop prereading and
early reading skills through parental and community involvement, public
awareness, coordination of resources, and partnerships with local
school districts and shall be used in accordance with the requirements
set forth in subsection (2) of this section.
(c) FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES--ECONOMIC
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000
This appropriation is provided solely for the headstart--state
collaboration office.
(d) The remainder of the appropriations in this section shall
lapse.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
Sec. 601 2005 c 518 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($556,499,000))
$557,735,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($556,220,000))
$572,216,000
Administrative Contingency Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,950,000
Education Legacy Trust--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,669,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,276,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,172,338,000))
$1,180,846,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The technical colleges may increase tuition and fees in excess
of the fiscal growth factor to conform with the percentage increase in
community college operating fees.
(2) $539,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $540,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the displaced homemakers
program.
(3) Access to baccalaureate and graduate degree programs continues
to be limited for residents of North Snohomish, Island, and Skagit
counties. The higher education consortium created to serve the region
has not been able to successfully address the region's access needs.
The university center model of service delivery, centered on a
community college campus with a single point of accountability, has
proven more effective in developing degree programs and attracting
students.
Therefore, the management and leadership responsibility for
consortium operations are assigned to Everett community college.
Everett community college shall collaborate with community and business
leaders, other local community colleges, the public four-year
institutions of higher education, and the higher education coordinating
board to develop an educational plan for the North Snohomish, Island,
and Skagit county region based on the university center model.
(4) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for higher education student child
care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(5) $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely as special funds for training and
related support services, including financial aid, as specified in
chapter 226, Laws of 1993 (employment and training for unemployed
workers). Funding is provided to support up to 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in each fiscal year.
(6) $2,000,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $2,000,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for basic skills
education at community and technical colleges and community-based
providers. These funds may be used to align or integrate adult basic
education and English as a second language courses with vocational
training.
(7) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 949 through 980 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding during the 2005-2007 biennium. This increase
in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition revenues
that will be generated and retained by the community and technical
colleges as a result of the tuition increases that are authorized in
section 601 of this act. Given these increases in core funding, the
state board for community and technical colleges shall, by June 30,
2007, show demonstrable progress toward achieving the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Increase the number of academic students who are eligible to
transfer to baccalaureate institutions;
(b) Increase the number of students prepared for work; and
(c) Increase the number of basic skills students who demonstrate
substantive skill gain.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the state board and the office of financial
management and shall be determined based on the per student funding
level assumed in this act.
The state board for community and technical colleges shall provide
a summary of the progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting the
provisions of this section to the governor and the appropriate fiscal
and policy committees of the legislature prior to November 1, 2006.
(8) $11,070,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $22,599,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided to increase budgeted
enrollments by 2,050 student FTEs in academic year 2006 and an
additional 2,135 student FTEs in academic year 2007. By December 15th
of each year of the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the board shall report to
the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees the number of new student FTEs enrolled with the funding
provided in this subsection.
(9) $2,250,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $2,250,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to increase
salaries and related benefits for part-time faculty. A college
district may match the state funds with local revenue. The board shall
report by January 30, 2006, to the office of financial management and
the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on (a)
the distribution of state funds, and (b) wage adjustments for part-time
faculty.
(10) $2,250,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $2,250,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for faculty
salary increments and associated benefits and may be used in
combination with salary and benefit savings from faculty turnover to
provide salary increments and associated benefits for faculty who
qualify through professional development and training. To the extent
general salary increase funding is used to pay faculty increments, the
general salary increase shall be reduced by the same amount.
(11) $2,950,000 of the administrative contingency account--state
appropriation is provided solely for administration and customized
training contracts through the job skills program, which shall be made
available broadly and not to the exclusion of private nonprofit
baccalaureate degree granting institutions or vocational arts career
schools operating in Washington state who partner with a firm,
hospital, group, or industry association concerned with commerce,
trade, manufacturing, or the provision of services to train current or
prospective employees. The state board shall make an annual report by
January 1 of each fiscal year to the governor and appropriate policy
and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding the implementation
of this section listing the scope of grant awards, the distribution of
funds by educational sector and region of the state, and the successful
partnerships supported by these state funds.
(12) $1,660,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for 2007
is provided solely for applied baccalaureate programs at selected
institutions and for increased colocation programs with regional
universities to bring upper-division course work to more community
college campuses.

Sec.602 2005 c 518 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($336,644,000))
$336,581,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($344,118,000))
$346,882,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,204,000))
$6,209,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,141,000))
$6,143,000
Education Legacy Trust--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,748,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $604,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($704,155,000))
$707,467,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $165,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $165,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item UW-01.
(2) $300,000 of the general fund -- private/local appropriation is
provided solely for shellfish biotoxin monitoring as specified in
chapter 263, Laws of 2003 (SSB 6073, shellfish license fee).
(3) $3,057,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $7,691,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy
for 360 new enrollments at the Seattle campus, 325 new enrollments at
the Tacoma campus, and 275 new enrollments at the Bothell campus. By
December 15th of each year of the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the
university shall report to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees the number of new student FTEs by campus
enrolled with the funding provided in this subsection.
(4) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 949 through 980 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding during the 2005-2007 biennium. This increase
in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition revenues
that will be generated and retained by the university as a result of
the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of this act.
Given these increases in core funding, the University of Washington
shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward achieving
the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that are ranked in the top twenty
nationally;
(e) Sustain the quality of its research programs as measured by the
national ranking for federal research grants received; and
(f) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before ((October)) November 1, 2006, the university shall
submit to the higher education coordinating board a report that
outlines the institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting
the provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating
board shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to
the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to ((November)) December 1, 2006.
(5) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to assist the transition of University of
Washington-Tacoma and University of Washington-Bothell from branch
campuses serving upper-division students, to four-year campuses serving
freshmen, sophomores, and upper-division students. Funds may be used
to develop curricula, recruit new faculty, and expand student services.
Consistent with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board, UW-Tacoma and UW-Bothell may begin enrolling lower-division students beginning in fiscal year 2007.
(6) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for research on labor and economic
issues in Washington state through the Harry Bridges center.
(7) $146,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $146,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for the
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to the Burke Museum to enhance the
museum's public outreach capabilities.
(8) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for the
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to the institute for learning and
brain sciences (ILABS) to develop a partnership, linking ILABS to
policymakers, private sectors and user-groups.
(9) The University of Washington medical center shall provide
inpatient and outpatient hospital services to offenders confined in
department of corrections facilities at a rate no greater than the
average rate that the department of corrections has negotiated with
other community hospitals in Washington state.
(10) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Olympic natural resources
center.
(11) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to maintain the autism center at
the University of Washington-Tacoma campus. The facility will continue
to function as a satellite facility to the autism center at the
University of Washington medical center in Seattle and provide clinical
service and professional training.
(12) $2,430,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for research in life science fields.
(13) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for improvements to the Pacific Northwest
seismic network.
(14) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for one-time expenditures associated with
creating the policy consensus center.

Sec. 603 2005 c 518 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($206,494,000))
$206,630,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($211,870,000))
$209,570,000
Education Legacy Trust--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,162,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($429,526,000))
$427,655,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $210,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $210,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of the
Puget Sound work plan and agency action item WSU-01.
(2) $2,741,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $6,900,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy
for 430 new enrollments at the Pullman campus, 450 new enrollments at
the Vancouver campus, and 25 new enrollments at the Tri-Cities campus.
By December 15th of each year of the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the
university shall report to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees the number of new student FTEs by campus
enrolled with the funding provided in this subsection.
(3) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 949 through 980 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding during the 2005-2007 biennium. This increase
in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition revenues
that will be generated and retained by the university as a result of
the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of this act.
Given these increases in core funding, Washington State University
shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward achieving
the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that are ranked in the top twenty
nationally;
(e) Sustain the quality of its research programs as measured by the
national ranking for federal research grants received; and
(f) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before ((October)) November 1, 2006 the university shall
submit to the higher education coordinating board a report that
outlines the institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting
the provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating
board shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to
the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to ((November)) December 1, 2006.
(4) $507,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,014,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to expand the entering class
of veterinary medicine students by 16 resident student FTEs each
academic year during the 2005-2007 biennium.
(5) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to assist the transition of Washington
State University-Vancouver from a branch campus serving only upper-division students, to a four-year campus serving freshmen, sophomores,
and upper-division students. Funds may be used to develop curricula,
recruit new faculty, and expand student services. Consistent with the
recommendations of the higher education coordinating board, WSU-Vancouver may begin enrolling lower-division students beginning in
fiscal year 2007.
(6) The university shall give consideration to reprioritizing
agricultural research funding to allow for expansion of the center for
precision agricultural systems and development of the biologically
intensive and organic agriculture program.
(7) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to study the cost of complying
with vehicle licensing and registration laws. Funding is subject to
the passage of House Bill No. 1241 (modifying vehicle licensing and
registration penalties). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5101
(providing incentives to support renewable energy). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(9) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to conduct research on
alternatives for controlling ghost shrimp in Willapa bay.
(10) $913,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for natural gas rate increases.
(11) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for one-time expenditures associated with
creating the policy consensus center.

Sec. 604 2005 c 518 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,137,000))
$46,142,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,069,000))
$47,009,000
Education Legacy Trust--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,461,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,667,000))
$99,722,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,147,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $4,314,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy
for 650 new enrollments. By December 15th of each year of the 2005-07
fiscal biennium, the university shall report to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees the number of new
student FTEs by campus enrolled with the funding provided in this
subsection.
(2) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 949 through 980 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding during the 2005-2007 biennium. This increase
in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition revenues
that will be generated and retained by the university as a result of
the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of this act.
Given these increases in core funding, Eastern Washington University
shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward achieving
the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that receive national accreditation;
and
(e) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before ((October)) November 1, 2006, the university shall
submit to the higher education coordinating board a report that
outlines the institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting
the provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating
board shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to
the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to ((November)) December 1, 2006.
(3) $212,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $213,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the northeast autism center to
provide community based approaches to assisting children and adults
with autism spectrum disorder and to include the establishment of a
preschool at Eastern Washington University to serve children identified
with autism spectrum disorder.
(4) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for natural gas rate increases.

Sec. 605 2005 c 518 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,379,000))
$45,377,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,739,000))
$46,681,000
Education Legacy Trust--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,461,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($98,579,000))
$98,622,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,147,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $4,314,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy
for 650 new enrollments. By December 15th of each year of the 2005-07
fiscal biennium, the university shall report to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees the number of new
student FTEs by campus enrolled with the funding provided in this
subsection.
(2) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 949 through 980 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding during the 2005-2007 biennium. This increase
in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition revenues
that will be generated and retained by the university as a result of
the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of this act.
Given these increases in core funding, Central Washington University
shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward achieving
the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that receive national accreditation;
and
(e) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before ((October)) November 1, 2006, the university shall
submit to the higher education coordinating board a report that
outlines the institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting
the provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating
board shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to
the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to ((November)) December 1, 2006.
(3) For the 2006-07 and 2007-08 academic years, the legislature
hereby increases the limit on total gross authorized operating fees
revenue waived, exempted, or reduced by Central Washington University
pursuant to RCW 28B.15.910 to eleven percent.
(4) $17,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for natural gas rate increases.

Sec. 606 2005 c 518 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,586,000))
$25,592,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,174,000))
$26,168,000
Education Legacy Trust--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,116,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,876,000))
$53,951,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $705,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $1,411,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy for 210 new
enrollments. By December 15th of each year of the 2005-07 fiscal
biennium, the college shall report to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees the number of new
student FTEs by campus enrolled with the funding provided in this
subsection.
(2) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 949 through 980 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding during the 2005-2007 biennium. This increase
in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition revenues
that will be generated and retained by the college as a result of the
tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of this act.
Given these increases in core funding, The Evergreen State College
shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward achieving
the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that receive national accreditation;
(e) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before ((October)) November 1, 2006, the university shall
submit to the higher education coordinating board a report that
outlines the institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting
the provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating
board shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to
the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to ((November)) December 1, 2006.
(3) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to conduct an analysis of the availability, services,
and effectiveness of programs in community and technical colleges that
serve the educational needs of recent immigrant students who are not
proficient in English and who are or have been enrolled in high school
but have not met graduation requirements. The analysis shall include,
but not be limited to, the type of programs provided, the geographic
availability of programs, the identification of best practices, how the
programs are funded, and the effectiveness of the programs. The
analysis shall also include recommendations for improving the programs
to better meet the needs of recent immigrant students and for expanding
the availability of programs statewide. A report shall be submitted to
the fiscal and education committees of the legislature, the
superintendent of public instruction, and the state board for community
and technical colleges by December 1, 2006.
(4) $170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $140,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for sections 217 and 605 of Senate
Bill No. 5763 (mental disorders treatment). If neither section 217 nor
section 605 is enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 607 2005 c 518 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,896,000))
$58,889,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,514,000))
$60,464,000
Education Legacy Trust--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,475,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $161,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($122,885,000))
$122,989,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,158,000 of the education legacy trust appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $2,317,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided as the state subsidy
for 340 new enrollments. By December 15th of each year of the 2005-07
fiscal biennium, the university shall report to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees the number of new
student FTEs by campus enrolled with the funding provided in this
subsection.
(2) The appropriations for higher education employee compensation
increases provided or referenced in this section and described in
sections 949 through 980 of this act are estimated to increase the
total per student funding during the 2005-2007 biennium. This increase
in total per student funding is in addition to the tuition revenues
that will be generated and retained by the university as a result of
the tuition increases that are authorized in section 601 of this act.
Given these increases in core funding, Western Washington University
shall, by June 30, 2007, show demonstrable progress toward achieving
the following six-year programmatic goals:
(a) Improve time to degree as measured by the percent of admitted
students who graduate within 125% of the credits required for a degree;
(b) Preserve access for low-income students as measured by the
percentage of total degrees awarded to Pell Grant recipients;
(c) Improve freshman retention rates;
(d) Improve and sustain the quality of its degree programs as
measured by the number of programs that receive national accreditation;
and
(e) Improve its ability to prepare students for the workforce as
measured by the job placement or graduate school acceptance rates among
graduates.
Specific six-year targets for the goals stated in this subsection
shall be established by the university, the office of financial
management, and the higher education coordinating board and shall be
determined based on the per student funding level assumed in this act.
On or before ((October)) November 1, 2006, the university shall
submit to the higher education coordinating board a report that
outlines the institution's progress and ongoing efforts toward meeting
the provisions of this section. The higher education coordinating
board shall compile and analyze all responses and provide a summary to
the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature prior to ((November)) December 1, 2006.
(3) Access to baccalaureate and graduate degree programs continues
to be limited for residents of North Snohomish, Island, and Skagit
counties. The higher education consortium created to serve the region
has not been able to successfully address the region's access needs.
The university center model of service delivery, centered on a
community college campus with a single point of accountability, has
proven more effective in developing degree programs and attracting
students.
Therefore, the management and leadership responsibility for
consortium operations are assigned to Everett community college.
Everett community college shall collaborate with community and business
leaders, other local community colleges, the public four-year
institutions of higher education, and the higher education coordinating
board to develop an educational plan for the North Snohomish, Island,
and Skagit county region based on the university center model.

Sec. 608 2005 c 518 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD -- POLICY COORDINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,665,000))
$2,721,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,684,000))
$2,749,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,289,000))
$4,291,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,638,000))
$9,775,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $300,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to develop
college readiness standards for English and science.

Sec. 609 2005 c 518 s 611 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($159,363,000))
$159,429,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($164,634,000))
$164,726,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,073,000))
$13,075,000
Education Legacy Trust--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,910,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($399,980,000))
$400,156,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $299,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $308,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the western interstate
commission for higher education.
(2) $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for higher education student child
care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(3) $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $25,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the benefit of students who
participate in college assistance migrant programs (CAMP) operating in
Washington state. To ensure timely state aid, the board may establish
a date after which no additional grants would be available for the
2005-06 and 2006-07 academic years. The board shall disperse grants in
equal amounts to eligible post-secondary institutions so that state
money in all cases supplements federal CAMP awards.
(4) $124,901,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006, $134,506,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007, $28,400,000 of the education legacy trust
appropriation for fiscal year 2006, and $31,654,000 of the education
legacy trust appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for
the state need grant program. After April 1st of each fiscal year, up
to one percent of the annual appropriation for the state need grant
program may be transferred to the state work study program.
(((5))) Of the amounts provided, $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and $250,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to
implement House Bill No. 1345 (part-time student financial aid). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse. The board may not expend more than the amount
provided in this subsection to implement the bill.
(((6))) (5) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the implementation of
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1050 (foster care endowed scholarship
program). The purpose of the program is to help students who are or
were in foster care attend an institution of higher education in the
state of Washington. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((7))) (6) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for the fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to support the future
teachers' conditional scholarship and loan repayment program.
(((8))) (7) $17,048,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006, $17,048,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007, $863,000 of the education legacy
trust appropriation for fiscal year 2006, and $1,993,000 of the
education legacy trust appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided
solely for the state work study program. After April 1st of each
fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual appropriation for the
state work study program may be transferred to the state need grant
program. In addition to the administrative allowance in subsection
(((11))) (13) of this section, four percent of the general fund -- state
amount and the education legacy trust amounts in this subsection may be
expended for state work study program administration.
(((9))) (8) $2,867,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $2,867,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for educational
opportunity grants pursuant to chapter 233, Laws of 2003 (ESB 5676).
The board may deposit sufficient funds from its appropriation into the
state education trust fund as established in RCW 28B.10.821 to provide
a one-year renewal of the grant for each new recipient of the
educational opportunity grant award.
(((10))) (9) $2,384,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2006 and $2,361,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement the
Washington scholars program. Any Washington scholars program moneys
not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the board
to the Washington award for vocational excellence. Amounts provided in
this subsection are sufficient for the higher education coordinating
board to select three Washington scholars in fiscal year 2006 and two
Washington scholars in fiscal year 2007 from each legislative district
under the provisions of RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150.
(((11))) (10) $794,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $847,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement Washington award
for vocational excellence program. Any Washington award for vocational
program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred
by the board to the Washington scholars program.
(((12))) (11) $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2006 and $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for community scholarship
matching grants of $2,000 each and up to a total of $46,000 per year in
grants for nonprofit community organizations with preference given to
organizations affiliated with scholarship America to administer the
scholarship matching grants. To be eligible for the matching grant, a
nonprofit community organization organized under section 501(c)(3) of
the internal revenue code must demonstrate that it has raised $2,000 in
new moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this
section. An organization may receive more than one $2,000 matching
grant and preference shall be given to organizations affiliated with
scholarship America.
(((13))) (12) Subject to state need grant service requirements
pursuant to chapter 28B.119 RCW, (($4,265,000)) $4,325,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2006 is provided
solely for the Washington promise scholarship program. The Washington
promise scholarship program is terminated following fiscal year 2006.
No Washington promise scholarship awards may be offered to students
beyond the graduating high school class of 2004.
(((14) $2,963,000)) (13) $2,914,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 and (($2,958,000)) $2,866,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2007 are provided
solely for financial aid administration, in addition to the four
percent cost allowance provision for state work study under subsection
(((5))) (7) of this section. These funds are provided to administer
all the financial aid and grant programs assigned to the board by the
legislature and administered by the agency. To the extent the
executive director finds the agency will not require the full sum
provided in this subsection, a portion may be transferred to supplement
financial grants-in-aid to eligible clients after notifying the board
and the office of financial management of the intended transfer.
(14) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2007 is provided solely for one-time costs associated with
stabilizing the GEAR-UP scholarship program.

Sec. 610 2005 c 518 s 612 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,225,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,231,000))
$1,236,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,890,000))
$53,897,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,346,000))
$56,365,000

Sec. 611 2005 c 518 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,446,000))
$1,483,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,476,000))
$1,514,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,922,000))
$3,005,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
The legislature finds that economic development, especially in
emerging technologies, is critical to Spokane and Eastern Washington.
The principal goal of the state's investment in the Spokane
intercollegiate research and technology institute (SIRTI) is to bridge
the gap between academic discovery and economic development, thereby
leveraging the state's investment in research. However, it is
essential to find appropriate ways to mark the success of these
efforts. By September 15, 2005, SIRTI shall develop a plan for review
by the house of representatives higher education committee and the
senate labor, commerce, research and development committee, describing
the agency's strategy and budget for commercial application of academic
research. The plan shall include actions to be taken to select,
develop, commercialize, and graduate clients. The plan shall also
detail how to measure significant impacts to the overall economic
climate of the Spokane region, including job creation and wages, that
are attributable to SIRTI.

Sec. 612 2005 c 518 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,322,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,349,000))
$2,356,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000))
$201,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,972,000))
$6,185,000

Sec. 613 2005 c 518 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,408,000))
$3,407,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,757,000))
$2,763,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,165,000))
$6,183,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5707
(women's history consortium). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $262,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely to coordinate and fund programs related to
the Lewis and Clark bicentennial commemoration.
(3) $155,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for reimbursement of costs incurred by the
Pacific county sheriff's office resulting from Lewis and Clark
bicentennial commemoration events.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 is provided solely for reimbursement of costs incurred by
local law enforcement resulting from Lewis and Clark bicentennial
commemoration events scheduled in the cities of Clarkston, Dayton,
Kennewick, Stevenson, Toppenish, and Vancouver.

Sec. 614 2005 c 518 s 616 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,636,000))
$1,633,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,630,000))
$1,631,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,266,000))
$3,272,000

Sec. 615 2005 c 518 s 617 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,133,000))
$5,134,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,251,000))
$5,237,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,335,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,719,000))
$11,744,000

Sec. 616 2005 c 518 s 618 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,419,000))
$8,416,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,613,000))
$8,637,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $232,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,264,000))
$17,335,000

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 701 2005 c 518 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT
LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($694,444,000))
$644,444,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($668,119,000))
$683,119,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,924,000))
$5,924,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($139,000))
$539,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,215,000))
$1,395,000
((Debt-limit General Fund Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,113,000))
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,583,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,374,537,000))
$1,338,004,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
deposit into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account. The
appropriation for fiscal year 2006 shall be deposited in the debt-limit
general fund bond retirement account by June 30, 2006.

Sec. 702 2005 c 518 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO
BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES
State Convention and Trade Center
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,411,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,111,000))
$5,112,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,111,000))
$5,112,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,633,000))
$39,635,000

Sec. 703 2005 c 518 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO
BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,588,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,743,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($131,844,000))
$130,909,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($183,175,000))
$182,240,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
deposit into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

Sec. 704 2005 c 518 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
State Building Construction Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,080,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,000))
$78,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,259,000))
$4,324,000

Sec. 705 2005 c 518 s 705 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$8,000,000

The sum of (($4,000,000)) $8,000,000 is appropriated from the
disaster response account for the purpose of making allocations to the
Washington state patrol for fire mobilizations costs or to the
department of natural resources for fire suppression costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--FIRE CONTINGENCY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
deposit into the disaster response account for the purposes specified
in section 705 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $137,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
deposit into the student achievement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EDUCATION LEGACY TRUST ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $411,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $411,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $822,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
deposit into the education legacy trust account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS. The following sums, or so much thereof as may be
necessary, are appropriated from the general fund, unless otherwise
indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations
for sundry claims. These appropriations are to be disbursed on
vouchers approved by the director of the office of financial
management, except as otherwise provided, as follows:
(1) Reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of
self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110: Kirk F. Schultz, claim number
SCJ 2006-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,312
(2) Payment from the state wildlife account for damage to crops by
wildlife pursuant to RCW 77.36.050: For deposit into the self-insurance liability account for reimbursement of payment made to Circle
S Landscape, claim number SCG 04-05 . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,926

Sec. 710 2005 c 518 s 713 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. The appropriations in this section are subject to
the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the
law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be
made on a monthly basis beginning July 1, 2005, consistent with chapter
41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial
retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with
chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.
(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system:
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,450,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,550,000

(a) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriations for fiscal
year 2006 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriations for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 1936 (emergency medical technicians). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2005, the amounts provided shall lapse.
(b) $950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2006 and $950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2007 are provided solely for the state contributions
required under Substitute Senate Bill No. 5615 (law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 disability
benefit). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amounts
provided shall lapse.

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,000,000))
$6,601,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,000,000))
$9,539,000

(3) There is appropriated for contributions to the judges
retirement system:
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($83,600,000))
$87,740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE GOVERNOR--EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS INTEROPERABILITY
Public Safety and Education Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funds are provided for acquisition and
deployment of interoperable telecommunications devices to local
jurisdictions. One program manager position is provided to assist
local and state public safety providers improve their interoperability
readiness and enhance levels of cooperation and coordination. The
governor shall allocate these funds as necessary with consultive
assistance from the state interoperability executive committee.

Sec. 712 2005 c 518 s 716 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE GOVERNOR--LIFE SCIENCES DISCOVERY FUND AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $992,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,142,000

The ((appropriation)) appropriations in this section ((is)) are
subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
((appropriation)) appropriations in this section ((is)) are provided
solely for a grant to the life sciences discovery fund authority to be
used in accordance with ((Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5581 (life sciences))) chapter 424, Laws of 2005 (life sciences
research). ((If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
appropriation in this section shall lapse.))

Sec. 713 2005 c 518 s 720 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
STRATEGIC PURCHASING STRATEGY. (1) The office of financial
management shall work with the appropriate state agencies to generate
savings of $50,000,000, of which $25,000,000 shall be from the state
general fund, that can arise from a strategic purchasing strategy.
((From appropriations in this act, the office of financial management
shall reduce)) General fund--state ((allotments by $8 million))
appropriations have been reduced by $4,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 and
by (($17 million)) $21,000,000 for fiscal year 2007 to reflect the
savings from the strategic purchasing strategy. ((The allotment
reductions shall be placed in unallotted status and remain unexpended))
These appropriation reductions are reflected in individual agency
appropriations in this act.
(2) The department of general administration, with the assistance
of the department of information services and the department of
printing and in consultation with the office of financial management,
shall conduct an analysis of the state's purchasing processes to
identify the most reasonable strategy of attaining a statewide savings
target of $50,000,000 without affecting direct program activities. The
analysis shall identify savings by agency and fund that will result
from the implementation of a strategic purchasing strategy. The
results of this analysis shall then be provided to the director of
financial management by October 1, 2005, so the director may use it as
the basis to achieve the savings identified in subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Before the purchase of goods and services, all state agencies
and higher education institutions shall first consider the utilization
of current or existing master contracts. All state agencies and higher
education institutions shall strive to use master contracts when that
use is consistent with the agency's requirements and purchase is
financially cost-effective.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CONTRIBUTIONS TO
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. Beginning July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, the
following add-on employer contribution rates are established. These
rates shall be collected in addition to already established employer
contribution rates:
(1) For all members of the public employees' retirement system, an
additional 0.87%;
(2) For all members for the teachers' retirement system, an
additional 1.29%;
(3) For all members of the school employees' retirement system, an
additional 0.87%; and
(4) For all members of the public safety employees' retirement
system, an additional 0.87%.
These rates are to be used as contributions to the unfunded
liabilities of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the
teachers' retirement system plan 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--PENSION PLAN 1 UNFUNDED
LIABILITIES
Pension Funding Stabilization
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $579,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,000
Judicial Information Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
Retirement Systems Expense Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $693,000

The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are sufficient to fund
an additional 0.87% contribution to the public employees' retirement
system and an additional 1.29% contribution to the teachers' retirement
system for legislative and judicial employees from July 1, 2006, until
June 30, 2007. The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriation schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section, as identified by agency in OFM document #2006-6R, dated
December 20, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--PENSION FUNDING STABILIZATION
ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $127,401,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,599,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $176,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
deposit into the pension funding stabilization account for the purpose
of reducing the unfunded public employees' retirement system and
teachers' retirement system pension liability. If the bill creating
this account is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the appropriation in this
section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--WASHINGTON BIOENERGY LOAN
ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
deposit into the Washington bioenergy loan account. If the bill
creating this account is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the
appropriation in this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--DISABILITY SURVIVOR'S BENEFIT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
allocation to the department of retirement systems for the Washington
state patrol retirement system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CENTRAL SERVICE AGENCY CHARGES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $118,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
central service agency charge adjustments for legislative and judicial
agencies. The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriation schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section as identified by agency in OFM document #2006-90, dated
December 20, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--HEALTH SERVICES ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,913,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2007) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,087,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
deposit into the health services account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--ECONOMIC STABILITY ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2006) . . . . . . . . . . . . $464,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
deposit into the economic stability account. If the bill creating this
account is not enacted by June 30, 2006, the appropriation in this
section shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 801 2005 c 518 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,577,000))
$6,561,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,422,000))
$44,292,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,457,000))
$3,568,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety and
education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,430,000))
$4,252,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly
funded autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,969,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation
for harbor improvement revenue
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $147,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for
distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($71,110,000))
$83,325,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,914,000))
$53,650,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,104,000))
$21,315,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for
liquor excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,413,000))
$40,512,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for
liquor profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($76,186,000))
$88,818,000
City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for
local government financial assistance distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($350,527,000))
$368,547,000
The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 802 2005 c 518 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE
ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,913,400))
$2,050,000
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2005-07 biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 803 2005 c 518 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE
ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,275,600))
$1,367,000
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2005-07 biennium to all
cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially
decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and
that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in
which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not
limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998
(deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license
suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations);
chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215,
Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 804 2005 c 518 s 804 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing
fees distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,632,000))
$1,644,000
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood
control funds distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,000
Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal
forest reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,200,000))
$86,212,000
The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 805 2005 c 518 s 805 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS. For transfers in this section
to the state general fund, pursuant to RCW 43.135.035(5), the state
expenditure limit shall be increased by the amount of the transfer.
The increase shall occur in the fiscal year in which the transfer
occurs.

State Convention and Trade Center Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$5,150,000 for fiscal year 2006 and $5,150,000
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000
General Fund: For transfer to the tourism
development and promotion account, $150,000
for fiscal year 2006 ((and $150,000 for fiscal
year 2007)) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($300,000))
$150,000
Financial Services Regulation Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $778,000 for
fiscal year 2006 and $779,000 for fiscal
year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,557,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For
transfer to the drinking water
assistance account, $8,400,000 for fiscal
year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,400,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer
to the health services account, in an
amount not to exceed the actual balance
of the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $185,823,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $45,000,000 for fiscal
year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
tobacco prevention and control account . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,366,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
water quality account . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,885,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the
violence reduction and drug enforcement
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,932,000
Public Employees' and Retirees' Insurance Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$40,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 and
$45,000,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,000,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$2,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Secretary of State's Revolving Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $250,000
for fiscal year 2006 and $250,000 for
fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $5,500,000 for fiscal
year 2006 and $5,000,000 for fiscal year
2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,500,000
General Fund: For transfer to the water quality
account, $318,000 for fiscal year 2006 and
$319,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $637,000
State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the
water quality account . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,500,000
Water Quality Account: For transfer to the
water pollution control revolving account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,534,000))
$16,534,000
Pollution Liability Insurance Trust Account: For
transfer to the state general fund . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,500,000))
$3,750,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance repayment
account, an amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,000,000))
$21,800,000
Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control
Account: For transfer to the state general
fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2006 and
$1,000,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to
the public facility construction loan revolving
account, $4,500,000 for fiscal year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to
the disaster response account, $3,000,000 for
fiscal year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Natural Resources Equipment Revolving Fund: For
transfer to the state general fund for fiscal
year 2006 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
General Fund: For transfer to the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account,
$1,500,000 for fiscal year 2006 and $1,500,000
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Education Legacy Trust Account: For transfer
to the student achievement account,
$35,541,000 for fiscal year 2006 and
$102,697,000 for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,238,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving
Account: For transfer to the data
processing revolving account . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Water Quality Account: For transfer to
the data processing revolving account . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
State Toxics Control Account: For transfer
to the data processing revolving account . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer
to the data processing revolving account . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Washington Housing Trust Account: For transfer
to the data processing revolving account . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer
to the data processing revolving account . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Sec. 806 2005 c 518 s 806 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS. For transfers in this section
to the state general fund, pursuant to RCW 43.135.035(5), the state
expenditure limit shall be increased by the amount of the transfer.
The increase shall occur in the fiscal year in which the transfer
occurs. The transfers are subject to the enactment of Senate Bill No.
5391 (tricare supplemental insurance), chapter 46, Laws of 2005.

Public Employees' and Retirees' Insurance Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$5,000,000 ((for fiscal year 2006 and $12,000,000))
for fiscal year 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,000,000))
$5,000,000
General Fund--State Account: For transfer
to the tourism development and promotion
account, $150,000 for fiscal year 2006 ((and
$150,000 for fiscal year 2007)) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($300,000))
$150,000

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 901 2005 c 518 s 948 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS. The appropriations for state
agencies, including institutions of higher education are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $663.00 per eligible employee
for fiscal year 2006. For fiscal year 2007 the monthly employer
funding rate shall not exceed $744.00 per eligible employee represented
by a collective bargaining unit under the personnel system reform act
of 2002, or $618.00 per eligible nonrepresented employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2006, through December 31, 2006, the
subsidy shall be $131.87. Starting January 1, 2007, the subsidy shall
be $149.67 per month.
(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $48.42 per month beginning
September 1, 2005, and (($55.73)) $55.15 beginning September 1, 2006;
(b) For each part-time employee who, at the time of the remittance,
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $48.42 each month beginning September 1, 2005, and
(($55.73)) $55.15 beginning September 1, 2006, prorated by the
proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time
employee that the part-time employee receives. The remittance
requirements specified in this subsection shall not apply to employees
of a technical college, school district, or educational service
district who purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the
health care authority.

Sec. 902 2005 c 518 s 963 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--((WPEA)) PSE/PROFESSIONAL LOCAL
365 UNIT C--WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY. Budget amounts reflect the
collective bargaining agreement reached between the Western Washington
University and the public school employees of Washington ((Public
Employees Association)) bargaining unit C under the personnel system
reform act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement,
provisions include a 3.2% salary increase effective retroactive to July
1, 2005. Provisions also include a 1.6% increase effective July 1,
2006, until June 30, 2007, and for implementation of the department of
personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than 25% below market
rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 A new section is added to 2005 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY, WFSE
BU 2. Budget amounts reflect the collective bargaining agreement
reached between Washington State University and the Washington
federation of state employees bargaining unit 2 -- service employees
under the personnel system reform act of 2002. For employees covered
under this agreement, provisions include a 3.2% salary increase
effective retroactive to July 1, 2005. Provisions also include a one-time 2% lump sum payment effective July 1, 2006, and implementation of
the department of personnel 2002 salary survey for classes more than
25% below market rate.

Sec. 904 RCW 43.135.025 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The state shall not expend from the general fund during any
fiscal year state moneys in excess of the state expenditure limit
established under this chapter.
(2) Except pursuant to a declaration of emergency under RCW
43.135.035 or pursuant to an appropriation under RCW 43.135.045(4)(b),
the state treasurer shall not issue or redeem any check, warrant, or
voucher that will result in a state general fund expenditure for any
fiscal year in excess of the state expenditure limit established under
this chapter. A violation of this subsection constitutes a violation
of RCW 43.88.290 and shall subject the state treasurer to the penalties
provided in RCW 43.88.300.
(3) The state expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the
previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit increased by a
percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth factor.
(4) For purposes of computing the state expenditure limit for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, 1995, the phrase "the previous fiscal
year's state expenditure limit" means the total state expenditures from
the state general fund, not including federal funds, for the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 1989, plus the fiscal growth factor. This
calculation is then computed for the state expenditure limit for fiscal
years 1992, 1993, 1994, and 1995, and as required under RCW
43.135.035(4).
(5) A state expenditure limit committee is established for the
purpose of determining and adjusting the state expenditure limit as
provided in this chapter. The members of the state expenditure limit
committee are the director of financial management, the attorney
general or the attorney general's designee, and the chairs of the
senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives
committee on appropriations. All actions of the state expenditure
limit committee taken pursuant to this chapter require an affirmative
vote of at least three members.
(6) Each November, the state expenditure limit committee shall
adjust the expenditure limit for the preceding fiscal year based on
actual expenditures and known changes in the fiscal growth factor and
then project an expenditure limit for the next two fiscal years. For
the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, this calculation shall include the state
general fund appropriation to the economic stability account and the
state general fund appropriation to the pension funding stabilization
account for fiscal year 2006. If, by November 30th, the state
expenditure limit committee has not adopted the expenditure limit
adjustment and projected expenditure limit as provided in subsection
(5) of this section, the attorney general or his or her designee shall
adjust or project the expenditure limit, as necessary.
(7) "Fiscal growth factor" means the average of the sum of
inflation and population change for each of the prior three fiscal
years.
(8) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for the United States for each fiscal year as published by the
federal bureau of labor statistics.
(9) "Population change" means the percentage change in state
population for each fiscal year as reported by the office of financial
management.

Sec. 905 RCW 43.135.035 and 2005 c 72 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax
shifts may be taken only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each
house, and then only if state expenditures in any fiscal year,
including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure limits
established under this chapter. However, for legislation enacted
between the effective date of this 2005 act and June 30, 2007, any
action or combination of actions by the legislature that raises state
revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax shifts may be taken with the
approval of a majority of members elected to each house, so long as
state expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will
not exceed the state expenditure limits established under this chapter.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until
approved by a vote of the people at a November general election. The
state expenditure limit committee shall adjust the state expenditure
limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the voters under
this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of revenue
generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be
adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
inflation and population increases?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the nature of the
emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require immediate
government action to alleviate human suffering and provide humanitarian
assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no more
than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund on or after January 1, 1993, to another source
of funding, or if moneys are transferred from the state general fund to
another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee, acting
pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure limit
to reflect the shift. For purposes of this section, expenditures from
the pension funding stabilization account shall not be considered a
state program cost shift from the state general fund to another
account. For the purposes of this section, a transfer of money from
the state general fund to another fund or account includes any state
legislative action taken that has the effect of reducing revenues from
a particular source, where such revenues would otherwise be deposited
into the state general fund, while increasing the revenues from that
particular source to another state or local government account. This
subsection does not apply to the dedication or use of lottery revenues
under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW 84.52.068, in
support of education or education expenditures. For the 2005-2007
fiscal biennium, this section does not apply to the state general fund
appropriation to the economic stability account and the state general
fund appropriation to the pension funding stabilization account for
fiscal year 2006. The unexpended portion of the 2005-2007 fiscal
biennium appropriations to these accounts are not to be included in the
calculation of expenditures from the state general fund for the purpose
of determining whether expenditures exceed the expenditure limit.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted to the
state general fund on or after January 1, 2000, from another source of
funding, or if moneys are transferred to the state general fund from
another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee, acting
pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall increase the state expenditure
limit to reflect the shift.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 Sections 904 and 905 of this act expire
July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

SUNDRY CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 197
ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 79
BOARD OF TAX APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 181
CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT
PSE/PROF LOCAL 365 UNIT C--WESTERN WA UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 212
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY, WFSE BU 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . 212
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 98
COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
COMMISSION ON ASIAN-PACIFIC-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 211
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 105
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 79
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 116
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 91
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING . . . . . . . . . . . . 167
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 98
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 106
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 85
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 80
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 119
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 111
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 197
OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 95
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 66
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 64
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 43
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 75
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 73
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 83
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 192
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 179
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 96
ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 105
FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
GOVERNOR
EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS INTEROPERABILITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 198
LIFE SCIENCES DISCOVERY FUND AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 199
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
GROWTH PLANNING HEARINGS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 187
POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 186
HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 85
HORSE RACING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 79
INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 83
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
CENTAL SERVICE AGENCY CHARGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 202
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 200
DISABILITY SURVIVOR'S BENEFIT . . . . . . . . . . . . 202
ECONOMIC STABILITY ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 203
EDUCATION LEGACY TRUST ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 196
FIRE CONTINGENCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 196
FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL . . . . . . . . . . . . 196
HEALTH SERVICES ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 202
PENSION FUNDING STABILIZATION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 201
PENSION PLAN 1 UNFUNDED LIABILITIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 200
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 196
WASHINGTON BIOENERGY LOAN ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 201
OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
PERSONNEL APPEALS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 95
SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 190
STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 75
STATE INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 102
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 121
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 193
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 193
STATE TREASURER . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 194, 195
COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 205
FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 206
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 205
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 204
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 206, 209
STRATEGIC PURCHASING STRATEGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 199
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 137
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 154
EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 151
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 130
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 162
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 151
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
PROMOTING ACADEMIC SUCCESS . . . . . . . . . . . . 164
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 143
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 141
SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 146
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 166
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 161
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 182
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 118
WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 191
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 192
WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 184
WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 190
--- END ---