BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits in this section, an eligible person is
authorized a credit against the tax due under this chapter for the
acquisition of health information technologies certified as eligible
for credit by the health care authority as provided in RCW 41.05.021.
(2) The credit allowed under this section:
(a) Is limited to fifty percent of the amount expended to acquire
computer hardware, software, labor, or services necessary for the
development, enhancement, or installation of certified health
information technologies.
(b) Is subject to a lifetime maximum of ten thousand dollars for
each eligible person.
(c) Must be claimed in the calendar year in which the expenditure
occurs by the due date of the last tax return for the calendar year in
which the expenditure occurs and may not exceed the amount of tax
imposed under this chapter.
(d) In no case may a credit earned during one calendar year be
carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent
calendar year. No refunds may be granted for credits under this
section.
(3) The credit allowed under this section shall not be claimed for
expenditures that occur before:
(a) The health care authority has certified the health information
technologies as eligible for the tax credit as provided in RCW
41.05.021; and
(b) The effective date of this section.
(4) No application is necessary for the tax credit. An eligible
person claiming this credit must keep records necessary for the
department to verify eligibility under this section. This includes,
but is not limited to, documentation substantiating that the health
information technologies acquired by the person are certified by the
health care authority as provided in RCW 41.05.021.
(5) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been used shall be immediately due. The department
shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited taxes for
which the person is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was taken,
and shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are
repaid.
(6) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Eligible person" means:
(i) A physician licensed under chapter 18.22, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW,
who is registered as a sole proprietor;
(ii) Any entity consisting of at least two but not more than five
physicians licensed under chapter 18.22, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW, including
physicians who are employees, officers, or owners of such entity;
(iii) An advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW who is a sole proprietor;
(iv) Any entity consisting of at least two but not more than five
advanced registered nurse practitioners licensed under chapter 18.79
RCW, including advanced registered nurse practitioners who are
employees, officers, or owners of such entity; or
(v) Any entity consisting of a combination of physicians licensed
under chapter 18.22, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW and advanced registered nurse
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW not to exceed five,
including physicians and advanced registered nurse practitioners who
are employees, officers, or owners of such entity.
(b) "Health information technologies" has the meaning provided in
RCW 41.05.021.
(7) This section expires December 31, 2012.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.021 and 2005 c 446 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state health care authority is created within
the executive branch. The authority shall have an administrator
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The
administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The
administrator may employ up to seven staff members, who shall be exempt
from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are
necessary to administer this chapter. The administrator may delegate
any power or duty vested in him or her by this chapter, including
authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings
conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The primary duties of the authority
shall be to: Administer state employees' insurance benefits and
retired or disabled school employees' insurance benefits; administer
the basic health plan pursuant to chapter 70.47 RCW; study state-purchased health care programs in order to maximize cost containment in
these programs while ensuring access to quality health care; and
implement state initiatives, joint purchasing strategies, and
techniques for efficient administration that have potential application
to all state-purchased health services. The authority's duties
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To administer health care benefit programs for employees and
retired or disabled school employees as specifically authorized in RCW
41.05.065 and in accordance with the methods described in RCW
41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of this chapter;
(b) To analyze state-purchased health care programs and to explore
options for cost containment and delivery alternatives for those
programs that are consistent with the purposes of those programs,
including, but not limited to:
(i) Creation of economic incentives for the persons for whom the
state purchases health care to appropriately utilize and purchase
health care services, including the development of flexible benefit
plans to offset increases in individual financial responsibility;
(ii) Utilization of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems,
utilization review, and prospective payment methods, and that ensure
access to quality care, including assuring reasonable access to local
providers, especially for employees residing in rural areas;
(iii) Coordination of state agency efforts to purchase drugs
effectively as provided in RCW 70.14.050;
(iv) Development of recommendations and methods for purchasing
medical equipment and supporting services on a volume discount basis;
(v) Development of data systems to obtain utilization data from
state-purchased health care programs in order to identify cost centers,
utilization patterns, provider and hospital practice patterns, and
procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained pursuant to RCW
41.05.031; and
(vi) In collaboration with other state agencies that administer
state purchased health care programs, private health care purchasers,
health care facilities, providers, and carriers, use evidence-based
medicine principles to develop common performance measures and
implement financial incentives in contracts with insuring entities,
health care facilities, and providers that:
(A) Reward improvements in health outcomes for individuals with
chronic diseases, increased utilization of appropriate preventive
health services, and reductions in medical errors; and
(B) Increase, through appropriate incentives to insuring entities,
health care facilities, and providers, the adoption and use of
information technology that contributes to improved health outcomes,
better coordination of care, and decreased medical errors;
(c) To analyze areas of public and private health care interaction;
(d) To provide information and technical and administrative
assistance to the board;
(e) To review and approve or deny applications from counties,
municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state to
provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to their
employees in accordance with the provisions of RCW 41.04.205, setting
the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined in RCW
41.05.050;
(f) To establish billing procedures and collect funds from school
districts and educational service districts under RCW 28A.400.400 in a
way that minimizes the administrative burden on districts;
(g) To publish and distribute to nonparticipating school districts
and educational service districts by October 1st of each year a
description of health care benefit plans available through the
authority and the estimated cost if school districts and educational
service district employees were enrolled; ((and))
(h) To promulgate and adopt rules consistent with this chapter as
described in RCW 41.05.160; and
(i)(i) Certifying that certain health information technologies
acquired by persons seeking the tax credit authorized in section 1 of
this act are consistent with recognized state and national standards
related to:
(A) Interoperability;
(B) Security;
(C) The protection of confidentiality; and
(D) Other subjects determined appropriate by the health care
authority; and
(ii) Making a determination that standards related to
interoperability, security, and the protection of confidentiality are
sufficiently established at the state and national level to ensure that
the credits authorized in section 1 of this act will encourage the
adoption of health information technologies that are compatible with
the development of a statewide system of interoperable health
information technologies. The health care authority shall develop a
list of health information technologies certified as eligible for the
tax credit provided in section 1 of this act and provide the list to
the department of revenue ninety days before the list becomes available
to the public.
As used in this subsection, "health information technologies" means
a computerized system that provides access to patients' medical records
in an electronic format in a manner consistent with the regulations
adopted under section 264(c) of the health insurance portability and
accountability act (42 U.S.C. 1320d-2 note) and chapter 70.02 RCW, and
includes e-mail communication, clinical alerts and reminders, and other
information technologies as prescribed by the administrator.
(2) ((On and after January 1, 1996,)) The public employees'
benefits board may implement strategies to promote managed competition
among employee health benefit plans. Strategies may include but are
not limited to:
(a) Standardizing the benefit package;
(b) Soliciting competitive bids for the benefit package;
(c) Limiting the state's contribution to a percent of the lowest
priced qualified plan within a geographical area;
(d) Monitoring the impact of the approach under this subsection
with regards to: Efficiencies in health service delivery, cost shifts
to subscribers, access to and choice of managed care plans statewide,
and quality of health services. The health care authority shall also
advise on the value of administering a benchmark employer-managed plan
to promote competition among managed care plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act takes effect January
1, 2007.

--- END ---