BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.21.045 and 2004 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an insurer
offering any health benefit plan to a small employer may offer small
group health benefit plans that qualify as insurance coverage combined
with a health savings account as defined by the United States internal
revenue service.
(2)(a) An insurer offering any health benefit plan to a small
employer, either directly or through an association or member-governed
group formed specifically for the purpose of purchasing health care,
may offer and actively market to the small employer a health benefit
plan featuring a limited schedule of covered health care services.
Nothing in this subsection shall preclude an insurer from offering, or
a small employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may
have more comprehensive benefits than those included in the product
offered under this subsection. An insurer offering a health benefit
plan under this subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits
to the small employer in a brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.21.130, 48.21.140, 48.21.141, 48.21.142,
48.21.144, 48.21.146, 48.21.160 through 48.21.197, 48.21.200,
48.21.220, 48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235, 48.21.240, 48.21.244,
48.21.250, 48.21.300, 48.21.310, or 48.21.320.
(((2))) (3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from
offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health benefit plans with
benefits in excess of the health benefit plan offered under subsection
(((1))) (2) of this section. All forms, policies, and contracts shall
be submitted for approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any
plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in relation to the
benefits thereto.
(((3))) (4) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small
employers as defined in this section shall be subject to the following
provisions:
(a) The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (((3))) (4).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs ((due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network)) for a plan. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(i) Except for small group health benefit plans that qualify as
insurance coverage combined with a health savings account as defined by
the United States internal revenue service, adjusted community rates
established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
small groups purchasing coverage. However, annual rate adjustments for
each small group health benefit plan may vary by up to plus or minus
four percentage points from the overall adjustment of a carrier's
entire small group pool, such overall adjustment to be approved by the
commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified by a member of
the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The variation is a result
of deductible leverage, benefit design, or provider network
characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period, the projected
weighted average of all small group benefit plans will have a revenue
neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool. Variations of
greater than four percentage points are subject to review by the
commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days of
submittal. A variation that is not denied within sixty days shall be
deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier a
detailed actuarial justification for any denial within thirty days of
the denial.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of
employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.
(((5))) (6)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements
used by an insurer in determining whether to provide coverage to a
small employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers
applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) An insurer shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) An insurer may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(((6))) (7) An insurer must offer coverage to all eligible
employees of a small employer and their dependents. An insurer may not
offer coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small
employer group or to only part of the group. An insurer may not modify
a health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee
or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.
(((7))) (8) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," "small
employer," "adjusted community rate," and "wellness activities" mean
the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.44.023 and 2004 c 244 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an insurer
offering any health benefit plan to a small employer may offer small
group health benefit plans that qualify as insurance coverage combined
with a health savings account as defined by the United States internal
revenue service.
(2)(a) A health care services contractor offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer a health benefit plan featuring a limited schedule of
covered health care services. Nothing in this subsection shall
preclude a contractor from offering, or a small employer from
purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more comprehensive
benefits than those included in the product offered under this
subsection. A contractor offering a health benefit plan under this
subsection shall clearly disclose all covered benefits to the small
employer in a brochure filed with the commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240, 48.44.245, 48.44.290,
48.44.300, 48.44.310, 48.44.320, 48.44.325, 48.44.330, 48.44.335,
48.44.340, 48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440, 48.44.450, and
48.44.460.
(((2))) (3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care
service contractor from offering, or a purchaser from seeking, health
benefit plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan
offered under subsection (((1))) (2) of this section. All forms,
policies, and contracts shall be submitted for approval to the
commissioner, and the rates of any plan offered under this section
shall be reasonable in relation to the benefits thereto.
(((3))) (4) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small
employers as defined in this section shall be subject to the following
provisions:
(a) The contractor shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The contractor shall be permitted to develop separate rates for
individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is
the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary
payer. Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this
subsection (((3))) (4).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs ((due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network)) for a plan. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(i) Except for small group health benefit plans that qualify as
insurance coverage combined with a health savings account as defined by
the United States internal revenue service, adjusted community rates
established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
groups purchasing coverage. However, annual rate adjustments for each
small group health benefit plan may vary by up to plus or minus four
percentage points from the overall adjustment of a carrier's entire
small group pool, such overall adjustment to be approved by the
commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified by a member of
the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The variation is a result
of deductible leverage, benefit design, or provider network
characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period, the projected
weighted average of all small group benefit plans will have a revenue
neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool. Variations of
greater than four percentage points are subject to review by the
commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days of
submittal. A variation that is not denied within sixty days shall be
deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier a
detailed actuarial justification for any denial within thirty days of
the denial.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of
employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.
(((5))) (6)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements
used by a contractor in determining whether to provide coverage to a
small employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers
applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.
(b) A contractor shall not require a minimum participation level
greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A contractor may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.
(((6))) (7) A contractor must offer coverage to all eligible
employees of a small employer and their dependents. A contractor may
not offer coverage to only certain individuals or dependents in a small
employer group or to only part of the group. A contractor may not
modify a health plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible
employee or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to
restrict or exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical
conditions, or services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.46.066 and 2004 c 244 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an insurer
offering any health benefit plan to a small employer may offer small
group health benefit plans that qualify as insurance coverage combined
with a health savings account as defined by the United States internal
revenue service.
(2)(a) A health maintenance organization offering any health
benefit plan to a small employer, either directly or through an
association or member-governed group formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care, may offer and actively market to the
small employer a health benefit plan featuring a limited schedule of
covered health care services. Nothing in this subsection shall
preclude a health maintenance organization from offering, or a small
employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more
comprehensive benefits than those included in the product offered under
this subsection. A health maintenance organization offering a health
benefit plan under this subsection shall clearly disclose all the
covered benefits to the small employer in a brochure filed with the
commissioner.
(b) A health benefit plan offered under this subsection shall
provide coverage for hospital expenses and services rendered by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not subject
to the requirements of RCW 48.46.275, 48.46.280, 48.46.285, 48.46.290,
48.46.350, 48.46.355, 48.46.375, 48.46.440, 48.46.480, 48.46.510,
48.46.520, and 48.46.530.
(((2))) (3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health
maintenance organization from offering, or a purchaser from seeking,
health benefit plans with benefits in excess of the health benefit plan
offered under subsection (((1))) (2) of this section. All forms,
policies, and contracts shall be submitted for approval to the
commissioner, and the rates of any plan offered under this section
shall be reasonable in relation to the benefits thereto.
(((3))) (4) Premium rates for health benefit plans for small
employers as defined in this section shall be subject to the following
provisions:
(a) The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates
based on an adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted
community rate for:
(i) Geographic area;
(ii) Family size;
(iii) Age; and
(iv) Wellness activities.
(b) The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not
use age brackets smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin
with age twenty and end with age sixty-five. Employees under the age
of twenty shall be treated as those age twenty.
(c) The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to
develop separate rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for
coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and coverage for which
medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be subject to the
requirements of this subsection (((3))) (4).
(d) The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than
four hundred twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups
on January 1, 1996, four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three
hundred seventy-five percent on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.
(e) A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to
reflect actuarially justified differences in utilization or cost
attributed to such programs.
(f) The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this
section may not be adjusted more frequently than annually except that
the premium may be changed to reflect:
(i) Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;
(ii) Changes to the family composition of the employee;
(iii) Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small
employer; or
(iv) Changes in government requirements affecting the health
benefit plan.
(g) Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that
differ only by the amounts attributable to plan design, with the
exception of discounts for health improvement programs.
(h) For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that
contains a restricted network provision shall not be considered similar
coverage to a health benefit plan that does not contain such a
provision, provided that the restrictions of benefits to network
providers result in substantial differences in claims costs. A carrier
may develop its rates based on claims costs ((due to network provider
reimbursement schedules or type of network)) for a plan. This
subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability of benefits as
provided in RCW 48.43.015.
(i) Except for small group health benefit plans that qualify as
insurance coverage combined with a health savings account as defined by
the United States internal revenue service, adjusted community rates
established under this section shall pool the medical experience of all
groups purchasing coverage. However, annual rate adjustments for each
small group health benefit plan may vary by up to plus or minus four
percentage points from the overall adjustment of a carrier's entire
small group pool, such overall adjustment to be approved by the
commissioner, upon a showing by the carrier, certified by a member of
the American academy of actuaries that: (i) The variation is a result
of deductible leverage, benefit design, or provider network
characteristics; and (ii) for a rate renewal period, the projected
weighted average of all small group benefit plans will have a revenue
neutral effect on the carrier's small group pool. Variations of
greater than four percentage points are subject to review by the
commissioner, and must be approved or denied within sixty days of
submittal. A variation that is not denied within sixty days shall be
deemed approved. The commissioner must provide to the carrier a
detailed actuarial justification for any denial within thirty days of
the denial.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this section shall restrict the right of
employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing benefits in
excess of those provided herein.
(((5))) (6)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements
used by a health maintenance organization in determining whether to
provide coverage to a small employer shall be applied uniformly among
all small employers applying for coverage or receiving coverage from
the carrier.
(b) A health maintenance organization shall not require a minimum
participation level greater than:
(i) One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups
with three or less employees; and
(ii) Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups
with more than three employees.
(c) In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to
a small employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or
dependents who have similar existing coverage in determining whether
the applicable percentage of participation is met.
(d) A health maintenance organization may not increase any
requirement for minimum employee participation or modify any
requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a small
employer at any time after the small employer has been accepted for
coverage.
(((6))) (7) A health maintenance organization must offer coverage
to all eligible employees of a small employer and their dependents. A
health maintenance organization may not offer coverage to only certain
individuals or dependents in a small employer group or to only part of
the group. A health maintenance organization may not modify a health
plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or
dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or
exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases, medical conditions,
or services otherwise covered by the plan.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.47.060 and 2004 c 192 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator has the following powers and duties:
(1) To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered
basic health care services, including physician services, inpatient and
outpatient hospital services, prescription drugs and medications, and
other services that may be necessary for basic health care. In
addition, the administrator may, to the extent that funds are
available, offer as basic health plan services chemical dependency
services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services
shall increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by
more than five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office
of financial management. All subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in
any participating managed health care system under the Washington basic
health plan shall be entitled to receive covered basic health care
services in return for premium payments to the plan. The schedule of
services shall emphasize proven preventive and primary health care and
shall include all services necessary for prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care. However, with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees
who are eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal services through the
medical assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator
shall not contract for such services except to the extent that such
services are necessary over not more than a one-month period in order
to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the
managed care provider. The schedule of services shall also include a
separate schedule of basic health care services for children, eighteen
years of age and younger, for those subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees who choose to secure basic coverage through the plan only for
their dependent children. In designing and revising the schedule of
services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines for assessing
health services under the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW 48.47.030,
and such other factors as the administrator deems appropriate.
(2)(a) To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due
the administrator from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross
family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and the
ages of all family members. The enrollment of children shall not
require the enrollment of their parent or parents who are eligible for
the plan. The structure of periodic premiums shall be applied to
subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals pursuant to
subsection (11) of this section and to the share of the cost of the
plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees
pursuant to subsection (12) of this section.
(b) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees
shall be in an amount equal to the cost charged by the managed health
care system provider to the state for the plan plus the administrative
cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under
RCW 48.14.0201.
(c) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. Premiums due from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees must be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to
the state for the plan, plus the administrative cost of providing the
plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201. The
administrator will consider the impact of eligibility determination by
the appropriate federal agency designated by the Trade Act of 2002
(P.L. 107-210) as well as the premium collection and remittance
activities by the United States internal revenue service when
determining the administrative cost charged for health coverage tax
credit eligible enrollees.
(d) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior
approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other
amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by
arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the
administrator. The administrator shall establish a mechanism for
receiving premium payments from the United States internal revenue
service for health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees.
(e) To develop, as an offering by every health carrier providing
coverage identical to the basic health plan, as configured on January
1, 2001, a basic health plan model plan with uniformity in enrollee
cost-sharing requirements.
(3) To evaluate, with the cooperation of participating managed
health care system providers, the impact on the basic health plan of
enrolling health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The
administrator shall issue to the appropriate committees of the
legislature preliminary evaluations on June 1, 2005, and January 1,
2006, and a final evaluation by June 1, 2006. The evaluation shall
address the number of persons enrolled, the duration of their
enrollment, their utilization of covered services relative to other
basic health plan enrollees, and the extent to which their enrollment
contributed to any change in the cost of the basic health plan.
(4) To end the participation of health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees in the basic health plan if the federal government reduces or
terminates premium payments on their behalf through the United States
internal revenue service.
(5) To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing
due a managed health care system from subsidized, nonsubsidized, and
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The structure shall
discourage inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care services,
and may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing
mechanisms, but shall not be so costly to enrollees as to constitute a
barrier to appropriate utilization of necessary health care services.
(6) To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as
to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes.
Whenever the administrator finds that there is danger of such an
overexpenditure, the administrator shall close enrollment until the
administrator finds the danger no longer exists. Such a closure does
not apply to health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees who receive
a premium subsidy from the United States internal revenue service as
long as the enrollees qualify for the health coverage tax credit
program.
(7) To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as
defined in RCW 70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who
qualify may be based on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the
administrator.
(8) To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery
of services and availability of the plan to residents of the state,
subject to the limitations contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act
appropriating funds for the plan.
(9) To solicit and accept applications from managed health care
systems, as defined in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic
health care providers under the plan for subsidized enrollees,
nonsubsidized enrollees, or health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees. The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered
basic health care services are available to any enrollee of the plan
from among a selection of two or more participating managed health care
systems. In adopting any rules or procedures applicable to managed
health care systems and in its dealings with such systems, the
administrator shall consider and make suitable allowance for the need
for health care services and the differences in local availability of
health care resources, along with other resources, within and among the
several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed
health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who
become eligible for medical assistance may, at their option, continue
to receive services from their existing providers within the managed
health care system if such providers have entered into provider
agreements with the department of social and health services.
(10) To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized,
nonsubsidized, and health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees,
deposit them in the basic health plan operating account, keep records
of enrollee status, and authorize periodic payments to managed health
care systems on the basis of the number of enrollees participating in
the respective managed health care systems.
(11) To accept applications from individuals residing in areas
served by the plan, on behalf of themselves and their spouses and
dependent children, for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan
as subsidized, nonsubsidized, or health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees, to establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for
enrollees as may be necessary, and to determine, upon application and
on a reasonable schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of
any enrollee, eligibility due to current gross family income for
sliding scale premiums. Funds received by a family as part of
participation in the adoption support program authorized under RCW
26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall not be counted toward
a family's current gross family income for the purposes of this
chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income or income changes
accurately, the administrator shall have the authority either to bill
the enrollee for the amounts overpaid by the state or to impose civil
penalties of up to two hundred percent of the amount of subsidy
overpaid due to the enrollee incorrectly reporting income. The
administrator shall adopt rules to define the appropriate application
of these sanctions and the processes to implement the sanctions
provided in this subsection, within available resources. No subsidy
may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current gross family
income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW
70.47.110, who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care
services under chapter 74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their
enrollment for no apparent good cause, the administrator may establish
appropriate rules or requirements that are applicable to such
individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in the plan.
(12) To accept applications from business owners on behalf of
themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent children, as
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in an area served by
the plan. The administrator may require all or the substantial
majority of the eligible employees of such businesses to enroll in the
plan and establish those procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly
enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed health care system.
The administrator may require that a business owner pay at least an
amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its portion
of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for
medicare who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic
health care coverage and services from a managed care system
participating in the plan. The administrator shall adjust the amount
determined to be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees whenever
the amount negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed health care system or systems is modified or the administrative
cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.
(13) To design and implement a program to provide a subsidy for
low-income employees of a business of between two and fifty employees
who are eligible for coverage under the basic health plan and
participate in an employer sponsored high deductible health plan. The
subsidy may only be deposited into a health savings account that
conforms to section 223, Part VII of subchapter B of chapter 1 of the
internal revenue code of 1986. The subsidy must be in an amount
appropriated for this specific purpose in the omnibus operating
appropriation bill or bills.
(14) To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed
health care system in return for the provision of covered basic health
care services to enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of
covered basic health care services will be the same or actuarially
equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates negotiated with
participating managed health care systems may vary among the systems.
In negotiating rates with participating systems, the administrator
shall consider the characteristics of the populations served by the
respective systems, economic circumstances of the local area, the need
to conserve the resources of the basic health plan trust account, and
other factors the administrator finds relevant.
(((14))) (15) To monitor the provision of covered services to
enrollees by participating managed health care systems in order to
assure enrollee access to good quality basic health care, to require
periodic data reports concerning the utilization of health care
services rendered to enrollees in order to provide adequate information
for evaluation, and to inspect the books and records of participating
managed health care systems to assure compliance with the purposes of
this chapter. In requiring reports from participating managed health
care systems, including data on services rendered enrollees, the
administrator shall endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed
health care systems and to the plan. The administrator shall
coordinate any such reporting requirements with other state agencies,
such as the insurance commissioner and the department of health, to
minimize duplication of effort.
(((15))) (16) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private
employer-based health care coverage and to take appropriate measures
consistent with state and federal statutes that will discourage the
reduction of such coverage in the state.
(((16))) (17) To develop a program of proven preventive health
measures and to integrate it into the plan wherever possible and
consistent with this chapter.
(((17))) (18) To provide, consistent with available funding,
assistance for rural residents, underserved populations, and persons of
color.
(((18))) (19) In consultation with appropriate state and local
government agencies, to establish criteria defining eligibility for
persons confined or residing in government-operated institutions.
(((19))) (20) To administer the premium discounts provided under
RCW 48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii) pursuant to a contract with the
Washington state health insurance pool.

--- END ---