BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a
significant disconnect in the state's medicaid program between
recipients and those delivering and paying for their care. Medicaid
recipients are not empowered to make decisions regarding their own
health care needs. Nor are there incentives for medicaid recipients to
be prudent purchasers of health care. The legislature further finds
that eight hundred fifty-four thousand individuals or fourteen percent
of the state population are enrolled in the state's medical assistance
program. State spending for health care within the state's medical
assistance program has grown by one hundred thirty-nine percent in the
past ten years, and has risen from 6.5 percent of state spending in
1994 to 13.4 percent in 2007. This rate of growth is unsustainable and
jeopardizes the state's ability to meet funding needs in such areas of
budget priority as K-12 education, higher education, public safety, and
employee compensation.
The legislature further finds that significant reforms must be made
to the medical assistance program to control the program's growth in
order to ensure its preservation as a vital safety net for the needy
and vulnerable in our state. Marketplace principles and marketplace
mechanisms must be introduced to the medical assistance program to
encourage recipients to be active participants in their health care.
Several states have recognized the need to make such reforms to their
medicaid programs and are working with the federal government to begin
the implementation of medicaid waivers that bring marketplace
principles, consumer choice, and personal responsibility to their
medicaid programs. Washington state should continue to be a leader in
health care policy and join other states in ensuring the sustainability
and improving the performance of its medicaid program by initiating
reforms incorporating marketplace principles, consumer choice, and
personal responsibility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of social and health services
shall submit a waiver request to the center for medicaid and medicare
services under section 1115 of the social security act to initiate a
waiver research and demonstration project. The waiver request shall
create a consumer-directed medicaid coverage plan that includes
personal health accounts and personal health incentives and provides
for consumer choice. The waiver request shall include the following
elements:
(1) Require eligible medicaid recipients to enroll in a state-approved health care plan;
(2) Provide each eligible medicaid recipient with a personal health
account to manage their health care spending, including payment of
premiums and other health care expenses including copays;
(3) Provide eligible medicaid recipients with the choice of several
health care plans to best meet their health care needs;
(4) Provide eligible medicaid recipients with the option of using
funds in their personal health accounts to enroll in employer-sponsored
health insurance plans;
(5) Encourage eligible medicaid recipients to take an active role
in their health care by providing incentives for healthy lifestyle
choices, including the ability to build a health care asset to pay for
future qualified health care expenses;
(6) Enable medicaid recipients who leave the medicaid program to
retain any money in their personal health accounts to pay for future
qualified health-related expenses; and
(7) Identify the segment of the medicaid population that would be
best served by and most benefit from a consumer-directed health care
option.

--- END ---