BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.94.175 and 1995 c 355 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 19.94.015, the following annual registration
fees shall be charged for each weighing or measuring instrument or
device used for commercial purposes in this state:

(a) Weighing devices:

(i) Small scales "zero to four
hundred pounds capacity" . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((5.00))
12.50

(ii) Intermediate scales "four
hundred one pounds to five
thousand pounds capacity" . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((20.00))
50.00

(iii) Large scales "over five
thousand pounds capacity" . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((52.00))
130.00

(iv) ((Large scales with
supplemental
devices . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 52.00

(v))) Railroad track scales . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((800.00))
2,000.00

(b) Liquid fuel metering devices:

(i) Motor fuel meters with flows of
((less than)) twenty gallons or
less per minute . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((5.00))
12.50

(ii) Motor fuel meters with flows of
more than twenty but not more
than one hundred fifty gallons
per minute . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((16.00))
40.00

(iii) Motor fuel meters with flows
over one hundred fifty gallons
per minute . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((25.00))
62.50

(c) Liquid petroleum gas meters:

(i) With one inch diameter or
smaller dispensers . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((10.00))
25.00

(ii) With greater than one inch
diameter dispensers . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((30.00))
75.00

(d) Fabric meters . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((5.00))
12.50

(e) Cordage meters . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((5.00))
12.50

(f) Mass flow meters . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((14.00))
35.00

(g) Taxi meters . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((5.00))
12.50

(2) With the exception of subsection (3) of this section, no person
shall be required to pay more than the ((established)) annual
registration fee ((adopted under this section)) for any weighing or
measuring instrument or device in any one year.
(3) The department or a city sealer may establish reasonable
inspection and testing fees for each type or class of weighing or
measuring instrument or device specially requested to be inspected or
tested by the device owner. These inspection and testing fees shall be
limited to those amounts necessary for the department or city sealer to
cover the direct costs associated with such inspection and testing.
The fees ((established under this subsection)) shall not be set so as
to compete with service agents normally engaged in such services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---