BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28C.04.410 and 1999 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 28C.04.390 and 28C.04.420.
(1) "Applicant" means an educational institution which has made
application for a job skills grant under RCW 28C.04.390 and 28C.04.420.
(2) "Business and industry" means a private corporation,
institution, firm, person, group, or association concerned with
commerce, trades, manufacturing, or the provision of services within
the state, or a public or nonprofit hospital licensed by the department
of social and health services.
(3) "College board" means the state board for community and
technical colleges under chapter 28B.50 RCW.
(4) "Dislocated worker" means an individual who meets the
definition of dislocated worker contained in P.L. 105-220, Sec. 101 on
July 25, 1999.
(((4))) (5) "Educational institution" means a public secondary or
postsecondary institution, an independent institution, or a private
career school or college within the state authorized by law to provide
a program of skills training or education beyond the secondary school
level. Any educational institution receiving a job skills grant under
RCW 28C.04.420 ((through 28C.04.480)) shall be free of sectarian
control or influence as set forth in Article IX, section 4 of the state
Constitution.
(((5))) (6) "Equipment" means tangible personal property which will
further the objectives of the supported program and for which a
definite value and evidence in support of the value have been provided
by the donor.
(((6))) (7) "Financial support" means any thing of value which is
contributed by business, industry, and others to an educational
institution which is reasonably calculated to support directly the
development and expansion of a particular program under RCW 28C.04.390
and 28C.04.420 and represents an addition to any financial support
previously or customarily provided to such educational institutions by
the donor. "Financial support" includes, but is not limited to, funds,
equipment, facilities, faculty, and scholarships for matriculating
students and trainees.
(((7))) (8) "Job skills grant" means funding that is provided to an
educational institution by the commission for the development or
significant expansion of a program under RCW 28C.04.390 and 28C.04.420.
(((8))) (9) "Job skills program" means a program of skills training
or education separate from and in addition to existing vocational
education programs and which:
(a) Provides short-term training which has been designated for
specific industries;
(b) Provides training for prospective employees before a new plant
opens or when existing industry expands;
(c) Includes training and retraining for workers already employed
by an existing industry or business where necessary to avoid
dislocation or where upgrading of existing employees would create new
vacancies for unemployed persons;
(d) Serves areas with high concentrations of economically
disadvantaged persons and high unemployment;
(e) Serves areas with new and growing industries;
(f) Serves areas where there is a shortage of skilled labor to meet
job demands; or
(g) Promotes the location of new industry in areas affected by
economic dislocation.
(((9))) (10) "Washington manufacturing competitiveness corporation"
means a private, nonprofit corporation, incorporated in accordance with
chapter 24.03 RCW, that has the mission to operate a modernization
extension system, coordinate a network of public and private
modernization resources, and stimulate the competitiveness of small and
midsize manufacturers in Washington.
(11) "Technical assistance" means professional and any other
assistance provided by business and industry to an educational
institution, which is reasonably calculated to support directly the
development and expansion of a particular program and which represents
an addition to any technical assistance previously or customarily
provided to the educational institutions by the donor.
(((10) "College board" means the state board for community and
technical colleges under chapter 28B.50 RCW.))

Sec. 2 RCW 28C.04.420 and 1999 c 121 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The college board may, subject to appropriation from the
legislature or from funds made available from any other public or
private source and pursuant to rules adopted by the college board with
the advice of the work force training customer advisory committee
established in RCW 28C.04.390, provide job skills grants to educational
institutions and Washington manufacturing competitiveness corporations.
The job skills grants shall be used exclusively for programs which are
consistent with the job skills program. The college board shall work
in collaboration with the work force training customer advisory
committee established in RCW 28C.04.390 to assure that:
(1) The program is within the scope of the job skills program under
this chapter and may reasonably be expected to succeed and thereby
increase employment within the state;
(2) Provision has been made to use any available alternative
funding from local, state, and federal sources;
(3) The job skills grant will only be used to cover the costs
associated with the program;
(4) The program will not unnecessarily duplicate existing programs
and could not be provided by another educational institution more
effectively or efficiently;
(5) The program involves an area of skills training and education
for which there is a demonstrable need;
(6) The applicant has made provisions for the use of existing
federal and state resources for student financial assistance;
(7) The job skills grant is essential to the success of the program
as the resources of the applicant are inadequate to attract the
technical assistance and financial support necessary for the program
from business and industry;
(8) The program represents a collaborative partnership between
business, industry, labor, educational institutions, and other
partners, as appropriate;
(9) The commitment of financial support from business and industry
shall be equal to or greater than the amount of the requested job
skills grant;
(10) Binding commitments have been made to the commission by the
applicant for adequate reporting of information and data regarding the
program to the commission, particularly information concerning the
recruitment and employment of trainees and students, and including a
requirement for an annual or other periodic audit of the books of the
applicant directly related to the program, and for such control on the
part of the commission as it considers prudent over the management of
the program, so as to protect the use of public funds, including, in
the discretion of the commission and without limitation, right of
access to financial and other records of the applicant directly related
to the programs; and
(11) A provision has been made by the applicant to work, in
cooperation with the employment security department, to identify and
screen potential trainees, and that provision has been made by the
applicant for the participation as trainees of low-income persons
including temporary assistance for needy families recipients,
dislocated workers, and persons from minority and economically
disadvantaged groups to participate in the program.
Beginning October 1, 1999, and every two years thereafter, the
college board shall provide the legislature and the governor with a
report describing the activities and outcomes of the state job skills
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of one million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the state board for community
and technical colleges for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---