BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.91 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Iodine matrix" means iodine at a concentration greater than
two percent by weight in a matrix or solution.
(b) "Matrix" means something, as a substance, in which something
else originates, develops, or is contained.
(c) "Methylsulfonylmethane" means methylsulfonylmethane in its
powder form only, and does not include products containing
methylsulfonylmethane in other forms such as liquids, tablets, capsules
not containing methylsulfonylmethane in pure powder form, ointments,
creams, cosmetics, foods, and beverages.
(2) Any person who knowingly purchases in a thirty-day period or
possesses any quantity of iodine in its elemental form, an iodine
matrix, or more than two pounds of methylsulfonylmethane is guilty of
a gross misdemeanor, except as provided in subsection (3) of this
section.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A person who possesses iodine in its elemental form or an
iodine matrix as a prescription drug, under a prescription issued by a
licensed veterinarian, physician, or advanced registered nurse
practitioner;
(b) A person who possesses iodine in its elemental form, an iodine
matrix, or any quantity of methylsulfonylmethane in its powder form and
is actively engaged in the practice of animal husbandry of livestock;
(c) A person who possesses iodine in its elemental form or an
iodine matrix in conjunction with experiments conducted in a chemistry
or chemistry-related laboratory maintained by a:
(i) Public or private secondary school;
(ii) Public or private institution of higher education that is
accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by
the United States department of education;
(iii) Manufacturing facility, government agency, or research
facility in the course of lawful business activities;
(d) A veterinarian, physician, advanced registered nurse
practitioner, pharmacist, retail distributor, wholesaler, manufacturer,
warehouseman, or common carrier, or an agent of any of these persons
who possesses iodine in its elemental form, an iodine matrix, or
methylsulfonylmethane in its powder form in the regular course of
lawful business activities; or
(e) A person working in a general hospital who possesses iodine in
its elemental form or an iodine matrix in the regular course of
employment at the hospital.
(4) Any person who purchases any quantity of iodine in its
elemental form, an iodine matrix, or any quantity of
methylsulfonylmethane must present an identification card or driver's
license issued by any state in the United States or jurisdiction of
another country before purchasing the item.
(5) The Washington state patrol shall develop a form to be used in
recording transactions involving iodine in its elemental form, an
iodine matrix, or methylsulfonylmethane. A person who sells or
otherwise transfers any quantity of iodine in its elemental form, an
iodine matrix, or any quantity of methylsulfonylmethane to a person for
any purpose authorized in subsection (3) of this section must record
each sale or transfer. The record must be made on the form developed
by the Washington state patrol and must be retained by the person for
at least three years. The Washington state patrol or any local law
enforcement agency may request access to the records. Failure to make
or retain a record required under this subsection is a misdemeanor.
Failure to comply with a request for access to records required under
this subsection to the Washington state patrol or a local law
enforcement agency is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---