BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.38.100 and 2000 c 103 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever a person's special assessment and/or real property tax
obligation is deferred under the provisions of this chapter, the amount
deferred and required to be paid pursuant to RCW 84.38.120 shall become
a lien in favor of the state upon his or her property and shall have
priority as provided in chapters 35.50 and 84.60 RCW: PROVIDED, That
the interest of a mortgage or purchase contract holder who is required
to cosign a declaration of deferral under RCW 84.38.090, shall have
priority to said deferred lien. This lien may accumulate up to eighty
percent of the amount of the claimant's equity value in said property
and shall bear interest at the rate of ((eight)) five percent per year
from the time it could have been paid before delinquency until said
obligation is paid: PROVIDED, That when taxes are deferred as provided
in RCW 84.64.050, the amount shall bear interest at the rate of
((eight)) five percent per year from the date the declaration is filed
until the obligation is paid. In the case of a mobile home, the
department of licensing shall show the state's lien on the certificate
of ownership for the mobile home. In the case of all other property,
the department of revenue shall file a notice of the deferral with the
county recorder or auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act only applies to property tax
deferrals granted under RCW 84.38.040 after the effective date of this
act for taxes levied for collection in 2007 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legislature finds that the intent of the
property tax deferral program is to assist retired persons in
maintaining their dignity and a reasonable standard of living by
residing in their own homes, providing for their own needs, and
managing their own affairs without requiring assistance from public
welfare programs. The department of revenue shall review the adequacy
and appropriateness of the interest rate provided in RCW 84.38.100 in
relation to these objectives. The department shall report its findings
to the finance committee of the house of representatives and the ways
and means committee of the senate by December 1, 2012.

--- END ---