BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS AND INTENT. (1) The legislature
finds that many small employers struggle with the cost of providing
employer-sponsored health insurance coverage to their employees, while
others are unable to offer employer-sponsored health insurance due to
its high cost. Low-wage workers also struggle with the burden of
paying their share of the costs of employer-sponsored health insurance,
while others turn down their employer's offer of coverage due to its
costs.
(2) The legislature intends, through establishment of a small
employer health insurance partnership program, to remove economic
barriers to health insurance coverage for low-wage employees of small
employers by building on the private sector health benefit plan system
and encouraging employer and employee participation in
employer-sponsored health benefit plan coverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the Washington state
health care authority, established under chapter 41.05 RCW.
(2) "Eligible employee" means an individual who:
(a) Is a resident of the state of Washington;
(b) Has family income less than two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level, as determined annually by the federal department of
health and human services; and
(c) Is employed by a small employer.
(3) "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005 or any plan provided by a self-funded multiple employer
welfare arrangement as defined in RCW 48.125.010 or by another benefit
arrangement defined in the federal employee retirement income security
act of 1974, as amended.
(4) "Program" means the small employer health insurance partnership
program established in section 3 of this act.
(5) "Small employer" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005.
(6) "Subsidy" means payment or reimbursement to an eligible
employee toward the purchase of a health benefit plan, and may include
a net billing arrangement with insurance carriers or a prospective or
retrospective payment for health benefit plan premiums.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 SMALL EMPLOYER HEALTH INSURANCE PARTNERSHIP
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED. To the extent funding is appropriated in the
operating budget for this purpose, the small employer health insurance
partnership program is established. The administrator shall be
responsible for the implementation and operation of the small employer
health insurance partnership program, directly or by contract. The
administrator shall offer premium subsidies to eligible employees under
section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 PREMIUM SUBSIDIES TO ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEES.
(1) Beginning July 1, 2007, the administrator shall accept applications
from eligible employees, on behalf of themselves, their spouses, and
their dependent children, to receive premium subsidies through the
small employer health insurance partnership program.
(2) Premium subsidy payments may be provided to eligible employees
if:
(a) The eligible employee is employed by a small employer;
(b) The actuarial value of the health benefit plan offered by the
small employer is at least equivalent to that of the basic health plan
benefit offered under chapter 70.47 RCW. The office of the insurance
commissioner under Title 48 RCW shall certify those small employer
health benefit plans that are at least actuarially equivalent to the
basic health plan benefit; and
(c) The small employer will pay at least forty percent of the
monthly premium cost for health benefit plan coverage of the eligible
employee.
(3) The amount of an eligible employee's premium subsidy shall be
determined by applying the sliding scale subsidy schedule developed for
subsidized basic health plan enrollees under RCW 70.47.060 to the
employee's premium obligation for his or her employer's health benefit
plan.
(4) After an eligible individual has enrolled in the program, the
program shall issue subsidies in an amount determined pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section to either the eligible employee or to
the carrier designated by the eligible employee.
(5) An eligible employee must agree to provide verification of
continued enrollment in his or her small employer's health benefit plan
on a semiannual basis or to notify the administrator whenever his or
her enrollment status changes, whichever is earlier. Verification or
notification may be made directly by the employee, or through his or
her employer or the carrier providing the small employer health benefit
plan. When necessary, the administrator has the authority to perform
retrospective audits on premium subsidy accounts. The administrator
may suspend or terminate an employee's participation in the program and
seek repayment of any subsidy amounts paid due to the omission or
misrepresentation of an applicant or enrolled employee. The
administrator shall adopt rules to define the appropriate application
of these sanctions and the processes to implement the sanctions
provided in this subsection, within available resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 ENROLLMENT LIMITS TO REMAIN WITHIN
APPROPRIATION. Enrollment in the small employer health insurance
partnership program is not an entitlement and shall not result in
expenditures that exceed the amount that has been appropriated for the
program in the operating budget. If it appears that continued
enrollment will result in expenditures exceeding the appropriated level
for a particular fiscal year, the administrator may freeze new
enrollment in the program and establish a waiting list of eligible
employees who shall receive subsidies only when sufficient funds are
available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RULES. The administrator shall adopt all
rules necessary for the implementation and operation of the small
employer health insurance partnership program. As part of the rule
development process, the administrator shall consult with small
employers, carriers, employee organizations, and the office of the
insurance commissioner under Title 48 RCW to determine an effective and
efficient method for the payment of subsidies under this chapter. All
rules shall be adopted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 REPORTS TO THE LEGISLATURE. The
administrator shall report biennially to the relevant policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the effectiveness and efficiency of
the small employer health insurance partnership program, including the
services and benefits covered under the purchased health benefit plans,
consumer satisfaction, and other program operational issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 SMALL EMPLOYER HEALTH INSURANCE PARTNERSHIP
PROGRAM ACCOUNT. The small employer health insurance partnership
program account is hereby established in the custody of the state
treasurer. Any nongeneral fund--state funds collected for the small
employer health insurance partnership program shall be deposited in the
small employer health insurance partnership program account. Moneys in
the account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of administering
the small employer health insurance partnership program, including
payments to participating managed health care systems on behalf of
small employer health insurance partnership enrollees. Only the
administrator of the health care authority or his or her designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 STATE CHILDREN'S HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM--FEDERAL WAIVER REQUEST. The department of social and health services
shall submit a request to the federal department of health and human
services by October 1, 2006, for a state children's health insurance
program section 1115 demonstration waiver. The waiver request shall
seek authorization from the federal government to draw down Washington
state's unspent state children's health insurance program allotment to
finance basic health plan coverage, as provided in chapter 70.47 RCW,
for parents of children enrolled in medical assistance or the state
children's health insurance program. The waiver also shall seek
authorization from the federal government to utilize the resulting
state savings to finance expanded basic health plan enrollment, or
subsidies provided to low-wage workers through the small employer
health insurance partnership program established in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct a program and fiscal review of the small
employer health insurance partnership program and report their findings
and recommendation to the appropriate committees of the legislature no
later than December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Captions used in this act are not part of
the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 9 and 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---