BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.170.020 and 1995 c 269 s 2203 are each amended to
read as follows:
((As used in)) The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter((:)) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means department of health.
(2) "Hospital" means any health care institution which is required
to qualify for a license under RCW 70.41.020(((2))) (4); or as a
psychiatric hospital under chapter 71.12 RCW.
(3) "Secretary" means secretary of health.
(4) "Charity care" means necessary hospital health care rendered to
indigent persons, to the extent that the persons are unable to pay for
the care or, except to the extent provided otherwise in RCW
70.170.060(6), to pay deductibles or co-insurance amounts required by
a third-party payer, as determined by the department.
(5) "Sliding fee schedule" means a hospital-determined, publicly
available schedule of discounts ((to charges)) for persons deemed
eligible for charity care((;)). Such schedules shall be established
after consideration of guidelines developed by the department.
(6) "Special studies" means studies which have not been funded
through the department's biennial or other legislative appropriations.
(7) "Federal poverty guidelines" means the poverty income
guidelines established annually by the federal department of health and
human services.
(8) "Hospital costs" is the number derived by multiplying hospital
charges by that hospital's aggregate hospital cost-to-charge ratio
calculated by the health and recovery services administration from the
latest available medicare cost report. If a recalculation of the
cost-to-charge ratio occurs sooner than twelve months from the last
update to the hospital's discount policy, the calculation existing
prior to the recalculation may be used for purposes of updating
hospital discount policies. The secretary shall develop alternate
means of determining hospital costs for hospitals that do not file
medicare cost reports, in consultation with such hospitals.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.170.060 and 1998 c 245 s 118 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No hospital or its medical staff shall adopt or maintain
admission practices or policies which result in:
(a) A significant reduction in the proportion of patients who have
no third-party coverage and who have family income up to four hundred
percent of federal poverty guidelines or are otherwise unable to pay
for hospital services;
(b) A significant reduction in the proportion of individuals
admitted for inpatient hospital services for which payment is, or is
likely to be, less than the anticipated charges for or costs of such
services; or
(c) The refusal to admit patients who would be expected to require
unusually costly or prolonged treatment for reasons other than those
related to the appropriateness of the care available at the hospital.
(2) No hospital shall adopt or maintain practices or policies which
would deny access to emergency care based on ability to pay. No
hospital which maintains an emergency department shall transfer a
patient with an emergency medical condition or who is in active labor
unless the transfer is performed at the request of the patient or is
due to the limited medical resources of the transferring hospital.
Hospitals must follow reasonable procedures in making transfers to
other hospitals including confirmation of acceptance of the transfer by
the receiving hospital.
(3) The department shall develop definitions by rule, as
appropriate, for subsection (1) of this section and, with reference to
federal requirements, subsection (2) of this section. The department
shall monitor hospital compliance with subsections (1) and (2) of this
section. The department shall report individual instances of possible
noncompliance to the state attorney general or the appropriate federal
agency.
(4) The department shall establish and maintain by rule, consistent
with the definition of charity care in RCW 70.170.020, the following:
(a) Uniform procedures, data requirements, and criteria for
identifying patients receiving charity care;
(b) A definition of residual bad debt including reasonable and
uniform standards for collection procedures to be used in efforts to
collect the unpaid portions of hospital charges that are the patient's
responsibility.
(5) For the purpose of providing charity care, each hospital shall
develop, implement, and maintain a charity care policy which,
consistent with subsection (1) of this section, shall enable people
with family income below one hundred percent of the federal poverty
((level)) guidelines access to appropriate hospital-based medical
services, and a sliding fee schedule for determination of discounts
((from charges)) for persons ((who qualify for such discounts by
January 1, 1990)) with family income from one hundred to two hundred
fifty percent of the federal poverty guidelines. Discounts under the
sliding fee schedule shall be applied to the amount derived from the
calculation in subsection (6) of this section. The department shall
develop specific guidelines to assist hospitals in setting sliding fee
schedules required by this section. All persons with family income
below one hundred percent of the federal poverty ((standard))
guidelines shall be deemed charity care patients for the full amount of
hospital charges, provided that such persons are not eligible for other
private or public health coverage sponsorship. Persons who may be
eligible for charity care shall be notified by the hospital.
(6) For uninsured persons with family income up to four hundred
percent of the federal poverty guidelines, hospitals must provide a
discount for any charges for services provided in the hospital.
Subsection (5) of this section shall determine the degree of the
discount for persons with family income of up to two hundred fifty
percent of the federal poverty guidelines. For persons with family
income in excess of two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty
guidelines, no patient may be required to pay more than the greater of
one hundred thirty percent of the hospital costs, or an amount equal to
the state average percentage of hospital costs paid by private payers,
as determined by the department.
(7) Each hospital shall provide notice to patients of its charity
care policies. At a minimum, each hospital must post prominently in
locations easily accessible to and visible by patients, including its
web site, and in the bill sent to patients, a notice stating that
charges for services to people meeting the charity care or discount
criteria may be waived or reduced, and regarding the availability of
charity care and how to qualify. The department shall develop model
language, not to exceed fifty words, and type font and style standards
that hospitals must use to satisfy the requirement to provide notice in
the bill sent to patients. The language may be written on the
patient's actual bill if it complies with the department's type font
and style requirements. A notice of charity care policies also may be
provided to patients prior to discharge. Posted notices must be in
English and in each of the five most common languages in Washington
other than English that are spoken by more than five percent of
residents of the county where the hospital is located. The department
shall make a biennial determination of the five most common languages
spoken in Washington and the languages needed for posting in each
county. The notice must use clear language that would be easily
understood by individuals with limited education.
(8) Each hospital shall make every reasonable effort to determine
the existence or nonexistence of private or public sponsorship which
might cover in full or part the charges for care rendered by the
hospital to a patient; the family income of the patient as classified
under federal poverty ((income)) guidelines; and the eligibility of the
patient for charity care as defined in this chapter and in accordance
with hospital policy. An initial determination of sponsorship status
shall precede collection efforts directed at the patient.
(((7))) (9) The department shall monitor the distribution of
charity care among hospitals, with reference to factors such as
relative need for charity care in hospital service areas and trends in
private and public health coverage. The department shall prepare
reports that identify any problems in distribution which are in
contradiction of the intent of this chapter. The report shall include
an assessment of the effects of the provisions of this chapter on
access to hospital and health care services, as well as an evaluation
of the contribution of all purchasers of care to hospital charity care.
(((8))) (10) The department shall issue a report on the subjects
addressed in this section at least annually((, with the first report
due on July 1, 1990)). The department shall also provide information
to the public on hospital charges for the most common inpatient
diagnosis-related groups, as identified under the patient discharge
information collected under RCW 43.70.052, the relationship between
hospital costs and charges, and details on hospital charity care
policies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.170 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before contracting with any entity to act as a hospital's
designated agent, assignee, or contractor for collection of its
accounts receivable, or to purchase its accounts receivable, the
hospital's governing board must have notice of, and affirmatively
approve, the debt collection practices of the entity. The practices
must include detailed information related to:
(a) Contacts with patients who have debts to the hospital,
including written, telephonic, and electronic contacts;
(b) Policies related to the ability of debtors to make installment
payments, and interest rates charged on any remaining balances;
(c) Circumstances under which the entity files civil actions to
collect debts, and undertakes any of the following collection actions
to execute a judgment in connection with a debt:
(i) Actions to foreclose on real property;
(ii) Actions to place a lien on any property;
(iii) Actions to garnish wages; and
(iv) Actions to attach or seize a bank account or any other
personal property.
(2) On at least an annual basis, the governing board of every
hospital shall review a report on collection actions taken by the
entity that has a contract with the hospital under subsection (1) of
this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.16.500 and 1997 c 387 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Agencies, departments, taxing districts, political
subdivisions of the state, counties, and cities may retain, by written
contract, collection agencies licensed under this chapter for the
purpose of collecting public debts owed by any person, including any
restitution that is being collected on behalf of a crime victim.
(b) Any governmental entity as described in (a) of this subsection
using a collection agency may add a reasonable fee, payable by the
debtor, to the outstanding debt for the collection agency fee incurred
or to be incurred. The amount to be paid for collection services shall
be left to the agreement of the governmental entity and its collection
agency or agencies, but a contingent fee of up to fifty percent of the
first one hundred thousand dollars of the unpaid debt per account and
up to thirty-five percent of the unpaid debt over one hundred thousand
dollars per account is reasonable, and a minimum fee of the full amount
of the debt up to one hundred dollars per account is reasonable. Any
fee agreement entered into by a governmental entity is presumptively
reasonable.
(2) No debt may be assigned to a collection agency unless (a) there
has been an attempt to advise the debtor (i) of the existence of the
debt and (ii) that the debt may be assigned to a collection agency for
collection if the debt is not paid, and (b) at least thirty days have
elapsed from the time notice was attempted.
(3) Collection agencies assigned debts under this section shall
have only those remedies and powers which would be available to them as
assignees of private creditors.
(4) Nothing in this section applies to public hospital district
responsibilities pursuant to chapter 70.170 RCW.
(5) For purposes of this section, the term debt shall include fines
and other debts, including the fee required under subsection (1)(b) of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department of financial institutions
shall establish a work group to make recommendations related to
hospital patient debt repayment and collection practices. The work
group shall develop standards for appropriate, predictable, and fair
repayment and debt collection practices for hospitals to apply to
patients who are eligible for charity care, a sliding fee schedule, or
maximum charge as defined in RCW 70.170.060.
The work group shall include representatives of the department of
licensing, the department of health, hospitals, debt collection
agencies, consumers and patients, and other interested stakeholders.
The work group shall submit its recommendations to the legislature by
November 15, 2006.

--- END ---