BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a systematic
assessment of the best available scientific and medical evidence and
timely application of this evidence to informed coverage and medical
necessity decisions by state purchased health care programs should
result in improved access, prevention, and health outcomes for
Washington citizens. The legislature further finds that transparency
and public participation in this program is important and should be
incorporated. Nothing in this act is intended to ration health care
that is provided to individuals in a state purchased health care
program. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to support the
establishment by the state of an evidence-based health technology
assessment program that:
(1) Conducts systematic reviews of scientific and medical
literature to identify safe, efficacious, and cost-effective health
technologies;
(2) Provides for the establishment of a statewide health technology
clinical committee;
(3) Develops methods and processes to track the application of
evidence-based practice and health outcomes across state agencies;
(4) Provides clear and transparent access to the scientific basis
of coverage decisions and coverage criteria developed under this
program; and
(5) To the extent possible, collaborates with other states in the
development and implementation of the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the Washington state
health care authority under chapter 41.05 RCW.
(2) "Agency" means a state agency administering a state purchased
health care program as defined in RCW 41.05.011(2).
(3) "Best available scientific and medical evidence" means the best
available clinical evidence derived from systematic research and is
based upon a hierarchy of evidence to determine the weight given to
available data. The weight of medical evidence depends on objective
indicators of its validity and reliability including the nature and
source of the evidence, the empirical characteristics of the studies or
trials upon which the evidence is based, and the consistency of the
outcome with comparable studies. The hierarchy, in descending order
with meta-analyses given the greatest weight, is:
(a) Meta-analysis done with multiple, well-designed controlled
studies;
(b) One or more well-designed experimental studies;
(c) Well-designed, quasi-experimental studies such as nonrandomized
controlled, single group prepost, cohort, time series, or matched case-controlled studies;
(d) Well-designed, nonexperimental studies, such as comparative and
correlation descriptive, and case studies; and
(e) Other credible evidence, such as clinical guidelines,
information produced by governmental sources, independent technology
assessment organizations, medical and hospital associations, and health
carriers as defined in RCW 48.43.005.
The agencies may modify the hierarchy of evidence, by rule, to the
extent that emerging research or practice related to health technology
assessment indicates that modification of the hierarchy is appropriate.
(4) "Coverage criteria" means an evidence-based set of explicit
clinical criteria that define the circumstances under which use of a
covered health technology will be approved for individual patients.
(5) "Coverage decision" means a determination regarding including
or excluding a health technology as a covered benefit, and if covered,
under what circumstances.
(6) "Evidence-based health technology assessment center" means an
assessment center responsible for conducting systematic reviews and
assessments of best available scientific and medical evidence related
to health technologies identified under section 3(3) of this act.
"Evidence-based health technology assessment center" includes, but is
not limited to, evidence-based practice centers designated as such by
the federal agency for health care research and quality.
(7) "Health technology" means medical and surgical devices and
procedures, medical equipment, and diagnostic tests. Health
technologies does not include prescription drugs governed by RCW
70.14.050.
(8) "Health technology clinical committee" means the committee
established under section 4 of this act.
(9) "Medical necessity decision" or "proper and necessary decision"
means a determination whether or not to provide reimbursement for a
covered health technology in a specific circumstance for an individual
patient who is eligible to receive health care services from the state
purchased health care program making the decision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each state agency administering a state purchased health care
program shall, in cooperation with other such agencies, take action to
prevent the application of health technologies where scientific and
medical evidence suggests little or no benefit or possible harm, and to
enhance the use of health technologies in circumstances where evidence
suggests substantial benefits. To accomplish this purpose, the
agencies shall establish an evidence-based health technology assessment
program.
(2) In developing the evidence-based health technology assessment
program, the agencies, to the extent permitted under federal and state
law governing each agency:
(a) Shall use the best available scientific and medical evidence to
make coverage and medical necessity decisions consistent with sections
2 through 5 of this act and RCW 41.05.013; and
(b) Shall develop and implement uniform policies for health
technology assessments as provided in sections 2 through 5 of this act
and RCW 41.05.013, including development of common coverage decisions
and coverage criteria.
(3) In designing and implementing the health technology assessment
program and developing uniform, consistent policies and decisions, the
agencies:
(a) Shall determine, after consultation with the health technology
clinical committee, which health technologies will be reviewed using
explicit prioritization criteria developed for this purpose. These
criteria may include, but are not limited to:
(i) The expected or demonstrated prevalence of use of the
technology in the population;
(ii) Significant variation in use of the health technology;
(iii) Substantial evidence of harm from use of the health
technology;
(iv) The health technology is costly, there is evidence of little
health benefit derived from use of the health technology, and there are
effective alternatives available for treatment of the underlying
condition;
(v) Whether there is no demonstrated medical or scientific value
for use of the health technology; and
(vi) Whether there is adequate available evidence of sufficient
quality to evaluate the medical or scientific value for use of the
health technology;
(b) Shall contract with one or more evidence-based health
technology assessment centers to conduct systematic reviews and
assessments of the best available scientific and medical evidence
related to health technologies identified for review under this
section. Systematic reviews and assessments should include an
assessment of the scientific literature regarding safety, efficacy, and
cost-effectiveness of the health technology, and the adequacy and
quality of systematic reviews undertaken by other national or
internationally recognized health technology assessment programs. The
systematic reviews must be conducted in a manner that provides an
opportunity for interested individuals and entities to submit
scientific or medical evidence to the center for their consideration.
Upon their completion, the systematic reviews must be transmitted to
the agencies and to the health technology clinical committee. Each
health technology that has been initially reviewed under this section
shall be reviewed at intervals of no less than eighteen months to
determine if new scientific or medical evidence has emerged that could
potentially change a health care coverage recommendation, or
recommendation related to medical necessity or proper or necessary
determinations;
(c) Shall establish a health technology clinical committee as
provided in section 4 of this act to make recommendations to the
agencies regarding coverage of health technologies and any coverage
criteria they would recommend related to medical necessity or proper
and necessary decisions regarding covered health technologies;
(d) May adopt coverage criteria to assist in the appropriate
application of medical necessity or proper and necessary decisions,
consistent with section 4 of this act;
(e) May develop criteria for payment of health technologies under
reasonable exceptions, such as experimental or investigational
treatment, services under a clinical investigation approved by an
institutional review board, or health technologies that have a
humanitarian device exemption from the federal food and drug
administration. Exceptions for deviations from clinical guidelines may
be considered when the exception is based on the best available
scientific and medical evidence and the specific clinical circumstances
for which an exception has been requested are not substantially
addressed in the applicable clinical guidelines; and
(f) Shall track and share safety, health outcome, exceptions to
coverage criteria, and cost data related to use of health technologies
to help inform health technology decisions. The agencies shall provide
such data to an evidence-based health technology assessment center or
the health technology clinical committee when the information will
inform their deliberations.
(4) The agencies shall develop methods to report on the performance
of the health technology assessment program, with respect to health
care outcomes, frequency of exceptions, cost outcomes, and other
matters deemed appropriate by the administrator.
(5) The agencies shall develop a centralized, web-based
communication tool that provides, at a minimum:
(a) Notification of health technologies that have been chosen for
review. Notification shall be provided at least thirty days before
initiation of review by an evidence-based health technology assessment
center and shall note the opportunity of interested parties to submit
scientific or medical evidence to the center for consideration as part
of their systematic review;
(b) Notification of all coverage decisions and coverage criteria
developed under this program, their effective date, and the scientific
basis for the decisions and guidelines; and
(c) Access to all reports produced under subsection (4) of this
section.
(6) The standard of medical necessity or proper and necessary shall
not apply to health technologies that are determined not to be covered
under sections 2 through 5 of this act and RCW 41.05.013. The
agencies' authority to develop criteria for payment of health
technologies under reasonable exceptions, as provided in subsection
(3)(e) of this section, is not limited by this subsection.
(7) Appeals of decisions made under sections 2 through 5 of this
act shall be governed by state and federal law applicable to
participating agency decisions. Nothing in this act diminishes an
individual's right to appeal an action or decision under the evidence-based health technology assessment program.
(8) The provisions of the health technology assessment program
apply to health technologies that have been reviewed by an evidence-based health technology assessment center and the health technology
clinical committee, and adopted by the agencies under this section.
For those health technologies that have not been identified for review
under subsection (3) of this section, the agencies may use their
existing statutory and rule-making authority to make coverage and
medical necessity or proper and necessary decisions. These decisions
shall be shared among the agencies, with a goal of maximizing each
agency's understanding of the basis for the other's decisions and
providing opportunities for agencies to collaborate in the decision-making process. The agencies also shall provide explanations of and
access to the scientific basis for coverage decisions related to health
technologies that have not been identified for systematic assessment
under the health technology assessment program.
(9) The agencies shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this
act.
(10) The health technology legislative oversight committee is
established. The committee shall consist of two members from each
caucus of the senate, and two members from each caucus of the house of
representatives. The health technology legislative oversight committee
shall:
(a) Review and report at least annually on the impact of health
technology coverage decisions made by the health technology clinical
committee and state agencies on patient access, treatment quality, and
overall health care costs;
(b) Provide manufacturers of a health technology and organizations
with an interest in a health technology an opportunity to present
information related to the operation of the health technology
assessment program, including coverage decisions and other matters at
the discretion of the health technology legislative oversight
committee; and
(c) Request the health technology clinical committee to reconsider
a recommendation, at the discretion of the oversight committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The administrator of the health care authority, in consultation
with the participating agencies and their medical directors, shall
establish a health technology clinical committee. The health
technology clinical committee shall be comprised of eleven members,
including six practicing licensed physicians and five other practicing
licensed health professionals who utilize health technology in the
professional scope of their practice. At least two members of the
committee must have demonstrated experience in serving women, children,
elderly persons, and people of color.
(2) The health technology clinical committee shall review the
results of the systematic assessments of health technologies conducted
by an evidence-based health technology assessment center. The
committee must use medical and scientific evidence in an open and
transparent process that evaluates the efficacy of health technologies,
considering safety, efficacy, likelihood of compliance, outcomes, and
any unique impacts on specific populations based upon factors such as
sex, age, ethnicity, race, or disability. The review process shall
include an opportunity for public comment. For each health technology
reviewed, the committee shall develop recommendations related to
whether the health technology should be covered by state purchased
health care programs, and if covered, any coverage criteria that should
be used to assist in determining the appropriate application of medical
necessity or proper and necessary decisions. Committee recommendations
are binding on the agencies, unless the recommendations are contrary to
an applicable federal statute or regulation, or state statute.
(3) The administrator may establish time limited subcommittees of
the health technology clinical committee where specific expertise is
needed to review a particular health technology or group of
technologies.
(4) Members of the health technology clinical committee, or any
subcommittee established under subsection (3) of this section are
prohibited from being employed by a health technology manufacturer or
by any agency administering state purchased health care programs. As
a condition of appointment to the committee or any subcommittee, each
member must disclose any potential conflict of interest, including
receipt of any remuneration, grants, or other compensation from a
health technology manufacturer.
(5) Members of the health technology clinical committee and any
subcommittees formed under subsection (3) of this section are immune
from civil liability for any official acts performed in good faith as
members of the committee or subcommittee.
(6) Meetings of the health technology clinical committee are
subject to the open public meetings act, as provided in chapter 42.30
RCW, including RCW 42.30.110(1)(l), which authorizes an executive
session during a regular or special meeting to consider proprietary or
confidential nonpublished information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW
to read as follows:
In the conduct of systematic reviews by the evidence-based health
technology assessment center, and in the conduct of business by the
health technology clinical advisory committee, the health technology
assessment program must ensure that conflicts of interest regarding a
specific health technology be minimized and fully disclosed to the
extent possible.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.05.013 and 2005 c 462 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The authority shall coordinate state agency efforts to develop
and implement uniform policies across state purchased health care
programs that will ensure prudent, cost-effective health services
purchasing, maximize efficiencies in administration of state purchased
health care programs, improve the quality of care provided through
state purchased health care programs, and reduce administrative burdens
on health care providers participating in state purchased health care
programs. The policies adopted should be based, to the extent
possible, upon the best available scientific and medical evidence and
shall endeavor to address:
(a) Methods of formal assessment, such as a health technology
assessment under sections 2 through 5 of this act. Consideration of
the best available scientific evidence does not preclude consideration
of experimental or investigational treatment or services under a
clinical investigation approved by an institutional review board;
(b) Monitoring of health outcomes, adverse events, quality, and
cost-effectiveness of health services;
(c) Development of a common definition of medical necessity; and
(d) Exploration of common strategies for disease management and
demand management programs, including asthma, diabetes, heart disease,
and similar common chronic diseases. Strategies to be explored include
individual asthma management plans. On January 1, 2007, and January 1,
2009, the authority shall issue a status report to the legislature
summarizing any results it attains in exploring and coordinating
strategies for asthma, diabetes, heart disease, and other chronic
diseases.
(2) The administrator may invite health care provider
organizations, carriers, other health care purchasers, and consumers to
participate in efforts undertaken under this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section "best available scientific and
medical evidence" means the best available clinical evidence derived
from systematic research.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Sections 2 through 5 of this act and RCW 41.05.013 do not apply to
state purchased health care services that are purchased from or through
health carriers as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---