BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Sexual assault is the most heinous crime
against another person short of murder. Sexual assault inflicts
humiliation, degradation, and terror on victims. According to the FBI,
a woman is raped every six minutes in the United States. Rape is
recognized as the most underreported crime; estimates suggest that only
one in seven rapes is reported to authorities. Victims who do not
report the crime still desire safety and protection from future
interactions with the offender. Some cases in which the rape is
reported are not prosecuted. In these situations, the victim should be
able to seek a civil remedy requiring that the offender stay away from
the victim.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Nonconsensual" means a lack of freely given agreement.
(2) "Petitioner" means any named petitioner for the sexual assault
protection order or any named victim of nonconsensual sexual conduct or
nonconsensual sexual penetration on whose behalf the petition is
brought.
(3) "Sexual assault protection order" means an ex parte temporary
order or a final order granted under this chapter, which includes a
remedy authorized by section 10 of this act.
(4) "Sexual conduct" means any of the following:
(a) Any intentional or knowing touching or fondling of the
genitals, anus, or breasts, directly or indirectly, including through
clothing;
(b) Any intentional or knowing display of the genitals, anus, or
breasts for the purposes of arousal or sexual gratification of the
respondent;
(c) Any intentional or knowing touching or fondling of the
genitals, anus, or breasts, directly or indirectly, including through
clothing, that the petitioner is forced to perform by another person or
the respondent;
(d) Any forced display of the petitioner's genitals, anus, or
breasts for the purposes of arousal or sexual gratification of the
respondent or others;
(e) Any intentional or knowing touching of the clothed or unclothed
body of a child under the age of thirteen, if done for the purpose of
sexual gratification or arousal of the respondent or others; and
(f) Any coerced or forced touching or fondling by a child under the
age of thirteen, directly or indirectly, including through clothing, of
the genitals, anus, or breasts of the respondent or others.
(5) "Sexual penetration" means any contact, however slight, between
the sex organ or anus of one person by an object, the sex organ, mouth,
or anus of another person, or any intrusion, however slight, of any
part of the body of one person or of any animal or object into the sex
organ or anus of another person, including but not limited to
cunnilingus, fellatio, or anal penetration. Evidence of emission of
semen is not required to prove sexual penetration.
(6) "Nonphysical contact" includes, but is not limited to,
telephone calls, mail, e-mail, fax, and written notes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A petition for a sexual assault protection
order may be filed by a person:
(1) Who is a victim of nonconsensual sexual conduct or
nonconsensual sexual penetration, including a single incident of
nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration; or
(2) On behalf of any of the following persons who is a victim of
nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration:
(a) A minor child;
(b) A vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 74.34.020 or 74.34.021; or
(c) Any other adult who, because of age, disability, health, or
inaccessibility, cannot file the petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Any person may seek relief under this
chapter by filing a petition with a court alleging that the person has
been the victim of nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual
penetration committed by the respondent.
(2) A person under eighteen years of age who is thirteen years of
age or older may seek relief under this chapter and is not required to
seek relief by a guardian or next friend.
(3) No guardian or guardian ad litem need be appointed on behalf of
a respondent to an action under this chapter who is under eighteen
years of age if such respondent is thirteen years of age or older.
(4) The court may, if it deems necessary, appoint a guardian ad
litem for a petitioner or respondent who is a party to an action under
this chapter.
(5) Jurisdiction of the courts over proceedings under this chapter
shall be the same as jurisdiction over domestic violence protection
orders under RCW 26.50.020(5).
(6) An action under this chapter shall be filed in the county or
the municipality where the petitioner resides.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 There shall exist an action known as a
petition for a sexual assault protection order.
(1) A petition for relief shall allege the existence of
nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration, and
shall be accompanied by an affidavit made under oath stating the
specific facts and circumstances from which relief is sought.
Petitioner and respondent shall disclose the existence of any other
litigation or of any other restraining, protection, or no-contact
orders between the parties.
(2) A petition for relief may be made regardless of whether or not
there is a pending lawsuit, complaint, petition, or other action
between the parties.
(3) Within ninety days of receipt of the master copy from the
administrative office of the courts, all court clerk's offices shall
make available the standardized forms, instructions, and informational
brochures required by section 19 of this act and shall fill in and keep
current specific program names and telephone numbers for community
resources. Any assistance or information provided by clerks under this
section does not constitute the practice of law and clerks are not
responsible for incorrect information contained in a petition.
(4) No filing fee may be charged for proceedings under this
chapter. Forms and instructional brochures and the necessary number of
certified copies shall be provided free of charge.
(5) A person is not required to post a bond to obtain relief in any
proceeding under this section.
(6) If the petition states that disclosure of the petitioner's
address would risk abuse of the petitioner or any member of the
petitioner's family or household, that address may be omitted from all
documents filed with the court. If the petitioner has not disclosed an
address under this subsection, the petitioner shall designate an
alternative address at which the respondent may serve notice of any
motions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Upon receipt of the petition, the court
shall order a hearing which shall be held not later than fourteen days
from the date of the order. The court may schedule a hearing by
telephone pursuant to local court rule, to reasonably accommodate a
disability, or in exceptional circumstances to protect a petitioner
from further nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual
penetration. The court shall require assurances of the petitioner's
identity before conducting a telephonic hearing. Except as provided in
section 12 of this act, personal service shall be made upon the
respondent not less than five court days prior to the hearing. If
timely personal service cannot be made, the court shall set a new
hearing date and shall require additional attempts at obtaining
personal service. The court may issue an ex parte temporary sexual
assault order pending the hearing as provided in section 12 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sexual assault advocates, as defined in RCW
5.60.060, shall be allowed to accompany the victim and confer with the
victim, unless otherwise directed by the court. Court administrators
shall allow sexual assault advocates to assist victims of nonconsensual
sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration in the preparation
of petitions for sexual assault protection orders. Sexual assault
advocates are not engaged in the unauthorized practice of law when
providing assistance of the types specified in this section.
Communications between the petitioner and a sexual assault advocate are
protected as provided by RCW 5.60.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The court may appoint counsel to represent
the petitioner if the respondent is represented by counsel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) In proceedings for a sexual assault
protection order and prosecutions for violating a sexual assault
protection order, the prior sexual activity or the reputation of the
petitioner is inadmissible except:
(a) As evidence concerning the past sexual conduct of the
petitioner with the respondent when this evidence is offered by the
respondent upon the issue of whether the petitioner consented to the
sexual conduct with respect to which the offense is alleged; or
(b) When constitutionally required to be admitted.
(2) No evidence admissible under this section may be introduced
unless ruled admissible by the court after an offer of proof has been
made at a hearing held in camera to determine whether the respondent
has evidence to impeach the witness in the event that prior sexual
activity with the respondent is denied. The offer of proof shall
include reasonably specific information as to the date, time, and place
of the past sexual conduct between the petitioner and the respondent.
Unless the court finds that reasonably specific information as to date,
time, or place, or some combination thereof, has been offered as to
prior sexual activity with the respondent, counsel for the respondent
shall be ordered to refrain from inquiring into prior sexual activity
between the petitioner and the respondent. The court may not admit
evidence under this section unless it determines at the hearing that
the evidence is relevant and the probative value of the evidence
outweighs the danger of unfair prejudice. The evidence shall be
admissible at trial to the extent an order made by the court specifies
the evidence that may be admitted and areas with respect to which the
petitioner may be examined or cross-examined.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1)(a) If the court finds by a
preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner has been a victim of
nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration by the
respondent, the court shall issue a sexual assault protection order;
provided that the petitioner must also satisfy the requirements of
section 12 of this act for ex parte temporary orders or section 13 of
this act for final orders.
(b) The petitioner shall not be denied a sexual assault protection
order because the petitioner or the respondent is a minor or because
the petitioner did not report the assault to law enforcement. The
court, when determining whether or not to issue a sexual assault
protection order, may not require proof of physical injury on the
person of the victim or proof that the petitioner has reported the
sexual assault to law enforcement. Modification and extension of prior
sexual assault protection orders shall be in accordance with this
chapter.
(2) The court may provide relief as follows:
(a) Restrain the respondent from having any contact, including
nonphysical contact, with the petitioner directly, indirectly, or
through third parties regardless of whether those third parties know of
the order;
(b) Exclude the respondent from the petitioner's residence,
workplace, or school, or from the day care or school of a child, if the
victim is a child;
(c) Prohibit the respondent from knowingly coming within, or
knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from a specified
location; and
(d) Order any other injunctive relief as necessary or appropriate
for the protection of the petitioner.
(3) In cases where the petitioner and the respondent are under the
age of eighteen and attend the same public or private elementary,
middle, or high school, the court, when issuing a protection order and
providing relief, shall consider, among the other facts of the case,
the severity of the act, any continuing physical danger or emotional
distress to the petitioner, and the expense difficulty, and educational
disruption that would be caused by a transfer of the respondent to
another school. The court may order that the person restrained in the
order not attend the public or approved private elementary, middle, or
high school attended by the person under the age of eighteen protected
by the order. In the event the court orders a transfer of the
restrained person to another school, the parents or legal guardians of
the person restrained in the order are responsible for transportation
and other costs associated with the change of school by the person
restrained in the order. The court shall send notice of the
restriction on attending the same school as the person protected by the
order to the public or approved private school the person restrained by
the order will attend and to the school the person protected by the
order attends.
(4) Denial of a remedy may not be based, in whole or in part, on
evidence that:
(a) The respondent was voluntarily intoxicated;
(b) The petitioner was voluntarily intoxicated; or
(c) The petitioner engaged in limited consensual sexual touching.
(5) Monetary damages are not recoverable as a remedy.
(6) A knowing violation of a court order issued under this section
is punishable under RCW 26.50.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 For the purposes of issuing a sexual
assault protection order, deciding what relief should be included in
the order, and enforcing the order, RCW 9A.08.020 shall govern whether
the respondent is legally accountable for the conduct of another
person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) An ex parte temporary sexual assault
protection order shall issue if the petitioner satisfies the
requirements of this subsection by a preponderance of the evidence.
The petitioner shall establish that:
(a) The petitioner has been a victim of nonconsensual sexual
conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration by the respondent; and
(b) There is good cause to grant the remedy, regardless of prior
service of process or of notice upon the respondent, because the harm
which that remedy is intended to prevent would be likely to occur if
the respondent were given any prior notice, or greater notice than was
actually given, of the petitioner's efforts to obtain judicial relief.
(2) If the respondent appears in court for this hearing for an ex
parte temporary order, he or she may elect to file a general appearance
and testify. Any resulting order may be an ex parte temporary order,
governed by this section.
(3) If the court declines to issue an ex parte temporary sexual
assault protection order, the court shall state the particular reasons
for the court's denial. The court's denial of a motion for an ex parte
order shall be filed with the court.
(4) A knowing violation of a court order issued under this section
is punishable under RCW 26.50.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1)(a) An ex parte temporary sexual assault
protection order shall be effective for a fixed period not to exceed
fourteen days. A full hearing, as provided in this chapter, shall be
set for not later than fourteen days from the issuance of the temporary
order. Except as provided in section 6 of this act, the respondent
shall be personally served with a copy of the ex parte temporary sexual
assault protection order along with a copy of the petition and notice
of the date set for the hearing.
(b) Any ex parte temporary order issued under this section shall
contain the date and time of issuance and the expiration date and shall
be entered into a statewide judicial information system by the clerk of
the court within one judicial day after issuance.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section or section 16 of
this act, a final sexual assault protection order shall be effective
for a fixed period of time, not to exceed two years.
(3) Any ex parte temporary or final sexual assault protection order
may be renewed one or more times, as required. The petitioner may
apply for renewal of the order by filing a petition for renewal at any
time within the three months before the order expires. If the motion
for renewal is uncontested and the petitioner seeks no modification of
the order, the order may be renewed on the basis of the petitioner's
motion or affidavit stating that there has been no material change in
relevant circumstances since entry of the order and stating the reason
for the requested renewal. Renewals may be granted only in open court.
(4) Any sexual assault protection order which would expire on a
court holiday shall instead expire at the close of the next court
business day.
(5) The practice of dismissing or suspending a criminal prosecution
in exchange for the issuance of a sexual assault protection order
undermines the purposes of this chapter. This section shall not be
construed as encouraging that practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) Any sexual assault protection order
shall describe each remedy granted by the court, in reasonable detail
and not by reference to any other document, so that the respondent may
clearly understand what he or she must do or refrain from doing.
(2) A sexual assault protection order shall further state the
following:
(a) The name of each petitioner that the court finds was the victim
of nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration by
the respondent;
(b) The date and time the sexual assault protection order was
issued, whether it is an ex parte temporary or final order, and the
duration of the order;
(c) The date, time, and place for any scheduled hearing for renewal
of that sexual assault protection order or for another order of greater
duration or scope;
(d) For each remedy in an ex parte temporary sexual assault
protection order, the reason for entering that remedy without prior
notice to the respondent or greater notice than was actually given;
(e) For ex parte temporary sexual assault protection orders, that
the respondent may petition the court, to reopen the order if he or she
did not receive actual prior notice of the hearing and if the
respondent alleges that he or she had a meritorious defense to the
order or that the order or its remedy is not authorized by this
chapter.
(3) A sexual assault protection order shall include the following
notice, printed in conspicuous type: "A knowing violation of this
sexual assault protection order is a criminal offense under chapter
26.50 RCW and will subject a violator to arrest. You can be arrested
even if any person protected by the order invites or allows you to
violate the order's prohibitions. You have the sole responsibility to
avoid or refrain from violating the order's provisions. Only the court
can change the order."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) An order issued under this chapter
shall be personally served upon the respondent, except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section.
(2) The sheriff of the county or the peace officers of the
municipality in which the respondent resides shall serve the respondent
personally unless the petitioner elects to have the respondent served
by a private party.
(3) If service by a sheriff or municipal peace officer is to be
used, the clerk of the court shall have a copy of any order issued
under this chapter forwarded on or before the next judicial day to the
appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order for service
upon the respondent. Service of an order issued under this chapter
shall take precedence over the service of other documents unless they
are of a similar emergency nature.
(4) If the sheriff or municipal peace officer cannot complete
service upon the respondent within ten days, the sheriff or municipal
peace officer shall notify the petitioner. The petitioner shall
provide information sufficient to permit notification.
(5) Returns of service under this chapter shall be made in
accordance with the applicable court rules.
(6) If an order entered by the court recites that the respondent
appeared in person before the court, the necessity for further service
is waived and proof of service of that order is not necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1)(a) When any person charged with or
arrested for a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, a violation of
RCW 9A.44.096, a violation of RCW 9.68A.090, or a gross misdemeanor
that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal
solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit an offense that is
classified as a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030, is released from
custody before arraignment or trial on bail or personal recognizance,
the court authorizing the release may prohibit that person from having
any contact with the victim. The jurisdiction authorizing the release
shall determine whether that person should be prohibited from having
any contact with the victim. If there is no outstanding restraining or
protective order prohibiting that person from having contact with the
victim, the court authorizing release may issue, by telephone, a sexual
assault protection order prohibiting the person charged or arrested
from having contact with the victim or from knowingly coming within, or
knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a location.
(b) In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions
of RCW 9.41.800.
(c) The sexual assault protection order shall also be issued in
writing as soon as possible.
(2)(a) At the time of arraignment or whenever a motion is brought
to modify the conditions of the defendant's release, the court shall
determine whether a sexual assault protection order shall be issued or
extended. If a sexual assault protection order is issued or extended,
the court may also include in the conditions of release a requirement
that the defendant submit to electronic monitoring. If electronic
monitoring is ordered, the court shall specify who shall provide the
monitoring services, and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed. Upon conviction, the court may require as a condition of
the sentence that the defendant reimburse the providing agency for the
costs of the electronic monitoring.
(b) A sexual assault protection order issued by the court in
conjunction with criminal charges shall terminate if the defendant is
acquitted or the charges are dismissed, unless the victim files an
independent action for a sexual assault protection order. If the
victim files an independent action for a sexual assault protection
order, the order may be continued by the court until a full hearing is
conducted pursuant to section 6 of this act.
(3)(a) The written order releasing the person charged or arrested
shall contain the court's directives and shall bear the legend:
"Violation of this order is a criminal offense under chapter 26.50 RCW
and will subject a violator to arrest. You can be arrested even if any
person protected by the order invites or allows you to violate the
order's prohibitions. You have the sole responsibility to avoid or
refrain from violating the order's provisions. Only the court can
change the order."
(b) A certified copy of the order shall be provided to the victim
at no charge.
(4) If a sexual assault protection order has been issued prior to
charging, that order shall expire at arraignment or within seventy-two
hours if charges are not filed. Such orders need not be entered into
the computer-based criminal intelligence information system in this
state which is used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding
warrants.
(5) Whenever an order prohibiting contact is issued pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section, the clerk of the court shall forward a
copy of the order on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate
law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the
copy of the order, the law enforcement agency shall enter the order for
one year or until the expiration date specified on the order into any
computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in
this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding
warrants. Entry into the computer-based criminal intelligence
information system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies
of the existence of the order. The order is fully enforceable in any
jurisdiction in the state.
(6)(a) When a defendant is found guilty of a sex offense as defined
in RCW 9.94A.030, any violation of RCW 9A.44.096, or any violation of
RCW 9.68A.090, or any gross misdemeanor that is, under chapter 9A.28
RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy
to commit an offense that is classified as a sex offense under RCW
9.94A.030, and a condition of the sentence restricts the defendant's
ability to have contact with the victim, the condition shall be
recorded as a sexual assault protection order.
(b) The written order entered as a condition of sentencing shall
contain the court's directives and shall bear the legend: "Violation
of this order is a criminal offense under chapter 26.50 RCW and will
subject a violator to arrest. You can be arrested even if any person
protected by the order invites or allows you to violate the order's
prohibitions. You have the sole responsibility to avoid or refrain
from violating the order's provisions. Only the court can change the
order."
(c) A final sexual assault protection order entered in conjunction
with a criminal prosecution shall remain in effect for a period of two
years following the expiration of any sentence of imprisonment and
subsequent period of community supervision, conditional release,
probation, or parole.
(d) A certified copy of the order shall be provided to the victim
at no charge.
(7) A knowing violation of a court order issued under subsection
(1), (2), or (6) of this section is punishable under RCW 26.50.110.
(8) Whenever a sexual assault protection order is issued, modified,
or terminated under subsection (1), (2), or (6) of this section, the
clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order on or before the
next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified
in the order. Upon receipt of the copy of the order, the law
enforcement agency shall enter the order for one year or until the
expiration date specified on the order into any computer-based criminal
intelligence information system available in this state used by law
enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the
computer-based criminal intelligence information system constitutes
notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of the order.
The order is fully enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state. Upon
receipt of notice that an order has been terminated under subsection
(2) of this section, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order
from the computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) A copy of a sexual assault protection
order granted under this chapter shall be forwarded by the clerk of the
court on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law
enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order,
the law enforcement agency shall immediately enter the order into any
computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in
this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding
warrants. The order shall remain in the computer for one year or until
the expiration date specified on the order. Upon receipt of notice
that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall
remove the order from the computer-based criminal intelligence
information system. The law enforcement agency shall only expunge from
the computer-based criminal intelligence information system orders that
are expired, vacated, terminated, or superseded. Entry into the law
enforcement information system constitutes notice to all law
enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully
enforceable in any county in the state.
(2) The information entered into the computer-based criminal
intelligence information system shall include notice to law enforcement
whether the order was personally served, served by publication, or
served by mail.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Upon application with notice to all parties
and after a hearing, the court may modify the terms of an existing
sexual assault protection order. In any situation where an order is
terminated or modified before its expiration date, the clerk of the
court shall forward on or before the next judicial day a true copy of
the modified order or the termination order to the appropriate law
enforcement agency specified in the modified or termination order.
Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency shall promptly
enter it in the computer-based criminal intelligence information
system, or if the order is terminated, remove the order from the
computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) The administrative office of the courts
shall develop and prepare instructions and informational brochures
required under section 5 of this act, standard petition and order for
protection forms, and a court staff handbook on sexual assault, and the
protection order process. The standard petition and order for
protection forms must be used after September 1, 2006, for all
petitions filed and orders issued under this chapter. The
instructions, brochures, forms, and handbook shall be prepared in
consultation with interested persons, including a representative of the
state sexual assault coalition, judges, and law enforcement personnel.
(a) The instructions shall be designed to assist petitioners in
completing the petition, and shall include a sample of standard
petition and order for protection forms.
(b) The informational brochure shall describe the use of and the
process for obtaining, modifying, and terminating a protection order as
provided under this chapter.
(c) The order for protection form shall include, in a conspicuous
location, notice of criminal penalties resulting from violation of the
order, and the following statement: "You can be arrested even if the
person or persons who obtained the order invite or allow you to violate
the order's prohibitions. The respondent has the sole responsibility
to avoid or refrain from violating the order's provisions. Only the
court can change the order upon written application."
(d) The court staff handbook shall allow for the addition of a
community resource list by the court clerk.
(2) All court clerks shall obtain a community resource list from a
sexual assault program serving the county in which the court is
located. The community resource list shall include the names and
telephone numbers of sexual assault programs serving the community in
which the court is located, including law enforcement agencies,
domestic violence agencies, sexual assault agencies, legal assistance
programs, interpreters, multicultural programs, and batterers'
treatment programs. The court shall make the community resource list
available as part of or in addition to the informational brochures
described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The administrative office of the courts shall distribute a
master copy of the petition and order forms, instructions, and
informational brochures to all court clerks and shall distribute a
master copy of the petition and order forms to all superior, district,
and municipal courts.
(4) For purposes of this section, "court clerks" means court
administrators in courts of limited jurisdiction and elected court
clerks.
(5) The administrative office of the courts shall determine the
significant non-English-speaking or limited English-speaking
populations in the state. The administrator shall then arrange for
translation of the instructions and informational brochures required by
this section, which shall contain a sample of the standard petition and
order for protection forms, into the languages spoken by those
significant non-English-speaking populations and shall distribute a
master copy of the translated instructions and informational brochures
to all court clerks by December 1, 2006.
(6) The administrative office of the courts shall update the
instructions, brochures, standard petition and order for protection
forms, and court staff handbook when changes in the law make an update
necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 An ex parte temporary order issued under
this chapter shall not be admissible as evidence in any subsequent
civil action for damages arising from the conduct alleged in the
petition or the order.

Sec. 21 RCW 9A.46.060 and 2004 c 94 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, "harassment" may include but is not
limited to any of the following crimes:
(1) Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020);
(2) Malicious harassment (RCW 9A.36.080);
(3) Telephone harassment (RCW 9.61.230);
(4) Assault in the first degree (RCW 9A.36.011);
(5) Assault of a child in the first degree (RCW 9A.36.120);
(6) Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021);
(7) Assault of a child in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.130);
(8) Assault in the fourth degree (RCW 9A.36.041);
(9) Reckless endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);
(10) Extortion in the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120);
(11) Extortion in the second degree (RCW 9A.56.130);
(12) Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);
(13) Burglary in the first degree (RCW 9A.52.020);
(14) Burglary in the second degree (RCW 9A.52.030);
(15) Criminal trespass in the first degree (RCW 9A.52.070);
(16) Criminal trespass in the second degree (RCW 9A.52.080);
(17) Malicious mischief in the first degree (RCW 9A.48.070);
(18) Malicious mischief in the second degree (RCW 9A.48.080);
(19) Malicious mischief in the third degree (RCW 9A.48.090);
(20) Kidnapping in the first degree (RCW 9A.40.020);
(21) Kidnapping in the second degree (RCW 9A.40.030);
(22) Unlawful imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040);
(23) Rape in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.040);
(24) Rape in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.050);
(25) Rape in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.060);
(26) Indecent liberties (RCW 9A.44.100);
(27) Rape of a child in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.073);
(28) Rape of a child in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.076);
(29) Rape of a child in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.079);
(30) Child molestation in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.083);
(31) Child molestation in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.086);
(32) Child molestation in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.089);
(33) Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110);
(34) Cyberstalking (RCW 9.61.260);
(35) Residential burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);
(36) Violation of a temporary ((or)), permanent, or final
protective order issued pursuant to chapter 7.-- (sections 1 through 20
of this act), 9A.46, 10.14, 10.99, 26.09, or 26.50 RCW;
(37) Unlawful discharge of a laser in the first degree (RCW
9A.49.020); and
(38) Unlawful discharge of a laser in the second degree (RCW
9A.49.030).

Sec. 22 RCW 10.14.130 and 1987 c 280 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Protection orders authorized under this chapter shall not be issued
for any action specifically covered by chapter 7.-- (sections 1 through
20 of this act), 10.99, or 26.50 RCW.

Sec. 23 RCW 10.31.100 and 2000 c 119 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has
committed or is committing a felony shall have the authority to arrest
the person without a warrant. A police officer may arrest a person
without a warrant for committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
only when the offense is committed in the presence of the officer,
except as provided in subsections (1) through (10) of this section.
(1) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor, involving physical harm or threats of harm to any person
or property or the unlawful taking of property or involving the use or
possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition, possession, or
consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one years
under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070
or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(2) A police officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that:
(a) An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge
under RCW 26.44.063, or chapter 7.-- (sections 1 through 20 of this
act), 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, 26.50, or 74.34 RCW restraining the
person and the person has violated the terms of the order restraining
the person from acts or threats of violence, or restraining the person
from going onto the grounds of or entering a residence, workplace,
school, or day care, or prohibiting the person from knowingly coming
within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a
location or, in the case of an order issued under RCW 26.44.063,
imposing any other restrictions or conditions upon the person; or
(b) A foreign protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, has
been issued of which the person under restraint has knowledge and the
person under restraint has violated a provision of the foreign
protection order prohibiting the person under restraint from contacting
or communicating with another person, or excluding the person under
restraint from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or
prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly
remaining within, a specified distance of a location, or a violation of
any provision for which the foreign protection order specifically
indicates that a violation will be a crime; or
(c) The person is sixteen years or older and within the preceding
four hours has assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW
10.99.020 and the officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has
occurred; (ii) an assault has occurred which has resulted in bodily
injury to the victim, whether the injury is observable by the
responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical action has
occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to fear
imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical
pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the
officer has probable cause to believe that family or household members
have assaulted each other, the officer is not required to arrest both
persons. The officer shall arrest the person whom the officer believes
to be the primary physical aggressor. In making this determination,
the officer shall make every reasonable effort to consider: (i) The
intent to protect victims of domestic violence under RCW 10.99.010;
(ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or serious threats
creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of domestic
violence between the persons involved.
(3) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of any of the
following traffic laws shall have the authority to arrest the person:
(a) RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(b) RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(c) RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or
racing of vehicles;
(d) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(e) RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while
operator's license is suspended or revoked;
(f) RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a
negligent manner.
(4) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor
vehicle accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in
the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the
driver has committed in connection with the accident a violation of any
traffic law or regulation.
(5) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of RCW 79A.60.040
shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(6) An officer may act upon the request of a law enforcement
officer in whose presence a traffic infraction was committed, to stop,
detain, arrest, or issue a notice of traffic infraction to the driver
who is believed to have committed the infraction. The request by the
witnessing officer shall give an officer the authority to take
appropriate action under the laws of the state of Washington.
(7) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing any act of indecent exposure, as
defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may arrest the person.
(8) A police officer may arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that
an order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under
chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated the terms of that order.
(9) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has, within twenty-four hours of the alleged violation,
committed a violation of RCW 9A.50.020 may arrest such person.
(10) A police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person illegally possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm or
other dangerous weapon on private or public elementary or secondary
school premises shall have the authority to arrest the person.
For purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).
(11) Except as specifically provided in subsections (2), (3), (4),
and (6) of this section, nothing in this section extends or otherwise
affects the powers of arrest prescribed in Title 46 RCW.
(12) No police officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for
making an arrest pursuant to RCW 10.31.100 (2) or (8) if the police
officer acts in good faith and without malice.

Sec. 24 RCW 19.220.010 and 2003 c 268 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each international matchmaking organization doing business in
Washington state shall disseminate to a recruit, upon request, state
background check information and personal history information relating
to any Washington state resident about whom any information is provided
to the recruit, in the recruit's native language. The organization
shall notify all recruits that background check and personal history
information is available upon request. The notice that background
check and personal history information is available upon request shall
be in the recruit's native language and shall be displayed in a manner
that separates it from other information, is highly noticeable, and in
lettering not less than one-quarter of an inch high.
(2) If an international matchmaking organization receives a request
for information from a recruit pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, the organization shall notify the Washington state resident of
the request. Upon receiving notification, the Washington state
resident shall obtain from the state patrol and provide to the
organization the complete transcript of any background check
information provided pursuant to RCW 43.43.760 based on a submission of
fingerprint impressions and provided pursuant to RCW 43.43.838 and
shall provide to the organization his or her personal history
information. The organization shall require the resident to affirm
that personal history information is complete and accurate. The
organization shall refrain from knowingly providing any further
services to the recruit or the Washington state resident in regards to
facilitating future interaction between the recruit and the Washington
state resident until the organization has obtained the requested
information and provided it to the recruit.
(3) This section does not apply to a traditional matchmaking
organization of a religious nature that otherwise operates in
compliance with the laws of the countries of the recruits of such
organization and the laws of the United States nor to any organization
that does not charge a fee to any party for the service provided.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "International matchmaking organization" means a corporation,
partnership, business, or other legal entity, whether or not organized
under the laws of the United States or any state, that does business in
the United States and for profit offers to Washington state residents,
including aliens lawfully admitted for permanent residence and residing
in Washington state, dating, matrimonial, or social referral services
involving citizens of a foreign country or countries who are not
residing in the United States, by: (i) An exchange of names, telephone
numbers, addresses, or statistics; (ii) selection of photographs; or
(iii) a social environment provided by the organization in a country
other than the United States.
(b) "Personal history information" means a declaration of the
person's current marital status, the number of previous marriages,
annulments, and dissolutions for the person, and whether any previous
marriages occurred as a result of receiving services from an
international matchmaking organization; founded allegations of child
abuse or neglect; and any existing orders under chapter 7.-- (sections
1 through 20 of this act), 10.14, 10.99, or 26.50 RCW. Personal
history information shall include information from the state of
Washington and any information from other states or countries.
(c) "Recruit" means a noncitizen, nonresident person, recruited by
an international matchmaking organization for the purpose of providing
dating, matrimonial, or social referral services.

Sec. 25 RCW 26.50.110 and 2000 c 119 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever an order is granted under this chapter, chapter 7.--(sections 1 through 20 of this act), 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or
74.34 RCW, or there is a valid foreign protection order as defined in
RCW 26.52.020, and the respondent or person to be restrained knows of
the order, a violation of the restraint provisions, or of a provision
excluding the person from a residence, workplace, school, or day care,
or of a provision prohibiting a person from knowingly coming within, or
knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a location, or of
a provision of a foreign protection order specifically indicating that
a violation will be a crime, for which an arrest is required under RCW
10.31.100(2) (a) or (b), is a gross misdemeanor except as provided in
subsections (4) and (5) of this section. Upon conviction, and in
addition to any other penalties provided by law, the court may require
that the respondent submit to electronic monitoring. The court shall
specify who shall provide the electronic monitoring services, and the
terms under which the monitoring shall be performed. The order also
may include a requirement that the respondent pay the costs of the
monitoring. The court shall consider the ability of the convicted
person to pay for electronic monitoring.
(2) A peace officer shall arrest without a warrant and take into
custody a person whom the peace officer has probable cause to believe
has violated an order issued under this chapter, chapter 7.-- (sections
1 through 20 of this act), 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or
a valid foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, that
restrains the person or excludes the person from a residence,
workplace, school, or day care, or prohibits the person from knowingly
coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of
a location, if the person restrained knows of the order. Presence of
the order in the law enforcement computer-based criminal intelligence
information system is not the only means of establishing knowledge of
the order.
(3) A violation of an order issued under this chapter, chapter 7.--(sections 1 through 20 of this act), 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or
74.34 RCW, or of a valid foreign protection order as defined in RCW
26.52.020, shall also constitute contempt of court, and is subject to
the penalties prescribed by law.
(4) Any assault that is a violation of an order issued under this
chapter, chapter 7.-- (sections 1 through 20 of this act), 10.99,
26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or of a valid foreign protection
order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, and that does not amount to assault
in the first or second degree under RCW 9A.36.011 or 9A.36.021 is a
class C felony, and any conduct in violation of such an order that is
reckless and creates a substantial risk of death or serious physical
injury to another person is a class C felony.
(5) A violation of a court order issued under this chapter, chapter
7.-- (sections 1 through 20 of this act), 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26,
or 74.34 RCW, or of a valid foreign protection order as defined in RCW
26.52.020, is a class C felony if the offender has at least two
previous convictions for violating the provisions of an order issued
under this chapter, chapter 7.-- (sections 1 through 20 of this act),
10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or a valid foreign protection
order as defined in RCW 26.52.020. The previous convictions may
involve the same victim or other victims specifically protected by the
orders the offender violated.
(6) Upon the filing of an affidavit by the petitioner or any peace
officer alleging that the respondent has violated an order granted
under this chapter, chapter 7.-- (sections 1 through 20 of this act),
10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or a valid foreign protection
order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, the court may issue an order to the
respondent, requiring the respondent to appear and show cause within
fourteen days why the respondent should not be found in contempt of
court and punished accordingly. The hearing may be held in the court
of any county or municipality in which the petitioner or respondent
temporarily or permanently resides at the time of the alleged
violation.

Sec. 26 RCW 26.50.160 and 2000 c 119 s 25 and 2000 c 51 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
To prevent the issuance of competing protection orders in different
courts and to give courts needed information for issuance of orders,
the judicial information system shall be available in each district,
municipal, and superior court by July 1, 1997, and shall include a data
base containing the following information:
(1) The names of the parties and the cause number for every order
of protection issued under this title, every sexual assault protection
order issued under chapter 7.-- RCW (sections 1 through 20 of this
act), every criminal no-contact order issued under chapters 9A.46 and
10.99 RCW, every antiharassment order issued under chapter 10.14 RCW,
every dissolution action under chapter 26.09 RCW, every third-party
custody action under chapter 26.10 RCW, every parentage action under
chapter 26.26 RCW, every restraining order issued on behalf of an
abused child or adult dependent person under chapter 26.44 RCW, every
foreign protection order filed under chapter 26.52 RCW, and every order
for protection of a vulnerable adult under chapter 74.34 RCW. When a
guardian or the department of social and health services has petitioned
for relief on behalf of an abused child, adult dependent person, or
vulnerable adult, the name of the person on whose behalf relief was
sought shall be included in the data base as a party rather than the
guardian or department;
(2) A criminal history of the parties; and
(3) Other relevant information necessary to assist courts in
issuing orders under this chapter as determined by the judicial
information system committee.

Sec. 27 RCW 59.18.575 and 2004 c 17 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a tenant notifies the landlord in writing that he or she
or a household member was a victim of an act that constitutes a crime
of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, and either (a)(i) or
(ii) of this subsection applies, then subsection (2) of this section
applies:
(i) The tenant or the household member has a valid order for
protection under one or more of the following: Chapter 7.-- (sections
1 through 20 of this act), 26.50, or 26.26 RCW or RCW 9A.46.040,
9A.46.050, 10.14.080, 10.99.040 (2) or (3), or 26.09.050; or
(ii) The tenant or the household member has reported the domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking to a qualified third party acting
in his or her official capacity and the qualified third party has
provided the tenant or the household member a written record of the
report signed by the qualified third party.
(b) When a copy of a valid order for protection or a written record
of a report signed by a qualified third party, as required under (a) of
this subsection, is made available to the landlord, the tenant may
terminate the rental agreement and quit the premises without further
obligation under the rental agreement or under chapter 59.12 RCW.
However, the request to terminate the rental agreement must occur
within ninety days of the reported act, event, or circumstance that
gave rise to the protective order or report to a qualified third party.
A record of the report to a qualified third party that is provided to
the tenant or household member shall consist of a document signed and
dated by the qualified third party stating: (i) That the tenant or the
household member notified him or her that he or she was a victim of an
act or acts that constitute a crime of domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking; (ii) the time and date the act or acts occurred;
(iii) the location where the act or acts occurred; (iv) a brief
description of the act or acts of domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking; and (v) that the tenant or household member informed him or
her of the name of the alleged perpetrator of the act or acts. The
record of the report provided to the tenant or household member shall
not include the name of the alleged perpetrator of the act or acts of
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking. The qualified third
party shall keep a copy of the record of the report and shall note on
the retained copy the name of the alleged perpetrator of the act or
acts of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking. The record of
the report to a qualified third party may be accomplished by completion
of a form provided by the qualified third party, in substantially the
following form:

(2) A tenant who terminates a rental agreement under this section
is discharged from the payment of rent for any period following the
last day of the month of the quitting date. The tenant shall remain
liable for the rent for the month in which he or she terminated the
rental agreement unless the termination is in accordance with RCW
59.18.200(1). Notwithstanding lease provisions that allow for
forfeiture of a deposit for early termination, a tenant who terminates
under this section is entitled to the return of the full deposit,
subject to RCW 59.18.020 and 59.18.280. Other tenants who are parties
to the rental agreement, except household members who are the victims
of sexual assault, stalking, or domestic violence, are not released
from their obligations under the rental agreement or other obligations
under this chapter.
(3) The provision of verification of a report under subsection
(1)(b) of this section does not waive the confidential or privileged
nature of the communication between a victim of domestic violence,
sexual assault, or stalking with a qualified third party pursuant to
RCW 5.60.060, 70.123.075, or 70.125.065. No record or evidence
obtained from such disclosure may be used in any civil, administrative,
or criminal proceeding against the victim unless a written waiver of
applicable evidentiary privilege is obtained, except that the
verification itself, and no other privileged information, under
subsection (1)(b) of this section may be used in civil proceedings
brought under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 This act may be cited as the sexual assault
protection order act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 Sections 1 through 20 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

--- END ---