BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that healthy shellfish
populations are an important component of the Puget Sound ecosystem, by
filtering water and improving water quality. The legislature further
finds that shellfish harvests provide jobs, generate economic benefits,
and provide state funds for public access to aquatic lands and
management of state aquatic resources. The legislature further finds
that point source outfalls result in the closure of shellfish beds, and
the loss of both environmental and economic benefits. The legislature
further finds that investments to address shellfish closures due to
point source outfalls may result in long-term financial and
environmental benefits. The legislature therefore finds that a
systematic approach to evaluating outfalls in Puget Sound must be
conducted with the goal of improving water quality and reducing the
closure of shellfish beds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of ecology, in
cooperation with the department of health, the department of natural
resources, the department of fish and wildlife, and representatives
from affected stakeholders, including, but not limited to,
environmental interests, shellfish growers, and organizations
representing both public and private outfalls, shall conduct a
systematic evaluation of point source outfalls in Puget Sound and their
impact on shellfish by December 1, 2006.
(2) The evaluation must:
(a) Identify all point source outfalls in Puget Sound in relation
to shellfish growing areas;
(b) Estimate the shellfish areas closed due to outfalls, including
an estimate of the impact on commercial shellfish harvests;
(c) Determine options for altering the outfall to increase
shellfish areas available for harvest. The options may include new
treatment technologies, water reuse, or other options that result in
either removal of the outfall, reducing or otherwise improving the
water quality of the discharge, or other outcomes resulting in an
increase in shellfish growing areas; and
(d) Prioritize projects based on the costs of making improvements
in relation to the economic and environmental benefits of the project.
(3) The department of ecology, in cooperation with the department
of health, the department of natural resources, and the department of
fish and wildlife, and affected stakeholders shall develop
recommendations and report findings to the appropriate committees of
the legislature for funding options to implement projects identified in
subsection (2)(d) of this section by December 1, 2006. The
recommendations must include incentives to encourage current operators
of legally permitted outfalls to undertake projects that would improve
water quality and increase shellfish growing areas. The report must
also include a review of all current grant and loan programs available
to fund projects identified in the list.

--- END ---