BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that language and
cultural differences, as well as economic hardship, can create barriers
to effective parental involvement in the schools for some families.
Some schools and school districts are taking innovative steps to
successfully reach out and include the parents of immigrant students,
students of color, and low-income students in the life of the school.
Some schools and school districts are also working hard to involve
community organizations that are reflective of their diverse student
bodies in the life of the school as a way to create an educational
environment that maximizes student learning. It is the legislature's
intent to dedicate new funding to support and replicate successful
parent and community involvement models within diverse student
populations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall administer a
competitive grant program designed to increase parent and community
involvement efforts within diverse communities.
(2) Schools or school districts may submit an application to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to receive a grant
under this section. No more than three proposals may be submitted from
a single school district.
(3) The superintendent shall convene an application review
committee that includes school personnel, parents, community-based
organizations, refugees and immigrants, persons representing different
regions of the state, and persons with expertise in cultural
competency. The review committee shall consider such factors as need
as indicated by student poverty and test scores, demonstration of
previous strengths in parent and community involvement, parent
involvement in decision making, cultural relevancy, and program
outcomes based on quantitative and qualitative evidence.
(4) Grants shall be awarded for a one-year period, but recipients
may apply for a renewal of the grant for a second year. The
superintendent shall award no more than ten grants per year. The
amount of a grant may range from twenty-five to fifty thousand dollars.
(5) The objectives of a program funded under this section are to
increase school or school district capacity to work with diverse
families and increase parent leadership and parenting skills. Grant
recipients shall allocate their grant funds evenly between these two
objectives.
(a) To increase capacity, grant recipients should collaborate with
community organizations to develop cultural competency skills through
professional development training; establish a welcoming, reflective,
and accessible school climate; create plans for community conversations
between school administration and the target population; and assess
current parent and community involvement efforts for relevancy,
success, and sustainability.
(b) To increase parent leadership and parenting skills, grant
recipients should collaborate with community organizations to provide
nontraditional pathways for engagement in schools; develop parent
leadership and parenting skills in culturally appropriate and
respectful ways; and recognize and use the inherent strengths of
parents.
(6) Grant recipients shall submit a report at the end of the year
to the office of the superintendent of public instruction with
quantitative and qualitative data that demonstrate increased
participation of families in schools and institutional change in the
schools as a result of the program. The report shall also include a
summary of the program, best practices, challenges, and benefits. The
superintendent shall make the reports available to other interested
schools and districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the superintendent
of public instruction for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---