BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) A blue ribbon growth management needs
and priorities task force is established to provide the governor and
the legislature with an analysis of how the growth management act has
worked in meeting the goals and requirements set forth in chapter
36.70A RCW and to provide recommendations on how it can be improved to
ensure meeting those goals. The task force shall be comprised of
members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The chairs and ranking minority members of the senate
government operations and elections committee and senate transportation
committee, or their elected official designees.
(ii) The chairs and ranking minority members of the house of
representatives local government committee and house of representatives
capital budget committee, or their elected official designees.
(iii) The president, board chairperson, or nonstaff person
appointed by each of the following organizations: Washington state
association of counties, association of Washington cities, association
of Washington business, Washington environmental council, building
industry association of Washington, Futurewise, Washington state farm
bureau, Washington league of women voters, and a representative of the
University of Washington's school of public policy.
(iv) Advisory committees may be established as appropriate to
provide the task force with perspectives from public, private, and
academic organizations.
(b) In addition, the task force shall retain the services of an
independent fact-finder to assemble, analyze, and present information
for its consideration in response to tasks specified in subsection
(2)(a) through (d) of this section.
(c) The task force shall convene its first meeting no later than
June 1, 2006, and shall choose two cochairs from among its legislative
membership. The task force shall submit an interim report to the
governor and legislature not later than November 1, 2006, which shall
contain, at minimum, the findings to date of the independent fact-finder. The task force shall submit its final report and
recommendations for legislative changes, if any, to the governor and
the legislature not later than December 1, 2007.
(2) The task force shall retain the services of an independent
fact-finder for the purpose of gathering, analyzing, and reporting
information on the positive and controversial aspects of implementing
the growth management act. The task force shall initially focus its
work and analysis on the following topics and in the following order:
(a) How best to adequately protect environmentally sensitive lands
from adverse impacts resulting from new development. This topic shall
include the consideration of how state and local governments should
best find, consider, and apply the pertinent best available science
when developing and implementing land use regulations applicable to new
or redeveloped uses on environmentally sensitive lands;
(b) How best to ensure that the levels of service provided by state
highways do not fall below acceptable levels due to growth and
development occurring adjacent to or nearby such highways;
(c) How best to provide counties, cities, towns, school districts,
water-sewer districts, and fire districts with the fiscal and planning
tools necessary to meet their collective obligations to accommodate
state growth projections developed pursuant to RCW 43.62.035; and
(d) Conduct such other studies or tasks as time and resources
allow.
(3) The task force, when appropriate, may consult with individuals
from the public and private sectors or ask those individuals to
establish one or more advisory committees. Members of these advisory
committees are not entitled to expense reimbursement.
(4) The task force may contract with additional persons who have
specific technical expertise if that expertise is necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section. Such a contract may be entered
into only if an appropriation is specifically provided for in the
operations of the task force.
(5) Staff support for the task force shall be provided by the
senate committee services, the house of representatives office of
program research, the department of community, trade, and economic
development, and the office of financial management.
(6) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly by the senate and the
house of representatives. Task force expenditures are subject to
approval by the senate facilities and operations committee and the
house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.
(8) This section expires June 30, 2008.

--- END ---