BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
The office of regulatory assistance shall conduct a collaborative
design pilot program. The pilot program shall, at a minimum, establish
a mechanism for convening collaborative design teams, evaluate the
effectiveness of collaborative design pilot projects, and make findings
and recommendations regarding the feasibility of applying collaborative
design practices throughout the state.
(1) To be eligible for consideration as a collaborative design
pilot program jurisdiction, a county or city must:
(a) Plan under RCW 36.70A.040; and
(b) Provide the office of regulatory assistance with a written
request signed by a majority of the county or city's legislative
authority requesting participation in the pilot program authorized
under this section.
(2) The office of regulatory assistance, the department of
community, trade, and economic development, and the department of
ecology shall develop operational guidelines and criteria for the
collaborative design pilot program. The operational guidelines and
criteria shall include provisions for:
(a) Establishing collaborative design teams comprised of local
government officials with project design and permitting expertise, and
public or private sector project applicants;
(b) Using collaborative design practices in the design and
realization of comprehensive or phased projects;
(c) Varying the application of development regulations and use
regulations adopted under this chapter and chapter 90.58 RCW,
respectively;
(d) Exempting qualifying collaborative design projects from chapter
43.21C RCW;
(e) Expediting county and city processing of permit applications
and project approval requests, including using hearing examiner
systems, for projects utilizing collaborative design teams;
(f) Tracking permit fees and collaborative design team costs
associated with projects authorized under this section; and
(g) Awarding appropriated grant funds in accordance with subsection
(5) of this section.
(3) The office of regulatory assistance, the department of
community, trade, and economic development, and the department of
ecology shall provide technical assistance to counties and cities
participating in the collaborative design pilot program.
(4) Permits and approvals issued pursuant to collaborative design
pilot projects shall provide a level of environmental analysis,
protection, and mitigation that is at least equal to the level required
by the jurisdiction's applicable:
(a) Comprehensive land use plan and development regulations adopted
under this chapter; and
(b) Shoreline master program and use regulations adopted under
chapter 90.58 RCW.
(5) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department of community, trade, and economic
development shall provide grants to counties and cities participating
in the pilot program authorized under this section. The grants shall
be for reimbursing jurisdictions for local government personnel costs
attributable to participating in a collaborative design project.
(6) This act does not limit or otherwise modify the level of
environmental analysis, protection, and mitigation required or
authorized by this chapter and chapters 43.21C and 90.58 RCW.
(7) The office of regulatory assistance shall report its findings
and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the house of
representatives and the senate by December 31, 2009.
(8) This section expires December 31, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county or city participating in the pilot program authorized
under section 1 of this act may, by ordinance or resolution, allow
variances in the application of development regulations adopted under
RCW 36.70A.040 for collaborative design projects if the project and
associated permits and approvals provide a level of environmental
analysis, protection, and mitigation that is at least equal to the
level required by the county or city's applicable comprehensive plan
and development regulations adopted under this chapter.
(2) This section expires December 31, 2009.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.58.100 and 1997 c 369 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The master programs provided for in this chapter, when adopted
or approved by the department shall constitute use regulations for the
various shorelines of the state. In preparing the master programs, and
any amendments thereto, the department and local governments shall to
the extent feasible:
(a) Utilize a systematic interdisciplinary approach which will
insure the integrated use of the natural and social sciences and the
environmental design arts;
(b) Consult with and obtain the comments of any federal, state,
regional, or local agency having any special expertise with respect to
any environmental impact;
(c) Consider all plans, studies, surveys, inventories, and systems
of classification made or being made by federal, state, regional, or
local agencies, by private individuals, or by organizations dealing
with pertinent shorelines of the state;
(d) Conduct or support such further research, studies, surveys, and
interviews as are deemed necessary;
(e) Utilize all available information regarding hydrology,
geography, topography, ecology, economics, and other pertinent data;
(f) Employ, when feasible, all appropriate, modern scientific data
processing and computer techniques to store, index, analyze, and manage
the information gathered.
(2) The master programs shall include, when appropriate, the
following:
(a) An economic development element for the location and design of
industries, industrial projects of statewide significance,
transportation facilities, port facilities, tourist facilities,
commerce and other developments that are particularly dependent on
their location on or use of the shorelines of the state;
(b) A public access element making provision for public access to
publicly owned areas;
(c) A recreational element for the preservation and enlargement of
recreational opportunities, including but not limited to parks,
tidelands, beaches, and recreational areas;
(d) A circulation element consisting of the general location and
extent of existing and proposed major thoroughfares, transportation
routes, terminals, and other public utilities and facilities, all
correlated with the shoreline use element;
(e) A use element which considers the proposed general distribution
and general location and extent of the use on shorelines and adjacent
land areas for housing, business, industry, transportation,
agriculture, natural resources, recreation, education, public buildings
and grounds, and other categories of public and private uses of the
land;
(f) A conservation element for the preservation of natural
resources, including but not limited to scenic vistas, aesthetics, and
vital estuarine areas for fisheries and wildlife protection;
(g) An historic, cultural, scientific, and educational element for
the protection and restoration of buildings, sites, and areas having
historic, cultural, scientific, or educational values;
(h) An element that gives consideration to the statewide interest
in the prevention and minimization of flood damages; and
(i) Any other element deemed appropriate or necessary to effectuate
the policy of this chapter.
(3) The master programs shall include such map or maps, descriptive
text, diagrams and charts, or other descriptive material as are
necessary to provide for ease of understanding.
(4) Master programs will reflect that state-owned shorelines of the
state are particularly adapted to providing wilderness beaches,
ecological study areas, and other recreational activities for the
public and will give appropriate special consideration to same.
(5)(a) Each master program shall contain provisions to allow for
the varying of the application of use regulations of the program,
including provisions for permits for conditional uses and variances, to
insure that strict implementation of a program will not create
unnecessary hardships or thwart the policy enumerated in RCW 90.58.020.
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any such varying shall be
allowed only if extraordinary circumstances are shown ((and)).
Variances are allowed only when the public interest suffers no
substantial detrimental effect. The concept of this subsection (5)(a)
shall be incorporated in the rules adopted by the department relating
to the establishment of a permit system as provided in RCW
90.58.140(3).
(b) Until December 31, 2009, a county or city participating in the
pilot program authorized under section 1 of this act may, by ordinance
or resolution, allow variances in the application of use regulations of
the master program for collaborative design projects if the project and
associated permits and approvals provide a level of environmental
analysis, protection, and mitigation that is at least equal to the
level required by the county or city's applicable master program and
use regulations adopted under this chapter.
(6) Each master program shall contain standards governing the
protection of single family residences and appurtenant structures
against damage or loss due to shoreline erosion. The standards shall
govern the issuance of substantial development permits for shoreline
protection, including structural methods such as construction of
bulkheads, and nonstructural methods of protection. The standards
shall provide for methods which achieve effective and timely protection
against loss or damage to single family residences and appurtenant
structures due to shoreline erosion. The standards shall provide a
preference for permit issuance for measures to protect single family
residences occupied prior to January 1, 1992, where the proposed
measure is designed to minimize harm to the shoreline natural
environment.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.58.140 and 1995 c 347 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A development shall not be undertaken on the shorelines of the
state unless it is consistent with the policy of this chapter and,
after adoption or approval, as appropriate, the applicable guidelines,
rules, or master program.
(2) A substantial development shall not be undertaken on shorelines
of the state without first obtaining a permit from the government
entity having administrative jurisdiction under this chapter.
A permit shall be granted:
(a) From June 1, 1971, until such time as an applicable master
program has become effective, only when the development proposed is
consistent with: (i) The policy of RCW 90.58.020; and (ii) after their
adoption, the guidelines and rules of the department; and (iii) so far
as can be ascertained, the master program being developed for the area;
(b) After adoption or approval, as appropriate, by the department
of an applicable master program, only when the development proposed is
consistent with the applicable master program and this chapter.
(3) The local government shall establish a program, consistent with
rules adopted by the department, for the administration and enforcement
of the permit system provided in this section. The administration of
the system so established shall be performed exclusively by the local
government.
(4) Except as otherwise specifically provided in subsection (11) of
this section, the local government shall require notification of the
public of all applications for permits governed by any permit system
established pursuant to subsection (3) of this section by ensuring that
notice of the application is given by at least one of the following
methods:
(a) Mailing of the notice to the latest recorded real property
owners as shown by the records of the county assessor within at least
three hundred feet of the boundary of the property upon which the
substantial development is proposed;
(b) Posting of the notice in a conspicuous manner on the property
upon which the project is to be constructed; or
(c) Any other manner deemed appropriate by local authorities to
accomplish the objectives of reasonable notice to adjacent landowners
and the public.
The notices shall include a statement that any person desiring to
submit written comments concerning an application, or desiring to
receive notification of the final decision concerning an application as
expeditiously as possible after the issuance of the decision, may
submit the comments or requests for decisions to the local government
within thirty days of the last date the notice is to be published
pursuant to this subsection. The local government shall forward, in a
timely manner following the issuance of a decision, a copy of the
decision to each person who submits a request for the decision.
If a hearing is to be held on an application, notices of such a
hearing shall include a statement that any person may submit oral or
written comments on an application at the hearing.
(5) The system shall include provisions to assure that construction
pursuant to a permit will not begin or be authorized until twenty-one
days from the date the permit decision was filed as provided in
subsection (6) of this section; or until all review proceedings are
terminated if the proceedings were initiated within twenty-one days
from the date of filing as defined in subsection (6) of this section
except as follows:
(a) In the case of any permit issued to the state of Washington,
department of transportation, for the construction and modification of
SR 90 (I-90) on or adjacent to Lake Washington, the construction may
begin after thirty days from the date of filing, and the permits are
valid until December 31, 1995;
(b) Construction may be commenced no sooner than thirty days after
the date of the appeal of the board's decision is filed if a permit is
granted by the local government and (i) the granting of the permit is
appealed to the shorelines hearings board within twenty-one days of the
date of filing, (ii) the hearings board approves the granting of the
permit by the local government or approves a portion of the substantial
development for which the local government issued the permit, and (iii)
an appeal for judicial review of the hearings board decision is filed
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. The appellant may request, within ten
days of the filing of the appeal with the court, a hearing before the
court to determine whether construction pursuant to the permit approved
by the hearings board or to a revised permit issued pursuant to the
order of the hearings board should not commence. If, at the conclusion
of the hearing, the court finds that construction pursuant to such a
permit would involve a significant, irreversible damaging of the
environment, the court shall prohibit the permittee from commencing the
construction pursuant to the approved or revised permit until all
review proceedings are final. Construction pursuant to a permit
revised at the direction of the hearings board may begin only on that
portion of the substantial development for which the local government
had originally issued the permit, and construction pursuant to such a
revised permit on other portions of the substantial development may not
begin until after all review proceedings are terminated. In such a
hearing before the court, the burden of proving whether the
construction may involve significant irreversible damage to the
environment and demonstrating whether such construction would or would
not be appropriate is on the appellant;
(c) If the permit is for a substantial development meeting the
requirements of subsection (11) of this section, construction pursuant
to that permit may not begin or be authorized until twenty-one days
from the date the permit decision was filed as provided in subsection
(6) of this section.
If a permittee begins construction pursuant to subsections (a),
(b), or (c) of this subsection, the construction is begun at the
permittee's own risk. If, as a result of judicial review, the courts
order the removal of any portion of the construction or the restoration
of any portion of the environment involved or require the alteration of
any portion of a substantial development constructed pursuant to a
permit, the permittee is barred from recovering damages or costs
involved in adhering to such requirements from the local government
that granted the permit, the hearings board, or any appellant or
intervener.
(6) Any decision on an application for a permit under the authority
of this section, whether it is an approval or a denial, shall,
concurrently with the transmittal of the ruling to the applicant, be
filed with the department and the attorney general. With regard to a
permit other than a permit governed by subsection (10) of this section,
"date of filing" as used ((herein)) in this section means the date of
actual receipt by the department. With regard to a permit for a
variance or a conditional use, "date of filing" means:
(a) The date a decision of the department rendered on the permit
pursuant to subsection (10)(a) of this section is transmitted by the
department to the local government. The department shall notify in
writing the local government and the applicant of the date of filing;
or
(b) The date a decision of the local government rendered on the
permit under subsection (10)(b) of this section is transmitted by the
local government to the department.
(7) Applicants for permits under this section have the burden of
proving that a proposed substantial development is consistent with the
criteria that must be met before a permit is granted. In any review of
the granting or denial of an application for a permit as provided in
RCW 90.58.180 (1) and (2), the person requesting the review has the
burden of proof.
(8) Any permit may, after a hearing with adequate notice to the
permittee and the public, be rescinded by the issuing authority upon
the finding that a permittee has not complied with conditions of a
permit. If the department is of the opinion that noncompliance exists,
the department shall provide written notice to the local government and
the permittee. If the department is of the opinion that the
noncompliance continues to exist thirty days after the date of the
notice, and the local government has taken no action to rescind the
permit, the department may petition the hearings board for a rescission
of the permit upon written notice of the petition to the local
government and the permittee if the request by the department is made
to the hearings board within fifteen days of the termination of the
thirty-day notice to the local government.
(9) The holder of a certification from the governor pursuant to
chapter 80.50 RCW shall not be required to obtain a permit under this
section.
(10)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any permit
for a variance or a conditional use by local government under approved
master programs must be submitted to the department for its approval or
disapproval.
(b) Until December 31, 2009, permits for variances or conditional
uses under an approved master program requested of a county or city
participating in the pilot program authorized under section 1 of this
act shall be approved or disapproved by the applicable county or city.
(11)(a) An application for a substantial development permit for a
limited utility extension or for the construction of a bulkhead or
other measures to protect a single family residence and its appurtenant
structures from shoreline erosion shall be subject to the following
procedures:
(i) The public comment period under subsection (4) of this section
shall be twenty days. The notice provided under subsection (4) of this
section shall state the manner in which the public may obtain a copy of
the local government decision on the application no later than two days
following its issuance;
(ii) The local government shall issue its decision to grant or deny
the permit within twenty-one days of the last day of the comment period
specified in (i) of this subsection; and
(iii) If there is an appeal of the decision to grant or deny the
permit to the local government legislative authority, the appeal shall
be finally determined by the legislative authority within thirty days.
(b) For purposes of this section, a limited utility extension means
the extension of a utility service that:
(i) Is categorically exempt under chapter 43.21C RCW for one or
more of the following: Natural gas, electricity, telephone, water, or
sewer;
(ii) Will serve an existing use in compliance with this chapter;
and
(iii) Will not extend more than twenty-five hundred linear feet
within the shorelines of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county or city participating in the pilot program authorized
under section 1 of this act may, by ordinance or resolution, establish
categorical exemptions from the requirements of this chapter for
collaborative design projects. An exemption may be adopted by a county
or city under this section if it meets the following criteria:
(a) The project and associated permits and approvals issued
pursuant to a collaborative design project provide a level of
environmental analysis, protection, and mitigation that is at least
equal to the level required by the county or city's applicable
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations adopted under
chapter 36.70A RCW;
(b) The county or city's applicable comprehensive plan was
previously subjected to environmental analysis through an environmental
impact statement under the requirements of this chapter prior to
adoption;
(c) The project and associated permits and approvals issued
pursuant to a collaborative design project provide a level of
environmental analysis, protection, and mitigation that is at least
equal to the level required by the county or city's applicable master
program and use regulations adopted under chapter 90.58 RCW; and
(d) The county or city's applicable shoreline master program was
previously subjected to environmental analysis through an environmental
impact statement under the requirements of this chapter prior to
adoption.
(2) Subsection (1)(c) and (d) of this section shall apply only if
the collaborative design project is proposed for an area subject to the
jurisdiction of chapter 90.58 RCW.
(3) An exemption adopted under this section applies even if it
differs from the categorical exemptions adopted by rule of the
department under RCW 43.21C.110(1)(a).
(4) This section expires December 31, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---