BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Beginning July 1, 2006, the state parks
and recreation commission and the department of fish and wildlife shall
establish a pilot program to evaluate the impacts of small scale
prospecting and mining on ocean beaches. The pilot program shall be
conducted from July 1, 2006, through July 1, 2008.
(2) The state parks and recreation commission, in consultation with
the department of fish and wildlife, shall establish two demonstration
areas in appropriate beach areas in the seashore conservation area to
allow small scale prospecting and mining for purposes of the pilot
program. Each demonstration area shall be (a) in separate areas along
the coast that are not geographically close together; (b) in an area
suitable for small scale mining and prospecting as identified by
persons interested in small scale mining and prospecting; and (c) in
areas having minimal potential for damage to the beach ecology and the
environment.
(3) The department of fish and wildlife shall use existing
authority under chapter 77.55 RCW to issue hydraulic permits for small
scale mining and prospecting within the demonstration areas established
under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The department of fish and wildlife shall monitor the impacts
of the small scale prospecting and mining activities on the beach
ecology including, but not limited to, habitat, birds, shellfish, and
other beach marine life.
(5) By October 1, 2008, the department of fish and wildlife shall
report its findings and recommendations regarding the impacts of small
scale prospecting and mining on the beach ecology to the state parks
and recreation commission. The department shall consider public input
prior to finalizing their findings and recommendations.
(6) The state parks and recreation commission and the department of
fish and wildlife shall report their findings and recommendations on
the impacts of small scale prospecting and mining on ocean beaches to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.

--- END ---