BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that publicly owned
zoological facilities in Washington serve a public purpose by providing
educational and recreational opportunities for Washington citizens and
spurring economic development in the state. The legislature also finds
that private funds are critical to the survival of publicly owned
zoological facilities. When a public owner of a zoological facility
contracts with a nonprofit corporation to raise private funds through
the management and operations of the facility, additional excise taxes
apply. The legislature intends these nonprofit organizations to pay
the same taxes as other nonprofit artistic and cultural organizations
within the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.4328 and 1985 c 471 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 82.04.4322, 82.04.4324, 82.04.4326,
82.04.4327, 82.08.031, and 82.12.031, the term "artistic or cultural
organization" means an organization which is organized and operated
exclusively for the purpose of providing artistic ((or)), cultural, or
zoological exhibitions, presentations, ((or)) performances, or
((cultural or art)) education programs, as defined in subsection (2) of
this section, for viewing or attendance by the general public. The
organization must be a not-for-profit corporation under chapter 24.03
RCW and managed by a governing board of not less than eight individuals
none of whom is a paid employee of the organization or by a corporation
sole under chapter 24.12 RCW. In addition, to qualify for deduction or
exemption from taxation under RCW 82.04.4322, 82.04.4324, 82.04.4326,
82.04.4327, 82.08.031, and 82.12.031, the corporation shall satisfy the
following conditions:
(a) No part of its income may be paid directly or indirectly to its
members, stockholders, officers, directors, or trustees except in the
form of services rendered by the corporation in accordance with its
purposes and bylaws;
(b) Salary or compensation paid to its officers and executives must
be only for actual services rendered, and at levels comparable to the
salary or compensation of like positions within the state;
(c) Assets of the corporation must be irrevocably dedicated to the
activities for which the exemption is granted and, on the liquidation,
dissolution, or abandonment by the corporation, may not inure directly
or indirectly to the benefit of any member or individual except a
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation which also would be
entitled to the exemption;
(d) The corporation must be duly licensed or certified when
licensing or certification is required by law or regulation;
(e) The amounts received that qualify for exemption must be used
for the activities for which the exemption is granted;
(f) Services must be available regardless of race, color, national
origin, or ancestry; and
(g) The director of revenue shall have access to its books in order
to determine whether the corporation is exempt from taxes.
(2) For the purposes of RCW 82.04.4322, 82.04.4324, 82.04.4326,
82.04.4327, 82.08.031, and 82.12.031, the term "artistic ((or)),
cultural, or zoological exhibitions, presentations, ((or))
performances, or ((cultural or art)) education programs," ((includes
and is limited to)) means:
(a) An exhibition or presentation of works of art or objects of
cultural or historical significance, such as those commonly displayed
in art or history museums;
(b) A musical or dramatic performance or series of performances;
((or))
(c) An educational seminar or program, or series of such programs,
offered by the organization to the general public on an artistic,
cultural, or historical subject; or
(d) Exhibitions, presentations, performances, or education programs
provided at a publicly owned zoological facility operated by a
nonprofit organization.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.4322 and 1981 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts received from the United States or any instrumentality thereof
or from the state of Washington or any municipal corporation or
subdivision thereof as compensation for, or to support, artistic
((or)), cultural, or zoological exhibitions, presentations,
performances, or education programs provided by an artistic or cultural
organization for attendance or viewing by the general public.
(2) The definitions and conditions in RCW 82.04.4328 apply to this
section.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.4324 and 1981 c 140 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
by persons subject to payment of the tax on manufacturing under RCW
82.04.240, the value of articles to the extent manufacturing activities
are undertaken by an artistic or cultural organization solely for the
purpose of manufacturing articles for use by the organization in
displaying art objects or presenting artistic ((or)), cultural, or
zoological exhibitions, presentations, performances, or education
programs for attendance or viewing by the general public.
(2) The definitions and conditions in RCW 82.04.4328 apply to this
section.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.04.4326 and 1981 c 140 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts received by artistic or cultural organizations as tuition
charges collected for the privilege of attending artistic ((or)),
cultural, or zoological education programs.
(2) The definitions and conditions in RCW 82.04.4328 apply to this
section.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.04.4327 and 1985 c 471 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
those amounts received by artistic or cultural organizations which
represent income derived from business activities conducted by the
organization.
(2) The definitions and conditions in RCW 82.04.4328 apply to this
section.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.08.031 and 1981 c 140 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales to
artistic or cultural organizations of objects which are acquired for
the purpose of artistic, cultural, or zoological exhibitions ((or)),
presentations, or performances to the general public if the objects
are:
(((1))) (a) Objects of art;
(((2))) (b) Objects of cultural value;
(((3))) (c) Objects to be used in the creation of a work of art,
other than tools; or
(((4))) (d) Objects to be used in displaying art objects or
presenting artistic ((or)), cultural, or zoological exhibitions or
performances.
(2) The definitions and conditions in RCW 82.04.4328 apply to this
section.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.12.031 and 1981 c 140 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use by artistic or cultural organizations of objects which are
acquired for the purpose of artistic, cultural, or zoological
exhibitions, presentations, or performances to the general public if
the objects are:
(((1))) (a) Objects of art;
(((2))) (b) Objects of cultural value;
(((3))) (c) Objects to be used in the creation of a work of art,
other than tools; or
(((4))) (d) Objects to be used in displaying art objects or
presenting artistic ((or)), cultural, or zoological exhibitions or
performances.
(2) The definitions and conditions in RCW 82.04.4328 apply to this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The department of revenue shall review
the tax exemptions benefitting zoological exhibitions, presentations,
performances, and education programs under sections 2 through 7 of this
act. The department shall consider, but not be limited to, the
following factors in the review:
(a) The classes of individuals, types of organizations, or types of
industries whose state tax liabilities are directly affected by the
exemptions;
(b) Public policy objectives that might provide a justification for
the exemptions, including but not limited to the legislative history,
any legislative intent, or the extent to which the exemption encourages
business growth or relocation into this state, promotes growth or
retention of high wage jobs, or helps stabilize communities;
(c) Evidence that the existence of the exemptions has contributed
to the achievement of any of the public policy objectives;
(d) The extent to which continuation of the exemptions might
contribute to any of the public policy objectives;
(e) The extent to which the exemptions may provide unintended
benefits to an individual, organization, or industry other than those
the legislature intended;
(f) The extent to which terminating the exemptions may have
negative effects on the category of taxpayers that currently benefit
from the exemptions, and the extent to which resulting higher taxes may
have negative effects on employment and the economy;
(g) The feasibility of modifying the exemptions to provide for
adjustment or recapture of the tax benefits of the exemptions if the
objectives are not fulfilled;
(h) Fiscal impacts of the exemptions, including past impacts and
expected future impacts if they are continued. For the purposes of
this subsection, "fiscal impact" includes an analysis of the general
effects of the exemptions on the overall state economy including, but
not limited to, the effects of the exemptions on the consumption and
expenditures of persons and businesses within the state;
(i) The extent to which termination of the exemptions would affect
the distribution of liability for payment of state taxes;
(j) Consideration of similar exemptions adopted in other states,
and potential public policy benefits that might be gained by
incorporating corresponding provisions in Washington.
(2) The department shall report its findings and recommendations to
the finance committee of the house of representatives and the ways and
means committee of the senate by December 1, 2016. The department
shall provide a recommendation as to whether the exemptions should be
continued without modification, modified, scheduled for sunset review
at a future date, or terminated immediately. The department may
recommend accountability standards for the future review of the
exemptions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---