BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.55.070 and 1987 c 311 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may impound, tow, or otherwise disturb any
unauthorized vehicle standing on nonresidential private property or in
a public parking facility for less than twenty-four hours unless a sign
is posted near each entrance and on the property in a clearly
conspicuous and visible location to all who park on such property that
clearly indicates:
(a) The vehicles that are considered unauthorized;
(b) The times a vehicle may be impounded as an unauthorized
vehicle; and
(((b))) (c) The name, telephone number, and address of the towing
firm where the vehicle may be redeemed.
(2) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section do not apply
to residential property. Any person having charge of such property may
have an unauthorized vehicle impounded immediately upon giving written
authorization.
(3) The department shall adopt rules relating to the size of the
sign required by subsection (1) of this section, its lettering,
placement, and the number required.
(4) This section applies to all new signs erected after July 1,
1986. All other signs must meet these requirements by July 1, 1989.

--- END ---