BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.16.020 and 2003 c 400 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Apprenticeship program" means ((an)) a state-approved
apprenticeship ((pilot)) program pursuant to chapter 49.04 RCW and
approved under RCW 18.16.280 for the practice of cosmetology,
barbering, esthetics, and manicuring((, which expires July 1, 2006)).
(2) "Apprentice" means a person who is engaged in a state-approved
apprenticeship program and who ((may)) must receive a wage or
compensation while engaged in the program.
(3) "Apprenticeship training committee" means a committee approved
by the Washington apprenticeship and training council established in
chapter 49.04 RCW.
(4) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(((4))) (5) "Board" means the cosmetology, barbering, esthetics,
and manicuring advisory board.
(((5))) (6) "Director" means the director of the department of
licensing or the director's designee.
(((6))) (7) "The practice of cosmetology" means arranging,
dressing, cutting, trimming, styling, shampooing, permanent waving,
chemical relaxing, straightening, curling, bleaching, lightening,
coloring, waxing, tweezing, shaving, and mustache and beard design of
the hair of the face, neck, and scalp; temporary removal of superfluous
hair by use of depilatories, waxing, or tweezing; manicuring and
pedicuring, limited to cleaning, shaping, polishing, decorating, and
caring for and treatment of the cuticles and nails of the hands and
feet, excluding the application and removal of sculptured or otherwise
artificial nails; esthetics limited to toning the skin of the scalp,
stimulating the skin of the body by the use of preparations, tonics,
lotions, or creams; and tinting eyelashes and eyebrows.
(((7))) (8) "Cosmetologist" means a person licensed under this
chapter to engage in the practice of cosmetology.
(((8))) (9) "The practice of barbering" means the cutting,
trimming, arranging, dressing, curling, shampooing, shaving, and
mustache and beard design of the hair of the face, neck, and scalp.
(((9))) (10) "Barber" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of barbering.
(((10))) (11) "Practice of manicuring" means the cleaning, shaping,
polishing, decorating, and caring for and treatment of the cuticles and
the nails of the hands or feet, and the application and removal of
sculptured or otherwise artificial nails by hand or with mechanical or
electrical apparatus or appliances.
(((11))) (12) "Manicurist" means a person licensed under this
chapter to engage in the practice of manicuring.
(((12))) (13) "Practice of esthetics" means care of the skin by
application and use of preparations, antiseptics, tonics, essential
oils, or exfoliants, or by any device or equipment, electrical or
otherwise, or by wraps, compresses, cleansing, conditioning,
stimulation, pore extraction, or product application and removal; the
temporary removal of superfluous hair by means of lotions, creams,
mechanical or electrical apparatus, appliance, waxing, tweezing, or
depilatories; tinting of eyelashes and eyebrows; and lightening the
hair, except the scalp, on another person.
(((13))) (14) "Esthetician" means a person licensed under this
chapter to engage in the practice of esthetics.
(((14))) (15) "Instructor-trainee" means a person who is currently
licensed in this state as a cosmetologist, barber, manicurist, or
esthetician, and is enrolled in an instructor-trainee curriculum in a
school licensed under this chapter.
(((15))) (16) "School" means any establishment that offers
curriculum of instruction in the practice of cosmetology, barbering,
esthetics, manicuring, or instructor-trainee to students and is
licensed under this chapter.
(((16))) (17) "Student" means a person sixteen years of age or
older who is enrolled in a school licensed under this chapter and
receives instruction in any of the curricula of cosmetology, barbering,
esthetics, manicuring, or instructor-training with or without tuition,
fee, or cost, and who does not receive any wage or commission.
(((17))) (18) "Instructor" means a person who gives instruction in
a school, or who provides classroom theory training to apprentices in
locations other than in a school, in a curriculum in which he or she
holds a license under this chapter, has completed at least five hundred
hours of instruction in teaching techniques and lesson planning in a
school, and has passed a licensing examination approved or administered
by the director. An applicant who holds a degree in education from an
accredited postsecondary institution shall upon application be licensed
as an instructor to give instruction in a school, or to provide
classroom theory training to apprentices in locations other than in a
school, in a curriculum in which he or she holds a license under this
chapter. An applicant who holds an instructional credential from an
accredited community or technical college and who has passed a
licensing examination approved or administered by the director shall
upon application be licensed as an instructor to give instruction in a
school, or to provide classroom theory training to apprentices in
locations other than in a school, in a curriculum in which he or she
holds a license under this chapter. To be approved as an "instructor"
in an approved apprenticeship program, the instructor must be a
competent instructor as defined in rules adopted under chapter 49.04
RCW.
(((18))) (19) "Apprentice trainer" means a person who gives
training to an apprentice in an approved apprenticeship program and who
is approved under RCW 18.16.280.
(20) "Person" means any individual, partnership, professional
service corporation, joint stock association, joint venture, or any
other entity authorized to do business in this state.
(((19))) (21) "Salon/shop" means any building, structure, or any
part thereof, other than a school, where the commercial practice of
cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or manicuring is conducted; provided
that any person, except employees of a salon/shop, who operates from a
salon/shop is required to meet all salon/shop licensing requirements
and may participate in the apprenticeship program when certified ((by
the advisory committee)) as established by the ((department of labor
and industries)) Washington state apprenticeship and training council
established in chapter 49.04 RCW.
(((20))) (22) "Approved apprenticeship program" means a salon/shop
that has been approved under RCW 18.16.280 and chapter 49.04 RCW to
participate in an apprenticeship program.
(23) "Crossover training" means training approved by the director
as training hours that may be credited to current licensees for similar
training received in another profession licensed under this chapter.
(((21))) (24) "Approved security" means surety bond.
(((22))) (25) "Personal services" means a location licensed under
this chapter where the practice of cosmetology, barbering, manicuring,
or esthetics is performed for clients in the client's home, office, or
other location that is convenient for the client.
(((23))) (26) "Individual license" means a cosmetology, barber,
manicurist, esthetician, or instructor license issued under this
chapter.
(((24))) (27) "Location license" means a license issued under this
chapter for a salon/shop, school, personal services, or mobile unit.
(((25))) (28) "Mobile unit" is a location license under this
chapter where the practice of cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or
manicuring is conducted in a mobile structure. Mobile units must
conform to the health and safety standards set by rule under this
chapter.
(((26))) (29) "Curriculum" means the courses of study taught at a
school, or in an approved apprenticeship program established by the
Washington state apprenticeship and training council and conducted in
an approved salon/shop, set by rule under this chapter, and approved by
the department. After consulting with the board, the director may set
by rule a percentage of hours in a curriculum, up to a maximum of ten
percent, that could include hours a student receives while training in
a salon/shop under a contract approved by the department. Each
curriculum must include at least the following required hours:
(a) School curriculum:
(i) Cosmetologist, one thousand six hundred hours;
(((b))) (ii) Barber, one thousand hours;
(((c))) (iii) Manicurist, six hundred hours;
(((d))) (iv) Esthetician, six hundred hours;
(((e))) (v) Instructor-trainee, five hundred hours.
(((27))) (b) Apprentice training curriculum:
(i) Cosmetologist, three thousand hours;
(ii) Barber, two thousand hours;
(iii) Manicurist, two thousand hours;
(iv) Esthetician, two thousand hours.
(30) "Student monthly report" means the student record of daily
activities and the number of hours completed in each course of a
curriculum that is prepared monthly by the school and provided to the
student, audited annually by the department, and kept on file by the
school for three years.
(31) "Apprentice monthly report" means the apprentice record of
daily activities and the number of hours completed in each course of a
curriculum that is prepared monthly by the approved apprenticeship
program and provided to the apprentice, audited annually by the
department, and kept on file by the approved apprenticeship program for
three years.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.16.030 and 2004 c 51 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other duties imposed by law, including RCW
18.235.030 and 18.235.040, the director shall have the following powers
and duties:
(1) To set all license, examination, and renewal fees in accordance
with RCW 43.24.086;
(2) To adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter;
(3) To prepare and administer or approve the preparation and
administration of licensing examinations;
(4) To establish minimum safety and sanitation standards for
schools, instructors, cosmetologists, barbers, manicurists,
estheticians, salons/shops, personal services, and mobile units;
(5) To establish curricula for the training of students and
apprentices under this chapter;
(6) To maintain the official department record of applicants and
licensees;
(7) To establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an
examination failure;
(8) To set license expiration dates and renewal periods for all
licenses consistent with this chapter;
(9) To ensure that all informational notices produced and mailed by
the department regarding statutory and regulatory changes affecting any
particular class of licensees are mailed to each licensee in good
standing or on inactive status in the affected class whose mailing
address on record with the department has not resulted in mail being
returned as undeliverable for any reason; and
(10) To make information available to the department of revenue to
assist in collecting taxes from persons required to be licensed under
this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.16.050 and 2002 c 111 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created a state cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, and
manicuring advisory board consisting of ((nine)) ten members appointed
by the director. These members of the board shall include: A
representative of private schools licensed under this chapter; a
representative from an approved apprenticeship program conducted in an
approved salon/shop; a representative of public vocational technical
schools licensed under this chapter; a consumer who is unaffiliated
with the cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or manicuring industry; and
six members who are currently practicing licensees who have been
engaged in the practice of manicuring, esthetics, barbering, or
cosmetology for at least three years. Members shall serve a term of
three years. Any board member may be removed for just cause. The
director may appoint a new member to fill any vacancy on the board for
the remainder of the unexpired term.
(2) Board members shall be entitled to compensation pursuant to RCW
43.03.240 for each day spent conducting official business and to
reimbursement for travel expenses as provided by RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(3) The board may seek the advice and input of officials from the
following state agencies: (a) The work force training and education
coordinating board; (b) the department of employment security; (c) the
department of labor and industries; (d) the department of health; (e)
the department of licensing; and (f) the department of revenue.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.16.060 and 2004 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to engage in a practice listed in
subsection (2) of this section unless the person has a license in good
standing as required by this chapter. A license issued under this
chapter shall be considered to be "in good standing" except when:
(a) The license has expired or has been canceled and has not been
renewed in accordance with RCW 18.16.110;
(b) The license has been denied, revoked, or suspended under RCW
18.16.210, 18.16.230, or 18.16.240, and has not been reinstated;
(c) The license is held by a person who has not fully complied with
an order of the director issued under RCW 18.16.210 requiring the
licensee to pay restitution or a fine, or to acquire additional
training; or
(d) The license has been placed on inactive status at the request
of the licensee, and has not been reinstated in accordance with RCW
18.16.110(3).
(2) The director may take action under RCW 18.235.150 and
18.235.160 against any person who does any of the following without
first obtaining, and maintaining in good standing, the license required
by this chapter:
(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section,
engages in the commercial practice of cosmetology, barbering,
esthetics, or manicuring;
(b) Instructs in a school;
(c) Operates a school; or
(d) Operates a salon/shop, personal services, or mobile unit.
(3) A person who receives a license as an instructor may engage in
the commercial practice for which he or she held a license when
applying for the instructor license without also renewing the
previously held license. However, a person licensed as an instructor
whose license to engage in a commercial practice is not or at any time
was not renewed may not engage in the commercial practice previously
permitted under that license unless that person renews the previously
held license.
(4) An apprentice actively enrolled in an apprenticeship program
for cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or manicuring may engage in the
commercial practice as required for the apprenticeship program.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.16.100 and 2003 c 400 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon completion of an application approved by the department
and payment of the proper fee, the director shall issue the appropriate
license to any person who:
(a) Is at least seventeen years of age or older;
(b)(i) Has completed and graduated from a school licensed under
this chapter in a curriculum approved by the director ((of sixteen
hundred hours of training in cosmetology, one thousand hours of
training in barbering, six hundred hours of training in manicuring, six
hundred hours of training in esthetics, and/or five hundred hours of
training as an instructor-trainee)) consisting of the hours of training
required under this chapter for a school curriculum, or has met the
requirements in RCW 18.16.020 or 18.16.130; or
(ii) Has successfully completed a state-approved apprenticeship
((training)) program consisting of the hours of training required under
this chapter for the apprentice training curriculum; and
(c) Has received a passing grade on the appropriate licensing
examination approved or administered by the director.
(2) A person currently licensed under this chapter may qualify for
examination and licensure, after the required examination is passed, in
another category if he or she has completed the crossover training
course.
(3) Upon completion of an application approved by the department,
certification of insurance, and payment of the proper fee, the director
shall issue a location license to the applicant.
(4) The director may consult with the state board of health and the
department of labor and industries in establishing training,
apprenticeship, and examination requirements.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.16.175 and 2002 c 111 s 11 and 2002 c 86 s 216 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A salon/shop or mobile unit shall meet the following minimum
requirements:
(a) Maintain an outside entrance separate from any rooms used for
sleeping or residential purposes;
(b) Provide and maintain for the use of its customers adequate
toilet facilities located within or adjacent to the salon/shop or
mobile unit;
(c) Any room used wholly or in part as a salon/shop or mobile unit
shall not be used for residential purposes, except that toilet
facilities may be used ((jointly)) for both residential and business
purposes;
(d) Meet the zoning requirements of the county, city, or town, as
appropriate;
(e) Provide for safe storage and labeling of chemicals used in the
practices under this chapter;
(f) Meet all applicable local and state fire codes; and
(g) Certify that the salon/shop or mobile unit is covered by a
public liability insurance policy in an amount not less than one
hundred thousand dollars for combined bodily injury and property damage
liability.
(2) The director may by rule determine other requirements that are
necessary for safety and sanitation of salons/shops, personal services,
or mobile units. The director may consult with the state board of
health and the department of labor and industries in establishing
minimum salon/shop, personal services, and mobile unit safety
requirements.
(3) Personal services license holders shall certify coverage of a
public liability insurance policy in an amount not less than one
hundred thousand dollars for combined bodily injury and property damage
liability.
(4) Upon receipt of a written complaint that a salon/shop or mobile
unit has violated any provisions of this chapter, chapter 18.235 RCW,
or the rules adopted under either chapter, or at least once every two
years for an existing salon/shop or mobile unit, the director or the
director's designee shall inspect each salon/shop or mobile unit. If
the director determines that any salon/shop or mobile unit is not in
compliance with this chapter, the director shall send written notice to
the salon/shop or mobile unit. A salon/shop or mobile unit which fails
to correct the conditions to the satisfaction of the director within a
reasonable time shall, upon due notice, be subject to the penalties
imposed by the director under RCW 18.235.110. The director may enter
any salon/shop or mobile unit during business hours for the purpose of
inspection. The director may contract with health authorities of local
governments to conduct the inspections under this subsection.
(5) A salon/shop, personal services, or mobile unit shall obtain a
certificate of registration from the department of revenue.
(6) This section does not prohibit the use of motor homes as mobile
units if the motor home meets the health and safety standards of this
section.
(7) Salon/shop or mobile unit licenses issued by the department
must be posted in the salon/shop or mobile unit's reception area.
(8) Cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, and manicuring licenses
issued by the department must be posted at the licensed person's work
station.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.16.180 and 1991 c 324 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall prepare and provide to all licensed
salons/shops a notice to consumers. At a minimum, the notice shall
state that cosmetology, barber, esthetics, and manicure salons/shops
are required to be licensed, that salons/shops are required to maintain
minimum safety and sanitation standards, that customer complaints
regarding salons/shops may be reported to the department, and a
telephone number and address where complaints may be made.
(2) An approved apprenticeship program must post a notice to
consumers in the reception area of the salon/shop stating that services
may be provided by an apprentice. At a minimum, the notice must state:
"This shop is a participant in a state-approved apprenticeship program.
Apprentices in this program are in training and have not yet received
a license."

Sec. 8 RCW 18.16.280 and 2003 c 400 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((A cosmetology apprenticeship pilot program is hereby created.
(1) An advisory committee is created that may consist of
representatives from individuals and businesses licensed under chapter
18.16 RCW; cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, and manicuring advisory
board members; department of labor and industries; department of
licensing; United States department of labor apprenticeship; and other
interested parties.
(a) The advisory committee shall meet to review progress of the
cosmetology apprenticeship pilot program.
(b) The department of labor and industries apprenticeship council
shall coordinate the activities of the advisory committee. The
advisory committee shall issue annual reports on the progress of the
apprenticeship program to interested parties and shall issue a final
report regarding the outcome of the apprenticeship program to be
presented to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives
and senate by December 31, 2005.
(2) Up to twenty salons approved by the department of labor and
industries apprenticeship council may participate in the apprenticeship
program. The participating salons shall proportionately represent the
geographic diversity of Washington state, including rural and urban
areas, and salons located in both eastern and western Washington.
(3))) (1) An approved cosmetology apprenticeship program is hereby
created. The apprenticeship program allows for the direct entry of
individuals into a training program approved as provided in this
chapter and chapter 49.04 RCW.
(2) The department of licensing shall adopt rules, including a
mandatory requirement that apprentices complete in-classroom theory
courses as a part of their training, to provide for the licensure of
participants of the apprenticeship program.
(((4) The cosmetology apprenticeship pilot program expires July 1,
2006.))
(3) Salon/shops participating in the apprenticeship program must:
(a) Be approved as an approved apprenticeship program conducted in
an approved salon/shop by:
(i) The Washington state apprenticeship and training council in
accordance with chapter 49.04 RCW; or
(ii) The department if the salon/shop is participating in a similar
training model administered by the department; and
(b) Provide the department with the names of all individuals acting
as apprentice trainers.
(4) To act as an apprentice trainer, an individual must be approved
by the department. To be approved, the trainer must hold a current
license in the practice for which he or she is providing training and
must have held that license for a minimum of three consecutive years.
(5) If an approved apprenticeship program implements changes
affecting the information required to be provided to the department
under this section or rules adopted under this section, the revised
information must be submitted to the department within fifteen days
after the date of implementing the changes.
(6) The director or the director's designee shall audit and inspect
approved apprenticeship programs for compliance with this chapter at
least annually. If the director determines that an approved
apprenticeship program is not maintaining the standards required by
this chapter, written notice thereof must be given to the approved
apprenticeship program. An approved apprenticeship program that fails
to correct the conditions listed in the notice to the satisfaction of
the director within a reasonable time may be subject to penalties
imposed under RCW 18.235.110.

--- END ---