BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28C.10.020 and 1993 c 445 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agency" means the work force training and education
coordinating board.
(2) "Agent" means a person owning an interest in, employed by, or
representing for remuneration a private vocational school within or
without this state, who enrolls or personally attempts to secure the
enrollment in a private vocational school of a resident of this state,
offers to award educational credentials for remuneration on behalf of
a private vocational school, or holds himself or herself out to
residents of this state as representing a private vocational school for
any of these purposes.
(3) "Current assets" includes cash or other assets or resources
commonly identified as those that are reasonably expected to be
realized in cash or sold or consumed within one year.
(4) "Current liabilities" includes obligations for which
liquidation is reasonably expected to require the use of existing
resources properly classifiable as current assets or the creation of
other current liabilities.
(5) "Degree" means any designation, appellation, letters, or words
including but not limited to "associate," "bachelor," "master,"
"doctor," or "fellow" which signify or purport to signify satisfactory
completion of an academic program of study beyond the secondary school
level.
(((4))) (6) "Education" includes but is not limited to, any class,
course, or program of training, instruction, or study.
(((5))) (7) "Educational credentials" means degrees, diplomas,
certificates, transcripts, reports, or documents((, or letters of
designation, marks, appellations, series of letters, numbers, or words
which)) that signify ((or appear to signify enrollment, attendance,
progress, or)) satisfactory completion of the requirements or
prerequisites for any educational program.
(((6))) (8) "Entity" includes, but is not limited to, a person,
company, firm, society, association, partnership, corporation, or
trust.
(((7))) (9) "Private vocational school" means any location where an
entity is offering postsecondary education in any form or manner for
the purpose of instructing, training, or preparing persons for any
vocation or profession.
(((8))) (10) "Probation" means the agency has officially notified
a private vocational school in writing that the school or a program
offered by the school has been identified by the agency as at risk and
has deficiencies that must be corrected within a specified time period.
(11) "Program" means a sequence of approved subjects offered by a
school that teaches skills and fundamental knowledge required for
employment in a particular occupation.
(12) "To grant" includes to award, issue, sell, confer, bestow, or
give.
(((9))) (13) "To offer" includes, in addition to its usual
meanings, to advertise or publicize. "To offer" also means to solicit
or encourage any person, directly or indirectly, to perform the act
described.
(((10))) (14) "To operate" means to establish, keep, or maintain
any facility or location where, from, or through which education is
offered or educational credentials are offered or granted to residents
of this state, and includes contracting for the performance of any such
act.

Sec. 2 RCW 28C.10.050 and 2005 c 274 s 247 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The agency shall adopt ((by rule minimum standards for entities
operating private vocational schools. The minimum standards shall
include, but not be limited to, requirements for each)) minimum
requirements to assess whether a private vocational school is eligible
to obtain and maintain a license in this state.
(2) The requirements adopted by the agency shall, at a minimum,
require a private vocational school to:
(a) Disclose to the agency information about its ownership and
financial position and to demonstrate that it has sufficient financial
resources to fulfill its commitments to students. Financial
disclosures provided to the agency shall not be subject to public
disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW;
(b) Demonstrate to the agency that the school is financially viable
and responsible, and has sufficient financial resources to fulfill the
school's commitments to its students. A private vocational school
shall be considered financially viable and responsible only if it:
(i) Is able to provide the services described in its official
publications and statements;
(ii) Is able to provide the administrative resources necessary to
comply with the requirements of this subsection;
(iii) Is able to meet all of its financial obligations, including,
but not limited to, refunds that it is required by agency rule to
provide to students;
(iv) Demonstrates that at the close of its most recent fiscal year
it had a ratio of current assets to current liabilities of at least
1:1; and
(v) Had at the close of its most recent fiscal year a positive net
worth. For the purposes of this section, "positive net worth" means
the school's assets exceed its liabilities;
(c) Follow a uniform statewide cancellation and refund policy as
specified by the agency;
(((c))) (d) Disclose through use of a school catalog, brochure, or
other written material, necessary information to students so that
students may make informed enrollment decisions. The agency shall
specify what information is required;
(((d))) (e) Use an enrollment contract or agreement that includes:
(i) The school's cancellation and refund policy, (ii) a brief statement
that the school is licensed under this chapter and that inquiries may
be made to the agency, and (iii) other necessary information as
determined by the agency;
(((e))) (f) Describe accurately and completely in writing to
students before their enrollment prerequisites and requirements for (i)
completing successfully the programs of study in which they are
interested and (ii) qualifying for the fields of employment for which
their education is designed;
(((f))) (g) Comply with the requirements of RCW 28C.10.084;
(((g))) (h) Assess the basic skills and relevant aptitudes of each
potential student to determine that a potential student has the basic
skills and relevant aptitudes necessary to complete and benefit from
the program in which the student plans to enroll, including but not
limited to administering a United States department of education-approved English as a second language exam before enrolling students
for whom English is a second language. Guidelines for such assessments
shall be developed by the agency, in consultation with the schools.
((The method of assessment shall be reported to the agency. Assessment
records shall be maintained in the student's file)) Each private
vocational school shall report its methods of assessment to the agency
and shall maintain assessment records in each student's file. If a
student's basic skills or English language proficiency is not adequate
for the student's likely success in the program in which the student is
enrolled, the private vocational school shall so inform the student and
shall either provide basic skills training or English as a second
language supplemental instruction to the student, or assist such
student with obtaining basic skills training or English as a second
language instruction;
(((h))) (i) Discuss with each potential student the potential
student's obligations in signing any enrollment contract and/or
incurring any debt for educational purposes. The discussion shall
include the inadvisability of acquiring an excessive educational debt
burden that will be difficult to repay given employment opportunities
and average starting salaries in the potential student's chosen
occupation((.));
(((2) Any enrollment contract shall have)) (j) Ensure that any
enrollment contract between the private vocational school and its
students has an attachment in a format provided by the agency. The
attachment shall be signed by both the school and the student. The
attachment shall stipulate that the school has complied with subsection
(1)(((h))) (i) of this section and that the student understands and
accepts his or her responsibilities in signing any enrollment contract
or debt application. The attachment shall also stipulate that the
enrollment contract shall not be binding for at least five days,
excluding Sundays and holidays, following signature of the enrollment
contract by both parties((.
(3) The agency shall deny, revoke, or suspend the license of any
school that does not meet or maintain the minimum standards));
(k) Comply with the requirements related to qualifications of
administrators and instructors under section 3 of this act; and
(l) Upon request, provide to the agency a statement from an
independent accountant regarding the school's financial viability. The
agency may determine that a school is not financially viable,
responsible, or able to fulfill its commitments to students if the
statement from an independent accountant expresses substantial doubt
about the school's financial ability to continue operating.
(3) The agency may deny a private vocational school's application
for licensure if the school fails to meet the requirements in this
section.
(4) The agency may determine that a licensed private vocational
school or a particular program of a private vocational school is at
risk if:
(a) There is a pattern or history of substantiated student
complaints filed with the agency pursuant to RCW 28C.10.120; or
(b) The private vocational school has a pattern or history of
failing to meet the minimum requirements for licensure established by
the agency or substantially fails to meet the minimum requirements for
licensure established by the agency.
(5) If the agency determines that a private vocational school is at
risk, the agency:
(a) Shall notify the school in writing of the deficiencies
determined by the agency;
(b) Shall require the owner of the school, the director of the
school, or both of them, to meet with agency staff to discuss the
school's deficiencies;
(c) May require the school to have an outside audit conducted; and
(d) May place the school on probation and include the school in any
list published by the agency of schools that are on probation.
(6) A school that is placed on probation by the agency shall
provide to the agency:
(a) A written school improvement plan that addresses the
deficiencies identified by the agency and the school's plan to remedy
the deficiencies. The school shall provide its school improvement plan
to the agency no later than thirty days after the meeting required by
subsection (5)(b) of this section;
(b) Evidence, if requested by the agency, that the school has
secured a line of credit from a lender approved by and in an amount
determined by the agency. The school shall provide evidence of the
line of credit to the agency no later than thirty days after the
meeting required by subsection (5)(b) of this section; and
(c) A monthly status report of the school's progress on
implementing its improvement plan for a period of up to twelve months.
The monthly status report shall include all students' names and current
contact information.
(7) If a private vocational school that is placed on probation by
the agency fails to correct the deficiencies identified by the agency
within twelve months the agency may revoke the school's license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28C.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The education and experience of administrators, instructors,
and counselors employed by a private vocational school shall be
adequate to ensure that students receive educational services
consistent with the school's stated program objectives.
(2) A private vocational school must file the qualifications of
each of its administrators, instructors, and counselors with the agency
within thirty calendar days of the day the school hires the
administrator, instructor, or counselor. This information shall be
provided by the school to the agency in the form required by the
agency.
(3) A private vocational school shall establish and enforce written
policies for the qualification, supervision, and periodic evaluation of
administrators, instructors, and counselors.
(4) The highest ranking administrator at a private vocational
school shall have at least two years of experience in school or
business administration, teaching, or professional employment related
to his or her duties within the school.
(5) Private vocational school instructors shall:
(a) Have at least two years of full-time work experience,
postsecondary training, or a combination of both, in the subjects they
instruct; or
(b) Possess current evidence issued by a regulatory agency of this
or another state that they are qualified to teach in their particular
subjects of instruction.
(6) If a private vocational school uses teacher assistants, aides,
or trainees, it must maintain policies governing their duties and
functions. Such personnel may provide services to students only under
the direct supervision of a qualified instructor and may not act as
substitutes for instructors.
(7) A private vocational school's owners, administrators,
instructors, agents, and other staff must be of good moral character
and reputation. The agency may find that a person is not of good moral
character and reputation if the person: (a) Has been convicted of a
felony within the last seven years or a misdemeanor that involved any
sexual offense, or (b) is found to have made any false and material
statements to the agency.
(8) Every private vocational school shall register its sales agents
with the agency within thirty days of the school's hiring or
contracting with the sales agent.

Sec. 4 RCW 28C.10.120 and 1993 c 445 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Complaints may be filed under this chapter only by a person
claiming loss of tuition or fees as a result of an unfair business
practice. The complaint shall set forth the alleged violation and
shall contain information required by the agency on forms provided for
that purpose. A complaint may also be filed with the agency by an
authorized staff member of the agency or by the attorney general.
(2) The agency shall investigate any complaint under this section
and shall first attempt to bring about a negotiated settlement. The
agency director or the director's designee may conduct an informal
hearing with the affected parties in order to determine whether a
violation has occurred.
(3) If the agency finds that the private vocational school or its
agent engaged in or is engaging in any unfair business practice, the
agency shall issue and cause to be served upon the violator an order
requiring the violator to cease and desist from the act or practice and
may impose the penalties provided under RCW 28C.10.130. If the agency
finds that the complainant has suffered loss as a result of the act or
practice, the agency may order the violator to pay full or partial
restitution of any amounts lost. The loss may include any money paid
for tuition, required or recommended course materials, and any
reasonable living expenses incurred by the complainant during the time
the complainant was enrolled at the school.
(4) The complainant is not bound by the agency's determination of
restitution. The complainant may reject that determination and may
pursue any other legal remedy.
(5) The violator may, within twenty days of being served any order
described under subsection (3) of this section, file an appeal under
the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Timely filing
stays the agency's order during the pendency of the appeal. If the
agency prevails, the appellant shall pay the costs of the
administrative hearing.
(6) If a private vocational school closes without providing
adequate notice to its enrolled students, the agency shall provide
transition assistance to the school's students including, but not
limited to, information regarding: (a) Transfer options available to
students; (b) financial aid discharge eligibility and procedures; (c)
the labor market, job search strategies, and placement assistance
services; and (d) other support services available to students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---