BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the existing
definition of "sale," as provided in chapter 15.36 RCW, includes
arrangements, known as "cow shares," in which one or more individuals
purchase one or more shares in a milk-producing animal in return for a
portion of the milk that is produced. It is the intent of the
legislature to clarify that the existing definition of "sale" includes
these arrangements.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.36.012 and 1999 c 291 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For the purpose of this chapter:)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Adulterated milk" means milk that is deemed adulterated under
appendix L of the PMO.
(2) "Colostrum milk" means milk produced within ten days before or
until practically colostrum free after parturition.
(3) "Cow share agreement" means an arrangement in which one or more
individuals purchase one or more shares of a cow, goat, sheep, or other
mammal in return for a portion of the milk produced by the animal.
(4) "DMO" means supplement I, the recommended sanitation ordinance
for grade A condensed and dry milk products and condensed and dry whey,
to the PMO published by the United States public health service, food
and drug administration.
(5) "Dairy farm" means a place or premises where one or more cows,
goats, or other mammals are kept, a part or all of the milk or milk
products from which is sold or offered for sale to a milk processing
plant, transfer station, or receiving station.
(6) "Dairy technician" means any person who takes samples of milk
or cream or fluid derivatives thereof, on which sample tests are to be
made as a basis of payment, or who grades, weighs, or measures milk or
cream or the fluid derivatives thereof, the grade, weight, or measure
to be used as a basis of payment, or who operates equipment wherein
milk or products thereof are pasteurized.
(7) "Degrade" means the lowering in grade from grade A to grade C.
(8) "Department" means the state department of agriculture.
(9) "Director" means the director of agriculture of the state of
Washington or the director's duly authorized representative.
(10) "Grade A milk processing plant" means any milk processing
plant that meets all of the standards of the PMO to process grade A
pasteurized milk or milk products.
(11) "Grade A pasteurized milk" means grade A raw milk that has
been pasteurized.
(12) "Grade A raw milk" means raw milk produced upon dairy farms
conforming with all of the items of sanitation contained in the PMO, in
which the bacterial plate count does not exceed twenty thousand per
milliliter and the coliform count does not exceed ten per milliliter as
determined in accordance with RCW 15.36.201.
(13) "Grade A raw milk for pasteurization" means raw milk produced
upon dairy farms conforming with all of the same items of sanitation
contained in the PMO of grade A raw milk, and the bacterial plate
count, as delivered from the farm, does not exceed eighty thousand per
milliliter as determined in accordance with RCW 15.36.201.
(14) "Grade C milk" is milk that violates any of the requirements
for grade A milk but that is not deemed to be adulterated.
(15) "Milk" means the lacteal secretion, practically free of
colostrum, obtained by the complete milking of one or more healthy
cows, goats, or other mammals.
(16) "Milk hauler" means a person who transports milk or milk
products in bulk to or from a milk processing plant, receiving station,
or transfer station.
(17) "Milk processing" means the handling, preparing, packaging, or
processing of milk in any manner in preparation for sale as food, as
defined in chapter 69.04 RCW. Milk processing does not include milking
or producing milk on a dairy farm that is shipped to a milk processing
plant for further processing.
(18) "Milk processing plant" means a place, premises, or
establishment where milk or milk products are collected, handled,
processed, stored, bottled, pasteurized, aseptically processed,
bottled, or prepared for distribution, except an establishment that
merely receives the processed milk products and serves them or sells
them at retail.
(19) "Milk products" means the product of a milk manufacturing
process.
(20) "Misbranded milk" means milk or milk products that carries a
grade label unless such grade label has been awarded by the director
and not revoked, or that fails to conform in any other respect with the
statements on the label.
(21) "Official laboratory" means a biological, chemical, or
physical laboratory that is under the direct supervision of the state
or a local regulatory agency.
(22) "Officially designated laboratory" means a commercial
laboratory authorized to do official work by the department, or a milk
industry laboratory officially designated by the department for the
examination of grade A raw milk for pasteurization and commingled milk
tank truck samples of raw milk for antibiotic residues and bacterial
limits.
(23) "PMO" means the grade "A" pasteurized milk ordinance published
by the United States public health service, food and drug
administration.
(24) "Pasteurized" means the process of heating every particle of
milk or milk product in properly designed and operated equipment to the
temperature and time standards specified in the PMO.
(25) "Person" means an individual, partnership, firm, corporation,
company, trustee, or association.
(26) "Producer" means a person or organization who operates a dairy
farm and provides, sells, or offers milk for sale to a milk processing
plant, receiving station, or transfer station.
(27) "Receiving station" means a place, premises, or establishment
where raw milk is received, collected, handled, stored, or cooled and
prepared for further transporting.
(28) "Sale" means selling, offering for sale, holding for sale,
preparing for sale, trading, bartering, offering a gift as an
inducement for sale of, a cow share agreement, and advertising for sale
in any media.
(29) "Transfer station" means any place, premises, or establishment
where milk or milk products are transferred directly from one milk tank
truck to another.
(30) "Wash station" means a place, facility, or establishment where
milk tanker trucks are cleaned in accordance with the standards of the
PMO.

--- END ---