BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.88A.020 and 1994 c 219 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of financial management shall, in cooperation with
appropriate legislative committees and legislative staff, establish a
procedure for the provision of fiscal notes on the expected impact of
bills and resolutions which increase or decrease or tend to increase or
decrease state government revenues or expenditures. Such fiscal notes
shall indicate by fiscal year the impact for the remainder of the
biennium in which the bill or resolution will first take effect as well
as a cumulative forecast of the fiscal impact for the succeeding four
fiscal years. Fiscal notes shall separately identify the fiscal
impacts on the operating and capital budgets. Estimates of fiscal
impacts shall be calculated using the procedures contained in the
fiscal note instructions issued by the office of financial management.
Fiscal notes shall also identify the fiscal and operational impacts on
the state information technology portfolio. To develop a process for
assessing the fiscal and operational impacts on the state information
technology portfolio, the office of financial management shall consult
with the information services board and the department of information
services.
In establishing the fiscal impact called for pursuant to this
chapter, the office of financial management shall coordinate the
development of fiscal notes with all state agencies affected.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.105.160 and 2005 c 319 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The department, in consultation with the office of financial
management and the information services board, shall prepare a ((state
strategic information technology plan which)) six-year strategic plan
for state information technology projects. The strategic plan shall
establish a statewide mission, goals, and objectives for the use of
information technology, including goals for electronic access to
government records, information, and services. At a minimum, the
strategic plan must contain the following: (i) A long-term plan for
state investments in information technology projects, that identifies
the highest priority needs for information technology projects within
affordable spending levels; (ii) a statewide information technology
assessment, that includes detailed project information and estimated
costs for all ongoing information technology projects included in a
state agency's information technology portfolio, under RCW 43.105.170;
(iii) a detailed list of proposed information technology projects for
the upcoming biennium and the two succeeding biennia; and (iv) a
comprehensive review of the most recent biennial state performance
report prepared under subsection (2) of this section. The plan shall
be developed in accordance with the standards and policies established
by the board and shall be submitted to the board for review,
modification as necessary, and approval. The department shall seek the
advice of the board in the development of this plan.
(b) The plan approved under this section shall be updated ((as
necessary)) biennially and submitted to the governor and the chairs and
ranking minority members of the appropriations committees of the senate
and the house of representatives.
(2)(a) The department shall prepare a biennial state performance
report on information technology based on agency performance reports
required under RCW 43.105.170 and other information deemed appropriate
by the department. The report shall include, but not be limited to:
(((a))) (i) An analysis, based upon agency portfolios, of the
state's information technology infrastructure, including its value,
condition, and capacity;
(((b))) (ii) An evaluation of performance relating to information
technology;
(((c))) (iii) An assessment of progress made toward implementing
the state strategic information technology plan, including progress
toward electronic access to public information and enabling citizens to
have two-way access to public records, information, and services;
(((d))) (iv) An analysis of the success or failure, feasibility,
progress, costs, and timeliness of implementation of major information
technology projects under RCW 43.105.190;
(((e))) (v) Identification of benefits, cost avoidance, and cost
savings generated by major information technology projects developed
under RCW 43.105.190; and
(((f))) (vi) An inventory of state information services, equipment,
and proprietary software.
(b) Copies of the report shall be distributed biennially to the
governor and the chairs and ranking minority members of the
appropriations committees of the senate and the house of
representatives.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.105.041 and 2003 c 18 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall have the following powers and duties related to
information services:
(a) To develop standards and procedures governing the acquisition
and disposition of equipment, proprietary software and purchased
services, licensing of the radio spectrum by or on behalf of state
agencies, and confidentiality of computerized data;
(b) To purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire, dispose of, and
maintain equipment, proprietary software, and purchased services, or to
delegate to other agencies and institutions of state government, under
appropriate standards, the authority to purchase, lease, rent, or
otherwise acquire, dispose of, and maintain equipment, proprietary
software, and purchased services((: PROVIDED, That,)). However,
agencies and institutions of state government are expressly prohibited
from acquiring or disposing of equipment, proprietary software, and
purchased services without such delegation of authority. The
acquisition and disposition of equipment, proprietary software, and
purchased services is exempt from RCW 43.19.1919 and, as provided in
RCW 43.19.1901, from the provisions of RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.200.
This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to the legislative branch;
(c) To develop statewide requirements for contracts for information
technology projects;
(d) To develop statewide or interagency technical policies,
standards, and procedures;
(((d))) (e) To review and approve standards and common
specifications for new or expanded telecommunications networks proposed
by agencies, public postsecondary education institutions, educational
service districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12
information technology services, and to assure the cost-effective
development and incremental implementation of a statewide video
telecommunications system to serve: Public schools; educational
service districts; vocational-technical institutes; community colleges;
colleges and universities; state and local government; and the general
public through public affairs programming;
(((e))) (f) To provide direction concerning strategic planning
goals and objectives for the state. The board shall seek input from
the legislature and the judiciary;
(((f))) (g) To develop and implement a process for the resolution
of appeals by:
(i) Vendors concerning the conduct of an acquisition process by an
agency or the department; or
(ii) A customer agency concerning the provision of services by the
department or by other state agency providers;
(((g))) (h) To establish policies for the periodic review by the
department of agency performance which may include but are not limited
to analysis of:
(i) Planning, management, control, and use of information services;
(ii) Training and education; and
(iii) Project management;
(((h))) (i) To set its meeting schedules and convene at scheduled
times, or meet at the request of a majority of its members, the chair,
or the director; and
(((i))) (j) To review and approve that portion of the department's
budget requests that provides for support to the board.
(2)(a) Statewide technical standards to promote and facilitate
electronic information sharing and access are an essential component of
acceptable and reliable public access service and complement content-related standards designed to meet those goals. The board shall:
(((a))) (i) Establish technical standards to facilitate electronic
access to government information and interoperability of information
systems, including wireless communications systems. Local governments
are strongly encouraged to follow the standards established by the
board; and
(((b))) (ii) Require agencies to consider electronic public access
needs when planning new information systems or major upgrades of
systems.
(b) In developing these standards, the board is encouraged to
include the state library, state archives, and appropriate
representatives of state and local government.
(3)(a) The board, in consultation with the K-20 board, has the duty
to govern, operate, and oversee the technical design, implementation,
and operation of the K-20 network including, but not limited to, the
following duties: Establishment and implementation of K-20 network
technical policy, including technical standards and conditions of use;
review and approval of network design; procurement of shared network
services and equipment; and resolving user/provider disputes concerning
technical matters. The board shall delegate general operational and
technical oversight to the K-20 network technical steering committee as
appropriate.
(b) The board has the authority to adopt rules under chapter 34.05
RCW to implement the provisions regarding the technical operations and
conditions of use of the K-20 network.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.105.825 and 2004 c 275 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In overseeing the technical aspects of the K-20 network, the
information services board is not intended to duplicate the statutory
responsibilities of the higher education coordinating board, the
superintendent of public instruction, the information services board,
the state librarian, or the governing boards of the institutions of
higher education.
(2) The board may not interfere in any curriculum or legally
offered programming offered over the network.
(3) The responsibility to review and approve standards and common
specifications for the network remains the responsibility of the
information services board under RCW 43.105.041.
(4) The coordination of telecommunications planning for the common
schools remains the responsibility of the superintendent of public
instruction. Except as set forth in RCW 43.105.041(1)(((d))) (e), the
board may recommend, but not require, revisions to the superintendent's
telecommunications plans.

--- END ---