BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.160.200 and 2004 c 252 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The economic development account is created within the public
facilities construction loan revolving fund under RCW 43.160.080.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of RCW
43.160.010(5) and this section. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) Applications under this section for assistance from the
economic development account are subject to all of the applicable
criteria set forth under this chapter, as well as procedures and
criteria established by the board, except as otherwise provided.
(3) Eligible applicants under this section are limited to political
subdivisions of the state and federally recognized Indian tribes in
rural natural resources impact areas and rural counties.
(4) Applicants must demonstrate that their request is part of an
economic development plan consistent with applicable state planning
requirements. Applicants must demonstrate that tourism projects have
been approved by the local government or federally recognized Indian
tribe. Industrial projects must be approved by the local government
and the associate development organization, or by the federally
recognized Indian tribe.
(5) Publicly owned projects may be financed under this section upon
proof by the applicant that the public project is a necessary component
of, or constitutes in whole, a tourism project.
(6) Applications must demonstrate local match and participation.
Such match may include: Land donation, other public or private funds
or both, or other means of local commitment to the project.
(7) Board financing for project-specific environmental, capital
facilities, land use, permitting, feasibility, and marketing studies
and plans; project engineering, design, and site planning and analysis;
and project debt and revenue impact analysis shall not exceed fifty
thousand dollars per study. Board funds for these purposes may be
provided as a grant and require a match.
(8) Board financing for tourism projects shall not exceed two
hundred fifty thousand dollars. Other public facility construction
projects under this section shall not exceed one million five hundred
thousand dollars. Loans with flexible terms and conditions to meet the
needs of the applicants shall be provided. Grants may also be
authorized, but only when, and to the extent that, a loan is not
reasonably possible, given the limited resources of the political
subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe.
(9) The board shall develop guidelines for allowable local match
and planning and predevelopment activities.
(10) The board may allow de minimis general system improvements to
be funded if they are critically linked to the viability of the
economic development project assisted under this section.
(11) Applications under this section need not demonstrate evidence
that specific private development or expansion is ready to occur or
will occur if funds are provided.
(12) The board shall establish guidelines for providing financial
assistance under this section to ensure that the requirements of this
chapter are complied with. The guidelines shall include:
(a) A process to equitably compare and evaluate applications from
competing communities.
(b) Criteria to ensure that approved projects will have a high
probability of success and are likely to provide long-term economic
benefits to the community. The criteria shall include: (i) A minimum
amount of local participation, determined by the board per application,
to verify community support for the project; (ii) an analysis that
establishes the project is feasible using standard economic principles;
and (iii) an explanation from the applicant regarding how the project
is consistent with the communities' economic strategy and goals.
(c) A method of evaluating the impact of the financial assistance
on the economy of the community and whether the financial assistance
achieved its purpose.

--- END ---