BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the
public interest to:
(1) Encourage private investment in renewable energy;
(2) Stimulate the economic growth of the state;
(3) Enhance the continued diversification of the energy resources
used in this state; and
(4) Provide for the safe interconnection, efficient markets, and
distribution of renewable electric energy.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.60.010 and 2000 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(2) "Customer-generator" means a user of a net metering system.
(3) "Electrical company" means a company owned by investors that
meets the definition of RCW 80.04.010.
(4) "Electric cooperative" means a cooperative or association
organized under chapter 23.86 or 24.06 RCW.
(5) "Electric utility" means any electrical company, public utility
district, irrigation district, port district, electric cooperative, or
municipal electric utility that is engaged in the business of
distributing electricity to retail electric customers in the state.
(6) "Irrigation district" means an irrigation district under
chapter 87.03 RCW.
(7) "Municipal electric utility" means a city or town that owns or
operates an electric utility authorized by chapter 35.92 RCW.
(8) "Net metering" means measuring the difference between the
electricity supplied by an electric utility and the electricity
generated by a customer-generator that is fed back to the electric
utility over the applicable billing period.
(9) "Net metering system" means a fuel cell or a facility for the
production of electrical energy that:
(a) Uses as its fuel either biogas produced from an anaerobic
digester, solar, wind, or hydropower;
(b) ((Has a generating capacity of not more than twenty-five
kilowatts;
(c))) Is located on the customer-generator's premises;
(((d))) (c) Operates in parallel with the electric utility's
transmission and distribution facilities; and
(((e))) (d) Is intended primarily to offset part or all of the
customer-generator's requirements for electricity.
(10) "Port district" means a port district within which an
industrial development district has been established as authorized by
Title 53 RCW.
(11) "Public utility district" means a district authorized by
chapter 54.04 RCW.
(12) "Small renewable producer" means any customer-generator that
uses a net metering system to generate a quantity of not less than one
hundred kilowatts and not more than four megawatts from a renewable
fuel source using net metering to connect to the utility's electrical
distribution grid.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.60.020 and 2000 c 158 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
An electric utility:
(1) Shall offer to make net metering available to eligible
customers-generators on a first-come, first-served basis until the
cumulative generating capacity of net metering systems equals ((0.1))
one percent of the utility's peak demand during 1996, of which not less
than 0.05 percent shall be attributable to net metering systems that
use as its fuel either biogas produced from an anaerobic digester,
solar, wind, or hydropower;
(2) Shall allow net metering systems to be interconnected using a
standard kilowatt-hour meter capable of registering the flow of
electricity in two directions, unless the commission, in the case of an
electrical company, or the appropriate governing body, in the case of
other electric utilities, determines, after appropriate notice and
opportunity for comment:
(a) That the use of additional metering equipment to monitor the
flow of electricity in each direction is necessary and appropriate for
the interconnection of net metering systems, after taking into account
the benefits and costs of purchasing and installing additional metering
equipment; and
(b) How the cost of purchasing and installing an additional meter
is to be allocated between the customer-generator and the utility;
(3) Shall charge the customer-generator a minimum monthly fee that
is the same as other customers of the electric utility in the same rate
class, but shall not charge the customer-generator any additional
standby, capacity, interconnection, or other fee or charge unless the
commission, in the case of an electrical company, or the appropriate
governing body, in the case of other electric utilities, determines,
after appropriate notice and opportunity for comment that:
(a) The electric utility will incur direct costs associated with
interconnecting or administering net metering systems that exceed any
offsetting benefits associated with these systems; and
(b) Public policy is best served by imposing these costs on the
customer-generator rather than allocating these costs among the
utility's entire customer base.
If a small renewable producer can demonstrate a base load supply
produced in ninety percent of the previous calendar quarter, an
electric utility must offer, as an alternative to net metering, to
contract for and purchase the portfolio of a small renewable producer
at the small renewable producer's mid "C" rate.

Sec. 4 RCW 80.60.030 and 1998 c 318 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Consistent with the other provisions of this chapter, the net
energy measurement must be calculated in the following manner:
(1) The electric utility shall measure the net electricity produced
or consumed during the billing period, in accordance with normal
metering practices.
(2) If the electricity supplied by the electric utility exceeds the
electricity generated by the customer-generator and fed back to the
electric utility during the billing period, the customer-generator
shall be billed for the net electricity supplied by the electric
utility, in accordance with normal metering practices.
(3) If electricity generated by the customer-generator exceeds the
electricity supplied by the electric utility, the customer-generator:
(a) Shall be billed for the appropriate customer charges for that
billing period, in accordance with RCW 80.60.020; and
(b) Shall be credited for the excess kilowatt-hours generated
during the billing period, with this kilowatt-hour credit appearing on
the bill for the following billing period.
At the beginning of each calendar ((year)) quarter, any remaining
unused kilowatt-hour credit accumulated during the previous ((year))
quarter shall be ((granted to the electric utility, without any
compensation)) compensated to the customer-generator at the utility's
standard retail rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 80.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The following renewable energy standards for state agencies are
established:
(a) By December 31, 2006, state agencies must demonstrate that at
least two percent of their total energy resources are generated by
small renewable producers' systems;
(b) By December 31, 2007, state agencies must demonstrate that at
least four percent of their total energy resources are generated by
small renewable producers' systems; and
(c) By December 31, 2009, state agencies must demonstrate that at
least eight percent of their total energy resources are generated by
small renewable producers' systems.
(2) Any electric utility operating in the state shall assist,
participate in, or facilitate the state's net metering purchasing
efforts under this section.

--- END ---