BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A volunteer member of any fire department who does not serve as
fire chief for the department may be:
(a) A candidate for elective public office and serve in that public
office if elected; or
(b) Appointed to any public office and serve in that public office
if appointed.
(2) For purposes of this section, "volunteer" means a member of any
fire department who performs voluntarily any assigned or authorized
duties on behalf of or at the direction of the fire department without
receiving compensation or consideration for performing such duties.
(3) For purposes of this section, "compensation" and
"consideration" do not include any benefits the volunteer may have
accrued or is accruing under chapter 41.24 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 52.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A volunteer member of any fire protection district who does not
serve as fire chief for the district may be:
(a) A candidate for elective public office and serve in that public
office if elected; or
(b) Appointed to any public office and serve in that public office
if appointed.
(2) For purposes of this section, "volunteer" means a member of any
fire protection district who performs voluntarily any assigned or
authorized duties on behalf of or at the direction of the fire
protection district without receiving compensation or consideration for
performing such duties.
(3) For purposes of this section, "compensation" and
"consideration" do not include any benefits the volunteer may have
accrued or is accruing under chapter 41.24 RCW.

--- END ---