BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the purpose of
RCW 36.87.130 is to preserve for the public, for recreational or other
purposes, existing access to bodies of salt or fresh water. It is the
intent of this act to enhance the ability of counties to balance the
need to protect and preserve existing public access to bodies of water
while providing counties the ability to vacate rights of way so long as
doing so does not undermine or eliminate such access.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.87.130 and 1969 ex.s. c 185 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
No county shall vacate a county road or part thereof which abuts on
a body of salt or fresh water unless:
(1) The purpose of the vacation is to enable any public authority
to acquire the vacated property for port purposes, boat moorage or
launching sites, or for park, viewpoint, recreational, educational or
other public purposes, or unless the property is zoned for industrial
uses; or
(2) The purpose of the vacation is to enable a county to implement
a plan, adopted by resolution or ordinance, that provides no less than
comparable public access to the same shoreline area to which the
streets or alleys sought to be vacated abut, had the properties
included in the plan not been vacated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---