BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.24.010 and 2005 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Municipal corporation" or "municipality" includes any county,
city, town or combination thereof, fire protection district, local law
enforcement agency, or any emergency medical service district or other
special district, authorized by law to protect life or property within
its boundaries through a fire department, emergency workers, or reserve
officers.
(2) "Fire department" means any regularly organized fire department
or emergency medical service district consisting wholly of volunteer
fire fighters, or any part-paid and part-volunteer fire department duly
organized and maintained by any municipality: PROVIDED, That any such
municipality wherein a part-paid fire department is maintained may by
appropriate legislation permit the full-paid members of its department
to come under the provisions of chapter 41.16 RCW.
(3) "Fire fighter" includes any fire fighter or emergency worker
who is a member of any fire department of any municipality but shall
not include fire fighters who are eligible for participation in the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system or the Washington public employees' retirement system, with
respect to periods of service rendered in such capacity.
(4) "Emergency worker" means any emergency medical service
personnel, regulated by chapters 18.71 and 18.73 RCW, who is a member
of an emergency medical service district but shall not include
emergency medical service personnel who are eligible for participation
in the Washington public employees' retirement system, with respect to
periods of service rendered in such capacity.
(5) "Performance of duty" or "performance of service" shall be
construed to mean and include any work in and about company quarters,
any fire station, any law enforcement office or precinct, or any other
place under the direction or general orders of the chief or other
officer having authority to order such member to perform such work;
performing other officially assigned duties that are secondary to his
or her duties as a fire fighter, emergency worker, or reserve officer
such as maintenance, public education, inspections, investigations,
court testimony, and fund-raising for the benefit of the department;
being on call or on standby under the orders of the chief or designated
officer of the department, except at the individual's home or place of
business; responding to, working at, or returning from an alarm of
fire, emergency call, or law enforcement duties; drill or training; or
any work performed of an emergency nature in accordance with the rules
and regulations of the fire department or local law enforcement agency.
(6) "State board" means the state board for volunteer fire fighters
and reserve officers.
(7) "Board of trustees" or "local board" means: (a) For matters
affecting fire fighters, a fire fighter board of trustees created under
RCW 41.24.060; (b) for matters affecting an emergency worker, an
emergency medical service district board of trustees created under RCW
41.24.330; or (c) for matters affecting reserve officers, a reserve
officer board of trustees created under RCW 41.24.460.
(8) "Appropriate legislation" means an ordinance when an ordinance
is the means of legislating by any municipality, and resolution in all
other cases.
(9) "Reserve officer" means the same as defined by the Washington
state criminal justice training commission under chapter 43.101 RCW,
but shall not include enforcement officers who are eligible for
participation in the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system or the Washington public employees'
retirement system, with respect to periods of service rendered in such
capacity.
(10) "Participant" means: (a) For purposes of relief, any reserve
officer who is or may become eligible for relief under this chapter or
any fire fighter or emergency worker; and (b) for purposes of
retirement pension, any fire fighter, emergency worker, or reserve
officer who is or may become eligible to receive a benefit of any type
under the retirement provisions of this chapter, or whose beneficiary
may be eligible to receive any such benefit.
(11) "Relief" means all medical, death, and disability benefits
available under this chapter that are made necessary from death,
sickness, injury, or disability arising in the performance of duty,
including benefits provided under RCW 41.24.110, 41.24.150, 41.24.160,
41.24.175, 41.24.220, and 41.24.230, but does not include retirement
pensions provided under this chapter.
(12) "Retirement pension" means retirement payments for the
performance of service, as provided under RCW 41.24.170, 41.24.172,
41.24.175, 41.24.180, and 41.24.185.
(13) "Principal fund" means the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund created under RCW
41.24.030.
(14) "Administrative fund" means the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' administrative fund created under RCW 41.24.030.

--- END ---