BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 17.21.020 and 2004 c 100 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agricultural commodity" means any plant or part of a plant, or
animal, or animal product, produced by a person (including farmers,
ranchers, vineyardists, plant propagators, Christmas tree growers,
aquaculturists, floriculturists, orchardists, foresters, or other
comparable persons) primarily for sale, consumption, propagation, or
other use by people or animals.
(2) "Agricultural land" means land on which an agricultural
commodity is produced or land that is in a government-recognized
conservation reserve program. This definition does not apply to
private gardens where agricultural commodities are produced for
personal consumption.
(3) "Antimicrobial pesticide" means a pesticide that is used for
the control of microbial pests, including but not limited to viruses,
bacteria, algae, and protozoa, and is intended for use as a
disinfectant or sanitizer.
(4) "Apparatus" means any type of ground, water, or aerial
equipment, device, or contrivance using motorized, mechanical, or
pressurized power and used to apply any pesticide on land and anything
that may be growing, habitating, or stored on or in such land, but
shall not include any pressurized handsized household device used to
apply any pesticide, or any equipment, device, or contrivance of which
the person who is applying the pesticide is the source of power or
energy in making such pesticide application, or any other small
equipment, device, or contrivance that is transported in a piece of
equipment licensed under this chapter as an apparatus.
(5) "Arthropod" means any invertebrate animal that belongs to the
phylum arthropoda, which in addition to insects, includes allied
classes whose members are wingless and usually have more than six legs;
for example, spiders, mites, ticks, centipedes, and isopod crustaceans.
(6) "Certified applicator" means any individual who is licensed as
a commercial pesticide applicator, commercial pesticide operator,
public operator, private-commercial applicator, demonstration and
research applicator, private applicator, limited private applicator,
rancher private applicator, or any other individual who is certified by
the director to use or supervise the use of any pesticide which is
classified by the EPA or the director as a restricted use pesticide.
(7) "Commercial pesticide applicator" means any person who engages
in the business of applying pesticides to the land of another.
(8) "Commercial pesticide operator" means any employee of a
commercial pesticide applicator who uses or supervises the use of any
pesticide and who is required to be licensed under provisions of this
chapter.
(9) "Defoliant" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to cause the leaves or foliage to drop from a plant with or
without causing abscission.
(10) "Department" means the Washington state department of
agriculture.
(11) "Desiccant" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to artificially accelerate the drying of plant tissues.
(12) "Device" means any instrument or contrivance intended to trap,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate pests, but not including equipment
used for the application of pesticides when sold separately from the
pesticides.
(13) "Direct supervision" by certified private applicators shall
mean that the designated restricted use pesticide shall be applied for
purposes of producing any agricultural commodity on land owned or
rented by the applicator or the applicator's employer, by a competent
person acting under the instructions and control of a certified private
applicator who is available if and when needed, even though such
certified private applicator is not physically present at the time and
place the pesticide is applied. The certified private applicator shall
have direct management responsibility and familiarity of the pesticide,
manner of application, pest, and land to which the pesticide is being
applied. Direct supervision by all other certified applicators means
direct on-the-job supervision and shall require that the certified
applicator be physically present at the application site and that the
person making the application be in voice and visual contact with the
certified applicator at all times during the application. However,
direct supervision for forest application does not require constant
voice and visual contact when general use pesticides are applied using
nonapparatus type equipment, the certified applicator is physically
present and readily available in the immediate application area, and
the certified applicator directly observes pesticide mixing and
batching. Direct supervision of an aerial apparatus means the pilot of
the aircraft must be appropriately certified.
(14) "Director" means the director of the department or a duly
authorized representative.
(15) "Engage in business" means any application of pesticides by
any person upon lands or crops of another.
(16) "EPA" means the United States environmental protection agency.
(17) "EPA restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide classified
for restricted use by the administrator, EPA.
(18) "FIFRA" means the federal insecticide, fungicide and
rodenticide act as amended (61 Stat. 163, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.).
(19) "Forest application" means the application of pesticides to
agricultural land used to grow trees for the commercial production of
wood or wood fiber for products such as dimensional lumber, shakes,
plywood, poles, posts, pilings, particle board, hardboard, oriented
strand board, pulp, paper, cardboard, or other similar products.
(20) "Fumigant" means any pesticide product or combination of
products that is a vapor or gas or forms a vapor or gas on application
and whose method of pesticidal action is through the gaseous state.
(21) "Fungi" means all nonchlorophyll-bearing thallophytes (all
nonchlorophyll-bearing plants of lower order than mosses and
liverworts); for example, rusts, smuts, mildews, molds, and yeasts,
except those on or in a living person or other animals.
(22) "Fungicide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any fungi.
(23) "Herbicide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any weed or other
higher plant.
(24) "Immediate service call" means a ((landscape)) pesticide
application to satisfy an emergency customer request for service((, or
a treatment to control a pest to landscape plants)).
(25) "Insect" means any small invertebrate animal, in any life
stage, whose adult form is segmented and which generally belongs to the
class insecta, comprised of six-legged, usually winged forms, as, for
example, beetles, bugs, bees, and flies. The term insect shall also
apply to other allied classes of arthropods whose members are wingless
and usually have more than six legs, for example, spiders, mites,
ticks, centipedes, and isopod crustaceans.
(26) "Insecticide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any insect.
(27) "Land" means all land and water areas, including airspace and
all plants, animals, structures, buildings, devices, and contrivances,
appurtenant to or situated on, fixed or mobile, including any used for
transportation.
(28) "Landscape application" means an application of any ((EPA
registered)) pesticide registered for use in this state to any exterior
landscape area around residential property as defined in this chapter,
commercial properties such as apartments or shopping centers, parks,
golf courses, schools including nursery schools and licensed day cares,
or cemeteries or similar areas. This definition shall not apply to:
(a) Applications made by private applicators, limited private
applicators, or rancher private applicators; (b) mosquito abatement,
gypsy moth eradication, or similar wide-area pest control programs
sponsored by governmental entities; and (c) commercial pesticide
applicators making structural applications to the perimeter of a
structure.
(29) "Limited private applicator" means a certified applicator who
uses or is in direct supervision, as defined for private applicators in
this section, of the use of any herbicide classified by the EPA or the
director as a restricted use pesticide, for the sole purpose of
controlling weeds on nonproduction agricultural land owned or rented by
the applicator or the applicator's employer. Limited private
applicators may also use restricted use pesticides on timber areas,
excluding aquatic sites, to control weeds designated for mandatory
control under chapters 17.04, 17.06, and 17.10 RCW and state and local
regulations adopted under chapters 17.04, 17.06, and 17.10 RCW. A
limited private applicator may apply restricted use herbicides to the
types of land described in this subsection of another person if applied
without compensation other than trading of personal services between
the applicator and the other person. This license is only valid when
making applications in counties of Washington located east of the crest
of the Cascade mountains.
(30) "Limited production agricultural land" means land used to grow
hay and grain crops that are consumed by the livestock on the farm
where produced. No more than ten percent of the hay and grain crops
grown on limited production agricultural land may be sold each crop
year. Limited production agricultural land does not include aquatic
sites.
(31) "Maintenance applicator" means any individual, except for a
certified applicator, who, in the course of his or her employment,
applies pesticides to the pesticide notification area of a pesticide-sensitive individual who lives in a multifamily dwelling, including the
manager or owner of the multifamily dwelling.
(32) "Nematocide" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate nematodes.
(((32))) (33) "Nematode" means any invertebrate animal of the
phylum nemathelminthes and class nematoda, that is, unsegmented round
worms with elongated, fusiform, or saclike bodies covered with cuticle,
and inhabiting soil, water, plants or plant parts. Nematodes may also
be called nemas or eelworms.
(((33))) (34) "Nonproduction agricultural land" means pastures,
rangeland, fencerows, and areas around farm buildings but not aquatic
sites.
(((34))) (35) "Person" means any individual, partnership,
association, corporation, or organized group of persons whether or not
incorporated.
(((35))) (36) "Pest" means, but is not limited to, any insect,
rodent, nematode, snail, slug, weed, and any form of plant or animal
life or virus, except virus, bacteria, or other microorganisms on or in
a living person or other animal or in or on processed food or beverages
or pharmaceuticals, which is normally considered to be a pest, or which
the director may declare to be a pest.
(((36))) (37) "Pesticide" means, but is not limited to:
(a) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to prevent,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate any pest;
(b) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as
a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant; and
(c) Any spray adjuvant as defined in RCW 15.58.030.
(((37))) (38) "Pesticide advisory board" means the pesticide
advisory board as provided for in this chapter.
(((38))) (39) "Plant regulator" means any substance or mixture of
substances intended through physiological action, to accelerate or
retard the rate of growth or maturation, or to otherwise alter the
behavior of ornamental or crop plants or their produce, but shall not
include substances insofar as they are intended to be used as plant
nutrients, trace elements, nutritional chemicals, plant inoculants, or
soil amendments.
(((39))) (40) "Private applicator" means a certified applicator who
uses or is in direct supervision of the use of any pesticide classified
by the EPA or the director as a restricted use pesticide, for the
purposes of producing any agricultural commodity and for any associated
noncrop application on land owned or rented by the applicator or the
applicator's employer or if applied without compensation other than
trading of personal services between producers of agricultural
commodities on the land of another person.
(((40))) (41) "Private-commercial applicator" means a certified
applicator who uses or supervises the use of any pesticide classified
by the EPA or the director as a restricted use pesticide for purposes
other than the production of any agricultural commodity on lands owned
or rented by the applicator or the applicator's employer.
(((41))) (42) "Rancher private applicator" means a certified
applicator who uses or is in direct supervision, as defined for private
applicators in this section, of the use of any herbicide or any
rodenticide classified by the EPA or the director as a restricted use
pesticide for the purpose of controlling weeds and pest animals on
nonproduction agricultural land and limited production agricultural
land owned or rented by the applicator or the applicator's employer.
Rancher private applicators may also use restricted use pesticides on
timber areas, excluding aquatic sites, to control weeds designated for
mandatory control under chapters 17.04, 17.06, and 17.10 RCW and state
and local regulations adopted under chapters 17.04, 17.06, and 17.10
RCW. A rancher private applicator may apply restricted use herbicides
and rodenticides to the types of land described in this subsection of
another person if applied without compensation other than trading of
personal services between the applicator and the other person. This
license is only valid when making applications in counties of
Washington located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains.
(((42))) (43) "Residential property" includes property less than
one acre in size zoned as residential by a city, town, or county, but
does not include property zoned as agricultural or agricultural
homesites.
(((43))) (44) "Restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide or
device which, when used as directed or in accordance with a widespread
and commonly recognized practice, the director determines, subsequent
to a hearing, requires additional restrictions for that use to prevent
unreasonable adverse effects on the environment including people,
lands, beneficial insects, animals, crops, and wildlife, other than
pests.
(((44))) (45) "Rodenticide" means any substance or mixture of
substances intended to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate rodents, or
any other vertebrate animal which the director may declare by rule to
be a pest.
(((45))) (46) "School facility" means any facility used for
licensed day care center purposes or for the purposes of a public
kindergarten or public elementary or secondary school. School facility
includes the buildings or structures, playgrounds, landscape areas,
athletic fields, school vehicles, or any other area of school property.
(((46))) (47) "Snails or slugs" include all harmful mollusks.
(((47))) (48) "Unreasonable adverse effects on the environment"
means any unreasonable risk to people or the environment taking into
account the economic, social, and environmental costs and benefits of
the use of any pesticide, or as otherwise determined by the director.
(((48))) (49) "Weed" means any plant which grows where it is not
wanted.

Sec. 2 RCW 17.21.150 and 1994 c 283 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person who has committed any of the following acts is declared to
be in violation of this chapter:
(1) Made false or fraudulent claims through any media,
misrepresenting the effect of materials or methods to be utilized;
(2) Applied worthless or improper pesticides;
(3) Operated a faulty or unsafe apparatus;
(4) Operated in a faulty, careless, or negligent manner;
(5) Refused or neglected to comply with the provisions of this
chapter, the rules adopted hereunder, or of any lawful order of the
director including a final order of the director directing payment of
a civil penalty. In an adjudicative proceeding arising from the
department's denial of a license for failure to pay a civil penalty the
subject shall be limited to whether the payment was made and the
proceeding may not be used to collaterally attack the final order;
(6) Refused or neglected to keep and maintain the pesticide
application records required by rule, or to make reports when and as
required;
(7) Made false or fraudulent records, invoices, or reports;
(8) Acted as a certified applicator without having provided direct
supervision to an unlicensed person as defined in RCW 17.21.020(((12)))
(13);
(9) Operated an unlicensed apparatus or an apparatus without a
license plate issued for that particular apparatus;
(10) Used fraud or misrepresentation in making an application for
a license or renewal of a license;
(11) Is not qualified to perform the type of pest control under the
conditions and in the locality in which he or she operates or has
operated, regardless of whether or not he or she has previously passed
a pesticide license examination;
(12) Aided or abetted a licensed or an unlicensed person to evade
the provisions of this chapter, combined or conspired with such a
licensed or an unlicensed person to evade the provisions of this
chapter, or allowed one's license to be used by an unlicensed person;
(13) Knowingly made false, misleading or erroneous statements or
reports during or after an inspection concerning any infestation or
infection of pests found on land or in connection with any pesticide
complaint or investigation;
(14) Impersonated any state, county or city inspector or official;
(15) Applied a restricted use pesticide without having a certified
applicator in direct supervision;
(16) Operated a commercial pesticide application business: (a)
Without an individual licensed as a commercial pesticide applicator or
(b) with a licensed commercial pesticide applicator not licensed in the
classification or classifications in which the business operates;
((or))
(17) Operated as a commercial pesticide applicator without meeting
the financial responsibility requirements including not having a
properly executed financial responsibility insurance certificate or
surety bond form on file with the department; or
(18) Failed to notify a pesticide-sensitive individual of a
pesticide application as required by this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 17.21.420 and 1994 c 283 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall develop a list of pesticide-sensitive
individuals. The list shall include any person with a documented
pesticide sensitivity who submits information to the department on an
application form developed by the department indicating the person's
pesticide sensitivity.
(2) An applicant for inclusion on the pesticide-sensitive list may
apply to the department at any time and shall provide the department,
on the department's form, the name, street address, and telephone
number of the applicant and the street address of each ((property owner
with)) property abutting the applicant's principal place of residence.
In the case of a multifamily dwelling, the applicant shall provide the
name, street address, and telephone number of the property manager.
The pesticide sensitivity of an individual shall be certified by a
physician who holds a valid license to practice medicine in this state.
(3) For a pesticide-sensitive individual who lives in a single-family dwelling, the lands listed on ((an)) the application ((for
inclusion on the pesticide-sensitive list)) form shall constitute the
pesticide notification area for that ((applicant. For highway or road
rights of way, a property abutting shall mean that portion of the
property within one-half mile of the principal place of residence))
individual for landscape and right of way applications.
(((3))) (4) For a pesticide-sensitive individual who lives in a
multifamily dwelling, such as an apartment or condominium, the lands
listed on the application form, including all landscape areas on the
property of the multifamily dwelling, shall constitute the pesticide
notification area for that individual for landscape and right of way
applications. The pesticide notification area for that individual for
pesticide applications to structures includes:
(a) The individual's dwelling;
(b) All interior areas of the individual's building that are
accessible to the individual, except the interior of other dwellings;
(c) All common areas of the multifamily dwelling that are for use
by and accessible to the individual, including but not limited to
kitchens, laundry rooms, clubhouses, and recreational rooms;
(d) All exterior areas, including the perimeter, of any structure
on the property of the multifamily dwelling.
(5) For highway or road rights of way, a property abutting shall
mean that portion of the property within one-half mile of the principal
place of residence.
(6) A person whose name has been included on the pesticide-sensitive list shall notify the department of a need to update the list
as soon as possible after: (a) A change of address or telephone
number; (b) ((a change in ownership of property abutting a pesticide-sensitive individual; (c))) a change in the applicant's condition; or
(((d))) (c) the sensitivity is deemed to no longer exist.
(((4))) (7) The pesticide-sensitive list shall expire on December
31 of each year. The department shall distribute application forms for
the new list at a reasonable time prior to the expiration of the
current list, including mailing an application form to each person on
the current list at the address given by the person in his or her most
recent application. Persons desiring to be placed on or remain on the
list shall submit a new application each year.
(((5))) (8) The department shall distribute the list by January 1
and June 15 of each year to all certified applicators likely to make
((landscape)) applications to the pesticide notification area of a
pesticide-sensitive individual. The list shall provide multiple
methods of accessing the information so that certified applicators
making ((landscape applications or right of way)) applications are able
to easily determine what properties and individuals require
notification for a specific application. An updated list shall be
distributed whenever deemed necessary by the department. Certified
applicators may request a list of newly registered individuals that
have been added to the list since the last distribution. Registered
individuals shall receive verification that their name has been placed
on the list.

Sec. 4 RCW 17.21.430 and 1992 c 176 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A certified applicator making a ((landscape application or a
right of way)) pesticide application to the pesticide notification
area((, as defined in RCW 17.21.420(2), of a person)) of an individual
on the pesticide-sensitive list shall notify the ((listed pesticide-sensitive)) individual of the application. Notification shall be made
at least ((two)) ten hours prior to the scheduled application, or in
the case of an immediate service call, the applicator shall provide
notification at the time of the application. The applicator must make
the application within twenty-four hours following the date and
approximate time stated in the notification. If the application is not
made within twenty-four hours, the notification process must be
repeated.
(2) Notification under this section shall be made in writing, in
person, or by telephone, and shall disclose the address or the specific
location on the property where the pesticide is to be applied and the
date and approximate time of the application. In the event a certified
applicator is unable to provide prior notification because of the
absence or inaccessibility of the individual, the applicator shall
leave a written notice at the residence of the individual ((listed on
the pesticide-sensitive list)) at the time of the application. If ((a
person on the pesticide-sensitive list)) the individual lives in a
multifamily dwelling ((such as an apartment or condominium)) and the
residence is inaccessible, the applicator shall ((notify the person on
the list or shall advise)) leave written notice with the manager or
other property owner's representative ((to)) who shall notify the
((person on the list)) individual of the application.
(3) The pesticide-sensitive individual may request in writing, in
person, or by telephone that the certified applicator provide the name
of each pesticide applied within the individual's pesticide
notification area. The applicator shall provide the information within
twenty-four hours of the application or of receiving the request.
(4) The notification requirements of this section do not apply to
routine applications of an antimicrobial pesticide.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 17.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An individual on the pesticide-sensitive list who lives in a
multifamily dwelling is entitled to receive prior notification of all
pesticide applications made by maintenance applicators to property
within the pesticide notification area of that individual. The
department shall inform the manager of the property within the
individual's pesticide notification area in writing that the individual
is on the pesticide-sensitive list and that the manager has certain
duties under this section and RCW 17.21.430.
(2) Following receipt of the information, the manager of the
property shall provide prior notification to the pesticide-sensitive
individual of all pesticide applications made by maintenance
applicators to property within the pesticide notification area of that
individual. Notification must be made at least ten hours prior to the
scheduled application, or in the case of an immediate service call, the
manager or maintenance applicator shall provide notification at the
time of the application. The applicator must make the application
within twenty-four hours following the date and approximate time stated
in the notification. If the application is not made within twenty-four
hours, the notification process must be repeated.
(3) Notification must be provided in writing, in person, or by
telephone and must disclose the address or the specific location on the
property where the pesticide is to be applied and the date and
approximate time of the application. In the event the manager of the
property is unable to provide prior notification because of the absence
or inaccessibility of the pesticide-sensitive individual, the manager
shall leave a written notice at the residence of the individual at the
time of the application.
(4) The pesticide-sensitive individual may request in writing, in
person, or by telephone that the property manager or maintenance
applicator provide the name of each pesticide applied within the
individual's pesticide notification area. The manager or applicator
shall provide the information within twenty-four hours of the
application or of receiving the request.
(5) Requests for notification expire on December 31st of each year.
(6) The notification requirements of this section do not apply to
routine applications of an antimicrobial pesticide.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2006.

--- END ---