BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.58 RCW
to read as follows:
Any materials furnished to an attorney pursuant to discovery in a
criminal case shall remain in the exclusive custody of the attorney and
be used only for the purposes of conducting the party's side of the
case, and shall be subject to such other terms and conditions as the
court may provide.

--- END ---