BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for an employer to refuse to hire or to
discharge an individual, or otherwise disadvantage an individual, with
respect to compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of employment
because the individual engages in the consumption of lawful tobacco
products off the premises of the employer during nonworking hours,
provided the individual complies with applicable laws or policies
regulating consumption of lawful tobacco products on the premises of
the employer during working hours.
(2) It is not unlawful or an unfair employment practice under this
section for an employer to refuse to hire, discharge, or otherwise
disadvantage an individual with respect to compensation, terms,
conditions, or privileges of employment if that decision is based on:
(a) The individual's failure to meet job-related standards set by
the employer;
(b) An employer's legitimate conflict of interest policy reasonably
designed to protect the employer's trade secrets, proprietary
information, or other proprietary interests;
(c) A bona fide occupational qualification or requirement,
including qualifications or requirements implemented by the employer to
screen for respiratory diseases in occupations where the individual
will be exposed to smoke and noxious fumes; or
(d) The employer's drug and alcohol free work place program,
including those adopted in response to federal requirements.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be applied to any matter that is
also subject to collective bargaining between the employer and the
affected employee.
(4) Nothing in this section precludes a religious or health
organization, whose tenets prohibit the use of an otherwise lawful
tobacco product or a company or nonprofit organization whose primary
business purpose is the prevention of heart and lung disease, from
refusing to employ an individual who uses an otherwise lawful tobacco
product.
(5) The remedy for an individual claiming to be aggrieved by a
violation of this section is a civil action for damages for all wages
and benefits deprived the individual by reason of the violation.
(6) In a civil action alleging a violation of this section, the
court may award the prevailing party court costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees.
(7) An individual aggrieved by a violation of this section must
file the civil action within six months after the alleged unlawful or
unfair employment practice or the discovery of that practice.

--- END ---