BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.01 RCW
to read as follows:
A private air ambulance service that solicits membership
subscriptions, accepts membership applications, charges membership
fees, and provides air ambulance services, to subscription members and
designated members of their household is not an insurer under RCW
48.01.050, a health carrier under chapter 48.43 RCW, a health care
services contractor under chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health maintenance
organization under chapter 48.46 RCW if the private air ambulance
service:
(1) Is licensed in accordance with RCW 18.73.130;
(2) Attains and maintains accreditation by the commission on
accreditation of medical transport services or another accrediting
organization approved by the department of health as having equivalent
requirements as the commission for aeromedical transport;
(3) Has been in operation in Washington for at least two years; and
(4) Has submitted evidence of its compliance with this section, the
licensing requirements of RCW 18.73.130, and accreditation from the
commission or another accrediting organization approved by the
department of health as having equivalent requirements as the
commission for aeromedical transport to the commissioner.

--- END ---