BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The graduation achievement program is
established. The purpose of the program is to improve significantly
the educational achievement of middle and high school students and
enable them to meet state standards for high school graduation in a
timely manner, including completion of a certificate of academic
achievement or a certificate of individual achievement. The program is
also intended to acknowledge the accomplishments of middle and high
school principals, teachers, and other school staff who help students
make these significant improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The graduation achievement program account
is created in the state treasury. All funds provided by the
legislature for the graduation achievement program must be deposited in
the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation and shall be allocated to school districts by the
superintendent of public instruction as provided in section 3 of this
act. Moneys in the account are not part of basic education.
Expenditures from the account may be used solely as provided in section
4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The superintendent of public instruction
shall allocate moneys from the graduation achievement program account
to school districts for each school year as follows:
(1) Five percent shall be for bonuses for principals and vice-principals of middle schools, high schools, and other schools that
include any of grades seven through twelve. The bonuses are intended
to reward the accomplishments of principals in schools where students
have made significant improvement in student achievement, as measured
by the Washington assessment of student learning. The state board of
education shall develop the criteria for identifying schools whose
principals are eligible for a bonus. The criteria for awarding the
first bonuses under this subsection shall be developed by July 1, 2006,
and may be adjusted annually thereafter. One significant criterion
shall be success in improving achievement for students with limited
English proficiency. The board shall determine a bonus amount for an
identified school, and the principals and vice-principals of the school
shall determine how the bonus shall be distributed. The board shall
rank order identified schools and award bonuses until the moneys
available for this purpose are exhausted;
(2) Fifteen percent shall be for bonuses for certificated
instructional staff and other staff, not including principals or vice-principals, of middle schools, high schools, and other schools that
include any of grades seven through twelve. The bonuses are intended
to reward the accomplishments of instructional and other staff in
schools where students have made significant improvement in student
achievement, as measured by the Washington assessment of student
learning. The state board of education shall develop the criteria for
identifying schools whose staff are eligible for a bonus. The criteria
for awarding the first bonuses under this subsection shall be developed
by July 1, 2006, and may be adjusted annually thereafter. One
significant criterion shall be success in improving achievement for
students with limited English proficiency. The board shall determine
a bonus amount for each identified school, which shall vary depending
on the number of staff in the school. The staff in the school shall
collectively determine how the bonus shall be distributed. The board
shall rank order identified schools and award bonuses until the moneys
available for this purpose are exhausted; and
(3) Eighty percent shall be allocated to school districts based on
prior year student enrollment in grades seven through twelve and shall
be used solely as provided in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Each school district with student
enrollment in any of grades seven through twelve shall establish a
local graduation achievement program account. Moneys allocated to the
district under section 3 of this act, not including any principal or
staff bonuses, shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from
the account shall be accounted for separately from other school
district expenditures. Within the account, the district shall
establish subaccounts for each middle school, high school, or other
school that includes any of grades seven through twelve. Except for
expenditures associated with the district graduation achievement
program coordinator, all other expenditures under this section shall be
accounted for under a school subaccount.
(2) Allocations and expenditures from the local graduation
achievement program account are not subject to collective bargaining.
(3) Each school district under this section shall designate a
district graduation achievement program coordinator. No more than
twenty percent of a district's graduation achievement program funds may
be expended on compensation or stipends for the district coordinator
and no more than one full-time equivalent staff may be compensated as
district coordinator using graduation achievement program funds.
(4) Except in school districts with only one school containing any
of grades seven through twelve, each school where more than sixty-five
percent of students did not meet the state standard in all required
subjects assessed by the seventh or tenth grade Washington assessment
of student learning administered during the previous school year shall
designate a building graduation achievement program coordinator. No
more than twenty percent of a district's graduation achievement program
funds may be expended on compensation or stipends for building
coordinators and no more than one full-time equivalent staff per school
may be compensated as a building coordinator using graduation
achievement program funds.
(5) Under the graduation achievement program, school districts
shall provide instructional programs specifically designed to remediate
student achievement deficiencies identified by the seventh or tenth
grade Washington assessment of student learning. Programs may be
offered before school, after school, on Saturdays, or during the
summer. Moneys from the local graduation achievement program account
may be expended on curriculum materials, diagnostic testing, school or
district expenses associated with students retaking the Washington
assessment of student learning, professional development for
instructional staff directly related to providing remedial instruction,
supplemental teaching contracts not to exceed sixty days, and other
operating expenses directly associated with the remedial instructional
programs. School districts may contract with third parties to provide
any aspect of the graduation achievement program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Each school district shall submit an annual
report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction on the
expenditures, activities, and improvements in student achievement, by
school, under the graduation achievement program. The reports shall
use a common format developed by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction and shall be posted on the office's web site. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall summarize the
district reports and submit a statewide report of the graduation
achievement program to the education committees of the legislature by
January 15th of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

--- END ---