BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.172 and 1995 c 347 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In designating and protecting critical areas under this
chapter, counties and cities shall ((include)) consider the best
available science in developing policies and development regulations to
protect the functions and values of critical areas. In addition,
counties and cities shall give special consideration to conservation or
protection measures necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous
fisheries.
(2) If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts
is necessary or will be of substantial assistance in reaching its
decision, a growth management hearings board may retain scientific or
other expert advice to assist in reviewing a petition under RCW
36.70A.290 that involves critical areas.
(3) Where a proposed critical area ordinance is based upon science
that has yet to be replicated in a physical context similar to the one
at issue, but is theoretically sound and otherwise meets the test for
best available science, that science constitutes the best available
science.
(4) The requirement to consider the best available science under
subsection (1) of this section does not obligate a county or city to
use science from a different physical context if the county or city
determines that the science is not applicable to a specific local
situation or physical context, even if it is the only available
science.
(5) The requirement to consider the best available science is a
procedural, not substantive, requirement.

--- END ---