BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.065 and 1999 c 249 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commission shall grant to any person who meets the
eligibility requirements specified in this section a senior citizen's
pass which shall (a) entitle such person, and members of his or her
camping unit, to a fifty percent reduction in the campsite rental fee
prescribed by the commission, and (b) entitle such person to free
admission to any state park.
(2) The commission shall grant a senior citizen's pass to any
person who applies for the same and who meets the following
requirements:
(a) The person is at least sixty-two years of age; and
(b) The person is a domiciliary of the state of Washington and
meets reasonable residency requirements prescribed by the commission;
and
(c) The person and his or her spouse have a combined income which
would qualify the person for a property tax exemption pursuant to RCW
84.36.381, as now law or hereafter amended. The financial eligibility
requirements of this subparagraph (c) shall apply regardless of whether
the applicant for a senior citizen's pass owns taxable property or has
obtained or applied for such property tax exemption.
(3) Each senior citizen's pass granted pursuant to this section is
valid so long as the senior citizen meets the requirements of
subsection (2)(b) of this section. Notwithstanding, any senior citizen
meeting the eligibility requirements of this section may make a
voluntary donation for the upkeep and maintenance of state parks.
(4) A holder of a senior citizen's pass shall surrender the pass
upon request of a commission employee when the employee has reason to
believe the holder fails to meet the criteria in subsection (2)(a),
(b), or (c) of this section. The holder shall have the pass returned
upon providing proof to the satisfaction of the director of the parks
and recreation commission that the holder does meet the eligibility
criteria for obtaining the senior citizen's pass.
(5) Any resident of Washington who is disabled as defined by the
social security administration and who receives social security
benefits for that disability, or any other benefits for that disability
from any other governmental or nongovernmental source, or who is
entitled to benefits for permanent disability under RCW 71A.10.020(3)
due to unemployability full time at the minimum wage, or who is legally
blind or profoundly deaf, or who has been issued a card, decal, or
special license plate for a permanent disability under RCW 46.16.381
shall be entitled to receive, regardless of age and upon making
application therefor, a disability pass at no cost to the holder. The
pass shall (a) entitle such person, and members of his or her camping
unit, to a fifty percent reduction in the campsite rental fee
prescribed by the commission, and (b) entitle such person to free
admission to any state park.
(6) A card, decal, or special license plate issued for a permanent
disability under RCW 46.16.381 may serve as a pass for the holder to
entitle that person and members of the person's camping unit to a fifty
percent reduction in the campsite rental fee prescribed by the
commission, and to allow the holder free admission to state parks.
(7) Any resident of Washington who is a veteran and has a service-connected disability of at least thirty percent shall be entitled to
receive a lifetime veteran's disability pass at no cost to the holder.
The pass shall (a) entitle such person, and members of his or her
camping unit, to free use of any campsite within any state park; (b)
entitle such person to free admission to any state park; and (c)
entitle such person to an exemption from any reservation fees.
(8) All passes issued pursuant to this section shall be valid at
all parks any time during the year: PROVIDED, That the pass shall not
be valid for admission to concessionaire operated facilities.
(9) The commission may deny or revoke any Washington state park
pass for cause, including but not limited to the following: (a)
Residency outside the state of Washington; (b) violation of laws or
state park rules resulting in eviction from a state park; (c)
intimidating, obstructing, or assaulting a park employee or park
volunteer who is engaged in the performance of official duties; (d)
fraudulent use of a pass; (e) providing false information or
documentation in the application for a state parks pass; (f) refusing
to display or show the pass to park employees when requested; or (g)
failing to provide current eligibility information upon request by the
agency or when eligibility ceases or changes.
(10) This section shall not affect or otherwise impair the power of
the commission to continue or discontinue any other programs it has
adopted for senior citizens.
(((10))) (11) The commission may engage in a mutually agreed upon
reciprocal or discounted program for all or specific pass programs with
other outdoor recreation agencies.
(12) The commission shall adopt such rules as it finds appropriate
for the administration of this section. Among other things, such rules
shall prescribe a definition of "camping unit" which will authorize a
reasonable number of persons traveling with the person having a pass to
stay at the campsite rented by such person, a minimum Washington
residency requirement for applicants for a senior citizen's pass and an
application form to be completed by applicants for a senior citizen's
pass.

--- END ---