BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of drug trafficking if he or she transfers
drugs that are in violation of this chapter across state lines or out
of the United States and as a result he or she:
(a) Knowingly or intentionally imports or exports a controlled
substance in violation of this chapter;
(b) Knowingly or intentionally brings or possesses on board a
vessel, aircraft, or vehicle a controlled substance in violation of
this chapter; or
(c) Manufactures, possesses with intent to deliver, or delivers a
controlled substance in violation this chapter.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person convicted
of a violation of subsection (1) of this section shall be sentenced to
a term of total confinement of not less than one hundred twenty months,
or two hundred forty months if the case involves death or serious
bodily injury as a result from the use of such substance, if the
offense involves:
(a) One kilogram or more of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of heroin;
(b) Five kilograms or more of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of:
(i) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves
from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives of ecgonine or their
salts have been removed;
(ii) Cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, and salts
or isomers;
(iii) Ecgonine, its derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers; or
(iv) Any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any
quantity of any of the substances referred to in (b)(i) through (iii)
of this subsection;
(c) Fifty grams or more of a mixture or substance described in (b)
of this subsection which contains cocaine base;
(d) One hundred grams or more of phencyclidine (PCP) or one
kilogram or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable
amount of phencyclidine (PCP);
(e) Ten grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of lysergic acid diethylamide;
(f) Four hundred grams or more of a mixture or substance containing
a detectable amount of N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]
propanamide or one hundred grams or more of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of any analogue of N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl] propanamide;
(g) One thousand kilograms or more of a mixture or substance
containing a detectable amount of marihuana; or
(h) Fifty grams or more of methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and
salts of its isomers, or five hundred grams or more of a mixture or
substance containing a detectable amount of methamphetamine, its salts,
isomers, or salts of its isomers.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for an offender
with one prior conviction for an offense under subsection (2) of this
section, such person shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement
of not less than two hundred forty months, or life imprisonment if
death or serious bodily injury results from the use of such substance.
(4) All mandatory minimum terms of total confinement provided in
this section shall be in addition to all other financial penalties or
fines provided by law.
(5) A minimum term of total confinement imposed under this section
may not be varied or modified under RCW 9.94A.535.

--- END ---