BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the penalties listed in RCW 46.61.5055, the
court shall impose the additional sentencing enhancements in subsection
(2) of this section when the offender, at the time he or she was
arrested for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, also committed
any of the following:
(a) Driving without a license, RCW 46.20.005 or 46.20.015;
(b) Failure to provide proof of motor vehicle insurance, RCW
46.30.020;
(c) Driving without a required ignition interlock device, RCW
46.20.740;
(d) Circumventing an ignition interlock device, RCW 46.20.750;
(e) Reckless driving, RCW 46.61.500;
(f) Exceeding the speed limit, RCW 46.61.400;
(g) Speeding in a school zone, RCW 46.61.440;
(h) Reckless endangerment of roadway workers, RCW 46.61.527;
(i) Racing of vehicles on highways, RCW 46.61.530;
(j) Failure to obey traffic control devices, RCW 46.61.050;
(k) Open container violation, RCW 46.61.519;
(l) Failure to stop, RCW 46.61.055, 46.61.065, 46.61.200,
46.61.340, 46.61.345, or 46.61.365;
(m) Failure to yield, RCW 46.61.180, 46.61.185, 46.61.190,
46.61.202, 46.61.205, 46.61.210, 46.61.215, 46.61.220, 46.61.235,
46.61.245, or 46.61.261;
(n) Improper lane change or travel, RCW 46.61.140;
(o) Passing stopped school bus, RCW 46.61.370;
(p) Impeding traffic, RCW 46.61.100, or 46.61.425;
(q) Failure to signal or improper signal, RCW 46.61.305;
(r) Operating with obstructed vision, RCW 46.61.615;
(s) Operating with obscured windows, RCW 46.37.430;
(t) Driving without lights, RCW 46.37.020;
(u) Failure to wear safety belts, RCW 46.61.688; or
(v) Following too close, RCW 46.61.145.
(2) For each infraction or offense, the court shall impose the
following sentencing enhancements:
(a) Five days imprisonment. The additional imprisonment shall be
served in total confinement, shall run consecutively to any other
period of confinement, and may not be suspended or deferred. However,
an offender may be granted extraordinary medical placement when
authorized under RCW 46.61.5055(11). If the additional period of
confinement required under this section increases the total time of
confinement so that it exceeds the statutory maximum for the offense,
the portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be
reduced.
(b) Two hundred fifty dollar fine. The court may not suspend or
defer this additional fine. If the additional fine required under this
section increases the total fine so that it exceeds the statutory
maximum for the offense, the portion of the fine representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(c) An order directing the department of licensing to suspend,
revoke, or deny the offender's driver's license, permit, or privilege
to drive for an additional thirty days. The suspension, revocation, or
denial under this section may not be stayed or deferred, shall run
consecutively to any other suspension, revocation, or denial imposed,
and is not subject to the day-for-day credit under RCW 46.20.3101(4)
and 46.61.5055(7).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
In a criminal case where the defendant has been convicted of a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and there has been a special
allegation pleaded and proven beyond a reasonable doubt that the
defendant also committed any of the offenses or infractions listed in
section 1 of this act, the court shall make a finding of fact of the
special allegation, or if a jury trial is had, the jury shall, if it
finds the defendant guilty, also find a special verdict as to the
special allegation.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.61.5055 and 2004 c 95 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 and who has no prior offense within seven years shall be
punished as follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than one
year. Twenty-four consecutive hours of the imprisonment may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection
(1)(a)(i), the court may order not less than fifteen days of electronic
home monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home
monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of
alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than one
year. Two consecutive days of the imprisonment may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory
minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence
is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason
for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term
of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court may
order not less than thirty days of electronic home monitoring. The
offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county
or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine
the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the
court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent.
(2) A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 and who has one prior offense within seven years shall be
punished as follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than one
year and sixty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall
pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or
municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the
cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of
imprisonment and sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than
one year and ninety days of electronic home monitoring. The offender
shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or
municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the
cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of
imprisonment and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(3) A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 and who has two or more prior offenses within seven years
shall be punished as follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than one
year and one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring. The
offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The
county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall
determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may
consume during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring.
Ninety days of imprisonment and one hundred twenty days of electronic
home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds
that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the
court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based;
and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor
more than one year and one hundred fifty days of electronic home
monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic
monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred
fifty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory
minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence
is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason
for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars
nor more than five thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars
of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(4) If a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 committed the offense while a passenger under the age of
sixteen was in the vehicle, the court shall:
(a) In any case in which the installation and use of an interlock
or other device is not mandatory under RCW 46.20.720 or other law,
order the use of such a device for not less than sixty days following
the restoration of the person's license, permit, or nonresident driving
privileges; and
(b) In any case in which the installation and use of such a device
is otherwise mandatory, order the use of such a device for an
additional sixty days.
(5) In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the
limits allowed by this section, the court shall particularly consider
the following:
(a) Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was
responsible for injury or damage to another or another's property; and
(b) Whether at the time of the offense the person was driving or in
physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers.
(6) An offender punishable under this section is subject to the
alcohol assessment and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.
(7) The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person
convicted of driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:
(a) If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if
for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
suspended or denied by the department for ninety days;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years;
(b) If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for one year;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for nine hundred days; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years; or
(c) If by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308, there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there have been no prior offenses within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for three years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more previous offenses within
seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years.
The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for any
portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under
this subsection for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under
RCW 46.20.3101 arising out of the same incident.
For purposes of this subsection (7), the department shall refer to
the driver's record maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the
existence of prior offenses.
(8) After expiration of any period of suspension, revocation, or
denial of the offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive
required by this section and section 1 of this act, the department
shall place the offender's driving privilege in probationary status
pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.
(9)(a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail
sentence required by this section and section 1 of this act, whenever
the court imposes less than one year in jail, the court shall also
suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not
exceeding five years. The court shall impose conditions of probation
that include: (i) Not driving a motor vehicle within this state
without a valid license to drive and proof of financial responsibility
for the future; (ii) not driving a motor vehicle within this state
while having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more within two hours
after driving; and (iii) not refusing to submit to a test of his or her
breath or blood to determine alcohol concentration upon request of a
law enforcement officer who has reasonable grounds to believe the
person was driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor.
The court may impose conditions of probation that include
nonrepetition, installation of an ignition interlock device on the
probationer's motor vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment, supervised
probation, or other conditions that may be appropriate. The sentence
may be imposed in whole or in part upon violation of a condition of
probation during the suspension period.
(b) For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under
(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection, the court shall order the
convicted person to be confined for thirty days, which shall not be
suspended or deferred.
(c) For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory
condition of probation imposed under this subsection, the license,
permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be suspended by the
court for thirty days or, if such license, permit, or privilege to
drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the finding
of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial
then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall
notify the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any
extension of a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this
subsection.
(10) A court may waive the electronic home monitoring requirements
of this chapter when:
(a) The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or
any other necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system;
(b) The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or
(c) The court determines that there is reason to believe that the
offender would violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring
penalty.
Whenever the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring
is waived, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the
waiver and the facts upon which the waiver is based, and shall impose
an alternative sentence with similar punitive consequences. The
alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to, additional
jail time, work crew, or work camp.
Whenever the combination of jail time and electronic home
monitoring or alternative sentence would exceed three hundred sixty-five days, the offender shall serve the jail portion of the sentence
first, and the electronic home monitoring or alternative portion of the
sentence shall be reduced so that the combination does not exceed three
hundred sixty-five days.
(11) An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or
not a mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an
extraordinary medical placement by the jail administrator subject to
the standards and limitations set forth in RCW 9.94A.728(4).
(12) For purposes of this section:
(a) A "prior offense" means any of the following:
(i) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(ii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(iii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(iv) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(v) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or
9A.36.050 or an equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the
result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW
46.61.520 or 46.61.522;
(vi) An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have
been a violation of (a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this
subsection if committed in this state;
(vii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an
equivalent local ordinance; or
(viii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local
ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred prosecution was
granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or
46.61.522; and
(b) "Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within seven years of the arrest for the current offense.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.61.5151 and 1995 c 332 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
A sentencing court may allow persons convicted of violating RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504 to fulfill the terms of the sentence provided in
RCW 46.61.5055 in nonconsecutive or intermittent time periods.
However, any mandatory minimum sentence under RCW 46.61.5055 and
sentencing enhancement under section 1 of this act shall be served
consecutively unless suspended or deferred as otherwise provided by
law.

--- END ---