BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Increasing Washington's economic competitiveness requires
increasing the supply of skilled workers in the state; and
(2) Improving the labor market competitiveness of all Washington
residents requires that all residents have access to postsecondary
education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The college board, a nonprofit organization that has been
established to address work force development issues by a recognized
statewide organization of employers representing a majority of
employers in the state, and the work force training and education
coordinating board, in consultation with a statewide high-technology
organization, shall:
(a) Identify high demand occupations, which are occupations where
employer demand for workers exceeds the supply of qualified job
applicants;
(b) Convene or use existing industry groups, such as industry skill
panels or other industry or occupational entities, to identify the
skill sets that workers need in the high demand occupations;
(c) Develop and identify credentials and credit-bearing curriculum
recognized by postsecondary institutions and employers statewide and
that are based on the attainment of the skill sets needed in
occupations in high demand sectors;
(d) Market the credentials or certificates and credit-bearing
curriculum to potential students and employers as a way for them to
advance in their careers; and
(e) Gain recognition of the credentials or certificates and credit-bearing curriculum by employers.
(2) In carrying out the functions of this section, the college
board shall give priority to high demand occupations in industry
sectors important to the economic growth of the state.
(3) The college board may, in implementing this section, accept,
use, and dispose of contributions of money, services, and property.
All moneys received by the college board for the purposes of this
section must be deposited in a depository approved by the state
treasurer. Disbursements of such funds shall be on authorization of
the college board or a duly authorized representative thereof. In
order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, such
funds are subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required to permit expenditure of such funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The college board shall develop and implement a work force
education program known as the opportunity grant program to provide
funding for low-income students enrolled in the program, including but
not limited to funding tuition, books, and fees. The college board
must:
(a) Begin developing the program no later than March 15, 2006, with
student enrollment to begin no later than January 1, 2007; and
(b) Submit a progress report to the legislature by January 15,
2008.
(2) The college board may, in implementing the opportunity grant
program, accept, use, and dispose of contributions of money, services,
and property. All moneys received by the college board for the program
must be deposited in a depository approved by the state treasurer.
Disbursements of such funds shall be on authorization of the college
board or a duly authorized representative thereof. In order to
maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, such funds are
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required to permit expenditure of such funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The work force training and education
coordinating board, with cooperation from the college board and the
higher education coordinating board, shall conduct a study to include:
(a) A review of and recommendations for consolidating and
simplifying the delivery of state-funded and federally funded work
force education programs and work force education aid offered to
students in this state, with a goal of achieving easier access to
postsecondary education for students;
(b) A description of barriers that exist to combining work force
education programs and work force education aid, such as state or
federal statutes, rules, or regulations, and the relief that may be
available through federal waivers;
(c) An estimate of the funding gap between available work force
education aid and the financial needs of students living in this state;
(d) A description of barriers to access to and completion of work
force education programs in this state; and
(e) Recommendations for increasing participation and completion
rates for work force education programs.
(2) The work force training and education coordinating board must
submit its report on the study to the legislature by November 15, 2006,
and must coordinate its study and research with the Washington Learns
study of postsecondary education.
(3) The work force training and education coordinating board may,
in carrying out this study, accept, use, and dispose of contributions
of money, services, and property. All moneys received by the work
force training and education coordinating board for the study must be
deposited in a depository approved by the state treasurer.
Disbursements of such funds shall be on authorization of the work force
training and education coordinating board or a duly authorized
representative thereof. In order to maintain an effective expenditure
and revenue control, such funds are subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit expenditure of
such funds.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Financial needs" includes but is not limited to tuition,
books, fees, tools, living expenses, and child care expenses.
(b) "Work force education aid" means financial aid, funded from
state or federal sources, provided to students enrolled in work force
education programs.
(c) "Work force education programs" means education and skills
training, including vocational education, apprenticeships, adult basic
education linked to vocational education, work force education under
RCW 28C.18.010, work force training provided under chapter 74.08A RCW,
and any other related work force training program.
(5) This section expires December 31, 2006.

--- END ---