BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to tangible
personal property for use or consumption directly and predominantly in
the receiving, initiating, amplifying, processing, monitoring,
transmitting, retransmitting, or switching of telecommunications
services for sale, internet access services for sale, or any
combination thereof, including tangible personal property used or
consumed to upgrade systems used to provide those same services.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to machinery,
equipment, and other tangible personal property for use in a data
center or call center that supports the sale of telecommunications or
internet services for customers.
(3) Where otherwise taxable services are rendered directly to or in
relation to tangible personal property as outlined in subsection (1) of
this section, those services are also exempt from the tax levied by RCW
82.08.020.
(4) The joint legislative audit and review committee, with the
cooperation of the department of revenue, shall report on the
effectiveness of the tax incentives in this section to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007. The report shall
measure the effectiveness of the tax incentives on promoting build out
of telecommunications infrastructure and any other factors the
committee may select.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2013.

--- END ---