BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.670 and 2003 c 274 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Human immunodeficiency virus insurance program," as used in
this section, means a program that provides health insurance coverage
for individuals with human immunodeficiency virus, as defined in RCW
70.24.017(7), who are not eligible for medical assistance programs from
the department of social and health services as defined in RCW
74.09.010(8) and meet eligibility requirements established by the
department of health.
(2) The department of health may pay for health insurance coverage
on behalf of persons with human immunodeficiency virus, who meet
department eligibility requirements, and who are eligible for
"continuation coverage" as provided by the federal consolidated omnibus
budget reconciliation act of 1985, group health insurance policies, or
individual policies. ((The number of insurance policies supported by
this program in the Washington state health insurance pool as defined
in RCW 48.41.030(18) shall not grow beyond the July 1, 2003, level.))

--- END ---