BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.40.040 and 1999 c 361 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In order to be investigated, an assertion of improper
governmental action must be provided to the auditor within one year
after the occurrence of the asserted improper governmental action.
(b) The auditor has the authority to determine whether to
investigate any assertions received. In determining whether to conduct
either a preliminary or further investigation, the auditor shall
consider factors including, but not limited to: The nature and quality
of evidence and the existence of relevant laws and rules; whether the
action was isolated or systematic; the history of previous assertions
regarding the same subject or subjects or subject matter; whether other
avenues are available for addressing the matter; whether the matter has
already been investigated or is in litigation; the seriousness or
significance of the asserted improper governmental action; and the cost
and benefit of the investigation. The auditor has the sole discretion
to determine the priority and weight given to these and other relevant
factors and to decide whether a matter is to be investigated. The
auditor shall document the factors considered and the analysis applied.
(c) The auditor also has the authority to investigate assertions of
improper governmental actions as part of an audit conducted under
chapter 43.09 RCW. The auditor shall document the reasons for handling
the matter as part of such an audit.
(d) In addition to investigating employee assertions of improper
governmental action, the auditor has the authority to investigate
assertions of improper action made by a state contractor or an employee
of a state contractor.
(2) Subject to subsection (5)(c) of this section, the identity of
a whistleblower is confidential at all times unless the whistleblower
consents to disclosure by written waiver or by acknowledging his or her
identity in a claim against the state for retaliation.
(3) Upon receiving specific information that an employee has
engaged in improper governmental action, the auditor shall, within five
working days of receipt of the information, mail written
acknowledgement to the whistleblower at the address provided stating
whether a preliminary investigation will be conducted. For a period
not to exceed thirty working days from receipt of the assertion, the
auditor shall conduct such preliminary investigation of the matter as
the auditor deems appropriate.
(4) In addition to the authority under subsection (3) of this
section, the auditor may, on its own initiative, investigate incidents
of improper state governmental action.
(5)(a) If it appears to the auditor, upon completion of the
preliminary investigation, that the matter is so unsubstantiated that
no further investigation, prosecution, or administrative action is
warranted, the auditor shall so notify the whistleblower.
(b) The written notification shall contain a summary of the
information received and of the results of the preliminary
investigation with regard to each assertion of improper governmental
action.
(c) In any case to which this section applies, the identity of the
whistleblower shall be kept confidential unless the auditor determines
that the information has been provided other than in good faith.
(d) With the agency's consent, the auditor may forward the
assertions to an appropriate agency to investigate and report back to
the auditor no later than sixty working days after the assertions are
received from the auditor. The auditor is entitled to all
investigative records resulting from such a referral. All procedural
and confidentiality provisions of this chapter apply to investigations
conducted under this subsection. The auditor shall document the
reasons the assertions were referred.
(6) During the preliminary investigation, the auditor shall provide
written notification of the nature of the assertions to the subject or
subjects of the investigation and the agency head. The notification
shall include the relevant facts and laws known at the time and the
procedure for the subject or subjects of the investigation and the
agency head to respond to the assertions and information obtained
during the investigation. This notification does not limit the auditor
from considering additional facts or laws which become known during
further investigation.
(7)(a) If it appears to the auditor after completion of the
preliminary investigation that further investigation, prosecution, or
administrative action is warranted, the auditor shall so notify the
whistleblower, the subject or subjects of the investigation, and the
agency head and either conduct a further investigation or issue a
report under subsection (10) of this section.
(b) If the preliminary investigation resulted from an anonymous
assertion, a decision to conduct further investigation shall be subject
to review by a three-person panel convened as necessary by the auditor
prior to the commencement of any additional investigation. The panel
shall include a state auditor representative knowledgeable of the
subject agency operations, a citizen volunteer, and a representative of
the attorney general's office. This group shall be briefed on the
preliminary investigation and shall recommend whether the auditor
should proceed with further investigation.
(c) If further investigation is to occur, the auditor shall provide
written notification of the nature of the assertions to the subject or
subjects of the investigation and the agency head. The notification
shall include the relevant facts known at the time and the procedure to
be used by the subject or subjects of the investigation and the agency
head to respond to the assertions and information obtained during the
investigation.
(8) Within sixty working days after the preliminary investigation
period in subsection (3) of this section, the auditor shall complete
the investigation and report its findings to the whistleblower unless
written justification for the delay is furnished to the whistleblower,
agency head, and subject or subjects of the investigation. In all such
cases, the report of the auditor's investigation and findings shall be
sent to the whistleblower within one year after the information was
filed under subsection (3) of this section.
(9)(a) At any stage of an investigation under this section the
auditor may require by subpoena the attendance and testimony of
witnesses and the production of documentary or other evidence relating
to the investigation at any designated place in the state. The auditor
may issue subpoenas, administer oaths, examine witnesses, and receive
evidence. In the case of contumacy or failure to obey a subpoena, the
superior court for the county in which the person to whom the subpoena
is addressed resides or is served may issue an order requiring the
person to appear at any designated place to testify or to produce
documentary or other evidence. Any failure to obey the order of the
court may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.
(b) The auditor may order the taking of depositions at any stage of
a proceeding or investigation under this chapter. Depositions shall be
taken before an individual designated by the auditor and having the
power to administer oaths. Testimony shall be reduced to writing by or
under the direction of the individual taking the deposition and shall
be subscribed by the deponent.
(c) Agencies shall cooperate fully in the investigation and shall
take appropriate action to preclude the destruction of any evidence
during the course of the investigation.
(d) During the investigation the auditor shall interview each
subject of the investigation. If it is determined there is reasonable
cause to believe improper governmental action has occurred, the subject
or subjects and the agency head shall be given fifteen working days to
respond to the assertions prior to the issuance of the final report.
(10)(a) If the auditor determines there is reasonable cause to
believe an employee has engaged in improper governmental action, the
auditor shall report the nature and details of the activity to:
(i) The subject or subjects of the investigation and the head of
the employing agency; and
(ii) If appropriate, the attorney general or such other authority
as the auditor determines appropriate.
(b) The auditor has no enforcement power except that in any case in
which the auditor submits an investigative report containing reasonable
cause determinations to the agency, the agency shall send its plan for
resolution to the auditor within fifteen working days of having
received the report. The agency is encouraged to consult with the
subject or subjects of the investigation in establishing the resolution
plan. The auditor may require periodic reports of agency action until
all resolution has occurred. If the auditor determines that
appropriate action has not been taken, the auditor shall report the
determination to the governor and to the legislature and may include
this determination in the agency audit under chapter 43.09 RCW.
(11) Once the auditor concludes that appropriate action has been
taken to resolve the matter, the auditor shall so notify the
whistleblower, the agency head, and the subject or subjects of the
investigation. If the resolution takes more than one year, the auditor
shall provide annual notification of its status to the whistleblower,
agency head, and subject or subjects of the investigation.
(12) This section does not limit any authority conferred upon the
attorney general or any other agency of government to investigate any
matter.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.41.030 and 1995 c 213 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every local government employee has the right to report to the
appropriate person or persons information concerning an alleged
improper governmental action.
(2) The governing body or chief administrative officer of each
local government shall adopt a policy on the appropriate procedures to
follow for reporting such information and shall provide information to
their employees on the policy. Local governments are encouraged to
consult with their employees on the policy.
(3) The policy shall describe the appropriate person or persons
within the local government to whom to report information and a list of
appropriate person or persons outside the local government to whom to
report. The list shall include the county prosecuting attorney.
(4) The policy shall authorize the state auditor to investigate
assertions of improper action made by a local government contractor or
an employee of a local government contractor.
(5) Each local government shall permanently post a summary of the
procedures for reporting information on an alleged improper
governmental action and the procedures for protection against
retaliatory actions described in RCW 42.41.040 in a place where all
employees will have reasonable access to it. A copy of the summary
shall be made available to any employee upon request.
(((5))) (6) A local government may require as part of its policy
that, except in the case of an emergency, before an employee provides
information of an improper governmental action to a person or an entity
who is not a public official or a person listed pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section, the employee shall submit a written report to the
local government. Where a local government has adopted such a policy
under this section, an employee who fails to make a good faith attempt
to follow the policy shall not receive the protections of this chapter.
(((6))) (7) If a local government has failed to adopt a policy as
required by subsection (2) of this section, an employee may report
alleged improper government action directly to the county prosecuting
attorney or, if the prosecuting attorney or an employee of the
prosecuting attorney participated in the alleged improper government
action, to the state auditor. The cost incurred by the state auditor
in such investigations shall be paid by the local government through
the municipal revolving account authorized in RCW 43.09.282.
(((7))) (8) The identity of a reporting employee shall be kept
confidential to the extent possible under law, unless the employee
authorizes the disclosure of his or her identity in writing.

--- END ---