BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, a school district may offer
either full-day or half-day kindergarten in one or more schools as part
of basic education. To ensure that the superintendent of public
instruction has sufficient time to allocate funds, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt deadlines for a school
district to notify the agency that the district intends to operate a
full-day kindergarten program in one or more schools.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.220 and 1993 c 371 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Satisfaction of the basic education program requirements
identified in RCW 28A.150.210 shall be considered to be implemented by
the following program:
(a) Each school district shall make available to students enrolled
in half-day kindergarten at least a total instructional offering of
four hundred fifty hours. Each school district shall make available to
students in a full-day kindergarten program at least a total
instructional offering of nine hundred hours. The program shall
include instruction in the essential academic learning requirements
((under RCW 28A.630.885)) and such other subjects and such activities
as the school district shall determine to be appropriate for the
education of the school district's students enrolled in such program;
(b) Each school district shall make available to students enrolled
in grades one through twelve, at least a district-wide annual average
total instructional hour offering of one thousand hours. The state
board of education may define alternatives to classroom instructional
time for students in grades nine through twelve enrolled in alternative
learning experiences. The state board of education shall establish
rules to determine annual average instructional hours for districts
including fewer than twelve grades. The program shall include the
essential academic learning requirements ((under RCW 28A.630.885)) and
such other subjects and such activities as the school district shall
determine to be appropriate for the education of the school district's
students enrolled in such group;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages.
(2) Nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to require individual students to attend school for any
particular number of hours per day or to take any particular courses.
(3) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five
years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one
years of age ((and)). The program shall consist of a minimum of one
hundred eighty school days per school year in such grades as are
conducted by a school district((, and)). At the option of the school
district, the basic education program for students in kindergarten may
consist of either one hundred eighty ((half-days)) half days or one
hundred eighty full days of instruction((, or equivalent, in
kindergarten: PROVIDED, That)). Effective May 1, 1979, a school
district may schedule the last five school days of the one hundred and
eighty day school year for noninstructional purposes in the case of
students who are graduating from high school, including, but not
limited to, the observance of graduation and early release from school
upon the request of a student, and all such students may be claimed as
a full time equivalent student to the extent they could otherwise have
been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260.
(4) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.250 and 1990 c 33 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
From those funds made available by the legislature for the current
use of the common schools, the superintendent of public instruction
shall distribute annually as provided in RCW 28A.510.250 to each school
district of the state operating a program approved by the state board
of education an amount which, when combined with an appropriate portion
of such locally available revenues, other than receipts from federal
forest revenues distributed to school districts pursuant to RCW
28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020, as the superintendent of public
instruction may deem appropriate for consideration in computing state
equalization support, excluding excess property tax levies, will
constitute a basic education allocation in dollars for each annual
average full time equivalent student enrolled, based upon one full
school year of one hundred eighty days, except that for schools in
which a school district is operating half-day kindergartens, one full
school year shall be one hundred eighty half days of instruction, or
the equivalent as provided in RCW 28A.150.220.
Basic education shall be considered to be fully funded by those
amounts of dollars appropriated by the legislature pursuant to RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 to fund those program requirements
identified in RCW 28A.150.220 in accordance with the formula and ratios
provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and those amounts of dollars appropriated
by the legislature to fund the salary requirements of RCW 28A.150.100
and 28A.150.410.
Operation of a program approved by the state board of education,
for the purposes of this section, shall include a finding that the
ratio of students per classroom teacher in grades kindergarten through
three is not greater than the ratio of students per classroom teacher
in grades four and above for such district: PROVIDED, That for the
purposes of this section, "classroom teacher" shall be defined as an
instructional employee possessing at least a provisional certificate,
but not necessarily employed as a certificated employee, whose primary
duty is the daily educational instruction of students: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the state board of education shall adopt rules and
regulations to insure compliance with the student/teacher ratio
provisions of this section, and such rules and regulations shall allow
for exemptions for those special programs and/or school districts which
may be deemed unable to practicably meet the student/teacher ratio
requirements of this section by virtue of a small number of students.
If a school district's basic education program fails to meet the
basic education requirements enumerated in RCW 28A.150.250,
28A.150.260, and 28A.150.220, the state board of education shall
require the superintendent of public instruction to withhold state
funds in whole or in part for the basic education allocation until
program compliance is assured: PROVIDED, That the state board of
education may waive this requirement in the event of substantial lack
of classroom space.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.525.162 and 1995 c 77 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Funds appropriated to the state board of education from the
common school construction fund shall be allotted by the state board of
education in accordance with student enrollment and the provisions of
RCW 28A.525.200.
(2) No allotment shall be made to a school district until such
district has provided matching funds equal to or greater than the
difference between the total approved project cost and the amount of
state assistance to the district for financing the project computed
pursuant to RCW 28A.525.166, with the following exceptions:
(a) The state board may waive the matching requirement for
districts which have provided funds for school building construction
purposes through the authorization of bonds or through the
authorization of excess tax levies or both in an amount equivalent to
two and one-half percent of the value of its taxable property, as
defined in RCW 39.36.015.
(b) No such matching funds shall be required as a condition to the
allotment of funds for the purpose of making major or minor structural
changes to existing school facilities in order to bring such facilities
into compliance with the barrier free access requirements of section
504 of the federal rehabilitation act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 706) and
rules implementing the act.
(3) For the purpose of computing the state matching percentage
under RCW 28A.525.166 when a school district is granted authority to
enter into contracts, adjusted valuation per pupil shall be calculated
using headcount student enrollments from the most recent October
enrollment reports submitted by districts to the superintendent of
public instruction, adjusted as follows:
(a) In the case of projects for which local bonds were approved
after May 11, 1989:
(i) For districts which have been designated as serving high school
districts under RCW 28A.540.110, students residing in the nonhigh
district so designating shall be excluded from the enrollment count if
the student is enrolled in any grade level not offered by the nonhigh
district;
(ii) The enrollment of nonhigh school districts shall be increased
by the number of students residing within the district who are enrolled
in a serving high school district so designated by the nonhigh school
district under RCW 28A.540.110, including only students who are
enrolled in grade levels not offered by the nonhigh school district;
and
(iii) The number of preschool students with disabilities included
in the enrollment count shall be multiplied by one-half;
(b) In the case of construction or modernization of high school
facilities in districts serving students from nonhigh school districts,
the adjusted valuation per pupil shall be computed using the combined
adjusted valuations and enrollments of each district, each weighted by
the percentage of the district's resident high school students served
by the high school district; and
(c) The number of kindergarten students included in the enrollment
count shall be multiplied by one-half in schools in which a school
district is operating or plans to operate a half-day kindergarten
program.
(4) The state board of education shall prescribe and make effective
such rules as are necessary to equate insofar as possible the efforts
made by school districts to provide capital funds by the means
aforesaid.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "preschool students with
disabilities" means developmentally disabled children of preschool age
who are entitled to services under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100
and are not included in the kindergarten enrollment count of the
district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect September 1, 2008.

--- END ---