BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the
scientific evidence and geologic record of the central Puget Sound
region of the state is at high risk for catastrophic seismic events.
The legislature recognizes that King, Snohomish, and Pierce counties
represent over sixty percent of the state's economic activity. The
legislature further recognizes that destruction or significant
disruption of the state's center of economic activity would have a
long-term crippling effect on the economic and social welfare of all
citizens of the state. Therefore, the legislature finds that it is in
the state's best interest for the safety and welfare of its citizens
that regional transit authorities be organized and act as dual purpose
entities serving both public transit needs and emergency evacuation and
disaster response support in case of catastrophic natural and terrorism
events.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.112.010 and 1992 c 101 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature recognizes that existing transportation facilities
in the central Puget Sound area are inadequate to address mobility
needs of the area. The geography of the region((,)) and travel demand
growth((, and public resistance to new roadways combine to further))
necessitate the rapid development of alternative modes of travel.
The legislature finds that local governments have been effective in
cooperatively planning a multicounty, high capacity transportation
system. However, a continued multijurisdictional approach to funding,
construction, and operation of a multicounty high capacity
transportation system may impair the successful implementation of such
a system.
The legislature finds that a single agency will be more effective
than several local jurisdictions working collectively at planning,
developing, operating, and funding a high capacity transportation
system and supporting emergency urban evacuation and postdisaster
transportation logistical support. The single agency's services must
be carefully integrated and coordinated with public transportation
services currently provided. As the single agency's services are
established, any public transportation services currently provided that
are duplicative should be eliminated. Further, the single agency must
coordinate its activities with other agencies providing local and state
roadway services, implementing comprehensive planning, and implementing
transportation demand management programs and assist in developing
infrastructure to support high capacity systems including but not
limited to feeder systems, park and ride facilities, intermodal
centers, and related roadway and operational facilities. Coordination
can be best achieved through common governance, such as integrated
governing boards.
The legislature also finds that a single agency in the state's most
populous region will be more effective at providing emergency
evacuation services than multiple local transit agencies. In the
consolidation of high capacity and local transit services, the regional
transit authority shall conduct integrated transit planning, emergency
evacuation planning, management, and administration and shall eliminate
redundant activities in the merged organization.
It is therefore the policy of the state of Washington to empower
counties in the state's most populous region to create a local agency
for planning and implementing public transportation systems and a high
capacity transportation system within that region. The authorization
for such an agency, except as specifically provided in this chapter, is
not intended to limit the powers of existing transit agencies.

Sec. 3 RCW 81.112.020 and 1999 c 20 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Authority" means a regional transit authority authorized under
this chapter.
(2) "Board" means the board of a regional transit authority.
(3) "Service area" or "area" means the area included within the
boundaries of a regional transit authority.
(4) "System" means a regional transit system or local public
transportation system authorized under this chapter and under the
jurisdiction of a regional transit authority.
(5) "Facilities" means any lands, interest in land, air rights over
lands, and structures, including improvements thereto ((including)) and
vessel terminals, and any equipment, vehicles, vessels, and other
components necessary to support ((the)) a system.
(6) "Proof of payment" means evidence of fare prepayment authorized
by a regional transit authority for the use of trains, including but
not limited to commuter trains and light rail trains.
(7) "Local public transportation system" means a system of public
transportation services, including the services and facilities
necessary to implement the system, not otherwise constituting a high
capacity transportation system.

Sec. 4 RCW 81.112.030 and 1994 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Two or more contiguous counties each having a population of four
hundred thousand persons or more may establish a regional transit
authority to develop and operate a high capacity transportation system
as defined in chapter 81.104 RCW.
((The authority shall be formed in the following manner:
(1) The joint regional policy committee created pursuant to RCW
81.104.040 shall adopt a system and financing plan, including the
definition of the service area. This action shall be completed by
September 1, 1992, contingent upon satisfactory completion of the
planning process defined in RCW 81.104.100. The final system plan
shall be adopted no later than June 30, 1993. In addition to the
requirements of RCW 81.104.100, the plan for the proposed system shall
provide explicitly for a minimum portion of new tax revenues to be
allocated to local transit agencies for interim express services. Upon
adoption the joint regional policy committee shall immediately transmit
the plan to the county legislative authorities within the adopted
service area.
(2) The legislative authorities of the counties within the service
area shall decide by resolution whether to participate in the
authority. This action shall be completed within forty-five days
following receipt of the adopted plan or by August 13, 1993, whichever
comes first.
(3) Each county that chooses to participate in the authority shall
appoint its board members as set forth in RCW 81.112.040 and shall
submit its list of members to the secretary of the Washington state
department of transportation. These actions must be completed within
thirty days following each county's decision to participate in the
authority.
(4) The secretary shall call the first meeting of the authority, to
be held within thirty days following receipt of the appointments. At
its first meeting, the authority shall elect officers and provide for
the adoption of rules and other operating procedures.
(5) The authority is formally constituted at its first meeting and
the board shall begin taking steps toward implementation of the system
and financing plan adopted by the joint regional policy committee. If
the joint regional policy committee fails to adopt a plan by June 30,
1993, the authority shall proceed to do so based on the work completed
by that date by the joint regional policy committee. Upon formation of
the authority, the joint regional policy committee shall cease to
exist. The authority may make minor modifications to the plan as
deemed necessary and shall at a minimum review local transit agencies'
plans to ensure feeder service/high capacity transit service
integration, ensure fare integration, and ensure avoidance of parallel
competitive services. The authority shall also conduct a minimum
thirty-day public comment period.
(6) If the authority determines that major modifications to the
plan are necessary before the initial ballot proposition is submitted
to the voters, the authority may make those modifications with a
favorable vote of two-thirds of the entire membership. Any such
modification shall be subject to the review process set forth in RCW
81.104.110. The modified plan shall be transmitted to the legislative
authorities of the participating counties. The legislative authorities
shall have forty-five days following receipt to act by motion or
ordinance to confirm or rescind their continued participation in the
authority.
(7) If any county opts to not participate in the authority, but two
or more contiguous counties do choose to continue to participate, the
authority's board shall be revised accordingly. The authority shall,
within forty-five days, redefine the system and financing plan to
reflect elimination of one or more counties, and submit the redefined
plan to the legislative authorities of the remaining counties for their
decision as to whether to continue to participate. This action shall
be completed within forty-five days following receipt of the redefined
plan.
(8) The authority shall place on the ballot within two years of the
authority's formation, a single ballot proposition to authorize the
imposition of taxes to support the implementation of an appropriate
phase of the plan within its service area. In addition to the system
plan requirements contained in RCW 81.104.100(2)(d), the system plan
approved by the authority's board before the submittal of a proposition
to the voters shall contain an equity element which:
(a) Identifies revenues anticipated to be generated by corridor and
by county within the authority's boundaries;
(b) Identifies the phasing of construction and operation of high
capacity system facilities, services, and benefits in each corridor.
Phasing decisions should give priority to jurisdictions which have
adopted transit-supportive land use plans; and
(c) Identifies the degree to which revenues generated within each
county will benefit the residents of that county, and identifies when
such benefits will accrue.
A simple majority of those voting within the boundaries of the
authority is required for approval. If the vote is affirmative, the
authority shall begin implementation of the projects identified in the
proposition. However, the authority may not submit any authorizing
proposition for voter-approved taxes prior to July 1, 1993; nor may the
authority issue bonds or form any local improvement district prior to
July 1, 1993.
(9) If the vote on a proposition fails, the board may redefine the
proposition, make changes to the authority boundaries, and make
corresponding changes to the composition of the board. If the
composition of the board is changed, the participating counties shall
revise the membership of the board accordingly. The board may then
submit the revised proposition or a different proposition to the
voters. No single proposition may be submitted to the voters more than
twice. The authority may place additional propositions on the ballot
to impose taxes to support additional phases of plan implementation.
If the authority is unable to achieve a positive vote on a
proposition within two years from the date of the first election on a
proposition, the board may, by resolution, reconstitute the authority
as a single-county body. With a two-thirds vote of the entire
membership of the voting members, the board may also dissolve the
authority.))

Sec. 5 RCW 81.112.040 and 1994 c 109 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The regional transit authority shall be governed by a board
consisting of ((representatives appointed by the county executive and
confirmed by the council or other legislative authority of each member
county. Membership shall be based on population from that portion of
each county which lies within the service area. Board members shall be
appointed initially on the basis of one for each one hundred forty-five
thousand population within the county. Such appointments shall be made
following consultation with city and town jurisdictions within the
service area. In addition, the secretary of transportation or the
secretary's designee shall serve as a member of the board and may have
voting status with approval of a majority of the other members of the
board)) the county executives of King, Snohomish, and Pierce counties,
the secretary of the state department of transportation, the director
of the state emergency management division, and two representatives of
the private sector appointed by the governor. Only board members, not
including alternates or designees, may cast votes.
((Each member of the board, except the secretary of transportation
or the secretary's designee, shall be:
(a) An elected official who serves on the legislative authority of
a city or as mayor of a city within the boundaries of the authority;
(b) On the legislative authority of the county, if fifty percent of
the population of the legislative official's district is within the
authority boundaries; or
(c) A county executive from a member county within the authority
boundaries.
When making appointments, each county executive shall ensure that
representation on the board includes an elected city official
representing the largest city in each county and assures proportional
representation from other cities, and representation from
unincorporated areas of each county within the service area. At least
one-half of all appointees from each county shall serve on the
governing authority of a public transportation system.))
Members appointed from each county shall serve staggered ((four))
six-year terms. ((Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for the
remainder of the unexpired term of the position being vacated.
The governing board shall be reconstituted, with regard to the
number of representatives from each county, on a population basis,
using the official office of financial management population estimates,
five years after its initial formation and, at minimum, in the year
following each official federal census. The board membership may be
reduced, maintained, or expanded to reflect population changes but
under no circumstances may the board membership exceed twenty-five.))
(2) ((Major decisions of the authority shall require a favorable
vote of two-thirds of the entire membership of the voting members.
"Major decisions" include at least the following: System plan adoption
and amendment; system phasing decisions; annual budget adoption;
authorization of annexations; modification of board composition; and
executive director employment.
(3))) Each member of the board is eligible to be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and to
receive compensation as provided in RCW 43.03.250.
(3) The board shall form an advisory committee of cities within its
jurisdiction.

Sec. 6 RCW 81.112.050 and 1998 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time of formation, the area to be included within the
boundary of the authority shall be that area set forth in the system
plan adopted by the joint regional policy committee. Prior to
submitting the system and financing plan to the voters, the authority
may make adjustments to the boundaries as deemed appropriate but must
assure that, to the extent possible, the boundaries: (a) Include the
largest-population urban growth area designated by each county under
chapter 36.70A RCW; and (b) follow election precinct boundaries. If a
portion of any city is determined to be within the service area, the
entire city must be included within the boundaries of the authority.
(2) ((After voters within the authority boundaries have approved
the system and financing plan, elections to add areas contiguous to the
authority boundaries may be called by resolution of the regional
transit authority, after consultation with affected transit agencies
and with the concurrence of the legislative authority of the city or
town if the area is incorporated, or with the concurrence of the county
legislative authority if the area is unincorporated. Only those areas
that would benefit from the services provided by the authority may be
included and services or projects proposed for the area must be
consistent with the regional transportation plan. The election may
include a single ballot proposition providing for annexation to the
authority boundaries and imposition of the taxes at rates already
imposed within the authority boundaries.
(3) Upon receipt of a resolution requesting exclusion from the
boundaries of the authority from a city whose municipal boundaries
cross the boundaries of an authority and thereby result in only a
portion of the city being subject to local option taxes imposed by the
authority under chapters 81.104 and 81.112 RCW in order to implement a
high-capacity transit plan, and where the vote to approve the city's
incorporation occurred simultaneously with an election approving the
local option taxes, then upon a two-thirds majority vote of the
governing board of the authority, the governing board shall redraw the
boundaries of the authority to exclude that portion of the city that is
located within the authority's boundaries, and the excluded area is no
longer subject to local option taxes imposed by the authority. This
subsection expires December 31, 1998)) On the date of the transfer of
local public transportation systems to the regional transit authority
as specified in section 12 of this act, the authority boundaries shall
be countywide.

Sec. 7 RCW 81.112.070 and 1992 c 101 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the powers specifically granted by this chapter an
authority shall have all powers necessary to implement ((a high
capacity transportation)) systems and to develop revenues ((for
system)) to support these systems. An authority may contract with the
United States or any agency thereof, any state or agency thereof, any
public transportation benefit area, any county, county transportation
authority, city, metropolitan municipal corporation, special district,
or governmental agency, within or without the state, and any private
person, firm, or corporation for: (1) The purpose of receiving gifts
or grants or securing loans or advances for preliminary planning and
feasibility studies; (2) the design, construction, or operation of
((high capacity transportation)) system facilities; or (3) the
provision or receipt of services, facilities, or property rights to
provide revenues for ((the)) a system. An authority shall have the
power to contract pursuant to RCW 39.33.050. In addition, an authority
may contract with any governmental agency or with any private person,
firm, or corporation for the use by either contracting party of all or
any part of the facilities, structures, lands, interests in lands, air
rights over lands and rights of way of all kinds which are owned,
leased, or held by the other party and for the purpose of planning,
constructing, or operating any facility or performing any service that
the authority may be authorized to operate or perform, on such terms as
may be agreed upon by the contracting parties. Before any contract for
the lease or operation of any authority facilities is let to any
private person, firm, or corporation, a general schedule of rental
rates for equipment with or without operators applicable to all private
certificated carriers shall be publicly posted, and for other
facilities competitive bids shall first be called upon such notice,
bidder qualifications, and bid conditions as the board shall determine.
This shall allow use of negotiated procurements.

Sec. 8 RCW 81.112.110 and 1992 c 101 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
If an authority acquires any existing components of a high capacity
transportation system, it shall assume and observe all existing labor
contracts relating to the transportation system and, to the extent
necessary for operation of facilities, all of the employees of such
acquired transportation system whose duties are necessary to operate
efficiently the facilities acquired shall be appointed to comparable
positions to those which they held at the time of such transfer, and no
employee or retired or pensioned employee of such transportation
systems shall be placed in any worse position with respect to pension
seniority, wages, sick leave, vacation or other benefits that he or she
enjoyed as an employee of the transportation system prior to such
acquisition. At such times as may be required by such contracts, the
authority shall engage in collective bargaining with the duly appointed
representatives of any employee labor organization having existing
contracts with the acquired transportation system and may enter into
labor contracts with such employee labor organization. Facilities and
equipment ((which are acquired after July 1, 1993,)) related to high
capacity transportation services which are to be assumed by the
authority as specifically identified in the adopted system plan shall
be acquired by the authority in a manner consistent with RCW 81.112.070
through 81.112.100.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW
to read as follows:
An authority shall have the following powers in addition to any
other powers granted by this chapter:
(1) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant, and to
lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate,
and regulate the use of local public transportation systems and
properties within authority boundaries, including those systems
specified in RCW 81.112.080(2). The right of eminent domain shall be
exercised by an authority in the same manner and by the same procedure
as or may be provided by law for cities of the first class, except
insofar as such laws may be inconsistent with the provisions of this
chapter;
(2) To dispose of any real or personal property acquired in
connection with any authority function related to the operation of a
local public transportation system that is no longer required for the
purposes of the authority, in the same manner as provided for cities of
the first class. When an authority determines that a facility or any
part thereof that has been acquired from any public agency without
compensation is no longer required for authority purposes, but is
required by the agency from which it was acquired, the authority shall
by resolution transfer it to the agency;
(3) To fix rates, tolls, fares, and charges for the use of local
public transportation system facilities and to establish various routes
and classes of service. Fares or charges may be adjusted or eliminated
for any distinguishable class of users.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 81.112
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Except in accordance with an agreement made as provided in this
section, upon the date an authority begins to operate a local public
transportation system, no person or private corporation may operate a
similar system or service within the area covered by the system, with
the exception of services owned or operated by any corporation or
organization solely for the purposes of the corporation or organization
and for the use of which no fee or fare is charged.
(2) The authority and any person or corporation legally operating
a local public transportation system wholly within or partly within and
partly without the authority boundary on the date an authority begins
operating the system may enter into an agreement under which the person
or corporation may continue to operate the system or any part thereof
for such time and upon such terms and conditions as provided in the
agreement. The agreement shall provide for a periodic review of the
terms and conditions contained therein. Where any local public
transportation system will be required to cease to operate within the
authority boundary, the authority may agree with the owner of the
system to purchase the assets used in providing the service, or if no
agreement can be reached, an authority shall condemn the assets in the
manner and by the same procedure as is or may be provided by law for
the condemnation of other properties for cities of the first class,
except insofar as such laws may be inconsistent with this chapter.
(3) Wherever a privately owned public carrier operates wholly or
partly within an authority boundary, the Washington utilities and
transportation commission shall continue to exercise jurisdiction over
such operation as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 81.112
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Within one year after the effective date of this section, all
local public transportation systems shall be transferred to, and
acquired by, a regional transit authority if the systems are operated
by a city, county, county transportation authority, public
transportation benefit area, or municipal corporation, wholly within
the boundary of the regional transit authority. An authority shall
have and exercise all rights with respect to the construction,
acquisition, maintenance, operation, extension, alteration, repair,
control, and management of local public transportation systems that any
city, county, county transportation authority, metropolitan municipal
corporation, or public transportation benefit area, located wholly
within the authority boundary, has been previously empowered to
exercise and these powers shall not thereafter be exercised by these
agencies without the consent of the authority.
(2) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
any transit agency to an authority does not affect the validity of any
act performed before the effective date of this section.
(3) All existing rights, contracts, and obligations shall remain in
full force and shall be enforceable by or against the authority upon
the acquisition of a local public transportation system from a city,
county, county transportation authority, public transportation benefit
area, or municipal corporation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Collective bargaining agreements covering employees affected by
this act that are in effect on the effective date of this section may
not be renewed or extended, including an arbitration award, beyond six
months after the date of transfer of the local public transportation
systems to the regional transit authority.
(2) By six months after the date of transfer of the local public
transportation systems to the regional transit authority, the
commission shall, to reduce excessive fragmentation, combine the
existing bargaining units of such employees into fewer appropriate
bargaining units based on the employees' duties, skills, and working
conditions. Representation in the new unit or units must be determined
by election under RCW 41.56.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board of a regional transit authority established under
chapter 81.112 RCW may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with
this chapter. The tax is in addition to any other taxes authorized by
law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the
state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within the county. The rate of tax shall not exceed six-tenths of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax,
or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.
(2) The board of a regional transit authority established under
chapter 81.112 RCW may designate any city of the first class located
within the boundary of the authority as a high density service zone.
Upon designation as a high density service zone, the authority may
submit an authorizing proposition to the voters of the first class
city, and if the proposition is approved by a majority of the persons
voting, impose a sales and use tax in accordance with this chapter.
The tax authorized in this subsection is in addition to the tax
authorized in subsection (1) of this section and any other taxes
authorized by law. The tax shall be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the service zone. The rate of
tax shall not exceed one-half of one percent of the selling price in
the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of
a use tax.
(3) The taxes authorized in this section shall only be used for the
construction, acquisition, operation, maintenance, extension,
alteration, and repair of local public transportation systems.
(4) The board of a regional transit authority shall only impose the
tax authorized in subsection (1) of this section to the extent
necessary to fund local public transportation systems upon the
acquisition of such systems under section 11 of this act.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "local public transportation
system" has the meaning provided in RCW 81.112.020.

Sec. 14 RCW 81.104.170 and 1997 c 450 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation
authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation
benefit areas, and regional transit authorities may submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters and if approved by a majority of
persons voting, fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with
the terms of this chapter, solely for the purpose of providing high
capacity transportation service.
(2) The tax authorized pursuant to this section shall be in
addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state pursuant to chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
taxing district. The maximum rate of such tax shall be approved by the
voters and shall not exceed one percent of the selling price (in the
case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use
tax). The maximum rate of such tax that may be imposed shall not
exceed nine-tenths of one percent in any county that imposes a tax
under RCW 82.14.340, or within a regional transit authority if any
county within the authority imposes a tax under RCW 82.14.340.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, after the
effective date of this section the maximum rate of tax for a regional
transit authority shall not exceed four-tenths of one percent. The
exemptions in RCW 82.08.820 and 82.12.820 are for the state portion of
the sales and use tax and do not extend to the tax authorized in this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 81.112
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2007, the regional transit authority shall,
jointly with the state department of transportation, county
transportation agencies, state emergency management division, and
county emergency management agencies, develop an emergency evacuation
plan, for use in case of a catastrophic natural or man-made disaster,
including a postdisaster transportation logistical support and rescue
plan, an implementation plan, and funding requirements. The plan shall
include, but not be limited to:
(a) Designated and marked evacuation routes;
(b) High capacity evacuee relocation areas with basic shelter and
support services;
(c) First responder rendezvous points;
(d) Emergency bus service rendezvous points;
(e) Emergency air service landing sites;
(f) Fuel and maintenance support facilities;
(g) Public health capacity and accessibility; and
(h) Emergency management division physical and remote access to
regional transit authority vehicle dispatch systems.
(2) All regional transit authority buses, support vehicles, and
fleet maintenance facilities shall be connected by an integrated
geographic positioning system and satellite telecommunications network.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A
RCW to read as follows:
A comprehensive plan must reflect the emergency evacuation planning
requirements in section 15 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 28A.160
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall, in
coordination with the appropriate educational service districts and
associated school districts, develop an integrated emergency evacuation
and postdisaster transportation logistical support and rescue plan,
implementation action plan, and funding requirements. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall integrate its plans with
evacuation and emergency response plans developed by a regional transit
authority and the state emergency management department. School
district facilities and vehicles shall be considered as resources for
evacuation and shelter as part of the emergency response planning
process. Rejoining children with their parents after a catastrophic
event shall be a significant priority in the emergency evacuation and
rescue plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state department of transportation shall establish
an ongoing inventory of all publicly owned heavy equipment that may be
used to open transportation corridors into the regional transit
authority area after a catastrophic event.

Sec. 19 RCW 35.95.020 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 270 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
The following terms however used or referred to in this chapter,
shall have the following meanings, unless a different meaning is
required by the context:
(1) "Corporate authority" shall mean the council or other
legislative body of a municipality.
(2)(a) "Municipality" shall mean any incorporated city, town,
county pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110, any county
transportation authority created pursuant to chapter 36.57 RCW, any
public transportation benefit area created pursuant to chapter 36.57A
RCW, or any metropolitan municipal corporation created pursuant to RCW
35.58.010, et seq: PROVIDED, That the term "municipality" shall mean
in respect to any county performing the public transportation function
pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110 only that portion of the
unincorporated area lying wholly within such unincorporated
transportation benefit area.
(b) "Municipality" does not include any local transportation agency
described in (a) of this subsection if the boundary of the agency is
located wholly within the boundary of a regional transit authority, as
defined in RCW 81.112.020.
(3) "Person" shall mean any individual, firm, partnership,
corporation, company, association, joint stock association, school
district or political subdivision of the state, fraternal, benevolent,
religious or charitable society, club or organization, and shall
include any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other person acting in a
similar representative capacity. The term "person" shall not be
construed to include the United States nor the state of Washington.

Sec. 20 RCW 82.14.045 and 2001 c 89 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any city pursuant to RCW 35.92.060, of
any county which has created an unincorporated transportation benefit
area pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110, of any public
transportation benefit area pursuant to RCW 36.57A.080 and 36.57A.090,
of any county transportation authority established pursuant to chapter
36.57 RCW, and of any metropolitan municipal corporation within a
county with a population of one million or more pursuant to chapter
35.58 RCW, may, by resolution or ordinance for the sole purpose of
providing funds for the operation, maintenance, or capital needs of
public transportation systems or public transportation limited to
persons with special needs under RCW 36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and in
lieu of the excise taxes authorized by RCW 35.95.040, submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters or include such authorization in
a proposition to perform the function of public transportation or
public transportation limited to persons with special needs under RCW
36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and if approved by a majority of persons
voting thereon, ((fix and)) impose a sales and use tax in accordance
with the terms of this chapter: PROVIDED, That no such legislative
body shall impose such a sales and use tax without submitting such an
authorizing proposition to the voters and obtaining the approval of a
majority of persons voting thereon: PROVIDED FURTHER, That where such
a proposition is submitted by a county on behalf of an unincorporated
transportation benefit area, it shall be voted upon by the voters
residing within the boundaries of such unincorporated transportation
benefit area and, if approved, the sales and use tax shall be imposed
only within such area. Notwithstanding any provisions of this section
to the contrary, any county in which a county public transportation
plan has been adopted pursuant to RCW 36.57.070 and the voters of such
county have authorized the imposition of a sales and use tax pursuant
to the provisions of section 10, chapter 167, Laws of 1974 ex. sess.,
prior to July 1, 1975, shall be authorized to fix and impose a sales
and use tax as provided in this section at not to exceed the rate so
authorized without additional approval of the voters of such county as
otherwise required by this section.
The tax authorized pursuant to this section shall be in addition to
the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within such city,
public transportation benefit area, county, or metropolitan municipal
corporation as the case may be. The rate of such tax shall be one-tenth, two-tenths, three-tenths, four-tenths, five-tenths, six-tenths,
seven-tenths, eight-tenths, or nine-tenths of one percent of the
selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used
(in the case of a use tax). The rate of such tax shall not exceed the
rate authorized by the voters unless such increase shall be similarly
approved.
(2)(a) In the event a metropolitan municipal corporation shall
impose a sales and use tax pursuant to this chapter no city, county
which has created an unincorporated transportation benefit area, public
transportation benefit area authority, or county transportation
authority wholly within such metropolitan municipal corporation shall
be empowered to ((levy and/or collect)) impose taxes pursuant to RCW
((35.58.273,)) 35.95.040((, and/or 82.14.045)) or this section, but
nothing herein shall prevent such city or county from imposing sales
and use taxes pursuant to any other authorization.
(b) In the event a county transportation authority shall impose a
sales and use tax pursuant to this section, no city, county which has
created an unincorporated transportation benefit area, public
transportation benefit area, or metropolitan municipal corporation,
located within the territory of the authority, shall be empowered to
((levy or collect)) impose taxes pursuant to RCW ((35.58.273,))
35.95.040((,)) or ((82.14.045)) this section.
(c) In the event a public transportation benefit area shall impose
a sales and use tax pursuant to this section, no city, county which has
created an unincorporated transportation benefit area, or metropolitan
municipal corporation, located wholly or partly within the territory of
the public transportation benefit area, shall be empowered to ((levy or
collect)) impose taxes pursuant to RCW ((35.58.273,)) 35.95.040((,)) or
((82.14.045)) this section.
(3) ((Any local sales and use tax revenue collected pursuant to
this section by any city or by any county for transportation purposes
pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110 shall not be counted as locally
generated tax revenues for the purposes of apportionment and
distribution, in the manner prescribed by chapter 82.44 RCW, of the
proceeds of the motor vehicle excise tax authorized pursuant to RCW
35.58.273, except that the local sales and use tax revenue collected
under this section by a city with a population greater than sixty
thousand that as of January 1, 1998, owns and operates a municipal
public transportation system shall be counted as locally generated tax
revenues for the purposes of apportionment and distribution, in the
manner prescribed by chapter 82.44 RCW, of the proceeds of the motor
vehicle excise tax authorized under RCW 35.58.273 as follows:
(a) For fiscal year 2000, revenues collected under this section
shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for up to 25 percent
of the tax collected under RCW 35.58.273;
(b) For fiscal year 2001, revenues collected under this section
shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for up to 50 percent
of the tax collected under RCW 35.58.273;
(c) For fiscal year 2002, revenues collected under this section
shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for up to 75 percent
of the tax collected under RCW 35.58.273; and
(d) For fiscal year 2003 and thereafter, revenues collected under
this section shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for up
to 100 percent of the tax collected under RCW 35.58.273)) No
transportation agency otherwise eligible to impose the sales and use
tax authorized in subsection (1) of this section shall impose the tax
authorized in subsection (1) of this section if the services and
facilities of the agency are acquired by a regional transit agency
under section 11 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Every four years, the state auditor shall conduct a performance
audit and evaluation of the regional transit authority established
under chapter 81.112 RCW. The audit shall review, but not be limited
to, vehicle dispatch operating technology and management systems, fleet
maintenance and operations, route mapping, and scheduling operating
systems and financial and administrative practices. A benchmarking
performance audit shall be done no later than ninety days after the
effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 81.112
RCW to read as follows:
As of the effective date of this section, the regional transit
authority shall defer any further expenditure related to the
construction and development of the light rail system until an
integrated bus rapid transit system and emergency urban evacuation and
postdisaster response plan are implemented and operational.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 81.112
RCW to read as follows:
The regional transit authority shall report on its emergency
evacuation plan to the appropriate committees of the legislature and
the governor by January 1, 2007.

--- END ---