BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the paramount
duty of the state is to provide for the education and well-being of its
children. Washington has been blessed with an ample forest land base
that, because of the wisdom of its founders, is held in trust by the
state to provide a sustainable economic mechanism for education
funding. However, the great forests of the state cannot provide for
the next generation on its own. To maximize the potential benefit to
the educational system, the forests of the state must be actively
managed and maintained, using modern silvicultural techniques and sound
forest stewardship. When land managers fail at this mission, or have
their efforts hamstrung by third party litigation roadblocks, the group
that bears the cost is the state's children. Therefore, the
legislature further finds that the state should make deeper investments
in the health of its forests, provide local mechanisms to aid the state
in its management duties, and require third parties that influence
forest health management to reimburse the state's children for the
costs inflicted upon the children.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.06.020 and 2003 c 314 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agent" means the recognized legal representative,
representatives, agent, or agents for any owner.
(2) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(3) "Owner" means and includes persons or their agents.
(4) "Timber land" means any land on which there is a sufficient
number of trees, standing or down, to constitute, in the judgment of
either the department or a county executive authority when appropriate,
a forest insect or forest disease breeding ground of a nature to
constitute a menace, injurious and dangerous to permanent forest growth
in the district under consideration.
(5) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(6) "Exotic" means not native to forest lands in Washington state.
(7) "Forest land" means any land on which there are sufficient
numbers and distribution of trees and associated species to, in the
judgment of the department, contribute to the spread of forest insect
or forest disease outbreaks that could be injurious to forest health.
(8) "Forest health" means the condition of a forest being sound in
ecological function, sustainable, resilient, and resistant to insects,
diseases, fire, and other disturbance, and having the capacity to meet
landowner objectives.
(9) "Forest health emergency" means the introduction of, or an
outbreak of, an exotic forest insect or disease that poses an imminent
danger of damage to the environment by threatening the survivability of
native tree species.
(10) "Forest insect or disease" means a living stage of an insect,
other invertebrate animal, or disease-causing organism or agent that
can directly or indirectly injure or cause disease or damage in trees,
or parts of trees, or in processed or manufactured wood, or other
products of trees.
(11) "Integrated pest management" means a strategy that uses
various combinations of pest control methods, including biological,
cultural, and chemical methods, in a compatible manner to achieve
satisfactory control and ensure favorable economic and environmental
consequences.
(12) "Native" means having populated Washington's forested lands
prior to European settlement.
(13) "Outbreak" means a rapidly expanding population of insects or
diseases with potential to spread.
(14) "Person" means any individual, partnership, private, public,
or municipal corporation, county, federal, state, or local governmental
agency, tribes, or association of individuals of whatever nature.

Sec. 3 RCW 76.06.040 and 1951 c 233 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every owner of timber lands, including timber lands owned by the
state and managed by the department, or ((his)) the owner's agent,
shall make every reasonable effort to control, destroy, and eradicate
such forest insect pests and forest tree diseases which threaten the
existence of any stand of timber or provide for the same to be done on
timber lands owned by him or her or under his or her control. In the
event ((he)) the owner fails, neglects, or is unable to accomplish such
control, the action may be performed as provided for in this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 76.06.030 and 1988 c 128 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided, this chapter shall be administered by
the department.

Sec. 5 RCW 76.06.050 and 1988 c 128 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever the department finds timber lands, that are managed
by a person or entity other than the department, threatened by
infestations of forest insects or forest tree diseases, and if it finds
that such infestation is of such character as to threaten destruction
of timber stands, the department shall declare and certify an
infestation control district and fix and declare the boundaries
((thereof)) of the control district, so as to definitely describe such
district. ((Said)) The district may include timber lands threatened by
the infestation as well as those timber lands already infested.
((Thereafter)) (b) The department shall at once serve written
notice to all owners of timber lands or their agents within the
((said)) district to proceed under the provisions of this chapter
without delay to control, destroy, and eradicate the ((said)) forest
insect pests or forest tree diseases as provided herein. The ((said))
notice may be made by personal service, or by mail addressed to the
last known place or address of ((such)) the owner or agent. ((Said))
The notice shall list and describe the method or methods of action that
will be acceptable to the department if the owner or agent elects to
control, destroy, and eradicate ((said)) the insects or diseases on his
or her own property.
((Said)) (c) The notice when published for five consecutive days in
at least one daily newspaper or in two consecutive issues of a weekly
newspaper, either paper having a general circulation in ((said)) the
district will serve as the written notice to owners of noncommercial
timber lands.
(2)(a) When the threatened timber lands occur on property managed
by the department, the authority to declare an infestation control
district transfers to the lead executive authority of the county in
which the land is located. If the infestation control area is located
in more than one county, then the lead executive authority of all
involved counties must act in concert.
(b) Once an infestation control district has been identified by a
county executive authority, notice must be immediately provided to the
commissioner along with a directive to proceed under the provisions of
this chapter without delay to control, destroy, and eradicate the
forest insect pests or forest tree diseases identified by the county.
Control efforts may include the removal of dead trees, standing or not,
that can serve as incubators for future forest health issues.

Sec. 6 RCW 76.06.060 and 1988 c 128 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the owner or agent ((so)) notified ((shall fail, refuse,
neglect)) by the department under RCW 76.06.050 fails, refuses, or
neglects or is unable to comply with the requirements of ((said)) the
notice, within a period of thirty days after the date ((thereof)) of
the notice, it shall be the duty of the department or its agents, using
such funds as have been, or hereafter may be, made available to proceed
with the control, eradication, and destruction of such forest pests or
forest tree diseases with or without the cooperation of the owner
involved in a manner approved by the department.
(2) In instances where a county executive authority notified the
department of the creation of an infestation control district on
department-managed land, it is the duty of the department to comply
with the requirements of the notice within thirty days of receipt. If
the department fails, refuses, or neglects to comply with the
requirements of the notice, the county executive authority may proceed
with the control, eradication, and destruction of forest pests or
forest tree diseases with or without the cooperation of the department.

Sec. 7 RCW 76.06.070 and 1988 c 128 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the completion of the work directed, authorized, and
performed under the provisions of ((this chapter)) RCW 76.06.060 by the
department on lands not managed by the department, the department shall
prepare a verified statement of the expenses necessarily incurred in
performing the work of controlling, eradicating, and destroying
((said)) forest insects or forest tree diseases. The balance of such
expenses after deducting such amounts as may be contributed to the
control costs by the state, by the federal government, or by any other
agencies, companies, corporations, or individuals, shall be a lien to
be prorated per acre upon the property, or properties involved((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, the amount of ((said)) the lien shall not
exceed twenty-five percent of the total costs incurred on such owner's
lands including necessary buffer strips. ((Said)) The lien shall be
reported by the department to the county assessor of the county in
which ((said)) the lands are situated, and shall be levied and
collected with the next taxes on such lands in the same manner and with
the same interest, penalty, and cost charges as apply to ad valorem
property taxes in this state((: PROVIDED FURTHER, Such)). Further,
the report and levy shall be made only on commercial timber lands. The
assessor shall extend the amounts on the assessment roll in a separate
column, and the procedure provided by law for the collection of taxes
and delinquent taxes shall be applicable thereto, and, upon the
collection thereof, the county treasurer shall repay the same to the
department to be applied to the expenses incurred in carrying out the
provisions of this chapter.
(2) Upon the completion of the work directed, authorized, and
performed under the provisions of RCW 76.06.060 by a county executive
authority on lands managed by the department, the county shall prepare
a verified statement of the expenses necessarily incurred in performing
the work of controlling, eradicating, and destroying the forest insects
or forest tree diseases on department-managed land. The department
shall fully reimburse the county within thirty days for all costs
involved in the recovery effort from the resource management cost
account created in RCW 79.64.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 76.06 RCW
to read as follows:
In any eradication or control effort on department-managed land
executed by either the department or a county executive authority under
RCW 76.06.060, the party implementing the control effort must include
provisions to sell all salvageable timber. The proceeds of all sales,
regardless if conducted by the department or a county, must be
distributed in the same manner as other timber sales from the same
property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 76.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any party that brings a judicial or administrative action
leading to a final judgment that results in the inability of the
department or a county to fulfill the duties of this chapter or execute
the authority of this chapter is required to reimburse the state for
the actual value of all revenue lost from the sale of otherwise
salvageable timber prohibited by the judicial or administrative order.
(2) Lost revenues recovered under this section must be distributed
in the same manner as provided for salvage timber sales in section 8 of
this act.

--- END ---