BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
Except when lawfully participating in a parade permitted by a local
jurisdiction, activation of an aftermarket hydraulic or mechanical
system that raises or lowers the height of a motor vehicle is
prohibited unless: (1) The motor vehicle is on a public roadway with
a posted speed limit of twenty-five miles per hour or less; and (2) the
vehicle is traveling at a speed of fifteen miles per hour or less. At
no time may any portion of any tire of such motor vehicle leave the
surface of the roadway or may any portion of the vehicle or component
of the hydraulic system used to raise or lower the vehicle cause or
emit sparks. A motor vehicle equipped with an aftermarket hydraulic or
mechanical system must meet all suspension requirements outlined in
this chapter or in rules adopted by the Washington state patrol.
Nothing in this section shall prohibit a city or county from enacting
stricter regulations for aftermarket vehicle hydraulics on a public
roadway.

--- END ---