BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Rising costs of natural gas are creating an economic hardship
for Washington's small business and food processing industries.
(2) Natural gas costs are unlikely to return to historically low
levels of a few years ago making investments in energy efficiency
increasingly important.
(3) Washington investor-owned and consumer-owned natural gas
utilities are uniquely well positioned to help small business and food
processors improve the efficiency of natural gas use and reduce current
and long-term energy costs.
(4) The state of Washington can assist gas utility energy
efficiency efforts by providing small public utility tax credits for
installation of high-efficiency equipment and processes that might not
otherwise occur.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, a gas distribution
business may claim a credit against the tax imposed under this chapter.
(2) The amount of credit is equal to the amount of qualifying
customer incentives and qualifying food processing incentives paid by
a gas distribution business between July 1, 2006, and June 30, 2007.
(3) The credit may be claimed only after the qualifying customer
incentives or qualifying food processing incentives are paid. The
credit shall be claimed against taxes due for the same fiscal year in
which the qualifying customer incentives or qualifying food processing
incentives are paid. The credit for each reporting period shall not
exceed the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the
reporting period. Credits earned for fiscal year 2007 shall not be
carried forward or backward and claimed against taxes due for prior or
subsequent fiscal years. Refunds may not be granted in the place of a
credit. Any unused credit expires.
(4) The total amount of credit that may be claimed by a gas
distribution business is limited to its maximum credit as determined by
the department. The total amount of credit that may be claimed by all
gas distribution businesses shall not exceed one million five hundred
thousand dollars.
(5) The commission in the case of investor-owned gas distribution
businesses, or the governing board in the case of consumer-owned gas
distribution businesses, shall provide the department, upon request,
information necessary to determine the maximum credit. By June 1,
2006, the department shall publish the maximum credit allowed for each
gas distribution business. The rule-making provisions of chapter 34.05
RCW do not apply to the determination of the maximum credit by the
department.
(6) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Base fiscal year" means the fiscal year beginning July 1,
2003, for purposes of calculating the maximum credit.
(b) "Commission" means the Washington utilities and transportation
commission.
(c) "Food processing business" means a person that operates a food
processing plant as defined in RCW 69.07.010.
(d) "Incremental cost" means the difference between the higher cost
of a qualifying energy efficiency measure and the cost of a same type
of nonenergy efficient piece of equipment. However, the incremental
cost of a service that is a qualifying energy efficiency measure is the
total cost of the service.
(e) "Maximum credit" means the maximum amount of credit against the
tax imposed by this chapter that each gas distribution business may
claim for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, as calculated by the
department. The maximum credit is equal to the proportionate share
that the in-state retail natural gas revenues received by each gas
distribution business in the base fiscal year bears to the total in-state retail natural gas revenues received by all gas distribution
businesses in the base fiscal year, multiplied by one million five
hundred thousand dollars. Revenues from wholesale sales of natural gas
or from transporting natural gas shall not be included in calculating
the maximum credit.
(f) "Qualifying customer" means a manufacturing, industrial, or
other commercial business located in this state that is a retail
natural gas customer of a gas distribution business. "Qualifying
customer" does not include any board, commission, institution,
department, or agency of federal, state, local, or tribal governments;
a business operated out of a personal residence or that has no physical
location; or a nonprofit organization as defined in RCW 82.04.3651.
(g) "Qualifying customer incentive" means the amount paid by a gas
distribution business to a qualifying customer for the purchase of a
qualifying energy efficiency measure. The amount of incentive that may
be paid is limited to no more than twenty-five percent of the
incremental cost or fifteen thousand dollars, whichever is less.
(h) "Qualifying energy efficiency measure" means equipment or
services that are purchased by a qualifying customer or qualifying food
processing business that meet or exceed the required level of energy
efficiency of natural gas consumption. "Qualifying energy efficiency
measure" includes high-efficiency boilers; high-efficiency water
heaters; high-efficiency furnaces; high-efficiency blanching; control
equipment that improves the energy efficiency operations of HVAC
equipment, boilers, or water heaters; energy efficiency equipment
repair or replacement services; and boiler and furnace tune-up
services. A qualifying energy efficiency measure shall be consistent
with the cost-effectiveness standards in the utility tariff on file
with the commission in the case of investor-owned gas distribution
businesses, or determined and approved by the governing board in the
case of consumer-owned gas distribution businesses.
(i) "Qualifying food processing business" means a food processing
business that purchases only natural gas transportation services from
a gas distribution business.
(j) "Qualifying food processing incentive" means the amount paid by
a gas distribution business to a qualifying food processing business
for the purchase of a qualifying energy efficiency measure. The amount
of incentive that may be paid is limited to no more than twenty-five
percent of the incremental cost or fifteen thousand dollars, whichever
is less.
(k) "Required level of energy efficiency" means the minimum energy
efficiency standards allowable in programs offered under utility
tariffs on file with the commission in the case of investor-owned gas
distribution businesses, and minimum energy efficiency standards
approved by the governing board in the case of consumer-owned gas
distribution businesses.
(7) This section expires July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The expiration of section 2 of this act does
not affect the right of a person to claim a credit under that section
on or after July 1, 2007, on a return for a reporting period that
includes tax liability incurred between July 1, 2006, and June 30,
2007, if the return is filed by the due date or any extension granted
by the department of revenue.

--- END ---