BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of trail
grooming services to the state of Washington or nonprofit corporations
organized under chapter 24.03 RCW. For the purposes of this section,
"trail grooming" means the activity of snow compacting, snow
redistribution, or snow removal on state-owned or privately-owned
trails.

--- END ---