BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is a
large, unmet need for affordable housing in the state of Washington.
The legislature declares that a decent, appropriate, and affordable
home in a healthy, safe environment for every low-income household by
2020 is a goal for state and local governments and all housing
organizations and related subcontractors. Furthermore, this goal
includes increasing the percentage of low-income households who are
able to obtain and retain housing without government subsidies or other
public support.
(2) The legislature finds that the continual systematic collection
and rigorous evaluation of comprehensive data regarding the state's
affordable housing stock and persons requiring affordable housing is
critical to planning for and achieving the state's affordable housing
goal.
(3) The legislature finds that there are many root causes of the
affordable housing shortage and declares that it is critical that such
causes be analyzed, effective solutions be developed, implemented,
monitored, and evaluated, and that these causal factors be eliminated.
The legislature also finds that there is a taxpayer and societal cost
associated with a lack of living wage jobs and affordable housing and
that state and local governments must identify and quantify that cost.
(4) The legislature finds that the support and commitment of all
sectors of the statewide community is critical to accomplishing the
state's affordable housing for all goal. The legislature finds that
the provision of housing and housing-related services should be
administered at the local level. However, the state should play a
primary role in: Researching, evaluating, benchmarking, and
implementing best practices; continually updating and evaluating
statewide housing data; developing a statewide plan to achieve the
affordable housing for all goal; coordinating and supporting local
government plans and activities; and encouraging quality management
practices by monitoring both state and local government performance
towards achieving interim and ultimate goals.
(5) The legislature declares that the systematic and comprehensive
performance measurement and evaluation of progress toward interim goals
and the ultimate state affordable housing goal of a decent,
appropriate, and affordable home in a healthy, safe environment for
every low-income household in the state by 2020 is a necessary
component of the statewide effort to end the lack of affordable housing
crisis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This chapter may be known and cited as the
Washington affordable housing for all act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 There is created within the department the
state affordable housing for all program. The goal of the program is
a decent, appropriate, and affordable home in a healthy, safe
environment for every low-income household in the state by 2020. A
priority shall be placed upon achieving this goal for very low-income
households. This goal includes increasing the percentage of very low
and low-income households who access affordable housing without
government assistance by increasing the number of households who
achieve self-sufficiency and economic independence. The goal also
includes implementing strategies to slow the rising cost of new
housing. The program shall be developed and administered by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Affordable housing" means housing that has a sales price or
rental amount that is within the means of a household that may occupy
moderate-income or low-income housing. In the case of dwelling units
for rent, affordable housing means housing for which the affordable
rent and utilities do not exceed thirty percent of the gross annual
household income for a household below median income of the household
size that may occupy the particular unit. In the case of dwelling
units for sale, affordable housing means housing in which annual
housing costs do not exceed thirty percent of the gross annual
household income for a household below the median income of the
household size that may occupy the particular unit. The department
shall adopt policies for residential homeownership housing, occupied by
low-income households, that specify the percentage of household income
that may be spent on monthly housing costs, including utilities other
than telephone, to qualify as affordable housing.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(4) "First-time home buyer" means an individual or his or her
spouse who have not owned a home during the three-year period prior to
purchase of a home.
(5) "Nonprofit organization" means any public or private nonprofit
organization that: (a) Is organized under federal, state, or local
laws; (b) has no part of its net earnings inuring to the benefit of any
member, founder, contributor, or individual; and (c) has among its
purposes, significant activities related to the provision of decent
housing that is affordable to very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households and special needs populations.
(6) "Regulatory barriers to affordable housing" and "regulatory
barriers" mean any public policies, including those embodied in
statutes, ordinances, regulations, or administrative procedures or
processes, required to be identified by the state or local government
in connection with its strategy under section 105(b)(4) of the
Cranston-Gonzalez national affordable housing act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12701
et seq.).
(7) "Affordable housing for all account" means the state treasury
account receiving the state's portion of income from the revenue of
sources established by section 19 of this act.
(8) "Local affordable housing task force" means a local committee,
as described in section 10 of this act, created to prepare and
recommend to its local government legislative authority an affordable
housing for all plan and also to decide upon expenditures of the funds
for the local affordable housing for all program.
(9) "Performance measurement" means the process of comparing
specific measures of success with ultimate and interim goals.
(10) "Performance evaluation" means the process of evaluating the
performance by established objective, measurable criteria according to
the achievement of outlined goals, measures, targets, standards, or
other outcomes using a ranked scorecard from highest to lowest
performance which employs a scale of one to one hundred, one hundred
being the optimal score.
(11) "Quality management program" means a nationally recognized
program similar or equivalent to the Baldridge criteria. All local
governments receiving over two hundred thousand dollars from the
affordable housing for all program in RCW 36.22.178 (as recodified by
this act) and from the surcharge in RCW 36.22.179 shall implement a
quality management program and shall apply to the Washington state
quality award program once every three years.
(12) "Affordable housing for all program" means the program
authorized under this chapter as administered by the department at the
state level and by the local government or its designated subcontractor
at the local level.
(13) "Affordable housing data base" means a master data base
created or purchased, implemented, and maintained by the department of
all existing housing stock which has received federal, state, or local
funds, funds from another nonprofit organization, or financing through
the Washington housing finance commission meeting the conditions of
section 6 of this act, and which is affordable to households whose
adjusted income is less than eighty percent of the median household
income, adjusted for household size for the county where the project is
located. The data base shall also include information on privately
owned rental units provided voluntarily by owners and landlords.
(14) "State affordable housing for all plan" means the plan
developed by the department in collaboration with the affordable
housing advisory board with the goal of ensuring every low-income
household in Washington has a decent, appropriate, and affordable home
in a healthy, safe environment by 2020.
(15) "Local affordable housing for all plan" means the plan
developed by each participating local government with the goal of
ensuring every low-income household in the local jurisdiction has a
decent, appropriate, and affordable home in a healthy, safe environment
by 2020.
(16) "Low-income household," for the purposes of the affordable
housing for all program, means a single person, family, or unrelated
persons living together whose adjusted income is less than eighty
percent of the median household income, adjusted for household size for
the county where the project is located.
(17) "Very low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is less than
fifty percent of the median family income, adjusted for household size
for the county where the project is located.
(18) "Local government" means a county government in the state of
Washington, or a city government, if the legislative authority of the
city affirmatively elects to accept the responsibility for reaching the
goals of the affordable housing for all program within its borders.
(19) "Authority" or "housing authority" means any of the public
corporations created by RCW 35.82.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department of labor and industries shall
annually determine a specific living wage, based upon the cost of
living, including housing costs, for each county in the state. The
department of labor and industries shall deliver a report to the
department of community, trade, and economic development regarding the
number and percentage of individuals and households statewide and in
each county, who are not earning a living wage. The affordable housing
advisory committee shall discuss in its annual report to the
legislature, starting in 2007, the measurable relationship between
living wage jobs and housing affordability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department shall create or purchase,
and implement a master affordable housing data base that includes
specific information about existing affordable housing stock in the
state of Washington by December 31, 2009. The data base shall be
maintained and continually updated by the department, and the
department may cross-reference and exchange information between this
data base and other existing state housing data bases.
(2) The data base shall include information on all units which meet
the affordable housing definition and have received or continue to
receive funding from the federal, state, or local government, or other
nonprofit organization or financing through the Washington housing
finance commission. The department shall encourage private landlords
to voluntarily submit information about private rental units that are
affordable for low-income households to be included in the data base.
(3) The data base shall include information about rental units that
shall be determined by the department; however, it must include, at a
minimum, measures for quality, cost, safety, and size. In addition to
other data points to be determined by the department, the following
data points may be collected for units entered into the data base:
(a) Identification of the owner and manager of the unit;
(b) Cost of the housing unit that, in the case of rental units, may
include rent, average utility costs, security deposits, and any other
fees required of tenants;
(c) Size of the housing unit, including square footage, number of
bedrooms, and number of bathrooms;
(d) Specific target populations for the unit, if applicable,
including, units designed to serve or limited to serving the disabled,
the elderly, victims of domestic violence, families, individuals, or a
specific number of persons; and
(e) The current availability of the unit.
(4) Other state agencies, local governments, local public agencies,
including water and sewer districts, housing authorities, and other
housing organizations shall cooperate with the department to create and
update the affordable housing data base by providing to the department
any requested existing information about housing units within the
jurisdiction.
(5) The data base shall be searchable by the department, local
governments, community housing organizations, including housing
authorities, and the public, according to housing characteristics
determined by the department including, at a minimum, location, cost,
and size. The data base will be utilized for data collection about
Washington's affordable housing stock and will also serve as a low-income housing referral system to connect low-income households seeking
housing with appropriate and available units.
(6) A summary of collected performance measurement data regarding
the existing rental housing stock and a corresponding analysis shall be
presented annually in the statewide plan required in RCW 43.185B.040
(as recodified by this act). Local data shall also be included in the
local governments' updated affordable housing for all plans under
section 12 of this act. Information shall include, at a minimum, the
following:
(a) An inventory of the supply and geographic, including political
geography, distribution of affordable housing units for specific income
groups, including households making at or below living wage levels, as
defined by the department of labor and industries, and those making at
or below eighty percent, fifty percent, and thirty percent of the
median household income adjusted for household size for the county
where the project is located, and other specific target populations;
(b) A calculation reflecting the increase or decrease in affordable
housing units from the previous twelve-month period; and
(c) The average current market cost per square foot of units,
statewide, in each county, and for each major metropolitan area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department shall conduct a study to
evaluate the potential development of a statewide, low-income
household, housing waiting list data base which would include
information on all low-income households requesting housing assistance
for the purpose of connecting such households with appropriate housing
opportunities. The study shall investigate and evaluate the following:
(a) The anticipated benefits of such a statewide waiting list to
low-income households and low-income housing providers;
(b) The cost of implementing and maintaining the data base; and
(c) Best practices from other states or from counties in other
states which currently have a similar data base.
The department shall report the results of this study to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2007.
(2) This section expires December 31, 2007.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.185B.030 and 1993 c 478 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The affordable housing advisory board shall:
(1) Analyze those solutions and programs that ((could begin to))
address the state's need for housing that is affordable for all
economic segments of the state, with an emphasis on very low and low-income populations and special needs populations, including, but not
limited to, initiatives, programs, or proposals which include
recommendations about or provide for:
(a) Financing for the acquisition, rehabilitation, preservation, or
construction of affordable housing in order to meet the state's
affordable housing and homelessness goals;
(b) Use of publicly owned land and buildings as sites for
affordable housing;
(c) Coordination of state initiatives with federal initiatives and
financing programs that are referenced in the Cranston-Gonzalez
national affordable housing act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12701 et seq.), as
amended, and development of an approved housing strategy as required in
the Cranston-Gonzalez national affordable housing act (42 U.S.C. Sec.
12701 et seq.), as amended;
(d) Identification and removal, where appropriate and not
detrimental to the public health and safety, or environment, of state
and local regulatory barriers to the development and placement of
affordable housing;
(e) Goals and performance measures for stimulating public and
private sector cooperation in the development of affordable housing and
public and private sector support to reach affordable housing and
homelessness goals; and
(f) Development of solutions and programs affecting housing,
including the equitable geographic distribution of housing for all
economic segments, as the advisory board deems necessary;
(2) Consider both homeownership and rental housing as viable
options for the provision of housing. The advisory board shall give
consideration to various types of residential construction and
innovative housing options, including, but not limited to, manufactured
housing, and make annual recommendations related to the appropriate
type of housing given a variety of situations and needs;
(3) Review, evaluate, and make recommendations regarding existing
and proposed housing programs and initiatives including but not limited
to tax policies, land use policies, and financing programs((. The
advisory board shall provide recommendations to the director, along
with the department's response in the annual housing report to the
legislature required in RCW 43.185B.040; and
(4) Prepare and submit to the director, by each December 1st,
beginning December 1, 1993, a report detailing its findings and make
specific program, legislative, and funding recommendations and any
other recommendations it deems appropriate));
(4) Annually evaluate the department's statewide affordable housing
for all plan; and
(5) Present annual reports of its findings and recommendations to
the department and appropriate committees of the legislature by October
31, 2007, and present annual updated reports by October 31st of each
subsequent year.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.185B.040 and 1993 c 478 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall, in consultation with the affordable
housing advisory board created in RCW 43.185B.020 (as recodified by
this act), prepare and ((from time to time amend a five-year)) update
annually an affordable housing ((advisory)) for all plan. The plan
includes the recommendations of the affordable housing advisory board
annual report required in RCW 43.185B.030 (as recodified by this act)
and must be coordinated with the state homeless housing strategic plan
required under RCW 43.185C.040. The plan shall be created by December
31, 2007, and updated by December 31st of each subsequent year. The
purpose of the plan is to document the need for affordable housing in
the state and the extent to which that need is being met through public
and private sector programs, to outline the development of sound
strategies and programs for affordable housing, to establish, evaluate,
and report upon performance measures for the state and local
governments, and to facilitate state and local planning to meet the
state affordable housing ((needs of the state, and to enable the
development of sound strategies and programs for affordable housing))
goal of ensuring a decent, appropriate, and affordable home in a
healthy, safe environment for every low-income household in the state
by 2020.
(2) The information in the ((five-year)) affordable housing
((advisory)) for all plan must include:
(a) An assessment of the state's housing market trends;
(b) An assessment of the housing needs for all economic segments of
the state and special needs populations;
(c) An inventory of the supply and geographic distribution of
affordable housing units made available through public and private
sector programs;
(d) A status report on the degree of progress made by the public
and private sector toward meeting the housing needs of the state and
each county and major city in the state;
(e) An identification of state and local regulatory barriers to
affordable housing and proposed regulatory and administrative
techniques designed to remove barriers to the development and placement
of affordable housing; ((and))
(f) An annual review, statewide and within each county and major
city, of the primary contributors to the cost of housing;
(g) Specific recommendations, policies, or proposals for meeting
the affordable housing needs of the state, including the
recommendations of the affordable housing advisory board annual report;
(h) Identification of key root causal factors of the affordable
housing shortage and the inability of low-income households to obtain
and retain appropriate housing, and identification of possible
preventative strategies and related performance measures. The list of
root causes shall include the cost of construction, other development
costs, the inadequacy of wages to enable low-income households to
obtain and retain housing, and financial management skills;
(i) A determination, in collaboration with the department of labor
and industries, of the state cost of the affordable housing shortage
and the lack of living wage jobs;
(j) Interim goals and timelines that are determined by the
department and by which the state and local governments' performances
may be measured;
(k) Detailed timelines to accomplish the goal of a decent,
appropriate, and affordable home in a healthy, safe environment for
every low-income household in the state by 2020; and
(l) Performance measures that are determined by the department with
input required from the appropriate committees of the legislature,
which include, at a minimum, the following:
(i) Percentage increase of affordable housing needs being met
within each twelve-month period;
(ii) Percentage increase of families reaching self-sufficiency or
economic independence as defined by the department of labor and
industries;
(iii) A measure of future sustainability of the affordable housing
stock;
(iv) A measure of increased collaboration and coordination among
public bodies and community stakeholders, and the level of community
support and participation;
(v) Percentage increase of living wage jobs, as defined by the
department of labor and industries; and
(vi) Implementation of local quality management programs.
(((2)(a))) (3) The ((five-year)) state affordable housing
((advisory)) for all plan required under subsection (1) of this section
must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature on
or before ((February 1, 1994)) December 31, 2007, and subsequent
updated plans must be submitted ((every five years)) annually by
December 31st thereafter, which shall include an annual progress report
detailing the extent to which the state's affordable housing needs were
met during the preceding year.
(((b) Each February 1st, beginning February 1, 1995, the department
shall submit an annual progress report, to the legislature, detailing
the extent to which the state's affordable housing needs were met
during the preceding year and recommendations for meeting those needs))
(4) To guide local governments in preparation for their first local
affordable housing for all plan required under section 12 of this act,
the department shall issue, by December 31, 2007, guidelines for
preparing local affordable housing for all plans consistent with this
chapter. Local affordable housing for all plans shall be substantially
consistent with the goals and program recommendations of the state
affordable housing for all plan and shall include, at a minimum, the
same performance measures as described in subsection (2) of this
section.
(5) Based on the performance of local affordable housing for all
programs in meeting their interim goals and on changes to the general
population and in the housing market, the department may revise the
performance measures and goals of the state affordable housing for all
plan, set goals for years following December 31, 2020, and recommend
changes in local affordable housing for all plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Each participating local government shall
convene an affordable housing task force. The task force shall be a
local committee, made up of volunteers, created to prepare and
recommend to its local government legislative authority an affordable
housing for all plan and also to decide upon expenditures of the funds
created in this chapter. The affordable housing task force shall
include a representative of the county, a representative of the largest
city located within the county, other members as may be required to
maintain eligibility for federal funding related to housing programs
and services, and a representative of a private nonprofit organization
with experience in low-income housing. The task force may be the same
as the homeless housing task force created in RCW 43.185C.160.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Each local affordable housing task
force shall prepare and recommend to its local government legislative
authority an affordable housing for all plan for its jurisdictional
area which must be consistent with the department's local plan
guidelines and the department's state affordable housing for all plan.
For local governments required or choosing to plan under RCW
36.70A.040, affordable housing for all plans must be consistent with
housing elements of comprehensive plans described in RCW 36.70A.070(2).
Local plans must also be consistent with any existing local homeless
housing plan required in RCW 43.185C.050. Local affordable housing for
all plans shall be primarily focused on ensuring that every low-income
household in the local jurisdictional area has a decent, appropriate,
and affordable home in a healthy, safe environment by 2020 and on
increasing the percentage of low-income households that access
affordable housing without government assistance. The local affordable
housing for all plan shall include performance measures, including, at
a minimum, the same performance measures required of the state
affordable housing for all plan outlined in RCW 43.185B.040(2)(l) (as
recodified by this act), timelines for the accomplishment of interim
goals, targets, and projected estimated financing appropriate for
outlined goals. Annual local plan updates shall include legislative
recommendations. Local governments shall adopt a plan by April 30,
2008, and update the plan annually on or before April 30th. All plans
must be forwarded to the department on or before the date of adoption.
(2) The department shall conduct an annual performance evaluation
of local affordable housing for all plans. The department shall
present its performance evaluations to the appropriate committees of
the legislature on or before December 31st of each year beginning in
2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Local governments shall report on
achievements, according to stated performance measures in the local
affordable housing for all plans, to the department annually by
December 1st. The department shall conduct an annual performance
evaluation of local governments according to their performance in
achieving stated affordable housing goals. The department shall
present the results of the performance evaluation in its annually
updated state affordable housing for all plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) A county may decline to participate in
the program authorized in this chapter by forwarding to the department
a resolution adopted by the county legislative authority stating its
intention not to participate. A copy of the resolution shall be
transmitted to the county auditor and treasurer. If a resolution is
adopted, all of the funds otherwise due to the county under RCW
36.22.178 (as recodified by this act) shall be remitted monthly to the
state treasurer for deposit in the affordable housing for all account,
except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, without any
reduction by the county for collecting or administering the funds.
Upon receipt of the resolution, the department shall promptly begin to
identify and contract with one or more entities to create and execute
a local affordable housing for all plan for the county meeting the
requirements of this chapter. The department shall utilize the
county's portion of the funds provided under section 17 of this act for
this purpose. The department shall expend all of the funds received
from the county to carry out the purposes of this chapter in the
county, except that the department may retain six percent of these
funds to offset the cost of managing the county's program.
(2) A resolution by the county declining to participate in the
program has no effect on the ability of each city in the county to
assert its right to manage its own program under this chapter, as
provided in section 14 of this act, and the county shall transmit to
the city, every month, the portion of funds due to the city, as
provided in section 14 of this act, which are collected pursuant to RCW
36.18.010.
(3) A county that has declined to participate may, at a later date,
participate in the program authorized by this chapter by forwarding to
the department a resolution adopted by the county legislative authority
stating the intention to participate. The department shall determine
a procedure and appropriate timeline for the transfer of the program
from any existing third-party contractor to the county.
(4) The funding reduction required under subsection (1) of this
section does not apply to counties which have made funding commitments
to projects prior to the effective date of this act. Such projects may
be awarded the funds that were not committed prior to the effective
date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Any city may assert responsibility for
reaching the goals of the affordable housing for all program within its
borders, if it so chooses, by forwarding a resolution to the
legislative authority of the county stating its intention and its
commitment to operate a separate affordable housing for all program.
If it so chooses, the city shall receive the portion of the funds
attributable to document recordings involving transactions within the
city. A city choosing to operate a separate affordable housing for all
program is responsible for complying with all of the same requirements
as counties and shall adopt an affordable housing for all plan meeting
the requirements of this chapter for local affordable housing for all
plans. The city may, by resolution of its legislative authority,
accept an appropriate portion of the county's affordable housing for
all plan as its own.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Local governments may subcontract with any
other local government, housing authority, community action agency, or
other nonprofit organization for the execution of programs contributing
to the goal of ensuring a decent, appropriate, and affordable home in
a healthy, safe environment for every low-income household in the local
jurisdiction by 2020. All subcontracts must be: Consistent with the
local affordable housing for all plan adopted by the legislative
authority of the local government; time limited; and filed with the
department, and must have specific performance terms as specified by
the local government. This authority to subcontract with other
entities does not affect the local governments' ultimate responsibility
for the affordable housing for all program within its borders.

Sec. 16 RCW 36.22.178 and 2005 c 484 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (((2))) (3) of this section,
a surcharge of ten dollars per instrument shall be charged by the
county auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to
any other charge authorized by law. The county may retain up to five
percent of these funds collected solely for the collection,
administration, and local distribution of these funds. Of the
remaining funds, forty percent of the revenue generated through this
surcharge will be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer who will
deposit the funds into the ((Washington housing trust account. The
office of community development of the department of community, trade,
and economic development will develop guidelines for the use of these
funds to support)) affordable housing for all account established in
section 19 of this act. The department may use these funds for the
following purposes:
(a) To provide planning grants to local governments that receive
less than twenty thousand dollars annually through revenue created by
this chapter for the purpose of the creation of local affordable
housing for all plans;
(b) To fund building operation and maintenance costs of housing
projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to
extremely low-income ((persons)) households with incomes at or below
thirty percent of the area median income, and that require a supplement
to rent income to cover ongoing operating expenses; and
(c) To provide technical assistance to any participating local
government that requests assistance. Technical assistance activities
may include:
(i) Assisting in identifying best practices from other areas;
(ii) Assisting in identifying additional funding sources for
specific projects;
(iii) Assisting local governments to identify appropriate service
providers with which the local government may subcontract for service
provision and development activities when necessary; and
(iv) Assisting local governments to implement a quality management
program.
(2) All of the remaining funds generated by this surcharge will be
retained by the county and be deposited into a fund that must be used
by the county and its cities and towns for programs and activities
outlined in the local affordable housing for all plan. Housing
projects or units within housing projects ((that are)) shall be
affordable to ((very)) low-income ((persons)) households with incomes
at or below ((fifty)) eighty percent of the area median income. The
portion of the surcharge retained by a county ((shall)) may be
allocated to ((very)) low-income housing projects or units within such
housing projects in the county and the cities within a county
((according to an interlocal agreement between the county and the
cities within the county)), or for programs and services, consistent
with countywide and local housing needs and policies. A priority shall
be given to projects or units within projects, or programs and services
that are affordable to very low-income households with incomes at or
below fifty percent of the area median income. Local governments shall
report upon performance measures established by the department in an
annual report to the department as required in section 12 of this act.
The funds generated with this surcharge shall not be used for
construction of new housing if at any time the vacancy rate for
available low-income housing within the county rises above ten percent.
The vacancy rate for each county shall be developed using the state
low-income vacancy rate standard developed under subsection (((3))) (5)
of this section. Uses of these local funds are limited to:
(a) Acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of housing
projects or units within housing projects that are affordable to
((very)) low-income ((persons)) households with incomes at or below
((fifty)) eighty percent of the area median income, including units for
homeownership, rental units, and single room occupancy units;
(b) Supporting building operation and maintenance costs of housing
projects or units within housing projects eligible to receive housing
trust funds, that are affordable to very low-income ((persons))
households with incomes at or below fifty percent of the area median
income, and that require a supplement to rent income to cover ongoing
operating expenses;
(c) Rental assistance vouchers for housing ((projects or)) units
((within housing projects)) that are affordable to very low-income
((persons)) households with incomes at or below fifty percent of the
area median income, to be administered by a local public housing
authority or other local organization that has an existing rental
assistance voucher program((, consistent with the United States
department of housing and urban development's section 8 rental
assistance voucher program standards)). The department shall develop
statewide guidelines for a rental assistance program by 2007; ((and))
(d) Operating costs for emergency shelters and licensed overnight
youth shelters;
(e) Housing programs and projects or housing services specifically
referenced in the current local affordable housing for all plan; and
(f) Activities eligible under chapter 43.185C RCW.
(((2))) (3) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.
(((3))) (4) Local governments shall report upon expenditures of
funds created by this chapter to the department. The report shall
include the amount of funding allocated, a description of the projects
funded, and the outcome or anticipated outcome of each project. The
department shall create an electronic reporting system.
(5) The real estate research center at Washington State University
shall develop a vacancy rate standard for low-income housing in the
state as described in RCW 18.85.540(1)(i).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The sum of two million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the affordable housing for all
account established in section 19 of this act, for the purposes of
accomplishing the planning, data system creation, data collection, and
program implementation activities of this act. Of the two million
dollars appropriated, the department of community, trade, and economic
development shall distribute one million dollars to the participating
local governments using a formula to be determined by the department
and to be used for local planning, data system creation, data
collection, and program implementation purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The department, the housing finance
commission, the affordable housing advisory board, and all
participating local governments, housing authorities, and other
nonprofits receiving state funds or financing through the housing
finance commission, shall, by December 31, 2006, and annually
thereafter, review current housing reporting requirements related to
housing programs and services and give recommendations to the
legislature to streamline and simplify all planning and reporting
requirements. The entities listed in this section shall also give
recommendations for additional legislative actions that could promote
the affordable housing for all goal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The affordable housing for all account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. The state's portion of
the surcharge established in RCW 36.22.178 (as recodified by this act)
shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may
only be used for the affordable housing for all program as described in
this chapter. Only the director or the director's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

Sec. 20 RCW 36.18.010 and 2005 c 484 s 19 and 2005 c 374 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
County auditors or recording officers shall collect the following
fees for their official services:
(1) For recording instruments, for the first page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, five dollars; for each additional page
eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one dollar. The fee for
recording multiple transactions contained in one instrument will be
calculated for each transaction requiring separate indexing as required
under RCW 65.04.050 as follows: The fee for each title or transaction
is the same fee as the first page of any additional recorded document;
the fee for additional pages is the same fee as for any additional
pages for any recorded document; the fee for the additional pages may
be collected only once and may not be collected for each title or
transaction;
(2) For preparing and certifying copies, for the first page eight
and one-half by fourteen inches or less, three dollars; for each
additional page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one
dollar;
(3) For preparing noncertified copies, for each page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, one dollar;
(4) For administering an oath or taking an affidavit, with or
without seal, two dollars;
(5) For issuing a marriage license, eight dollars, (this fee
includes taking necessary affidavits, filing returns, indexing, and
transmittal of a record of the marriage to the state registrar of vital
statistics) plus an additional five-dollar fee for use and support of
the prevention of child abuse and neglect activities to be transmitted
monthly to the state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund
plus an additional ten-dollar fee to be transmitted monthly to the
state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund. The
legislature intends to appropriate an amount at least equal to the
revenue generated by this fee for the purposes of the displaced
homemaker act, chapter 28B.04 RCW;
(6) For searching records per hour, eight dollars;
(7) For recording plats, fifty cents for each lot except cemetery
plats for which the charge shall be twenty-five cents per lot; also one
dollar for each acknowledgment, dedication, and description: PROVIDED,
That there shall be a minimum fee of twenty-five dollars per plat;
(8) For recording of miscellaneous records not listed above, for
the first page eight and one-half by fourteen inches or less, five
dollars; for each additional page eight and one-half by fourteen inches
or less, one dollar;
(9) For modernization and improvement of the recording and indexing
system, a surcharge as provided in RCW 36.22.170;
(10) For recording an emergency nonstandard document as provided in
RCW 65.04.047, fifty dollars, in addition to all other applicable
recording fees;
(11) For recording instruments, a surcharge as provided in RCW
36.22.178 (as recodified by this act); and
(([(12)])) (12) For recording instruments, except for documents
recording a birth, marriage, divorce, or death or any documents
otherwise exempted from a recording fee under state law, a surcharge as
provided in RCW 36.22.179.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 This chapter does not require either the
department or any local government to expend any funds to accomplish
the goals of this chapter other than the revenues authorized in this
act. However, neither the department nor any local government may use
any funds authorized in this act to supplant or reduce any existing
expenditures of public money to address the affordable housing
shortage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct a performance audit of the affordable housing
for all programs every four years. The first audit shall be conducted
on or before December 31, 2009. Each audit shall take no longer than
six months or fifty thousand dollars to complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department shall report annually on counties and cities
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to satisfy the affordable housing
requirements of this chapter.
(2) The report shall include:
(a) A performance evaluation of county and city compliance and
results in implementing adopted policies, the housing element of
comprehensive plans, and development regulations pertaining to
affordable housing; and
(b) A performance evaluation of county and city efforts in
leveraging public and private funds or other resources to provide,
develop, and preserve affordable housing to all. Consideration will be
given to factors, which include county size, population, and economic
conditions.
(3) The report shall be included in the state affordable housing
for all plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 43.185
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department, in collaboration with the affordable housing
advisory board, shall establish performance measures for the housing
assistance program. Performance measures shall, at a minimum, include
the following:
(a) Percentage of the affordable housing need met within the last
twelve-month period;
(b) Reduction of cost per unit developed;
(c) Percent increase in affordable units preserved; and
(d) Percent increase in other public and private funds leveraged.
(2) The department, in collaboration with the affordable housing
advisory board, shall establish individual performance measures for
housing assistance program grantees.
(3) The department shall include a summary of the performance
evaluations of programs and projects financed by the housing assistance
program in the annual state affordable housing for all plan.

Sec. 25 RCW 43.185A.020 and 1995 c 399 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
The affordable housing program is created in the department for the
purpose of developing and coordinating public and private resources
targeted to meet the affordable housing needs of low-income households
in the state of Washington. The program shall be developed and
administered by the department with advice and input from the
affordable housing advisory board established in RCW 43.185B.020 (as
recodified by this act). The program shall operate in coordination
with the state affordable housing for all program established in
section 3 of this act. Funding decisions made through the affordable
housing program shall be consistent with the recommendations of the
state affordable housing for all plan.

Sec. 26 RCW 43.185A.070 and 1991 c 356 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall monitor the activities of recipients of grants
and loans under this chapter to determine compliance with the terms and
conditions set forth in its application or stated by the department in
connection with the grant or loan. The department shall establish
performance measures upon which each grant or loan recipient must
report. The department shall conduct, at a minimum, annual performance
evaluations of all projects receiving affordable housing program
assistance. The department shall report on performance evaluations
annually in the updated state affordable housing for all plan.

Sec. 27 RCW 35.82.080 and 1989 c 363 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is hereby declared to be the policy of this state that each
housing authority shall manage and operate its housing projects in an
efficient manner so as to enable it to fix the rentals for low-income
dwelling accommodations at the lowest possible rates consistent with
its providing decent, safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations, and
that no housing authority shall construct or operate any such project
for profit, or as a source of revenue to the city or the county. Each
housing authority shall annually provide to the department of
community, trade, and economic development performance measurement data
on the attainment of these policy goals. To this end, an authority
shall fix the rentals for rental units for persons of low income in
projects owned or leased by the authority at no higher rates than it
shall find to be necessary in order to produce revenues which (together
with all other available moneys, revenues, income and receipts of the
authority from whatever sources derived) will be sufficient (1) to pay,
as the same become due, the principal and interest on the bonds or
other obligations of the authority issued or incurred to finance the
projects; (2) to meet the cost of, and to provide for, maintaining and
operating the projects (including the cost of any insurance) and the
administrative expenses of the authority; and (3) to create (during not
less than the six years immediately succeeding its issuance of any such
bonds) a reserve sufficient to meet the largest principal and interest
payments which will be due on such bonds in any one year thereafter and
to maintain such reserve. Nothing contained in this section shall be
construed to limit an authority's power to rent commercial space
located in buildings containing housing projects or non low-income
units owned, acquired, financed, or constructed under RCW 35.82.070
(5), (((16))) (18), or (((17))) (19) at profitable rates and to use any
profit realized from such rentals in carrying into effect the powers
and purposes provided to housing authorities under this chapter.

Sec. 28 RCW 35.21.685 and 1986 c 248 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A city or town may assist in the development or preservation of
publicly or privately owned housing for ((persons)) households of low
income by providing loans or grants of general municipal funds to the
owners or developers of the housing. The loans or grants shall be
authorized by the legislative authority of the city or town. They may
be made to finance all or a portion of the cost of construction,
reconstruction, acquisition, or rehabilitation of housing that will be
occupied by a ((person or family)) household of low income. As used in
this section, "low income" means income that does not exceed eighty
percent of the median income for the standard metropolitan statistical
area in which the city or town is located.
(2) Participating cities and towns shall annually report their
efforts to the department of community, trade, and economic development
housing division. Information from the report shall be included in the
state and local affordable housing for all plans.
(3) Housing constructed with loans or grants made under this
section shall not be considered public works or improvements subject to
competitive bidding or a purchase of services subject to the
prohibition against advance payment for services: PROVIDED, That
whenever feasible the borrower or grantee shall make every reasonable
and practicable effort to utilize a competitive public bidding process.

Sec. 29 RCW 35.82.230 and 1965 c 7 s 35.82.230 are each amended
to read as follows:
At least once a year, an authority shall file with the clerk a
report of its activities for the preceding year, and shall make
recommendations with reference to such additional legislation or other
action as it deems necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this
chapter. Each city or county for which a particular housing authority
exists shall conduct an annual performance evaluation of the housing
authority, utilizing performance measures determined by the local
governing body. The annual performance evaluation shall be submitted
annually to the department of community, trade, and economic
development. The report shall be integrated into the local affordable
housing for all plan as required under section 12 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 A new section is added to chapter 35.82 RCW
to read as follows:
All housing authorities receiving over two hundred thousand dollars
from the state or financing through the Washington housing finance
commission for housing projects during the previous twenty-four months
must implement a quality management program and must apply to the
Washington state quality award program once every three years. Every
year, beginning in 2007, the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall conduct a performance evaluation, using
predetermined criteria, of housing authorities that have received
funding from the state or financing through the Washington housing
finance commission for housing projects during the previous twenty-four
months.

Sec. 31 RCW 43.63A.505 and 1999 c 164 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and administer a "one-stop
clearinghouse" to coordinate state assistance for growers and nonprofit
organizations in developing housing for agricultural employees.
Growers, housing authorities, and nonprofit organizations shall have
direct access to the one-stop clearinghouse. The department one-stop
clearinghouse shall provide assistance on planning and design, building
codes, temporary worker housing regulations, financing options, and
management to growers and nonprofit organizations interested in
farmworker construction. The department one-stop clearinghouse shall
also provide educational materials and services to local government
authorities on Washington state law concerning farmworker housing.
(2) The department shall report on the performance of the one-stop
clearinghouse by December 31st of each year as part of its report on
the state affordable housing for all program and shall make
recommendations for improvement. Performance measures for all state-supported farmworker housing activities shall be included in the state
affordable housing for all plan. The performance measures to be
included in the report are the following, at a minimum:
(a) Percent of farmworker housing developed within the last twelve-month period that received assistance from the one-stop clearinghouse;
(b) Percent of farmworker housing need met in the state;
(c) Percent of farmworker housing developed within the last twelve-month period that complies with building codes and temporary worker
housing regulations; and
(d) Amount leveraged in public and private dollars for the
development of farmworker housing within the last twelve-month period.

Sec. 32 RCW 43.63A.640 and 1994 c 114 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall carry out the following duties:
(1) Administer the program;
(2) Identify organizations eligible to receive funds to implement
the program;
(3) Develop and adopt the necessary rules and procedures for
implementation of the program and for dispersal of program funds to
eligible organizations;
(4) Establish performance measures for the program to include the
following:
(a) Percentage of households that retained housing due to the
program's intervention; and
(b) Percentage of on-time loan payments during the last twelve-month period.
(5) Establish the interest rate for repayment of loans at two
percent below the market rate;
(((5))) (6) Work with lending institutions and social service
providers in the eligible communities to assure that all eligible
persons are informed about the program;
(((6))) (7) Utilize federal and state programs that complement or
facilitate carrying out the program;
(((7))) (8) Ensure that local eligible organizations that dissolve
or become ineligible assign their program funds, rights to loan
repayments, and loan security instruments, to the government of the
county in which the local organization is located. If the county
government accepts the program assets described in this subsection, it
shall act as a local eligible organization under the provisions of RCW
((43.63A.600 through)) 43.63A.640. If the county government declines
to participate, the program assets shall revert to the department;
(9) Include activities, performance measures, and outcomes of
activities of the program in the state affordable housing for all plan.

Sec. 33 RCW 43.63A.645 and 1999 c 267 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall, by rule, establish program standards,
performance measures, eligibility standards, eligibility criteria, and
administrative rules for emergency housing programs and specify other
benefits that may arise in consultation with providers.

Sec. 34 RCW 43.330.110 and 1993 c 280 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall maintain an active effort to help
communities, families, and individuals build and maintain capacity to
meet housing needs in Washington state. The department shall
facilitate partnerships among the many entities related to housing
issues and leverage a variety of resources and services to produce
comprehensive, cost-effective, and innovative housing solutions.
(2) The department shall assist in the production, development,
rehabilitation, and operation of owner-occupied or rental housing for
very low, low, and moderate-income persons; operate programs to assist
home ownership, offer housing services, and provide emergency,
transitional, and special needs housing services; and qualify as a
participating state agency for all programs of the federal department
of housing and urban development or its successor. The department
shall develop or assist local governments in developing housing plans
required by the state or federal government.
(3) The department shall coordinate and administer energy
assistance and residential energy conservation and rehabilitation
programs of the federal and state government through nonprofit
organizations, local governments, and housing authorities.
(4) The department shall include information on its activities,
outcomes, and performance measures in the state affordable housing for
all plan.

Sec. 35 RCW 43.330.165 and 1998 c 37 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall work with the advisory group established
in subsection (2) of this section to review proposals and make
prioritized funding recommendations to the department or funding
approval board that oversees the distribution of housing trust fund
grants and loans to be used for the development, maintenance, and
operation of housing for low-income farmworkers.
(2) A farmworker housing advisory group representing growers,
farmworkers, and other interested parties shall be formed to assist the
department in the review and priority funding recommendations under
this section.
(3) The department shall establish performance measures for
farmworker programs receiving state funding to include the following:
(a) Percentage of need for farmworker housing met within the last
twelve-month period; and
(b) Percentage of farmworkers who have obtained permanent housing.
(4) The department shall include farmworker housing performance
measures in its state affordable housing for all plan.

Sec. 36 RCW 43.330.170 and 2002 c 294 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The office of community development of the department of community,
trade, and economic development is directed to conduct a statewide
housing market analysis by region. The purpose of the analysis is to
identify areas of greatest need for the appropriate investment of state
affordable housing funds, using vacancy data and other appropriate
measures of need for low-income housing. The analysis shall include
the number and types of projects that counties have developed using the
funds collected under chapter 294, Laws of 2002. The analysis shall be
completed by September 2003, and updated ((every two years)) annually
thereafter. The analysis shall be included in the state affordable
housing for all plan.

Sec. 37 RCW 59.28.010 and 1989 c 188 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) There is a severe shortage of federally assisted housing within
the state of Washington. Over one hundred seventy thousand low and
moderate-income households are eligible for federally assisted housing
but are unable to locate vacant units.
(2) Within the next twenty years, more than twenty-six thousand
existing low-income housing units may be lost as a result of the
prepayment of mortgages or loans by the owners, or as a result of the
expiration of rental assistance contracts. Over three thousand units
of federally assisted housing have already been lost and an additional
nine thousand units may be lost within the next two and one-half years.
(3) Recent reductions in federal housing assistance and tax
benefits related to low-income housing make it uncertain whether
additional units of federally assisted housing will be built or that
those lost will be replaced.
(4) The loss of federally assisted housing will adversely affect
current tenants and lead to their displacement. It will also
drastically reduce the supply of affordable housing in our communities.
It is the purpose of this chapter to preserve federally assisted
housing in the state of Washington and to minimize the involuntary
displacement of tenants currently residing in such housing. The
preservation of existing federally assisted housing is a critical
strategy in achieving the state's goal of a decent, appropriate, and
affordable home in a healthy, safe environment for every low-income
household in the state by 2020.

Sec. 38 RCW 70.114A.010 and 1995 c 220 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that there is an inadequate supply of
temporary and permanent housing for migrant and seasonal workers in
this state. The legislature also finds that unclear, complex
regulations related to the development, construction, and permitting of
worker housing inhibit the development of this much needed housing.
The legislature further finds that as a result, many workers are forced
to obtain housing that is unsafe and unsanitary.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to encourage the
development of temporary and permanent housing for workers that is safe
and sanitary by: Establishing a clear and concise set of regulations
for temporary housing; establishing a streamlined permitting and
administrative process that will be locally administered and encourage
the development of such housing; and by providing technical assistance
to organizations or individuals interested in the development of worker
housing.
The development of temporary and permanent worker housing is a
critical strategy in achieving the state's goal of a decent,
appropriate, and affordable home in a healthy, safe environment for
every low-income household in the state by 2020. Information on
activities, outcomes, and performance measures of the department under
this chapter shall be included in the state affordable housing for all
plan.

Sec. 39 RCW 70.114A.040 and 1995 c 220 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department ((is designated the single state agency responsible
for encouraging)) shall collaborate with the departments of community,
trade, and economic development, agriculture, and labor and industries
to encourage the development of additional temporary worker housing((,
and shall be)). The department of community, trade, and economic
development is responsible for coordinating the activities of the
various state and local agencies to assure a seamless, nonduplicative
system for the development and operation of temporary worker housing.
Information on the performance and efforts of all state departments
under this chapter shall be included by the department of community,
trade, and economic development in the state affordable housing for all
plan.

Sec. 40 RCW 70.114A.085 and 1999 c 374 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department, in collaboration with the departments of community,
trade, and economic development, agriculture, and labor and industries,
shall prepare a report to the legislature on utilization of the
temporary worker building code authorized by RCW 70.114A.081. The
report shall include the number of housing units, number of families or
individuals housed, number of growers obtaining permits, the geographic
distribution of the permits, and recommendations of changes in the
temporary worker building code necessary to avoid health and safety
problems for the occupants. The report shall be ((transmitted to the
senate committee on commerce, trade, housing and financial institutions
and the house of representatives committee on economic development,
housing and trade by December 15, 2000, and an update shall be
transmitted every two years thereafter)) included in the department of
community, trade, and economic development affordable housing for all
plan. The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall report on performance measures established by the department to
include, at a minimum, the percentage of temporary and permanent
housing need met within the preceding twelve-month period.

Sec. 41 RCW 70.164.010 and 1987 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds and declares that weatherization of the
residences of low-income households will help conserve energy resources
in this state and can reduce the need to obtain energy from more costly
conventional energy resources. The legislature also finds that rising
energy costs have made it difficult for low-income citizens of the
state to afford adequate fuel for residential space heat.
Weatherization of residences will lower energy consumption, making
space heat more affordable for persons in low-income households.
Weatherization will also reduce overall household costs, which
increases the ability of low-income households to maintain safe,
quality housing and thus contributes to achieving the state's goal of
a decent, appropriate, and affordable home in a healthy, safe
environment for every low-income household in the state by 2020. It
will also reduce the uncollectible accounts of fuel suppliers resulting
from low-income customers not being able to pay fuel bills.
The program implementing the policy of this chapter is necessary to
support the poor and infirm and also to benefit the health, safety, and
general welfare of all citizens of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 (1) The department shall include
performance measures related to the weatherization assistance program
in the state affordable housing for all plan. Performance measures
shall be established by the department; however, the measures must
include, at a minimum, the following information by county and major
city:
(a) Percent of low-income households requesting assistance that
receive assistance; and
(b) Percent of low-income households receiving assistance that pay
less than thirty percent of household income on housing costs,
including heating the residence.
(2) Performance evaluations shall be conducted for each
participating vendor.

Sec. 43 RCW 43.63A.115 and 1993 c 280 s 60 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The community action agency network, established initially
under the federal economic opportunity act of 1964 and subsequently
under the federal community services block grant program of 1981, as
amended, shall be a delivery system for federal and state anti-poverty
programs in this state, including but not limited to the community
services block grant program, the low-income energy assistance program,
and the federal department of energy weatherization program.
(2) Local community action agencies comprise the community action
agency network. The community action agency network shall serve low-income persons in the counties. Each community action agency and its
service area shall be designated in the state federal community service
block grant plan as prepared by the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) Funds for anti-poverty programs may be distributed to the
community action agencies by the department of community, trade, and
economic development and other state agencies in consultation with the
authorized representatives of community action agency networks.
(4) Information regarding community action agency affordable
housing programs and performance measures shall be included in the
state affordable housing for all plan required in RCW 43.185B.040 (as
recodified by this act).
(5) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall conduct an annual performance evaluation of all community action
agency affordable housing programs.

Sec. 44 RCW 43.185B.020 and 2003 c 40 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish the affordable housing advisory
board to consist of ((twenty-two)) seventeen members.
(a) ((The following nineteen)) Nine members shall be appointed by
the governor on the basis of geographic distribution, cultural
diversity, and their expertise in one or more of the following fields:
(i) ((Two representatives of the)) Residential construction
((industry));
(ii) ((Two representatives of the)) Home mortgage lending
((profession));
(iii) ((One representative of the)) Real estate sales
((profession));
(iv) ((One representative of the)) Apartment management and
operations ((industry));
(v) ((One representative of the)) For-profit and nonprofit housing
development ((industry));
(vi) ((One representative of)) For-profit and nonprofit rental
housing ((owners));
(vii) ((One representative of the nonprofit housing development
industry;
(viii) One representative of)) Homeless shelter ((operators))
operations and services;
(((ix) One representative of lower-income persons;
(x) One representative of)) (viii) Special needs ((populations))
population services;
(((xi) One representative of)) (ix) Public housing authorities ((as
created)) under chapter 35.82 RCW;
(((xii))) (x) Two representatives ((of)) shall be appointed by the
governor from among persons nominated by the Washington association of
counties, one ((representative)) of which shall be from a county that
is located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains, and one of which
shall be from a county that is located west of the crest of the Cascade
mountains;
(((xiii))) (xi) Two representatives ((of)) shall be appointed by
the governor from among persons nominated by the association of
Washington cities, one ((representative)) of which shall be from a city
that is located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains, and one of
which shall be from a city that is located west of the crest of the
Cascade mountains; and
(((xiv))) (xii) One representative shall be appointed by the
governor to serve as chair of the affordable housing advisory board((;
(xv) One representative at large)).
(b) ((The following)) Three members shall serve as ex officio((,
nonvoting members)):
(i) The director or the director's designee;
(ii) The executive director of the Washington state housing finance
commission or the executive director's designee; and
(iii) The secretary of social and health services or the
secretary's designee.
(2)(((a))) The members of the affordable housing advisory board
appointed by the governor shall be appointed for four-year terms,
except that the chair shall be appointed to serve a two-year term.
((The terms of five of the initial appointees shall be for two years
from the date of appointment and the terms of six of the initial
appointees shall be for three years from the date of appointment. The
governor shall designate the appointees who will serve the two-year and
three-year terms.)) All members of the board serving on the effective
date of this act shall continue to serve through the end of the terms
to which they were originally appointed. As vacancies in the positions
are filled by the governor, the governor shall designate the length of
the term of each position filled, with the requirement that five of the
positions serve terms that overlap, by two years, the terms of the four
remaining positions. The members of the advisory board shall serve
without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(((b) The governor, when making appointments to the affordable
housing advisory board, shall make appointments that reflect the
cultural diversity of the state of Washington.))
(3) The affordable housing advisory board shall serve as the
((department's)) state's principal advisory body on housing and
housing-related issues((, and replaces the department's existing boards
and task forces on housing and housing-related issues)) and will submit
annual reports, consistent with RCW 43.185B.030 (as recodified by this
act), to the department and to the appropriate committees of the
legislature.
(4) The affordable housing advisory board shall meet regularly and
may appoint technical advisory committees, which may include members
and nonmembers of the affordable housing advisory board, as needed to
address specific issues and concerns.
(5) The department, in conjunction with the Washington state
housing finance commission and the department of social and health
services, shall supply such information and assistance as are deemed
necessary for the advisory board to carry out its duties under this
section.
(6) The department shall provide administrative and clerical
assistance to the affordable housing advisory board.

Sec. 45 RCW 43.185.015 and 1995 c 399 s 100 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created within the department the housing assistance
program to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The program shall
be developed and administered by the department with advice and input
from the affordable housing advisory board established in RCW
43.185B.020 (as recodified by this act). The housing assistance
program must operate in coordination with the state affordable housing
for all program established in section 3 of this act. Funding
decisions made through the housing assistance program must be
consistent with recommendations of the state affordable housing for all
plan.

Sec. 46 RCW 43.185.110 and 1993 c 478 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The affordable housing advisory board established in RCW
43.185B.020 (as recodified by this act) shall advise the director on
housing needs in this state, including housing needs for persons who
are mentally ill or developmentally disabled or youth who are blind or
deaf or otherwise disabled, operational aspects of the grant and loan
program or revenue collection programs established by this chapter, and
implementation of the policy and goals of this chapter. Such advice
shall be consistent with the state affordable housing for all plan and
policies and plans developed by regional support networks according to
chapter 71.24 RCW for the mentally ill and the developmental
disabilities planning council for the developmentally disabled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 47 A new section is added to chapter 35.82 RCW
to read as follows:
The primary objective of all housing authorities is to provide
decent, safe, and affordable housing for families who, due to economic
hardship or disabilities, find it difficult or impossible to obtain
housing in the private real estate market. A second objective is to
assist families in achieving self-sufficiency.

Sec. 48 RCW 43.63A.650 and 1999 c 267 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall be the principal state department
responsible for coordinating federal and state resources and activities
in housing, except for programs administered by the Washington state
housing finance commission under chapter 43.180 RCW, and for evaluating
the operations and accomplishments of other state departments and
agencies as they affect housing. The department shall conduct an
annual evaluation of all state departments and agencies regarding their
housing programs and activities. The department shall provide copies
of the evaluation reports to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 31st of each year.
(2) The department shall work with local governments, tribal
organizations, local housing authorities, nonprofit community or
neighborhood-based organizations, and regional or statewide nonprofit
housing assistance organizations, for the purpose of coordinating
federal and state resources with local resources for housing.
(3) The department shall be the principal state department
responsible for providing shelter and housing services to homeless
families with children. The department shall have the principal
responsibility to coordinate, plan, and oversee the state's activities
for developing a coordinated and comprehensive plan to serve homeless
families with children. The plan shall be developed collaboratively
with the department of social and health services. The department
shall include community organizations involved in the delivery of
services to homeless families with children, and experts in the
development and ongoing evaluation of the plan. The department shall
follow professionally recognized standards and procedures. The plan
shall be implemented within amounts appropriated by the legislature for
that specific purpose in the operating and capital budgets. The
department shall submit the plan to the appropriate committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than September 1, 1999,
and shall update the plan and submit it to the appropriate committees
of the legislature by January 1st of every odd-numbered year through
2007. The plan shall address at least the following: (a) The need for
prevention assistance; (b) the need for emergency shelter; (c) the need
for transitional assistance to aid families into permanent housing; (d)
the need for linking services with shelter or housing; and (e) the need
for ongoing monitoring of the efficiency and effectiveness of the
plan's design and implementation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 49 RCW 36.22.178, 43.185B.020, 43.185B.030,
and 43.185B.040 are each recodified as sections in chapter 43.--- RCW
(created in section 50 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 50 Sections 1 through 7, 10 through 15, 18,
19, 21, 22, and 42 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 51 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 52 RCW 43.185B.010 (Definitions) and 1995 c
399 s 104 & 1993 c 478 s 4 are each repealed.

--- END ---