BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.185C.005 and 2005 c 484 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Despite laudable efforts by all levels of government, private
individuals, nonprofit organizations, and charitable foundations to end
homelessness, the number of homeless persons in Washington is
unacceptably high. The state's homeless population, furthermore,
includes a large number of families with children, youth, and employed
persons. The legislature finds that the fiscal and societal costs of
homelessness are high for both the public and private sectors, and that
ending homelessness should be a goal for state and local government.
The legislature finds that there are many causes of homelessness,
including a shortage of affordable housing; a shortage of family-wage
jobs which undermines housing affordability; a lack of an accessible
and affordable health care system available to all who suffer from
physical and mental illnesses and chemical and alcohol dependency;
domestic violence; ((and)) a lack of education and job skills necessary
to acquire adequate wage jobs in the economy of the twenty-first
century; inadequate services for mentally ill and developmentally
disabled citizens living in the community; and the difficulties faced
by formerly institutionalized persons in reintegrating to society and
finding stable employment and housing.
The support and commitment of all sectors of the statewide
community is critical to the chances of success in ending homelessness
in Washington. While the provision of housing and housing-related
services to the homeless should be administered at the local level to
best address specific community needs, the legislature also recognizes
the need for the state to play a primary coordinating, supporting,
((and)) monitoring, and evaluating role. There must be a clear
assignment of responsibilities and a clear statement of achievable and
quantifiable goals. Systematic statewide data collection on
((homelessness)) homeless individuals in Washington must be a critical
component of such a program enabling the state to work with local
governments to not only count all homeless people in the state, but
also to record and manage information about homeless persons ((and)) in
order to assist them in finding housing and other supportive services
that can assist them, when possible, in achieving a higher degree of
self-sufficiency and economic independence if that is a reasonable and
appropriate goal.
The creation of a homeless client management information system,
the systematic collection and rigorous evaluation of homeless data, a
nationwide search for and implementation through adequate resource
allocation of best practices, and the systematic measurement of
progress toward interim goals and the ultimate goal of ending
homelessness are all necessary components of a statewide effort to end
homelessness in Washington by July 1, 2015.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.185C.010 and 2005 c 484 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(3) "Homeless person" means an individual living outside or in a
building not meant for human habitation or which they have no legal
right to occupy, in an emergency shelter, or in a temporary housing
program which may include a transitional and supportive housing program
if habitation time limits exist. This definition includes substance
abusers, mentally ill people, and sex offenders who are homeless.
(4) "Washington homeless census" means an annual statewide census
conducted as a collaborative effort by towns, cities, counties,
community-based organizations, and state agencies, with the technical
support and coordination of the department, to count and collect data
on all homeless individuals in Washington.
(5) "Washington homeless client survey" means a statewide survey
conducted as a collaborative effort by towns, cities, counties,
community-based organizations, and state agencies, with the technical
support and coordination of the department, to count and collect
specific identifying data on all homeless individuals in Washington to
be entered into the Washington homeless client management information
system.
(6) "Washington homeless client management information system"
means a data base of information about homeless individuals in the
state used to coordinate resources to assist homeless clients to obtain
and retain housing and reach greater levels of self-sufficiency or
economic independence when appropriate, depending upon their individual
situations.
(7) "((Homeless housing)) Ending homelessness account" means the
state treasury account receiving the state's portion of income from
revenue from the sources established by RCW 36.22.179 (as recodified by
this act).
(((6))) (8) "((Homeless housing)) Ending homelessness grant
program" means the vehicle by which competitive grants are awarded by
the department, utilizing moneys from the ((homeless housing)) ending
homelessness account, to local governments for programs directly
related to housing homeless individuals and families, addressing the
root causes of homelessness, preventing homelessness, collecting data
on homeless individuals, and other efforts directly related to housing
homeless persons.
(((7))) (9) "Local government" means a county government in the
state of Washington or a city government, if the legislative authority
of the city affirmatively elects to accept the responsibility for
housing homeless persons within its borders.
(((8))) (10) "Housing continuum" means the progression of
individuals along a housing-focused continuum with homelessness at one
end and homeownership at the other.
(((9))) (11) "Local ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness task
force" means a voluntary local committee created to ((advise a local
government on the creation of)) develop a local ((homeless housing))
ending homelessness plan and participate in a local ((homeless
housing)) ending homelessness program. It must include a
representative of the county, a representative of the largest city
located within the county, at least one homeless or formerly homeless
person, such other members as may be required to maintain eligibility
for federal funding related to housing programs and services and if
feasible, a representative of a private nonprofit organization with
experience in low-income housing.
(((10))) (12) "Long-term private or public housing" means
subsidized and unsubsidized rental or owner-occupied housing in which
there is no established time limit for habitation of less than two
years.
(((11))) (13) "Interagency council on homelessness" means a
committee appointed by the governor and consisting of, at least, ((the
director)) policy level representatives of the department of community,
trade, and economic development; the ((secretary of the)) department of
corrections; ((the secretary of)) the department of social and health
services; ((the director of)) the department of veterans affairs; and
the ((secretary of the)) department of health.
(((12))) (14) "Performance measurement" means the process of
comparing specific measures of success against ultimate and interim
goals.
(((13))) (15) "Performance evaluation" means the process of
evaluating performance by established criteria according to the
achievement of outlined goals, measures, targets, standards, or other
outcomes, using a ranked scorecard from highest to lowest performance
which employs a scale of one to one hundred, one hundred being the
optimal score.
(16) "Quality management program" means a nationally recognized
program similar or equivalent to the Baldridge criteria. All local
governments receiving over two hundred thousand dollars from the ending
homelessness program surcharge in RCW 36.22.179 (as recodified by this
act) and from the surcharge in RCW 36.22.178 shall implement a quality
management program and shall apply to the Washington state quality
award program once every three years.
(17) "Community action agency" means a nonprofit private or public
organization established under the economic opportunity act of 1964.
(((14))) (18) "Housing authority" means any of the public
corporations created by chapter 35.82 RCW.
(((15))) (19) "((Homeless housing)) Ending homelessness program"
means the program authorized under this chapter as administered by the
department at the state level and by the local government or its
designated subcontractor at the local level.
(((16))) (20) "((Homeless housing)) Ending homelessness plan" means
the ten-year plan developed by the county or other local government to
address ((housing for homeless persons)) ending homelessness.
(((17))) (21) "((Homeless housing)) Ending homelessness strategic
plan" means the ten-year plan developed by the department, in
consultation with ((the interagency council on homelessness and)) the
affordable housing advisory board.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.185C.020 and 2005 c 484 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created within the department the ((homeless housing))
ending homelessness program to develop and coordinate a statewide
strategic plan aimed at housing homeless persons. The program shall be
developed and administered by the department with advice and input from
the affordable housing advisory board established in RCW 43.185B.020.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.185C.030 and 2005 c 484 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall annually conduct both a Washington
homeless census ((or count)) of all homeless individuals statewide and
an annual Washington homeless client survey which shall collect
information on all homeless individuals in the state consistent with
the requirements of RCW 43.63A.655 (as recodified by this act). The
census and survey shall make every effort to count and collect
information about all homeless individuals living outdoors, in
shelters, and in transitional housing, coordinated, when reasonably
feasible, with already existing homeless census and counting projects,
including those funded in part by the United States department of
housing and urban development under the McKinney-Vento homeless
assistance program. The department shall determine, in consultation
with local governments, the data to be collected and shall review and
report annually on the effectiveness of the data collection process,
including suggestions for process improvements. Information collected
shall be entered, when appropriate, into the homeless client management
information system for the purpose of coordinating supportive services
and housing opportunities for the homeless client to assist the client
to achieve greater levels of self-sufficiency and economic independence
if that is deemed a reasonable and achievable goal for the client.
(2) The annual count of homeless individuals throughout the state
shall commence immediately. The annual Washington homeless client
survey shall be implemented by December 31, 2009, and shall be
conducted at least annually on a schedule created by the department.
The annual count and survey may be the same if the requirements of both
are met. The department shall make summary data by county and each
city available to the public each year. This data, and its analysis,
shall be included in the department's annual updated ending
homelessness strategic plan.
Information for the Washington homeless client survey shall be
collected after having obtained informed, reasonably time-limited
written consent from the homeless individual to whom the information
relates. Data collection shall be done in a manner consistent with
federally informed consent guidelines regarding human research which,
at a minimum, require that individuals be informed about the expected
duration of their participation, an explanation of whom to contact for
answers to pertinent questions about the data collection and their
rights regarding their personal identifying information, an explanation
regarding whom to contact in the event of injury to the individual
related to the homeless client survey, a description of any reasonably
foreseeable risks to the homeless individual, and a statement
describing the extent to which confidentiality of records identifying
the individual will be maintained. A unique identifier shall be
collected during the homeless client survey and shall be used in the
homeless client management information system which, at a minimum, must
include the client's name, except as provided for in subsection (3) of
this section.
(3) All personal information collected ((in the census)) through
the ending homelessness program is confidential, and the department and
each local government shall take all necessary steps to protect the
identity and confidentiality of each person ((counted)) whose
information is recorded and ultimately entered into the homeless client
management information system. The department and each local
government are prohibited from disclosing any personally identifying
information about any homeless individual when there is reason to
believe or evidence indicating that the homeless individual is an adult
or minor victim of domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault,
or stalking or is the parent or guardian of a child victim of domestic
violence, dating violence, sexual assault, or stalking; or revealing
other confidential information regarding HIV/AIDS status, as found in
RCW 70.24.105. The department and each local government shall not
((ask)) require any homeless housing provider to disclose personally
identifying information about any homeless individuals when the
providers implementing those programs have reason to believe or
evidence indicating that those clients are adult or minor victims of
domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault, or stalking or are
the parents or guardians of child victims of domestic violence, dating
violence, sexual assault, or stalking. Summary data, which includes
specific performance outcome data to be determined by the department in
consultation with the department of social and health services, for the
provider's facility or program may be substituted.
((The Washington homeless census shall be conducted annually on a
schedule created by the department. The department shall make summary
data by county available to the public each year. This data, and its
analysis, shall be included in the department's annual updated homeless
housing program strategic plan.
Based on the annual census and provider information from the local
government plans, the department shall, by the end of year four,
implement an online information and referral system to enable local
governments and providers to identify available housing for a homeless
person.)) The department, in consultation and cooperation with the
department of social and health services, and each local government
shall create privacy plans to ensure that information entered into the
homeless client management information system data base remains
confidential and is only shared amongst service providers, the program
managing entity of the local government, and the department. The
department shall conduct an annual performance evaluation of each local
government in relation to the successful implementation of its privacy
plan.
The state auditor shall conduct a performance audit of the
department and all local governments, which shall cost, at a minimum,
one hundred thousand dollars, by 2013 to evaluate the performance of
the department and local governments in protecting the privacy of
persons whose information is collected through the homeless client
management information system.
(4) The department shall work with local governments and their
providers to develop a capacity for continuous case management, when
appropriate, to assist homeless persons.
(5) By the end of year four, the department shall implement an
organizational quality management ((system)) program.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.185C.040 and 2005 c 484 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Six months after the first Washington homeless census,)) The
department shall, in consultation with the interagency council on
homelessness and the affordable housing advisory board, prepare and
publish a ten-year ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness strategic
plan which shall outline statewide goals and performance measures and
shall be coordinated with the plan for homeless families with children
required under RCW 43.63A.650. To guide local governments in
preparation of their first local ((homeless housing)) ending
homelessness plans due December 31, 2005, the department shall issue by
October 15, 2005, temporary guidelines consistent with this chapter and
including the best available data on each community's homeless
population. Local governments' ten-year ((homeless housing)) ending
homelessness plans shall not be substantially inconsistent with the
goals and program recommendations of the temporary guidelines and, when
amended after 2005, the state ending homelessness strategic plan.
(2) Program outcomes and performance measures and goals shall be
created by the department and reflected in the department's ((homeless
housing)) ending homelessness strategic plan as well as interim goals
against which state and local governments' performance may be measured,
including:
(a) By the end of year one, completion of the first census as
described in RCW 43.185C.030. By December 31, 2009, implement the
annual Washington homeless client survey as described in RCW
43.185C.030 and the Washington homeless client management information
system as described in RCW 43.63A.655 (as recodified by this act);
(b) By the end of each subsequent year, goals common to all local
programs which are measurable and the achievement of which would move
that community toward housing its homeless population; and
(c) By July 1, 2015, reduction of the homeless population statewide
and in each county by fifty percent.
(3) The department shall develop a consistent statewide data
gathering instrument to monitor the performance of cities and counties
receiving grants in order to determine compliance with the terms and
conditions set forth in the grant application or required by the
department.
The department shall, in consultation with the interagency council
on homelessness and the affordable housing advisory board, report
annually to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature the fiscal and societal cost of the homeless crisis,
including identifying to the extent practical, savings in state and
local program costs that could be achieved through the achievement of
stable housing for the clients served by those programs, an assessment
of the state's performance in furthering the goals of the state ten-year ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness strategic plan and the
performance of each participating local government in creating and
executing a local ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness plan which
meets the requirements of this chapter. The annual report ((may))
shall include performance measures such as:
(a) The reduction in the number of homeless individuals and
families from the initial count of homeless persons;
(b) The number of new units available and affordable for homeless
families by housing type from all sources;
(c) The number of homeless individuals identified who are not
offered suitable housing within one day and within thirty days of their
request or identification as homeless;
(d) The number of households at risk of losing housing who maintain
it due to a preventive intervention;
(e) The transition time from homelessness to permanent housing and
to measurable benchmark increases in self-sufficiency and economic
independence;
(f) The cost per person housed at each level of the housing
continuum;
(g) The ability of the state and local governments to successfully
collect data and report performance;
(h) The extent of collaboration and coordination among public
bodies, as well as community stakeholders, and the level of community
support and participation;
(i) The quality and safety of housing provided; and
(j) The effectiveness of outreach to homeless persons, and their
satisfaction with the program.
(4) Based on the performance of local ((homeless housing)) ending
homelessness programs in meeting their interim goals, on general
population changes and on changes in the homeless population recorded
in the annual census and Washington homeless client survey, the
department may revise the performance measures and goals of the state
((homeless housing)) ending homelessness strategic plan, set goals for
years following the initial ten-year period, and recommend changes in
local governments' plans.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.185C.050 and 2005 c 484 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each local ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness task force
shall prepare and recommend to its local government legislative
authority a ten-year ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness plan for
its jurisdictional area which shall be not inconsistent with the
department's statewide temporary guidelines, ((for the December 31,
2005, plan,)) and thereafter the department's ten-year ((homeless
housing)) ending homelessness strategic plan, and which shall be aimed
at eliminating homelessness, with a minimum goal of reducing
homelessness by fifty percent by July 1, 2015. The local government
may amend the proposed local plan and shall adopt a plan by December
31, 2005. The department shall conduct an annual performance
evaluation of all local government plans. Performance in meeting the
goals of ((this)) local plans shall be assessed annually by the
department in terms of the performance measures described in RCW
43.185C.040(3) and others published by the department. The department
shall request input from members of the appropriate committees of the
legislature when establishing additional performance measures. Local
plans may include specific local performance measures adopted by the
local government legislative authority((,)) and ((may include))
recommendations for any state legislation needed to meet the state or
local plan goals. The department shall conduct an annual performance
evaluation of each local government by December 31st of each year
beginning in 2007. Factors upon which a local government's performance
is evaluated include the participation of each city in the county in
the county's homeless census and client survey, thoroughness of the
local plan, and the results of homeless program activities.
(2) Eligible activities under the local plans include:
(a) Rental and furnishing of dwelling units for the use of homeless
persons;
(b) Costs of developing affordable housing for homeless persons,
and services for formerly homeless individuals and families residing in
transitional housing or permanent housing and still at risk of
homelessness;
(c) Operating subsidies for transitional housing or permanent
housing serving formerly homeless families or individuals;
(d) Services to prevent homelessness, such as emergency eviction
prevention programs including temporary rental subsidies to prevent
homelessness;
(e) Temporary services to assist persons leaving state institutions
and other state programs to prevent them from becoming or remaining
homeless;
(f) Outreach services for homeless individuals and families;
(g) Development and management of local ((homeless)) ending
homelessness plans including homeless census and client survey data
collection((;)), identification of goals, performance measures,
strategies, and costs, and evaluation of progress towards established
goals;
(h) Rental vouchers payable to landlords for persons who are
homeless or below thirty percent of the median income or in immediate
danger of becoming homeless;
(i) Implementing a quality management program, if applicable; and
(((i))) (j) Other activities to reduce and prevent homelessness as
identified for funding in the local plan.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.185C.060 and 2005 c 484 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. The state's portion of the
surcharge established in RCW 36.22.179 (as recodified by this act) must
be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness program as
described in this chapter. Only the director or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.185C.070 and 2005 c 484 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) During each calendar year in which moneys from the ((homeless
housing)) ending homelessness account are available for use by the
department for the ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness grant
program, the department shall announce to all Washington counties,
participating cities, and through major media throughout the state, a
grant application period of at least ninety days' duration. This
announcement will be made as often as the director deems appropriate
for proper utilization of resources. The department shall then
promptly grant as many applications as will utilize available funds,
less appropriate administrative costs of the department as described in
RCW 36.22.179 (as recodified by this act).
(2) The department will develop, with advice and input from the
affordable housing advisory board established in RCW 43.185B.020,
criteria to evaluate grant applications.
(3) The department may approve applications only if they are
consistent with the local and state ((homeless housing program
strategic)) ending homelessness plans. The department may give
preference to applications based on some or all of the following
criteria:
(a) The total homeless population in the applicant local government
service area, as reported by the most recent ((annual)) Washington
homeless census and client survey;
(b) Current local expenditures to provide housing for the homeless
and to address the underlying causes of homelessness as described in
RCW 43.185C.005;
(c) Local government and private contributions pledged to the
program in the form of matching funds, property, infrastructure
improvements, and other contributions; and the degree of leveraging of
other funds from local government or private sources for the program
for which funds are being requested, to include recipient contributions
to total project costs, including allied contributions from other
sources such as professional, craft and trade services, and lender
interest rate subsidies;
(d) Construction projects or rehabilitation that will serve
homeless individuals or families for a period of at least twenty-five
years;
(e) Projects which demonstrate serving homeless populations with
the greatest needs, including projects that serve special needs
populations;
(f) The degree to which the applicant project represents a
collaboration between local governments, nonprofit community-based
organizations, local and state agencies, and the private sector,
especially through its integration with the coordinated and
comprehensive plan for homeless families with children required under
RCW 43.63A.650;
(g) The cooperation of the local government in the ((annual))
Washington homeless ((census project)) census and client survey;
(h) The commitment of the local government and any subcontracting
local governments, nonprofit organizations, and for-profit entities to
employ a diverse work force;
(i) The extent, if any, that the local homeless population is
disproportionate to the revenues collected under this chapter and RCW
36.22.178 and 36.22.179 (as recodified by this act); and
(j) Other elements shown by the applicant to be directly related to
the goal and the department's state ending homelessness strategic plan.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.185C.080 and 2005 c 484 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Only a local government is eligible to receive ((a homeless
housing)) an ending homelessness grant from the ((homeless housing))
ending homelessness account. Any city may assert responsibility for
homeless housing within its borders if it so chooses, by forwarding a
resolution to the legislative authority of the county stating its
intention and its commitment to operate a separate ((homeless housing))
ending homelessness program. The city shall then receive a percentage
of the surcharge assessed under RCW 36.22.179 (as recodified by this
act) equal to the percentage of the city's local portion of the real
estate excise tax collected by the county. A participating city may
also then apply separately for ((homeless housing program)) ending
homelessness grants. A city choosing to operate a separate ((homeless
housing)) ending homelessness program shall be responsible for
complying with all of the same requirements as counties and shall adopt
a local ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness plan meeting the
requirements of this chapter for ((county)) local plans. However, the
city may by resolution of its legislative authority accept the county's
((homeless housing)) ending homelessness task force as its own and
based on that task force's recommendations adopt ((a homeless housing))
an ending homelessness plan specific to the city.
(2) Local governments receiving or applying for ((homeless
housing)) ending homelessness funds may subcontract with any other
local government, housing authority, community action agency or other
nonprofit organization for the execution of programs contributing to
the overall goal of ending homelessness within a defined service area.
All subcontracts shall be consistent with the local ((homeless
housing)) ending homelessness plan adopted by the legislative authority
of the local government, time limited, and filed with the department
and shall have specific performance terms. While a local government
has the authority to subcontract with other entities, the local
government continues to maintain the ultimate responsibility for the
((homeless housing)) ending homelessness program within its borders.
(3) A county may decline to participate in the program authorized
in this chapter by forwarding to the department a resolution adopted by
the county legislative authority stating the intention not to
participate. A copy of the resolution shall also be transmitted to the
county auditor and treasurer. If such a resolution is adopted, all of
the funds otherwise due to the county under RCW 43.185C.060 shall be
remitted monthly to the state treasurer for deposit in the ((homeless
housing)) ending homelessness account, without any reduction by the
county for collecting or administering the funds. Upon receipt of the
resolution, the department shall promptly begin to identify and
contract with one or more entities eligible under this section to
create and execute a local ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness
plan for the county meeting the requirements of this chapter. The
department shall expend all of the funds received from the county under
this subsection to carry out the purposes of chapter 484, Laws of 2005
in the county, provided that the department may retain six percent of
these funds to offset the cost of managing the county's program.
(4) A resolution by the county declining to participate in the
program shall have no effect on the ability of each city in the county
to assert its right to manage its own program under this chapter, and
the county shall monthly transmit to the city the funds due under this
chapter.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.185C.090 and 2005 c 484 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall allocate grant moneys from the ((homeless
housing)) ending homelessness account to finance in whole or in part
programs and projects in approved local ((homeless housing)) ending
homelessness plans to assist homeless individuals and families gain
access to adequate housing, prevent at-risk individuals from becoming
homeless, address the root causes of homelessness, track and report on
homeless-related data, and facilitate the movement of homeless or
formerly homeless individuals along the housing continuum toward more
stable and independent housing and economic independence. The
department may issue criteria or guidelines to guide local governments
in the application process.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.185C.100 and 2005 c 484 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall provide technical assistance to any
participating local government that requests such assistance.
Technical assistance activities may include:
(1) Assisting local governments to identify appropriate parties to
participate on local ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness task
forces;
(2) Assisting local governments to identify appropriate service
providers with which the local governments may subcontract for service
provision and development activities, when necessary;
(3) Assisting local governments to implement or expand homeless
census ((programs)) and client surveys to meet ((homeless housing))
ending homelessness program requirements;
(4) Assisting local governments in the local implementation of the
homeless client management information system;
(5) Assisting in the identification of "best practices" from other
areas;
(((5))) (6) Assisting in identifying additional funding sources for
specific projects; and
(((6))) (7) Training local government and subcontractor staff.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.185C.130 and 2005 c 484 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall ensure that the state's interest is protected
upon the development, use, sale, or change of use of projects
constructed, acquired, or financed in whole or in part through the
((homeless housing)) ending homelessness grant program. These policies
may include, but are not limited to: (1) Requiring a share of the
appreciation in the project in proportion to the state's contribution
to the project, or (2) requiring a lump sum repayment of the grant upon
the sale or change of use of the project.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.185C.160 and 2005 c 485 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each county shall create ((a homeless housing)) an ending
homelessness task force to develop a ten-year ((homeless housing))
ending homelessness plan addressing short-term and long-term housing
for homeless persons.
Membership on the task force may include representatives of the
counties, cities, towns, housing authorities, civic and faith
organizations, schools, community networks, human services providers,
law enforcement personnel, criminal justice personnel, including
prosecutors, probation officers, and jail administrators, substance
abuse treatment providers, mental health care providers, emergency
health care providers, businesses, at-large representatives of the
community, and a homeless or formerly homeless individual.
In lieu of creating a new task force, a local government may
designate an existing governmental or nonprofit body which
substantially conforms to this section and which includes at least one
homeless or formerly homeless individual to serve as its homeless
representative. As an alternative to a separate plan, two or more
local governments may work in concert to develop and execute a joint
((homeless housing)) ending homelessness plan, or to contract with
another entity to do so according to the requirements of this chapter.
While a local government has the authority to subcontract with other
entities, the local government continues to maintain the ultimate
responsibility for the ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness program
within its borders.
A county may decline to participate in the program authorized in
this chapter by forwarding to the department a resolution adopted by
the county legislative authority stating the intention not to
participate. A copy of the resolution shall also be transmitted to the
county auditor and treasurer. If a county declines to participate, the
department shall create and execute a local ((homeless housing)) ending
homelessness plan for the county meeting the requirements of this
chapter.
(2) In addition to developing a ten-year ((homeless housing))
ending homelessness plan, each task force shall establish guidelines
consistent with the statewide ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness
strategic plan, as needed, for the following:
(a) Emergency shelters;
(b) Short-term housing needs;
(c) Temporary encampments;
(d) Supportive housing for chronically homeless persons; and
(e) Long-term housing.
Guidelines must include, when appropriate, standards for health and
safety and notifying the public of proposed facilities to house the
homeless.
(3) Each county, including counties exempted from creating a new
task force under subsection (1) of this section, shall report to the
department of community, trade, and economic development such
information as may be needed to ensure compliance with this chapter.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.185C.900 and 2005 c 484 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter may be known and cited as the ((homelessness housing))
ending homelessness and assistance act.

Sec. 15 RCW 36.22.179 and 2005 c 484 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) In addition to the surcharge authorized in RCW 36.22.178,
and except as provided in subsection (((2))) (3) of this section, an
additional surcharge of ten dollars shall be charged by the county
auditor for each document recorded, which will be in addition to any
other charge allowed by law. The funds collected pursuant to this
section are to be distributed and used as follows:
(((a))) (1) The auditor shall retain two percent for collection of
the fee, and of the remainder shall remit sixty percent to the county
to be deposited into a fund that must be used by the county and its
cities and towns to accomplish the purposes of chapter 484, Laws of
2005, six percent of which may be used by the county for administrative
costs related to its ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness plan, and
the remainder for programs which directly accomplish the goals of the
county's ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness plan, except that for
each city in the county which elects as authorized in RCW 43.185C.080
to operate its own ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness program, a
percentage of the surcharge assessed under this section equal to the
percentage of the city's local portion of the real estate excise tax
collected by the county shall be transmitted at least quarterly to the
city treasurer, without any deduction for county administrative costs,
for use by the city for program costs which directly contribute to the
goals of the city's ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness plan; of
the funds received by the city, it may use six percent for
administrative costs for its ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness
program.
(((b))) (2) The auditor shall remit the remaining funds to the
state treasurer for deposit in the ((homeless housing)) ending
homelessness account. The department may use twelve and one-half
percent of this amount for administration of the program established in
RCW 43.185C.020, including the costs of creating the statewide
((homeless housing)) ending homelessness strategic plan, updating and
managing the Washington homeless client survey and homeless client
management information system, measuring performance, providing
technical assistance to local governments, and managing the ((homeless
housing)) ending homelessness grant program. The remaining eighty-seven and one-half percent is to be distributed by the department to
local governments through the ((homeless housing)) ending homelessness
grant program.
(((2))) (3) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to
assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The sum of two million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the ending homelessness
account. Up to five hundred thousand dollars of this funding shall be
used by the department to implement and continually update the
Washington homeless client management information system as required in
RCW 43.63A.655 (as recodified by this act). The department shall
distribute one million five hundred thousand dollars of this funding to
the participating local governments, using a formula to be determined
by the department, to be used for local planning, data collection and
management, program implementation purposes, implementation of quality
management and evaluation programs, and local housing programs eligible
under this act.

Sec. 17 RCW 43.185B.030 and 1993 c 478 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The affordable housing advisory board shall:
(1) Analyze those solutions and programs that could begin to
address the state's need for housing that is affordable for all
economic segments of the state, including homeless and special needs
populations, including, but not limited to, programs or proposals which
provide for:
(a) Financing for the acquisition, rehabilitation, preservation, or
construction of housing;
(b) Use of publicly owned land and buildings as sites for
affordable housing;
(c) Coordination of state initiatives with federal initiatives and
financing programs that are referenced in the Cranston-Gonzalez
national affordable housing act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12701 et seq.), as
amended, and development of an approved housing strategy as required in
the Cranston-Gonzalez national affordable housing act (42 U.S.C. Sec.
12701 et seq.), as amended;
(d) Identification and removal, where appropriate and not
detrimental to the public health and safety, or environment, of state
and local regulatory barriers to the development and placement of
affordable housing;
(e) Stimulating public and private sector cooperation in the
development of affordable housing; and
(f) Development of solutions and programs affecting housing,
including the equitable geographic distribution of housing for all
economic segments, as the advisory board deems necessary;
(2) Consider both homeownership and rental housing as viable
options for the provision of housing. The advisory board shall give
consideration to various types of residential construction and
innovative housing options, including but not limited to manufactured
housing;
(3) Review, evaluate, and make recommendations regarding existing
and proposed housing programs and initiatives including, but not
limited to, tax policies, land use policies, and financing programs.
The advisory board shall provide recommendations to the director, along
with the department's response in the annual housing report to the
legislature required in RCW 43.185B.040; and
(4) Prepare and submit to the director, by each December 1st,
beginning December 1, 1993, a report detailing its findings and make
specific program, legislative, and funding recommendations and any
other recommendations it deems appropriate.

Sec. 18 RCW 43.20A.790 and 1999 c 267 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall collaborate with the department of
community, trade, and economic development in the development of the
coordinated and comprehensive plan for homeless families with children
required under RCW 43.63A.650, which designates the department of
community, trade, and economic development as the state agency with
primary responsibility for providing shelter and housing services to
homeless families with children. The plan for homeless families with
children shall be coordinated with the state ending homelessness
program strategic plan. In fulfilling its responsibilities to
collaborate with the department of community, trade, and economic
development pursuant to RCW 43.63A.650, the department shall develop,
administer, supervise, and monitor its portion of the plan. The
department's portion of the plan shall contain at least the following
elements:
(a) Coordination or linkage of services with shelter and housing;
(b) Accommodation and addressing the needs of homeless families in
the design and administration of department programs;
(c) Participation of the department's local offices in the
identification, assistance, and referral of homeless families; and
(d) Ongoing monitoring of the efficiency and effectiveness of the
plan's design and implementation.
(2) The department shall include community organizations involved
in the delivery of services to homeless families with children, and
experts in the development and ongoing evaluation of the plan.
(3) The duties under this section shall be implemented within
amounts appropriated for that specific purpose by the legislature in
the operating and capital budgets.
(4) The department shall report upon performance measures quarterly
to the department of community, trade, and economic development, via an
electronic reporting system to be created by the department.

Sec. 19 RCW 43.330.167 and 2004 c 276 s 718 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) There is created in the custody of the state treasurer an
account to be known as the homeless families services fund. Revenues
to the fund consist of a one-time appropriation by the legislature,
private contributions, and all other sources deposited in the fund.
(b) Expenditures from the fund may only be used for the purposes of
the program established in this section, including administrative
expenses. Only the director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development, or the director's designee, may authorize
expenditures.
(c) Expenditures from the fund are exempt from appropriations and
the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW. However, money used for
program administration by the department is subject to the allotment
and budgetary controls of chapter 43.88 RCW, and an appropriation is
required for these expenditures.
(2) The department may expend moneys from the fund to provide state
matching funds for housing-based supportive services for homeless
families over a period of at least ten years.
(3) Activities eligible for funding through the fund include, but
are not limited to, the following:
(a) Case management;
(b) Counseling;
(c) Referrals to employment support and job training services and
direct employment support and job training services;
(d) Domestic violence services and programs;
(e) Mental health treatment, services, and programs;
(f) Substance abuse treatment, services, and programs;
(g) Parenting skills education and training;
(h) Transportation assistance;
(i) Child care; and
(j) Other supportive services identified by the department to be an
important link for housing stability.
(4) Organizations that may receive funds from the fund include
local housing authorities, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based
organizations, public development authorities, federally recognized
Indian tribes in the state, and regional or statewide nonprofit housing
assistance organizations.
(5) The homeless families services program shall be incorporated
into the state ending homelessness strategic plan and, where
applicable, with local ending homelessness plans. The homeless
families services program shall report results quarterly to the
department. The department shall conduct an annual performance
evaluation of the homeless families services fund program.

Sec. 20 RCW 43.63A.650 and 1999 c 267 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall be the principal state department
responsible for coordinating federal and state resources and activities
in housing, except for programs administered by the Washington state
housing finance commission under chapter 43.180 RCW, and for evaluating
the operations and accomplishments of other state departments and
agencies as they affect housing.
(2) The department shall work with local governments, tribal
organizations, local housing authorities, nonprofit community or
neighborhood-based organizations, for-profit developers, and regional
or statewide nonprofit housing assistance organizations, for the
purpose of coordinating federal and state resources with local
resources for housing.
(3) The department shall be the principal state department
responsible for providing shelter and housing services to homeless
families with children. The department shall have the principal
responsibility to coordinate, plan, and oversee the state's activities
for developing a coordinated and comprehensive plan to serve homeless
families with children. The plan shall be developed collaboratively
with the department of social and health services. The department
shall include community organizations involved in the delivery of
services to homeless families with children, and experts in the
development and ongoing evaluation of the plan. The department shall
follow professionally recognized standards and procedures. The plan
shall be implemented within amounts appropriated by the legislature for
that specific purpose in the operating and capital budgets. The
department shall submit the plan to the appropriate committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than September 1, 1999,
and shall update the plan and submit it to the appropriate committees
of the legislature by January 1st of every ((odd-numbered)) year
through 2007. The plan shall address at least the following: (a) The
need for prevention assistance; (b) the need for emergency shelter; (c)
the need for transitional assistance to aid families into permanent
housing; (d) the need for linking services with shelter or housing; and
(e) the need for ongoing monitoring of the efficiency and effectiveness
of the plan's design and implementation. The plan shall include
performance measures to be determined by the department in
collaboration with the department of social and health services. The
department shall evaluate the plan and its results annually based upon
the performance measures outlined in the plan.

Sec. 21 RCW 43.63A.655 and 1999 c 267 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to improve services for the homeless, the department,
within amounts appropriated by the legislature for this specific
purpose, shall implement ((a)) the Washington homeless client
management information system for the ongoing collection ((and analysis
of)) and updates of information about all homeless individuals in the
state.
(2) The homeless client management information system shall serve
as an online information and referral system to enable local
governments and providers to connect homeless persons in the data base
with available housing and other supportive services. Local
governments shall develop a capacity for continuous case management,
which shall include independent living plans, when appropriate, to
assist homeless persons.
(3) Information about homeless individuals for the Washington
homeless client management information system shall come from the
Washington homeless client survey and other state agencies and
community organizations serving homeless individuals and families.
(4) The information in the Washington homeless client management
information system will also provide the department with the
information to consolidate and analyze data about the extent and nature
of homelessness in Washington state, giving emphasis to information
about extent and nature of homelessness in Washington state families
with children.
(5) The system may be merged with other data gathering and
reporting systems and shall:
(a) Protect the right of privacy of individuals;
(b) Provide for consultation and collaboration with all relevant
state agencies including the department of social and health services,
experts, and community organizations involved in the delivery of
services to homeless persons; and
(c) Include related information held or gathered by other state
agencies.
(((2))) (6) Within amounts appropriated by the legislature, for
this specific purpose, the department shall evaluate the information
gathered and disseminate the analysis and the evaluation broadly, using
appropriate computer networks as well as written reports.
(7) The Washington homeless client management information system
shall be implemented by December 31, 2009, and updated with new
homeless client information annually.

Sec. 22 RCW 74.50.060 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 18 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a shelter assistance program to
provide, within available funds, shelter for persons eligible under
this chapter. "Shelter," "shelter support," or "shelter assistance"
means a facility under contract to the department providing room and
board in a supervised living arrangement, normally in a group or
dormitory setting, to eligible recipients under this chapter. This may
include supervised domiciliary facilities operated under the auspices
of public or private agencies. No facility under contract to the
department shall allow the consumption of alcoholic beverages on the
premises. The department may contract with counties and cities for
such shelter services. To the extent possible, the department shall
not displace existing emergency shelter beds for use as shelter under
this chapter. In areas of the state in which it is not feasible to
develop shelters, due to low numbers of people needing shelter
services, or in which sufficient numbers of shelter beds are not
available, the department may provide shelter through an intensive
protective payee program, unless the department grants an exception on
an individual basis for less intense supervision.
(2) The department shall report annually to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on performance measures established by
the department.
(3) The department of social and health services shall provide the
annual report on program performance measures to the department of
community, trade, and economic development, which shall include the
information in the state affordable housing for all plan.
(4) Persons continuously eligible for the general assistance--unemployable program since July 25, 1987, who transfer to the program
established by this chapter, have the option to continue their present
living situation, but only through a protective payee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
The department, the Washington housing finance commission, the
affordable housing advisory board, and all participating local
governments, housing authorities, and other nonprofit organizations
receiving state funds or financing through the housing finance
commission, shall, by December 31, 2006, and annually thereafter,
review current housing planning and reporting requirements related to
housing programs and services and give recommendations to the
legislature to streamline and simplify all planning and reporting
requirements. The entities listed in this section shall also give
recommendations for additional legislative actions that could promote
the ending homelessness goal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The interagency council on homelessness, as defined in RCW
43.185C.010, shall be convened not later than August 31, 2006, and
shall meet at least two times each year and report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature annually by December 31st on its
activities.
(2) The interagency council on homelessness shall work to create
greater levels of interagency coordination and to coordinate state
agency efforts with the efforts of state and local entities addressing
homelessness.
(3) The interagency council shall seek to:
(a) Align homeless-related housing and supportive service policies
among state agencies;
(b) Identify ways in which providing housing with appropriate
services can contribute to cost savings for state agencies;
(c) Identify and eliminate policies and actions which contribute to
homelessness or interfere with its reduction;
(d) Review and improve strategies for discharge from state
institutions which contribute to homelessness;
(e) Recommend and adopt new policies to improve practices and/or
align resources, including those policies requested by the affordable
housing advisory board or through state and local housing plans; and
(f) Ensure that the housing status of people served by state
programs is collected in consistent formats available for analysis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall report
annually to the department and to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on performance measures related to the housing status of
very low-income clients and clients with disabilities in order to
promote coordination with the efforts of other state agencies and local
governments in ending homelessness. Such reports shall include
performance measures to be determined by the department.
(2) The department of social and health services shall estimate, in
cooperation with the interagency council on homelessness, the total
amount of the annual department of social and health services budget
that could be saved by homeless clients obtaining and retaining stable
housing and self-sufficiency.
(3) The department of social and health services shall provide the
annual report on program performance measures to the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department of corrections shall report annually to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the housing status of
inmates at the time of discharge and the housing status of clients
under correctional supervision at a minimum of three, six, and twelve-month intervals to promote coordination of the efforts of the
department with the efforts of other state agencies and local
governments in ending homelessness. Such reports shall include
performance measures to be determined by the department.
(2) The department of corrections shall provide the annual report
on program performance measures to the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 RCW 36.22.179 and 43.63A.655 are each
recodified as sections in chapter 43.185C RCW.

--- END ---