BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.50.610 and 2003 c 53 s 312 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person may not knowingly, for valuable consideration,
purchase or sell a part for transplantation, research, or therapy, if
removal of the part is intended to occur after the death of the
decedent.
(2) Valuable consideration does not include reasonable payment for
the removal, processing, disposal, preservation, quality control,
storage, transportation, or implantation of a part.
(3) A person who violates this section is guilty of a class C
felony and upon conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding fifty
thousand dollars or imprisonment not exceeding five years, or both.

--- END ---