BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.155.070 and 1990 c 3 s 807 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall issue a certificate to any applicant who meets
the following requirements:
(1) Successful completion of an educational program approved by the
secretary or successful completion of alternate training which meets
the criteria of the secretary;
(2) Successful completion of any experience requirement established
by the secretary;
(3) Successful completion of an examination administered or
approved by the secretary;
(4) Not having engaged in unprofessional conduct or being unable to
practice with reasonable skill and safety as a result of a physical or
mental impairment;
(5) Not convicted of a sex offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 or
convicted in any other jurisdiction of an offense that under the laws
of this state would be classified as a sex offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030; and
(6) Other requirements as may be established by the secretary that
impact the competence of the sex offender treatment provider.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.155.075 and 2004 c 38 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall issue an affiliate certificate to any
applicant who meets the following requirements:
(1) Successful completion of an educational program approved by the
secretary or successful completion of alternate training which meets
the criteria of the secretary;
(2) Successful completion of an examination administered or
approved by the secretary;
(3) Proof of supervision by a certified sex offender treatment
provider;
(4) Not having engaged in unprofessional conduct or being unable to
practice with reasonable skill and safety as a result of a physical or
mental impairment; ((and))
(5) Not convicted of a sex offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 or
convicted in any other jurisdiction of an offense that under the laws
of this state would be classified as a sex offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030; and
(6) Other requirements as may be established by the secretary that
impact the competence of the sex offender treatment provider.

--- END ---