BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.61.210 and 1997 c 3 s 205 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board of park commissioners may levy or cause to be levied a
general tax on all the property located in said park district each year
not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of the
property in such park district. In addition, the board of park
commissioners may levy or cause to be levied a general tax on all
property located in said park district each year not to exceed twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation. Although park
districts are authorized to impose two separate regular property tax
levies, the levies shall be considered to be a single levy for purposes
of the limitation provided for in chapter 84.55 RCW.
The board is hereby authorized to levy a general tax in excess of
its regular property tax levy or levies when authorized so to do at a
special election conducted in accordance with and subject to all the
requirements of the Constitution and laws of the state now in force or
hereafter enacted governing the limitation of tax levies. The board is
hereby authorized to call a special election for the purpose of
submitting to the qualified voters of the park district a proposition
to levy a tax in excess of the seventy-five cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value herein specifically authorized. The manner of
submitting any such proposition, of certifying the same, and of giving
or publishing notice thereof, shall be as provided by law for the
submission of propositions by cities or towns.
The board shall include in its general tax levy for each year a
sufficient sum to pay the interest on all outstanding bonds and may
include a sufficient amount to create a sinking fund for the redemption
of all outstanding bonds. The levy shall be certified to the proper
county officials for collection the same as other general taxes and
when collected, the general tax shall be placed in a separate fund in
the office of the county treasurer to be known as the "metropolitan
park district fund" and ((paid out on warrants)) disbursed under RCW
36.29.010(1) and 39.58.750.

--- END ---