BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.09.250 and 1986 c 206 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((interagency)) committee ((for outdoor recreation)) shall
maintain:
(1) A statewide plan which shall be updated at least once every
third biennium and shall be used by all participating agencies to guide
distribution and expenditure of funds under this chapter; and
(2) A statewide data base of ORV trails, ORV sports parks, and
other ORV recreation areas open to the general public. The data base
must be based on a geographic information system program and include
all state and federal lands open for public ORV use. The data base
must be available to the public over the committee's internet web site
and a link to the data base must be created on web sites operated by
all state agencies, other than colleges and universities, that manage
recreational land of any nature. The committee shall fund the data
base consistent with RCW 46.09.110.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.09.110 and 2004 c 105 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The moneys collected by the department under this chapter shall be
distributed from time to time but at least once a year in the following
manner:
(1) The department shall retain enough money to cover expenses
incurred in the administration of this chapter((: PROVIDED, That such
retention)). However, the money retained for administration shall
never exceed eighteen percent of fees collected.
(2) The remaining moneys shall be distributed by the committee for
the ORV data base required by RCW 46.09.250 and for ORV recreation
facilities ((by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation)) in
accordance with RCW 46.09.170(2)(d)(ii)(A).

--- END ---