BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall create an adhesive label specifying the
current federal and state motor vehicle fuel and special fuel tax
rates. The label should be chemical and weather resistant. The label
must be updated as necessary to reflect current motor vehicle fuel and
special fuel tax rates.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2007, a current adhesive label, as
described in subsection (1) of this section, must be affixed on each
retail motor vehicle fuel pump in the state.
(3) For the purposes of this section, a "retail motor vehicle fuel
pump" means any weighing device as defined by RCW 19.94.010 from which
motor vehicle fuel is dispensed for retail sale.

--- END ---