BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.38 RCW
to read as follows:
Alternative fuel is exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter if
the fuel is manufactured in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
alternative fuel, as defined in RCW 82.38.020, if the fuel is exempt
from special fuel tax under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of alternative fuel, as defined in RCW 82.38.020, if the fuel is exempt
from special fuel tax under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.38.020 and 2002 c 183 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Alternative fuel" means alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or
biodiesel feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135.
(2) "Blended special fuel" means a mixture of undyed diesel fuel
and another liquid, other than a de minimis amount of the liquid, that
can be used as a fuel to propel a motor vehicle.
(((2))) (3) "Blender" means a person who produces blended special
fuel outside the bulk transfer-terminal system.
(((3))) (4) "Bond" means a bond duly executed with a corporate
surety qualified under chapter 48.28 RCW, which bond is payable to the
state of Washington conditioned upon faithful performance of all
requirements of this chapter, including the payment of all taxes,
penalties, and other obligations arising out of this chapter.
(((4))) (5) "Bulk transfer-terminal system" means the special fuel
distribution system consisting of refineries, pipelines, vessels, and
terminals. Special fuel in a refinery, pipeline, vessel, or terminal
is in the bulk transfer-terminal system. Special fuel in the fuel tank
of an engine, motor vehicle, or in a railcar, trailer, truck, or other
equipment suitable for ground transportation is not in the bulk
transfer-terminal system.
(((5))) (6) "Bulk transfer" means a transfer of special fuel by
pipeline or vessel.
(((6))) (7) "Bulk storage" means the placing of special fuel into
a receptacle other than the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle.
(((7))) (8) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(((8))) (9) "Dyed special fuel user" means a person authorized by
the internal revenue code to operate a motor vehicle on the highway
using dyed special fuel, in which the use is not exempt from the
special fuel tax.
(((9))) (10) "Evasion" or "evade" means to diminish or avoid the
computation, assessment, or payment of authorized taxes or fees
through:
(a) A knowing: False statement; omission; misrepresentation of
fact; or other act of deception;
(b) An intentional: Failure to file a return or report; or other
act of deception; or
(c) The unlawful use of dyed special fuel.
(((10))) (11) "Export" means to obtain special fuel in this state
for sales or distribution outside the state.
(((11))) (12) "Highway" means every way or place open to the use of
the public, as a matter of right, for the purpose of vehicular travel.
(((12))) (13) "Import" means to bring special fuel into this state
by a means of conveyance other than the fuel supply tank of a motor
vehicle.
(((13))) (14) "International fuel tax agreement licensee" means a
special fuel user operating qualified motor vehicles in interstate
commerce and licensed by the department under the international fuel
tax agreement.
(((14))) (15) "Lessor" means a person: (a) Whose principal
business is the bona fide leasing or renting of motor vehicles without
drivers for compensation to the general public; and (b) who maintains
established places of business and whose lease or rental contracts
require the motor vehicles to be returned to the established places of
business.
(((15))) (16) "Licensee" means a person holding a license issued
under this chapter.
(((16))) (17) "Motor vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle
designed for operation upon land utilizing special fuel as the means of
propulsion.
(((17))) (18) "Natural gas" means naturally occurring mixtures of
hydrocarbon gases and vapors consisting principally of methane, whether
in gaseous or liquid form.
(((18))) (19) "Person" means a natural person, fiduciary,
association, or corporation. The term "person" as applied to an
association means and includes the partners or members thereof, and as
applied to corporations, the officers thereof.
(((19))) (20) "Position holder" means a person who holds the
inventory position in special fuel, as reflected by the records of the
terminal operator. A person holds the inventory position in special
fuel if the person has a contractual agreement with the terminal for
the use of storage facilities and terminating services at a terminal
with respect to special fuel. "Position holder" includes a terminal
operator that owns special fuel in their terminal.
(((20))) (21) "Rack" means a mechanism for delivering special fuel
from a refinery or terminal into a truck, trailer, railcar, or other
means of nonbulk transfer.
(((21))) (22) "Refiner" means a person who owns, operates, or
otherwise controls a refinery.
(((22))) (23) "Removal" means a physical transfer of special fuel
other than by evaporation, loss, or destruction.
(((23))) (24) "Special fuel" means and includes all combustible
gases and liquids suitable for the generation of power for propulsion
of motor vehicles, except that it does not include motor vehicle fuel
as defined in chapter 82.36 RCW, nor does it include dyed special fuel
as defined by federal regulations, unless the use is in violation of
this chapter. If a person holds for sale, sells, purchases, or uses
any dyed special fuel in violation of this chapter, all dyed special
fuel held for sale, sold, purchased, stored, or used by that person is
considered special fuel, and the person is subject to all presumptions,
reporting, and recordkeeping requirements and other obligations which
apply to special fuel, along with payment of any applicable taxes,
penalties, or interest for illegal use.
(((24))) (25) "Special fuel distributor" means a person who
acquires special fuel from a supplier, distributor, or licensee for
subsequent sale and distribution.
(((25))) (26) "Special fuel exporter" means a person who purchases
special fuel in this state and directly exports the fuel by a means
other than the bulk transfer-terminal system to a destination outside
of the state.
(((26))) (27) "Special fuel importer" means a person who imports
special fuel into the state by a means other than the bulk transfer-terminal system. If the importer of record is acting as an agent, the
person for whom the agent is acting is the importer. If there is no
importer of record, the owner of the special fuel at the time of
importation is the importer.
(((27))) (28) "Special fuel supplier" means a person who holds a
federal certificate issued under the internal revenue code and
authorizes the person to tax-free transactions on special fuel in the
bulk transfer-terminal system.
(((28))) (29) "Special fuel user" means a person engaged in uses of
special fuel that are not specifically exempted from the special fuel
tax imposed under this chapter.
(((29))) (30) "Terminal" means a special fuel storage and
distribution facility that has been assigned a terminal control number
by the internal revenue service, is supplied by pipeline or vessel, and
from which reportable special fuel is removed at a rack.
(((30))) (31) "Terminal operator" means a person who owns,
operates, or otherwise controls a terminal.
(((31))) (32) "Two-party exchange" or "buy-sell agreement" means a
transaction in which taxable special fuel is transferred from one
licensed supplier to another licensed supplier under an exchange or
buy-sell agreement whereby the supplier that is the position holder
agrees to deliver taxable special fuel to the other supplier or the
other supplier's customer at the rack of the terminal at which the
delivering supplier is the position holder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act expires July 1, 2015.

--- END ---