BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that every gallon of
renewable fuel produced and consumed in Washington state represents one
less gallon of refined petroleum product from foreign or domestic
sources. Every gallon of renewable fuel produced and consumed in
Washington realizes a significant reduction in the amount of harmful
vehicle emissions. The legislature further finds a renewable fuel
standard is beneficial for the environment in all areas of the state,
for agriculture and Washington's farm families, for commerce, for a
general increase in our state's level of employment, and for
functioning as a bridge that spans the gulf between the mainstream
ideological differences of eastern and western Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.112 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise provided under subsection (2) of this section,
when there is sufficient verifiable quantities of competitively priced
Washington-produced biodiesel fuel available to meet two percent of
Washington state's aggregate diesel motor fuel demand, as determined by
the director of the department of agriculture, all diesel motor fuels
offered at retail sale in Washington must contain at least two percent
biodiesel fuel by volume. When calculating whether there is sufficient
verifiable quantities of competitively priced Washington-produced
biodiesel fuel available to meet two percent of Washington state's
aggregate diesel motor fuel demand, the director shall not include a
producer's gallons of biodiesel unless it can be verified that a
predominant portion of the feedstock used to produce the biodiesel was
grown in Washington state.
(2) The director may authorize on a temporary basis the sale of
motor fuels that do not meet the requirements of this section if the
director determines:
(a) That sufficient verifiable quantities of competitively priced
Washington-produced biodiesel fuel are not available to meet the
minimum requirements of this section; or
(b) Any other circumstances occur that would make compliance with
this section an undue hardship for the motor fuel manufacturer,
distributor, retailer, or consumer.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.112.010 and 1991 c 145 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Motor fuel" means any liquid product used for the generation
of power in an internal combustion engine used for the propulsion of a
motor vehicle upon the highways of this state. Motor fuels containing
ethanol may be marketed if either (a) the base motor fuel meets the
applicable standards before the addition of the ethanol or (b) the
resultant blend meets the applicable standards after the addition of
the ethanol.
(2) "Director" means the director of agriculture.
(3) "Biodiesel fuel" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.29A.135.

--- END ---