BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.75.060 and 1969 ex.s. c 182 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of efficient administration of the county roads
of each county the board may((, but not more than once in each year,))
form their respective counties, or any part thereof, into suitable and
convenient road districts, not exceeding nine in number, and cause a
description thereof to be entered upon their records. Except as
provided in this section, amendments to the boundaries of a road
district may be considered by a board no more frequently than once
every year.
(2) Unless the board decides otherwise by majority vote, there
shall be at least one road district in each county commissioner's
district embracing territory outside of cities and towns and territory
inside of cities and towns as provided in chapter 36.82 RCW. A road
district may include territory within cities and towns if an annexing
city or town and the applicable county or counties reach agreement on
the transfer of funds as provided in section 6 of this act at least one
hundred twenty days before an annexation election or an ordinance
approving annexation by a city or town, whichever comes first.
Amendments to the boundaries of a road district to include territory
inside of a city or town within a road district may be considered by a
board more frequently than once per year and must have the approval of
any applicable city and town legislative authorities. No road district
shall extend into more than one county commissioner's district. The
authority of a county to include territory inside of a city or town
within a road district expires ten years after the city or town annexes
the subject territory.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.33.220 and 2001 c 212 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislative authority of any county may budget, in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 36.40 RCW, and expend any
portion of the county road property tax revenues for:
(i) Any service to be provided in the unincorporated area of the
county notwithstanding any other provision of law, including chapter
36.82 RCW and RCW 84.52.050 and 84.52.043; and
(ii) The provision of municipal services within an annexation area
or areas as provided under chapter 36.82 RCW.
(b) "Annexation area" and "municipal services" have the same
meanings as provided in section 6 of this act.
(2)(a) County road property tax revenues that are diverted under
chapter 39.89 RCW may be expended as provided under chapter 39.89 RCW.
(b) County road property tax revenues that are diverted under
section 6 of this act shall be expended as provided under chapter 36.82
RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.82.020 and 1991 c 363 s 87 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Any)) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, funds
accruing to and to be deposited in the county road fund ((arising))
from any levy in any road district shall be expended for proper county
road purposes.
(2) Funds accruing to and to be deposited in the county road fund
from any levy in an annexation area or areas in any road district may
also be expended for the provision of municipal services within an
annexation area or areas as provided by this chapter and RCW 36.33.220.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.82.040 and 2001 c 212 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of raising revenue for establishing, laying
out, constructing, altering, repairing, improving, and maintaining
county roads, bridges, and wharves necessary for vehicle ferriage and
for other proper county purposes, and for the provision of municipal
services as provided by this chapter and RCW 36.33.220, the board shall
annually at the time of making the levy for general purposes make a
uniform tax levy throughout the county, or any road district thereof,
of not to exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value of the last assessed valuation of the taxable
property in the county, or road district thereof, unless other law of
the state requires a lower maximum levy, in which event such lower
maximum levy shall control.
(2) All funds accruing from such levy shall be credited to and
deposited in the county road fund except that revenue diverted under:
(a) RCW 36.33.220 shall be placed in a separate and identifiable
account within the county current expense fund ((and except that
revenue diverted under));
(b) Chapter 39.89 RCW shall be expended as provided under chapter
39.89 RCW; and
(c) Section 6 of this act shall be expended as provided by this
chapter and RCW 36.33.220.
(3) The authority of a county to levy funds under this chapter from
incorporated territory within a road district expires ten years after
the city or town annexes the subject territory.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.82.070 and 2001 c 221 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any money paid to any county road fund may be used for the
construction, alteration, repair, improvement, or maintenance of county
roads and bridges thereon and for wharves necessary for ferriage of
motor vehicle traffic, and for ferries, and for the acquiring,
operating, and maintaining of machinery, equipment, quarries, or pits
for the extraction of materials, and for the cost of establishing
county roads, acquiring rights-of-way therefor, and expenses for the
operation of the county engineering office, for the provision of
municipal services as provided by this chapter and RCW 36.33.220, and
for any of the following programs when directly related to county road
purposes: (((1))) (a) Insurance; (((2))) (b) self-insurance programs;
and (((3))) (c) risk management programs; and for any other proper
county road purpose. Such expenditure may be made either independently
or in conjunction with the state or any city, town, or tax district
within the county.
(2) County road purposes also include the removal of barriers to
fish passage related to county roads, and include but are not limited
to the following activities associated with the removal of these
barriers: Engineering and technical services; stream bank
stabilization; streambed restoration; the placement of weirs, rock, or
woody debris; planting; and channel modification. County road funds
may be used beyond the county right-of-way for activities clearly
associated with removal of fish passage barriers that are the
responsibility of the county. Activities related to the removal of
barriers to fish passage performed beyond the county right-of-way must
not exceed twenty-five percent of the total cost of activities related
to fish barrier removal on any one project, and the total annual cost
of activities related to the removal of barriers to fish passage
performed beyond the county rights-of-way must not exceed one-half of
one percent of a county's annual road construction budget. The use of
county road funds beyond the county right-of-way for activities
associated with the removal of fish barriers is permissive, and wholly
within the discretion of the county legislative authority. The use of
county road funds beyond the county right-of-way for such activities
does not create or impose a legal duty upon a county for salmon
recovery work beyond the county right-of-way.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 36.82 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Taxes levied under this chapter for collection from within an
annexation area shall be transferred to an annexing city or town and
expended for municipal services within an annexation area if the
legislative authority of the annexing city or town has:
(a) Completed the annexation of an annexation area;
(b) Determined by resolution or ordinance that the costs of
providing municipal services to the annexation area exceed or are
projected to exceed the general revenue generated for the city or town
from the annexation area on an annual basis; and
(c) Entered into an interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW
with the applicable county or counties specifying the terms by which
levied funds may be transferred to the annexing city or town.
(2)(a)(i) The authority of a county to transfer funds under this
section expires ten years after the city or town annexes the subject
territory.
(ii) The authority of a city or town to expend funds under this
section expires ten years after the city or town annexes the subject
territory. The period of expenditure may not commence before the date
on which the annexation area is annexed to the city or town.
(b) Funds transferred to a city or town under this section for
three years after the adoption of a resolution or ordinance as provided
in subsection (1)(b) of this section may not include taxes levied under
this chapter that are allocated by a county legislative authority to a
county sheriff. However, funds transferred to a city or town under
this section shall include taxes levied under this chapter that are
allocated to a county sheriff that are in excess of four percent of the
revenue from an annexation area.
(c) Funds levied under this chapter before the date on which the
annexation area is annexed to the city or town may not be transferred
and expended under this section.
(3) Funds expended by a city or town under this section shall be
used solely to provide, maintain, and operate municipal services for
the annexation area. Funds expended under this section may not be used
in an annexation area other than that from which the funds were levied.
(4) The following definitions apply throughout this chapter unless
the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Annexation area" means an area that has been annexed to a city
or town.
(b) "Municipal services" means those services customarily provided
to the public by a city or town government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---