BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.08.002 and 2004 c 149 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Amateur" means a person who has never received nor competed
for any purse or other article of value, either for expenses of
training or for participating in an event, other than a prize of fifty
dollars in value or less.
(2) "Bout" means a contest or match between participants appearing
at an event.
(3) "Boxing" means the sport of attack and defense which uses the
contestants fists and where the contestants compete with the intent not
to injure or disable an opponent, but to win by decision, knockout, or
technical knockout, but does not include professional wrestling.
(((3))) (4) "Chiropractor" means a person licensed under chapter
18.25 RCW as a doctor of chiropractic or under the laws of any
jurisdiction in which that person resides.
(((4))) (5) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(((5))) (6) "Director" means the director of the department of
licensing or the director's designee.
(((6))) (7) "Event" includes, but is not limited to, a boxing,
wrestling, or martial arts contest, sparring, fisticuffs, match, show,
or exhibition.
(((7))) (8) "Event physician" means the physician licensed under
RCW 67.08.100 and who is responsible for the activities described in
RCW 67.08.090.
(((8))) (9) "Face value" means the dollar value of a ticket or
order, which value must reflect the dollar amount that the customer is
required to pay or, for a complimentary ticket, would have been
required to pay to purchase a ticket with equivalent seating priority,
in order to view the event.
(((9))) (10) "Gross receipts" means the amount received from the
face value of all tickets sold and complimentary tickets redeemed.
(((10))) (11) "Kickboxing" means a type of boxing in which blows
are delivered with the fist and any part of the leg below the hip,
including the foot and where the contestants compete with the intent
not to injure or disable an opponent, but to win by decision, knockout,
or technical knockout.
(((11))) (12) "Martial arts" means a type of boxing including sumo,
judo, karate, kung fu, tae kwon do, pankration, muay thai, or other
forms of full-contact martial arts or self-defense conducted on a full-contact basis where weapons are not used and the participants utilize
kicks, punches, blows, or other techniques with the intent not to
injure or disable an opponent, but to defeat an opponent or win by
decision, knockout, technical knockout, or submission.
(((12))) (13) "No holds barred fighting," also known as "frontier
fighting" and "extreme fighting," means a contest, exhibition, or match
between contestants where any part of the contestant's body may be used
as a weapon or any means of fighting may be used with the specific
purpose to intentionally injure the other contestant in such a manner
that they may not defend themselves and a winner is declared. Rules
may or may not be used.
(((13))) (14) "Combative fighting," also known as "toughman
fighting," "toughwoman fighting," "badman fighting," and "so you think
you're tough," means a contest, exhibition, or match between
contestants who use their fists, with or without gloves, or their feet,
or both, and which allows contestants that are not trained in the sport
to compete and the object is to defeat an opponent or to win by
decision, knockout, or technical knockout.
(((14))) (15) "Physician" means a person licensed under chapter
18.57, 18.36A, or 18.71 RCW as a physician or a person holding an
osteopathic or allopathic physician license under the laws of any
jurisdiction in which the person resides.
(((15))) (16) "Professional" means a person who has received or
competed for any purse or other articles of value greater than fifty
dollars, either for the expenses of training or for participating in an
event.
(((16))) (17) "Promoter" means a person, and includes any officer,
director, employee, or stockholder of a corporate promoter, who
produces, arranges, stages, holds, or gives an event in this state
involving a professional boxing, martial arts, or wrestling event, or
shows or causes to be shown in this state a closed circuit telecast of
a match involving a professional participant whether or not the
telecast originates in this state.
(((17))) (18) "Wrestling exhibition" or "wrestling show" means a
form of sports entertainment in which the participants display their
skills in a physical struggle against each other in the ring and either
the outcome may be predetermined or the participants do not necessarily
strive to win, or both.
(((18))) (19) "Amateur event" means an event in which all the
participants are "amateurs" and which is registered and sanctioned by:
(a) United States Amateur Boxing, Inc.;
(b) Washington Interscholastic Activities Association;
(c) National Collegiate Athletic Association;
(d) Amateur Athletic Union;
(e) Golden Gloves of America;
(f) United Full Contact Federation;
(g) Any similar organization recognized by the department as
exclusively or primarily dedicated to advancing the sport of amateur
boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts, as those sports are defined in
this section; or
(h) Local affiliate of any organization identified in this
subsection.
(((19))) (20) "Elimination tournament" means any contest in which
contestants compete in a series of matches until not more than one
contestant remains in any weight category. The term does not include
any event that complies with the provisions of RCW 67.08.015(2) (a) or
(b).

Sec. 2 RCW 67.08.030 and 1997 c 205 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every promoter, as a condition for receiving a license, shall
file with the department a surety bond in an amount to be determined by
the department, but not less than ten thousand dollars, to cover all of
the event locations applied for within the state during the license
period, conditioned upon the faithful performance by such licensee of
the provisions of this chapter, the payment of the ((taxes))
department's administrative fee, officials, and participant contracts
as provided for herein and the observance of all rules of the
department.
(2) Boxing, kickboxing, and martial arts promoters must obtain
medical insurance in an amount set by the director, but not less than
fifty thousand dollars, to cover any injuries incurred by participants
at the time of each event held in this state and provide proof of
insurance to the department seventy-two hours before each event. The
evidence of insurance must specify, at a minimum, the name of the
insurance company, the insurance policy number, the effective date of
the coverage, and evidence that each participant is covered by the
insurance. The promoter must pay any deductible associated with the
insurance policy.
(3) In lieu of the insurance requirement of subsection (2) of this
section, a promoter of the boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts event
who so chooses may, as a condition for receiving a license under this
chapter, file proof of medical insurance coverage that is in effect for
the entire term of the licensing period.
(4) The department shall cancel a boxing, kickboxing, or martial
arts event if the promoter fails to provide proof of medical insurance
within the proper time frame.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.08.050 and 2000 c 151 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any promoter shall within seven days prior to the holding of
any event file with the department a statement setting forth the name
of each licensee who is a potential participant, his or her manager or
managers, and such other information as the department may require.
Participant changes regarding a wrestling event may be allowed after
notice to the department, if the new participant holds a valid license
under this chapter. The department may stop any wrestling event in
which a participant is not licensed under this chapter.
(2) Upon the termination of any event the promoter shall file with
the designated department representative a written report, duly
verified as the department may require showing the number of tickets
sold for the event, the price charged for the tickets and the gross
proceeds thereof, and such other and further information as the
department may require. The promoter shall pay to the department at
the time of filing the report under this section ((a tax)) an
administrative fee equal to five percent of such gross receipts.
However, the ((tax)) administrative fee may not be less than twenty-five dollars. The five percent administrative fee of such gross
receipts shall be immediately paid by the department into the state
general fund.
(3) A complimentary ticket may not have a face value of less than
the least expensive ticket available for sale to the general public.
The number of untaxed complimentary tickets shall be limited to ten
percent of the total tickets sold per event location, not to exceed one
thousand tickets. All complimentary tickets exceeding this exemption
shall be subject to ((taxation)) the five percent administrative fee.

Sec. 4 RCW 67.08.055 and 1993 c 278 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every licensee who charges and receives an admission fee for
exhibiting a simultaneous telecast of any live, current, or spontaneous
boxing or sparring match, or wrestling exhibition or show on a closed
circuit telecast viewed within this state shall, within seventy-two
hours after such event, furnish to the department a verified written
report on a form which is supplied by the department showing the number
of tickets issued or sold, and the gross receipts therefor without any
deductions whatsoever. Such licensee shall also, at the same time, pay
to the department ((a tax)) an administrative fee equal to five percent
of such gross receipts paid for admission to the showing of the
contest, match or exhibition. In no event, however, shall the ((tax))
administrative fee be less than twenty-five dollars. The ((tax))
administrative fee shall apply uniformly at the same rate to all
persons subject to the ((tax)) administrative fee. Such receipts shall
be immediately paid by the department into the general fund of the
state.

Sec. 5 RCW 67.08.090 and 2002 c 147 s 2 and 2002 c 86 s 308 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Each contestant for boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts events
shall be examined within twenty-four hours before the contest by an
event physician licensed by the department. The event physician shall
report in writing and over his or her signature before the event the
physical condition of each and every contestant to the inspector
present at such contest. No contestant whose physical condition is not
approved by the event physician shall be permitted to participate in
any event. Blank forms for event physicians' reports shall be provided
by the department and all questions upon such blanks shall be answered
in full. The event physician shall be paid a fee and travel expenses
by the promoter.
(2) The department may require that an event physician be present
at a wrestling event. The promoter shall pay the event physician
present at a wrestling event. A boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts
event may not be held unless an event physician licensed by the
department is present throughout the event. In addition to the event
physician, a chiropractor may be included as a licensed official at a
boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts event. The promoter shall pay the
chiropractor present at a boxing, kickboxing, or martial arts event.
(3) Any physician licensed under RCW 67.08.100 may be selected by
the department as the event physician. The event physician present at
any contest shall have authority to stop any ((event)) bout when in the
event physician's opinion it would be dangerous to a contestant to
continue, and in such event it shall be the event physician's duty to
stop the ((event)) bout.
(4) The department may have a participant in a wrestling event
examined by an event physician licensed by the department prior to the
event. A participant in a wrestling event whose condition is not
approved by the event physician shall not be permitted to participate
in the event.
(5) Each contestant for boxing, kickboxing, martial arts, or
wrestling events may be subject to a random urinalysis or chemical test
within twenty-four hours before or after a contest. In addition to the
unprofessional conduct specified in RCW 18.235.130, an applicant or
licensee who refuses or fails to submit to the urinalysis or chemical
test is subject to disciplinary action under RCW 18.235.110. If the
urinalysis or chemical test is positive for substances prohibited by
rules adopted by the director, the applicant or licensee has engaged in
unprofessional conduct and disciplinary action may be taken under RCW
18.235.110.

Sec. 6 RCW 67.08.130 and 2002 c 86 s 311 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever any licensee shall fail to make a report of any event
within the time prescribed by this chapter or when such report is
unsatisfactory to the department, the director may examine the books
and records of such licensee; he or she may subpoena and examine under
oath any officer of such licensee and such other person or persons as
he or she may deem necessary to a determination of the total gross
receipts from any event and the amount of ((tax)) the administrative
fee thereon. If, upon the completion of such examination it shall be
determined that an additional ((tax)) the administrative fee is due,
notice thereof shall be served upon the licensee, providing the
licensee with an opportunity to request a hearing under chapter 34.05
RCW. The failure to request a hearing within twenty days of service of
the notice constitutes a default, whereupon the director will enter a
decision on the facts available. Failure to pay such additional
((tax)) administrative fee within twenty days after service of a final
order constitutes unprofessional conduct and the licensee may be
subject to disciplinary action against its license and shall be
disqualified from receiving any new license.

--- END ---