BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that specialty
hospitals jeopardize the financial balance of community hospitals by
selectively providing care to less ill patients, treating fewer
medicare, medicaid, and uninsured patients, providing primarily care
that is profitable to investors, and reducing community hospital
staffing. To assure that private and public hospitals in Washington
remain financially viable institutions able to provide general acute
care in their communities and maintain the capacity to respond to
local, state, and national emergencies, the legislature has concluded
that specialty hospitals must meet certain conditions in order to be
licensed. These conditions will ensure that specialty hospitals and
community hospitals compete on a level playing field and, therefore,
will minimize the adverse impacts of specialty hospitals on community
general hospitals while assuring quality patient care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Emergency services" means health care services medically
necessary to evaluate and treat a medical condition that manifests
itself by the acute onset of a symptom or symptoms, including severe
pain, that would lead a prudent layperson acting reasonably to believe
that a health condition exists that requires immediate medical
attention, and that the absence of immediate medical attention could
reasonably be expected to result in serious impairment to bodily
functions or serious dysfunction of an organ or part of the body, or
would place the person's health, or in the case of a pregnant woman,
the health of the woman or her unborn child, in serious jeopardy.
(b) "General hospital" means a hospital that provides general acute
care services, including emergency services.
(c) "Specialty hospital" means a subclass of hospital that is
primarily or exclusively engaged in the care and treatment of one of
the following categories: (i) Patients with a cardiac condition; (ii)
patients with an orthopedic condition; (iii) patients receiving a
surgical procedure; and (iv) any other specialized category of services
that the secretary of health and human services designates as a
specialty hospital.
(d) "Transfer agreement" means a written agreement providing an
effective process for the transfer of a patient requiring emergency
services to a general hospital providing emergency services and for
continuity of care for that patient.
(e) "Health service area" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.38.025.
(2) To be licensed under this chapter, a specialty hospital shall:
(a) Be significantly engaged in providing inpatient care;
(b) Comply with all standards and rules adopted by the department
for hospitals;
(c) Provide appropriate discharge planning;
(d) Participate in the medicare and medicaid programs and provide
at least the same percentage of services to medicare and medicaid
beneficiaries, as a percent of gross revenues, as the lowest percentage
of services provided to medicare and medicaid beneficiaries by a
general hospital in the same health service area. The lowest
percentage of services provided to medicare and medicaid beneficiaries
shall be determined by the department in consultation with the general
hospitals in the health service area;
(e) Provide at least the same percentage of charity care, as a
percent of gross revenues, as the lowest percentage of charity care
provided by a general hospital in the same health service area. The
lowest percentage of charity care shall be determined by the department
in consultation with the general hospitals in the health service area;
(f) Require any physician owner to: (i) In accordance with chapter
19.68 RCW, disclose a financial interest in the specialty hospital and
provide a list of alternative hospitals before referring a patient to
the specialty hospital; and (ii) if the specialty hospital does not
have an intensive care unit, notify the patient that if intensive care
services are required, the patient will be transferred to another
hospital;
(g) Provide emergency services twenty-four hours per day, seven
days per week with appropriate staff in a designated area of the
hospital and comply with requirements for emergency facilities that are
established by the department;
(h) Require all physicians with privileges at the specialty
hospital to maintain privileges at a general hospital in the same
health service area and to provide on-call services to the general
hospital at least at the same level as other specialists in the health
service area, as determined by the department and the affected general
hospital; and
(i) Establish procedures to stabilize a patient with an emergency
medical condition until the patient is transported or transferred to
another hospital if emergency services cannot be provided at the
specialty hospital to meet the needs of the patient in an emergency,
and maintain a transfer agreement with a general hospital in the same
health service area that establishes a process for patient transfers in
a situation in which the specialty hospital cannot provide continuing
care for a patient because of the specialty hospital's scope of
services.
(3) This section does not apply to:
(a) A specialty hospital that provides only psychiatric, pediatric,
long-term acute care, cancer, or rehabilitative services; or
(b) A hospital that was licensed under this chapter before January
1, 2006.

--- END ---