BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Benefit zone" means the geographic zone from which taxes are
to be appropriated to finance public improvements authorized under this
chapter and in which a hospital that has received a certificate of need
is to be constructed.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Local government" means any city, town, county, or any
combination thereof.
(4) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(5) "Participating taxing authority" means a taxing authority that
has entered into a written agreement with a local government for the
use of hospital benefit zone financing to the extent of allocating
excess excise taxes to the local government for the purpose of
financing all or a portion of the costs of designated public
improvements.
(6) "Public improvements" means infrastructure improvements within
the benefit zone that include:
(a) Street and road construction and maintenance;
(b) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;
(c) Sidewalks and streetlights;
(d) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(e) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(f) Park facilities and recreational areas; and
(g) Storm water and drainage management systems.
(7) "Public improvement costs" means the costs of: (a) Design,
planning, acquisition including land acquisition, site preparation
including land clearing, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
improvement, and installation of public improvements; (b) demolishing,
relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of
public improvements; (c) relocating utilities as a result of public
improvements; and (d) financing public improvements, including interest
during construction, legal and other professional services, taxes,
insurance, principal and interest costs on indebtedness issued to
finance public improvements, and any necessary reserves for
indebtedness; and administrative expenses and feasibility studies
reasonably necessary and related to these costs, including related
costs that may have been incurred before adoption of the ordinance
authorizing the public improvements and the use of hospital benefit
zone financing to fund the costs of the public improvements.
(8) "Tax allocation revenues" means those tax revenues derived from
the receipt of excess excise taxes under section 5 of this act and
distributed to finance public improvements.
(9) "Taxing authority" means a governmental entity that imposes a
sales or use tax under chapter 82.14 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within a proposed or approved benefit zone.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A local government may finance public
improvements using hospital benefit zone financing subject to the
following conditions:
(1) The local government adopts an ordinance designating a benefit
zone within its boundaries and specifying the public improvements
proposed to be financed in whole or in part with the use of hospital
benefit zone financing;
(2) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in
part using hospital benefit zone financing are expected both to
encourage private development within the benefit zone and to support
the development of a hospital that has received a certificate of need;
(3) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the
benefit zone, as a result of the public improvements, will be
consistent with the county-wide planning policy adopted by the county
under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's comprehensive plan and
development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW; and
(4) The governing body of the local government finds that the
public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in part using
hospital benefit zone financing are reasonably likely to:
(a) Increase private investment within the benefit zone;
(b) Increase employment within the benefit zone; and
(c) Generate, over the period of time that the local sales and use
tax will be imposed under section 7 of this act, state and local sales
and use tax revenues that are equal to or greater than the respective
state and local contributions made under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Before adopting an ordinance creating
the benefit zone, a local government must:
(a) Obtain written agreement for the use of hospital benefit zone
financing to finance all or a portion of the costs of the designated
public improvements from any taxing authority that imposes a sales or
use tax under chapter 82.14 RCW within the benefit zone if the taxing
authority chooses to participate in the public improvements to the
extent of providing limited funding under hospital benefit zone
financing authorized under this chapter. The agreement must be
authorized by the governing body of such participating taxing
authorities; and
(b) Hold a public hearing on the proposed financing of the public
improvement in whole or in part with hospital benefit zone financing.
(i) Notice of the public hearing must be published in a legal
newspaper of general circulation within the proposed benefit zone at
least ten days before the public hearing and posted in at least six
conspicuous public places located in the proposed benefit zone.
(ii) Notices must describe the contemplated public improvements,
estimate the costs of the public improvements, describe the portion of
the costs of the public improvements to be borne by hospital benefit
zone financing, describe any other sources of revenue to finance the
public improvements, describe the boundaries of the proposed benefit
zone, and estimate the period during which hospital benefit zone
financing is contemplated to be used. The public hearing may be held
by either the governing body of the local government, or a committee of
the governing body that includes at least a majority of the whole
governing body.
(2) In order to create a benefit zone, a local government must
adopt an ordinance establishing the benefit zone that:
(a) Describes the public improvements;
(b) Describes the boundaries of the benefit zone;
(c) Estimates the cost of the public improvements and the portion
of these costs to be financed by hospital benefit zone financing;
(d) Estimates the time during which excess excise taxes are to be
used to finance public improvement costs associated with the public
improvements financed in whole or in part by hospital benefit zone
financing;
(e) Estimates the average amount of tax revenue to be received in
all fiscal years through the imposition of a sales and use tax under
section 7 of this act;
(f) Provides the date when the use of excess excise taxes will
commence; and
(g) Finds that the conditions of section 2 of this act are met.
(3) For purposes of this section, "fiscal year" means the year
beginning July 1st and ending the following June 30th.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A local government that adopts an ordinance
creating a benefit zone under this chapter shall, within ninety days of
adopting the ordinance:
(1) Publish notice in a legal newspaper of general circulation
within the benefit zone that describes the public improvement,
describes the boundaries of the benefit zone, and identifies the
location and times where the ordinance and other public information
concerning the public improvement may be inspected; and
(2) Deliver a certified copy of the ordinance to the county
treasurer, the county assessor, the department of revenue, and the
governing body of each participating taxing authority within which the
benefit zone is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A local government that creates a
benefit zone and has received approval from the department under
section 9 of this act to impose the local option sales and use tax
authorized in section 7 of this act may use annually any excess excise
taxes received by it from taxable activity within the benefit zone to
finance public improvement costs associated with the public
improvements financed in whole or in part by hospital benefit zone
financing. The use of excess excise taxes must cease when tax
allocation revenues are no longer necessary or obligated to pay the
costs of the public improvements. Any participating taxing authority
is authorized to allocate excess excise taxes to the local government
as long as the local government has received approval from the
department under section 9 of this act to impose the local option sales
and use tax authorized in section 7 of this act. The legislature
declares that it is a proper purpose of a local government or
participating taxing authority to allocate excess excise taxes for
purposes of financing public improvements under this chapter.
(2) A local government shall provide the department accurate
information describing the geographical boundaries of the benefit zone
at least seventy-five days before the effective date of the ordinance
creating the benefit zone. The local government shall ensure that the
boundary information provided to the department is kept current.
(3) The department shall provide the necessary information to
calculate excess excise taxes to each local government that has
provided boundary information to the department as provided in this
section and that has received approval from the department under
section 9 of this act to impose the local option sales and use tax
authorized in section 7 of this act.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Base year" means the calendar year immediately following the
creation of a benefit zone.
(b) "Excess excise taxes" means the amount of excise taxes received
by the local government during the measurement year from taxable
activity within the benefit zone over and above the amount of excise
taxes received by the local government during the base year from
taxable activity within the benefit zone. However, if a local
government creates the benefit zone and reasonably determines that no
activity subject to tax under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred in
the twelve months immediately preceding the creation of the benefit
zone within the boundaries of the area that became the benefit zone,
"excess excise taxes" means the entire amount of excise taxes received
by the local government during a calendar year period beginning with
the calendar year immediately following the creation of the benefit
zone and continuing with each measurement year thereafter.
(c) "Excise taxes" means local retail sales and use taxes
authorized in RCW 82.14.030.
(d) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure the amount of excess
excise taxes required to be used to finance public improvement costs
associated with public improvements financed in whole or in part by
hospital benefit zone financing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A local government may issue revenue
bonds to fund public improvements, or portions of public improvements,
that are located within a benefit zone and that it is authorized to
provide or operate. Whenever revenue bonds are to be issued, the
legislative authority of the local government shall create or have
created a special fund or funds from which, along with any reserves
created pursuant to RCW 39.44.140, the principal and interest on these
revenue bonds shall exclusively be payable. The legislative authority
of the local government may obligate the local government to set aside
and pay into the special fund or funds a fixed proportion or a fixed
amount of the revenues obtained from within the benefit zone of the
development, construction, operation, and maintenance of businesses
supported by the public improvements that are funded by the revenue
bonds. This amount or proportion is a lien and charge against these
revenues, subject only to operating and maintenance expenses. The
local government shall have due regard for the cost of operation and
maintenance of the public improvements that are funded by the revenue
bonds, and shall not set aside into the special fund or funds a greater
amount or proportion of the revenues that in its judgment will be
available over and above the cost of maintenance and operation and the
amount or proportion, if any, of the revenue previously pledged. The
local government may also provide that revenue bonds payable out of the
same source or sources of revenue may later be issued on a parity with
any revenue bonds being issued and sold.
(2) Revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section are not an
indebtedness of the local government issuing the bonds, and the
interest and principal on the bonds shall only be payable from the
revenues lawfully pledged to meet the principal and interest
requirements and any reserves created pursuant to RCW 39.44.140. The
owner or bearer of a revenue bond or any interest coupon issued
pursuant to this section shall not have any claim against the local
government arising from the bond or coupon except for payment from the
revenues lawfully pledged to meet the principal and interest
requirements and any reserves created pursuant to RCW 39.44.140. The
substance of the limitations included in this subsection shall be
plainly printed, written, or engraved on each bond issued pursuant to
this section.
(3) Revenue bonds with a maturity in excess of thirty years shall
not be issued. The legislative authority of the local government shall
by resolution determine for each revenue bond issue the amount, date,
form, terms, conditions, denominations, maximum fixed or variable
interest rate or rates, maturity or maturities, redemption rights,
registration privileges, manner of execution, manner of sale, callable
provisions, if any, and covenants including the refunding of existing
revenue bonds. Facsimile signatures may be used on the bonds and any
coupons. Refunding revenue bonds may be issued in the same manner as
revenue bonds are issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city, town, or county that creates a benefit zone and
finances public improvements pursuant to chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1
through 6 of this act) may impose a sales and use tax in accordance
with the terms of this chapter and subject to the criteria set forth in
this section. Except as provided in this section, the tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from
those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing
jurisdiction of the city, town, or county. The rate of tax shall not
exceed the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1) in the case of a sales tax
or the rate provided in RCW 82.12.020(5) in the case of a use tax, less
the aggregate rates of any other taxes imposed on the same events that
are credited against the state taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The
department shall perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the
city, town, or county at no cost to the city, town, or county.
(3) No tax may be imposed under this section before July 1, 2007.
Before imposing a tax under this section, the city, town, or county
shall first have received tax allocation revenues derived from excess
excise taxes during the preceding calendar year. The tax imposed under
this section shall expire when the bonds issued under the authority of
chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 6 of this act) are retired, but
not more than thirty years after the tax is first imposed.
(4) An ordinance adopted by the legislative authority of a city,
town, or county imposing a tax under this section shall provide that:
(a) The tax shall first be imposed on the first day of a fiscal
year;
(b) The amount of tax received by the local government in any
fiscal year shall not exceed the amount of the state contribution;
(c) The tax shall cease to be imposed for the remainder of any
fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax receipts totals the amount of the state
contribution;
(ii) The amount of tax receipts totals the amount of "local public
sources," as that term is used in section 8 of this act, dedicated in
the previous calendar year to finance public improvements authorized
under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 6 of this act); or
(iii) The amount of revenue from taxes imposed under this section
by all cities, towns, and counties totals the annual state credit limit
as provided in section 9(3) of this act;
(d) The tax shall be reimposed, should it cease to be imposed for
any of the reasons provided in (c) of this subsection, at the beginning
of the next fiscal year, subject to the restrictions in this section;
and
(e) Any revenue generated by the tax in excess of the amounts
specified in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection shall belong to the
state of Washington.
(5) If both a county and a city or town impose a tax under this
section, the tax imposed by the city, town, or county shall be credited
as follows:
(a) If the county has created a benefit zone before the city or
town, the tax imposed by the county shall be credited against the tax
imposed by the city or town, the purpose of such credit is to give
priority to the county tax; and
(b) If the city or town has created a benefit zone before the
county, the tax imposed by the city or town shall be credited against
the tax imposed by the county, the purpose of such credit is to give
priority to the city or town tax.
(6) The department shall determine the amount of tax receipts
attributable to each city, town, and county imposing a sales and use
tax under this section and shall advise a city, town, or county when it
must cease imposing the tax for the remainder of the fiscal year as
provided in subsection (4)(c) of this section. Determinations by the
department of the amount of taxes attributable to a city, town, or
county are final and shall not be used to challenge the validity of any
tax imposed under this section. The department shall remit any tax
receipts in excess of the amounts specified in subsection (4)(a), (b),
and (c) of this section to the state treasurer who shall deposit the
moneys in the general fund.
(7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Base year" means the calendar year immediately following the
creation of a benefit zone.
(b) "Benefit zone" has the same meaning as provided in section 1 of
this act.
(c) "Excess excise taxes" has the same meaning as provided in
section 5 of this act.
(d) "Excess state excise taxes" means the amount of excise taxes
received by the state during the measurement year from taxable activity
within the benefit zone over and above the amount of excise taxes
received by the state during the base year from taxable activity within
the benefit zone. However, if a local government creates the benefit
zone and reasonably determines that no activity subject to tax under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred in the twelve months immediately
preceding the creation of the benefit zone within the boundaries of the
area that became the benefit zone, "excess state excise taxes" means
the entire amount of excise taxes received by the state during a
calendar year period beginning with the calendar year immediately
following the creation of the benefit zone and continuing with each
measurement year thereafter.
(e) "Excise taxes" means the state retail sales and use taxes
imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
(f) "Fiscal year" has the same meaning as provided in section 3 of
this act.
(g) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure the amount of excess
excise taxes required to be used to finance public improvement costs
associated with public improvements financed in whole or in part by
hospital benefit zone financing.
(h) "State contribution" means the lesser of two million dollars or
an amount equal to excess state excise taxes received by the state
during the preceding calendar year.
(i) "Tax allocation revenues" has the same meaning as provided in
section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Moneys collected from the taxes imposed under section 7 of this
act shall be used only for the purpose of principal and interest
payments on bonds issued under the authority of section 6 of this act
and must be matched with an amount from local public sources dedicated
through December 31st of the previous calendar year to finance public
improvements authorized under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 6
of this act). Such local public sources include but are not limited to
private monetary contributions and tax allocation revenues. Local
public sources are dedicated to finance public improvements if they are
actually expended to pay public improvement costs or are required by
law or an agreement to be used exclusively to pay public improvement
costs.
(2) A local government shall inform the department by the first day
of March of the amount of local public sources dedicated in the
preceding calendar year to finance public improvements authorized under
chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 6 of this act).
(3) If a local government fails to comply with subsection (2) of
this section, no tax may be imposed under section 7 of this act in the
subsequent fiscal year.
(4) A local government shall provide a report to the department by
March 1st of each year. The report shall contain the following
information:
(a) The amount of tax allocation revenues, taxes under section 7 of
this act, and local public sources received by the local government
during the preceding calendar year, and a summary of how these revenues
were expended;
(b) The names of any businesses locating within the benefit zone as
a result of the public improvements undertaken by the local government
and financed in whole or in part with hospital benefit zone financing;
(c) The total number of permanent jobs created as a result of the
public improvements undertaken by the local government and financed in
whole or in part with hospital benefit zone financing; and
(d) The average wages and benefits received by all employees of
businesses locating within the benefit zone as a result of the public
improvements undertaken by the local government and financed in whole
or in part with hospital benefit zone financing.
(5) The department shall make a report available to the public and
the legislature by June 1st of each year. The report shall include a
list of public improvements undertaken by local governments and
financed in whole or in part with hospital benefit zone financing, and
it shall also include a summary of the information provided to the
department by local governments under subsection (4) of this section.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Public improvement costs" has the same meaning as in section
1 of this act.
(b) "Tax allocation revenues" has the same meaning as provided in
section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As a condition to imposing a sales and use tax under section 7
of this act, a city, town, or county must apply to the department at
least seventy-five days before the effective date of any such tax. The
application shall be in a form and manner prescribed by the department
and shall include but is not limited to information establishing that
the applicant is eligible to impose such a tax, the anticipated
effective date for imposing the tax, the estimated number of years that
the tax will be imposed, and the estimated amount of tax revenue to be
received in each fiscal year that the tax will be imposed. For
purposes of this section, "fiscal year" means the year beginning July
1st and ending the following June 30th. The department shall make
available forms to be used for this purpose. As part of the
application, a city, town, or county must provide to the department a
copy of the ordinance creating the benefit zone as required in section
4 of this act. The department shall rule on completed applications
within sixty days of receipt. The department may begin accepting and
approving applications August 1, 2006. No new applications shall be
considered by the department after the thirtieth day of September of
the third year following the year in which the first application was
received by the department.
(2) The authority to impose the local option sales and use taxes
under section 7 of this act is on a first-come basis. Priority for
collecting the taxes authorized under section 7 of this act among
approved applicants shall be based on the date that the approved
application was received by the department. As a part of the approval
of applications under this section, the department shall approve the
amount of tax under section 7 of this act that an applicant may impose.
The amount of tax approved by the department shall not exceed the
lesser of two million dollars or the average amount of tax revenue that
the applicant estimates that it will receive in all fiscal years
through the imposition of a sales and use tax under section 7 of this
act. A city, town, or county shall not receive, in any fiscal year,
more revenues from taxes imposed under section 7 of this act than the
amount approved by the department. The department shall not approve
the receipt of more credit against the state sales and use tax than is
authorized under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) No more than two million dollars of credit against the state
sales and use tax may be received by all cities, towns, and counties
imposing a tax under section 7 of this act.
(4) The credit against the state sales and use tax shall be
available to any city, town, or county imposing a tax under section 7
of this act only as long as the city, town, or county has outstanding
indebtedness under section 7 of this act.
(5) The department may adopt any rules under chapter 34.05 RCW it
considers necessary for the administration of chapter 39.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 6 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---