BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.32.045 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 13 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, payments of the
taxes imposed under chapters 82.04, 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, and 82.16 RCW,
along with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department,
are due monthly within ((twenty)) twenty-five days after the end of the
month in which the taxable activities occur.
(2) The department of revenue may relieve any taxpayer or class of
taxpayers from the obligation of remitting monthly and may require the
return to cover other longer reporting periods, but in no event may
returns be filed for a period greater than one year. For these
taxpayers, tax payments are due on or before the last day of the month
next succeeding the end of the period covered by the return.
(3) The department of revenue may also require verified annual
returns from any taxpayer, setting forth such additional information as
it may deem necessary to correctly determine tax liability.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
department may relieve any person of the requirement to file returns if
the following conditions are met:
(a) The person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or
gross income of the business, from all business activities taxable
under chapter 82.04 RCW, is less than twenty-eight thousand dollars per
year;
(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities
taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twenty-four thousand
dollars per year; and
(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department
of revenue any other tax or fee which the department is authorized to
collect.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.23B.020 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 13 s 9 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) An oil spill response tax is imposed on the privilege of
receiving crude oil or petroleum products at a marine terminal within
this state from a waterborne vessel or barge operating on the navigable
waters of this state. The tax imposed in this section is levied upon
the owner of the crude oil or petroleum products immediately after
receipt of the same into the storage tanks of a marine terminal from a
waterborne vessel or barge at the rate of one cent per barrel of crude
oil or petroleum product received.
(2) In addition to the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this
section, an oil spill administration tax is imposed on the privilege of
receiving crude oil or petroleum products at a marine terminal within
this state from a waterborne vessel or barge operating on the navigable
waters of this state. The tax imposed in this section is levied upon
the owner of the crude oil or petroleum products immediately after
receipt of the same into the storage tanks of a marine terminal from a
waterborne vessel or barge at the rate of four cents per barrel of
crude oil or petroleum product.
(3) The taxes imposed by this chapter shall be collected by the
marine terminal operator from the taxpayer. If any person charged with
collecting the taxes fails to bill the taxpayer for the taxes, or in
the alternative has not notified the taxpayer in writing of the
imposition of the taxes, or having collected the taxes, fails to pay
them to the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter,
whether such failure is the result of the person's own acts or the
result of acts or conditions beyond the person's control, he or she
shall, nevertheless, be personally liable to the state for the amount
of the taxes. Payment of the taxes by the owner to a marine terminal
operator shall relieve the owner from further liability for the taxes.
(4) Taxes collected under this chapter shall be held in trust until
paid to the department. Any person collecting the taxes who
appropriates or converts the taxes collected shall be guilty of a gross
misdemeanor if the money required to be collected is not available for
payment on the date payment is due. The taxes required by this chapter
to be collected shall be stated separately from other charges made by
the marine terminal operator in any invoice or other statement of
account provided to the taxpayer.
(5) If a taxpayer fails to pay the taxes imposed by this chapter to
the person charged with collection of the taxes and the person charged
with collection fails to pay the taxes to the department, the
department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the
taxpayer for collection of the taxes.
(6) The taxes shall be due from the marine terminal operator, along
with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department, within
((twenty)) twenty-five days after the end of the month in which the
taxable activity occurs.
(7) The amount of taxes, until paid by the taxpayer to the marine
terminal operator or to the department, shall constitute a debt from
the taxpayer to the marine terminal operator. Any person required to
collect the taxes under this chapter who, with intent to violate the
provisions of this chapter, fails or refuses to do so as required and
any taxpayer who refuses to pay any taxes due under this chapter, shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(8) Upon prior approval of the department, the taxpayer may pay the
taxes imposed by this chapter directly to the department. The
department shall give its approval for direct payment under this
section whenever it appears, in the department's judgment, that direct
payment will enhance the administration of the taxes imposed under this
chapter. The department shall provide by rule for the issuance of a
direct payment certificate to any taxpayer qualifying for direct
payment of the taxes. Good faith acceptance of a direct payment
certificate by a terminal operator shall relieve the marine terminal
operator from any liability for the collection or payment of the taxes
imposed under this chapter.
(9) All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this
section shall be deposited into the state oil spill response account.
All receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (2) of this section
shall be deposited into the oil spill prevention account.
(10) Within forty-five days after the end of each calendar quarter,
the office of financial management shall determine the balance of the
oil spill response account as of the last day of that calendar quarter.
Balance determinations by the office of financial management under this
section are final and shall not be used to challenge the validity of
any tax imposed under this chapter. The office of financial management
shall promptly notify the departments of revenue and ecology of the
account balance once a determination is made. For each subsequent
calendar quarter, the tax imposed by subsection (1) of this section
shall be imposed during the entire calendar quarter unless:
(a) Tax was imposed under subsection (1) of this section during the
immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent quarterly
balance is more than nine million dollars; or
(b) Tax was not imposed under subsection (1) of this section during
the immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent
quarterly balance is more than eight million dollars.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.27.060 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 13 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
The taxes levied by this chapter shall be due for payment monthly
and remittance therefor shall be made within ((twenty)) twenty-five
days after the end of the month in which the taxable activity occurs.
The taxpayer on or before the due date shall make out a signed return,
setting out such information as the department of revenue may require,
including the gross measure of the tax, any deductions, credits, or
exemptions claimed, and the amount of tax due for the preceding monthly
period, which amount shall be transmitted to the department along with
the return.
The department may relieve any taxpayer from the obligation of
filing a monthly return and may require the return to cover other
periods, but in no event may periodic returns be filed for a period
greater than one year. In such cases tax payments are due on or before
the last day of the month next succeeding the end of the period covered
by the return.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.32.085 and 1990 c 69 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Electronic funds transfer" means any transfer of funds, other
than a transaction originated by check, drafts, or similar paper
instrument, which is initiated through an electronic terminal,
telephonic instrument, or computer or magnetic tape so as to order,
instruct, or authorize a financial institution to debit or credit an
account.
((The electronic funds transfer is to be completed so that the
state receives collectible funds on or before the next banking day
following the due date.))
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the electronic
funds transfer is to be completed so that the state receives
collectible funds on or before the next banking day following the due
date.
(b) A remittance made using the automated clearinghouse debit
method will be deemed to be received on the due date if the electronic
funds transfer is initiated on or before 11:59 p.m. pacific time on the
due date with an effective payment date on or before the next banking
day following the due date.
(3)(a) The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement the
provisions of RCW 82.32.080 and this section. The rules shall include
but are not limited to: (((1))) (i) Coordinating the filing of tax
returns with payment by electronic funds transfer; (((2))) (ii) form
and content of electronic funds transfer; (((3))) (iii) voluntary use
of electronic funds transfer with permission of the department; (((4)))
(iv) use of commonly accepted means of electronic funds transfer;
(((5))) (v) means of crediting and recording proof of payment; and
(((6))) (vi) means of correcting errors in transmission.
(b) Any changes in the threshold of tax shall be implemented with
a separate rule-making procedure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The legislature recognizes the following
with respect to the payment of excise taxes to the department of
revenue by electronic funds transfer:
(a) Taxpayers required to pay their taxes by electronic funds
transfer must do so through the use of either the automated
clearinghouse debit method or automated clearinghouse credit method;
(b) For a remittance by electronic funds transfer to be considered
timely, the transfer must be completed so that the state receives
collectible funds on or before the next banking day following the due
date;
(c) For the state to receive collectible funds on or before the
next banking day following the due date, taxpayers using the automated
clearinghouse debit method must initiate the transfer before 5:00 p.m.
pacific time on the due date;
(d) The department of revenue receives information identifying the
precise date and time the electronic funds transfer is initiated when
a taxpayer uses the debit method; and
(e) The department receives information identifying only the date
that the state receives collectible funds when a taxpayer uses the
automated clearinghouse credit method.
(2) The legislature therefore finds that a remittance made using
the automated clearinghouse debit method should be deemed to be
received on the due date if the transfer is initiated on or before
11:59 p.m. pacific time on the due date with an effective payment date
on or before the next banking day following the due date. The
legislature further finds that because the department does not receive
information about when an electronic funds transfer is initiated when
a taxpayer uses the automated clearinghouse credit method, such
transfers must be completed so that the state receives collectible
funds on or before the next banking day following the due date.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.32.090 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 13 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) If payment of any tax due on a return to be filed by a taxpayer
is not received by the department of revenue by the due date, there
shall be assessed a penalty of five percent of the amount of the tax;
and if the tax is not received on or before the last day of the month
following the due date, there shall be assessed a total penalty of
fifteen percent of the amount of the tax under this subsection; and if
the tax is not received on or before the last day of the second month
following the due date, there shall be assessed a total penalty of
twenty-five percent of the amount of the tax under this subsection. No
penalty so added shall be less than five dollars.
(2) If ((the department of revenue determines that any tax is due,
there shall be assessed a penalty of five percent of the amount of the
tax determined by the department to be due; and if)) payment of any tax
determined by the department to be due is not received by the
department by the due date specified in the notice, or any extension
thereof, there shall be assessed a total penalty of fifteen percent of
the amount of the tax under this subsection; and if the tax is not
received on or before the thirtieth day following the due date
specified in the notice of tax due, or any extension thereof, there
shall be assessed a total penalty of twenty-five percent of the amount
of the tax under this subsection. No penalty so added shall be less
than five dollars.
(3) If a warrant be issued by the department of revenue for the
collection of taxes, increases, and penalties, there shall be added
thereto a penalty of ten percent of the amount of the tax, but not less
than ten dollars.
(4) If the department finds that a person has engaged in any
business or performed any act upon which a tax is imposed under this
title and that person has not obtained from the department a
registration certificate as required by RCW 82.32.030, the department
shall impose a penalty of five percent of the amount of tax due from
that person for the period that the person was not registered as
required by RCW 82.32.030. The department shall not impose the penalty
under this subsection (4) if a person who has engaged in business
taxable under this title without first having registered as required by
RCW 82.32.030, prior to any notification by the department of the need
to register, obtains a registration certificate from the department.
(5) If the department finds that all or any part of a deficiency
resulted from the disregard of specific written instructions as to
reporting or tax liabilities, the department shall add a penalty of ten
percent of the amount of the additional tax found due because of the
failure to follow the instructions. A taxpayer disregards specific
written instructions when the department of revenue has informed the
taxpayer in writing of the taxpayer's tax obligations and the taxpayer
fails to act in accordance with those instructions unless the
department has not issued final instructions because the matter is
under appeal pursuant to this chapter or departmental regulations. The
department shall not assess the penalty under this section upon any
taxpayer who has made a good faith effort to comply with the specific
written instructions provided by the department to that taxpayer.
Specific written instructions may be given as a part of a tax
assessment, audit, determination, or closing agreement, provided that
such specific written instructions shall apply only to the taxpayer
addressed or referenced on such documents. Any specific written
instructions by the department of revenue shall be clearly identified
as such and shall inform the taxpayer that failure to follow the
instructions may subject the taxpayer to the penalties imposed by this
subsection.
(6) If the department finds that all or any part of the deficiency
resulted from an intent to evade the tax payable hereunder, a further
penalty of fifty percent of the additional tax found to be due shall be
added.
(7) The penalties imposed under subsections (1) through (4) of this
section can each be imposed on the same tax found to be due. This
subsection does not prohibit or restrict the application of other
penalties authorized by law.
(8) The department of revenue may not impose both the evasion
penalty and the penalty for disregarding specific written instructions
on the same tax found to be due.
(9) For the purposes of this section, "return" means any document
a person is required by the state of Washington to file to satisfy or
establish a tax or fee obligation that is administered or collected by
the department of revenue, and that has a statutorily defined due date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Sections 1 through 3 of this act apply
to returns due after July 31, 2006.
(2) Section 4 of this act applies to payments due after July 31,
2006.
(3) Section 6 of this act only applies to assessments originally
issued after June 30, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act does not affect any existing right
acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the sections amended
in this act or under any rule or order adopted under those sections,
nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under those sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Sections 1 through 4 of this act take
effect August 1, 2006.
(2) Sections 6 and 7 of this act take effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---