BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
INTENT AND DEFINITIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 INTENT. The legislature recognizes that
the state as a whole benefits from investment in public infrastructure
because it promotes community and economic development. Public
investment stimulates business activity and helps create jobs;
stimulates the redevelopment of brownfields and blighted areas in the
inner city; lowers the cost of housing; and promotes efficient land
use. The legislature finds that these activities generate revenue for
the state and that it is in the public interest to invest in these
projects through a credit against the state sales and use tax and an
allocation of property tax revenue to those sponsoring local
governments that can demonstrate the expected returns to the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Annual state contribution limit" means five million dollars
statewide per fiscal year.
(2) "Assessed value" means the valuation of taxable real property
as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(3) "Base year" means the first calendar year following the
creation of a revenue development area.
(4) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board under
chapter 43.160 RCW.
(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(6) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st
and ending the following June 30th.
(7) "Local excise taxes" means local revenues derived from the
imposition of sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030 at the
tax rate that was in effect at the time the revenue development area
was created.
(8) "Local excise tax allocation revenue" means the amount of local
excise taxes received by the local government during the measurement
year from taxable activity within the revenue development area over and
above the amount of local excise taxes received by the local government
during the base year from taxable activity within the revenue
development area, except that:
(a) If a sponsoring local government creates a revenue development
area and reasonably determines that no activity subject to tax under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred in the twelve months immediately
preceding the creation of the revenue development area within the
boundaries of the area that became the revenue development area, "local
excise tax allocation revenue" means the entire amount of local excise
taxes received by the sponsoring local government during a calendar
year period beginning with the calendar year immediately following the
creation of the revenue development area and continuing with each
measurement year thereafter; and
(b) For revenue development areas created in calendar year 2006
that do not meet the requirements in (a) of this subsection, "local
excise tax allocation revenue" means the amount of local excise taxes
received by the sponsoring local government during the measurement year
from taxable activity within the revenue development area over and
above an amount of local excise taxes received by the sponsoring local
government during the 2007 base year adjusted by the department for any
estimated impacts from retail sales and use tax sourcing changes
effective July 1, 2007. The amount of base year adjustment determined
by the department is final.
(9) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port district,
and for the purpose of this chapter any federally recognized Indian
tribe.
(10) "Local infrastructure financing" means the use of revenues
received from local excise tax allocation revenues, local property tax
allocation revenues, dedicated revenues from local public sources, and
revenues received from the local option sales and use tax authorized in
section 202 of this act to pay the principal and interest on bonds
authorized under section 501 of this act.
(11) "Local property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the receipt of regular property taxes levied on
the property tax allocation revenue value and used for local
infrastructure financing.
(12) "Local public sources" means federal and private monetary
contributions, and amounts of local excise tax allocation revenues
dedicated by participating local governments and local property tax
allocation revenues dedicated by participating taxing districts.
(13) "Low-income housing" means residential housing for persons or
families who lack the amount of income which is necessary to enable
them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe, and
sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding.
(14) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure state and local excise tax
allocation revenues.
(15) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(16) "Participating local government" means a local government with
the revenue development area within its geographic boundaries that has
entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring local government to
allow the use of all or some of its local excise tax allocation
revenues or dedicated revenues from local public sources for local
infrastructure financing.
(17) "Participating taxing district" means any taxing district
levying regular property taxes on real property within a revenue
development area, where a sponsoring local government has obtained
written agreement for the use of local infrastructure financing to
finance all or a portion of the costs of designated public improvements
as provided in section 205 of this act.
(18) "Property tax allocation revenue value" means seventy-five
percent of any increase in the assessed value of real property in a
revenue development area due to the placement of new construction and
improvements to property on the assessment rolls after the revenue
development area is created, where the new construction or improvements
occur entirely after the revenue development area is created.
"Property tax allocation revenue value" does not include any increase
in the assessed value of real property representing new construction
and improvements to property occurring after their initial placement on
the assessment rolls, except that for new construction which represents
entire buildings, allocation revenue value includes seventy-five
percent of any increase in the assessed value of such new construction
in the years following its initial placement on the assessment rolls.
There is no property tax allocation revenue value if the assessed value
of real property in a revenue development area has not increased due to
new construction and improvements to property occurring after the
revenue development area is created.
(19) "Property taxing district" means a government entity that
levies or has levied for it regular property taxes upon real property
located within a proposed or approved revenue development area.
(20) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the revenue development area
that include:
(i) Street, bridge, and road construction and maintenance;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;
(iii) Sidewalks, traffic controls, and streetlights;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas; and
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems;
(b) Expenditures for facilities and improvements that support
affordable housing as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
(21) "Public improvement costs" means the cost of: (a) Design,
planning, acquisition including land acquisition, site preparation
including land clearing, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
improvement, and installation of public improvements; (b) demolishing,
relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of
public improvements; (c) the local government's portion of relocating
utilities as a result of public improvements; (d) financing public
improvements, including interest during construction, legal and other
professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs
on general indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any
necessary reserves for general indebtedness; (e) assessments incurred
in revaluing real property for the purpose of determining the property
tax allocation revenue base value that are in excess of costs incurred
by the assessor in accordance with the revaluation plan under chapter
84.41 RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and complying with
this chapter and other applicable law; and (f) administrative expenses
and feasibility studies reasonably necessary and related to these
costs, including related costs that may have been incurred before
adoption of the ordinance authorizing the public improvements and the
use of local infrastructure financing to fund the costs of the public
improvements.
(22) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as
defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied by
public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making
required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness;
(b) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of the
common schools under RCW 84.52.065; and (c) regular property taxes
authorized by RCW 84.55.050 that are limited to a specific purpose.
"Regular property taxes" do not include excess property tax levies that
are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and senior taxing
districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.
(23) "Property tax allocation revenue base value" means the
assessed value of real property located within a revenue development
area for taxes levied in the year in which the revenue development area
is created for collection in the following year, plus one hundred
percent of any increase in the assessed value of real property located
within a revenue development area that is placed on the assessment
rolls after the revenue development area is created, less the property
tax allocation revenue value.
(24) "Relocating a business" means the closing of a business and
the reopening of that business, or the opening of a new business that
engages in the same activities as the previous business, in a different
location within a one-year period, when an individual or entity has an
ownership interest in the business at the time of closure and at the
time of opening or reopening. "Relocating a business" does not include
the closing and reopening of a business in a new location where the
business has been acquired and is under entirely new ownership at the
new location, or the closing and reopening of a business in a new
location as a result of the exercise of the power of eminent domain.
(25) "Revenue development area" means the geographic area created
by a sponsoring local government from which local tax allocation
revenues are derived for local infrastructure financing.
(26) "Small business" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
19.85.020.
(27) "Sponsoring local government" means a city, town, or county,
and for the purpose of this chapter a federally recognized Indian tribe
or any combination thereof, that creates a revenue development area and
applies to the board to use local infrastructure financing.
(28) "State contribution" means the lesser of one million dollars
or an amount equal to:
(a) The state excise tax allocation revenue and state property tax
allocation revenue received by the state during the preceding calendar
year;
(b) The amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, local
property tax allocation revenues, and revenues from local public
sources that are dedicated by a sponsoring local government in the
preceding calendar year to the payment of principal and interest on
bonds issued under section 501 of this act; or
(c) The amount of project award granted by the board in the notice
of approval to use local infrastructure financing under section 202 of
this act.
(29) "State excise taxes" means revenues derived from state retail
sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, less the amount
of tax distributions from all taxes imposed on the same taxable events
that are credited against the state taxes under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW.
(30) "State excise tax allocation revenue" means the amount of
state excise taxes received by the state during the measurement year
from taxable activity within the revenue development area over and
above the amount of state excise taxes received by the state during the
base year from taxable activity within the revenue development area,
except that:
(a) If a sponsoring local government creates a revenue development
area and reasonably determines that no activity subject to tax under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred in the twelve months immediately
preceding the creation of the revenue development area within the
boundaries of the area that became the revenue development area, "state
excise tax allocation revenue" means the entire amount of state excise
taxes received by the state during a calendar year period beginning
with the calendar year immediately following the creation of the
revenue development area and continuing with each measurement year
thereafter; and
(b) For revenue development areas created in calendar year 2006
that do not meet the requirements in (a) of this subsection, "local
excise tax allocation revenue" means the amount of state excise taxes
received by the state during the measurement year from taxable activity
within the revenue development area over and above an amount of state
excise taxes received by the state during the 2007 base year adjusted
by the department for any estimated impacts from retail sales and use
tax sourcing changes effective July 1, 2007. The amount of base year
adjustment determined by the department is final.
(31) "State property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the imposition of property taxes levied by the
state for the support of common schools under RCW 84.52.065 on the
property tax allocation revenue value.
(32) "Taxing authority" means a governmental entity that imposes a
sales or use tax under chapter 82.14 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within a proposed or approved revenue development area.
(33) "Urban growth area" has the same meaning as provided in
chapter 36.70A RCW.

PART II
LOCAL INFRASTRUCTURE FINANCING TOOL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 CREATION OF THE LOCAL INFRASTRUCTURE
FINANCING TOOL PROGRAM. The local infrastructure financing tool
program is created to assist local governments in financing authorized
public infrastructure projects designed to promote economic development
in the jurisdiction. The local infrastructure financing tool program
is not created to enable existing Washington-based businesses from
outside a revenue development area to relocate into a revenue
development area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 LOCAL INFRASTRUCTURE FINANCING TOOL
PROGRAM APPLICATION. (1) Prior to applying to the board to use local
infrastructure financing, a sponsoring local government shall:
(a) Designate a revenue development area within the limitations in
section 203 of this act;
(b) Certify that the conditions in section 204 of this act are met;
(c) Complete the process in section 205 of this act;
(d) Provide public notice as required in section 207 of this act;
and
(e) Pass an ordinance adopting the revenue development area as
required in section 206 of this act.
(2) As a condition to imposing a sales and use tax under section
401 of this act, a city, town, or county must apply to the board at
least one hundred fifty days before the effective date of any such tax.
The application shall be in a form and manner prescribed by the board
and shall include, but is not limited to, information establishing that
the applicant is eligible to impose such a tax, the anticipated
effective date for imposing the tax, the estimated number of years that
the tax will be imposed, and the estimated amount of tax revenue to be
received in each fiscal year that the tax will be imposed. The board
shall make available forms to be used for this purpose. As part of the
application, a city, town, or county must provide to the board a copy
of the ordinance creating the revenue development area as required in
section 206 of this act. The board shall rule on completed
applications within sixty days of receipt. The board may begin
accepting and approving applications August 1, 2006. No new
applications shall be considered by the board after the thirtieth day
of September of the third year following the year in which the first
application was received by the board.
(3) The board shall establish a competitive process to prioritize
applications and shall approve any tax that may be imposed under
section 401 of this act. The board shall consult with the department
of revenue in approving a proposed tax.
(4) The board shall apply the following criteria for evaluation and
ranking of applications:
(a) The relative benefits provided to the community by the proposed
economic or community development, including employment;
(b) The present level of economic activity in the community and the
existing local financial capacity to increase economic activity in the
community;
(c) The rate of return of the state's investment, that includes the
expected increase in state and local tax revenues associated with the
project;
(d) The lack of another timely source of funding available to
finance the project which would likely prevent the proposed community
or economic development, absent the financing available under this act;
(e) The ability of the project to improve the viability of existing
business entities in the project area;
(f) Whether or not the project is a partnership of multiple
jurisdictions;
(g) Demonstration that the requested assistance will directly
stimulate community and economic development by facilitating the
creation of new jobs or the retention of existing jobs; and
(h) The availability of existing assets that applicants may apply
to projects.
(5)(a) A proposed tax may not be approved unless the applicant has
entered into or expects to enter into a contract with a private
developer relating to private investment that will result in the
creation or retention of jobs upon completion of the project; and
(b) A proposed tax may not be approved if the expected development
will result in the relocation of jobs from another part of the state
into the revenue development area.
(6) As a part of the approval of applications under this section,
the board shall approve the project award, the amount of tax under
section 401 of this act, that an applicant may impose. The board shall
consult with the department in determining the amount. The amount of
tax approved by the board shall not exceed the lesser of one million
dollars or the average amount of tax revenue that the applicant
estimates that it will receive in all fiscal years through the
imposition of the sales and use tax under section 401 of this act. A
city, town, or county shall not receive, in any fiscal year, more
revenues from taxes imposed under section 401 of this act than the
amount approved by the board. The board shall not approve the receipt
of more credit against the state sales and use tax than is authorized
under subsection (7) of this section.
(7) No more than five million dollars of credit against the state
sales and use tax may be received by all cities, towns, and counties in
any fiscal year.
(8) The credit against the state sales and use tax shall be
available to any city, town, or county imposing a tax under section 401
of this act only as long as the city, town, or county has outstanding
indebtedness under section 501 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 LIMITATIONS ON REVENUE DEVELOPMENT AREAS.
The designation of a revenue development area is subject to the
following limitations:
(1) The taxable real property within the revenue development area
boundaries may not exceed one billion dollars in assessed value at the
time the revenue development area is designated;
(2) The average assessed value per square foot of taxable land
within the revenue development area boundaries may not exceed seventy
dollars at the time the revenue development area is designated;
(3) No more than one revenue development area may be created in a
county;
(4) A revenue development area is limited to contiguous tracts,
lots, pieces, or parcels of land without the creation of islands of
property not included in the revenue development area;
(5) The boundaries may not be drawn to purposely exclude parcels
where economic growth is unlikely to occur;
(6) The public improvements financed through local infrastructure
financing must be located in the revenue development area;
(7) A revenue development area cannot comprise an area containing
more than twenty-five percent of the total assessed value of the
taxable real property within the boundaries of the sponsoring local
government, including any cosponsoring local government, at the time
the revenue development area is designated; and
(8) The boundaries of the revenue development area shall not be
changed for the time period that local infrastructure financing is
used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 CONDITIONS. The use of local
infrastructure financing under this chapter is subject to the following
conditions:
(1) No funds may be used to finance, design, acquire, construct,
equip, operate, maintain, remodel, repair, or reequip public facilities
funded with taxes collected under RCW 82.14.048;
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection no funds may be
used for public improvements other than projects identified within the
capital facilities, utilities, housing, or transportation element of a
comprehensive plan required under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(b) Funds may be used for public improvements that are historical
preservation activities as defined in RCW 39.89.020;
(3) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in
part using local infrastructure financing are expected to encourage
private development within the revenue development area and to increase
the fair market value of real property within the revenue development
area;
(4) A sponsoring local government or participating local government
has entered or expects to enter into a contract with a private
developer relating to the development of private improvements within
the revenue development area or has received a letter of intent from a
private developer relating to the developer's plans for the development
of private improvements within the revenue development area;
(5) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the
revenue development area, as a result of the public improvements, will
be consistent with the countywide planning policy adopted by the county
under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's comprehensive plan and
development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(6) The governing body of the sponsoring local government must make
a finding that local infrastructure financing:
(a) Is not expected to be used for the purpose of relocating a
business from outside the revenue development area, but within this
state, into the revenue development area; and
(b) Will improve the viability of existing business entities within
the revenue development area;
(7) The governing body of the sponsoring local government finds
that the public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in
part using local infrastructure financing are reasonably likely to:
(a) Increase private residential and commercial investment within
the revenue development area;
(b) Increase employment within the revenue development area;
(c) Improve the viability of existing communities that are based on
mixed-use development within the revenue development area; and
(d) Generate, over the period of time that the local option sales
and use tax will be imposed under section 401 of this act, state excise
tax allocation revenues and state property tax allocation revenues
derived from the revenue development area that are equal to or greater
than the respective state contributions made under this chapter;
(8) The sponsoring local government may only use local
infrastructure financing in areas deemed in need of economic
development or redevelopment within boundaries of the sponsoring local
government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 PROCESS. Before adopting an ordinance
creating the revenue development area, a sponsoring local government
must:
(1) Obtain written agreement from any participating local
government and participating taxing district to use dedicated amounts
of revenues from local public sources, local excise tax allocation
revenues, and local property tax allocation revenues, in whole or in
part, for local infrastructure financing authorized under this chapter.
The agreement to opt into the local infrastructure financing public
improvement project must be authorized by the governing body of such
participating local government and participating taxing district;
(2) Estimate the impact of the revenue development area on small
business and low-income housing and develop a mitigation plan for the
impacted businesses and housing. In analyzing the impact of the
revenue development area, the sponsoring local government must develop:
(a) An inventory of existing low-income housing units, and
businesses and retail activity within the revenue development area;
(b) A reasonable estimate of the number of low-income housing
units, small businesses, and other commercial activity that may be
vulnerable to displacement within the revenue development area;
(c) A reasonable estimate of projected net job growth and net
housing growth caused by creation of the revenue development area when
compared to the existing jobs or housing balance for the area; and
(d) A reasonable estimate of the impact of net housing growth on
the current housing price mix.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 ORDINANCE. (1) To create a revenue
development area, a sponsoring local government must adopt an ordinance
establishing the revenue development area that:
(a) Describes the public improvements proposed to be made in the
revenue development area;
(b) Describes the boundaries of the revenue development area,
subject to the limitations in section 203 of this act;
(c) Estimates the cost of the proposed public improvements and the
portion of these costs to be financed by local infrastructure
financing;
(d) Estimates the time during which local excise tax allocation
revenues, local property tax allocation revenues, and revenues from
local public sources are to be used for local infrastructure financing;
(e) Provides the date when the use of local excise tax allocation
revenues and local property tax allocation revenues will commence; and
(f) Finds that the conditions in section 204 of this act are met
and the findings in section 205 of this act are complete.
(2) The sponsoring local government must hold a public hearing on
the proposed financing of the public improvements in whole or in part
with local infrastructure financing at least thirty days before passage
of the ordinance establishing the revenue development area. The public
hearing may be held by either the governing body of the sponsoring
local government, or by a committee of that governing body that
includes at least a majority of the whole governing body. The public
hearing is subject to the notice requirements in section 207 of this
act.
(3) The sponsoring local government shall deliver a certified copy
of the adopted ordinance to the county treasurer, the governing body of
each participating local government within which the revenue
development area is located, the board, and the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 NOTICE REQUIREMENTS. Prior to adopting
the ordinance creating the revenue development area and to meet the
requirements of section 501(1)(b) of this act, a sponsoring local
government must provide public notice.
(1) Notice of the public hearing must be published in a legal
newspaper of general circulation within the proposed revenue
development area at least ten days before the public hearing and posted
in at least six conspicuous public places located in the proposed
revenue development area.
(2) Notice must also be sent by United States mail to the property
owners, all identifiable community-based organizations with involvement
in the proposed revenue development area, and the business enterprises
located within the proposed revenue development area at least thirty
days prior to the hearing. In implementing provisions under this
chapter, the local governing body may also consult with community-based
groups, business organizations, including the local chamber of
commerce, and the office of minority and women's business enterprises
to assist with providing appropriate notice to business enterprises and
property owners for whom English is a second language.
(3) Notices must describe the contemplated public improvements,
estimate the public improvement costs, describe the portion of the
public improvement costs to be borne by local infrastructure financing,
describe any other sources of revenue to finance the public
improvements, describe the boundaries of the proposed revenue
development area, estimate the impact that the public improvements will
have on small businesses and low-income housing, and estimate the
period during which local infrastructure financing is contemplated to
be used.
(4) Notices must inform the public where to obtain the information
that shows how the limitations, conditions, and findings required in
sections 203 through 205 of this act are met.
(5) The sponsoring local government shall deliver a certified copy
of the proposed ordinance to the county treasurer, the governing body
of each participating local government within which the revenue
development area is located, the board, and the department.

PART III
TAX ALLOCATION REVENUES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 LOCAL EXCISE TAX ALLOCATION REVENUES. (1)
A sponsoring local government or participating local government may use
annually its local excise tax allocation revenues to finance public
improvements in the revenue development area financed in whole or in
part by local infrastructure financing. The use of local excise tax
allocation revenues dedicated by participating local governments must
cease when such allocation revenues are no longer necessary or
obligated to pay bonds issued to finance the public improvements in the
revenue development area. Any participating taxing authority is
authorized to dedicate local excise tax allocation revenues to the
sponsoring local government as authorized in section 205(1) of this
act.
(2) A sponsoring local government shall provide the board and the
department accurate information describing the geographical boundaries
of the revenue development area at the time of application. The
information shall be provided in an electronic format or manner as
prescribed by the department. The sponsoring local government shall
ensure that the boundary information provided to the board and the
department is kept current.
(3) In the event a city annexes a county area located within a
county-sponsored revenue development area, the city shall remit to the
county the portion of the local excise tax allocation revenue that the
county would have received had the area not been annexed to the county.
The city shall remit such revenues until such time as the bonds issued
under section 501 of this act are retired.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 LOCAL PROPERTY TAX ALLOCATION REVENUES.
(1) Commencing in the second calendar year following the passage of the
ordinance creating a revenue development area and authorizing the use
of local infrastructure financing, the county treasurer shall
distribute receipts from regular taxes imposed on real property located
in the revenue development area as follows:
(a) Each participating taxing district and the sponsoring local
government shall receive that portion of its regular property taxes
produced by the rate of tax levied by or for the taxing district on the
property tax allocation revenue base value for that local
infrastructure financing project in the taxing district, or upon the
total assessed value of real property in the taxing district, whichever
is smaller; and
(b) The sponsoring local government shall receive an additional
portion of the regular property taxes levied by it and by or for each
participating taxing district upon the property tax allocation revenue
value within the revenue development area. However, if there is no
property tax allocation revenue value, the sponsoring local government
shall not receive any additional regular property taxes under this
subsection (1)(b). The sponsoring local government may agree to
receive less than the full amount of the additional portion of regular
property taxes under this subsection (1)(b) as long as bond debt
service, reserve, and other bond covenant requirements are satisfied,
in which case the balance of these tax receipts shall be allocated to
the participating taxing districts that levied regular property taxes,
or have regular property taxes levied for them, in the revenue
development area for collection that year in proportion to their
regular tax levy rates for collection that year. The sponsoring local
government may request that the treasurer transfer this additional
portion of the property taxes to its designated agent. The portion of
the tax receipts distributed to the sponsoring local government or its
agent under this subsection (1)(b) may only be expended to finance
public improvement costs associated with the public improvements
financed in whole or in part by local infrastructure financing.
(2) The county assessor shall allocate any increase in the assessed
value of real property occurring in the revenue development area to the
property tax allocation revenue value and property tax allocation
revenue base value as appropriate. This section does not authorize
revaluations of real property by the assessor for property taxation
that are not made in accordance with the assessor's revaluation plan
under chapter 84.41 RCW or under other authorized revaluation
procedures.
(3) The apportionment of increases in assessed valuation in a
revenue development area, and the associated distribution to the
sponsoring local government of receipts from regular property taxes
that are imposed on the property tax allocation revenue value, must
cease when property tax allocation revenues are no longer necessary or
obligated to pay the costs of the public improvements. Any excess
local property tax allocation revenues derived from regular property
taxes and earnings on these tax allocation revenues, remaining at the
time the apportionment of tax receipts terminates, must be returned to
the county treasurer and distributed to the participating taxing
districts that imposed regular property taxes, or had regular property
taxes imposed for it, in the revenue development area for collection
that year, in proportion to the rates of their regular property tax
levies for collection that year.

PART IV
STATE CONTRIBUTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
SALES AND USE TAX. (1) A sponsoring local government that has been
approved by the board to use local infrastructure financing may impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter and
subject to the criteria set forth in this section. Except as provided
in this section, the tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by
law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the
state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any
taxable event within the taxing jurisdiction of the sponsoring local
government. The rate of tax shall not exceed the rate provided in RCW
82.08.020(1), less the aggregate rates of any other local sales and use
taxes imposed on the same taxable events that are credited against the
state sales and use taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
The rate of tax may be changed only on the first day of a fiscal year
as needed. Notice of rate changes must be provided to the department
on the first day of March to be effective on July 1st of the next
fiscal year.
(2) The tax authorized under subsection (1) of this section shall
be credited against the state taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or
82.12 RCW. The department shall perform the collection of such taxes
on behalf of the sponsoring local government at no cost to the
sponsoring local government and shall remit the taxes as provided in
RCW 82.14.060.
(3) No tax may be imposed under this section before July 1, 2008,
and before approval by the board under section 202 of this act. Before
imposing a tax under this section, the sponsoring local government
shall first have received both local excise tax allocation revenues and
local property tax allocation revenues during the preceding calendar
year. The tax imposed under this section shall expire when the bonds
issued under the authority of section 501 of this act are retired, but
not more than twenty-five years after the tax is first imposed.
(4) An ordinance adopted by the legislative authority of a
sponsoring local government imposing a tax under this section shall
provide that:
(a) The tax shall first be imposed on the first day of a fiscal
year;
(b) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government
in any fiscal year shall not exceed the amount of the state
contribution;
(c) The tax shall cease to be distributed for the remainder of any
fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government
equals the amount of the state contribution;
(ii) The amount of revenue from taxes imposed under this section by
all cities and counties equals the annual state contribution limit; or
(iii) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government
equals the amount of project award granted in the approval notice
described in section 202 of this act;
(d) Neither the local excise tax allocation revenues nor the local
property tax allocation revenues can be more than eighty percent of the
total local funds used to earn the state contribution;
(e) The tax shall be distributed again, should it cease to be
distributed for any of the reasons provided in (c) of this subsection,
at the beginning of the next fiscal year, subject to the restrictions
in this section; and
(f) Any revenue generated by the tax in excess of the amounts
specified in (c) of this subsection shall belong to the state of
Washington.
(5) If a county and city cosponsor a revenue development area, the
combined rates of tax shall not exceed the rate provided in RCW
82.08.020(1), less the aggregate rates of any other local sales and use
taxes imposed on the same taxable events that are credited against the
state sales and use taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
(6) The department shall determine the amount of tax receipts
distributed to each sponsoring local government imposing sales and use
tax under this section and shall advise a sponsoring local government
when tax distributions for the fiscal year equal the amount of state
contribution for that fiscal year as provided in subsection (8) of this
section. Determinations by the department of the amount of tax
distributions attributable to each sponsoring local government are
final and shall not be used to challenge the validity of any tax
imposed under this section. The department shall remit any tax
receipts in excess of the amounts specified in subsection (4)(c) of
this section to the state treasurer who shall deposit the money in the
general fund.
(7) If a sponsoring local government fails to comply with section
403 of this act, no tax may be distributed in the subsequent fiscal
year until such time as the sponsoring local government complies and
the department calculates the state contribution amount for such fiscal
year.
(8) Each year, the amount of taxes approved by the board for
distribution to a sponsoring local government in the next fiscal year
shall be the lesser of the amount of the project award in the approval
notice described in section 202 of this act or the amount equal to the
state contribution. The board shall consider information from reports
described in section 403 of this act when determining the amount of
state contributions for each fiscal year. A sponsoring local
government shall not receive, in any fiscal year, more revenues from
taxes imposed under the authority of this section than the amount
approved annually by the board. The board shall not approve the
receipt of more distributions of sales and use tax under this section
to a sponsoring local government than is authorized under subsection
(3) of this section.
(9) The amount of tax distributions received from taxes imposed
under the authority of this section by all sponsoring local governments
is limited annually to not more than five million dollars. The tax
distributions shall be available to the sponsoring local government
imposing a tax under this section only as long as the sponsoring local
government has outstanding indebtedness under section 501 of this act.
(10) The definitions in section 102 of this act apply to this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 USE OF FUNDS. Money collected from the
taxes imposed under section 401 of this act shall be used only for the
purpose of principal and interest payments on bonds issued under the
authority of section 501 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. (1) A sponsoring
local government shall provide a report to the board by March 1st of
each year. The report shall contain the following information:
(a) The amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, and local
property tax allocation revenues, taxes under section 401 of this act,
and revenues from local public sources received by the sponsoring local
government during the preceding calendar year that were dedicated to
pay the public improvements financed in whole or in part with local
infrastructure financing, and a summary of how these revenues were
expended;
(b) The names of any businesses locating within the revenue
development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by
the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with
local infrastructure financing;
(c) The total number of permanent jobs created in the revenue
development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by
the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with
local infrastructure financing;
(d) The average wages and benefits received by all employees of
businesses locating within the revenue development area as a result of
the public improvements undertaken by the sponsoring local government
and financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure financing;
and
(e) That the sponsoring local government is in compliance with
section 204 of this act.
(2) The board shall make a report available to the public and the
legislature by June 1st of each year. The report shall include a list
of public improvements undertaken by sponsoring local governments and
financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure financing and it
shall also include a summary of the information provided to the board
by sponsoring local governments under subsection (1) of this section.

PART V
BOND AUTHORIZATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 BOND ISSUANCE. (1) A sponsoring local
government that has designated a revenue development area and been
authorized the use of local infrastructure financing may incur general
indebtedness, and issue general obligation bonds, to finance the public
improvements and retire the indebtedness in whole or in part from tax
allocation revenues it receives, subject to the following requirements:
(a) The ordinance adopted by the sponsoring local government and
authorizing the use of local infrastructure financing indicates an
intent to incur this indebtedness and the maximum amount of this
indebtedness that is contemplated; and
(b) The local government includes this statement of the intent in
all notices required by section 206 of this act.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the general
indebtedness incurred under subsection (1) of this section may be
payable from other tax revenues, the full faith and credit of the local
government, and nontax income, revenues, fees, and rents from the
public improvements, as well as contributions, grants, and nontax money
available to the local government for payment of costs of the public
improvements or associated debt service on the general indebtedness.
(b) A local government that issues bonds under this section shall
not pledge any money received from the state of Washington for the
payment of such bonds, other than the local sales and use taxes imposed
under the authority of section 401 of this act and collected by the
department.
(3) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, a local government designating a revenue development area and
authorizing the use of local infrastructure financing may require the
nonpublic participant to provide adequate security to protect the
public investment in the public improvement within the revenue
development area.
(4) Bonds issued under this section shall be authorized by
ordinance of the local governing body and may be issued in one or more
series and shall bear such date or dates, be payable upon demand or
mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be
in such denomination or denominations, be in such form either coupon or
registered as provided in RCW 39.46.030, carry such conversion or
registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in
such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or
places, and be subject to such terms of redemption with or without
premium, be secured in such manner, and have such other
characteristics, as may be provided by such ordinance or trust
indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto.
(5) The local government may annually pay into a fund to be
established for the benefit of bonds issued under this section a fixed
proportion or a fixed amount of any local excise tax allocation
revenues and local property tax allocation revenues derived from
property or business activity within the revenue development area
containing the public improvements funded by the bonds, such payment to
continue until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full. The
local government may also annually pay into the fund established in
this section a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of any revenues
derived from taxes imposed under section 401 of this act, such payment
to continue until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full.
Revenues derived from taxes imposed under section 401 of this act are
subject to the use restriction in section 402 of this act.
(6) In case any of the public officials of the local government
whose signatures appear on any bonds or any coupons issued under this
chapter shall cease to be such officials before the delivery of such
bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for
all purposes, the same as if such officials had remained in office
until such delivery. Any provision of any law to the contrary
notwithstanding, any bonds issued under this chapter are fully
negotiable.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (4) through (6) of this section,
bonds issued under this section may be issued and sold in accordance
with chapter 39.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 USE OF TAX REVENUE FOR BOND REPAYMENT. A
sponsoring local government that issues bonds under section 501 of this
act to finance public improvements may pledge for the payment of such
bonds all or part of any local excise tax allocation revenues and all
or part of any local property tax allocation revenues dedicated by the
sponsoring local government, any participating taxing authority, or
participating taxing district. The local government may also pledge
all or part of any revenues derived from taxes imposed under section
401 of this act and held in connection with the public improvements.
All of such tax revenues are subject to the use restrictions in
sections 202 through 204 of this act, and the process requirements in
section 205(1) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 BONDS ISSUED NOT AN OBLIGATION OF THE
STATE OF WASHINGTON. The bonds issued by a sponsoring local government
under section 501 of this act to finance public improvements shall not
constitute an obligation of the state of Washington, either general or
special.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 GENERAL INDEBTEDNESS--SECURITY. (1) A
sponsoring local government designating a revenue development area and
authorizing the use of local infrastructure financing may incur general
indebtedness, and issue general obligation bonds, to finance the public
improvements and retire the indebtedness in whole or in part from local
excise tax allocation revenues and local property tax allocation
revenues it receives, subject to the following requirements:
(a) The ordinance adopted by the sponsoring local government
creating the revenue development area and authorizing the use of local
infrastructure financing indicates an intent to incur this indebtedness
and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is contemplated; and
(b) The sponsoring local government includes this statement of the
intent in all notices required by sections 204 and 205 of this act.
(2) The general indebtedness incurred under subsection (1) of this
section may be payable from other tax revenues, the full faith and
credit of the sponsoring local government, and nontax income, revenues,
fees, and rents from the public improvements, as well as contributions,
grants, and nontax money available to the sponsoring local government
for payment of costs of the public improvements or associated debt
service on the general indebtedness.
(3) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, a sponsoring local government designating a revenue
development area and authorizing the use of local infrastructure
financing may require the nonpublic participant to provide adequate
security to protect the public investment in the public improvement
within the revenue development area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 REVENUE BONDS. (1) A sponsoring local
government may issue revenue bonds to fund revenue-generating public
improvements, or portions of public improvements, that are located
within a revenue development area. Whenever revenue bonds are to be
issued, the legislative authority of the sponsoring local government
shall create or have created a special fund or funds from which, along
with any reserves created pursuant to RCW 39.44.140, the principal and
interest on these revenue bonds shall exclusively be payable. The
legislative authority of the sponsoring local government may obligate
the sponsoring local government to set aside and pay into the special
fund or funds a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of the revenues from
the public improvements that are funded by the revenue bonds. This
amount or proportion is a lien and charge against these revenues,
subject only to operating and maintenance expenses. The sponsoring
local government shall have due regard for the cost of operation and
maintenance of the public improvements that are funded by the revenue
bonds, and shall not set aside into the special fund or funds a greater
amount or proportion of the revenues that in its judgment will be
available over and above the cost of maintenance and operation and the
amount or proportion, if any, of the revenue previously pledged. The
sponsoring local government may also provide that revenue bonds payable
out of the same source or sources of revenue may later be issued on a
parity with any revenue bonds being issued and sold.
(2) Revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section are not an
indebtedness of the sponsoring local government issuing the bonds, and
the interest and principal on the bonds shall only be payable from the
revenues lawfully pledged to meet the principal and interest
requirements and any reserves created pursuant to RCW 39.44.140. The
owner or bearer of a revenue bond or any interest coupon issued
pursuant to this section shall not have any claim against the
sponsoring local government arising from the bond or coupon except for
payment from the revenues lawfully pledged to meet the principal and
interest requirements and any reserves created pursuant to RCW
39.44.140. The substance of the limitations included in this
subsection shall be plainly printed, written, or engraved on each bond
issued pursuant to this section.
(3) Revenue bonds with a maturity in excess of twenty-five years
shall not be issued. The legislative authority of the sponsoring local
government shall by resolution determine for each revenue bond issue
the amount, date, form, terms, conditions, denominations, maximum fixed
or variable interest rate or rates, maturity or maturities, redemption
rights, registration privileges, manner of execution, manner of sale,
callable provisions, if any, and covenants including the refunding of
existing revenue bonds. Facsimile signatures may be used on the bonds
and any coupons. Refunding revenue bonds may be issued in the same
manner as revenue bonds are issued.

PART VI
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE REPORTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW
COMMITTEE REPORTS. Beginning September 1, 2013, and continuing every
five years thereafter, the joint legislative audit and review committee
shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature.
The report shall, at a minimum, evaluate the effectiveness of the local
infrastructure financing tool program, including a project by project
review. The report shall include a comparison of the local
infrastructure financing revenues received to the incremental
improvements in assessed value of the real property located within the
revenue development area. The report that is due September 1, 2028,
should also include any recommendations regarding whether or not the
program should be expanded statewide and what impact the expansion
would have on economic development in Washington.

PART VII
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE EVALUATION. The
department of revenue shall evaluate and periodically report on the
implementation of the local infrastructure financing program to the
governor and legislature as the department deems appropriate and
recommend such amendments, changes in, and modifications of this act as
seem proper.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 CAPTIONS. Captions and part headings used
in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid,
the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 PORT DISTRICTS. Nothing in this act shall
be construed to give port districts the authority to impose a sales or
use tax under chapter 82.14 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 EFFECTIVE DATE. This act takes effect
July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 EXPIRATION DATE. This act expires June
30, 2039.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 NEW CHAPTER. Sections 101 through 302 and
402 through 601 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

--- END ---