BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.300 and 2005 c 274 s 410 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Records, maps, or other information identifying the location of
archaeological sites in order to avoid the looting or depredation of
such sites are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.
(2) Records, maps, and other information, acquired during watershed
analysis pursuant to the forests and fish report under RCW 76.09.370,
that identify the location of archaeological sites, historic sites,
artifacts, or the sites of traditional religious, ceremonial, or social
uses and activities of affected Indian tribes, are exempt from
disclosure under this chapter in order to prevent the looting or
depredation of such sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---