BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.34.040 and 1995 c 22 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Prior to its entry into force, an agreement made pursuant to this
chapter shall be filed with the county auditor or, alternatively,
listed by subject on a public agency's web site or other electronically
retrievable public source. In the event that an agreement entered into
pursuant to this chapter is between or among one or more public
agencies of this state and one or more public agencies of another state
or of the United States the agreement shall have the status of an
interstate compact, but in any case or controversy involving
performance or interpretation thereof or liability thereunder, the
public agencies party thereto shall be real parties in interest and the
state may maintain an action to recoup or otherwise make itself whole
for any damages or liability which it may incur by reason of being
joined as a party therein. Such action shall be maintainable against
any public agency or agencies whose default, failure of performance, or
other conduct caused or contributed to the incurring of damage or
liability by the state.

--- END ---