BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
The economic stability account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for extraordinary costs
to government, the costs of health care, education, and pensions, or
the costs resulting from emergencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---