BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable to plan 1, plan 2,
and plan 3" to read as follows:
(1) A member eligible to retire under RCW 41.40.180, 41.40.630, or
41.40.820 may, at the time of filing a written application for
retirement with the department, apply to the department to make a one-time purchase of up to five years of additional service credit.
(2) To purchase additional service credit under this section, a
member shall pay the actuarial equivalent value of the resulting
increase in the member's benefit.
(3) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member purchasing
additional service credit under this section may pay all or part of the
cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover, direct rollover, or
trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible retirement plan. The
department shall adopt rules to ensure that all lump sum payments,
rollovers, and transfers comply with the requirements of the internal
revenue code and regulations adopted by the internal revenue service.
The rules adopted by the department may condition the acceptance of a
rollover or transfer from another plan on the receipt of information
necessary to enable the department to determine the eligibility of any
transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment
under federal income tax law.
(4) Additional service credit purchased under this section is not
membership service and shall be used exclusively to provide the member
with a monthly annuity that is paid in addition to the member's
retirement allowance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable to plan 1, plan 2,
and plan 3" to read as follows:
(1) A member eligible to retire under RCW 41.32.480, 41.32.765, or
41.32.875 may, at the time of filing a written application for
retirement with the department, apply to the department to make a one-time purchase of up to five years of additional service credit.
(2) To purchase additional service credit under this section, a
member shall pay the actuarial equivalent value of the resulting
increase in the member's benefit.
(3) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member purchasing
additional service credit under this section may pay all or part of the
cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover, direct rollover, or
trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible retirement plan. The
department shall adopt rules to ensure that all lump sum payments,
rollovers, and transfers comply with the requirements of the internal
revenue code and regulations adopted by the internal revenue service.
The rules adopted by the department may condition the acceptance of a
rollover or transfer from another plan on the receipt of information
necessary to enable the department to determine the eligibility of any
transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment
under federal income tax law.
(4) Additional service credit purchased under this section is not
membership service and shall be used exclusively to provide the member
with a monthly annuity that is paid in addition to the member's
retirement allowance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW
under the subchapter heading "provisions applicable to plan 2 and plan
3" to read as follows:
(1) A member eligible to retire under RCW 41.35.420 or 41.35.680
may, at the time of filing a written application for retirement with
the department, apply to the department to make a one-time purchase of
up to five years of additional service credit.
(2) To purchase additional service credit under this section, a
member shall pay the actuarial equivalent value of the resulting
increase in the member's benefit.
(3) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member purchasing
additional service credit under this section may pay all or part of the
cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover, direct rollover, or
trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible retirement plan. The
department shall adopt rules to ensure that all lump sum payments,
rollovers, and transfers comply with the requirements of the internal
revenue code and regulations adopted by the internal revenue service.
The rules adopted by the department may condition the acceptance of a
rollover or transfer from another plan on the receipt of information
necessary to enable the department to determine the eligibility of any
transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment
under federal income tax law.
(4) Additional service credit purchased under this section is not
membership service and shall be used exclusively to provide the member
with a monthly annuity that is paid in addition to the member's
retirement allowance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.37 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A member eligible to retire under RCW 41.37.210 may, at the
time of filing a written application for retirement with the
department, apply to the department to make a one-time purchase of up
to five years of additional service credit.
(2) To purchase additional service credit under this section, a
member shall pay the actuarial equivalent value of the resulting
increase in the member's benefit.
(3) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member purchasing
additional service credit under this section may pay all or part of the
cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover, direct rollover, or
trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible retirement plan. The
department shall adopt rules to ensure that all lump sum payments,
rollovers, and transfers comply with the requirements of the internal
revenue code and regulations adopted by the internal revenue service.
The rules adopted by the department may condition the acceptance of a
rollover or transfer from another plan on the receipt of information
necessary to enable the department to determine the eligibility of any
transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment
under federal income tax law.
(4) Additional service credit purchased under this section is not
membership service and shall be used exclusively to provide the member
with a monthly annuity that is paid in addition to the member's
retirement allowance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW
under the subchapter heading "plan 1" to read as follows:
(1) A member eligible to retire under RCW 41.26.090 may, at the
time of filing a written application for retirement with the
department, apply to the department to make a one-time purchase of up
to five years of additional service credit.
(2) To purchase additional service credit under this section, a
member shall pay the actuarial equivalent value of the resulting
increase in the member's benefit.
(3) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member purchasing
additional service credit under this section may pay all or part of the
cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover, direct rollover, or
trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible retirement plan. The
department shall adopt rules to ensure that all lump sum payments,
rollovers, and transfers comply with the requirements of the internal
revenue code and regulations adopted by the internal revenue service.
The rules adopted by the department may condition the acceptance of a
rollover or transfer from another plan on the receipt of information
necessary to enable the department to determine the eligibility of any
transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment
under federal income tax law.
(4) Additional service credit purchased under this section is not
membership service and shall be used exclusively to provide the member
with a monthly annuity that is paid in addition to the member's
retirement allowance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A member eligible to retire under RCW 43.43.250 may, at the
time of filing a written application for retirement with the
department, apply to the department to make a one-time purchase of up
to five years of additional service credit.
(2) To purchase additional service credit under this section, a
member shall pay the actuarial equivalent value of the resulting
increase in the member's benefit.
(3) Subject to rules adopted by the department, a member purchasing
additional service credit under this section may pay all or part of the
cost with a lump sum payment, eligible rollover, direct rollover, or
trustee-to-trustee transfer from an eligible retirement plan. The
department shall adopt rules to ensure that all lump sum payments,
rollovers, and transfers comply with the requirements of the internal
revenue code and regulations adopted by the internal revenue service.
The rules adopted by the department may condition the acceptance of a
rollover or transfer from another plan on the receipt of information
necessary to enable the department to determine the eligibility of any
transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment
under federal income tax law.
(4) Additional service credit purchased under this section is not
membership service and shall be used exclusively to provide the member
with a monthly annuity that is paid in addition to the member's
retirement allowance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 41.40.713 (Purchase of additional service credit -- Costs--Rules) and 2004 c 172 s 1;
(2) RCW 41.40.833 (Purchase of additional service credit -- Costs--Rules) and 2004 c 172 s 2;
(3) RCW 41.32.767 (Additional service credit purchase -- Rules) and
2005 c 65 s 1;
(4) RCW 41.32.877 (Additional service credit purchase -- Rules) and
2005 c 65 s 2;
(5) RCW 41.35.473 (Purchase of additional service credit -- Costs--Rules) and 2004 c 172 s 3; and
(6) RCW 41.35.653 (Purchase of additional service credit -- Costs--Rules) and 2004 c 172 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---