BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.25.050 and 1995 c 393 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Drivers of commercial motor vehicles shall obtain a
commercial driver's license as required under this chapter by April 1,
1992. The director shall establish a program to convert all qualified
commercial motor vehicle drivers by that date. After April 1, 1992,))
Except when driving under a commercial driver's instruction permit and
a valid automobile or classified license and accompanied by the holder
of a commercial driver's license valid for the vehicle being driven, no
person may drive a commercial motor vehicle unless the person holds and
is in immediate possession of a commercial driver's license and
applicable endorsements valid for the vehicle they are driving.
However, this requirement does not apply to any person:
(a) Who is the operator of a farm vehicle, and the vehicle is:
(i) Controlled and operated by a farmer;
(ii) Used to transport either agricultural products, which in this
section include Christmas trees and wood products harvested from
private tree farms and transported by vehicles weighing no more than
forty thousand pounds licensed gross vehicle weight, farm machinery,
farm supplies, or any combination of those materials to or from a farm;
(iii) Not used in the operations of a common or contract motor
carrier; and
(iv) Used within one hundred fifty miles of the person's farm; or
(b) Who is a fire fighter or law enforcement officer operating
emergency equipment, and:
(i) The fire fighter or law enforcement officer has successfully
completed a driver training course approved by the director; and
(ii) The fire fighter or law enforcement officer carries a
certificate attesting to the successful completion of the approved
training course; or
(c) Who is operating a recreational vehicle for noncommercial
purposes. As used in this section, "recreational vehicle" includes a
vehicle towing a horse trailer for a noncommercial purpose.
(2) The department may enter into reciprocal agreements with
adjoining states to exempt persons from those states falling under
subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section from the requirement to obtain
a commercial driver's license.
(3) No person may drive a commercial motor vehicle while his or her
driving privilege is suspended, revoked, or canceled, while subject to
disqualification, or in violation of an out-of-service order.
Violations of this subsection shall be punished in the same way as
violations of RCW 46.20.342(1).

--- END ---