BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.12.220 and 2004 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If an employer fails to file ((in)) a timely ((and complete
manner a)) report as required by RCW 50.12.070, or the rules adopted
pursuant thereto, the employer ((shall be)) is subject to a penalty
((to be determined by the commissioner, but not to exceed two hundred
fifty dollars or ten percent of the quarterly contributions for each
such offense, whichever is less)) of twenty-five dollars per violation,
unless the penalty is waived by the commissioner.
(b) An employer who files an incomplete or incorrectly formatted
tax and wage report as required by RCW 50.12.070 shall receive a
warning letter for the first occurrence. Except as provided in (c) of
this subsection, for subsequent occurrences, the employer is subject to
a penalty as follows:
(i) When no contributions are due: For the second occurrence, the
penalty is seventy-five dollars; for the third occurrence, the penalty
is one hundred fifty dollars; and for the fourth occurrence and for
each occurrence thereafter, the penalty is two hundred fifty dollars.
(ii) When contributions are due: For the second occurrence, the
penalty is ten percent of the quarterly contributions due, but not less
than seventy-five dollars nor more than two hundred fifty dollars; for
the third occurrence, the penalty is ten percent of the quarterly
contributions due, but not less than one hundred fifty dollars nor more
than two hundred fifty dollars; and for the fourth occurrence and each
occurrence thereafter, the penalty is two hundred fifty dollars.
(c) An employer who files an incomplete or incorrectly formatted
tax and wage report as required by RCW 50.12.070 more than five times
within any five consecutive calendar years is subject to a penalty as
provided in this subsection (1)(c) if the commissioner finds that the
filing of the incomplete or incorrectly formatted report was willful.
In such a case, the penalty shall be five hundred dollars for the sixth
occurrence. The penalty for each subsequent occurrence found to be
willful within that period shall be twice the penalty incurred for the
immediately preceding occurrence.
(2) If an employer knowingly misrepresents to the employment
security department the amount of his or her payroll upon which
contributions under this title are based, the employer shall be liable
to the state for up to ten times the amount of the difference in
contributions paid, if any, and the amount the employer should have
paid and for the reasonable expenses of auditing his or her books and
collecting such sums. Such liability may be enforced in the name of
the department.
(((c) If any part of a delinquency for which an assessment is made
under this title is due to an intent to evade the successorship
provisions of RCW 50.29.062, then for the calendar year in which the
commissioner makes the determination under this subsection, the
commissioner shall assign to the employer, and to any business found to
be promoting the evasion of such provisions, the contribution rate
determined for that calendar year under RCW 50.29.025, including the
solvency surcharge, if any, for rate class 20 or rate class 40, as
applicable, plus two percent.
(2))) (3) If contributions are not paid on the date on which they
are due and payable as prescribed by the commissioner, there shall be
assessed a penalty of five percent of the amount of the contributions
for the first month or part thereof of delinquency; there shall be
assessed a total penalty of ten percent of the amount of the
contributions for the second month or part thereof of delinquency; and
there shall be assessed a total penalty of twenty percent of the amount
of the contributions for the third month or part thereof of
delinquency. No penalty so added shall be less than ten dollars.
These penalties are in addition to the interest charges assessed under
RCW 50.24.040.
(((3))) (4) Penalties shall not accrue on contributions from an
estate in the hands of a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee in
bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating officer
subsequent to the date when such receiver, executor, administrator,
trustee in bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating
officer qualifies as such, but contributions accruing with respect to
employment of persons by a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee
in bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating officer shall
become due and shall be subject to penalties in the same manner as
contributions due from other employers.
(((4))) (5) Where adequate information has been furnished to the
department and the department has failed to act or has advised the
employer of no liability or inability to decide the issue, penalties
shall be waived by the commissioner. Penalties may also be waived for
good cause if the commissioner determines that the failure to
((timely)) file timely and complete reports or pay contributions was
not due to the employer's fault.
(((5))) (6) Any decision to assess a penalty as provided by this
section shall be made by the chief administrative officer of the tax
branch or his or her designee.
(((6))) (7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny an
employer the right to appeal the assessment of any penalty. Such
appeal shall be made in the manner provided in RCW 50.32.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 50.12.220 is recodified as a section in
chapter 50.36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---