BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person who drives a vehicle in a willful or wanton
disregard for the safety of, and injures, an emergency worker
performing his or her official duties at the time of the incident is
guilty of reckless driving that injures an emergency worker. Violation
of this section is a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2) The license or permit to drive or any nonresident privilege of
any person convicted of reckless driving that injures an emergency
worker shall be suspended by the department for not less than ninety
days.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "emergency worker" means an
emergency medical technician or a first responder as those terms are
defined in RCW 18.73.030.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.36.031 and 2005 c 458 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of assault in the third degree if he or she,
under circumstances not amounting to assault in the first or second
degree:
(a) With intent to prevent or resist the execution of any lawful
process or mandate of any court officer or the lawful apprehension or
detention of himself or another person, assaults another; or
(b) Assaults a person employed as a transit operator or driver, the
immediate supervisor of a transit operator or driver, a mechanic, or a
security officer, by a public or private transit company or a
contracted transit service provider, while that person is performing
his or her official duties at the time of the assault; or
(c) Assaults an emergency worker who was performing his or her
official duties at the time of the assault. For the purposes of this
subsection, the definitions in section 1 of this act apply; or
(d) Assaults a school bus driver, the immediate supervisor of a
driver, a mechanic, or a security officer, employed by a school
district transportation service or a private company under contract for
transportation services with a school district, while the person is
performing his or her official duties at the time of the assault; or
(((d))) (e) With criminal negligence, causes bodily harm to another
person by means of a weapon or other instrument or thing likely to
produce bodily harm; or
(((e))) (f) Assaults a fire fighter or other employee of a fire
department, county fire marshal's office, county fire prevention
bureau, or fire protection district who was performing his or her
official duties at the time of the assault; or
(((f))) (g) With criminal negligence, causes bodily harm
accompanied by substantial pain that extends for a period sufficient to
cause considerable suffering; or
(((g))) (h) Assaults a law enforcement officer or other employee of
a law enforcement agency who was performing his or her official duties
at the time of the assault; or
(((h))) (i) Assaults a peace officer with a projectile stun gun; or
(((i))) (j) Assaults a nurse, physician, or health care provider
who was performing his or her nursing or health care duties at the time
of the assault. For purposes of this subsection: "Nurse" means a
person licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; "physician" means a person
licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW; and "health care provider"
means a person certified under chapter 18.71 or 18.73 RCW who performs
emergency medical services or a person regulated under Title 18 RCW and
employed by, or contracting with, a hospital licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW.
(2) Assault in the third degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.63.020 and 2005 c 431 s 2, 2005 c 323 s 3, and 2005
c 183 s 10 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act
prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic
including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is
designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a
criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following
provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:
(1) RCW 46.09.120(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance;
(2) RCW 46.09.130 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;
(3) RCW 46.10.090(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;
(4) RCW 46.10.130 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;
(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of ownership and
registration and markings indicating that a vehicle has been destroyed
or declared a total loss;
(6) RCW 46.16.010 relating to the nonpayment of taxes and fees by
failure to register a vehicle and falsifying residency when registering
a motor vehicle;
(7) RCW 46.16.011 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to
drive;
(8) RCW 46.16.160 relating to vehicle trip permits;
(9) RCW 46.16.381(2) relating to knowingly providing false
information in conjunction with an application for a special placard or
license plate for disabled persons' parking;
(10) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's
license;
(11) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a
driver's license or instruction permit;
(12) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of
a driver's license;
(13) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked
license or status;
(14) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle
with a suspended or revoked license;
(15) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an
occupational or temporary restricted driver's license;
(16) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without
an ignition interlock device in violation of a license notation that
the device is required;
(17) RCW 46.20.750 relating to assisting another person to start a
vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device;
(18) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;
(19) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;
(20) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of
financial responsibility;
(21) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of
sunscreening material;
(22) RCW 46.37.650 relating to the sale, resale, distribution, or
installation of a previously deployed air bag;
(23) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot
vehicles;
(24) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous
articles;
(25) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(26) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(27) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen, storagemen,
and appraisers;
(28) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving
record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer, and an
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;
(29) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a
registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;
(30) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck
operators;
(31) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers,
flaggers, or fire fighters;
(32) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or
cooperate with an officer;
(33) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give
identification to an officer;
(34) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police
vehicles;
(35) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;
(36) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(37) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one
driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;
(38) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor vehicle;
(39) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;
(40) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent driving;
(41) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of roadway
workers;
(42) Section 1 of this act relating to reckless driving that
injures an emergency worker;
(43) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on highways;
(((43))) (44) RCW 46.61.655(7) (a) and (b) relating to failure to
secure a load;
(((44))) (45) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an
unattended vehicle with the motor running;
(((45))) (46) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle
fuel;
(((46))) (47) RCW 46.37.671 through 46.37.675 relating to signal
preemption devices;
(((47))) (48) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or
attempt to cancel a traffic citation;
(((48))) (49) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding,
abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(((49))) (50) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic
offenders;
(((50))) (51) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to
obtain a refund;
(((51))) (52) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle
business practices, except where that chapter provides for the
assessment of monetary penalties of a civil nature;
(((52))) (53) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of
passengers in for hire vehicles;
(((53))) (54) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier
insurance;
(((54))) (55) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine
without a vehicle certificate;
(((55))) (56) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a
limousine carrier;
(((56))) (57) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;
(((57))) (58) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training
schools;
(((58))) (59) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a
cab card, letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued
under chapter 46.87 RCW;
(((59))) (60) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an
unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

--- END ---