BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.110 and 2004 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall designate an urban growth area or areas within which
urban growth shall be encouraged and outside of which growth can occur
only if it is not urban in nature. Each city that is located in such
a county shall be included within an urban growth area. An urban
growth area may include more than a single city. An urban growth area
may include territory that is located outside of a city only if such
territory already is characterized by urban growth whether or not the
urban growth area includes a city, or is adjacent to territory already
characterized by urban growth, or is a designated new fully contained
community as defined by RCW 36.70A.350.
(2) Based upon the growth management population projection made for
the county by the office of financial management, the county and each
city within the county shall include areas and densities sufficient to
permit the urban growth that is projected to occur in the county or
city for the succeeding twenty-year period, except for those urban
growth areas contained totally within a national historical reserve.
Each urban growth area shall permit urban densities and shall
include greenbelt and open space areas. In the case of urban growth
areas contained totally within a national historical reserve, the city
may restrict densities, intensities, and forms of urban growth as
determined to be necessary and appropriate to protect the physical,
cultural, or historic integrity of the reserve. An urban growth area
determination may include a reasonable land market supply factor and
shall permit a range of urban densities and uses. In determining this
market factor, cities and counties may consider local circumstances.
Cities and counties have discretion in their comprehensive plans to
make many choices about accommodating growth.
Within one year of July 1, 1990, each county that as of June 1,
1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, shall begin
consulting with each city located within its boundaries and each city
shall propose the location of an urban growth area. Within sixty days
of the date the county legislative authority of a county adopts its
resolution of intention or of certification by the office of financial
management, all other counties that are required or choose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall begin this consultation with each city
located within its boundaries. The county shall attempt to reach
agreement with each city on the location of an urban growth area within
which the city is located. If such an agreement is not reached with
each city located within the urban growth area, the county shall
justify in writing why it so designated the area an urban growth area.
A city may object formally with the department over the designation of
the urban growth area within which it is located. Where appropriate,
the department shall attempt to resolve the conflicts, including the
use of mediation services.
(3) Urban growth should be located first in areas already
characterized by urban growth that have adequate existing public
facility and service capacities to serve such development, second in
areas already characterized by urban growth that will be served
adequately by a combination of both existing public facilities and
services and any additional needed public facilities and services that
are provided by either public or private sources, and third in the
remaining portions of the urban growth areas. Urban growth may also be
located in designated new fully contained communities as defined by RCW
36.70A.350.
(4) In general, cities are the units of local government most
appropriate to provide urban governmental services. In general, it is
not appropriate that urban governmental services be extended to or
expanded in rural areas except in those limited circumstances shown to
be necessary to protect basic public health and safety and the
environment and when such services are financially supportable at rural
densities and do not permit urban development.
(5) On or before October 1, 1993, each county that was initially
required to plan under RCW 36.70A.040(1) shall adopt development
regulations designating interim urban growth areas under this chapter.
Within three years and three months of the date the county legislative
authority of a county adopts its resolution of intention or of
certification by the office of financial management, all other counties
that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt
development regulations designating interim urban growth areas under
this chapter. Adoption of the interim urban growth areas may only
occur after public notice; public hearing; and compliance with the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, and RCW 36.70A.110.
Such action may be appealed to ((the appropriate growth management
hearings board under RCW 36.70A.280)) superior court. Final urban
growth areas shall be adopted at the time of comprehensive plan
adoption under this chapter.
(6) Each county shall include designations of urban growth areas in
its comprehensive plan.
(7) An urban growth area designated in accordance with this section
may include within its boundaries urban service areas or potential
annexation areas designated for specific cities or towns within the
county.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.130 and 2005 c 423 s 6 and 2005 c 294 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
shall be subject to continuing review and evaluation by the county or
city that adopted them. Except as otherwise provided, a county or city
shall take legislative action to review and, if needed, revise its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure the
plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter
according to the time periods specified in subsection (4) of this
section.
(b) Except as otherwise provided, a county or city not planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if needed, revise
its policies and development regulations regarding critical areas and
natural resource lands adopted according to this chapter to ensure
these policies and regulations comply with the requirements of this
chapter according to the time periods specified in subsection (4) of
this section. Legislative action means the adoption of a resolution or
ordinance following notice and a public hearing indicating at a
minimum, a finding that a review and evaluation has occurred and
identifying the revisions made, or that a revision was not needed and
the reasons therefor.
(c) The review and evaluation required by this subsection may be
combined with the review required by subsection (3) of this section.
The review and evaluation required by this subsection shall include,
but is not limited to, consideration of critical area ordinances and,
if planning under RCW 36.70A.040, an analysis of the population
allocated to a city or county from the most recent ten-year population
forecast by the office of financial management.
(d) Any amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan
shall conform to this chapter. Any amendment of or revision to
development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan.
(2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate
to the public a public participation program consistent with RCW
36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140 that identifies procedures and schedules
whereby updates, proposed amendments, or revisions of the comprehensive
plan are considered by the governing body of the county or city no more
frequently than once every year. "Updates" means to review and revise,
if needed, according to subsection (1) of this section, and the time
periods specified in subsection (4) of this section or in accordance
with the provisions of subsection (8) of this section. Amendments may
be considered more frequently than once per year under the following
circumstances:
(i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan that does not modify the
comprehensive plan policies and designations applicable to the subarea;
(ii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under
the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW;
(iii) The amendment of the capital facilities element of a
comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the adoption or
amendment of a county or city budget; and
(iv) Until June 30, 2006, the designation of recreational lands
under RCW 36.70A.1701. A county amending its comprehensive plan
pursuant to this subsection (2)(a)(iv) may not do so more frequently
than every eighteen months.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all
proposals shall be considered by the governing body concurrently so the
cumulative effect of the various proposals can be ascertained.
However, after appropriate public participation a county or city may
adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform
with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with ((a growth management hearings board
or with)) the court.
(3)(a) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW
36.70A.110 shall review, at least every ten years, its designated urban
growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the
incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In
conjunction with this review by the county, each city located within an
urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within its
boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within
the county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions
of the urban growth areas.
(b) The county comprehensive plan designating urban growth areas,
and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by the
comprehensive plans of the county and each city located within the
urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth
projected to occur in the county for the succeeding twenty-year period.
The review required by this subsection may be combined with the review
and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.
(4) The department shall establish a schedule for counties and
cities to take action to review and, if needed, revise their
comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and
regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter. Except as
provided in subsection (8) of this section, the schedule established by
the department shall provide for the reviews and evaluations to be
completed as follows:
(a) On or before December 1, 2004, and every seven years
thereafter, for Clallam, Clark, Jefferson, King, Kitsap, Pierce,
Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those
counties;
(b) On or before December 1, 2005, and every seven years
thereafter, for Cowlitz, Island, Lewis, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and
Skamania counties and the cities within those counties;
(c) On or before December 1, 2006, and every seven years
thereafter, for Benton, Chelan, Douglas, Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and
Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and
(d) On or before December 1, 2007, and every seven years
thereafter, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield,
Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille,
Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the cities
within those counties.
(5)(a) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from
conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before
the time limits established in subsection (4) of this section.
Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be eligible
for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.
(b) State agencies are encouraged to provide technical assistance
to the counties and cities in the review of critical area ordinances,
comprehensive plans, and development regulations.
(6) A county or city subject to the time periods in subsection
(4)(a) of this section that, pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the
county or city establishing a schedule for periodic review of its
comprehensive plan and development regulations, has conducted a review
and evaluation of its comprehensive plan and development regulations
and, on or after January 1, 2001, has taken action in response to that
review and evaluation shall be deemed to have conducted the first
review required by subsection (4)(a) of this section. Subsequent
review and evaluation by the county or city of its comprehensive plan
and development regulations shall be conducted in accordance with the
time periods established under subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(7) The requirements imposed on counties and cities under this
section shall be considered "requirements of this chapter" under the
terms of RCW 36.70A.040(1). Only those counties and cities in
compliance with the schedules in this section and those counties and
cities demonstrating substantial progress towards compliance with the
schedules in this section for development regulations that protect
critical areas may receive grants, loans, pledges, or financial
guarantees from those accounts established in RCW 43.155.050 and
70.146.030. A county or city that is fewer than twelve months out of
compliance with the schedules in this section for development
regulations that protect critical areas is deemed to be making
substantial progress towards compliance. Only those counties and
cities in compliance with the schedules in this section may receive
preference for grants or loans subject to the provisions of RCW
43.17.250.
(8)(a) Counties and cities required to satisfy the requirements of
this section according to the schedule established by subsection (4)(b)
through (d) of this section may comply with the requirements of this
section for development regulations that protect critical areas one
year after the dates established in subsection (4)(b) through (d) of
this section.
(b) Counties and cities complying with the requirements of this
section one year after the dates established in subsection (4)(b)
through (d) of this section for development regulations that protect
critical areas shall be deemed in compliance with the requirements of
this section.
(c) This subsection (8) applies only to the counties and cities
specified in subsection (4)(b) through (d) of this section, and only to
the requirements of this section for development regulations that
protect critical areas that must be satisfied by December 1, 2005,
December 1, 2006, and December 1, 2007.
(9) Notwithstanding subsection (8) of this section and the
substantial progress provisions of subsections (7) and (10) of this
section, only those counties and cities complying with the schedule in
subsection (4) of this section may receive preferences for grants,
loans, pledges, or financial guarantees from those accounts established
in RCW 43.155.050 and 70.146.030.
(10) Until December 1, 2005, and notwithstanding subsection (7) of
this section, a county or city subject to the time periods in
subsection (4)(a) of this section demonstrating substantial progress
towards compliance with the schedules in this section for its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations may receive
grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees from those accounts
established in RCW 43.155.050 and 70.146.030. A county or city that is
fewer than twelve months out of compliance with the schedules in this
section for its comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
is deemed to be making substantial progress towards compliance.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.140 and 1995 c 347 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each county and city that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a
public participation program identifying procedures providing for early
and continuous public participation in the development and amendment of
comprehensive land use plans and development regulations implementing
such plans. The procedures shall provide for broad dissemination of
proposals and alternatives, opportunity for written comments, public
meetings after effective notice, provision for open discussion,
communication programs, information services, and consideration of and
response to public comments. In enacting legislation in response to
((the board's decision pursuant to RCW 36.70A.300)) a court's decision
declaring part or all of a comprehensive plan or development regulation
invalid, the county or city shall provide for public participation that
is appropriate and effective under the circumstances presented by the
((board's)) court's order. Errors in exact compliance with the
established program and procedures shall not render the comprehensive
land use plan or development regulations invalid if the spirit of the
program and procedures is observed.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.172 and 1995 c 347 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) In designating and protecting critical areas under this
chapter, counties and cities shall include the best available science
in developing policies and development regulations to protect the
functions and values of critical areas. In addition, counties and
cities shall give special consideration to conservation or protection
measures necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous fisheries.
(((2) If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts
is necessary or will be of substantial assistance in reaching its
decision, a growth management hearings board may retain scientific or
other expert advice to assist in reviewing a petition under RCW
36.70A.290 that involves critical areas.))

Sec. 5 RCW 36.70A.210 and 1998 c 171 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that counties are regional
governments within their boundaries, and cities are primary providers
of urban governmental services within urban growth areas. For the
purposes of this section, a "county-wide planning policy" is a written
policy statement or statements used solely for establishing a county-wide framework from which county and city comprehensive plans are
developed and adopted pursuant to this chapter. This framework shall
ensure that city and county comprehensive plans are consistent as
required in RCW 36.70A.100. Nothing in this section shall be construed
to alter the land-use powers of cities.
(2) The legislative authority of a county that plans under RCW
36.70A.040 shall adopt a county-wide planning policy in cooperation
with the cities located in whole or in part within the county as
follows:
(a) No later than sixty calendar days from July 16, 1991, the
legislative authority of each county that as of June 1, 1991, was
required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall convene a meeting
with representatives of each city located within the county for the
purpose of establishing a collaborative process that will provide a
framework for the adoption of a county-wide planning policy. In other
counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this
meeting shall be convened no later than sixty days after the date the
county adopts its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management.
(b) The process and framework for adoption of a county-wide
planning policy specified in (a) of this subsection shall determine the
manner in which the county and the cities agree to all procedures and
provisions including but not limited to desired planning policies,
deadlines, ratification of final agreements and demonstration thereof,
and financing, if any, of all activities associated therewith.
(c) If a county fails for any reason to convene a meeting with
representatives of cities as required in (a) of this subsection, the
governor may immediately impose any appropriate sanction or sanctions
on the county from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340.
(d) If there is no agreement by October 1, 1991, in a county that
was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991,
or if there is no agreement within one hundred twenty days of the date
the county adopted its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management in any other county that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, the governor shall first inquire
of the jurisdictions as to the reason or reasons for failure to reach
an agreement. If the governor deems it appropriate, the governor may
immediately request the assistance of the department of community,
trade, and economic development to mediate any disputes that preclude
agreement. If mediation is unsuccessful in resolving all disputes that
will lead to agreement, the governor may impose appropriate sanctions
from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on the county, city, or
cities for failure to reach an agreement as provided in this section.
The governor shall specify the reason or reasons for the imposition of
any sanction.
(e) No later than July 1, 1992, the legislative authority of each
county that was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of
June 1, 1991, or no later than fourteen months after the date the
county adopted its resolution of intention or was certified by the
office of financial management the county legislative authority of any
other county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040,
shall adopt a county-wide planning policy according to the process
provided under this section and that is consistent with the agreement
pursuant to (b) of this subsection, and after holding a public hearing
or hearings on the proposed county-wide planning policy.
(3) A county-wide planning policy shall at a minimum, address the
following:
(a) Policies to implement RCW 36.70A.110;
(b) Policies for promotion of contiguous and orderly development
and provision of urban services to such development;
(c) Policies for siting public capital facilities of a county-wide
or statewide nature, including transportation facilities of statewide
significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140;
(d) Policies for county-wide transportation facilities and
strategies;
(e) Policies that consider the need for affordable housing, such as
housing for all economic segments of the population and parameters for
its distribution;
(f) Policies for joint county and city planning within urban growth
areas;
(g) Policies for county-wide economic development and employment;
and
(h) An analysis of the fiscal impact.
(4) Federal agencies and Indian tribes may participate in and
cooperate with the county-wide planning policy adoption process.
Adopted county-wide planning policies shall be adhered to by state
agencies.
(5) Failure to adopt a county-wide planning policy that meets the
requirements of this section may result in the imposition of a sanction
or sanctions on a county or city within the county, as specified in RCW
36.70A.340. In imposing a sanction or sanctions, the governor shall
specify the reasons for failure to adopt a county-wide planning policy
in order that any imposed sanction or sanctions are fairly and
equitably related to the failure to adopt a county-wide planning
policy.
(6) Cities and the governor may appeal an adopted county-wide
planning policy to ((the growth management hearings board)) superior
court within sixty days of the adoption of the county-wide planning
policy.
(7) Multicounty planning policies shall be adopted by two or more
counties, each with a population of four hundred fifty thousand or
more, with contiguous urban areas and may be adopted by other counties,
according to the process established under this section or other
processes agreed to among the counties and cities within the affected
counties throughout the multicounty region.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.70A.320 and 1997 c 429 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (((5))) (4) of this section,
comprehensive plans and development regulations, and amendments
thereto, adopted under this chapter are presumed valid upon adoption.
(2) ((Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this
section,)) The burden is on the petitioner to demonstrate that any
action taken by a state agency, county, or city under this chapter is
not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.
(3) In any petition under this chapter, the ((board)) court, after
full consideration of the petition, shall determine whether there is
compliance with the requirements of this chapter. In making its
determination, the ((board)) court shall consider the criteria adopted
by the department under RCW 36.70A.190(4). The ((board)) court shall
find compliance unless it determines that the action by the state
agency, county, or city is clearly erroneous in view of the entire
record before the ((board)) court and in light of the goals and
requirements of this chapter.
(4) ((A county or city subject to a determination of invalidity
made under RCW 36.70A.300 or 36.70A.302 has the burden of demonstrating
that the ordinance or resolution it has enacted in response to the
determination of invalidity will no longer substantially interfere with
the fulfillment of the goals of this chapter under the standard in RCW
36.70A.302(1).
(5))) The shoreline element of a comprehensive plan and the
applicable development regulations adopted by a county or city shall
take effect as provided in chapter 90.58 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.70A.345 and 1994 c 249 s 33 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governor may impose a sanction or sanctions specified under
((RCW 36.70A.340)) subsection (2) of this section on: (((1))) (a) A
county or city that fails to designate critical areas, agricultural
lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands under RCW 36.70A.170 by
the date such action was required to have been taken; (((2))) (b) a
county or city that fails to adopt development regulations under RCW
36.70A.060 protecting critical areas or conserving agricultural lands,
forest lands, or mineral resource lands by the date such action was
required to have been taken; (((3))) (c) a county that fails to
designate urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 by the date such
action was required to have been taken; and (((4))) (d) a county or
city that fails to adopt its comprehensive plan or development
regulations when such actions are required to be taken.
Imposition of a sanction or sanctions under this section shall be
preceded by written findings by the governor, that either the county or
city is not proceeding in good faith to meet the requirements of the
act; or that the county or city has unreasonably delayed taking the
required action. ((The governor shall consult with and communicate his
or her findings to the appropriate growth management hearings board
prior to imposing the sanction or sanctions.)) For those counties or
cities that are not required to plan or have not opted in, the governor
in imposing sanctions shall consider the size of the jurisdiction
relative to the requirements of this chapter and the degree of
technical and financial assistance provided.
(2) The governor may file a notice of noncompliance with the
secretary of state and the county or city, which shall temporarily
rescind the county or city's authority to collect the real estate
excise tax under RCW 82.46.030 until the governor files a notice
rescinding the notice of noncompliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 36.70A.250 (Growth management hearings boards) and 1994 c
249 s 29 & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 5;
(2) RCW 36.70A.260 (Growth management hearings boards--Qualifications) and 1994 c 249 s 30 & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 6;
(3) RCW 36.70A.270 (Growth management hearings boards -- Conduct,
procedure, and compensation) and 1997 c 429 s 11, 1996 c 325 s 1, 1994
c 257 s 1, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 7;
(4) RCW 36.70A.280 (Matters subject to board review) and 2003 c 332
s 2, 1996 c 325 s 2, 1995 c 347 s 108, 1994 c 249 s 31, & 1991 sp.s. c
32 s 9;
(5) RCW 36.70A.290 (Petitions to growth management hearings
boards -- Evidence) and 1997 c 429 s 12 & 1995 c 347 s 109;
(6) RCW 36.70A.295 (Direct judicial review) and 1997 c 429 s 13;
(7) RCW 36.70A.300 (Final orders) and 1997 c 429 s 14, 1995 c 347
s 110, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 11;
(8) RCW 36.70A.302 (Determination of invalidity -- Vesting of
development permits -- Interim controls) and 1997 c 429 s 16;
(9) RCW 36.70A.305 (Expedited review) and 1996 c 325 s 4;
(10) RCW 36.70A.310 (Limitations on appeal by the state) and 1994
c 249 s 32 & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 12;
(11) RCW 36.70A.3201 (Intent -- Finding -- 1997 c 429 § 20(3)) and 1997
c 429 s 2;
(12) RCW 36.70A.330 (Noncompliance) and 1997 c 429 s 21, 1995 c 347
s 112, & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 14;
(13) RCW 36.70A.335 (Order of invalidity issued before July 27,
1997) and 1997 c 429 s 22; and
(14) RCW 36.70A.340 (Noncompliance and sanctions) and 1991 sp.s. c
32 s 26.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 All cases pending before the growth
management hearings boards on the effective date of this act are
transferred to superior court. The superior courts are not bound by
the precedent from prior decisions of the growth management hearings
boards.

--- END ---