BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.55.021 and 2005 c 146 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 77.55.031, 77.55.051, and 77.55.041,
in the event that any person or government agency desires to undertake
a hydraulic project, the person or government agency shall, before
commencing work thereon, secure the approval of the department in the
form of a permit as to the adequacy of the means proposed for the
protection of fish life.
(2) A complete written application for a permit may be submitted in
person or by registered mail and must contain the following:
(a) General plans for the overall project;
(b) Complete plans and specifications of the proposed construction
or work within the mean higher high water line in saltwater or within
the ordinary high water line in freshwater;
(c) Complete plans and specifications for the proper protection of
fish life; and
(d) Notice of compliance with any applicable requirements of the
state environmental policy act, unless otherwise provided for in this
chapter.
(3)(a) Protection of fish life is the only ground upon which
approval of a permit may be denied or conditioned. Approval of a
permit may not be unreasonably withheld or unreasonably conditioned.
Except as provided in this subsection and subsections (8), (10), and
(11) of this section, the department has forty-five calendar days upon
receipt of a complete application to grant or deny approval of a
permit. The forty-five day requirement is suspended if:
(i) After ten working days of receipt of the application, the
applicant remains unavailable or unable to arrange for a timely field
evaluation of the proposed project;
(ii) The site is physically inaccessible for inspection;
(iii) The applicant requests a delay; or
(iv) The department is issuing a permit for a storm water discharge
and is complying with the requirements of RCW 77.55.161(3)(b).
(b) Immediately upon determination that the forty-five day period
is suspended, the department shall notify the applicant in writing of
the reasons for the delay.
(c) The period of forty-five calendar days may be extended if the
permit is part of a multiagency permit streamlining effort and all
participating permitting agencies and the permit applicant agree to an
extended timeline longer than forty-five calendar days.
(4) If the department denies approval of a permit, the department
shall provide the applicant a written statement of the specific reasons
why and how the proposed project would adversely affect fish life.
Issuance, denial, conditioning, or modification of a permit shall be
appealable to ((the department or)) the board as specified in RCW
77.55.301 within thirty days of the notice of decision.
(5)(a) The permittee must demonstrate substantial progress on
construction of that portion of the project relating to the permit
within two years of the date of issuance.
(b) Approval of a permit is valid for a period of up to five years
from the date of issuance, except as provided in (c) of this subsection
and in RCW 77.55.151.
(c) A permit remains in effect without need for periodic renewal
for hydraulic projects that divert water for agricultural irrigation or
stock watering purposes and that involve seasonal construction or other
work. A permit for streambank stabilization projects to protect farm
and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020 remains in effect
without need for periodic renewal if the problem causing the need for
the streambank stabilization occurs on an annual or more frequent
basis. The permittee must notify the appropriate agency before
commencing the construction or other work within the area covered by
the permit.
(6) The department may, after consultation with the permittee,
modify a permit due to changed conditions. The modification becomes
effective unless appealed to ((the department or)) the board as
specified in RCW 77.55.301 within thirty days from the notice of the
proposed modification. For hydraulic projects that divert water for
agricultural irrigation or stock watering purposes, or when the
hydraulic project or other work is associated with streambank
stabilization to protect farm and agricultural land as defined in RCW
84.34.020, the burden is on the department to show that changed
conditions warrant the modification in order to protect fish life.
(7) A permittee may request modification of a permit due to changed
conditions. The request must be processed within forty-five calendar
days of receipt of the written request. A decision by the department
may be appealed to the board as specified in RCW 77.55.301 within
thirty days of the notice of the decision. For hydraulic projects that
divert water for agricultural irrigation or stock watering purposes, or
when the hydraulic project or other work is associated with streambank
stabilization to protect farm and agricultural land as defined in RCW
84.34.020, the burden is on the permittee to show that changed
conditions warrant the requested modification and that such a
modification will not impair fish life.
(8) The department or the county legislative authority may declare
and continue an emergency. The county legislative authority shall
immediately notify the department if it declares an emergency under
this subsection. The department, through its authorized
representatives, shall issue immediately, upon request, oral approval
for a stream crossing, or work to remove any obstructions, repair
existing structures, restore streambanks, protect fish life, or protect
property threatened by the stream or a change in the stream flow
without the necessity of obtaining a written permit prior to commencing
work. Conditions of the emergency oral permit must be established by
the department and reduced to writing within thirty days and complied
with as provided for in this chapter. The department may not require
the provisions of the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C
RCW, to be met as a condition of issuing a permit under this
subsection.
(9) All state and local agencies with authority under this chapter
to issue permits or other authorizations in connection with emergency
water withdrawals and facilities authorized under RCW 43.83B.410 shall
expedite the processing of such permits or authorizations in keeping
with the emergency nature of such requests and shall provide a decision
to the applicant within fifteen calendar days of the date of
application.
(10) The department or the county legislative authority may
determine an imminent danger exists. The county legislative authority
shall notify the department, in writing, if it determines that an
imminent danger exists. In cases of imminent danger, the department
shall issue an expedited written permit, upon request, for work to
remove any obstructions, repair existing structures, restore banks,
protect fish resources, or protect property. Expedited permit requests
require a complete written application as provided in subsection (2) of
this section and must be issued within fifteen calendar days of the
receipt of a complete written application. Approval of an expedited
permit is valid for up to sixty days from the date of issuance. The
department may not require the provisions of the state environmental
policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition of issuing a
permit under this subsection.
(11) The department may issue an expedited written permit in those
instances where normal permit processing would result in significant
hardship for the applicant or unacceptable damage to the environment.
Expedited permit requests require a complete written application as
provided in subsection (2) of this section and must be issued within
fifteen calendar days of the receipt of a complete written application.
Approval of an expedited permit is valid for up to sixty days from the
date of issuance. The department may not require the provisions of the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a
condition of issuing a permit under this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.55.301 and 2005 c 146 s 801 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created within the environmental hearings office under
RCW 43.21B.005 the hydraulic appeals board of the state of Washington.
(2) The board consists of three members: The director of the
department of ecology or the director's designee, the director of the
department of agriculture or the director's designee, and the director
or the director's designee of the department. A decision must be
agreed to by at least two members of the board to be final.
(3) The board may adopt rules necessary for the conduct of its
powers and duties or for transacting other official business.
(4) The board shall make findings of fact and prepare a written
decision in each case decided by it. The finding and decision shall be
effective upon being signed by two or more board members and upon being
filed at the board's principal office, and shall be open to public
inspection at all reasonable times.
(5) The board has exclusive jurisdiction to hear appeals arising
from the approval, denial, conditioning, or modification of a permit
issued by the department((: (a) Under the authority granted in RCW
77.55.021 for the diversion of water for agricultural irrigation or
stock watering purposes or when associated with streambank
stabilization to protect farm and agricultural land as defined in RCW
84.34.020; (b) under the authority granted in RCW 77.55.241 for off-site mitigation proposals; (c) under the authority granted in RCW
77.55.141; or (d) under the authority granted in RCW 77.55.181)) under
this chapter.
(6)(a) Any person aggrieved by the approval, denial, conditioning,
or modification of a permit under ((RCW 77.55.021)) this chapter may,
except as otherwise provided in chapter 43.21L RCW, seek review from
the board by filing a request for the same within thirty days of notice
of the approval, denial, conditioning, or modification of the permit.
(b) The review proceedings authorized in (a) of this subsection are
subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW pertaining to procedures
in adjudicative proceedings.

--- END ---