BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
SUBSTANCE ABUSE REDUCTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 13.40
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) The department of social and health services division of
alcohol and substance abuse shall establish a substance abuse and
mental health treatment pilot program that awards grants to counties on
a competitive basis for substance abuse and mental health treatment for
users of methamphetamine, subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose.
(b) The department of social and health services division of
alcohol and substance abuse shall review county applications for
funding through the substance abuse and mental health treatment program
and shall select the counties that will be awarded grants with funds
appropriated to implement this program. The department, in
consultation with the Washington state institute for public policy,
shall develop guidelines to determine which counties will be awarded
funding in accordance with the substance abuse and mental health
treatment program. At a minimum, counties must meet the following
criteria in order to participate in the substance abuse and mental
health treatment program:
(i) Counties must have imposed the sales and use tax authorized by
RCW 82.14.460;
(ii) Counties must demonstrate that state funds allocated pursuant
to this section are used only for the purposes authorized in RCW
82.14.460;
(iii) Counties that submit joint applications must submit for
approval by the department of social and health services division of
alcohol and substance abuse multicounty plans for efficient program
delivery.
(2)(a) Effective July 1, 2006, and continuing through June 30,
2008, a substance abuse and mental health treatment pilot program shall
be established. The pilot program shall be for the purpose of
exploring methods of providing new or expanded chemical dependency or
mental health treatment services and for the operation of new or
expanded therapeutic court programs for crimes involving substance
abuse.
(b) Counties that participate in the pilot program shall have a
portion of their costs paid for with moneys from the substance abuse
and mental health treatment account established pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section. The total amount allocated for pilot program
grants established in this section is limited to amounts appropriated
for this specific purpose.
(3)(a) The substance abuse and mental health treatment account is
created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account shall be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used to
reimburse local governments for the implementation of the substance
abuse and mental health treatment program established in this section.
(b) Revenues to the substance abuse and mental health treatment
account consist of revenues appropriated to or deposited in the
account.
(c) The department of social and health services division of
alcohol and substance abuse shall review and monitor the expenditures
made by any county or group of counties that is funded, in whole or in
part, with funds provided through the substance abuse and mental health
treatment account. Counties shall repay any funds that are not spent
in accordance with this section.
(4) The department of social and health services division of
alcohol and substance abuse shall provide a preliminary report to the
legislature on the pilot project on or before October 1, 2007, and a
final report on or before October 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide an annual combined level of state and federal funding for
multijurisdictional drug task forces and local government drug
prosecution assistance at a minimum of four million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 (1) It is the intent of the legislature to
provide assistance for jurisdictions enforcing illegal-drug laws who
have historically been underserved by federally funded state narcotics
task forces and are considered to be major transport areas of narcotics
traffickers.
(2) Three pilot enforcement areas shall be established for a period
of four fiscal years, beginning on July 1, 2006, and ending on June 30,
2010, with one in the southwestern region of the state, comprising of
Pacific and Wahkiakum counties; one in the southeastern region of the
state, comprising of Walla Walla, Columbia, Garfield, and Asotin
counties; and one in the northeastern part of the state, comprising of
Stevens, Ferry, and Pend Oreille counties.
(3) It is the legislature's intent to provide funding of no less
than 1.125 million dollars annually. The funding is to be divided
equally between the three pilot enforcement areas. This funding is
intended to provide a minimum of three additional sheriff deputies for
each pilot area, a deputy prosecutor who will support the counties who
are included in the pilot area, and court clerk and clerical staff to
serve the pilot area. Counties are encouraged to utilize drug courts
and treatment programs and to share resources that operate in the
region through the use of interlocal agreements. The funding
appropriated for this purpose must not be used to supplant existing
funding and cannot be used for any purpose other than the enforcement
of illegal-drug laws.
The criminal justice training commission shall allocate funds to
the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys and the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The Washington association
of prosecuting attorneys is responsible for administration of the
funding and programs for the prosecution of crimes and court
proceedings and the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs shall administer the funds provided for law enforcement.
(4) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the
Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, and the Washington
association of county officials shall jointly develop measures to
determine the efficacy of the programs in the pilot area. These
measures will include comparison of arrest rates before the
implementation of this act and after, reduction of recidivism, and any
other factors that are determined to be relevant to evaluation of the
programs. The organizations named in this section shall present their
findings to the legislature by December 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 It is the intent of the legislature to
promote drug-free workplaces to improve the safety of the workplace,
protect the health of workers, and afford employers in this state the
opportunity to maximize their levels of productivity, enhance their
competitive positions in the marketplace, and reach their desired
levels of success without experiencing the costs, delays, and tragedies
associated with work-related accidents resulting from substance abuse
by employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Alcohol" means ethyl alcohol, hydrated oxide of ethyl, or
spirits of wine, from whatever source or by whatever process produced.
(2) "Alcohol test" means a chemical, biological, or physical
instrumental analysis administered for the purpose of determining the
presence or absence of alcohol within an individual's body systems.
(3) "Chain of custody" means the methodology of tracking specimens
for the purpose of maintaining control and accountability from initial
collection to final disposition for all specimens and providing for
accountability at each stage in handling, testing, and storing
specimens and reporting test results.
(4) "Collection site" means a place where individuals present
themselves for the purpose of providing a urine, breath, or other
specimen to be analyzed for the presence of drugs or alcohol.
(5) "Confirmation test" or "confirmed test" means a second
analytical procedure used to identify the presence of a specific drug
or metabolic in a specimen. Drug tests must be confirmed as specified
in section 109(5) of this act. Alcohol tests must be confirmed by a
second breath test or as specified for drug tests.
(6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(7) "Drug" means amphetamines, cannabinoids, cocaine, phencyclidine
(PCP), methadone, methaqualone, opiates, barbiturates, benzodiazepines,
propoxyphene, or a metabolite of any such substances.
(8) "Drug test" means a chemical, biological, or physical
instrumental analysis administered on a specimen sample for the purpose
of determining the presence or absence of a drug or its metabolites
within the sample.
(9) "Employee" means a person who is employed for salary, wages, or
other remuneration by an employer.
(10) "Employee assistance program" means a program designed to
assist in the identification and resolution of job performance problems
associated with employees impaired by personal concerns. A minimum
level of core services must include: Consultation and professional,
confidential, appropriate, and timely problem assessment services;
short-term problem resolution; referrals for appropriate diagnosis,
treatment, and assistance; follow-up and monitoring; employee
education; and supervisory training.
(11) "Employer" means an employer subject to Title 51 RCW but does
not include the state or any department, agency, or instrumentality of
the state; any county; any city; any school district or educational
service district; or any municipal corporation.
(12) "Initial test" means a sensitive, rapid, and reliable
procedure to identify negative and presumptive positive specimens. An
initial drug test must use an immunoassay procedure or an equivalent
procedure or must use a more accurate scientifically accepted method
approved by the national institute on drug abuse as more accurate
technology becomes available in a cost-effective form.
(13) "Injury" means a sudden and tangible happening, of a traumatic
nature, producing an immediate or prompt result and occurring from
without, and such physical conditions as result therefrom.
(14) "Job applicant" means a person who has applied for employment
with an employer and has been offered employment conditioned upon
successfully passing a drug test and may have begun work pending the
results of the drug test.
(15) "Last-chance agreement" means a notice to an employee who is
referred to the employee assistance program due to a verified positive
alcohol or drug test or for violating an alcohol or drug-related
employer rule that states the terms and conditions of continued
employment with which the employee must comply.
(16) "Medical review officer" means a licensed physician trained in
the field of drug testing who provides medical assessment of positive
test results, requests reanalysis if necessary, and makes a
determination whether or not drug misuse has occurred.
(17) "Nonprescription medication" means a drug or medication
authorized under federal or state law for general distribution and use
without a prescription in the treatment of human disease, ailments, or
injuries.
(18) "Prescription medication" means a drug or medication lawfully
prescribed by a physician, or other health care provider licensed to
prescribe medication, for an individual and taken in accordance with
the prescription.
(19) "Rehabilitation program" means a program approved by the
department that is capable of providing expert identification,
assessment, and resolution of employee drug or alcohol abuse in a
confidential and timely service. Any rehabilitation program under this
chapter must contain a two-year continuing care component.
(20) "Specimen" means breath or urine. "Specimen" may include
other products of the human body capable of revealing the presence of
drugs or their metabolites or of alcohol, if approved by the United
States department of health and human services and permitted by rules
adopted under section 116 of this act.
(21) "Substance" means drugs or alcohol.
(22) "Substance abuse test" or "test" means a chemical, biological,
or physical instrumental analysis administered on a specimen sample for
the purpose of determining the presence or absence of a drug or its
metabolites or of alcohol within the sample.
(23) "Threshold detection level" means the level at which the
presence of a drug or alcohol can be reasonably expected to be detected
by an initial and confirmation test performed by a laboratory meeting
the standards specified in this chapter. The threshold detection level
indicates the level at which a valid conclusion can be drawn that the
drug or alcohol is present in the employee's specimen.
(24) "Verified positive test result" means a confirmed positive
test result obtained by a laboratory meeting the standards specified in
this chapter that has been reviewed and verified by a medical review
officer in accordance with medical review officer guidelines
promulgated by the United States department of health and human
services.
(25) "Workers' compensation premium" means the medical aid fund
premium and the accident fund premium under Title 51 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 (1) An employer, except an employer that
is self-insured for the purposes of Title 51 RCW, implementing a drug-free workplace program in accordance with section 107 of this act shall
qualify for a five percent workers' compensation premium discount under
Title 51 RCW if the employer:
(a) Is certified by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of
the department as provided in section 116 of this act. The employer
must maintain an alcohol and drug-free workplace program in accordance
with the standards, procedures, and rules established in or under this
chapter. If the employer fails to maintain the program as required,
the employer shall not qualify for the premium discount provided under
this section;
(b) Is in good standing and remains in good standing with the
department of labor and industries with respect to the employer's
workers' compensation premium obligations and any other premiums and
assessments under Title 51 RCW; and
(c) Has medical insurance available to its full-time employees
through an employer, union, or jointly sponsored medical plan.
(2) The premium discount must remain in effect as long as the
employer is certified under section 116 of this act, up to a maximum of
three years from the date of initial certification.
(3) A certified employer may discontinue operating a drug-free
workplace program at any time. The qualification for a premium
discount shall expire in accordance with decertification rules adopted
by the department under section 116 of this act.
(4) An employer whose substance abuse testing program reasonably
meets, as of July 1, 2006, the requirements for the premium discount
provided in this section is not eligible for certification.
(5) Nothing in this chapter creates or alters an obligation on the
part of an employer seeking to participate in this program to bargain
with a collective bargaining representative of its employees.
(6) An employer may not receive premium discounts from the
department of labor and industries under more than one premium discount
program. An employer participating in and meeting all of the
requirements for the discount provided in this section and also
participating in another premium discount program offered by the
department of labor and industries is only entitled to the premium
discount that is the highest.
(7) The department of labor and industries will notify self-insured
employers of the value of drug-free workplace programs and encourage
them to implement programs that are in accord with section 107 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 (1) A drug-free workplace program
established under this chapter must contain all of the following
elements:
(a) A written policy statement in compliance with section 108 of
this act;
(b) Substance abuse testing in compliance with section 109 of this
act;
(c) An employee assistance program in compliance with section 110
of this act;
(d) Employee education in compliance with section 112 of this act;
and
(e) Supervisor training in compliance with section 113 of this act.
(2) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section, a drug-free workplace program established under this chapter
must be implemented in compliance with the confidentiality standards
provided in section 115 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 (1) An alcohol and drug-free workplace
program established under this chapter must contain a written substance
abuse policy statement in order to qualify for the premium discount
provided under section 106 of this act. The policy must:
(a) Notify employees that the use or being under any influence of
alcohol during working hours is prohibited;
(b) Notify employees that the use, purchase, possession, or
transfer of drugs or having illegal drugs in their system is prohibited
and that prescription or nonprescription medications are not prohibited
when taken in accordance with a lawful prescription or consistent with
standard dosage recommendations;
(c) Identify the types of testing an employee or job applicant may
be required to submit to or other basis used to determine when such a
test will be required;
(d) Identify the actions the employer may take against an employee
or job applicant on the basis of a verified positive test result;
(e) Contain a statement advising an employee or job applicant of
the existence of this chapter;
(f) Contain a general statement concerning confidentiality;
(g) Identify the consequences of refusing to submit to a drug test;
(h) Contain a statement advising an employee of the employee
assistance program;
(i) Contain a statement that an employee or job applicant who
receives a verified positive test result may contest or explain the
result to the employer within five working days after receiving written
notification of the positive test result;
(j) Contain a statement informing an employee of the provisions of
the federal drug-free workplace act, if applicable to the employer; and
(k) Notify employees that the employer may discipline an employee
for failure to report an injury in the workplace.
(2) An employer not having a substance abuse testing program in
effect on July 1, 2006, shall ensure that at least sixty days elapse
between a general one-time notice to all employees that a substance
abuse testing program is being implemented and the beginning of the
actual testing. An employer having a substance abuse testing program
in place before July 1, 2006, is not required to provide a sixty-day
notice period.
(3) An employer shall include notice of substance abuse testing to
all job applicants. A notice of the employer's substance abuse testing
policy must also be posted in an appropriate and conspicuous location
on the employer's premises, and copies of the policy must be made
available for inspection by the employees or job applicants of the
employer during regular business hours in the employer's personnel
office or other suitable locations. An employer with employees or job
applicants who have trouble communicating in English shall make
reasonable efforts to help the employees understand the policy
statement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 (1) In conducting substance abuse testing
under this chapter, the employer must comply with the standards and
procedures established in this chapter and all applicable rules adopted
by the department under this chapter and must:
(a) Require job applicants to submit to a drug test after extending
an offer of employment. The employer may use a refusal to submit to a
drug test or a verified positive test as a basis for not hiring the job
applicant;
(b) Investigate each workplace injury that results in a worker
needing off-site medical attention and require an employee to submit to
drug and alcohol tests if the employer reasonably believes the employee
has caused or contributed to an injury which resulted in the need for
off-site medical attention. An employer need not require that an
employee submit to drug and alcohol tests if a supervisor, trained in
accordance with section 113 of this act, reasonably believes that the
injury was due to the inexperience of the employee or due to a
defective or unsafe product or working condition, or other
circumstances beyond the control of the employee. Under this chapter,
a first-time verified positive test result may not be used as a basis
to terminate an employee's employment. However, nothing in this
section prohibits an employee from being terminated for reasons other
than the positive test result;
(c) If the employee in the course of employment is referred to the
employee assistance program by the employer as a result of a verified
positive drug or alcohol test or an alcohol or drug-related incident in
violation of employer rules, require the employee to submit to drug and
alcohol testing in conjunction with any recommended rehabilitation
program. If the employee assistance program determines that the
employee does not require treatment services, the employee must still
be required to participate in follow-up testing. However, if an
employee voluntarily enters an employee assistance program, without a
verified positive drug or alcohol test or a violation of any drug or
alcohol related employer rule, follow-up testing is not required. If
follow-up testing is conducted, the frequency of the testing shall be
at least four times a year for a two-year period after completion of
the rehabilitation program and advance notice of the testing date may
not be given. A verified positive follow-up test result shall normally
require termination of employment.
(2) This section does not prohibit an employer from conducting
other drug or alcohol testing, such as upon reasonable suspicion or a
random basis.
(3) Specimen collection and substance abuse testing under this
section must be performed in accordance with regulations and procedures
approved by the United States department of health and human services
and the United States department of transportation regulations for
alcohol and drug testing and must include testing for marijuana,
cocaine, amphetamines, opiates, and phencyclidine. Employers may test
for any drug listed in section 105(7) of this act.
(a) A specimen must be collected with due regard to the privacy of
the individual providing the specimen and in a manner reasonably
calculated to prevent substitution or contamination of the specimen.
(b) Specimen collection and analysis must be documented. The
documentation procedures must include:
(i) Labeling of specimen containers so as to reasonably preclude
the likelihood of erroneous identification of test results; and
(ii) An opportunity for the employee or job applicant to provide to
a medical review officer information the employee or applicant
considers relevant to the drug test, including identification of
currently or recently used prescription or nonprescription medication
or other relevant medical information.
(c) Specimen collection, storage, and transportation to the testing
site must be performed in a manner that reasonably precludes specimen
contamination or adulteration.
(d) An initial and confirmation test conducted under this section,
not including the taking or collecting of a specimen to be tested, must
be conducted by a laboratory as described in subsection (4) of this
section.
(e) A specimen for a test may be taken or collected by any of the
following persons:
(i) A physician, a physician's assistant, a registered professional
nurse, a licensed practical nurse, a nurse practitioner, or a certified
paramedic who is present at the scene of an accident for the purpose of
rendering emergency medical service or treatment;
(ii) A qualified person certified or employed by a laboratory
certified by the substance abuse and mental health administration or
the college of American pathologists; or
(iii) A qualified person certified or employed by a collection
company using collection procedures adopted by the United States
department of health and human services and the United States
department of transportation for alcohol collection.
(f) Within five working days after receipt of a verified positive
test result from the laboratory, an employer shall inform an employee
or job applicant in writing of the positive test result, the
consequences of the result, and the options available to the employee
or job applicant.
(g) The employer shall provide to the employee or job applicant,
upon request, a copy of the test results.
(h) An initial test having a positive result must be verified by a
confirmation test.
(i) An employer who performs drug testing or specimen collection
shall use chain of custody procedures to ensure proper recordkeeping,
handling, labeling, and identification of all specimens to be tested.
(j) An employer shall pay the cost of all drug or alcohol tests,
initial and confirmation, that the employer requires of employees.
(k) An employee or job applicant shall pay the cost of additional
tests not required by the employer.
(4)(a) A laboratory may not analyze initial or confirmation drug
specimens unless:
(i) The laboratory is approved by the substance abuse and mental
health administration or the college of American pathologists;
(ii) The laboratory has written procedures to ensure the chain of
custody; and
(iii) The laboratory follows proper quality control procedures
including, but not limited to:
(A) The use of internal quality controls including the use of
samples of known concentrations that are used to check the performance
and calibration of testing equipment, and periodic use of blind samples
for overall accuracy;
(B) An internal review and certification process for test results,
conducted by a person qualified to perform that function in the testing
laboratory;
(C) Security measures implemented by the testing laboratory to
preclude adulteration of specimens and test results; and
(D) Other necessary and proper actions taken to ensure reliable and
accurate drug test results.
(b) A laboratory shall disclose to the employer a written test
result report within seven working days after receipt of the sample.
A laboratory report of a substance abuse test result must, at a
minimum, state:
(i) The name and address of the laboratory that performed the test
and the positive identification of the person tested;
(ii) Positive results on confirmation tests only, or negative
results, as applicable;
(iii) A list of the drugs for which the drug analyses were
conducted; and
(iv) The type of tests conducted for both initial and confirmation
tests and the threshold detection levels of the tests.
A report may not disclose the presence or absence of a drug other
than a specific drug and its metabolites listed under this chapter.
(c) A laboratory shall provide technical assistance through the use
of a medical review officer to the employer, employee, or job applicant
for the purpose of interpreting a positive confirmed drug test result
that could have been caused by prescription or nonprescription
medication taken by the employee or job applicant. The medical review
officer shall interpret and evaluate the laboratory's positive drug
test result and eliminate test results that could have been caused by
prescription medication or other medically documented sources in
accordance with the United States department of health and human
services medical review officer manual.
(5) A positive initial drug test must be confirmed using the gas
chromatography/mass spectrometry method or an equivalent or more
accurate scientifically accepted method approved by the substance abuse
and mental health administration as the technology becomes available in
a cost-effective form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 (1) The employee assistance program
required under this chapter shall provide the employer with a system
for dealing with employees whose job performances are declining due to
unresolved problems, including alcohol or other drug-related problems,
marital problems, or legal or financial problems.
(2) To ensure appropriate assessment and referral to treatment:
(a) The employer must notify the employees of the benefits and
services of the employee assistance program;
(b) The employer shall publish notice of the employee assistance
program in conspicuous places and explore alternative routine and
reinforcing means of publicizing the services; and
(c) The employer shall provide the employee with notice of the
policies and procedures regarding access to and use of the employee
assistance program.
(3) A list of approved employee assistance programs must be
provided by the department according to recognized program standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 (1)(a) Rehabilitation of employees
suffering from either or both alcohol or drug addiction shall be a
primary focus of an employee assistance program.
(b) Under any program under this chapter, the employer may not use
a first-time verified positive drug or alcohol test as the basis for
termination of an employee. After a first-time verified positive test
result, the employee must be given an opportunity to keep his or her
job through the use of a last-chance agreement. The last-chance
agreement shall require an employee to:
(i) Submit to an employee assistance program evaluation for
chemical dependency;
(ii) Comply with any treatment recommendations;
(iii) Be subject to follow-up drug and alcohol testing for two
years;
(iv) Meet the same standards of performance and conduct that are
set for other employees; and
(v) Authorize the employer to receive all relevant information
regarding the employee's progress in treatment, if applicable.
Failure to comply with all the terms of this agreement normally
will result in termination of employment.
(2) When substance abuse treatment is necessary, employees must use
treatment services approved by the department, which include a
continuing care component lasting for two years.
(a) The employee assistance program shall monitor the employee's
progress while in treatment, including the two-year continuing care
component, and notify the employer when an employee is not complying
with the programs's treatment recommendations.
(b) The employer shall monitor job performance and conduct follow-up testing.
(3) An employer may terminate an employee for the following
reasons:
(a) Refusal to submit to a drug or alcohol test;
(b) Refusal to agree to or failure to comply with the conditions of
a last-chance agreement;
(c) A second verified positive drug or alcohol test result; or
(d) After the first verified positive drug or alcohol test, any
violation of employer rules pertaining to alcohol and drugs.
(4) Nothing in this chapter limits the right of any employer who
participates in the worker's compensation premium discount program
under this chapter to terminate employment for any other reason.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 As part of a program established under
this chapter, an employer shall provide all employees with an annual
education program on substance abuse, in general, and its effects on
the workplace, specifically. An employer with employees who have
difficulty communicating in English shall make reasonable efforts to
help the employees understand the substance of the education program.
An education program for a minimum of one hour should include but is
not limited to the following information:
(1) The explanation of the disease model of addiction for alcohol
and drugs;
(2) The effects and dangers of the commonly abused substances in
the workplace; and
(3) The employer's policies and procedures regarding substance
abuse in the workplace and how employees who wish to obtain substance
abuse treatment can do so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 In addition to the education program
provided in section 112 of this act, an employer shall provide all
supervisory personnel with a minimum of two hours of supervisor
training, that should include but is not limited to the following
information:
(1) How to recognize signs of employee substance abuse;
(2) How to document and collaborate signs of employee substance
abuse;
(3) How to refer employees to the employee assistance program or
proper treatment providers; and
(4) Circumstances and procedures for postinjury testing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 (1) A physician-patient relationship is
not created between an employee or job applicant and an employer,
medical review officer, or person performing or evaluating a drug or
alcohol test solely by the establishment, implementation, or
administration of a drug or alcohol testing program.
(2) This chapter may not be construed to prevent an employer from
establishing reasonable work rules related to employee possession, use,
sale, or solicitation of drugs, including convictions for drug-related
offenses, and taking action based upon a violation of any of those
rules.
(3) This chapter may not be construed to operate retroactively.
This chapter does not abrogate the right of an employer under state or
federal law to conduct drug or alcohol tests or implement employee drug
or alcohol testing programs. However, only those programs that meet
the criteria outlined in this chapter qualify for workers' compensation
insurance premiums discounts.
(4) This chapter may not be construed to prohibit an employer from
conducting medical screening or other tests required, permitted, or not
disallowed by a statute or rule for the purpose of monitoring exposure
of employees to toxic or other unhealthy materials in the workplace or
in the performance of job responsibilities. The screening or tests
must be limited to testing for the specific material expressly
identified in the statute or rule, unless prior written consent of the
employee is obtained for other tests.
(5) This chapter does not establish a legal duty for employers to
conduct alcohol or drug tests of employees or job applicants. A cause
of action may not arise in favor of a person based upon the failure of
an employer to establish or conduct a program or policy for substance
abuse testing or to conduct a program or policy in conformance with the
standards and procedures established in this chapter. This chapter
does not create individual rights of action and may be enforced only by
the department by denial of the workers' compensation premium discount
provided in section 106 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 Confidentiality standards that apply to
substance abuse testing programs implemented under this chapter include
the following:
(1) Information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, and
test results, written or otherwise, received through a substance abuse
testing program are confidential communications, and may not be used or
received in evidence, obtained in discovery, or disclosed in a civil or
administrative proceeding, except as provided in subsection (5) of this
section.
(2) An employer, laboratory, medical review officer, employee
assistance program, drug or alcohol rehabilitation program, and their
agents who receive or have access to information concerning test
results shall keep the information confidential, except as provided in
subsection (5) of this section.
(3) Any release of the information must be pursuant to a written
consent form that complies with RCW 70.02.030 and is signed voluntarily
by the person tested, unless the release is compelled by the division
of alcohol and substance abuse of the department or a court of
competent jurisdiction in accordance with state and federal
confidentiality laws, or unless required by a professional or
occupational licensing board in a related disciplinary proceeding. Any
disclosure by any agency approved by the department must be in
accordance with RCW 70.96A.150. The consent form must contain at a
minimum:
(a) The name of the person who is authorized to obtain the
information;
(b) The purpose of the disclosure;
(c) The precise information to be disclosed;
(d) The duration of the consent; and
(e) The signature of the person authorizing release of the
information.
(4) Information on test results may not be released or used in a
criminal proceeding against the employee or job applicant. Information
released contrary to this subsection is inadmissible as evidence in a
criminal proceeding.
(5) Nothing in this chapter prohibits:
(a) An employer from using information concerning an employee or
job applicant's substance abuse test results in a lawful manner with
respect to that employee or applicant; or
(b) An entity that obtains the information from disclosing or using
the information in a lawful manner as part of a matter relating to the
substance abuse test, the test result, or an employer action with
respect to the job applicant or employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 The department shall adopt by rule
procedures and forms for the certification of employers who establish
and maintain a drug-free workplace that complies with this chapter.
The department shall adopt by rule procedures for the decertification
of employers formally certified for the workers' compensation premium
discount provided under this chapter. The department may charge a fee
for the certification of a drug-free workplace program in an amount
that must approximate its administrative costs related to the
certification. Certification of an employer is required for each year
in which a premium discount is granted. The department may adopt any
other rules necessary for the implementation of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 (1) The department of labor and industries
may adopt rules necessary for the implementation of this chapter
including but not limited to provisions for penalties and repayment of
premium discounts by employers that are decertified by the department
of social and health services under section 116 of this act.
(2) The department of labor and industries shall conduct an
evaluation of the effect of the premium discount provided for under
section 106 of this act on workplace safety and the state of Washington
industrial insurance fund. The department of labor and industries
shall report its preliminary findings to the appropriate committees of
the legislature on September 1st of 2007 and 2008 and shall issue a
comprehensive final report on December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 The department shall conduct an evaluation
to determine the costs and benefits of the program under this chapter.
If the department contracts for the performance of any or all of the
evaluation, no more than ten percent of the contract amount may be used
to cover indirect expenses. The department shall report its
preliminary findings to the legislature on September 1st of 2007 and
2008 and shall issue a comprehensive final report on December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 Notwithstanding any other provisions of
this chapter, the total premium discounts available under section 106
of this act shall not exceed five million dollars during any fiscal
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 Sections 102 through 119 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

Sec. 121 RCW 2.28.170 and 2005 c 504 s 504 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Counties may establish and operate drug courts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "drug court" means a court
that has special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a reduction
in recidivism and substance abuse among nonviolent, substance abusing
felony and nonfelony offenders by increasing their likelihood for
successful rehabilitation through early, continuous, and intense
judicially supervised treatment; mandatory periodic drug testing; and
the use of appropriate sanctions and other rehabilitation services.
"Drug court" also includes, but is not limited to, courts whose
jurisdiction is conferred over juvenile offenders pursuant to chapter
13.40 RCW.
(3)(a) Any jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a
drug court program must first:
(i) Exhaust all federal funding that is available to support the
operations of its drug court and associated services; and
(ii) Match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated
for drug court programs with local cash or in-kind resources. Moneys
allocated by the state must be used to supplement, not supplant, other
federal, state, and local funds for drug court operations and
associated services.
(b) Any county that establishes a drug court pursuant to this
section shall establish minimum requirements for the participation of
offenders in the program. The drug court may adopt local requirements
that are more stringent than the minimum. The minimum requirements
are:
(i) The offender would benefit from substance abuse treatment;
(ii) The offender has not previously been convicted of a serious
violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and
(iii) Without regard to whether proof of any of these elements is
required to convict, the offender is not currently charged with or
convicted of an offense:
(A) That is a sex offense;
(B) That is a serious violent offense;
(C) During which the defendant used a firearm; or
(D) During which the defendant caused substantial or great bodily
harm or death to another person.

Sec. 122 RCW 74.34.020 and 2003 c 230 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Abandonment" means action or inaction by a person or entity
with a duty of care for a vulnerable adult that leaves the vulnerable
person without the means or ability to obtain necessary food, clothing,
shelter, or health care.
(2) "Abuse" means the willful action or inaction that inflicts
injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment on a
vulnerable adult. In instances of abuse of a vulnerable adult who is
unable to express or demonstrate physical harm, pain, or mental
anguish, the abuse is presumed to cause physical harm, pain, or mental
anguish. Abuse includes sexual abuse, mental abuse, physical abuse,
and exploitation of a vulnerable adult, which have the following
meanings:
(a) "Sexual abuse" means any form of nonconsensual sexual contact,
including but not limited to unwanted or inappropriate touching, rape,
sodomy, sexual coercion, sexually explicit photographing, and sexual
harassment. Sexual abuse includes any sexual contact between a staff
person, who is not also a resident or client, of a facility or a staff
person of a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, and a
vulnerable adult living in that facility or receiving service from a
program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, whether or not it is
consensual.
(b) "Physical abuse" means the willful action of inflicting bodily
injury or physical mistreatment. Physical abuse includes, but is not
limited to, striking with or without an object, slapping, pinching,
choking, kicking, shoving, prodding, exposure to manufacture of
methamphetamine or exposure to chemicals used in the manufacture of
methamphetamine, or the use of chemical restraints or physical
restraints unless the restraints are consistent with licensing
requirements, and includes restraints that are otherwise being used
inappropriately.
(c) "Mental abuse" means any willful action or inaction of mental
or verbal abuse. Mental abuse includes, but is not limited to,
coercion, harassment, inappropriately isolating a vulnerable adult from
family, friends, or regular activity, and verbal assault that includes
ridiculing, intimidating, yelling, or swearing.
(d) "Exploitation" means an act of forcing, compelling, or exerting
undue influence over a vulnerable adult causing the vulnerable adult to
act in a way that is inconsistent with relevant past behavior, or
causing the vulnerable adult to perform services for the benefit of
another.
(3) "Consent" means express written consent granted after the
vulnerable adult or his or her legal representative has been fully
informed of the nature of the services to be offered and that the
receipt of services is voluntary.
(4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(5) "Facility" means a residence licensed or required to be
licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, boarding homes; chapter 18.51 RCW,
nursing homes; chapter 70.128 RCW, adult family homes; chapter 72.36
RCW, soldiers' homes; or chapter 71A.20 RCW, residential habilitation
centers; or any other facility licensed by the department.
(6) "Financial exploitation" means the illegal or improper use of
the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult
by any person for any person's profit or advantage.
(7) "Individual provider" means a person under contract with the
department to provide services in the home under chapter 74.09 or
74.39A RCW.
(8) "Mandated reporter" is an employee of the department; law
enforcement officer; social worker; professional school personnel;
individual provider; an employee of a facility; an operator of a
facility; an employee of a social service, welfare, mental health,
adult day health, adult day care, home health, home care, or hospice
agency; county coroner or medical examiner; Christian Science
practitioner; or health care provider subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.
(9) "Neglect" means (a) a pattern of conduct or inaction by a
person or entity with a duty of care that fails to provide the goods
and services that maintain physical or mental health of a vulnerable
adult, or that fails to avoid or prevent physical or mental harm or
pain to a vulnerable adult; or (b) an act or omission that demonstrates
a serious disregard of consequences of such a magnitude as to
constitute a clear and present danger to the vulnerable adult's health,
welfare, or safety.
(10) "Permissive reporter" means any person, employee of a
financial institution, attorney, or volunteer in a facility or program
providing services for vulnerable adults.
(11) "Protective services" means any services provided by the
department to a vulnerable adult with the consent of the vulnerable
adult, or the legal representative of the vulnerable adult, who has
been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, neglected, or in a state
of self-neglect. These services may include, but are not limited to
case management, social casework, home care, placement, arranging for
medical evaluations, psychological evaluations, day care, or referral
for legal assistance.
(12) "Self-neglect" means the failure of a vulnerable adult, not
living in a facility, to provide for himself or herself the goods and
services necessary for the vulnerable adult's physical or mental
health, and the absence of which impairs or threatens the vulnerable
adult's well-being. This definition may include a vulnerable adult who
is receiving services through home health, hospice, or a home care
agency, or an individual provider when the neglect is not a result of
inaction by that agency or individual provider.
(13) "Vulnerable adult" includes a person:
(a) Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or
physical inability to care for himself or herself; or
(b) Found incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW; or
(c) Who has a developmental disability as defined under RCW
71A.10.020; or
(d) Admitted to any facility; or
(e) Receiving services from home health, hospice, or home care
agencies licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW;
or
(f) Receiving services from an individual provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall review federal, state, and local funding
sources and funding levels available to local meth action teams through
the Washington state methamphetamine initiative to determine whether
funding is adequate to accomplish the mission of the meth action teams.
The department shall also review the funding levels for drug task
forces in the state of Washington to determine whether they may require
additional resources to successfully interdict drug trafficking
organizations and clandestine labs statewide. The department shall
report findings and recommendations to the legislature by November 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124 The department of social and health
services shall hold a summit with faith-based organizations to discuss
the appropriate role that such organizations may play in filling
support service delivery gaps to recovering drug addicts. The
department shall report findings and recommendations to the legislature
by November 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125 The agency council on coordinated
transportation shall adopt, as a part of its strategic program, a plan
to increase access by recovering addicts to existing special needs
transportation services already offered by medicaid brokerages and
local transportation coalitions. The council may also implement an
awareness campaign through department of corrections community
corrections officers and service providers licensed by the department
of social and health services division of alcohol and substance abuse
to promote to recovering addicts seeking treatment the use of special
needs transportation services, the council web site, and the statewide
trip planner. The council shall report back to the legislature
regarding the implementation of these strategies by November 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126 The department of social and health
services division of alcohol and substance abuse shall report to the
legislature by January 15, 2007, on the status of ongoing multimedia
campaigns to prevent methamphetamine use and underage drinking, and
promote treatment, within the state of Washington.

PART II
CLEANUP OF CONTAMINATED PROPERTY
Sec. 201 RCW 64.44.010 and 1999 c 292 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The words and phrases defined in this section shall have the
following meanings when used in this chapter unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise.
(1) "Authorized contractor" means a person who decontaminates,
demolishes, or disposes of contaminated property as required by this
chapter who is certified by the department as provided for in RCW
64.44.060.
(2) "Contaminated" or "contamination" means polluted by hazardous
chemicals so that the property is unfit for human habitation or use due
to immediate or long-term hazards. Property that at one time was
contaminated but has been satisfactorily decontaminated according to
procedures established by the state board of health is not
"contaminated."
(3) "Department" means the department of health.
(4) "Hazardous chemicals" means the following substances ((used
in)) associated with the manufacture of illegal drugs: (a) Hazardous
substances as defined in RCW 70.105D.020((, and)); (b) precursor
substances as defined in RCW 69.43.010 which the state board of health,
in consultation with the state board of pharmacy, has determined
present an immediate or long-term health hazard to humans; and (c) the
controlled substance or substances being manufactured, as defined in
RCW 69.50.101.
(((4))) (5) "Officer" means a local health officer authorized under
chapters 70.05, 70.08, and 70.46 RCW.
(((5))) (6) "Property" means any real or personal property, ((site,
structure, or part of a structure which)) or segregable part thereof,
that is involved in or affected by the unauthorized manufacture,
distribution, or storage of hazardous chemicals. This includes but is
not limited to single-family residences, units of multiplexes,
condominiums, apartment buildings, motels, hotels, boats, motor
vehicles, trailers, manufactured housing, ((or)) any shop, booth,
((or)) garden, or storage shed, and all contents of the items
referenced in this subsection.

Sec. 202 RCW 64.44.020 and 1999 c 292 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever a law enforcement agency becomes aware that property has
been contaminated by hazardous chemicals, that agency shall report the
contamination to the local health officer. The local health officer
shall ((post)) cause a posting of a written warning on the premises
within one working day of notification of the contamination and shall
inspect the property within fourteen days after receiving the notice of
contamination. The warning shall inform the potential occupants that
hazardous chemicals may exist on, or have been removed from, the
premises and that entry is unsafe. If a property owner believes that
a tenant has contaminated property that was being leased or rented, and
the property is vacated or abandoned, then the property owner shall
contact the local health officer about the possible contamination.
Local health officers or boards may charge property owners reasonable
fees for inspections of suspected contaminated property requested by
property owners.
A local health officer may enter, inspect, and survey at reasonable
times any properties for which there are reasonable grounds to believe
that the property has become contaminated. If the property is
contaminated, the local health officer shall post a written notice
declaring that the officer intends to issue an order prohibiting use of
the property as long as the property is contaminated.
If access to the property is denied, a superior, district, or
municipal court within the jurisdiction of the property may, based upon
cause to believe that the property is contaminated, issue warrants for
the purpose of conducting administrative inspections and seizure of
property appropriate to the inspections.
Local health officers must report all cases of contaminated
property to the state department of health. The department may make
the list of contaminated properties available to health associations,
landlord and realtor organizations, prosecutors, and other interested
groups. The department shall promptly update the list of contaminated
properties to remove those which have been decontaminated according to
provisions of this chapter.
The local health officer may determine when the services of an
authorized contractor are necessary.

Sec. 203 RCW 64.44.030 and 1999 c 292 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If after the inspection of the property, the local health
officer finds that it is contaminated, then the ((property shall be
found unfit for)) local health officer shall issue an order declaring
the property unfit and prohibiting its use. The local health officer
shall cause the order to be served ((an order prohibiting use)) either
personally or by certified mail, with return receipt requested, upon
all occupants and persons having any interest therein as shown upon the
records of the auditor's office of the county in which such property is
located. The local health officer shall also ((post)) cause the order
((prohibiting use)) to be posted in a conspicuous place on the
property. If the whereabouts of such persons is unknown and the same
cannot be ascertained by the local health officer in the exercise of
reasonable diligence, and the health officer makes an affidavit to that
effect, then the serving of the order upon such persons may be made
either by personal service or by mailing a copy of the order by
certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to each
person at the address appearing on the last equalized tax assessment
roll of the county where the property is located or at the address
known to the county assessor, and the order shall be posted
conspicuously at the residence. A copy of the order shall also be
mailed, addressed to each person or party having a recorded right,
title, estate, lien, or interest in the property. The order shall
contain a notice that a hearing before the local health board or
officer shall be held upon the request of a person required to be
notified of the order under this section. The request for a hearing
must be made within ten days of serving the order. The hearing shall
then be held within not less than twenty days nor more than thirty days
after the serving of the order. The officer shall prohibit use as long
as the property is found to be contaminated. A copy of the order shall
also be filed with the auditor of the county in which the property is
located, where the order pertains to real property, and such filing of
the complaint or order shall have the same force and effect as other
lis pendens notices provided by law. In any hearing concerning whether
property is fit for use, the property owner has the burden of showing
that the property is decontaminated or fit for use. The owner or any
person having an interest in the property may file an appeal on any
order issued by the local health board or officer within thirty days
from the date of service of the order with the appeals commission
established pursuant to RCW 35.80.030. All proceedings before the
appeals commission, including any subsequent appeals to superior court,
shall be governed by the procedures established in chapter 35.80 RCW.
(2) If the local health officer determines immediate action is
necessary to protect public health, safety, or the environment, the
officer may issue or cause to be issued an emergency order, and any
person to whom such an order is directed shall comply immediately.
Emergency orders issued pursuant to this section shall expire no later
than seventy-two hours after issuance and shall not impair the health
officer from seeking an order under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 204 RCW 64.44.040 and 1999 c 292 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon issuance of an order declaring property unfit and
prohibiting its use, the city or county in which the contaminated
property is located may take action to prohibit use, occupancy, or
removal of such property; condemn, decontaminate, or demolish the
property; or ((to)) require that the property be vacated or the
contents removed from the property. The city or county may use an
authorized contractor if property is demolished, decontaminated, or
removed under this section. The city, county, or contractor shall
comply with all orders of the health officer during these processes.
No city or county may condemn, decontaminate, or demolish property
pursuant to this section until all procedures granting the right of
notice and the opportunity to appeal in RCW 64.44.030 have been
exhausted, but may prohibit use, occupancy, or removal of contaminated
property pending appeal of the order.
(2)(a) It is unlawful for any person to enter upon any property, or
to remove any property, that has been found unfit for use by a local
health officer pursuant to RCW 64.44.030.
(b) This section does not apply to: (i) Health officials, law
enforcement officials, or other government agents performing their
official duties; (ii) authorized contractors or owners performing
decontamination pursuant to authorization by the local health officer;
and (iii) any person acting with permission of a local health officer,
or of a superior court hearing examiner following an appeal of a
decision of the local health officer.
(c) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor.

Sec. 205 RCW 64.44.050 and 1999 c 292 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An owner of contaminated property who desires to have the
property decontaminated, demolished, or disposed of shall use the
services of an authorized contractor unless otherwise authorized by the
local health officer. The contractor and property owner shall prepare
and submit a written work plan for decontamination, demolishing, or
disposal to the local health officer. The local health officer may
charge a reasonable fee for review of the work plan. If the work plan
is approved and the decontamination, demolishing, or disposal is
completed and the property is retested according to the plan and
properly documented, then the health officer shall allow reuse of the
property. A release for reuse document shall be recorded in the real
property records indicating the property has been decontaminated,
demolished, or disposed of in accordance with rules of the state
department of health. The property owner is responsible for: (a) The
costs of any property testing which may be required to demonstrate the
presence or absence of hazardous chemicals; and (b) the costs of the
property's decontamination, demolishing, and disposal expenses, as well
as costs incurred by the local health officer resulting from the
enforcement of this chapter.
(2) The local health officer may establish a time period in which
decontamination, demolishing, and disposal shall be completed. The
local health officer, city, or county may assess a fine or institute
appropriate action upon failure to meet the decontamination,
demolishing, and disposal deadline.

Sec. 206 RCW 64.44.060 and 1999 c 292 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A contractor, supervisor, or worker may not perform
decontamination, demolition, or disposal work unless issued a
certificate by the state department of health. The department shall
establish performance standards for contractors, supervisors, and
workers by rule in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act. The department shall train and test, or
may approve courses to train and test, contractors, supervisors, and
((their employees)) workers on the essential elements in assessing
property used as an illegal drug manufacturing or storage site to
determine hazard reduction measures needed, techniques for adequately
reducing contaminants, use of personal protective equipment, methods
for proper decontamination, demolition, removal, and disposal of
contaminated property, and relevant federal and state regulations.
Upon successful completion of the training, and after a background
check, the contractor, supervisor, or ((employee)) worker shall be
certified.
(2) The department may require the successful completion of annual
refresher courses provided or approved by the department for the
continued certification of the contractor or employee.
(3) The department shall provide for reciprocal certification of
any individual trained to engage in decontamination, demolition, or
disposal work in another state when the prior training is shown to be
substantially similar to the training required by the department. The
department may require such individuals to take an examination or
refresher course before certification.
(4) The department may deny, suspend, ((or)) revoke, or place
restrictions on a certificate for failure to comply with the
requirements of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this
chapter. A certificate may be denied, suspended, ((or)) revoked, or
have restrictions placed on it on any of the following grounds:
(a) Failing to perform decontamination, demolition, or disposal
work under the supervision of trained personnel;
(b) Failing to perform decontamination, demolition, or disposal
work using department of health certified decontamination personnel;
(c) Failing to file a work plan;
(((c))) (d) Failing to perform work pursuant to the work plan;
(((d))) (e) Failing to perform work that meets the requirements of
the department and the requirements of the local health officers;
(((e) The certificate was obtained by error, misrepresentation, or
fraud; or))
(f) Failing to properly dispose of contaminated property;
(g) Committing fraud or misrepresentation in: (i) Applying for or
obtaining a certification, recertification, or reinstatement; (ii)
seeking approval of a work plan; and (iii) documenting completion of
work to the department or local health officer;
(h) Failing to cooperate with the department or the local health
officer;
(i) Failing the evaluation and inspection of decontamination
projects pursuant to section 208 of this act;
(j) Conviction of any gross misdemeanor or felony. For purposes of
this subsection, "conviction" is intended to apply to all instances in
which an adjudication of guilt has occurred, whether or not a deferred
or alternative sentence has been imposed; or
(k) If the person has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by
the department of social and health services as a person who is not in
compliance with a support order or a residential or visitation order.
If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for
reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or
certificate shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a
release issued by the department of social and health services stating
that the person is in compliance with the order.
(5) A contractor, supervisor, or worker who violates any provision
of this chapter may be assessed a fine not to exceed five hundred
dollars for each violation.
(6) The department of health shall prescribe fees as provided for
in RCW 43.70.250 for the issuance and renewal of certificates, the
administration of examinations, and for the review of training courses.
(7) The decontamination account is hereby established in the state
treasury. All fees collected under this chapter shall be deposited in
this account. Moneys in the account may only be spent after
appropriation for costs incurred by the department in the
administration and enforcement of this chapter.

Sec. 207 RCW 64.44.070 and 1999 c 292 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of health shall promulgate rules and standards
for carrying out the provisions in this chapter in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act. The local board
of health and the local health officer are authorized to exercise such
powers as may be necessary to carry out this chapter. The department
shall provide technical assistance to local health boards and health
officers to carry out their duties under this chapter.
(2) The department shall adopt rules for decontamination of a
property used as an illegal drug laboratory and methods for the testing
of porous and nonporous surfaces, ground water, surface water, soil,
and septic tanks for contamination. The rules shall establish
decontamination standards for hazardous chemicals, including but not
limited to methamphetamine, lead, mercury, and total volatile organic
compounds. The department shall also adopt rules pertaining to
independent third party sampling to verify satisfactory decontamination
of property deemed contaminated and unfit for use. For the purposes of
this section, an independent third party sampler is a person who is not
an employee, agent, representative, partner, joint venturer,
shareholder, or parent or subsidiary company of the clandestine drug
laboratory decontamination contractor, the contractor's company, or
property owner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 A new section is added to chapter 64.44
RCW to read as follows:
The department may evaluate annually a number of the property
decontamination projects performed by licensed contractors to determine
the adequacy of the decontamination work, using the services of an
independent environmental contractor or state or local agency. If a
project fails the evaluation and inspection, the contractor is subject
to a civil penalty and license suspension, pursuant to RCW 64.44.060
(4) and (5); and the contractor is prohibited from performing
additional work until deficiencies have been corrected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 A new section is added to chapter 64.44
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The methamphetamine contamination cleanup account is created in
the state treasury. All receipts from appropriations for this purpose
must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for cleanup of residential rental properties contaminated by
methamphetamine production.
(2) The department of health shall review applications and make
grants to landlords who own residential rental properties that have
been contaminated by methamphetamine production. The department may
only make grants to landlords who had no knowledge or consent
concerning the production of methamphetamine on the property.

Sec. 210 RCW 70.105D.020 and 2005 c 191 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) "Agreed order" means an order issued by the department under
this chapter with which the potentially liable person receiving the
order agrees to comply. An agreed order may be used to require or
approve any cleanup or other remedial actions but it is not a
settlement under RCW 70.105D.040(4) and shall not contain a covenant
not to sue, or provide protection from claims for contribution, or
provide eligibility for public funding of remedial actions under RCW
70.105D.070(2)(d)(xi).
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Director" means the director of ecology or the director's
designee.
(4) "Facility" means (a) any building, structure, installation,
equipment, pipe or pipeline (including any pipe into a sewer or
publicly owned treatment works), well, pit, pond, lagoon, impoundment,
ditch, landfill, storage container, motor vehicle, rolling stock,
vessel, or aircraft, or (b) any site or area where a hazardous
substance, other than a consumer product in consumer use, has been
deposited, stored, disposed of, or placed, or otherwise come to be
located.
(5) "Federal cleanup law" means the federal comprehensive
environmental response, compensation, and liability act of 1980, 42
U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq., as amended by Public Law 99-499.
(6) "Foreclosure and its equivalents" means purchase at a
foreclosure sale, acquisition, or assignment of title in lieu of
foreclosure, termination of a lease, or other repossession, acquisition
of a right to title or possession, an agreement in satisfaction of the
obligation, or any other comparable formal or informal manner, whether
pursuant to law or under warranties, covenants, conditions,
representations, or promises from the borrower, by which the holder
acquires title to or possession of a facility securing a loan or other
obligation.
(7) "Hazardous substance" means:
(a) Any dangerous or extremely hazardous waste as defined in RCW
70.105.010 (5) and (6), or any dangerous or extremely dangerous waste
designated by rule pursuant to chapter 70.105 RCW;
(b) Any hazardous substance as defined in RCW 70.105.010(14) or any
hazardous substance as defined by rule pursuant to chapter 70.105 RCW;
(c) Any substance that, on March 1, 1989, is a hazardous substance
under section 101(14) of the federal cleanup law, 42 U.S.C. Sec.
9601(14);
(d) Petroleum or petroleum products; and
(e) Any substance or category of substances, including solid waste
decomposition products, determined by the director by rule to present
a threat to human health or the environment if released into the
environment.
The term hazardous substance does not include any of the following
when contained in an underground storage tank from which there is not
a release: Crude oil or any fraction thereof or petroleum, if the tank
is in compliance with all applicable federal, state, and local law.
(8) "Independent remedial actions" means remedial actions conducted
without department oversight or approval, and not under an order,
agreed order, or consent decree.
(9) "Holder" means a person who holds indicia of ownership
primarily to protect a security interest. A holder includes the
initial holder such as the loan originator, any subsequent holder such
as a successor-in-interest or subsequent purchaser of the security
interest on the secondary market, a guarantor of an obligation, surety,
or any other person who holds indicia of ownership primarily to protect
a security interest, or a receiver, court-appointed trustee, or other
person who acts on behalf or for the benefit of a holder. A holder can
be a public or privately owned financial institution, receiver,
conservator, loan guarantor, or other similar persons that loan money
or guarantee repayment of a loan. Holders typically are banks or
savings and loan institutions but may also include others such as
insurance companies, pension funds, or private individuals that engage
in loaning of money or credit.
(10) "Indicia of ownership" means evidence of a security interest,
evidence of an interest in a security interest, or evidence of an
interest in a facility securing a loan or other obligation, including
any legal or equitable title to a facility acquired incident to
foreclosure and its equivalents. Evidence of such interests includes,
mortgages, deeds of trust, sellers interest in a real estate contract,
liens, surety bonds, and guarantees of obligations, title held pursuant
to a lease financing transaction in which the lessor does not select
initially the leased facility, or legal or equitable title obtained
pursuant to foreclosure and their equivalents. Evidence of such
interests also includes assignments, pledges, or other rights to or
other forms of encumbrance against the facility that are held primarily
to protect a security interest.
(11) "Operating a facility primarily to protect a security
interest" occurs when all of the following are met: (a) Operating the
facility where the borrower has defaulted on the loan or otherwise
breached the security agreement; (b) operating the facility to preserve
the value of the facility as an ongoing business; (c) the operation is
being done in anticipation of a sale, transfer, or assignment of the
facility; and (d) the operation is being done primarily to protect a
security interest. Operating a facility for longer than one year prior
to foreclosure or its equivalents shall be presumed to be operating the
facility for other than to protect a security interest.
(12) "Owner or operator" means:
(a) Any person with any ownership interest in the facility or who
exercises any control over the facility; or
(b) In the case of an abandoned facility, any person who had owned,
or operated, or exercised control over the facility any time before its
abandonment;
The term does not include:
(i) An agency of the state or unit of local government which
acquired ownership or control through a drug forfeiture action under
RCW 69.50.505, through a voluntary conveyance for the purpose of
remediating the property for a public purpose, or involuntarily through
bankruptcy, tax delinquency, abandonment, or other circumstances in
which the government involuntarily acquires title. This exclusion does
not apply to an agency of the state or unit of local government which
has caused or contributed to the release or threatened release of a
hazardous substance from the facility;
(ii) A person who, without participating in the management of a
facility, holds indicia of ownership primarily to protect the person's
security interest in the facility. Holders after foreclosure and its
equivalent and holders who engage in any of the activities identified
in subsection (13)(e) through (g) of this section shall not lose this
exemption provided the holder complies with all of the following:
(A) The holder properly maintains the environmental compliance
measures already in place at the facility;
(B) The holder complies with the reporting requirements in the
rules adopted under this chapter;
(C) The holder complies with any order issued to the holder by the
department to abate an imminent or substantial endangerment;
(D) The holder allows the department or potentially liable persons
under an order, agreed order, or settlement agreement under this
chapter access to the facility to conduct remedial actions and does not
impede the conduct of such remedial actions;
(E) Any remedial actions conducted by the holder are in compliance
with any preexisting requirements identified by the department, or, if
the department has not identified such requirements for the facility,
the remedial actions are conducted consistent with the rules adopted
under this chapter; and
(F) The holder does not exacerbate an existing release. The
exemption in this subsection (12)(b)(ii) does not apply to holders who
cause or contribute to a new release or threatened release or who are
otherwise liable under RCW 70.105D.040(1) (b), (c), (d), and (e);
provided, however, that a holder shall not lose this exemption if it
establishes that any such new release has been remediated according to
the requirements of this chapter and that any hazardous substances
remaining at the facility after remediation of the new release are
divisible from such new release;
(iii) A fiduciary in his, her, or its personal or individual
capacity. This exemption does not preclude a claim against the assets
of the estate or trust administered by the fiduciary or against a
nonemployee agent or independent contractor retained by a fiduciary.
This exemption also does not apply to the extent that a person is
liable under this chapter independently of the person's ownership as a
fiduciary or for actions taken in a fiduciary capacity which cause or
contribute to a new release or exacerbate an existing release of
hazardous substances. This exemption applies provided that, to the
extent of the fiduciary's powers granted by law or by the applicable
governing instrument granting fiduciary powers, the fiduciary complies
with all of the following:
(A) The fiduciary properly maintains the environmental compliance
measures already in place at the facility;
(B) The fiduciary complies with the reporting requirements in the
rules adopted under this chapter;
(C) The fiduciary complies with any order issued to the fiduciary
by the department to abate an imminent or substantial endangerment;
(D) The fiduciary allows the department or potentially liable
persons under an order, agreed order, or settlement agreement under
this chapter access to the facility to conduct remedial actions and
does not impede the conduct of such remedial actions;
(E) Any remedial actions conducted by the fiduciary are in
compliance with any preexisting requirements identified by the
department, or, if the department has not identified such requirements
for the facility, the remedial actions are conducted consistent with
the rules adopted under this chapter; and
(F) The fiduciary does not exacerbate an existing release.
The exemption in this subsection (12)(b)(iii) does not apply to
fiduciaries who cause or contribute to a new release or threatened
release or who are otherwise liable under RCW 70.105D.040(1) (b), (c),
(d), and (e); provided however, that a fiduciary shall not lose this
exemption if it establishes that any such new release has been
remediated according to the requirements of this chapter and that any
hazardous substances remaining at the facility after remediation of the
new release are divisible from such new release. The exemption in this
subsection (12)(b)(iii) also does not apply where the fiduciary's
powers to comply with this subsection (12)(b)(iii) are limited by a
governing instrument created with the objective purpose of avoiding
liability under this chapter or of avoiding compliance with this
chapter; or
(iv) Any person who has any ownership interest in, operates, or
exercises control over real property where a hazardous substance has
come to be located solely as a result of migration of the hazardous
substance to the real property through the ground water from a source
off the property, if:
(A) The person can demonstrate that the hazardous substance has not
been used, placed, managed, or otherwise handled on the property in a
manner likely to cause or contribute to a release of the hazardous
substance that has migrated onto the property;
(B) The person has not caused or contributed to the release of the
hazardous substance;
(C) The person does not engage in activities that damage or
interfere with the operation of remedial actions installed on the
person's property or engage in activities that result in exposure of
humans or the environment to the contaminated ground water that has
migrated onto the property;
(D) If requested, the person allows the department, potentially
liable persons who are subject to an order, agreed order, or consent
decree, and the authorized employees, agents, or contractors of each,
access to the property to conduct remedial actions required by the
department. The person may attempt to negotiate an access agreement
before allowing access; and
(E) Legal withdrawal of ground water does not disqualify a person
from the exemption in this subsection (12)(b)(iv).
(13) "Participation in management" means exercising decision-making
control over the borrower's operation of the facility, environmental
compliance, or assuming or manifesting responsibility for the overall
management of the enterprise encompassing the day-to-day decision
making of the enterprise.
The term does not include any of the following: (a) A holder with
the mere capacity or ability to influence, or the unexercised right to
control facility operations; (b) a holder who conducts or requires a
borrower to conduct an environmental audit or an environmental site
assessment at the facility for which indicia of ownership is held; (c)
a holder who requires a borrower to come into compliance with any
applicable laws or regulations at the facility for which indicia of
ownership is held; (d) a holder who requires a borrower to conduct
remedial actions including setting minimum requirements, but does not
otherwise control or manage the borrower's remedial actions or the
scope of the borrower's remedial actions except to prepare a facility
for sale, transfer, or assignment; (e) a holder who engages in workout
or policing activities primarily to protect the holder's security
interest in the facility; (f) a holder who prepares a facility for
sale, transfer, or assignment or requires a borrower to prepare a
facility for sale, transfer, or assignment; (g) a holder who operates
a facility primarily to protect a security interest, or requires a
borrower to continue to operate, a facility primarily to protect a
security interest; and (h) a prospective holder who, as a condition of
becoming a holder, requires an owner or operator to conduct an
environmental audit, conduct an environmental site assessment, come
into compliance with any applicable laws or regulations, or conduct
remedial actions prior to holding a security interest is not
participating in the management of the facility.
(14) "Person" means an individual, firm, corporation, association,
partnership, consortium, joint venture, commercial entity, state
government agency, unit of local government, federal government agency,
or Indian tribe.
(15) "Policing activities" means actions the holder takes to insure
that the borrower complies with the terms of the loan or security
interest or actions the holder takes or requires the borrower to take
to maintain the value of the security. Policing activities include:
Requiring the borrower to conduct remedial actions at the facility
during the term of the security interest; requiring the borrower to
comply or come into compliance with applicable federal, state, and
local environmental and other laws, regulations, and permits during the
term of the security interest; securing or exercising authority to
monitor or inspect the facility including on-site inspections, or to
monitor or inspect the borrower's business or financial condition
during the term of the security interest; or taking other actions
necessary to adequately police the loan or security interest such as
requiring a borrower to comply with any warranties, covenants,
conditions, representations, or promises from the borrower.
(16) "Potentially liable person" means any person whom the
department finds, based on credible evidence, to be liable under RCW
70.105D.040. The department shall give notice to any such person and
allow an opportunity for comment before making the finding, unless an
emergency requires otherwise.
(17) "Prepare a facility for sale, transfer, or assignment" means
to secure access to the facility; perform routine maintenance on the
facility; remove inventory, equipment, or structures; properly maintain
environmental compliance measures already in place at the facility;
conduct remedial actions to clean up releases at the facility; or to
perform other similar activities intended to preserve the value of the
facility where the borrower has defaulted on the loan or otherwise
breached the security agreement or after foreclosure and its
equivalents and in anticipation of a pending sale, transfer, or
assignment, primarily to protect the holder's security interest in the
facility. A holder can prepare a facility for sale, transfer, or
assignment for up to one year prior to foreclosure and its equivalents
and still stay within the security interest exemption in subsection
(12)(b)(ii) of this section.
(18) "Primarily to protect a security interest" means the indicia
of ownership is held primarily for the purpose of securing payment or
performance of an obligation. The term does not include indicia of
ownership held primarily for investment purposes nor indicia of
ownership held primarily for purposes other than as protection for a
security interest. A holder may have other, secondary reasons, for
maintaining indicia of ownership, but the primary reason must be for
protection of a security interest. Holding indicia of ownership after
foreclosure or its equivalents for longer than five years shall be
considered to be holding the indicia of ownership for purposes other
than primarily to protect a security interest. For facilities that
have been acquired through foreclosure or its equivalents prior to July
23, 1995, this five-year period shall begin as of July 23, 1995.
(19) "Public notice" means, at a minimum, adequate notice mailed to
all persons who have made timely request of the department and to
persons residing in the potentially affected vicinity of the proposed
action; mailed to appropriate news media; published in the newspaper of
largest circulation in the city or county of the proposed action; and
opportunity for interested persons to comment.
(20) "Release" means any intentional or unintentional entry of any
hazardous substance into the environment, including but not limited to
the abandonment or disposal of containers of hazardous substances.
(21) "Remedy" or "remedial action" means any action or expenditure
consistent with the purposes of this chapter to identify, eliminate, or
minimize any threat or potential threat posed by hazardous substances
to human health or the environment including any investigative and
monitoring activities with respect to any release or threatened release
of a hazardous substance and any health assessments or health effects
studies conducted in order to determine the risk or potential risk to
human health.
(22) "Security interest" means an interest in a facility created or
established for the purpose of securing a loan or other obligation.
Security interests include deeds of trusts, sellers interest in a real
estate contract, liens, legal, or equitable title to a facility
acquired incident to foreclosure and its equivalents, and title
pursuant to lease financing transactions. Security interests may also
arise from transactions such as sale and leasebacks, conditional sales,
installment sales, trust receipt transactions, certain assignments,
factoring agreements, accounts receivable financing arrangements,
easements, and consignments, if the transaction creates or establishes
an interest in a facility for the purpose of securing a loan or other
obligation.
(23) "Industrial properties" means properties that are or have been
characterized by, or are to be committed to, traditional industrial
uses such as processing or manufacturing of materials, marine terminal
and transportation areas and facilities, fabrication, assembly,
treatment, or distribution of manufactured products, or storage of bulk
materials, that are either:
(a) Zoned for industrial use by a city or county conducting land
use planning under chapter 36.70A RCW; or
(b) For counties not planning under chapter 36.70A RCW and the
cities within them, zoned for industrial use and adjacent to properties
currently used or designated for industrial purposes.
(24) "Workout activities" means those actions by which a holder, at
any time prior to foreclosure and its equivalents, seeks to prevent,
cure, or mitigate a default by the borrower or obligor; or to preserve,
or prevent the diminution of, the value of the security. Workout
activities include: Restructuring or renegotiating the terms of the
security interest; requiring payment of additional rent or interest;
exercising forbearance; requiring or exercising rights pursuant to an
assignment of accounts or other amounts owed to an obligor; requiring
or exercising rights pursuant to an escrow agreement pertaining to
amounts owed to an obligor; providing specific or general financial or
other advice, suggestions, counseling, or guidance; and exercising any
right or remedy the holder is entitled to by law or under any
warranties, covenants, conditions, representations, or promises from
the borrower.
(25)(a) "Fiduciary" means a person acting for the benefit of
another party as a bona fide trustee; executor; administrator;
custodian; guardian of estates or guardian ad litem; receiver;
conservator; committee of estates of incapacitated persons; trustee in
bankruptcy; trustee, under an indenture agreement, trust agreement,
lease, or similar financing agreement, for debt securities,
certificates of interest or certificates of participation in debt
securities, or other forms of indebtedness as to which the trustee is
not, in the capacity of trustee, the lender. Except as provided in
subsection (12)(b)(iii) of this section, the liability of a fiduciary
under this chapter shall not exceed the assets held in the fiduciary
capacity.
(b) "Fiduciary" does not mean:
(i) A person acting as a fiduciary with respect to a trust or other
fiduciary estate that was organized for the primary purpose of, or is
engaged in, actively carrying on a trade or business for profit, unless
the trust or other fiduciary estate was created as part of, or to
facilitate, one or more estate plans or because of the incapacity of a
natural person;
(ii) A person who acquires ownership or control of a facility with
the objective purpose of avoiding liability of the person or any other
person. It is prima facie evidence that the fiduciary acquired
ownership or control of the facility to avoid liability if the facility
is the only substantial asset in the fiduciary estate at the time the
facility became subject to the fiduciary estate;
(iii) A person who acts in a capacity other than that of a
fiduciary or in a beneficiary capacity and in that capacity directly or
indirectly benefits from a trust or fiduciary relationship;
(iv) A person who is a beneficiary and fiduciary with respect to
the same fiduciary estate, and who while acting as a fiduciary receives
benefits that exceed customary or reasonable compensation, and
incidental benefits permitted under applicable law;
(v) A person who is a fiduciary and receives benefits that
substantially exceed customary or reasonable compensation, and
incidental benefits permitted under applicable law; or
(vi) A person who acts in the capacity of trustee of state or
federal lands or resources.
(26) "Fiduciary capacity" means the capacity of a person holding
title to a facility, or otherwise having control of an interest in the
facility pursuant to the exercise of the responsibilities of the person
as a fiduciary.

PART III
CRIMINAL SANCTIONS AND PROCEDURE
Sec. 301 RCW 9.94A.533 and 2003 c 53 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence
ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.
(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the
standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid
sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the
seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by
seventy-five percent.
(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm
enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is
subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is
being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to
commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to
the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class
C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both,
and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements
under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has
previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July
23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection
(4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm
enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the
enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all
felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed
felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to
the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which
underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of
the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon
enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section
based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c)
of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender
has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after
July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or
subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly
weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of
the enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to
all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense
while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender
is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If
the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in
this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility,
and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under
chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(a) or (b) or 69.50.410;
(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(c), (d), or (e);
(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.
For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a
state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part
of that facility or county jail.
(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter
69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or
9.94A.605. All enhancements under this subsection shall run
consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, for all offenses
sentenced under this chapter.
(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence
range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each
prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.

Sec. 302 RCW 9.94A.728 and 2004 c 176 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
No person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and
committed to the custody of the department shall leave the confines of
the correctional facility or be released prior to the expiration of the
sentence except as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (2) of this
section, the term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and promulgated by the correctional agency having
jurisdiction in which the offender is confined. The earned release
time shall be for good behavior and good performance, as determined by
the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency
shall not credit the offender with earned release credits in advance of
the offender actually earning the credits. Any program established
pursuant to this section shall allow an offender to earn early release
credits for presentence incarceration. If an offender is transferred
from a county jail to the department, the administrator of a county
jail facility shall certify to the department the amount of time spent
in custody at the facility and the amount of earned release time. An
offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after July 23,
1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good time credits
or earned release time for that portion of his or her sentence that
results from any deadly weapon enhancements.
(a) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In the
case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex
offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 2003,
the aggregate earned release time may not exceed ten percent of the
sentence.
(b)(i) In the case of an offender who qualifies under (b)(ii) of
this subsection, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed fifty
percent of the sentence.
(ii) An offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time under this subsection (1)(b) if he or
she:
(A) Is classified in one of the two lowest risk categories under
(b)(iii) of this subsection;
(B) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; ((or))
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
((and))
(C) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence imposed under RCW
9.94A.660; and
(D) Has no prior conviction for:
(I) A sex offense;
(II) A violent offense;
(III) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(IV) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW
10.99.020;
(V) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(VI) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(VII) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor).
(iii) For purposes of determining an offender's eligibility under
this subsection (1)(b), the department shall perform a risk assessment
of every offender committed to a correctional facility operated by the
department who has no current or prior conviction for a sex offense, a
violent offense, a crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411,
a felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020, a
violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary), a violation of, or
an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.401 by
manufacture or delivery or possession with intent to deliver
methamphetamine, or a violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy to violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled
substance to a minor). The department must classify each assessed
offender in one of four risk categories between highest and lowest
risk.
(iv) The department shall recalculate the earned release time and
reschedule the expected release dates for each qualified offender under
this subsection (1)(b).
(v) This subsection (1)(b) applies retroactively to eligible
offenders serving terms of total confinement in a state correctional
facility as of July 1, 2003.
(vi) This subsection (1)(b) does not apply to offenders convicted
after July 1, 2010.
(c) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence;
(2)(a) A person convicted of a sex offense or an offense
categorized as a serious violent offense, assault in the second degree,
vehicular homicide, vehicular assault, assault of a child in the second
degree, any crime against persons where it is determined in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.602 that the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed before July 1, 2000, may become
eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the department, for
transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned release time
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(b) A person convicted of a sex offense, a violent offense, any
crime against persons under RCW 9.94A.411(2), or a felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, committed on or after July 1, 2000, may
become eligible, in accordance with a program developed by the
department, for transfer to community custody status in lieu of earned
release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(c) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community placement or community
custody terms eligible for release to community custody status in lieu
of earned release shall provide an approved residence and living
arrangement prior to release to the community;
(d) The department may deny transfer to community custody status in
lieu of earned release time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
if the department determines an offender's release plan, including
proposed residence location and living arrangements, may violate the
conditions of the sentence or conditions of supervision, place the
offender at risk to violate the conditions of the sentence, place the
offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk to victim safety or
community safety. The department's authority under this section is
independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence or statutory
provision regarding conditions for community custody or community
placement;
(e) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(4)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section;
(3) An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an
authorized furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may
leave a correctional facility when in the custody of a corrections
officer or officers;
(4)(a) The secretary may authorize an extraordinary medical
placement for an offender when all of the following conditions exist:
(i) The offender has a medical condition that is serious enough to
require costly care or treatment;
(ii) The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or
she is physically incapacitated due to age or the medical condition;
and
(iii) Granting the extraordinary medical placement will result in
a cost savings to the state.
(b) An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without
the possibility of release or parole is not eligible for an
extraordinary medical placement.
(c) The secretary shall require electronic monitoring for all
offenders in extraordinary medical placement unless the electronic
monitoring equipment interferes with the function of the offender's
medical equipment or results in the loss of funding for the offender's
medical care. The secretary shall specify who shall provide the
monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed.
(d) The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical placement
under this subsection at any time;
(5) The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons
board, may grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health
problems, senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or
other extraordinary circumstances;
(6) No more than the final six months of the sentence may be served
in partial confinement designed to aid the offender in finding work and
reestablishing himself or herself in the community;
(7) The governor may pardon any offender;
(8) The department may release an offender from confinement any
time within ten days before a release date calculated under this
section; and
(9) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to
completion of his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as
provided in RCW 9.94A.870.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an offender
sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.540 as subject to a
mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not be released
from total confinement before the completion of the listed mandatory
minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless allowed
under RCW 9.94A.540, however persistent offenders are not eligible for
extraordinary medical placement.

Sec. 303 RCW 9.94A.500 and 2000 c 75 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before imposing a sentence upon a defendant, the court shall
conduct a sentencing hearing. The sentencing hearing shall be held
within forty court days following conviction. Upon the motion of
either party for good cause shown, or on its own motion, the court may
extend the time period for conducting the sentencing hearing.
Except in cases where the defendant shall be sentenced to a term of
total confinement for life without the possibility of release or, when
authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for the crime of aggravated murder in the
first degree, sentenced to death, the court may order the department to
complete a risk assessment report. If available before sentencing, the
report shall be provided to the court.
Unless specifically waived by the court, the court shall order the
department to complete a chemical dependency screening report before
imposing a sentence upon a defendant who has been convicted of ((a
violation of the uniform controlled substances act under chapter 69.50
RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation under chapter
9A.28 RCW)) any felony where the court finds that the offender has a
chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense. In
addition, the court shall, at the time of plea or conviction, order the
department to complete a presentence report before imposing a sentence
upon a defendant who has been convicted of a felony ((sexual offense)).
The department of corrections shall give priority to presentence
investigations for sexual offenders. If the court determines that the
defendant may be a mentally ill person as defined in RCW 71.24.025,
although the defendant has not established that at the time of the
crime he or she lacked the capacity to commit the crime, was
incompetent to commit the crime, or was insane at the time of the
crime, the court shall order the department to complete a presentence
report before imposing a sentence.
The court shall consider the risk assessment report and presentence
reports, if any, including any victim impact statement and criminal
history, and allow arguments from the prosecutor, the defense counsel,
the offender, the victim, the survivor of the victim, or a
representative of the victim or survivor, and an investigative law
enforcement officer as to the sentence to be imposed.
If the court is satisfied by a preponderance of the evidence that
the defendant has a criminal history, the court shall specify the
convictions it has found to exist. All of this information shall be
part of the record. Copies of all risk assessment reports and
presentence reports presented to the sentencing court and all written
findings of facts and conclusions of law as to sentencing entered by
the court shall be sent to the department by the clerk of the court at
the conclusion of the sentencing and shall accompany the offender if
the offender is committed to the custody of the department. Court
clerks shall provide, without charge, certified copies of documents
relating to criminal convictions requested by prosecuting attorneys.
(2) To prevent wrongful disclosure of information related to mental
health services, as defined in RCW 71.05.445 and ((71.34.225))
71.34.345, a court may take only those steps necessary during a
sentencing hearing or any hearing in which the department presents
information related to mental health services to the court. The steps
may be taken on motion of the defendant, the prosecuting attorney, or
on the court's own motion. The court may seal the portion of the
record relating to information relating to mental health services,
exclude the public from the hearing during presentation or discussion
of information relating to mental health services, or grant other
relief to achieve the result intended by this subsection, but nothing
in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the subsequent release
of information related to mental health services as authorized by RCW
71.05.445, ((71.34.225)) 71.34.345, or 72.09.585. Any person who
otherwise is permitted to attend any hearing pursuant to chapter 7.69
or 7.69A RCW shall not be excluded from the hearing solely because the
department intends to disclose or discloses information related to
mental health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 The Washington institute for public policy
shall conduct a study of criminal sentencing provisions of neighboring
states for all crimes involving methamphetamine. The institute shall
report to the legislature on any criminal sentencing increases
necessary under Washington law to reduce or remove any incentives
methamphetamine traffickers and manufacturers may have to locate in
Washington. The report shall be completed by January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 The Washington institute for public policy
shall conduct a study of the drug offender sentencing alternative to
determine its impact on recidivism. The institute shall study the
success rate of the sentencing alternative for different types of
crimes and whether offenders who received substance abuse treatment
while in confinement were more or less successful than offenders who
received treatment in the community or received no treatment. The
institute shall report to the legislature by January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 Part headings used in this act are no part
of the law.

--- END ---