BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that local governments
need to have interoperable communications to ensure the public safety
and welfare of all citizens in the state of Washington. In light of
recent catastrophic events around the world, including in the United
States, it is now more important than ever that all responders be able
to communicate clearly and without interference or malfunction.
The legislature has learned that numerous states, the federal
government, and some international governments have adopted the
project-25 standard for interoperable communications. Local
governments in Washington have started to purchase the project-25
interoperable communication standard equipment. In order to ensure
that local governments continue to make smart purchasing decisions,
they need certainty that the purchases will be interoperable with state
equipment and that the state will adopt the national project-25
standards. It is the intent of this act to provide certainty to local
governments that a statewide project-25 interoperable communications
system will be in place throughout Washington in the near future, and
the investments they are making are advantageous to the original intent
of interoperable communications, thus ensuring the safety and welfare
of Washington's citizens.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.105.330 and 2003 c 18 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall appoint a state interoperability executive
committee, the membership of which must include, but not be limited to,
representatives of the military department, the Washington state
patrol, the department of transportation, the department of information
services, the department of natural resources, city and county
governments, state and local fire chiefs, police chiefs, and sheriffs,
and state and local emergency management directors. The chair and
legislative members of the board will serve as nonvoting ex officio
members of the committee. Voting membership may not exceed fifteen
members.
(2) The chair of the board shall appoint the chair of the committee
from among the voting members of the committee.
(3) The ((strategic [state])) state interoperability executive
committee has the following responsibilities:
(a) Develop policies and make recommendations to the board for
technical standards for state wireless radio communications systems,
including emergency communications systems. The standards must
address, among other things, the interoperability of systems, taking
into account both existing and future systems and technologies;
(b) Coordinate and manage on behalf of the board the licensing and
use of state-designated and state-licensed radio frequencies, including
the spectrum used for public safety and emergency communications, and
serve as the point of contact with the federal communications
commission on matters relating to allocation, use, and licensing of
radio spectrum;
(c) Coordinate the purchasing of all state wireless radio
communications system equipment to ensure that:
(i) After the transition from a radio over internet protocol
network, any new trunked system shall be, at a minimum, project-25;
(ii) Any new system that requires advanced digital features shall
be, at a minimum, project-25; and
(iii) Any new system or equipment purchases shall be, at a minimum,
upgradeable to project-25;
(d) Seek support, including possible federal or other funding, for
state-sponsored wireless communications systems;
(((d))) (e) Develop recommendations for legislation that may be
required to promote interoperability of state wireless communications
systems;
(((e))) (f) Foster cooperation and coordination among public safety
and emergency response organizations;
(((f))) (g) Work with wireless communications groups and
associations to ensure interoperability among all public safety and
emergency response wireless communications systems; and
(((g))) (h) Perform such other duties as may be assigned by the
board to promote interoperability of wireless communications systems.

--- END ---