BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.020 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Accrual method of accounting" means a method of accounting in
which revenues are reported in the period when they are earned,
regardless of when they are collected, and expenses are reported in the
period in which they are incurred, regardless of when they are paid.
(2) "Appraisal" means the process of estimating the fair market
value or reconstructing the historical cost of an asset acquired in a
past period as performed by a professionally designated real estate
appraiser with no pecuniary interest in the property to be appraised.
It includes a systematic, analytic determination and the recording and
analyzing of property facts, rights, investments, and values based on
a personal inspection and inventory of the property.
(3) "Arm's-length transaction" means a transaction resulting from
good-faith bargaining between a buyer and seller who are not related
organizations and have adverse positions in the market place. Sales or
exchanges of nursing home facilities among two or more parties in which
all parties subsequently continue to own one or more of the facilities
involved in the transactions shall not be considered as arm's-length
transactions for purposes of this chapter. Sale of a nursing home
facility which is subsequently leased back to the seller within five
years of the date of sale shall not be considered as an arm's-length
transaction for purposes of this chapter.
(4) "Assets" means economic resources of the contractor, recognized
and measured in conformity with generally accepted accounting
principles.
(5) "Audit" or "department audit" means an examination of the
records of a nursing facility participating in the medicaid payment
system, including but not limited to: The contractor's financial and
statistical records, cost reports and all supporting documentation and
schedules, receivables, and resident trust funds, to be performed as
deemed necessary by the department and according to department rule.
(6) "Bad debts" means amounts considered to be uncollectible from
accounts and notes receivable.
(7) "Beneficial owner" means:
(a) Any person who, directly or indirectly, through any contract,
arrangement, understanding, relationship, or otherwise has or shares:
(i) Voting power which includes the power to vote, or to direct the
voting of such ownership interest; and/or
(ii) Investment power which includes the power to dispose, or to
direct the disposition of such ownership interest;
(b) Any person who, directly or indirectly, creates or uses a
trust, proxy, power of attorney, pooling arrangement, or any other
contract, arrangement, or device with the purpose or effect of
divesting himself or herself of beneficial ownership of an ownership
interest or preventing the vesting of such beneficial ownership as part
of a plan or scheme to evade the reporting requirements of this
chapter;
(c) Any person who, subject to (b) of this subsection, has the
right to acquire beneficial ownership of such ownership interest within
sixty days, including but not limited to any right to acquire:
(i) Through the exercise of any option, warrant, or right;
(ii) Through the conversion of an ownership interest;
(iii) Pursuant to the power to revoke a trust, discretionary
account, or similar arrangement; or
(iv) Pursuant to the automatic termination of a trust,
discretionary account, or similar arrangement;
except that, any person who acquires an ownership interest or power
specified in (c)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection with the purpose
or effect of changing or influencing the control of the contractor, or
in connection with or as a participant in any transaction having such
purpose or effect, immediately upon such acquisition shall be deemed to
be the beneficial owner of the ownership interest which may be acquired
through the exercise or conversion of such ownership interest or power;
(d) Any person who in the ordinary course of business is a pledgee
of ownership interest under a written pledge agreement shall not be
deemed to be the beneficial owner of such pledged ownership interest
until the pledgee has taken all formal steps necessary which are
required to declare a default and determines that the power to vote or
to direct the vote or to dispose or to direct the disposition of such
pledged ownership interest will be exercised; except that:
(i) The pledgee agreement is bona fide and was not entered into
with the purpose nor with the effect of changing or influencing the
control of the contractor, nor in connection with any transaction
having such purpose or effect, including persons meeting the conditions
set forth in (b) of this subsection; and
(ii) The pledgee agreement, prior to default, does not grant to the
pledgee:
(A) The power to vote or to direct the vote of the pledged
ownership interest; or
(B) The power to dispose or direct the disposition of the pledged
ownership interest, other than the grant of such power(s) pursuant to
a pledge agreement under which credit is extended and in which the
pledgee is a broker or dealer.
(8) "Capitalization" means the recording of an expenditure as an
asset.
(9) "Case mix" means a measure of the intensity of care and
services needed by the residents of a nursing facility or a group of
residents in the facility.
(10) "Case mix index" means a number representing the average case
mix of a nursing facility.
(11) "Case mix weight" means a numeric score that identifies the
relative resources used by a particular group of a nursing facility's
residents.
(12) "Certificate of capital authorization" means a certification
from the department for an allocation from the biennial capital
financing authorization for all new or replacement building
construction, or for major renovation projects, receiving a certificate
of need or a certificate of need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW
after July 1, 2001.
(13) "Contractor" means a person or entity licensed under chapter
18.51 RCW to operate a medicare and medicaid certified nursing
facility, responsible for operational decisions, and contracting with
the department to provide services to medicaid recipients residing in
the facility.
(14) "Default case" means no initial assessment has been completed
for a resident and transmitted to the department by the cut-off date,
or an assessment is otherwise past due for the resident, under state
and federal requirements.
(15) "Department" means the department of social and health
services (DSHS) and its employees.
(16) "Depreciation" means the systematic distribution of the cost
or other basis of tangible assets, less salvage, over the estimated
useful life of the assets.
(17) "Direct care" means nursing care and related care provided to
nursing facility residents. Therapy care shall not be considered part
of direct care.
(18) "Direct care supplies" means medical, pharmaceutical, and
other supplies required for the direct care of a nursing facility's
residents.
(19) "Entity" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
limited liability company, or any other association of individuals
capable of entering enforceable contracts.
(20) "Equity" means the net book value of all tangible and
intangible assets less the recorded value of all liabilities, as
recognized and measured in conformity with generally accepted
accounting principles.
(21) "Essential community provider" means a facility which is the
only nursing facility within a commuting distance radius of at least
forty minutes duration, traveling by automobile.
(22) "Facility" or "nursing facility" means a nursing home licensed
in accordance with chapter 18.51 RCW, excepting nursing homes certified
as institutions for mental diseases, or that portion of a multiservice
facility licensed as a nursing home, or that portion of a hospital
licensed in accordance with chapter 70.41 RCW which operates as a
nursing home.
(23) "Fair market value" means the replacement cost of an asset
less observed physical depreciation on the date for which the market
value is being determined.
(24) "Financial statements" means statements prepared and presented
in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles including,
but not limited to, balance sheet, statement of operations, statement
of changes in financial position, and related notes.
(25) "Generally accepted accounting principles" means accounting
principles approved by the financial accounting standards board (FASB).
(26) "Goodwill" means the excess of the price paid for a nursing
facility business over the fair market value of all net identifiable
tangible and intangible assets acquired, as measured in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles.
(27) "Grouper" means a computer software product that groups
individual nursing facility residents into case mix classification
groups based on specific resident assessment data and computer logic.
(28) "High labor-cost county" means an urban county in which the
median allowable facility cost per case mix unit is more than ten
percent higher than the median allowable facility cost per case mix
unit among all other urban counties, excluding that county.
(29) "Historical cost" means the actual cost incurred in acquiring
and preparing an asset for use, including feasibility studies,
architect's fees, and engineering studies.
(30) "Home and central office costs" means costs that are incurred
in the support and operation of a home and central office. Home and
central office costs include centralized services that are performed in
support of a nursing facility. The department may exclude from this
definition costs that are nonduplicative, documented, ordinary,
necessary, and related to the provision of care services to authorized
patients.
(31) "Imprest fund" means a fund which is regularly replenished in
exactly the amount expended from it.
(32) "Joint facility costs" means any costs which represent
resources which benefit more than one facility, or one facility and any
other entity.
(33) "Lease agreement" means a contract between two parties for the
possession and use of real or personal property or assets for a
specified period of time in exchange for specified periodic payments.
Elimination (due to any cause other than death or divorce) or addition
of any party to the contract, expiration, or modification of any lease
term in effect on January 1, 1980, or termination of the lease by
either party by any means shall constitute a termination of the lease
agreement. An extension or renewal of a lease agreement, whether or
not pursuant to a renewal provision in the lease agreement, shall be
considered a new lease agreement. A strictly formal change in the
lease agreement which modifies the method, frequency, or manner in
which the lease payments are made, but does not increase the total
lease payment obligation of the lessee, shall not be considered
modification of a lease term.
(34) "Medical care program" or "medicaid program" means medical
assistance, including nursing care, provided under RCW 74.09.500 or
authorized state medical care services.
(35) "Medical care recipient," "medicaid recipient," or "recipient"
means an individual determined eligible by the department for the
services provided under chapter 74.09 RCW.
(36) "Minimum data set" means the overall data component of the
resident assessment instrument, indicating the strengths, needs, and
preferences of an individual nursing facility resident.
(37) "Net book value" means the historical cost of an asset less
accumulated depreciation.
(38) "Net invested funds" means the net book value of tangible
fixed assets employed by a contractor to provide services under the
medical care program, including land, buildings, and equipment as
recognized and measured in conformity with generally accepted
accounting principles.
(39) "Nonurban county" means a county which is not located in a
metropolitan statistical area as determined and defined by the United
States office of management and budget or other appropriate agency or
office of the federal government.
(40) "Operating lease" means a lease under which rental or lease
expenses are included in current expenses in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles.
(41) "Owner" means a sole proprietor, general or limited partners,
members of a limited liability company, and beneficial interest holders
of five percent or more of a corporation's outstanding stock.
(42) "Ownership interest" means all interests beneficially owned by
a person, calculated in the aggregate, regardless of the form which
such beneficial ownership takes.
(43) "Patient day" or "resident day" means a calendar day of care
provided to a nursing facility resident, regardless of payment source,
which will include the day of admission and exclude the day of
discharge; except that, when admission and discharge occur on the same
day, one day of care shall be deemed to exist. A "medicaid day" or
"recipient day" means a calendar day of care provided to a medicaid
recipient determined eligible by the department for services provided
under chapter 74.09 RCW, subject to the same conditions regarding
admission and discharge applicable to a patient day or resident day of
care.
(44) "Professionally designated real estate appraiser" means an
individual who is regularly engaged in the business of providing real
estate valuation services for a fee, and who is deemed qualified by a
nationally recognized real estate appraisal educational organization on
the basis of extensive practical appraisal experience, including the
writing of real estate valuation reports as well as the passing of
written examinations on valuation practice and theory, and who by
virtue of membership in such organization is required to subscribe and
adhere to certain standards of professional practice as such
organization prescribes.
(45) "Qualified therapist" means:
(a) A mental health professional as defined by chapter 71.05 RCW;
(b) A mental retardation professional who is a therapist approved
by the department who has had specialized training or one year's
experience in treating or working with the mentally retarded or
developmentally disabled;
(c) A speech pathologist who is eligible for a certificate of
clinical competence in speech pathology or who has the equivalent
education and clinical experience;
(d) A physical therapist as defined by chapter 18.74 RCW;
(e) An occupational therapist who is a graduate of a program in
occupational therapy, or who has the equivalent of such education or
training; and
(f) A respiratory care practitioner certified under chapter 18.89
RCW.
(46) "Rate" or "rate allocation" means the medicaid per-patient-day
payment amount for medicaid patients calculated in accordance with the
allocation methodology set forth in part E of this chapter.
(47) "Real property," whether leased or owned by the contractor,
means the building, allowable land, land improvements, and building
improvements associated with a nursing facility.
(48) "Rebased rate" or "cost-rebased rate" means a facility-specific component rate assigned to a nursing facility for a particular
rate period established on desk-reviewed, adjusted costs reported for
that facility covering at least six months of a prior calendar year
designated as a year to be used for cost-rebasing payment rate
allocations under the provisions of this chapter.
(49) "Records" means those data supporting all financial statements
and cost reports including, but not limited to, all general and
subsidiary ledgers, books of original entry, and transaction
documentation, however such data are maintained.
(50) "Related organization" means an entity which is under common
ownership and/or control with, or has control of, or is controlled by,
the contractor.
(a) "Common ownership" exists when an entity is the beneficial
owner of five percent or more ownership interest in the contractor and
any other entity.
(b) "Control" exists where an entity has the power, directly or
indirectly, significantly to influence or direct the actions or
policies of an organization or institution, whether or not it is
legally enforceable and however it is exercisable or exercised.
(51) "Related care" means only those services that are directly
related to providing direct care to nursing facility residents. These
services include, but are not limited to, nursing direction and
supervision, medical direction, medical records, pharmacy services,
activities, and social services.
(52) "Resident assessment instrument," including federally approved
modifications for use in this state, means a federally mandated,
comprehensive nursing facility resident care planning and assessment
tool, consisting of the minimum data set and resident assessment
protocols.
(53) "Resident assessment protocols" means those components of the
resident assessment instrument that use the minimum data set to trigger
or flag a resident's potential problems and risk areas.
(54) "Resource utilization groups" means a case mix classification
system that identifies relative resources needed to care for an
individual nursing facility resident.
(55) "Restricted fund" means those funds the principal and/or
income of which is limited by agreement with or direction of the donor
to a specific purpose.
(56) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social
and health services.
(57) "Support services" means food, food preparation, dietary,
housekeeping, and laundry services provided to nursing facility
residents.
(58) "Therapy care" means those services required by a nursing
facility resident's comprehensive assessment and plan of care, that are
provided by qualified therapists, or support personnel under their
supervision, including related costs as designated by the department.
(59) "Title XIX" or "medicaid" means the 1965 amendments to the
social security act, P.L. 89-07, as amended and the medicaid program
administered by the department.
(60) "Urban county" means a county which is located in a
metropolitan statistical area as determined and defined by the United
States office of management and budget or other appropriate agency or
office of the federal government.
(61) "Vital local provider" means a facility reporting a home
office that meets the following qualifications:
(a) The home office address is located in Washington state; and
(b) The sum of medicaid days for all Washington facilities
reporting the home office as their home office was greater than two
hundred fifteen thousand in 2003.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.431 and 2005 c 518 s 944 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 1999, nursing facility medicaid payment rate
allocations shall be facility-specific and shall have seven components:
Direct care, therapy care, support services, operations, property,
financing allowance, and variable return. The department shall
establish and adjust each of these components, as provided in this
section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing
facility in this state.
(2) ((All)) Component rate allocations in therapy care, support
services, variable return, operations, property, and financing
allowance for essential community providers as defined in this chapter
shall be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent
of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use.
For all facilities other than essential community providers, effective
July 1, 2001, component rate allocations in direct care, therapy care,
support services, variable return, operations, property, and financing
allowance shall continue to be based upon a minimum facility occupancy
of eighty-five percent of licensed beds. For all facilities other than
essential community providers, effective July 1, 2002, the component
rate allocations in operations, property, and financing allowance shall
be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of ninety percent of
licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use. For
all facilities, effective July 1, 2006, the component rate allocation
in direct care shall be based upon actual facility occupancy.
(3) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, direct care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
((2005)) 2006, direct care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost
report data from ((1999)) 2003 will ((continue to)) be used for July 1,
((2005)) 2006, and later direct care component rate allocations.
(b) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1996 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(c) Direct care component rate allocations based on 1999 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(d) Direct care component rate allocations based on 2003 cost
report data shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial
appropriations act for facilities whose direct care component rate is
set equal to their adjusted June 30, 2006, rate, as provided in RCW
74.46.506(5)(i).
(5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, therapy care component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 will be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
2005, therapy care component rate allocations. Adjusted cost report
data from 1999 will continue to be used for July 1, 2005, and later
therapy care component rate allocations.
(b) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(6)(a) Support services component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October
1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services component rate
allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July
1, 2001, through June 30, 2005, support services component rate
allocations. Adjusted cost report data from 1999 will continue to be
used for July 1, 2005, and later support services component rate
allocations.
(b) Support services component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act.
(7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted
cost report data from 1996 shall be used for October 1, 1998, through
June 30, 2001, operations component rate allocations; adjusted cost
report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1, 2001, through June 30,
((2005)) 2006, operations component rate allocations. Adjusted cost
report data from ((1999)) 2003 will ((continue to)) be used for July 1,
((2005)) 2006, and later operations component rate allocations.
(b) Operations component rate allocations shall be adjusted
annually for economic trends and conditions by a factor or factors
defined in the biennial appropriations act. A different economic
trends and conditions adjustment factor or factors may be defined in
the biennial appropriations act for facilities whose operations
component rate is set equal to their adjusted June 30, 2006, rate, as
provided in RCW 74.46.521(4).
(8) For July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, a facility's
property and return on investment component rates shall be the
facility's June 30, 1998, property and return on investment component
rates, without increase. For October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999,
a facility's property and return on investment component rates shall be
rebased utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months of data.
(9) Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment
system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the general public
for comparable services.
(10) Medicaid contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum
wage of the greater of the state minimum wage or the federal minimum
wage.
(11) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions for determining component rate allocations for
facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to: The need to prorate inflation for
partial-period cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing
facilities entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a
period of absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded
new bed capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of
ownership of the nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or
converting beds back into service, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(12) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting
rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements imposed by
the department or the federal government. Any such rate adjustments
are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(13) Effective July 1, 2001, medicaid rates shall continue to be
revised downward in all components, in accordance with department
rules, for facilities converting banked beds to active service under
chapter 70.38 RCW, by using the facility's increased licensed bed
capacity to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting. However,
for facilities other than essential community providers which bank beds
under chapter 70.38 RCW, after May 25, 2001, medicaid rates shall be
revised upward, in accordance with department rules, in direct care,
therapy care, support services, and variable return components only, by
using the facility's decreased licensed bed capacity to recalculate
minimum occupancy for rate setting, but no upward revision shall be
made to operations, property, or financing allowance component rates.
The direct care component rate allocation shall be adjusted, without
using the minimum occupancy assumption, for facilities that convert
banked beds to active service, under chapter 70.38 RCW, beginning on
July 1, 2006.
(14) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a certificate of
need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30, 2001, must have
a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a) the
depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included in
calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation; and
(b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition to
be included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance rate
allocation.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.46.433 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish for each medicaid nursing
facility a variable return component rate allocation. In determining
the variable return allowance:
(a) Except as provided in (e) of this subsection, the variable
return array and percentage shall be assigned whenever rebasing of
noncapital rate allocations is scheduled under RCW ((46.46.431
[74.46.431])) 74.46.431 (4), (5), (6), and (7).
(b) To calculate the array of facilities for the July 1, 2001, rate
setting, the department, without using peer groups, shall first rank
all facilities in numerical order from highest to lowest according to
each facility's examined and documented, but unlidded, combined direct
care, therapy care, support services, and operations per resident day
cost from the 1999 cost report period. However, before being combined
with other per resident day costs and ranked, a facility's direct care
cost per resident day shall be adjusted to reflect its facility average
case mix index, to be averaged from the four calendar quarters of 1999,
weighted by the facility's resident days from each quarter, under RCW
74.46.501(7)(b)(ii). The array shall then be divided into four
quartiles, each containing, as nearly as possible, an equal number of
facilities, and four percent shall be assigned to facilities in the
lowest quartile, three percent to facilities in the next lowest
quartile, two percent to facilities in the next highest quartile, and
one percent to facilities in the highest quartile.
(c) The department shall, subject to (d) of this subsection,
compute the variable return allowance by multiplying a facility's
assigned percentage by the sum of the facility's direct care, therapy
care, support services, and operations component rates determined in
accordance with this chapter and rules adopted by the department.
(d) Effective July 1, 2001, if a facility's examined and documented
direct care cost per resident day for the preceding report year is
lower than its average direct care component rate weighted by medicaid
resident days for the same year, the facility's direct care cost shall
be substituted for its July 1, 2001, direct care component rate, and
its variable return component rate shall be determined or adjusted each
July 1st by multiplying the facility's assigned percentage by the sum
of the facility's July 1, 2001, therapy care, support services, and
operations component rates, and its direct care cost per resident day
for the preceding year.
(e) Effective July 1, 2006, the variable return component rate
allocation for each facility shall be the facility's June 30, 2006,
variable return component rate allocation.
(2) The variable return rate allocation calculated in accordance
with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply
with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.46.496 and 1998 c 322 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each case mix classification group shall be assigned a case mix
weight. The case mix weight for each resident of a nursing facility
for each calendar quarter shall be based on data from resident
assessment instruments completed for the resident and weighted by the
number of days the resident was in each case mix classification group.
Days shall be counted as provided in this section.
(2) The case mix weights shall be based on the average minutes per
registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, and certified nurse aide,
for each case mix group, and using the health care financing
administration of the United States department of health and human
services 1995 nursing facility staff time measurement study stemming
from its multistate nursing home case mix and quality demonstration
project. Those minutes shall be weighted by statewide ratios of
registered nurse to certified nurse aide, and licensed practical nurse
to certified nurse aide, wages, including salaries and benefits, which
shall be based on 1995 cost report data for this state.
(3) The case mix weights shall be determined as follows:
(a) Set the certified nurse aide wage weight at 1.000 and calculate
wage weights for registered nurse and licensed practical nurse average
wages by dividing the certified nurse aide average wage into the
registered nurse average wage and licensed practical nurse average
wage;
(b) Calculate the total weighted minutes for each case mix group in
the resource utilization group III classification system by multiplying
the wage weight for each worker classification by the average number of
minutes that classification of worker spends caring for a resident in
that resource utilization group III classification group, and summing
the products;
(c) Assign a case mix weight of 1.000 to the resource utilization
group III classification group with the lowest total weighted minutes
and calculate case mix weights by dividing the lowest group's total
weighted minutes into each group's total weighted minutes and rounding
weight calculations to the third decimal place.
(4) The case mix weights in this state may be revised if the health
care financing administration updates its nursing facility staff time
measurement studies. The case mix weights shall be revised, but only
when direct care component rates are cost-rebased as provided in
subsection (5) of this section, to be effective on the July 1st
effective date of each cost-rebased direct care component rate.
However, the department may revise case mix weights more frequently if,
and only if, significant variances in wage ratios occur among direct
care staff in the different caregiver classifications identified in
this section.
(5) Case mix weights shall be revised when direct care component
rates are cost-rebased ((every three years)) as provided in RCW
74.46.431(4)(((a))).

Sec. 5 RCW 74.46.501 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 9 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) From individual case mix weights for the applicable quarter,
the department shall determine two average case mix indexes for each
medicaid nursing facility, one for all residents in the facility, known
as the facility average case mix index, and one for medicaid residents,
known as the medicaid average case mix index.
(2)(a) In calculating a facility's two average case mix indexes for
each quarter, the department shall include all residents or medicaid
residents, as applicable, who were physically in the facility during
the quarter in question based on the resident assessment instrument
completed by the facility and the requirements and limitations for the
instrument's completion and transmission (January 1st through March
31st, April 1st through June 30th, July 1st through September 30th, or
October 1st through December 31st).
(b) The facility average case mix index shall exclude all default
cases as defined in this chapter. However, the medicaid average case
mix index shall include all default cases.
(3) Both the facility average and the medicaid average case mix
indexes shall be determined by multiplying the case mix weight of each
resident, or each medicaid resident, as applicable, by the number of
days, as defined in this section and as applicable, the resident was at
each particular case mix classification or group, and then averaging.
(4)(a) In determining the number of days a resident is classified
into a particular case mix group, the department shall determine a
start date for calculating case mix grouping periods as follows:
(i) If a resident's initial assessment for a first stay or a return
stay in the nursing facility is timely completed and transmitted to the
department by the cutoff date under state and federal requirements and
as described in subsection (5) of this section, the start date shall be
the later of either the first day of the quarter or the resident's
facility admission or readmission date;
(ii) If a resident's significant change, quarterly, or annual
assessment is timely completed and transmitted to the department by the
cutoff date under state and federal requirements and as described in
subsection (5) of this section, the start date shall be the date the
assessment is completed;
(iii) If a resident's significant change, quarterly, or annual
assessment is not timely completed and transmitted to the department by
the cutoff date under state and federal requirements and as described
in subsection (5) of this section, the start date shall be the due date
for the assessment.
(b) If state or federal rules require more frequent assessment, the
same principles for determining the start date of a resident's
classification in a particular case mix group set forth in subsection
(4)(a) of this section shall apply.
(c) In calculating the number of days a resident is classified into
a particular case mix group, the department shall determine an end date
for calculating case mix grouping periods as follows:
(i) If a resident is discharged before the end of the applicable
quarter, the end date shall be the day before discharge;
(ii) If a resident is not discharged before the end of the
applicable quarter, the end date shall be the last day of the quarter;
(iii) If a new assessment is due for a resident or a new assessment
is completed and transmitted to the department, the end date of the
previous assessment shall be the earlier of either the day before the
assessment is due or the day before the assessment is completed by the
nursing facility.
(5) The cutoff date for the department to use resident assessment
data, for the purposes of calculating both the facility average and the
medicaid average case mix indexes, and for establishing and updating a
facility's direct care component rate, shall be one month and one day
after the end of the quarter for which the resident assessment data
applies.
(6) A threshold of ninety percent, as described and calculated in
this subsection, shall be used to determine the case mix index each
quarter. The threshold shall also be used to determine which
facilities' costs per case mix unit are included in determining the
ceiling, floor, and price. For direct care component rate allocations
established on and after July 1, 2006, the threshold of ninety percent
shall be used to determine the case mix index each quarter and to
determine which facilities' costs per case mix unit are included in
determining the ceiling and price. If the facility does not meet the
ninety percent threshold, the department may use an alternate case mix
index to determine the facility average and medicaid average case mix
indexes for the quarter. The threshold is a count of unique minimum
data set assessments, and it shall include resident assessment
instrument tracking forms for residents discharged prior to completing
an initial assessment. The threshold is calculated by dividing a
facility's count of residents being assessed by the average census for
the facility. A daily census shall be reported by each nursing
facility as it transmits assessment data to the department. The
department shall compute a quarterly average census based on the daily
census. If no census has been reported by a facility during a
specified quarter, then the department shall use the facility's
licensed beds as the denominator in computing the threshold.
(7)(a) Although the facility average and the medicaid average case
mix indexes shall both be calculated quarterly, the facility average
case mix index will be used ((only every three years)) throughout the
applicable cost-rebasing period in combination with cost report data as
specified by RCW 74.46.431 and 74.46.506, to establish a facility's
allowable cost per case mix unit. A facility's medicaid average case
mix index shall be used to update a nursing facility's direct care
component rate quarterly.
(b) The facility average case mix index used to establish each
nursing facility's direct care component rate shall be based on an
average of calendar quarters of the facility's average case mix
indexes.
(i) For October 1, 1998, direct care component rates, the
department shall use an average of facility average case mix indexes
from the four calendar quarters of 1997.
(ii) For July 1, 2001, direct care component rates, the department
shall use an average of facility average case mix indexes from the four
calendar quarters of 1999.
(iii) Beginning on July 1, 2006, when establishing the direct care
component rates, the department shall use an average of facility case
mix indexes from the four calendar quarters occurring during the cost
report period used to rebase the direct care component rate allocations
as specified in RCW 74.46.431.
(c) The medicaid average case mix index used to update or
recalibrate a nursing facility's direct care component rate quarterly
shall be from the calendar quarter commencing six months prior to the
effective date of the quarterly rate. For example, October 1, 1998,
through December 31, 1998, direct care component rates shall utilize
case mix averages from the April 1, 1998, through June 30, 1998,
calendar quarter, and so forth.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.46.506 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The direct care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of nursing care for one resident of a nursing facility for
one day, including direct care supplies. Therapy services and
supplies, which correspond to the therapy care component rate, shall be
excluded. The direct care component rate includes elements of case mix
determined consistent with the principles of this section and other
applicable provisions of this chapter.
(2) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall determine and
update quarterly for each nursing facility serving medicaid residents
a facility-specific per-resident day direct care component rate
allocation, to be effective on the first day of each calendar quarter.
In determining direct care component rates the department shall
utilize, as specified in this section, minimum data set resident
assessment data for each resident of the facility, as transmitted to,
and if necessary corrected by, the department in the resident
assessment instrument format approved by federal authorities for use in
this state.
(3) The department may question the accuracy of assessment data for
any resident and utilize corrected or substitute information, however
derived, in determining direct care component rates. The department is
authorized to impose civil fines and to take adverse rate actions
against a contractor, as specified by the department in rule, in order
to obtain compliance with resident assessment and data transmission
requirements and to ensure accuracy.
(4) Cost report data used in setting direct care component rate
allocations shall be 1996 ((and)), 1999, and 2003 for rate periods as
specified in RCW 74.46.431(4)(a).
(5) Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall rebase each
nursing facility's direct care component rate allocation as described
in RCW 74.46.431, adjust its direct care component rate allocation for
economic trends and conditions as described in RCW 74.46.431, and
update its medicaid average case mix index, consistent with the
following:
(a) Reduce total direct care costs reported by each nursing
facility for the applicable cost report period specified in RCW
74.46.431(4)(a) to reflect any department adjustments, and to eliminate
reported resident therapy costs and adjustments, in order to derive the
facility's total allowable direct care cost;
(b) Divide each facility's total allowable direct care cost by its
adjusted resident days for the same report period, increased if
necessary to a minimum occupancy of eighty-five percent; that is, the
greater of actual or imputed occupancy at eighty-five percent of
licensed beds, to derive the facility's allowable direct care cost per
resident day. However, effective July 1, 2006, each facility's
allowable direct care costs shall be divided by its adjusted resident
days without application of a minimum occupancy assumption;
(c) Adjust the facility's per resident day direct care cost by the
applicable factor specified in RCW 74.46.431(4) (b) ((and)), (c), and
(d) to derive its adjusted allowable direct care cost per resident day;
(d) Divide each facility's adjusted allowable direct care cost per
resident day by the facility average case mix index for the applicable
quarters specified by RCW 74.46.501(7)(b) to derive the facility's
allowable direct care cost per case mix unit;
(e) Effective for July 1, 2001, rate setting, divide nursing
facilities into at least two and, if applicable, three peer groups:
Those located in nonurban counties; those located in high labor-cost
counties, if any; and those located in other urban counties;
(f) Array separately the allowable direct care cost per case mix
unit for all facilities in nonurban counties; for all facilities in
high labor-cost counties, if applicable; and for all facilities in
other urban counties, and determine the median allowable direct care
cost per case mix unit for each peer group;
(g) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, from October 1,
1998, through June 30, 2000, determine each facility's quarterly direct
care component rate as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than eighty-five percent of the facility's peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per
case mix unit equal to eighty-five percent of the facility's peer group
median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to
the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group median, and
shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the
facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(iii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is
between eighty-five and one hundred fifteen percent of the peer group
median established under (f) of this subsection shall have a direct
care component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost
per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case
mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(h) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, from July 1,
2000, ((forward, and for all future rate setting)) through June 30,
2006, determine each facility's quarterly direct care component rate as
follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than ninety percent of the facility's peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to ninety percent of the facility's peer group median, and shall
have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's
assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid
average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred ten percent of the peer group median established under
(f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit equal
to one hundred ten percent of the peer group median, and shall have a
direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's assigned
cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average
case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(iii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is
between ninety and one hundred ten percent of the peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall have a direct care
component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost per
case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c);
(i)(i) Between October 1, 1998, and June 30, 2000, the department
shall compare each facility's direct care component rate allocation
calculated under (g) of this subsection with the facility's nursing
services component rate in effect on September 30, 1998, less therapy
costs, plus any exceptional care offsets as reported on the cost
report, adjusted for economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW
74.46.431. A facility shall receive the higher of the two rates.
(ii) Between July 1, 2000, and June 30, 2002, the department shall
compare each facility's direct care component rate allocation
calculated under (h) of this subsection with the facility's direct care
component rate in effect on June 30, 2000. A facility shall receive
the higher of the two rates. Between July 1, 2001, and June 30, 2002,
if during any quarter a facility whose rate paid under (h) of this
subsection is greater than either the direct care rate in effect on
June 30, 2000, or than that facility's allowable direct care cost per
case mix unit calculated in (d) of this subsection multiplied by that
facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable quarter
specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c), the facility shall be paid in that
and each subsequent quarter pursuant to (h) of this subsection and
shall not be entitled to the greater of the two rates.
(iii) ((Effective)) Between July 1, 2002, and June 30, 2006, all
direct care component rate allocations shall be as determined under (h)
of this subsection.
(iv) Effective July 1, 2006, for all providers, except vital local
providers as defined in this chapter, all direct care component rate
allocations shall be as determined under (j) of this subsection.
(v) Effective July 1, 2006, for vital local providers, as defined
in this chapter, direct care component rate allocations shall be
determined as follows:
(A) The department shall calculate:
(I) The sum of each facility's July 1, 2006, direct care component
rate allocation calculated under (j) of this subsection and July 1,
2006, operations component rate calculated under RCW 74.46.521; and
(II) The sum of each facility's June 30, 2006, direct care and
operations component rates.
(B) If the sum calculated under (i)(v)(A)(I) of this subsection is
less than the sum calculated under (i)(v)(A)(II) of this subsection,
the facility shall have a direct care component rate allocation equal
to the facility's June 30, 2006, direct care component rate allocation.
(C) If the sum calculated under (i)(v)(A)(I) of this subsection is
greater than or equal to the sum calculated under (i)(v)(A)(II) of this
subsection, the facility's direct care component rate shall be
calculated under (j) of this subsection.
(j) Except as provided in (i) of this subsection, from July 1,
2006, forward, and for all future rate setting, determine each
facility's quarterly direct care component rate as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred twelve percent of the peer group median established
under (f) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per case mix unit
equal to one hundred twelve percent of the peer group median, and shall
have a direct care component rate allocation equal to the facility's
assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid
average case mix index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW
74.46.501(7)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than or equal to one hundred twelve percent of the peer group median
established under (f) of this subsection shall have a direct care
component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost per
case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case mix
index from the applicable quarter specified in RCW 74.46.501(7)(c).
(6) The direct care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) Costs related to payments resulting from increases in direct
care component rates, granted under authority of RCW 74.46.508(1) for
a facility's exceptional care residents, shall be offset against the
facility's examined, allowable direct care costs, for each report year
or partial period such increases are paid. Such reductions in
allowable direct care costs shall be for rate setting, settlement, and
other purposes deemed appropriate by the department.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.46.521 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The operations component rate allocation corresponds to the
general operation of a nursing facility for one resident for one day,
including but not limited to management, administration, utilities,
office supplies, accounting and bookkeeping, minor building
maintenance, minor equipment repairs and replacements, and other
supplies and services, exclusive of direct care, therapy care, support
services, property, financing allowance, and variable return.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, beginning
October 1, 1998, the department shall determine each medicaid nursing
facility's operations component rate allocation using cost report data
specified by RCW 74.46.431(7)(a). Effective July 1, 2002, operations
component rates for all facilities except essential community providers
shall be based upon a minimum occupancy of ninety percent of licensed
beds, and no operations component rate shall be revised in response to
beds banked on or after May 25, 2001, under chapter 70.38 RCW.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, to
determine each facility's operations component rate the department
shall:
(a) Array facilities' adjusted general operations costs per
adjusted resident day, as determined by dividing each facility's total
allowable operations cost by its adjusted resident days for the same
report period, increased if necessary to a minimum occupancy of ninety
percent; that is, the greater of actual or imputed occupancy at ninety
percent of licensed beds, for each facility from facilities' cost
reports from the applicable report year, for facilities located within
urban counties and for those located within nonurban counties and
determine the median adjusted cost for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's operations component rate at the lower of:
(i) The facility's per resident day adjusted operations costs from
the applicable cost report period adjusted if necessary to a minimum
occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed beds before July 1, 2002,
and ninety percent effective July 1, 2002; or
(ii) The adjusted median per resident day general operations cost
for that facility's peer group, urban counties or nonurban counties;
and
(c) Adjust each facility's operations component rate for economic
trends and conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(7)(b).
(4)(a) Effective July 1, 2006, for any facility whose direct care
component rate allocation is set equal to its June 30, 2006, direct
care component rate allocation, as provided in RCW 74.46.506(5)(i), the
facility's operations component rate allocation shall also be set equal
to the facility's June 30, 2006, operations component rate allocation.
(b) The operations component rate allocation for facilities whose
operations component rate is set equal to their June 30, 2006,
operations component rate, shall be adjusted for economic trends and
conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(7)(b).
(5) The operations component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---