BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.67.370 and 2003 c 297 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Cities, towns, or counties may not require existing mobile home
parks to replace existing, functional septic systems with a sewer
system within the community unless the local board of health determines
that the septic system is failing.
(2) Cities, towns, and counties are prohibited from requiring
existing mobile home parks to pay any charges related to sewer, to
include, but not exclusively, a sewer service availability charge,
standby charge, consumption charge, or any other similar types of
charges associated with available but unused sewer service, including
any interest or penalties for nonpayment or enforcement charges, until
the mobile home park connects to the sewer service. When a mobile home
park connects to a sewer, cities, towns, and counties may only charge
mobile home parks prospectively from the date of connection for their
sewer service. Chapter 297, Laws of 2003 is remedial in nature and
applies retroactively to 1993.

--- END ---