BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.56.240 and 1997 c 393 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the county treasurer is unable, for the want of goods or
chattels whereupon to levy, to collect by distress or otherwise, the
taxes, or any part thereof, which may have been assessed upon the
personal property of any person or corporation, or an executor or
administrator, guardian, receiver, accounting officer, agent or factor,
the treasurer shall file with the county legislative authority, on the
first day of February following, a list of such taxes, with an
affidavit of the treasurer or of the deputy treasurer entrusted with
the collection of the taxes, stating that the treasurer had made
diligent search and inquiry for goods and chattels wherewith to make
such taxes, and was unable to make or collect the same. The county
legislative authority shall cancel such taxes as the county legislative
authority is satisfied cannot be collected.
(2) The county treasurer shall cancel all delinquent taxes, owed on
a mobile home, that are delinquent by more than one year if:
(a) The county treasurer determines that the distraint and sale of
a mobile home will cost more than the amount of delinquent taxes owed
on the mobile home; and
(b) The owner of the real estate used to provide space for the
mobile home:
(i) Originally requests the cancellation of taxes;
(ii) Will sell the mobile home pursuant to the foreclosure of a
landlord lien under chapter 60.72 RCW; and
(iii) Agrees to remit to the county treasurer, after the sale of
the mobile home, an amount equal to the taxes delinquent for one year
or less.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2007.

--- END ---