BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 57.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a district acquires either water facilities or sewer
facilities, or both from a city, and the district and the city within
which the facilities are located enter into an agreement stating that
the district will seek annexation of territory within that city, the
district commissioners may initiate a process for the annexation of
such territory.
(2) The annexation process shall commence upon the adoption of a
resolution by the commissioners calling for the question of annexation
to be submitted to the voters of the territory proposed for annexation
and setting forth the boundaries thereof. The resolution must be filed
with the county legislative authority of each county in which the
territory proposed for annexation is located.
(3) Upon receipt of the resolution, the county legislative
authority shall cause a hearing to be held as provided in section 2 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 57.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a resolution calling for an annexation election as provided
in section 1 of this act is presented for hearing, the legislative
authority of each county in which the territory proposed for annexation
is located shall hear the resolution or may adjourn and reconvene the
hearing as deemed necessary for its purposes. The hearing, however,
may not exceed four weeks in duration. Any person, firm, or
corporation may appear before the legislative authority or authorities
and make objections to the proposed boundary lines or to annexation of
the territory described in the resolution.
(2) Upon a final hearing, each county legislative authority may
make changes to the proposed boundary lines within the county as it
deems proper and shall formally establish and define the boundaries.
Each legislative authority also shall find whether the proposed
annexation will be conducive to the public health, welfare, and
convenience and whether it will be of special benefit to the land
included within the boundaries of the proposed annexation. No lands
that will not, in the judgment of the legislative authority, benefit by
inclusion therein, may be included within the boundaries of the
territory as established and defined. The legislative authority may
not include within the territory proposed for annexation any territory
outside of the boundary lines described in the resolution adopted by
the district under section 1(2) of this act.
(3) Upon the entry of the findings of the final hearing, each
county legislative authority, if it finds the proposed annexation
satisfies the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, shall
give notice of a special election to be held within the boundaries of
the territory proposed for annexation for the purpose of determining
whether the same shall be annexed to the district. The notice shall:
(a) Describe the boundaries established by the legislative
authority;
(b) State the name of the district to which the territory is
proposed to be annexed;
(c) Be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the
territory proposed for annexation at least once a week for a minimum of
two successive weeks prior to the election;
(d) Be posted for the same period in at least four public places
within the boundaries of the territory proposed for annexation; and
(e) Designate the places within the territory proposed for
annexation where the election shall be held.
(4) The proposition to the voters shall be expressed on ballots
containing the words:

For Annexation to District
or
Against Annexation to District

The county legislative authority shall name the persons to act as
judges at that election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 57.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The annexation election shall be held on the date designated in
the notice and shall be conducted in accordance with the general
election laws of the state. Qualified voters residing within the
territory proposed for annexation shall be permitted to vote at the
election.
(2) If the majority of the votes cast upon the question of such
election are for annexation, the territory concerned shall immediately
be deemed annexed to the district and the same shall then forthwith be
a part of the district, the same as though originally included in that
district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 57.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The method of annexation provided for in sections 1 through 3 of
this act is an alternative method and is additional to other methods
provided for in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Cities shall, in the predesign phase of construction projects
involving relocation of sewer and/or water facilities, consult with
public utilities operating water/sewer systems in order to coordinate
design.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.55.060 and 1963 c 4 s 36.55.060 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person constructing or operating any utility on or along a
county road shall be liable to the county for all necessary expense
incurred in restoring the county road to a suitable condition for
travel.
(2) No franchise shall be granted for a period of longer than fifty
years.
(3) No exclusive franchise or privilege shall be granted.
(4) The facilities of the holder of any such franchise shall be
removed at the expense of the holder thereof, to some other location on
such county road in the event it is to be constructed, altered, or
improved or becomes a primary state highway and such removal is
reasonably necessary for the construction, alteration, or improvement
thereof.
(5) Counties shall, in the predesign phase of construction projects
involving relocation of sewer and/or water facilities, consult with
public utilities operating water/sewer systems in order to coordinate
design.

Sec. 7 RCW 44.04.170 and 1999 c 153 s 59 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the duty of each association of municipal corporations
or municipal officers, which is recognized by law and utilized as an
official agency for the coordination of the policies and/or
administrative programs of municipal corporations, to submit
biennially, or oftener as necessary, to the governor and to the
legislature the joint recommendations of such participating
municipalities regarding changes which would affect the efficiency of
such municipal corporations. Such associations shall include but shall
not be limited to the Washington state association of fire
commissioners((, a state association of water/wastewater districts,))
and the Washington state school directors' association.

Sec. 8 RCW 57.08.005 and 2004 c 202 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A district shall have the following powers:
(1) To acquire by purchase or condemnation, or both, all lands,
property and property rights, and all water and water rights, both
within and without the district, necessary for its purposes. The right
of eminent domain shall be exercised in the same manner and by the same
procedure as provided for cities and towns, insofar as consistent with
this title, except that all assessment or reassessment rolls to be
prepared and filed by eminent domain commissioners or commissioners
appointed by the court shall be prepared and filed by the district, and
the duties devolving upon the city treasurer are imposed upon the
county treasurer;
(2) To lease real or personal property necessary for its purposes
for a term of years for which that leased property may reasonably be
needed;
(3) To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and
supply waterworks to furnish the district and inhabitants thereof and
any other persons, both within and without the district, with an ample
supply of water for all uses and purposes public and private with full
authority to regulate and control the use, content, distribution, and
price thereof in such a manner as is not in conflict with general law
and may construct, acquire, or own buildings and other necessary
district facilities. Where a customer connected to the district's
system uses the water on an intermittent or transient basis, a district
may charge for providing water service to such a customer, regardless
of the amount of water, if any, used by the customer. District
waterworks may include facilities which result in combined water supply
and electric generation, if the electricity generated thereby is a
byproduct of the water supply system. That electricity may be used by
the district or sold to any entity authorized by law to use or
distribute electricity. Electricity is deemed a byproduct when the
electrical generation is subordinate to the primary purpose of water
supply. For such purposes, a district may take, condemn and purchase,
acquire, and retain water from any public or navigable lake, river or
watercourse, or any underflowing water, and by means of aqueducts or
pipeline conduct the same throughout the district and any city or town
therein and carry it along and upon public highways, roads, and
streets, within and without such district. For the purpose of
constructing or laying aqueducts or pipelines, dams, or waterworks or
other necessary structures in storing and retaining water or for any
other lawful purpose such district may occupy the beds and shores up to
the high water mark of any such lake, river, or other watercourse, and
may acquire by purchase or condemnation such property or property
rights or privileges as may be necessary to protect its water supply
from pollution. For the purposes of waterworks which include
facilities for the generation of electricity as a byproduct, nothing in
this section may be construed to authorize a district to condemn
electric generating, transmission, or distribution rights or facilities
of entities authorized by law to distribute electricity, or to acquire
such rights or facilities without the consent of the owner;
(4) To purchase and take water from any municipal corporation,
private person, or entity. A district contiguous to Canada may
contract with a Canadian corporation for the purchase of water and for
the construction, purchase, maintenance, and supply of waterworks to
furnish the district and inhabitants thereof and residents of Canada
with an ample supply of water under the terms approved by the board of
commissioners;
(5) To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and
operate systems of sewers for the purpose of furnishing the district,
the inhabitants thereof, and persons outside the district with an
adequate system of sewers for all uses and purposes, public and
private, including but not limited to on-site sewage disposal
facilities, approved septic tanks or approved septic tank systems, on-site sanitary sewerage systems, inspection services and maintenance
services for private and public on-site systems, point and nonpoint
water pollution monitoring programs that are directly related to the
sewerage facilities and programs operated by a district, other
facilities, programs, and systems for the collection, interception,
treatment, and disposal of wastewater, and for the control of pollution
from wastewater with full authority to regulate the use and operation
thereof and the service rates to be charged. Under this chapter, after
July 1, 1998, any requirements for pumping the septic tank of an on-site sewage system should be based, among other things, on actual
measurement of accumulation of sludge and scum by a trained inspector,
trained owner's agent, or trained owner. Training must occur in a
program approved by the state board of health or by a local health
officer. Sewage facilities may include facilities which result in
combined sewage disposal or treatment and electric or natural gas
generation, except that the electricity or natural gas generated
thereby is a byproduct of the system of sewers. Such electricity or
natural gas may be used by the district or sold to any entity
authorized by law to distribute electricity or natural gas.
Electricity ((is)) and natural gas are deemed ((a)) byproducts when the
electrical or natural gas generation is subordinate to the primary
purpose of sewage disposal or treatment. The district may also sell
surplus natural gas, which may be produced as a byproduct. For such
purposes a district may conduct sewage throughout the district and
throughout other political subdivisions within the district, and
construct and lay sewer pipe along and upon public highways, roads, and
streets, within and without the district, and condemn and purchase or
acquire land and rights of way necessary for such sewer pipe. A
district may erect sewage treatment plants within or without the
district, and may acquire, by purchase or condemnation, properties or
privileges necessary to be had to protect any lakes, rivers, or
watercourses and also other areas of land from pollution from its
sewers or its sewage treatment plant. For the purposes of sewage
facilities which include facilities that result in combined sewage
disposal or treatment and electric generation where the electric
generation is a byproduct, nothing in this section may be construed to
authorize a district to condemn electric generating, transmission, or
distribution rights or facilities of entities authorized by law to
distribute electricity, or to acquire such rights or facilities without
the consent of the owners;
(6)(a) To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and
operate systems of drainage for the benefit and use of the district,
the inhabitants thereof, and persons outside the district with an
adequate system of drainage, including but not limited to facilities
and systems for the collection, interception, treatment, and disposal
of storm or surface waters, and for the protection, preservation, and
rehabilitation of surface and underground waters, and drainage
facilities for public highways, streets, and roads, with full authority
to regulate the use and operation thereof and, except as provided in
(b) of this subsection, the service rates to be charged.
(b) The rate a district may charge under this section for storm or
surface water sewer systems or the portion of the rate allocable to the
storm or surface water sewer system of combined sanitary sewage and
storm or surface water sewer systems shall be reduced by a minimum of
ten percent for any new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes
a permissive rainwater harvesting system. Rainwater harvesting systems
shall be properly sized to utilize the available roof surface of the
building. The jurisdiction shall consider rate reductions in excess of
ten percent dependent upon the amount of rainwater harvested.
(c) Drainage facilities may include natural systems. Drainage
facilities may include facilities which result in combined drainage
facilities and electric generation, except that the electricity
generated thereby is a byproduct of the drainage system. Such
electricity may be used by the district or sold to any entity
authorized by law to distribute electricity. Electricity is deemed a
byproduct when the electrical generation is subordinate to the primary
purpose of drainage collection, disposal, and treatment. For such
purposes, a district may conduct storm or surface water throughout the
district and throughout other political subdivisions within the
district, construct and lay drainage pipe and culverts along and upon
public highways, roads, and streets, within and without the district,
and condemn and purchase or acquire land and rights of way necessary
for such drainage systems. A district may provide or erect facilities
and improvements for the treatment and disposal of storm or surface
water within or without the district, and may acquire, by purchase or
condemnation, properties or privileges necessary to be had to protect
any lakes, rivers, or watercourses and also other areas of land from
pollution from storm or surface waters. For the purposes of drainage
facilities which include facilities that also generate electricity as
a byproduct, nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a
district to condemn electric generating, transmission, or distribution
rights or facilities of entities authorized by law to distribute
electricity, or to acquire such rights or facilities without the
consent of the owners;
(7) To construct, condemn, acquire, and own buildings and other
necessary district facilities;
(8) To compel all property owners within the district located
within an area served by the district's system of sewers to connect
their private drain and sewer systems with the district's system under
such penalty as the commissioners shall prescribe by resolution. The
district may for such purpose enter upon private property and connect
the private drains or sewers with the district system and the cost
thereof shall be charged against the property owner and shall be a lien
upon property served;
(9) Where a district contains within its borders, abuts, or is
located adjacent to any lake, stream, ground water as defined by RCW
90.44.035, or other waterway within the state of Washington, to provide
for the reduction, minimization, or elimination of pollutants from
those waters in accordance with the district's comprehensive plan, and
to issue general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, local improvement
district bonds, or utility local improvement bonds for the purpose of
paying all or any part of the cost of reducing, minimizing, or
eliminating the pollutants from these waters;
(10) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, to fix rates and
charges for water, sewer, and drain service supplied and to charge
property owners seeking to connect to the district's systems, as a
condition to granting the right to so connect, in addition to the cost
of the connection, such reasonable connection charge as the board of
commissioners shall determine to be proper in order that those property
owners shall bear their equitable share of the cost of the system. For
the purposes of calculating a connection charge, the board of
commissioners shall determine the pro rata share of the cost of
existing facilities and facilities planned for construction within the
next ten years and contained in an adopted comprehensive plan and other
costs borne by the district which are directly attributable to the
improvements required by property owners seeking to connect to the
system. The cost of existing facilities shall not include those
portions of the system which have been donated or which have been paid
for by grants. The connection charge may include interest charges
applied from the date of construction of the system until the
connection, or for a period not to exceed ten years, whichever is
shorter, at a rate commensurate with the rate of interest applicable to
the district at the time of construction or major rehabilitation of the
system, or at the time of installation of the lines to which the
property owner is seeking to connect. In lieu of requiring the
installation of permanent local facilities not planned for construction
by the district, a district may permit connection to the water and/or
sewer systems through temporary facilities installed at the property
owner's expense, provided the property owner pays a connection charge
consistent with the provisions of this chapter and agrees, in the
future, to connect to permanent facilities when they are installed; or
a district may permit connection to the water and/or sewer systems
through temporary facilities and collect from property owners so
connecting a proportionate share of the estimated cost of future local
facilities needed to serve the property, as determined by the district.
The amount collected, including interest at a rate commensurate with
the rate of interest applicable to the district at the time of
construction of the temporary facilities, shall be held for
contribution to the construction of the permanent local facilities by
other developers or the district. The amount collected shall be deemed
full satisfaction of the proportionate share of the actual cost of
construction of the permanent local facilities. If the permanent local
facilities are not constructed within fifteen years of the date of
payment, the amount collected, including any accrued interest, shall be
returned to the property owner, according to the records of the county
auditor on the date of return. If the amount collected is returned to
the property owner, and permanent local facilities capable of serving
the property are constructed thereafter, the property owner at the time
of construction of such permanent local facilities shall pay a
proportionate share of the cost of such permanent local facilities, in
addition to reasonable connection charges and other charges authorized
by this section. A district may permit payment of the cost of
connection and the reasonable connection charge to be paid with
interest in installments over a period not exceeding fifteen years.
The county treasurer may charge and collect a fee of three dollars for
each year for the treasurer's services. Those fees shall be a charge
to be included as part of each annual installment, and shall be
credited to the county current expense fund by the county treasurer.
Revenues from connection charges excluding permit fees are to be
considered payments in aid of construction as defined by department of
revenue rule. Rates or charges for on-site inspection and maintenance
services may not be imposed under this chapter on the development,
construction, or reconstruction of property.
Before adopting on-site inspection and maintenance utility
services, or incorporating residences into an on-site inspection and
maintenance or sewer utility under this chapter, notification must be
provided, prior to the applicable public hearing, to all residences
within the proposed service area that have on-site systems permitted by
the local health officer. The notice must clearly state that the
residence is within the proposed service area and must provide
information on estimated rates or charges that may be imposed for the
service.
A water-sewer district shall not provide on-site sewage system
inspection, pumping services, or other maintenance or repair services
under this section using water-sewer district employees unless the on-site system is connected by a publicly owned collection system to the
water-sewer district's sewerage system, and the on-site system
represents the first step in the sewage disposal process.
Except as otherwise provided in RCW 90.03.525, any public entity
and public property, including the state of Washington and state
property, shall be subject to rates and charges for sewer, water, storm
water control, drainage, and street lighting facilities to the same
extent private persons and private property are subject to those rates
and charges that are imposed by districts. In setting those rates and
charges, consideration may be made of in-kind services, such as stream
improvements or donation of property;
(11) To contract with individuals, associations and corporations,
the state of Washington, and the United States;
(12) To employ such persons as are needed to carry out the
district's purposes and fix salaries and any bond requirements for
those employees;
(13) To contract for the provision of engineering, legal, and other
professional services as in the board of commissioner's discretion is
necessary in carrying out their duties;
(14) To sue and be sued;
(15) To loan and borrow funds and to issue bonds and instruments
evidencing indebtedness under chapter 57.20 RCW and other applicable
laws;
(16) To transfer funds, real or personal property, property
interests, or services subject to RCW 57.08.015;
(17) To levy taxes in accordance with this chapter and chapters
57.04 and 57.20 RCW;
(18) To provide for making local improvements and to levy and
collect special assessments on property benefitted thereby, and for
paying for the same or any portion thereof in accordance with chapter
57.16 RCW;
(19) To establish street lighting systems under RCW 57.08.060;
(20) To exercise such other powers as are granted to water-sewer
districts by this title or other applicable laws; and
(21) To exercise any of the powers granted to cities and counties
with respect to the acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation
of, and fixing rates and charges for waterworks and systems of sewerage
and drainage.

Sec. 9 RCW 57.08.120 and 1996 c 230 s 319 are each amended to
read as follows:
A district may lease out real property which it owns or in which it
has an interest and which is not immediately necessary for its purposes
upon such terms as the board of commissioners deems proper. No such
lease shall be made until the district has first caused notice thereof
to be published twice in a newspaper in general circulation in the
district, the first publication to be at least fifteen days and the
second at least seven days prior to the making of such lease. The
notice shall describe the property, the lessee, and the lease payments.
A hearing shall be held pursuant to the terms of the notice, at which
time any and all persons who may be interested shall have the right to
appear and to be heard.
No such lease shall be made unless secured by a bond conditioned on
the performance of the terms of the lease, with surety satisfactory to
the commissioners and with a penalty of not less than one-sixth of the
term of the lease or for one year's rental, whichever is greater.
No such lease shall be made for a term longer than ((twenty-five))
fifty years. In cases involving leases of more than five years, the
commissioners may provide for or stipulate to acceptance of a bond
conditioned on the performance of a part of the term for five years or
more whenever it is further provided that the lessee must procure and
deliver to the commissioners renewal bonds with like terms and
conditions no more than two years prior nor less than one year prior to
the expiration of such bond during the entire term of the lease.
However, no such bond shall be construed to secure the furnishing of
any other bond by the same surety or indemnity company. The board of
commissioners may require a reasonable security deposit in lieu of a
bond on leased property owned by a district.
The commissioners may accept as surety on any bond required by this
section an approved surety company, or may accept in lieu thereof a
secured interest in property of a value at least twice the amount of
the bond required, conditioned further that in the event the
commissioners determine that the value of the bond security has become
or is about to become impaired, additional security shall be required
from the lessee.
The authority granted under this section shall not be exercised by
the board of commissioners unless the property is declared by
resolution of the board of commissioners to be property for which there
is a future need by the district and for the use of which provision is
made in the comprehensive plan of the district as the same may be
amended from time to time.

--- END ---