BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.06.022 and 2005 c 511 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A seller of real property ((located within one mile of the property
boundary of a farm or farm operation)) shall make available to the
buyer the following statement: "This notice is to inform ((prospective
residents)) you that the real property ((they are about to acquire lies
within one mile of the property boundary of a farm. The farm may
generate usual and ordinary noise, dust, odors, and other associated
conditions, and these practices)) you are considering for purchase may
lie in close proximity to a farm. The operation of a farm involves
usual and customary agricultural practices, which are protected ((by))
under RCW 7.48.305, the Washington right to farm act."

--- END ---