BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) To perform in the emerging global marketplace, Washington
manufacturers must master new technologies, production processes, and
methods of work organization;
(b) Only through modernization can Washington manufacturers both
compete successfully in the market of the future and pay good wages;
(c) Most small and midsize manufacturers cannot easily access the
technical assistance and skills training needed to make them globally
competitive;
(d) To be effective, any program to improve the capability of
Washington small and midsize manufacturers must reflect the specific
needs and capabilities of those firms.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that the state increase its
support for delivery of modernization services to small and midsize
manufacturers and leverage federal and private resources devoted to
such efforts. It is the further intent of the legislature that the
state facilitate the delivery of modernization services and:
(a) Encourage small and midsize firms to aggregate their demand for
training and other modernization services, thus driving down the cost
to the individual firm and securing more effective services; and
(b) Encourage large firms to support training consortia among their
suppliers and validate the importance of high performance work
organization and workplace learning as desirable supplier practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Washington manufacturing services is
organized as a private, nonprofit corporation in accordance with
chapter 24.03 RCW and this section. The mission of the center is to
operate a modernization extension system, coordinate a network of
public and private modernization resources, and stimulate the
competitiveness of small and midsize manufacturers in Washington.
(2) Washington manufacturing services shall be governed by a board
of directors. A majority of the board of directors shall be
representatives of small and medium-sized manufacturing firms and
industry associations, networks, or consortia. The board shall also
include at least one member representing labor unions or labor councils
and, as ex officio members, the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development, the executive director of
the state board for community and technical colleges, and the director
of the work force training and education coordinating board, or their
respective designees.
(3) Washington manufacturing services may:
(a) Charge fees for services, make and execute contracts with any
individual, corporation, association, public agency, or any other
entity, and employ all other legal instruments necessary or convenient
for the performance of its duties and the exercise of its powers and
functions under this chapter; and
(b) Receive funds from federal, state, or local governments,
private businesses, foundations, or any other source for purposes
consistent with this chapter.
(4) Washington manufacturing services shall:
(a) Develop policies, plans, and programs to assist in the
modernization of businesses in targeted sectors of Washington's economy
and coordinate the delivery of modernization services;
(b) Provide information about the advantages of modernization and
the modernization services available in the state to federal, state,
and local economic development officials, state colleges and
universities, and private providers;
(c) Collaborate with the Washington quality initiative in the
development of manufacturing quality standards and quality
certification programs;
(d) Serve as an information clearinghouse and provide access for
users to the federal manufacturing extension partnership national
research and information system; and
(e) Provide, either directly or through contracts, assistance to
industry associations, networks, or consortia, that would be of value
to their member firms in:
(i) Adopting advanced business management practices such as
strategic planning and total quality management;
(ii) Developing mechanisms for interfirm collaboration and
cooperation;
(iii) Appraising, purchasing, installing, and effectively using
equipment, technologies, and processes that improve the quality of
goods and services and the productivity of the firm;
(iv) Improving human resource systems and work force training in a
manner that moves firms toward flexible, high-performance work
organizations;
(v) Developing new products;
(vi) Conducting market research, analysis, and development of new
sales channels and export markets;
(vii) Improving processes to enhance environmental, health, and
safety compliance; and
(viii) Improving credit, capital management, and business finance
skills.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 24 RCW.

--- END ---