BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
the amount paid by small employers to provide health care services for
its employees. Payments made by employees are not eligible for
deduction under this subsection.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Small employer" has the meaning provided in RCW 48.43.005;
(b) "Health care services" means a health benefit plan as defined
in RCW 48.43.005, contributions to health savings accounts as defined
by the United States internal revenue service, or other health care
services purchased by the small employer for its employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---