BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the professional
certification process required of new teachers and experienced teachers
from out-of-state is intended to advance their teaching skills and
demonstrate their ability to improve student learning. The legislature
also finds that professional certification is a rigorous and demanding
process, yet the state salary schedule does not recognize these
advanced skill levels. Furthermore, teachers often pay substantial
costs to complete the programs, but are not reimbursed for their
expenses. Therefore the legislature intends to address these
inequities by providing a bonus for all teachers who have achieved
professional certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Certificated instructional staff who have attained a
professional certificate under rules adopted by the professional
educator standards board or its predecessor agency shall receive an
annual bonus beginning the school year immediately following their
certification.
(2) The bonus for professional certification is provided in
addition to compensation received under a district's salary schedule
adopted in accordance with RCW 28A.405.200 and shall not be included in
calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary
limitations under RCW 28A.400.200.
(3) The bonus shall be paid in monthly increments and shall be
included in the definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW
41.32.010(10). The amount of the bonus shall be established by the
legislature through the omnibus appropriations act and is not part of
basic education.

--- END ---