BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.20.141 and 2004 c 271 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To be valid, a convention must be attended by at least one
hundred registered voters.
(2) In order to nominate candidates for the offices of president
and vice president of the United States, United States senator, United
States representative, or any statewide office, a nominating convention
shall obtain and submit to the filing officer the signatures of at
least ((one thousand)) two hundred registered voters of the state of
Washington. In order to nominate candidates for any other office, a
nominating convention shall obtain and submit to the filing officer the
signatures of ((one hundred)) twenty-five persons who are registered to
vote in the jurisdiction of the office for which the nominations are
made.

--- END ---