BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that advanced
certification and education for teachers should focus on deepening
teachers' knowledge in the academic content area in which they
instruct. The legislature further finds that current professional
certification programs fail to provide adequate focus on academic
content, instead offering general and often repetitive coursework in
classroom management, learning theory, personal growth, and other
topics. Moreover, professional certification programs vary widely
depending on the college or university offering them. Professional
certification does not provide sufficient additional value to a
teacher's knowledge and skills to warrant being required of all
teachers. Therefore the legislature intends to remove the mandate of
professional certification for teachers and replace it with an
incentive for teachers to obtain advanced education in a specific
content area.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.410.250 and 2005 c 498 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((agency responsible for educator certification)) professional
educator standards board shall adopt rules for professional
certification that:
(1) Authorize but do not require teachers to seek or obtain
professional certification as an advanced level of certification;
(2) Provide for a uniform and standard program, activities, and
expectations for all approved professional certification programs;
(3) Provide maximum program choice for applicants((, promote
portability among programs,)) and promote maximum efficiency for
applicants in attaining professional certification;
(((2) Require professional certification no earlier than the fifth
year following the year that the teacher first completes provisional
status, with an automatic two-year extension upon enrollment;
(3))) (4) Grant professional certification to any teacher who
attains certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards;
(((4))) (5) Permit any teacher currently enrolled in or
participating in a program leading to professional certification to
continue the program under administrative rules in place when the
teacher began the program;
(((5))) (6) Provide criteria for the approval of educational
service districts, beginning no later than August 31, 2007, to offer
programs leading to professional certification. The rules shall be
written to encourage institutions of higher education and educational
service districts to partner with local school districts or consortia
of school districts, as appropriate, to provide instruction for
teachers seeking professional certification;
(((6) Encourage)) (7) Require institutions of higher education to
offer professional certificate coursework as continuing education
credit hours. This shall not prevent an institution of higher
education from providing the option of including the professional
certification requirements as part of a master's degree program;
(((7))) (8) Provide criteria for a liaison relationship between
approved programs and school districts in which applicants are
employed;
(((8))) (9) Identify an expedited professional certification
process for out-of-state teachers who have five years or more of
successful teaching experience to demonstrate skills and impact on
student learning commensurate with Washington requirements for
professional certification. The rules may require these teachers,
((within one year of the time they begin to teach in the state's public
schools,)) if they seek professional certification, to take a course in
or show evidence that they can teach to the state's essential academic
learning requirements; and
(((9))) (10) Identify an evaluation process of approved programs
that includes a review of the program coursework and applicant
coursework load requirements, linkages of programs to individual
teacher professional growth plans, linkages to school district and
school improvement plans, and, to the extent possible, linkages to
school district professional enrichment and growth programs for
teachers, where such programs are in place in school districts. ((The
agency shall provide a preliminary report on the evaluation process to
the senate and house of representatives committees on education policy
by November 1, 2005. The board shall identify:
(a) A process for awarding conditional approval of a program that
shall include annual evaluations of the program until the program is
awarded full approval;
(b) A less intensive evaluation cycle every three years once a
program receives full approval unless the responsible agency has reason
to intensify the evaluation;
(c) A method for investigating programs that have received numerous
complaints from students enrolled in the program and from those
recently completing the program;
(d) A method for investigating programs at the reasonable
discretion of the agency; and
(e) A method for using, in the evaluation, both program completer
satisfaction responses and data on the impact of educators who have
obtained professional certification on student work and achievement.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Effective September 1, 2006, certificated instructional staff
who have attained a master's or doctorate degree in an academic content
area that is directly aligned with one of the endorsements issued to
their teaching certificate shall receive an annual bonus. Certificated
instructional staff who attain such an advanced degree after September
1, 2006, shall receive the annual bonus beginning the school year
immediately following attainment of the degree.
(2) The bonus under this section is provided in addition to
compensation received under a district's salary schedule adopted in
accordance with RCW 28A.405.200 and shall not be included in
calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary
limitations under RCW 28A.400.200. The bonus is not part of basic
education.
(3) The bonus shall be paid in monthly increments and shall be
included in the definition of "earnable compensation" under RCW
41.32.010. The annual amount of the bonus shall be three thousand five
hundred dollars, prorated for less than full-time employment.
(4) The professional educator standards board shall adopt rules
defining the alignment of academic degrees and endorsement areas.

--- END ---