BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.305.220 and 2004 c 19 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall develop for use by all
public school districts a standardized high school transcript. The
state board of education shall establish clear definitions for the
terms "credits" and "hours" so that school programs operating on the
quarter, semester, or trimester system can be compared.
(2) The standardized high school transcript shall include ((the
following information:
(a) The highest scale score and level achieved in each content area
on the high school Washington assessment of student learning or other
high school measures successfully completed by the student as provided
by RCW 28A.655.061 and 28A.155.045;
(b) All scholar designations as provided by RCW 28A.655.061;
(c))) a notation of whether the student has earned a certificate of
individual achievement or a certificate of academic achievement by
means of the Washington assessment of student learning or by an
alternative assessment.
(3) Transcripts are important documents to students who will apply
for admission to postsecondary institutions of higher education.
Transcripts are also important to students who will seek employment
upon or prior to graduation from high school. It is recognized that
student transcripts may be the only record available to employers in
their decision-making processes regarding prospective employees. The
superintendent of public instruction shall require school districts to
inform annually all high school students that prospective employers may
request to see transcripts and that the prospective employee's decision
to release transcripts can be an important part of the process of
applying for employment.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2004 c 19 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (((11))) (10) of this section, one or more
objective alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate
achievement of state academic standards. The objective alternative
assessments for each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the
skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the
Washington assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045, acquisition of the certificate is required for graduation
from a public high school but is not the only requirement for
graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a
student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more
content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement,
then the student may retake the assessment in the content area up to
four times at no cost to the student. If the student successfully
meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the
student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once
objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection
(((11))) (10) of this section, a student may use the objective
alternative assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully
meets the state standards for that content area if the student has
retaken the Washington assessment of student learning at least once.
If the student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement. The student's transcript shall note whether the
certificate of academic achievement was acquired by means of the
Washington assessment of student learning or by an alternative
assessment.
(4) Beginning with the graduating class of 2010, a student must
meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content
areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the Washington
assessment of student learning or the objective alternative assessments
in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) ((Beginning with the graduating class of 2006, the highest
scale score and level achieved in each content area on the high school
Washington assessment of student learning shall be displayed on a
student's transcript. In addition, beginning with the graduating class
of 2008, each student shall receive a scholar's designation on his or
her transcript for each content area in which the student achieves
level four the first time the student takes that content area
assessment.
(8))) Beginning in 2006, school districts must make available to
students the following options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(((9))) (8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of
the high school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall
pay for retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(((10))) (9) Subject to available funding, the superintendent shall
pilot opportunities for retaking the high school assessment beginning
in the 2004-05 school year. Beginning no later than September 2006,
opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year shall be
available to each school district.
(((11))) (10) The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop options for implementing objective
alternative assessments, which may include an appeals process, for
students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic standards.
The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable in rigor to
the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the
Washington assessment of student learning and be objective in its
determination of student achievement of the state standards. Before
any objective alternative assessments are used by a student to
demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in a content
area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall formally
approve the use of any objective alternative assessments through the
omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent resolution.
(((12))) (11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives
and senate education committees shall obtain information and
conclusions from recognized, independent, national assessment experts
regarding the validity and reliability of the high school Washington
assessment of student learning for making individual student high
school graduation determinations.
(((13))) (12) To help assure continued progress in academic
achievement as a foundation for high school graduation and to assure
that students are on track for high school graduation, each school
district shall prepare plans for students as provided in this
subsection (((13))) (12).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content
areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during the
previous school year. The plan shall include the courses,
competencies, and other steps needed to be taken by the student to meet
state academic standards and stay on track for graduation. This
requirement shall be phased in as follows:
(i) Beginning no later than the 2004-05 school year ninth grade
students as described in this subsection (((13))) (12)(a) shall have a
plan.
(ii) Beginning no later than the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter eighth grade students as described in this subsection
(((13))) (12)(a) shall have a plan.
(iii) The parent or guardian shall be notified, preferably through
a parent conference, of the student's results on the Washington
assessment of student learning, actions the school intends to take to
improve the student's skills in any content area in which the student
was unsuccessful, strategies to help them improve their student's
skills, and the content of the student's plan.
(iv) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.
(b) Beginning with the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter, all fifth grade students who were not successful in one or
more of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment of
student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of a student described in this
subsection (((13))) (12)(b) shall be notified, preferably through a
parent conference, of the student's results on the Washington
assessment of student learning, actions the school intends to take to
improve the student's skills in any content area in which the student
was unsuccessful, and provide strategies to help them improve their
student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.

--- END ---