BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.04.294 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 4, 2004:
(1) "Misconduct" includes, but is not limited to, the following
conduct by a claimant:
(a) Willful or wanton disregard of the rights, title, and interests
of the employer or a fellow employee;
(b) Deliberate violations or disregard of standards of behavior
which the employer has the right to expect of an employee;
(c) Carelessness or negligence that causes or would likely cause
serious bodily harm to the employer or a fellow employee; or
(d) Carelessness or negligence of such degree or recurrence to show
an intentional or substantial disregard of the employer's interest.
(2) The following acts are considered misconduct because the acts
signify a willful or wanton disregard of the rights, title, and
interests of the employer or a fellow employee. These acts include,
but are not limited to:
(a) Insubordination showing a deliberate, willful, or purposeful
refusal to follow the reasonable directions or instructions of the
employer;
(b) Repeated inexcusable tardiness following warnings by the
employer;
(c) Dishonesty related to employment, including but not limited to
deliberate falsification of company records, theft, deliberate
deception, or lying;
(d) Repeated and inexcusable absences, including absences for which
the employee was able to give advance notice and failed to do so;
(e) Deliberate acts that are illegal, provoke violence or violation
of laws, or violate the collective bargaining agreement. However, an
employee who engages in lawful union activity may not be disqualified
due to misconduct;
(f) Violation of a company rule if the rule is reasonable and if
the ((claimant)) employee knew or should have known of the existence of
the rule; ((or))
(g)(i) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or
after the effective date of this act, using or being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any nonprescribed controlled
substance when the employee is:
(A) Driving, or is in actual physical control of, a motor vehicle
while acting within the scope of employment; or
(B) Acting within the scope of employment in a position identified
as a safety-sensitive position by written employer policy that was in
effect when the conduct occurred and concerning which the affected
employee received actual notice.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (2)(g):
(A) "Controlled substance" means the same as the definition in RCW
69.50.101;
(B) "Motor vehicle" means the same as the definition in RCW
46.04.320; and
(C) "Under the influence" means the standard established by the
employer in a written policy that was in effect when the conduct
occurred and concerning which the affected employee received actual
notice or, if the employer has not established such a written policy,
the same as the standard in RCW 46.61.502.
(iii) This subsection (2)(g) does not limit application of this
section to other misconduct involving intoxicating liquor or controlled
substances; or
(h) Violations of law by the ((claimant)) employee while acting
within the scope of employment that substantially affect the
((claimant's)) employee's job performance or that substantially harm
the employer's ability to do business.
(3) "Misconduct" does not include:
(a) Inefficiency, unsatisfactory conduct, or failure to perform
well as the result of inability or incapacity;
(b) Inadvertence or ordinary negligence in isolated instances; or
(c) Good faith errors in judgment or discretion.
(4) "Gross misconduct" means a criminal act in connection with an
individual's work for which the individual has been convicted in a
criminal court, or has admitted committing, or conduct connected with
the individual's work that demonstrates a flagrant and wanton disregard
of and for the rights, title, or interest of the employer or a fellow
employee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The commissioner of the employment security
department may adopt such rules as are necessary to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

--- END ---