BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
motor vehicles to: (a) General authority Washington law enforcement
agencies; or (b) local governments if the vehicles are designed and
constructed specifically to provide emergency services, including
medical-aid vehicles, ambulances, and fire engines.
(2) Only the first twenty-five thousand dollars of the selling
price is exempt from tax under this section.
(3) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(4) For the purposes of this section and section 2 of this act, the
following definitions apply:
(a) "General authority Washington law enforcement agency" has the
same meaning as in RCW 10.93.020 except "general authority Washington
law enforcement agency" does not include the Washington state patrol or
the department of fish and wildlife.
(b) "Local government" means any county, city, town, public
hospital district, fire protection district, regional fire protection
service authority, or emergency medical service district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply with respect to
the use of motor vehicles by: (a) General authority Washington law
enforcement agencies; and (b) local governments if the vehicles are
constructed specifically to provide emergency services, including
medical-aid vehicles, ambulances, and fire engines.
(2) Only the first twenty-five thousand dollars of the value of the
article used is exempt under this section.
(3) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---