BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Local governments are the appropriate place for land use
changes to be considered and for ordinances to be implemented that
relate to the clearing and grading of land, local services, and
critical areas;
(b) The department of natural resources implements the forest
practices act and the forest practices rules;
(c) The department of ecology is responsible for protection of
water quality;
(d) It is in the best interests of the state that forest landowners
keep their land in forestry;
(e) Working forests are vital to the economic and environmental
health of the state;
(f) Processes are in place which allow a landowner to convert
forest land to another use or maintain the option to convert forest
land at a later date;
(g) Laws governing conversion of forest land to other uses and
regulatory jurisdiction over such forest practices have been in place
for more than eight years; and
(h) It is clear that at times in some places in the state these
laws, and associated administrative processes, have unnecessarily
complicated landowners' ability to carry out forest practices.
(2) The department of natural resources and the department of
ecology shall work with a statewide association of counties and other
participants in the process leading to the forests and fish law to
determine how the current laws and processes regulating forest
practices and conversion of forest land to a nonforestry use could be
improved by clarifying roles and responsibilities, eliminating
duplicative regulation of the same activity, making any needed
adjustments to regulatory requirements, and simplifying pathways
leading to regulatory decisions while maintaining current standards of
environmental protection.
(3) The evaluation required by this section must include specific
examination of laws and administrative processes governing:
(a) Interactions among the department of natural resources, the
department of ecology, and local governments in situations where both
the state and local governments have regulatory responsibilities
related to the same forestry-related activity;
(b) Moratoriums on the conversion of forest land;
(c) Conversion harvest option plans;
(d) Determination of lead agency status pursuant to the state
environmental policy act; and
(e) Application, processing, and recording fees.
(4) The department of natural resources must provide a report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 31, 2006,
including recommendations for changes to laws and administrative
processes.
(5) This section expires on July 1, 2007.

--- END ---