BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.09.065 and 2000 c 11 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Effective July 1, 1997, an applicant)) All persons applying
under this chapter shall pay an application fee and a recording fee, if
applicable, at the time an application or notification is submitted to
the department or to the local governmental entity as provided in this
chapter.
(2) ((For applications and notifications submitted to the
department,)) The application fee shall be fifty dollars for class II,
III, and IV forest practices applications or notifications relating to
the commercial harvest of timber, regardless of whether the application
or notification is submitted to the department or a local governmental
entity. ((However, the fee shall be five hundred dollars for class IV
forest practices applications on lands being converted to other uses or
on lands which are not to be reforested because of the likelihood of
future conversion to urban development or on lands that are contained
within "urban growth areas," designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW,
except the fee shall be fifty dollars on those lands where the forest
landowner provides:
(a) A written statement of intent signed by the forest landowner
not to convert to a use other than commercial forest product operations
for ten years, accompanied by either a written forest management plan
acceptable to the department or documentation that the land is enrolled
under the provisions of chapter 84.33 RCW; or
(b) A conversion option harvest plan approved by the local
governmental entity and submitted to the department as part of the
forest practices application.))
All money collected by the department from fees under this subsection
shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(3) ((For applications submitted to the local governmental entity,
the fee shall be five hundred dollars for class IV forest practices on
lands being converted to other uses or lands that are contained within
"urban growth areas," designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, except
as otherwise provided in this section, unless a different fee is
otherwise provided by the local governmental entity.
(4))) Recording fees shall be as provided in chapter 36.18 RCW.
(((5))) (4) An application fee under subsection (2) of this section
shall be refunded or credited to the applicant if either the
application or notification is disapproved by the department or the
application or notification is withdrawn by the applicant due to
restrictions imposed by the department.

--- END ---