BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.20.020 and 2004 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Boarding home" means any home or other institution, however
named, which is advertised, announced, or maintained for the express or
implied purpose of providing housing, basic services, and assuming
general responsibility for the safety and well-being of the residents,
and may also provide domiciliary care, consistent with chapter 142,
Laws of 2004, to seven or more residents after July 1, 2000. However,
a boarding home that is licensed for three to six residents prior to or
on July 1, 2000, may maintain its boarding home license as long as it
is continually licensed as a boarding home. "Boarding home" shall not
include facilities certified as group training homes pursuant to RCW
71A.22.040, nor any home, institution or section thereof which is
otherwise licensed and regulated under the provisions of state law
providing specifically for the licensing and regulation of such home,
institution or section thereof. Nor shall it include any independent
senior housing, independent living units in continuing care retirement
communities, or other similar living situations including those
subsidized by the department of housing and urban development.
(2) "Basic services" means housekeeping services, meals, nutritious
snacks, laundry, and activities.
(3) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal
successor thereof.
(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(5) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(6) "Resident's representative" means a person designated
voluntarily by a competent resident, in writing, to act in the
resident's behalf concerning the care and services provided by the
boarding home and to receive information from the boarding home, if
there is no legal representative. The resident's competence shall be
determined using the criteria in RCW 11.88.010(1)(e). The resident's
representative may not be affiliated with the licensee, boarding home,
or management company, unless the affiliated person is a family member
of the resident. The resident's representative shall not have
authority to act on behalf of the resident once the resident is no
longer competent.
(7) "Domiciliary care" means: Assistance with activities of daily
living provided by the boarding home either directly or indirectly; or
health support services, if provided directly or indirectly by the
boarding home; or intermittent nursing services, if provided directly
or indirectly by the boarding home.
(8) "General responsibility for the safety and well-being of the
resident" means the provision of the following: Prescribed general low
sodium diets; prescribed general diabetic diets; prescribed mechanical
soft foods; emergency assistance; monitoring of the resident; arranging
health care appointments with outside health care providers and
reminding residents of such appointments as necessary; coordinating
health care services with outside health care providers consistent with
RCW 18.20.380; assisting the resident to obtain and maintain glasses,
hearing aids, dentures, canes, crutches, walkers, wheelchairs, and
assistive communication devices; observation of the resident for
changes in overall functioning; blood pressure checks as scheduled;
responding appropriately when there are observable or reported changes
in the resident's physical, mental, or emotional functioning; or
medication assistance as permitted under RCW 69.41.085 and as defined
in RCW 69.41.010.
(9) "Legal representative" means a person or persons identified in
RCW 7.70.065 who may act on behalf of the resident pursuant to the
scope of their legal authority. The legal representative shall not be
affiliated with the licensee, boarding home, or management company,
unless the affiliated person is a family member of the resident.
(10) "Nonresident individual" means a person who resides in
independent senior housing, independent living units in continuing care
retirement communities, or in other similar living environments or in
a boarding home and may receive one or more of the services listed in
RCW 18.20.030(5)((, but)). A nonresident individual residing in an
unlicensed apartment within a boarding home, or in independent senior
housing that is not part of a continuing care retirement community, or
other similar living environments, may not receive domiciliary care, as
defined in this chapter, directly or indirectly by the ((facility))
boarding home and may not receive the items and services listed in
subsection (8) of this section, except during the time the person is
receiving adult day service as defined in this section. A nonresident
individual residing in independent senior housing that is part of a
continuing care retirement community may, in addition to the services
listed in RCW 18.20.030(5), receive the services listed in section 2 of
this act.
(11) "Resident" means an individual who is not related by blood or
marriage to the operator of the boarding home, and by reason of age or
disability, chooses to reside in the boarding home and receives basic
services and one or more of the services listed under general
responsibility for the safety and well-being of the resident and may
receive domiciliary care or respite care provided directly or
indirectly by the boarding home and shall be permitted to receive
hospice care through an outside service provider when arranged by the
resident or the resident's legal representative under RCW 18.20.380.
(12) "Resident applicant" means an individual who is seeking
admission to a licensed boarding home and who has completed and signed
an application for admission, or such application for admission has
been completed and signed in their behalf by their legal representative
if any, and if not, then the designated representative if any.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.39 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A continuing care retirement community may provide the
following supportive services and health care services to nonresidents
who reside in the independent senior housing setting to promote
independence, personal hygiene, and safety in his or her own apartment:
(a) Assistance with compression stockings;
(b) Assistance with inserting hearing aids;
(c) Setting up medi-sets;
(d) Medication assistance consistent with RCW 69.41.085 and as
defined in RCW 69.41.010;
(e) Postsurgery dressing changes, nonsterile;
(f) Removal of sutures postsurgery;
(g) Ear irrigation;
(h) Resident specific blood pressure monitoring following a
medication change;
(i) Reminding the nonresident of a scheduled health care
appointment;
(j) Delivery of meals to nonresidents;
(k) First aid care;
(l) Oxygen tank adjustment; and
(m) Blood glucose monitoring including the administration of
insulin as defined in RCW 69.41.010.
The supportive services or health care services that may be
provided are services that a person without a functional limitation
would customarily and personally perform without assistance or are
services that are provided as a convenience to the nonresident.
(2) The individual who chooses to receive supportive services or
health care services is responsible for initiating the scheduling of
such services by informing the continuing care retirement community of
those permitted tasks that the individual would need or prefer to have
performed or provided.
(3) When a licensed health care provider orders treatment involving
a health care task to be performed under this section, the
responsibility to ascertain that the patient understands the treatment
and will be able to follow through on the care task is the same as it
would be for a patient who performs the health care task for himself or
herself, and the licensed health care provider incurs no additional
liability when ordering a health care task which is to be performed
under this section.
(4) The responsibility to initiate self-directed health care tasks,
to possess the necessary knowledge and training for those tasks, and to
exercise judgment regarding the manner of their performance rests and
remains with the person who has chosen to request that those tasks be
provided or performed by the continuing care retirement community.
(5) For the purpose of this section, a continuing care retirement
community has the same meaning defined in RCW 70.38.025.

--- END ---