BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.42.100 and 2005 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of the crime of endangerment with a
controlled substance if the person ((knowingly or intentionally permits
a dependent child or dependent adult to be exposed to, ingest, inhale,
or have contact with methamphetamine or ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
anhydrous ammonia, including their salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers, that are being used in the manufacture of methamphetamine,
including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers)) manufactures,
delivers, or possesses with the intent to manufacture or deliver a
controlled substance in violation of chapter 69.50 RCW, upon the same
premises where a child or dependent adult is present.
(2) As used in this section, "premises" means any:
(a) Motor vehicle or vessel;
(b) Dwelling or rental unit including, but not limited to,
apartment, townhouse, condominium, mobile home, manufactured home,
motel room, or hotel room;
(c) Dwelling house, its curtilage, and any other outbuildings.
(3) Endangerment with a controlled substance is a class B felony.

--- END ---