BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.12.035 and 2002 c 175 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Volunteers shall be deemed employees and/or workers, as the
case may be, for all purposes relating to medical aid benefits under
chapter 51.36 RCW.
((A)) (b) As used in this subsection, "volunteer" ((shall)) means
a person who performs any assigned or authorized duties for the state
or any agency thereof, except emergency services workers as described
by chapter 38.52 RCW, brought about by one's own free choice, receives
no wages, and is registered and accepted as a volunteer by the state or
any agency thereof, prior to the occurrence of the injury or the
contraction of an occupational disease, for the purpose of engaging in
authorized volunteer service((: PROVIDED, That such)). The person
shall be deemed to be a volunteer although he or she may be granted
maintenance and reimbursement for actual expenses necessarily incurred
in performing his or her assigned or authorized duties.
(c) Any and all premiums or assessments due under this title on
account of ((such)) volunteer service covered under this subsection
shall be the obligation of and be paid by the state or any agency
thereof which has registered and accepted the services of volunteers.
(d) Volunteers who provide volunteer services to the department of
corrections in an inmate education program or as a chaplain do not have
any right of action whatsoever against the state or the department of
corrections on account of an injury incurred or an occupational disease
contracted in the course of that volunteer service, except as otherwise
provided in this title.
(2)(a) Except as provided in RCW 51.12.050, volunteers may be
deemed employees and/or workers, as the case may be, for all purposes
relating to medical aid benefits under chapter 51.36 RCW at the option
of any city, county, town, special district, municipal corporation, or
political subdivision of any type, or any private nonprofit charitable
organization, when any such unit of local government or any such
nonprofit organization has given notice of covering all of its
volunteers to the director prior to the occurrence of the injury or
contraction of an occupational disease.
((A)) (b) As used in this subsection, "volunteer" ((shall)) means
a person who performs any assigned or authorized duties for any
((such)) unit of local government((,)) or ((any such)) nonprofit
organization described in (a) of this subsection, except emergency
services workers as described by chapter 38.52 RCW, or fire fighters
covered by chapter 41.24 RCW, brought about by one's own free choice,
receives no wages, and is registered and accepted as a volunteer by any
such unit of local government((,)) or any such nonprofit organization
which has given ((such)) the notice((,)) required in (a) of this
subsection for the purpose of engaging in authorized volunteer
services((: PROVIDED, That such)). The person shall be deemed to be
a volunteer although he or she may be granted maintenance and
reimbursement for actual expenses necessarily incurred in performing
his or her assigned or authorized duties((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
However, juveniles performing community restitution under chapter 13.40
RCW may not be granted coverage as volunteers under this section.
(c) Any and all premiums or assessments due under this title on
account of ((such)) volunteer service covered under this subsection for
any ((such)) unit of local government((,)) or ((any such)) nonprofit
organization described in (a) of this subsection shall be the
obligation of and be paid by such unit of local government or nonprofit
organization which has registered and accepted the services of
volunteers and exercised its option to secure the medical aid benefits
under chapter 51.36 RCW for such volunteers.

--- END ---