BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.24.5501 and 1997 c 364 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((By December 1, 1997)) When funded, the Washington association
of sheriffs and police chiefs shall convene a sex offender model policy
work group to develop a model policy for law enforcement agencies ((to
follow when they disclose information about sex offenders to the public
under RCW 4.24.550. The model policy shall be designed to further the
objectives of providing adequate notice to the community concerning sex
offenders who are or will be residing in the community and of assisting
community members in developing constructive plans to prepare
themselves and their children for residing near released sex
offenders)) and other criminal justice personnel. The model policy
shall provide guidelines for sex offender registration, community
notification, and strategies for sex offender management.
(2) In developing the policy, the association shall consult with
representatives of the following agencies and professions: (a) The
department of corrections; (b) the department of social and health
services; (c) the indeterminate sentence review board; (d) the
Washington state council of police officers; (e) local correctional
agencies; (f) the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys; (g)
the Washington ((public defender association)) association of criminal
defense lawyers; (h) the Washington association for the treatment of
sexual abusers; ((and)) (i) victim advocates; (j) the office of the
superintendent of public instruction; (k) the association of Washington
cities; (l) the criminal justice training commission; and (m) the
Washington coalition of sexual assault programs.
The sex offender model policy work group, once convened, shall
first conduct a series of community meetings around the state to assess
the practices and needs of communities, identify best practices on sex
offender registration, community notification, and strategies for sex
offender management. Once the sex offender model policy work group has
received input from stakeholders on a final draft of the model policy,
the policy shall be presented to the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs for adoption or rejection. Following the adoption of
a model policy, the sex offender model policy work group shall conduct
a series of meetings around the state with local law enforcement
agencies and other criminal justice personnel to review the model
policy and conduct training as needed. The sex offender model policy
work group shall then be dissolved, and, when funded, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall be responsible for the
continued promotion of the model policy, including annual or biennial
regional workshops with local law enforcement agencies and other
criminal justice personnel to encourage sex offender registration,
community notification, and strategies for sex offender management
policies and practices that best fit the needs, characteristics, and
risks of each community.
(3) The model policy shall, at a minimum, include recommendations
to address the following issues: (a) Procedures for local agencies or
officials to accomplish the notifications required under RCW
4.24.550(((8))) (10), including the identification of best practices
for community notification, as they relate to the specific needs and
characteristics to each community and the risk posed to that community
and including the identification of best practices for notification of
a school and the community when a juvenile sex offender attends a
school; (b) contents and form of community notification documents,
including procedures for ensuring the accuracy of factual information
contained in the notification documents, and ways of protecting the
privacy of victims of the offenders' crimes; (c) methods of
distributing community notification documents; (d) methods of providing
follow-up notifications to community residents at specified intervals
and of disclosing information about offenders to law enforcement
agencies in other jurisdictions if necessary to protect the public; (e)
methods of educating community residents at public meetings on how they
can use the information in the notification document in a reasonable
manner to enhance their individual and collective safety; (f)
procedures for educating community members regarding the right of
juvenile and adult sex offenders not to be the subject of harassment or
criminal acts as a result of the notification process; ((and)) (g)
procedures and documents for local law enforcement agencies to provide
appropriate notification when a sex offender risk level is
reclassified, including strategies to monitor the reclassification of
sex offender risk levels by local law enforcement agencies; (h)
formulas and instructions on standard sex offender risk assessment
instruments; (i) strategies for sex offender management; and (j) other
matters the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs deems
necessary ((to ensure the effective and fair administration of RCW
4.24.550)) as it relates to sex offender registration, community
notification, and management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the supplemental omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---