BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.753 and 2002 c 289 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that recent developments in molecular biology
and genetics have important applications for forensic science. It has
been scientifically established that there is a unique pattern to the
chemical structure of the deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) contained in each
cell of the human body. The process for identifying this pattern is
called "DNA identification."
The legislature further finds that DNA data bases are important
tools in criminal investigations, in the exclusion of individuals who
are the subject of investigations or prosecutions, and in detecting
recidivist acts. It is the policy of this state to assist federal,
state, and local criminal justice and law enforcement agencies in both
the identification and detection of individuals in criminal
investigations and the identification and location of missing and
unidentified persons. Therefore, it is in the best interest of the
state to establish a DNA data base and DNA data bank containing DNA
samples submitted by persons convicted of felony offenses and other
crimes as specified in RCW 43.43.754. DNA samples necessary for the
identification of missing persons and unidentified human remains will
also be included in the DNA data base.
The legislature further finds that the DNA identification system
used by the federal bureau of investigation and the Washington state
patrol has no ability to predict genetic disease or predisposal to
illness. Nonetheless, the legislature intends that biological samples
collected under RCW 43.43.754, and DNA identification data obtained
from the samples, be used only for purposes related to criminal
investigation, identification of human remains or missing persons, or
improving the operation of the system authorized under RCW 43.43.752
through 43.43.758.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.754 and 2002 c 289 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every adult or juvenile individual convicted ((of a felony,
stalking under RCW 9A.46.110, harassment under RCW 9A.46.020,
communicating with a minor for immoral purposes under RCW 9.68A.090,))
(or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense) of any of the
following crimes must have a biological sample collected for purposes
of DNA identification analysis ((in the following manner)):
Any felony;
Aiming or discharging firearms, dangerous weapons (RCW 9.41.230);
Animal cruelty in the second degree (RCW 16.52.207);
Assault in the fourth degree (RCW 9A.36.041);
Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);
Communication with a minor for immoral purposes (RCW 9.68A.090);
Criminal impersonation in the second degree (RCW 9A.60.045);
Custodial sexual misconduct in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.170);
Cyberstalking (RCW 9.61.260);
Dangerous weapons (RCW 9.41.250);
Domestic violence-any misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor crime
committed by one family or household member against another (RCW
10.99.020(5));
Escape in the third degree (RCW 9A.76.130);
Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020);
Indecent exposure (RCW 9A.88.010);
Making or having burglar tools (RCW 9A.52.060);
Patronizing a prostitute (RCW 9A.88.110);
Possession of another's identification (RCW 9A.56.330);
Prostitution (RCW 9A.88.030);
Reckless burning in the second degree (RCW 9A.48.050);
Reckless endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);
Registration of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders (RCW
9A.44.130);
Sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree (RCW
9A.44.096);
Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110);
Telephone harassment (RCW 9.61.230);
Unlawful harboring of a minor (RCW 13.32A.080);
Vehicle prowling in the second degree (RCW 9A.52.100);
Violation involving weapon apparently capable of producing bodily
harm (RCW 9.41.270);
Violation of civil antiharassment orders (RCW 10.14.170);
Violation of court orders issued under chapter 26.50, 10.99, 26.09,
26.26, or 74.34 RCW, and foreign protection orders as defined in RCW
26.52.020 (RCW 26.50.110).
If the Washington state patrol crime laboratory already has a DNA
sample from an individual for a qualifying offense, a subsequent
submission should not be submitted. The following applies to the
collection and analysis processes:
(a) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense who do not serve a term of confinement
in a department of corrections facility, and do serve a term of
confinement in a city or county jail facility, the city or county shall
be responsible for obtaining the biological samples either as part of
the intake process into the city or county jail or detention facility
for those persons convicted on or after July 1, 2002, or within a
reasonable time after July 1, 2002, for those persons incarcerated
before July 1, 2002, who have not yet had a biological sample
collected, beginning with those persons who will be released the
soonest.
(b) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense who do not serve a term of confinement
in a department of corrections facility, and do not serve a term of
confinement in a city or county jail facility, the local police
department or sheriff's office is responsible for obtaining the
biological samples after sentencing on or after July 1, 2002.
(c) For persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of
an equivalent juvenile offense, who are serving or who are to serve a
term of confinement in a department of corrections facility or a
department of social and health services facility, the facility holding
the person shall be responsible for obtaining the biological samples
either as part of the intake process into such facility for those
persons convicted on or after July 1, 2002, or within a reasonable time
after July 1, 2002, for those persons incarcerated before July 1, 2002,
who have not yet had a biological sample collected, beginning with
those persons who will be released the soonest.
(2) Any biological sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.752 through
43.43.758 may be retained by the forensic laboratory services bureau,
and shall be used solely for the purpose of providing DNA or other
tests for identification analysis and prosecution of a criminal offense
or for the identification of human remains or missing persons. Nothing
in this section prohibits the submission of results derived from the
biological samples to the federal bureau of investigation combined DNA
index system.
(3) The ((director of the)) forensic laboratory services bureau of
the Washington state patrol ((shall perform)) is responsible for
testing performed on all biological samples, excluding known duplicates
unless necessary, that are collected under subsection (1) of this
section, to the extent allowed by funding available for this purpose.
((The director shall give priority to testing on samples collected from
those adults or juveniles convicted of a felony or adjudicated guilty
of an equivalent juvenile offense that is defined as a sex offense or
a violent offense in RCW 9.94A.030.))
(4) This section applies to all adults who are convicted of a sex
or violent offense after July 1, 1990; and to all adults who were
convicted of a sex or violent offense on or prior to July 1, 1990, and
who are still incarcerated on or after July 25, 1999. This section
applies to all juveniles who are adjudicated guilty of a sex or violent
offense after July 1, 1994; and to all juveniles who were adjudicated
guilty of a sex or violent offense on or prior to July 1, 1994, and who
are still incarcerated on or after July 25, 1999. This section applies
to all adults and juveniles who are convicted of a felony other than a
sex or violent offense, stalking under RCW 9A.46.110, harassment under
RCW 9A.46.020, or communicating with a minor for immoral purposes under
RCW 9.68A.090, or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense,
on or after July 1, 2002; and to all adults and juveniles who were
convicted or adjudicated guilty of such an offense before July 1, 2002,
and are still incarcerated on or after July 1, 2002. This section
applies to all adults and juveniles who are convicted of a felony other
than a sex or violent offense and all additional crimes listed in
subsection (1) of this section or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent
juvenile offense, on or after the effective date of this act; and to
all adults and juveniles who were convicted or adjudicated guilty of
such an offense before the effective date of this act, and are still
incarcerated on or after the effective date of this act.
(5) This section creates no rights in a third person. No cause of
action may be brought based upon the noncollection or nonanalysis or
the delayed collection or analysis of a biological sample authorized to
be taken under RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758.
(6) The detention, arrest, or conviction of a person based upon a
data base match or data base information is not invalidated if it is
determined that the sample was obtained or placed in the data base by
mistake, or if the conviction or juvenile adjudication that resulted in
the collection of the biological sample was subsequently vacated or
otherwise altered in any future proceeding including but not limited to
posttrial or postfact-finding motions, appeals, or collateral attacks.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.43.7541 and 2002 c 289 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every sentence imposed ((under chapter 9.94A RCW,)) for a
((felony)) crime specified in RCW 43.43.754 that is committed on or
after July 1, 2002, must include a fee of one hundred dollars for
collection of a biological sample as required under RCW 43.43.754,
unless the court finds that imposing the fee would result in undue
hardship on the offender. The fee is a court-ordered legal financial
obligation ((as defined in RCW 9.94A.030,)) payable by the offender
after payment of all other legal financial obligations included in the
sentence has been completed. The clerk of the court shall transmit
fees collected to the state treasurer for deposit in the state DNA data
base account created under RCW 43.43.7532.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.43.756 and 1989 c 350 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state patrol ((in consultation with the University
of Washington school of medicine)) forensic laboratory services bureau
may:
(1) Provide DNA analysis services to law enforcement agencies
throughout the state after July 1, 1990;
(2) Provide assistance to law enforcement officials and prosecutors
in the preparation and utilization of DNA evidence for presentation in
court; and
(3) Provide expert testimony in court on DNA evidentiary issues.

--- END ---