BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 65.04.140 and 1886 p 163 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county auditor in his capacity of recorder of deeds is sole
custodian of all books in which are recorded deeds, mortgages,
judgments, liens, incumbrances and other instruments of writing,
indexes thereto, maps, charts, town plats, survey and other books and
papers constituting the records and files in said office of recorder of
deeds, and all such records and files are, and shall be, matters of
public information, free of charge to any and all persons demanding to
inspect or to examine the same, or to search the same for titles of
property. It is said recorder's duty to arrange in suitable places the
indexes of said books of record, and when practicable, the record books
themselves, to the end that the same may be accessible to the public
and convenient for said public inspection, examination and search, and
not interfere with the said auditor's personal control and
responsibility for the same, or prevent him from promptly furnishing
the said records and files of his said office to persons demanding any
information from the same. The said auditor or recorder must and
shall, upon demand, and without charge, freely permit any and all
persons, during reasonable office hours, to inspect, examine and search
any or all of the records and files of his said office, and to gather
any information therefrom, and to make any desired notes or memoranda
about or concerning the same, and to prepare an abstract or abstracts
of title to any and all property therein contained.
(2) The county auditor may not publicly disclose or otherwise allow
public access to federal social security numbers contained in any
documents, records, or files maintained by the auditor, unless:
(a) The individual to whom the federal security number is assigned
gives his or her express written consent for the disclosure of his or
her federal social security number; or
(b) Such disclosure is requested by a federal, state, or local
government agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The federal social security numbers contained in the documents,
records, or files the county auditor is required to maintain under
chapter 65.04 RCW are exempt from disclosure under this chapter unless:
(1) The individual to whom the federal security number is assigned
gives his or her express written consent for the disclosure of his or
her federal social security number; or (2) such disclosure is requested
by a federal, state, or local government agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A surcharge of one dollar per instrument shall be charged by
the county auditor for each document recorded. This surcharge is in
addition to any other charge authorized by law. The revenue from this
surcharge shall be used for the administrative and technological costs
associated with creating a system to ensure social security numbers are
removed, or otherwise redacted, from documents available to the public
for inspection.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---