BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.410.120 and 2005 c 497 s 208 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, the Washington
professional educator standards board or superintendent of public
instruction shall not require any professional certification or other
qualifications of any person elected superintendent of a local school
district by that district's board of directors, or any person hired in
any manner to fill a position designated as, or which is, in fact,
deputy superintendent, or assistant superintendent. However, each
school district board of directors shall hire at least one school
administrator with a state superintendent certificate who fills a
senior-level administrative position within the district.

--- END ---