BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) A significant number of Washington citizens answered the call
to serve our country in recent military action leaving behind families,
community, employment, and education;
(2) Many soldiers returning to their families and communities face
transition problems in areas such as family reunification, employment,
education, and health;
(3) While the Washington state department of veterans affairs has
provided services to many returning soldiers, a significant number have
returned to families and communities without continuing ties to the
military department or veterans' administration, but still in need of
help; and
(4) Our state needs to honor and serve those who have protected our
security and safety.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.60A.010 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 115 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter the following words and phrases shall have
the following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Department" means the department of veterans affairs((;)).
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of veterans
affairs((;)).
(3) "Committee" means the veterans affairs advisory committee.
(4) "Board" means the veterans innovations program board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 There is created in the department a
veterans innovations program, which consists of the defenders' fund and
the competitive grant program. The purpose of the veterans innovations
program is to provide crisis and emergency relief and education,
training, and employment assistance to veterans and their families in
their communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The defenders' fund is created to provide
assistance to members of the Washington national guard and reservists
who served in Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation Iraqi Freedom, or
Operation Noble Eagle, and who are experiencing financial hardships in
employment, education, housing, and health care due to the significant
period of time away from home serving our country. The program shall
be administered by the department. Eligibility determinations shall be
made by the department. Eligible veterans may receive a one-time grant
of no more than five hundred dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The competitive grant program is created to
fund innovative initiatives to provide crisis and emergency relief,
education, training, and employment assistance to veterans and their
families in their communities.
(1) The veterans innovations program board is created to exercise
the powers granted under sections 1 and 3 through 8 of this act related
to the competitive grant program.
(a) The board consists of seven citizens of the state, appointed by
the governor, with recognized experience in serving veterans and their
families in the community regarding transition and readjustment issues;
education, training, and employment needs; and other needs experienced
by veterans and their families stemming from service to their country.
(b) The members of the board select the chair.
(c) The department shall provide staff support to the board.
(d) Members of the board receive no compensation but shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(2) The board shall:
(a) Establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and
prioritize project applications for potential funding. The purpose of
the proposals shall be in three categories:
(i) Crisis and emergency relief;
(ii) Education, training, and employment assistance; and
(iii) Community outreach and resources; and
(b) Report on January 1, 2007, to the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature and to the joint committee on veterans
and military affairs on the implementation of this act. The report
must include, but is not limited to, information on the number of
applications for assistance, the grant amount awarded each project, a
description of each project, and performance measures of the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department may receive gifts,
grants, or endowments from public or private sources that are made from
time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the
purposes of the defenders' fund and the competitive grant program and
spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from the public or private
sources according to their terms, unless the receipt of the gifts,
grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17.710.
(2) The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as
necessary to carry out the purposes of sections 1 and 3 through 8 of
this act.
(3) The department may perform all acts and functions as necessary
or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted or implied
under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 In addition to other applicable provisions
of law pertaining to conflicts of interest of public officials, no
board member, appointive or otherwise, may participate in any decision
on any board contract in which the board member has any interests,
direct or indirect, with any entity that would be the recipient of any
aid under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The veterans innovations program account is
created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only
for purposes of the veterans innovations program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The veterans innovations program and its powers and duties shall be
terminated on June 30, 2016, as provided in section 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 43.131
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2017.
(1) Section 1 of this act;
(2) Section 3 of this act;
(3) Section 4 of this act;
(4) Section 5 of this act;
(5) Section 6 of this act;
(6) Section 7 of this act; and
(7) Section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 and 3 through 8 of this act are
each added to chapter 43.60A RCW.

--- END ---