BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2005 c 436 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670,
9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or 9.94A.545, served in the
community subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and
activities by the department. For offenders placed on community
custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department
shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and
modify conditions of community custody, in addition to those imposed by
the court, based upon the risk to community safety.
(6) "Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum period
of community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW
9.94A.715, as established by the commission or the legislature under
RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000.
(7) "Community placement" means that period during which the
offender is subject to the conditions of community custody and/or
postrelease supervision, which begins either upon completion of the
term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release.
Community placement may consist of entirely community custody, entirely
postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.
(8) "Community protection zone" means the area within eight hundred
eighty feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or private
school.
(9) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(10) "Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other
sentence conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW
16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the court finds that any offender has
a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense, the
conditions of supervision may, subject to available resources, include
treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for out-of-state
supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be
considered the same as probation by other states.
(11) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(12) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles
10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and
acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(13) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(14) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior
convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(15) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that
equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the
reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the
offender and any dependents.
(16) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision
designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with
sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report
daily to a specific location designated by the department or the
sentencing court.
(17) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(18) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with
exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community supervision, the
number of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or
dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of
confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a
determinate sentence.
(19) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(20) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option
available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent
offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW
9.94A.660.
(21) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(22) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as
provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(23) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(24) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(25) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of
time.
(26) "First-time offender" means any person who has no prior
convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender
waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(27) "Home detention" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private
residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(28) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is
ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal
financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim,
statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as assessed
pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds,
court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any
other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result
of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense
of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction,
subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(29) "Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or
a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.
(30) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent
offense.
(31) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(32) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one
year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract
by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home detention or
work crew has been ordered by the court, in an approved residence, for
a substantial portion of each day with the balance of the day spent in
the community. Partial confinement includes work release, home
detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.
(33) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree, incest in the first
degree, promoting prostitution in the first degree when the perpetrator
advances or profits from prostitution of a person under eighteen years
old, sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree, rape in the
second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, child molestation
in the second degree, rape in the third degree if the victim was under
sixteen years old, rape of a child in the third degree, dealing in
depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, luring,
patronizing a juvenile prostitute, possession of depictions of a minor
engaged in sexually explicit conduct, sending or bringing into the
state depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct,
sexual exploitation of a minor, sexually violating human remains by
sexual intercourse, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B)
any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual motivation:
Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by
abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree,
assault in the first degree, assault in the second degree, assault of
a child in the first degree, ((or)) assault of a child in the second
degree, assault of a child in the third degree, child buying, child
selling, indecent exposure to a person under fourteen years old,
residential burglary, burglary in the first degree, or burglary in the
second degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (33)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(34) "Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's
community placement that is not community custody.
(35) "Private school" means a school regulated under chapter
28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.
(36) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.
(37) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(38) "Risk assessment" means the application of an objective
instrument supported by research and adopted by the department for the
purpose of assessing an offender's risk of reoffense, taking into
consideration the nature of the harm done by the offender, place and
circumstances of the offender related to risk, the offender's
relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be
based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(39) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug (RCW 46.61.502), actual physical control while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving
(RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5));
or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(40) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense
and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(41) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.130(11);
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW ((9.68A.070 or)) 9.68A.080; ((or))
(iv) A violation of RCW 9A.40.090; or
(v) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(42) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which
the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her
sexual gratification.
(43) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing court's
discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(44) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time
for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime as
prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the
crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(45) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical
boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four
hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(46) "Transition training" means written and verbal instructions
and assistance provided by the department to the offender during the
two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of the work
ethic camp program. The transition training shall include instructions
in the offender's requirements and obligations during the offender's
period of community custody.
(47) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as
a direct result of the crime charged.
(48) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(49) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting
of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that
complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(50) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program
as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower
the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(51) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2003 c 53 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670,
9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or 9.94A.545, served in the
community subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and
activities by the department. For offenders placed on community
custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department
shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and
modify conditions of community custody, in addition to those imposed by
the court, based upon the risk to community safety.
(6) "Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum period
of community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW
9.94A.715, as established by the commission or the legislature under
RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000.
(7) "Community placement" means that period during which the
offender is subject to the conditions of community custody and/or
postrelease supervision, which begins either upon completion of the
term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release.
Community placement may consist of entirely community custody, entirely
postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.
(8) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(9) "Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other
sentence conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW
16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the court finds that any offender has
a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense, the
conditions of supervision may, subject to available resources, include
treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for out-of-state
supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be
considered the same as probation by other states.
(10) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(11) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles
10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and
acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(12) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(13) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior
convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(14) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that
equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the
reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the
offender and any dependents.
(15) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision
designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with
sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report
daily to a specific location designated by the department or the
sentencing court.
(16) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(17) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with
exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community supervision, the
number of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or
dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of
confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a
determinate sentence.
(18) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(19) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option
available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent
offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW
9.94A.660.
(20) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(21) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as
provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(22) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(23) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(24) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of
time.
(25) "First-time offender" means any person who has no prior
convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender
waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(26) "Home detention" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private
residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(27) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is
ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal
financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim,
statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as assessed
pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds,
court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any
other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result
of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense
of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction,
subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(28) "Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or
a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.
(29) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent
offense.
(30) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(31) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one
year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract
by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home detention or
work crew has been ordered by the court, in an approved residence, for
a substantial portion of each day with the balance of the day spent in
the community. Partial confinement includes work release, home
detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.
(32) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree, incest in the first
degree, promoting prostitution in the first degree when the perpetrator
advances or profits from prostitution of a person under eighteen years
old, sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree, rape in the
second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, child molestation
in the second degree, rape in the third degree if the victim was under
sixteen years old, rape of a child in the third degree, dealing in
depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, luring,
patronizing a juvenile prostitute, possession of depictions of a minor
engaged in sexually explicit conduct, sending or bringing into the
state depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct,
sexual exploitation of a minor, sexually violating human remains by
sexual intercourse, or indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B)
any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual motivation:
Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by
abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree,
assault in the first degree, assault in the second degree, assault of
a child in the first degree, ((or)) assault of a child in the second
degree, assault of a child in the third degree, child buying, child
selling, indecent exposure to a person under fourteen years old,
residential burglary, burglary in the first degree, or burglary in the
second degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (32)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(33) "Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's
community placement that is not community custody.
(34) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(35) "Risk assessment" means the application of an objective
instrument supported by research and adopted by the department for the
purpose of assessing an offender's risk of reoffense, taking into
consideration the nature of the harm done by the offender, place and
circumstances of the offender related to risk, the offender's
relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be
based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(36) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug (RCW 46.61.502), actual physical control while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving
(RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5));
or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(37) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense
and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(38) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.130(11);
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW ((9.68A.070 or)) 9.68A.080; ((or))
(iv) A violation of RCW 9A.40.090; or
(v) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(39) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which
the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her
sexual gratification.
(40) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing court's
discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(41) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time
for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime as
prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the
crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(42) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical
boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four
hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(43) "Transition training" means written and verbal instructions
and assistance provided by the department to the offender during the
two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of the work
ethic camp program. The transition training shall include instructions
in the offender's requirements and obligations during the offender's
period of community custody.
(44) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as
a direct result of the crime charged.
(45) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(46) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting
of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that
complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(47) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program
as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower
the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(48) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.712 and 2005 c 436 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender who is not a persistent offender shall be sentenced
under this section if the offender:
(a) Is convicted of:
(i) Rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a
child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree, incest in the first
degree, promoting prostitution in the first degree when the perpetrator
advances or profits from prostitution of a person under eighteen years
old, sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree, rape of a
child in the second degree, child molestation in the second degree,
rape in the third degree if the victim was under sixteen years old,
rape of a child in the third degree, dealing in depictions of a minor
engaged in sexually explicit conduct, luring, patronizing a juvenile
prostitute, possession of depictions of a minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct, sending or bringing into the state depictions of a
minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, sexual exploitation of a
minor, sexually violating human remains by sexual intercourse, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion;
(ii) Any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual
motivation: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the
second degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second
degree, assault of a child in the first degree, ((or)) assault of a
child in the second degree, assault of a child in the third degree,
child buying, child selling, indecent exposure to a person under
fourteen years old, residential burglary, burglary in the first degree,
or burglary in the second degree; or
(iii) An attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection
(1)(a);
committed on or after September 1, 2001; or
(b) Has a prior conviction for an offense listed in RCW
9.94A.030(33)(b), and is convicted of any sex offense which was
committed after September 1, 2001.
For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), failure to register is not
a sex offense.
(2) An offender convicted of rape of a child in the first or second
degree or child molestation in the first degree who was seventeen years
of age or younger at the time of the offense shall not be sentenced
under this section.
(3) Upon a finding that the offender is subject to sentencing under
this section, the court shall impose a sentence to a maximum term
consisting of the statutory maximum sentence for the offense and a
minimum term either within the standard sentence range for the offense,
or outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW 9.94A.535, if
the offender is otherwise eligible for such a sentence.
(4) A person sentenced under subsection (3) of this section shall
serve the sentence in a facility or institution operated, or utilized
under contract, by the state.
(5) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department under this section, the court shall, in addition to the
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody
under the supervision of the department and the authority of the board
for any period of time the person is released from total confinement
before the expiration of the maximum sentence.
(6)(a)(i) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions
of community custody shall include those provided for in RCW
9.94A.700(4). The conditions may also include those provided for in
RCW 9.94A.700(5). The court may also order the offender to participate
in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct
reasonably related to the circumstances of the offense, the offender's
risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community, and the department
and the board shall enforce such conditions pursuant to RCW 9.94A.713,
9.95.425, and 9.95.430.
(ii) If the offense that caused the offender to be sentenced under
this section was an offense listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section
and the victim of the offense was under eighteen years of age at the
time of the offense, the court shall, as a condition of community
custody, prohibit the offender from residing in a community protection
zone.
(b) As part of any sentence under this section, the court shall
also require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the
board under RCW 9.94A.713 and 9.95.420 through 9.95.435.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.712 and 2004 c 176 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender who is not a persistent offender shall be sentenced
under this section if the offender:
(a) Is convicted of:
(i) Rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree, rape of a
child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree, incest in the first
degree, promoting prostitution in the first degree when the perpetrator
advances or profits from prostitution of a person under eighteen years
old, sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree, rape of a
child in the second degree, child molestation in the second degree,
rape in the third degree if the victim was under sixteen years old,
rape of a child in the third degree, dealing in depictions of a minor
engaged in sexually explicit conduct, luring, patronizing a juvenile
prostitute, possession of depictions of a minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct, sending or bringing into the state depictions of a
minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, sexual exploitation of a
minor, sexually violating human remains by sexual intercourse, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion;
(ii) Any of the following offenses with a finding of sexual
motivation: Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the
second degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second
degree, assault of a child in the first degree, ((or))assault of a
child in the second degree, assault of a child in the third degree,
child buying, child selling, indecent exposure to a person under
fourteen years old, residential burglary, burglary in the first degree,
or burglary in the second degree; or
(iii) An attempt to commit any crime listed in this subsection
(1)(a);
committed on or after September 1, 2001; or
(b) Has a prior conviction for an offense listed in RCW
9.94A.030(32)(b), and is convicted of any sex offense which was
committed after September 1, 2001.
For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), failure to register is not
a sex offense.
(2) An offender convicted of rape of a child in the first or second
degree or child molestation in the first degree who was seventeen years
of age or younger at the time of the offense shall not be sentenced
under this section.
(3) Upon a finding that the offender is subject to sentencing under
this section, the court shall impose a sentence to a maximum term
consisting of the statutory maximum sentence for the offense and a
minimum term either within the standard sentence range for the offense,
or outside the standard sentence range pursuant to RCW 9.94A.535, if
the offender is otherwise eligible for such a sentence.
(4) A person sentenced under subsection (3) of this section shall
serve the sentence in a facility or institution operated, or utilized
under contract, by the state.
(5) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department under this section, the court shall, in addition to the
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody
under the supervision of the department and the authority of the board
for any period of time the person is released from total confinement
before the expiration of the maximum sentence.
(6)(a) Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions of
community custody shall include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(4).
The conditions may also include those provided for in RCW 9.94A.700(5).
The court may also order the offender to participate in rehabilitative
programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct reasonably related to
the circumstances of the offense, the offender's risk of reoffending,
or the safety of the community, and the department and the board shall
enforce such conditions pursuant to RCW 9.94A.713, 9.95.425, and
9.95.430.
(b) As part of any sentence under this section, the court shall
also require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the
board under RCW 9.94A.713 and 9.95.420 through 9.95.435.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2005 c 458 s 2 and 2005 c 183 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Assault 2 (with sexual motivation)
(RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Assault of a Child 3 (with sexual
motivation) (RCW
9A.36.140(2)(b))

Burglary 1 (with sexual motivation)
(RCW 9A.52.020)

Burglary 2 (with sexual motivation)
(RCW 9A.52.030(2)(b))

Child Buying (with sexual motivation)
(RCW 9A.64.030(3)(b)(ii))

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Child Selling (with sexual motivation)
(RCW 9A.64.030(3)(b)(i))

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged
in sexually explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.050)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Failure to Register as a Kidnapping
Offender (felony offense) (RCW
9A.44.130(11)(a))

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender
(felony offense) (RCW
9A.44.130(10)(a))

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (with sexual
motivation) (RCW
9A.88.010(2)(d))

Kidnapping 2 (with sexual motivation)
(RCW 9A.40.030)

Luring (RCW 9A.40.090)

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW
9.68A.100)

Possession of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct (RCW 9.68A.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (advances or
profits from prostitution of a
person less than eighteen years
old) (RCW 9A.88.070(3))

Rape 3 (victim under sixteen) (RCW
9A.44.060(2)(b))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Residential Burglary (with sexual
motivation) (RCW
9A.52.025(2)(b))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains (by
sexual intercourse) (RCW
9A.44.105(1)(b))

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (advances
prostitution by compelling a
person by threat or force to engage
in prostitution or profits from
prostitution that results from such
threat or force) (RCW
9A.88.070(2))

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (without sexual motivation)
(RCW 9A.52.020)

((Child Molestation 2 (RCW
9A.44.086)))

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

((Dealing in depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit
conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of
a Signal Preemption Device
(RCW 46.37.675)

((Sending, bringing into state
depictions of minor engaged in
sexually explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.060)))

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW
9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

((Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

((Rape of a Child 3 (RCW
9A.44.079)))

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of dependent person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

((Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1
(RCW 9A.44.160)))

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (without sexual
motivation) (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (victim sixteen years of age or
older) (RCW 9A.44.060(2)(a))

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

((Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)))

Sexually Violating Human Remains (by
sexual contact) (RCW
9A.44.105(1)(a))

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (without sexual motivation)
(RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a
Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW
9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW
9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person ((Under))
Age Fourteen (((subsequent sex
offense))) or Higher (with a
previous conviction of a sex
offense or indecent exposure)
(RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting
Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (without sexual
motivation) (RCW
9A.52.025(2)(a))

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(3))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Abandonment of dependent person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace
Officer With a Projectile Stun
Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except
subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (without sexual
motivation) (RCW
9A.36.140(2)(a))

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (without sexual motivation)
(RCW 9A.52.030(2)(a))

((Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)))

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily
Harm By Use of a Signal
Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.674)

((Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute
(RCW 9.68A.100)))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 6 RCW 9.68A.040 and 1989 c 32 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of sexual exploitation of a minor if the
person:
(a) Compels a minor by threat or force to engage in sexually
explicit conduct, knowing that such conduct will be photographed or
part of a live performance;
(b) Aids, invites, employs, authorizes, or causes a minor to engage
in sexually explicit conduct, knowing that such conduct will be
photographed or part of a live performance; or
(c) Being a parent, legal guardian, or person having custody or
control of a minor, permits the minor to engage in sexually explicit
conduct, knowing that the conduct will be photographed or part of a
live performance.
(2) Sexual exploitation of a minor is a class ((B)) A felony
punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.68A.050 and 1989 c 32 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person who:
(1) Knowingly develops, duplicates, publishes, prints,
disseminates, exchanges, finances, attempts to finance, or sells any
visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in an act of
sexually explicit conduct; or
(2) Possesses with intent to develop, duplicate, publish, print,
disseminate, exchange, or sell any visual or printed matter that
depicts a minor engaged in an act of sexually explicit conduct
is guilty of a class ((C)) A felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 9.68A.060 and 1989 c 32 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person who knowingly sends or causes to be sent, or brings or
causes to be brought, into this state for sale or distribution, any
visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct is guilty of a class ((C)) A felony punishable under
chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 9 RCW 9.68A.070 and 1990 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person who knowingly possesses visual or printed matter depicting
a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct is guilty of a class ((C))
A felony.

Sec. 10 RCW 9.68A.100 and 1999 c 327 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person is guilty of patronizing a juvenile prostitute if that
person engages or agrees or offers to engage in sexual conduct with a
minor in return for a fee, and is guilty of a class ((C)) A felony
punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW. In addition to any other penalty
provided under chapter 9A.20 RCW, a person guilty of patronizing a
juvenile prostitute is subject to the provisions under RCW 9A.88.130
and 9A.88.140.

Sec. 11 RCW 9A.36.130 and 1992 c 145 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person eighteen years of age or older is guilty of the crime
of assault of a child in the second degree if the child is under the
age of thirteen and the person:
(a) Commits the crime of assault in the second degree, as defined
in RCW 9A.36.021, against a child; or
(b) Intentionally assaults the child and causes bodily harm that is
greater than transient physical pain or minor temporary marks, and the
person has previously engaged in a pattern or practice either of (i)
assaulting the child which has resulted in bodily harm that is greater
than transient pain or minor temporary marks, or (ii) causing the child
physical pain or agony that is equivalent to that produced by torture.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, assault of a
child in the second degree is a class B felony.
(b) Assault of a child in the second degree with a finding of
sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135 is a class A felony.

Sec. 12 RCW 9A.36.140 and 1992 c 145 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person eighteen years of age or older is guilty of the crime
of assault of a child in the third degree if the child is under the age
of thirteen and the person commits the crime of assault in the third
degree as defined in RCW 9A.36.031(1)(d) or (f) against the child.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, assault of a
child in the third degree is a class C felony.
(b) Assault of a child in the third degree with a finding of sexual
motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135 is a class A felony.

Sec. 13 RCW 9A.40.090 and 1995 c 156 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person commits the crime of luring if the person:
(1)(a) Orders, lures, or attempts to lure a minor or a person with
a developmental disability into any area or structure that is obscured
from or inaccessible to the public or into a motor vehicle;
(b) Does not have the consent of the minor's parent or guardian or
of the guardian of the person with a developmental disability; and
(c) Is unknown to the child or developmentally disabled person.
(2) It is a defense to luring, which the defendant must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence, that the defendant's actions were
reasonable under the circumstances and the defendant did not have any
intent to harm the health, safety, or welfare of the minor or the
person with the developmental disability.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Minor" means a person under the age of sixteen;
(b) "Person with a developmental disability" means a person with a
developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.
(4) Luring is a class ((C)) A felony.

Sec. 14 RCW 9A.44.060 and 1999 c 143 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of rape in the third degree when, under
circumstances not constituting rape in the first or second degrees,
such person engages in sexual intercourse with another person, not
married to the perpetrator:
(a) Where the victim did not consent as defined in RCW
9A.44.010(7), to sexual intercourse with the perpetrator and such lack
of consent was clearly expressed by the victim's words or conduct, or
(b) Where there is threat of substantial unlawful harm to property
rights of the victim.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, rape in the
third degree is a class C felony.
(b) Rape in the third degree is a class A felony if the victim is
under the age of sixteen.

Sec. 15 RCW 9A.44.079 and 1988 c 145 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of rape of a child in the third degree when
the person has sexual intercourse with another who is at least fourteen
years old but less than sixteen years old and not married to the
perpetrator and the perpetrator is at least forty-eight months older
than the victim.
(2) Rape of a child in the third degree is a class ((C)) A felony.

Sec. 16 RCW 9A.44.086 and 1994 c 271 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of child molestation in the second degree
when the person has, or knowingly causes another person under the age
of eighteen to have, sexual contact with another who is at least twelve
years old but less than fourteen years old and not married to the
perpetrator and the perpetrator is at least thirty-six months older
than the victim.
(2) Child molestation in the second degree is a class ((B)) A
felony.

Sec. 17 RCW 9A.44.093 and 2005 c 262 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of sexual misconduct with a minor in the
first degree when: (a) The person has, or knowingly causes another
person under the age of eighteen to have, sexual intercourse with
another person who is at least sixteen years old but less than eighteen
years old and not married to the perpetrator, if the perpetrator is at
least sixty months older than the victim, is in a significant
relationship to the victim, and abuses a supervisory position within
that relationship in order to engage in or cause another person under
the age of eighteen to engage in sexual intercourse with the victim;
(b) the person is a school employee who has, or knowingly causes
another person under the age of eighteen to have, sexual intercourse
with a registered student of the school who is at least sixteen years
old and not married to the employee, if the employee is at least sixty
months older than the student; or (c) the person is a foster parent who
has, or knowingly causes another person under the age of eighteen to
have, sexual intercourse with his or her foster child who is at least
sixteen.
(2) Sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree is a class
((C)) A felony.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "school employee" means an
employee of a common school defined in RCW 28A.150.020, or a grade
kindergarten through twelve employee of a private school under chapter
28A.195 RCW, who is not enrolled as a student of the common school or
private school.

Sec. 18 RCW 9A.44.105 and 1994 c 53 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any person who has ((sexual intercourse or)) sexual contact
with a dead human body is guilty of a class C felony.
(b) Any person who has sexual intercourse with a dead human body is
guilty of a class A felony.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Sexual intercourse" (i) has its ordinary meaning and occurs
upon any penetration, however slight; and (ii) also means any
penetration of the vagina or anus however slight, by an object, when
committed on a dead human body, except when such penetration is
accomplished as part of a procedure authorized or required under
chapter 68.50 RCW or other law; and (iii) also means any act of sexual
contact between the sex organs of a person and the mouth or anus of a
dead human body.
(b) "Sexual contact" means any touching by a person of the sexual
or other intimate parts of a dead human body done for the purpose of
gratifying the sexual desire of the person.

Sec. 19 RCW 9A.44.160 and 1999 c 45 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of custodial sexual misconduct in the first
degree when the person has sexual intercourse with another person:
(a) When:
(i) The victim is a resident of a state, county, or city adult or
juvenile correctional facility, including but not limited to jails,
prisons, detention centers, or work release facilities, or is under
correctional supervision; and
(ii) The perpetrator is an employee or contract personnel of a
correctional agency and the perpetrator has, or the victim reasonably
believes the perpetrator has, the ability to influence the terms,
conditions, length, or fact of incarceration or correctional
supervision; or
(b) When the victim is being detained, under arrest(([,])), or in
the custody of a law enforcement officer and the perpetrator is a law
enforcement officer.
(2) Consent of the victim is not a defense to a prosecution under
this section.
(3) Custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree is a class
((C)) A felony.

Sec. 20 RCW 9A.52.025 and 1989 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of residential burglary if, with intent to
commit a crime against a person or property therein, the person enters
or remains unlawfully in a dwelling other than a vehicle.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, residential
burglary is a class B felony.
(b) Residential burglary with a finding of sexual motivation under
RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135 is a class A felony.
(c) In establishing sentencing guidelines and disposition
standards, the sentencing guidelines commission and the juvenile
disposition standards commission shall consider residential burglary as
a more serious offense than second degree burglary.

Sec. 21 RCW 9A.52.030 and 1989 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of burglary in the second degree if, with
intent to commit a crime against a person or property therein, he
enters or remains unlawfully in a building other than a vehicle or a
dwelling.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, burglary in
the second degree is a class B felony.
(b) Burglary in the second degree with a finding of sexual
motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135 is a class A felony.

Sec. 22 RCW 9A.64.020 and 2003 c 53 s 80 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person is guilty of incest in the first degree if he or
she engages in sexual intercourse with a person whom he or she knows to
be related to him or her, either legitimately or illegitimately, as an
ancestor, descendant, brother, or sister of either the whole or the
half blood.
(b) Incest in the first degree is a class ((B)) A felony.
(2)(a) A person is guilty of incest in the second degree if he or
she engages in sexual contact with a person whom he or she knows to be
related to him or her, either legitimately or illegitimately, as an
ancestor, descendant, brother, or sister of either the whole or the
half blood.
(b) Incest in the second degree is a class C felony.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Descendant" includes stepchildren and adopted children under
eighteen years of age;
(b) "Sexual contact" has the same meaning as in RCW 9A.44.010; and
(c) "Sexual intercourse" has the same meaning as in RCW 9A.44.010.

Sec. 23 RCW 9A.64.030 and 2003 c 53 s 81 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to sell or purchase a minor
child.
(2) A transaction shall not be a purchase or sale under subsection
(1) of this section if any of the following exists:
(a) The transaction is between the parents of the minor child; or
(b) The transaction is between a person receiving or to receive the
child and an agency recognized under RCW 26.33.020; or
(c) The transaction is between the person receiving or to receive
the child and a state agency or other governmental agency; or
(d) The transaction is pursuant to chapter 26.34 RCW; or
(e) The transaction is pursuant to court order; or
(f) The only consideration paid by the person receiving or to
receive the child is intended to pay for the prenatal hospital or
medical expenses involved in the birth of the child, or attorneys' fees
and court costs involved in effectuating transfer of child custody.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection:
(i) Child selling is a class C felony.
(((b))) (ii) Child buying is a class C felony.
(b) If there is a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835
or 13.40.135:
(i) Child selling is a class A felony.
(ii) Child buying is a class A felony.

Sec. 24 RCW 9A.88.010 and 2003 c 53 s 92 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of indecent exposure if he or she
intentionally makes any open and obscene exposure of his or her person
or the person of another knowing that such conduct is likely to cause
reasonable affront or alarm. The act of breastfeeding or expressing
breast milk is not indecent exposure.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) ((and)), (c), and (d) of this
subsection, indecent exposure is a misdemeanor.
(b) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, indecent exposure
is a gross misdemeanor on the first offense if the person exposes
himself or herself to a person under the age of fourteen years.
(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, indecent exposure
is a class C felony if the person has previously been convicted under
this section or of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.
(d) Indecent exposure with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135 is a class A felony if the person exposes
himself or herself to a person under the age of fourteen years.

Sec. 25 RCW 9A.88.070 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.88.070 are
each amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of promoting prostitution in the first
degree if he knowingly:
(a) Advances prostitution by compelling a person by threat or force
to engage in prostitution or profits from prostitution which results
from such threat or force; or
(b) Advances or profits from prostitution of a person less than
eighteen years old.
(2) Promoting prostitution in the first degree is a class B felony
when committed under subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(3) Promoting prostitution in the first degree is a class A felony
when committed under subsection (1)(b) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2007, a person required to register under RCw
9A.44.130 shall be electronically monitored during the period of
registration. The monitoring agency shall electronically monitor the
person using an active global positioning system or similar tracking
system. The system must actively monitor, identify, and timely report
the person's location.
(2) The monitoring agency shall, upon request, provide information
on the whereabouts of an offender who is being monitored by the agency
to any state or local law enforcement agency. Information on the
whereabouts of an offender may not be disclosed under any other
circumstances.
(3) The monitoring agency may contract for the electronic
monitoring required by this section. A contract entered into under
this subsection shall require the party performing the monitoring to
adhere to the same requirements under this section as the monitoring
agency.
(4) The monitoring agency may adopt rules to implement the
requirements of this section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "monitoring agency" means:
(a) The department of corrections if the person is being supervised
by the department of corrections in the community;
(b) The department of social and health services if the person is
being supervised by the department of social and health services in the
community; and
(c) The state patrol if the person is not under the supervision of
the department of corrections or the department of social and health
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 Sections 1 and 3 of this act expire July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 (1) Sections 1, 3, and 5 through 27 of this
act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and take effect immediately.
(2) Sections 2 and 4 of this act take effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---