BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.0283 and 2004 c 153 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of:
(a) Prosthetic devices of the type reimbursed or paid by medicaid
or medicare and prescribed, fitted, or furnished for an individual by
a person licensed under the laws of this state to prescribe, fit, or
furnish prosthetic devices;
(b) Medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical origin prescribed,
administered, dispensed, or used in the treatment of an individual by
a person licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW; ((and))
(c) Medically prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to,
oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen
systems, and gaseous, bottled oxygen systems prescribed for an
individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW for
use in the medical treatment of that individual;
(d) Mobility enhancement equipment of the type reimbursed or paid
by medicaid or medicare and prescribed, fitted, or furnished for an
individual by a person licensed under the laws of this state to
prescribe, fit, or furnish mobility enhancement equipment; and
(e) Durable medical equipment for home use only, of the type
reimbursed or paid by medicaid or medicare, and prescribed, fitted, or
furnished for an individual by a person licensed under the laws of this
state to prescribe, fit, or furnish durable medical equipment.
(2) In addition, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to the
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of any of the items
exempted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) ((The exemption in subsection (1) of this section shall not
apply to sales of durable medical equipment or mobility enhancing
equipment.
(4))) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Prosthetic device" means a replacement, corrective, or
supportive device, including repair and replacement parts for a
prosthetic device, worn on or in the body to:
(i) Artificially replace a missing portion of the body;
(ii) Prevent or correct a physical deformity or malfunction; or
(iii) Support a weak or deformed portion of the body.
(b) "Durable medical equipment" means equipment, including repair
and replacement parts for durable medical equipment that:
(i) Can withstand repeated use;
(ii) Is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose;
(iii) Generally is not useful to a person in the absence of illness
or injury; and
(iv) Does not work in or on the body.
(c) "Mobility enhancing equipment" means equipment, including
repair and replacement parts for mobility enhancing equipment that:
(i) Is primarily and customarily used to provide or increase the
ability to move from one place to another and that is appropriate for
use either in a home or a motor vehicle;
(ii) Is not generally used by persons with normal mobility; and
(iii) Does not include any motor vehicle or equipment on a motor
vehicle normally provided by a motor vehicle manufacturer.
(d) The terms "durable medical equipment" and "mobility enhancing
equipment" are mutually exclusive.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.0277 and 2004 c 153 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of:
(a) Prosthetic devices prescribed, fitted, or furnished for an
individual by a person licensed under the laws of this state to
prescribe, fit, or furnish prosthetic devices;
(b) Medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical origin prescribed,
administered, dispensed, or used in the treatment of an individual by
a person licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW; ((and))
(c) Medically prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to,
oxygen concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen
systems, and gaseous, bottled oxygen systems prescribed for an
individual by a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW for
use in the medical treatment of that individual; and
(d) Durable medical equipment for home use only.
(2) In addition, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in
respect to the use of labor and services rendered in respect to the
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of any of the items
exempted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) ((The exemption provided by subsection (1) of this section
shall not apply to the use of durable medical equipment or mobility
enhancing equipment.
(4) "Prosthetic device," "durable medical equipment," and "mobility
enhancing equipment" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.08.0283.))
The definitions in RCW 82.08.0283 apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---