BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 25.15.030 and 1994 c 211 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every limited liability company formed under this chapter may
carry on any lawful business or activity unless a more limited purpose
is set forth in the certificate of formation. A limited liability
company may not be formed under this chapter for the purposes of
((banking or)) engaging in business as an insurer.
(2) Unless this chapter, its certificate of formation, or its
limited liability company agreement provides otherwise, a limited
liability company has the same powers as an individual to do all things
necessary or convenient to carry out its business and affairs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 30.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, if the
conditions of this section are met, a bank, or a holding company of a
bank, may be organized as, or convert to, a limited liability company
under the Washington limited liability company act, chapter 25.15 RCW.
As used in this section, "bank" includes an applicant to become a bank
or holding company of a bank, and "holding company" means a holding
company of a bank.
(2)(a) Before a bank or holding company may organize as, or convert
to, a limited liability company, the bank or holding company must
obtain approval of the director.
(b)(i) To obtain approval under this section from the director, the
bank or holding company must file a request for approval with the
director at least ninety days before the day on which the bank or
holding company becomes a limited liability company.
(ii) If the director does not disapprove the request for approval
within ninety days from the day on which the director receives the
request, the request is considered approved.
(iii) When taking action on a request for approval filed under this
section, the director may:
(A) Approve the request;
(B) Approve the request subject to terms and conditions the
director considers necessary; or
(C) Disapprove the request.
(3) To approve a request for approval, the director must find that
the bank or holding company:
(a) Will operate in a safe and sound manner; and
(b) Has the following characteristics:
(i) The certificate of formation and limited liability company
require or set forth that the duration of the limited liability company
is perpetual;
(ii) The bank or holding company is not otherwise subject to
automatic termination, dissolution, or suspension upon the happening of
some event other than the passage of time;
(iii) The exclusive authority to manage the bank or holding company
is vested in a board of managers or directors that:
(A) Is elected or appointed by the owners;
(B) Is not required to have owners of the bank or holding company
included on the board;
(C) Possesses adequate independence and authority to supervise the
operation of the bank or holding company; and
(D) Operates with substantially the same rights, powers,
privileges, duties, and responsibilities as the board of directors of
a corporation;
(iv) Neither state law, nor the bank's or holding company's
operating agreement, bylaws, or other organizational documents provide
that an owner of the bank or holding company is liable for the debts,
liabilities, and obligations of the bank or holding company in excess
of the amount of the owner's investment;
(v) Neither state law, nor the bank's or holding company's
operating agreement, bylaws, or other organizational documents require
the consent of any other owner of the bank or holding company in order
for any owner to transfer an ownership interest in the bank or holding
company, including voting rights;
(vi) The bank or holding company is able to obtain new investment
funding if needed to maintain adequate capital;
(vii) The bank or holding company is able to comply with all legal
and regulatory requirements for a federally insured depository bank, or
holding company of a federally insured depository bank, under
applicable federal and state law; and
(viii) A bank or holding company that is organized as a limited
liability company shall maintain the characteristics listed in this
subsection (3)(b) during such time as it is authorized to conduct
business under this title as a limited liability company.
(4)(a) All rights, privileges, powers, duties, and obligations of
a bank or holding company, that is organized as a limited liability
company, and its members and managers are governed by the Washington
limited liability company act, chapter 25.15 RCW, except:
(i) To the extent chapter 25.15 RCW is in conflict with federal law
or regulation respecting the organization of a federally insured
depository institution as a limited liability company, such federal law
or regulation supersedes the conflicting provisions contained in
chapter 25.15 RCW in relation to a bank or holding company organized as
a limited liability company pursuant to this section; and
(ii) Without limitation, the following are inapplicable to a bank
or holding company organized as a limited liability company:
(A) Permitting automatic dissolution or suspension of a limited
liability company as set forth in RCW 25.15.270(1), pursuant to a
statement of limited duration which, though impermissible under
subsection (3)(b)(i) of this section, has been provided for in a
certificate of formation;
(B) Permitting automatic dissolution or suspension of a limited
liability company, pursuant to the limited liability company agreement,
as set forth in RCW 25.15.270(2);
(C) Permitting dissolution of the limited liability company
agreement based upon agreement of all the members, as set forth in RCW
25.l5.270(3);
(D) Permitting dissociation of all the members of the limited
liability company, as set forth in RCW 25.l5.270(4); and
(E) Permitting automatic dissolution or suspension of a limited
liability company, pursuant to operation of law, as otherwise set forth
in chapter 25.15 RCW.
(b) Notwithstanding (a) of this subsection:
(i) For purposes of transferring a member's interests in the bank
or holding company, a member's interest in the bank or holding company
is treated like a share of stock in a corporation; and
(ii) If a member's interest in the bank or holding company is
transferred voluntarily or involuntarily to another person, the person
who receives the member's interest obtains the member's entire rights
associated with the member's interest in the bank or holding company
including, all economic rights and all voting rights.
(c) A bank or holding company may not by agreement or otherwise
change the application of (a) of this subsection to the bank or holding
company.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 25.15 RCW or this
section to the contrary, all voting members remain liable and
responsible as fiduciaries of a bank or holding company organized as a
limited liability company, regardless of resignation, dissociation, or
disqualification, to the same extent that directors of a bank or
holding company organized as a corporation would be or remain liable or
responsible to the department and applicable federal banking
regulators; and
(b) If death, incapacity, or disqualification of all members of the
limited liability company would result in a complete dissociation of
all members, then the bank or holding company, or both, as applicable
is deemed nonetheless to remain in existence for purposes of the
department or an applicable federal regulator, or both, having standing
under RCW 30.44.270 or applicable federal law, or both, to exercise the
powers and authorities of a receiver for the bank or holding company.
(6) For the purposes of this section, and unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, for the purpose of applying chapter 25.15
RCW to a bank or holding company organized as a limited liability
company:
(a) "Articles of incorporation" includes a limited liability
company's certificate of formation, as that term is used in RCW
25.15.005(1) and 25.15.070, and a limited liability company agreement
as that term is used in RCW 25.15.005(5);
(b) "Board of directors" includes one or more persons who have,
with respect to a bank or holding company described in subsection (1)
of this section, authority that is substantially similar to that of a
board of directors of a corporation;
(c) "Bylaws" includes a limited liability company agreement as that
term is defined in RCW 25.15.005(5);
(d) "Corporation" includes a limited liability company organized
under chapter 25.15 RCW;
(e) "Director" includes any of the following of a limited liability
company:
(i) A manager;
(ii) A director; or
(iii) Other person who has, with respect to the bank or holding
company described in subsection (1) of this section, authority
substantially similar to that of a director of a corporation;
(f) "Dividend" includes distributions made by a limited liability
company under RCW 25.15.215;
(g) "Incorporator" includes the person or persons executing the
certificate of formation as provided in RCW 25.15.085(1);
(h) "Officer" includes any of the following of a bank or holding
company:
(i) An officer; or
(ii) Other person who has, with respect to the bank or holding
company, authority substantially similar to that of an officer of a
corporation;
(i) "Security," "shares," or "stock" of a corporation includes a
membership interest in a limited liability company and any certificate
or other evidence of an ownership interest in a limited liability
company; and
(j) "Stockholder" or "shareholder" includes an owner of an equity
interest in a bank or holding company, including a member as defined in
RCW 25.15.005(8) and 25.15.115.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 32.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, if the
conditions of this section are met, a savings bank, or a holding
company of a savings bank, may be organized as, or convert to, a
limited liability company under the Washington limited liability
company act, chapter 25.15 RCW. As used in this section, "savings
bank" includes an applicant to become a savings bank or holding company
of a savings bank, and "holding company" means a holding company of a
savings bank.
(2)(a) Before a savings bank or holding company may organize as, or
convert to, a limited liability company, the savings bank or holding
company must obtain approval of the director.
(b)(i) To obtain approval under this section from the director, the
savings bank or holding company must file a request for approval with
the director at least ninety days before the day on which the savings
bank or holding company becomes a limited liability company.
(ii) If the director does not disapprove the request for approval
within ninety days from the day on which the director receives the
request, the request is considered approved.
(iii) When taking action on a request for approval filed under this
section, the director may:
(A) Approve the request;
(B) Approve the request subject to terms and conditions the
director considers necessary; or
(C) Disapprove the request.
(3) To approve a request for approval, the director must find that
the savings bank or holding company:
(a) Will operate in a safe and sound manner; and
(b) Has the following characteristics:
(i) The certificate of formation and limited liability company
require or set forth that the duration of the limited liability company
is perpetual;
(ii) The savings bank or holding company is not otherwise subject
to automatic termination, dissolution, or suspension upon the happening
of some event other than the passage of time;
(iii) The exclusive authority to manage the savings bank or holding
company is vested in a board of managers or directors that:
(A) Is elected or appointed by the owners;
(B) Is not required to have owners of the savings bank or holding
company included on the board;
(C) Possesses adequate independence and authority to supervise the
operation of the savings bank or holding company; and
(D) Operates with substantially the same rights, powers,
privileges, duties, and responsibilities as the board of directors of
a corporation;
(iv) Neither state law, nor the savings bank's or holding company's
operating agreement, bylaws, or other organizational documents provide
that an owner of the savings bank or holding company is liable for the
debts, liabilities, and obligations of the savings bank or holding
company in excess of the amount of the owner's investment;
(v) Neither state law, nor the savings bank's or holding company's
operating agreement, bylaws, or other organizational documents require
the consent of any other owner of the savings bank or holding company
in order for any owner to transfer an ownership interest in the savings
bank or holding company, including voting rights;
(vi) The savings bank or holding company is able to obtain new
investment funding if needed to maintain adequate capital;
(vii) The savings bank or holding company is able to comply with
all legal and regulatory requirements for a federally insured
depository bank, or holding company of a federally insured depository
bank, under applicable federal and state law; and
(viii) A savings bank or holding company that is organized as a
limited liability company shall maintain the characteristics listed in
this subsection (3)(b) during such time as it is authorized to conduct
business under this title as a limited liability company.
(4)(a) All rights, privileges, powers, duties, and obligations of
a savings bank or holding company, that is organized as a limited
liability company, and its members and managers are governed by the
Washington limited liability company act, chapter 25.15 RCW, except:
(i) To the extent chapter 25.15 RCW is in conflict with federal law
or regulation respecting the organization of a federally insured
depository institution as a limited liability company, such federal law
or regulation supersedes the conflicting provisions contained in
chapter 25.15 RCW in relation to a savings bank or holding company
organized as a limited liability company pursuant to this section; and
(ii) Without limitation, the following are inapplicable to a
savings bank or holding company organized as a limited liability
company:
(A) Permitting automatic dissolution or suspension of a limited
liability company as set forth in RCW 25.15.270(1), pursuant to a
statement of limited duration which, though impermissible under
subsection (3)(b)(i) of this section, has been provided for in a
certificate of formation;
(B) Permitting automatic dissolution or suspension of a limited
liability company, pursuant to the limited liability company agreement,
as set forth in RCW 25.15.270(2);
(C) Permitting dissolution of the limited liability company
agreement based upon agreement of all the members, as set forth in RCW
25.l5.270(3);
(D) Permitting dissociation of all the members of the limited
liability company, as set forth in RCW 25.l5.270(4); and
(E) Permitting automatic dissolution or suspension of a limited
liability company, pursuant to operation of law, as otherwise set forth
in chapter 25.15 RCW.
(b) Notwithstanding (a) of this subsection:
(i) For purposes of transferring a member's interests in the
savings bank or holding company, a member's interest in the savings
bank or holding company is treated like a share of stock in a
corporation; and
(ii) If a member's interest in the savings bank or holding company
is transferred voluntarily or involuntarily to another person, the
person who receives the member's interest obtains the member's entire
rights associated with the member's interest in the savings bank or
holding company including, all economic rights and all voting rights.
(c) A savings bank or holding company may not by agreement or
otherwise change the application of (a) of this subsection to the
savings bank or holding company.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 25.15 RCW or this
section to the contrary, all voting members remain liable and
responsible as fiduciaries of a savings bank or holding company
organized as a limited liability company, regardless of resignation,
dissociation, or disqualification, to the same extent that directors of
a savings bank or holding company organized as a corporation would be
or remain liable or responsible to the department and applicable
federal banking regulators; and
(b) If death, incapacity, or disqualification of all members of the
limited liability company would result in a complete dissociation of
all members, then the savings bank or holding company, or both, as
applicable is deemed nonetheless to remain in existence for purposes of
the department or an applicable federal regulator, or both, having
standing under RCW 32.24.090 or applicable federal law, or both, to
exercise the powers and authorities of a receiver for the savings bank
or holding company.
(6) For the purposes of this section, and unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, for the purpose of applying chapter 25.15
RCW to a savings bank or holding company organized as a limited
liability company:
(a) "Articles of incorporation" includes a limited liability
company's certificate of formation, as that term is used in RCW
25.15.005(1) and 25.15.070, and a limited liability company agreement
as that term is used in RCW 25.15.005(5);
(b) "Board of directors" includes one or more persons who have,
with respect to a savings bank or holding company described in
subsection (1) of this section, authority that is substantially similar
to that of a board of directors of a corporation;
(c) "Bylaws" includes a limited liability company agreement as that
term is defined in RCW 25.15.005(5);
(d) "Corporation" includes a limited liability company organized
under chapter 25.15 RCW;
(e) "Director" includes any of the following of a limited liability
company:
(i) A manager;
(ii) A director; or
(iii) Other person who has, with respect to the savings bank or
holding company described in subsection (1) of this section, authority
substantially similar to that of a director of a corporation;
(f) "Dividend" includes distributions made by a limited liability
company under RCW 25.15.215;
(g) "Incorporator" includes the person or persons executing the
certificate of formation as provided in RCW 25.15.085(1);
(h) "Officer" includes any of the following of a savings bank or
holding company:
(i) An officer; or
(ii) Other person who has, with respect to the savings bank or
holding company, authority substantially similar to that of an officer
of a corporation;
(i) "Security," "shares," or "stock" of a corporation includes a
membership interest in a limited liability company and any certificate
or other evidence of an ownership interest in a limited liability
company; and
(j) "Stockholder" or "shareholder" includes an owner of an equity
interest in a savings bank or holding company, including a member as
defined in RCW 25.15.005(8) and 25.15.115.

Sec. 4 RCW 25.15.270 and 2000 c 169 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A limited liability company is dissolved and its affairs shall be
wound up upon the first to occur of the following:
(1)(a) The dissolution date, if any, specified in the certificate
of formation. If a dissolution date is not specified in the
certificate of formation, the limited liability company's existence
will continue until the first to occur of the events described in
subsections (2) through (6) of this section. If a dissolution date is
specified in the certificate of formation, the certificate of formation
may be amended and the existence of the limited liability company may
be extended by vote of all the members;
(b) This subsection does not apply to a limited liability company
formed under section 2 or 3 of this act.
(2) The happening of events specified in a limited liability
company agreement;
(3) The written consent of all members;
(4) Unless the limited liability company agreement provides
otherwise, ninety days following an event of dissociation of the last
remaining member, unless those having the rights of assignees in the
limited liability company under RCW 25.15.130(1) have, by the ninetieth
day, voted to admit one or more members, voting as though they were
members, and in the manner set forth in RCW 25.15.120(1);
(5) The entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under RCW
25.15.275; or
(6) The expiration of two years after the effective date of
dissolution under RCW 25.15.285 without the reinstatement of the
limited liability company.

--- END ---