BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed to a retailer of carbonated beverages for taxes imposed under
RCW 82.64.020 and paid to a wholesaler or to the department.
(2) Credit under this section shall be claimed against taxes due
under this chapter for the tax reporting period in which the taxes
imposed under RCW 82.64.020 are paid by the retailer. The credit shall
not exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for the tax
reporting period. Unused credit may be carried over and used in
subsequent tax reporting periods, except that no credit may be claimed
more than twelve months from the end of the tax reporting period in
which the credit was earned. No refunds shall be granted for credits
under this section.
(3) No credit is available under this section for taxes paid under
RCW 82.64.020 before the effective date of this act.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "carbonated beverage" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 82.64.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2007.

--- END ---