BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2004 c 19 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (((11))) (10) of this section, one or more
objective alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate
achievement of state academic ((standards)) requirements. The
objective alternative assessments for each content area shall be
comparable in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must
demonstrate on the Washington assessment of student learning for each
content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state ((standard)) requirements in the content areas included in
the certificate. With the exception of students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, acquisition of the certificate is
required for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the ((state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of)) requirements of subsection (13) of this section on
the high school Washington assessment of student learning shall earn a
certificate of academic achievement. If a student does not
successfully meet the state ((standards)) requirements in one or more
content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement,
then the student may retake the assessment in the content area up to
four times at no cost to the student. If the student successfully
meets the state ((standards)) requirements on a retake of the
assessment then the student shall earn a certificate of academic
achievement. Once objective alternative assessments are authorized
pursuant to subsection (((11))) (10) of this section, a student may use
the objective alternative assessments to demonstrate that the student
successfully meets the state ((standards)) requirements for that
content area if the student has retaken the Washington assessment of
student learning at least once. If the student successfully meets the
state ((standards)) requirements on the objective alternative
assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of academic
achievement. The student's transcript shall note whether the
certificate of academic achievement was acquired by means of the
Washington assessment of student learning or by an alternative
assessment.
(4) ((Beginning with the graduating class of 2010, a student must
meet the state standards in science in addition to the other content
areas required under subsection (3) of this section on the Washington
assessment of student learning or the objective alternative assessments
in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(5))) The state board of education may not require the acquisition
of the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(((6))) (5) A student may retain and use the highest result from
each successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(((7))) (6) Beginning with the graduating class of 2006, the
highest scale score and level achieved in each content area on the high
school Washington assessment of student learning shall be displayed on
a student's transcript. In addition, beginning with the graduating
class of 2008, each student shall receive a scholar's designation on
his or her transcript for each content area in which the student
achieves level four the first time the student takes that content area
assessment.
(((8))) (7) Beginning in 2006, school districts must make available
to students the following options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state ((standards)) requirements if the student is enrolled in a public
school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state ((standards)) requirements for a certificate of academic
achievement if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(((9))) (8) Students who achieve the ((standard)) state requirement
in a content area of the high school assessment but who wish to improve
their results shall pay for retaking the assessment, using a uniform
cost determined by the superintendent of public instruction.
(((10))) (9) Subject to available funding, the superintendent shall
pilot opportunities for retaking the high school assessment beginning
in the 2004-05 school year. Beginning no later than September 2006,
opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year shall be
available to each school district.
(((11))) (10) The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop options for implementing objective
alternative assessments, which may include an appeals process, for
students to demonstrate achievement of the ((state academic standards))
certificate of academic achievement. The objective alternative
assessments shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and knowledge
that the student must demonstrate on the Washington assessment of
student learning and be objective in its determination of student
achievement of the state ((standards)) requirements. Before any
objective alternative assessments are used by a student to demonstrate
that the student has met the state ((standards)) requirements in a
content area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall
formally approve the use of any objective alternative assessments
through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent
resolution.
(((12))) (11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives
and senate education committees shall obtain information and
conclusions from recognized, independent, national assessment experts
regarding the validity and reliability of the high school Washington
assessment of student learning for making individual student high
school graduation determinations.
(((13))) (12) To help assure continued progress in academic
achievement as a foundation for high school graduation and to assure
that students are on track for high school graduation, each school
district shall prepare plans for students as provided in this
subsection (((13))) (12).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not ((successful)) proficient on any or all of
the content areas of the Washington assessment for student learning
during the previous school year. The plan shall include the courses,
competencies, and other steps needed to be taken by the student to meet
the state ((academic standards)) requirements and stay on track for
graduation. This requirement shall be phased in as follows:
(i) Beginning no later than the 2004-05 school year ninth grade
students as described in this subsection (((13))) (12)(a) shall have a
plan.
(ii) Beginning no later than the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter eighth grade students as described in this subsection
(((13))) (12)(a) shall have a plan.
(iii) The parent or guardian shall be notified, preferably through
a parent conference, of the student's results on the Washington
assessment of student learning, actions the school intends to take to
improve the student's skills in any content area in which the student
was ((unsuccessful)) not proficient, strategies to help them improve
their student's skills, and the content of the student's plan.
(iv) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.
(b) Beginning with the 2005-06 school year and every year
thereafter, all fifth grade students who were not ((successful))
proficient in one or more of the content areas of the fourth grade
Washington assessment of student learning shall have a student learning
plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of a student described in this
subsection (((13))) (12)(b) shall be notified, preferably through a
parent conference, of the student's results on the Washington
assessment of student learning, actions the school intends to take to
improve the student's skills in any content area in which the student
was ((unsuccessful)) not proficient, and provide strategies to help
them improve their student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.
(13) In order to meet state requirements and earn a certificate of
academic achievement, a student must meet or exceed either the
proficient or basic level on the high school Washington assessment of
student learning as follows:
(a) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008 and until July 31,
2010, the student must meet or exceed the proficient level in one out
of three and meet or exceed the basic level in two out of three of the
reading, writing, and mathematics content areas on the high school
Washington assessment of student learning or an approved alternative
assessment;
(b) Beginning August 1, 2010, and until July 31, 2014, the student
must meet or exceed the proficient level in two out of four and meet or
exceed the basic level in two out of four of the reading, writing,
mathematics, and science content areas on the high school Washington
assessment of student learning or an approved alternative assessment;
(c) Beginning August 1, 2014, and until July 31, 2017, the student
must meet or exceed the proficient level in three out of four of the
reading, writing, mathematics, and science content areas on the high
school Washington assessment of student learning or an approved
alternative assessment; and
(d) Beginning August 1, 2017, and thereafter, a student must meet
or exceed the proficient level in all four content areas of reading,
writing, mathematics, and science on the high school Washington
assessment of student learning or an approved alternative assessment.

--- END ---