BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.46 RCW
to read as follows:
If a water right holder reclaims any of their wastewater, the
amount of water reclaimed must be added to the instantaneous and annual
quantities of water right embodied in a permit, certificate, or claim
granted under chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 90.46.130 (Impairment of water rights
downstream from freshwater discharge points) and 2002 c 329 s 5, 2001
c 69 s 4, & 1997 c 444 s 4 are each repealed.

--- END ---