BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for investment related to pressurized steam pulp washing
technology acquired by a paper manufacturer after the effective date of
this section to be used in the manufacturing of pulp, paper, newsprint,
or paperboard by the paper manufacturer. The credit is equal to: (a)
The purchase price or lease price of the pulp washing technology, and
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing
such technology, if the technology will be located in a rural county;
or (b) fifty percent of the purchase price or lease price of the pulp
washing technology, and fifty percent of charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to installing such technology, if the
technology will not be located in a rural county. The credit under
this subsection shall only be taken for the first ten years of any
lease of pressurized steam pulp washing technology or the duration of
the lease, whichever is shorter in time.
(2) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for the purchase of anaerobic digestion technology acquired by
a person after the effective date of this section. The credit is equal
to: (a) The purchase price or lease price of the anaerobic digestion
technology, and charges made for labor and services rendered in respect
to installing such technology, if the technology will be located in a
rural county; or (b) fifty percent of the purchase price or lease price
of the anaerobic digestion technology, and fifty percent of charges
made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such
technology, if the technology will not be located in a rural county.
The credit under this subsection shall only be taken for the first ten
years of any lease of anaerobic digestion technology, or the duration
of the lease, whichever is shorter in time.
(3) An application must be made to the department before taking a
credit authorized under this section. The application shall be made to
the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
application shall contain information regarding the uses of the
pressurized steam pulp washing technology or anaerobic digestion
technology, total cost of acquiring the technology, date of
acquisition, and other information required by the department. The
department shall rule on the application within sixty days.
(4) A person taking a credit under this section must keep records
necessary for the department to verify eligibility for the credit under
this section.
(5) Credits under this section may be carried over until used. No
refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(6) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Anaerobic digestion technology" means: (i) Machinery and
equipment that processes manure from livestock into biogas and dried
manure using microorganisms in a decomposition process within a closed,
oxygen-free container; and (ii) tangible personal property that becomes
an ingredient or component of the machinery or equipment.
(b) "Paper manufacturer" means a person that is primarily engaged
in manufacturing pulp, paper, newsprint, and paperboard.
(c) "Pressurized steam pulp washing technology" means machinery and
equipment that uses a pressure vessel that discharges steam to wash
unbleached pulp for paper product-making purposes and that is designed
to reduce water consumption in pulp washing processes relative to
conventional pulp washing processes that use drum washers, rewashers,
and deckers.
(d) "Rural county" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.14.370.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.900 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to an
eligible person establishing or operating an anaerobic digester or to
services rendered in respect to installing, constructing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving an anaerobic digester, or to sales of
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of
the anaerobic digester. The anaerobic digester must be used primarily
to treat ((dairy)) livestock manure.
(2)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department
and must contain information regarding the location of the facility and
other information as the department may require.
(b) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
RCW 82.12.900 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Anaerobic digester" means a facility that processes manure
from ((cattle)) livestock into biogas and dried manure using
microorganisms in a decomposition process within a closed, oxygen-free
container.
(b) "Eligible person" means any person establishing or operating an
anaerobic digester to treat primarily ((dairy)) livestock manure.
(c) "Primarily" means more than fifty percent measured by volume or
weight.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.900 and 2003 c 5 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of anaerobic digesters, tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of anaerobic digesters, or the use of services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving eligible tangible personal property by an eligible person
establishing or operating an anaerobic digester, as defined in RCW
82.08.900. The anaerobic digester must be used primarily to treat
((dairy)) livestock manure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---