BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
under the subchapter heading "rule-making procedures" to read as
follows:
(1) If an agency receives two hundred or more letters of protest,
including emails and form letters, regarding a proposed rule, the
proposed rule shall not be adopted until there has been compliance with
the process in this section.
(2) Any proposed rule receiving two hundred letters or more of
protest shall be reviewed by the rule-making accountability committee.
(3) The rule-making accountability committee shall be composed of
five members of each of the two largest caucuses in the house of
representatives, chosen by the speaker of the house of representatives,
and five members of each of the two largest caucuses in the senate,
chosen by the president of the senate. The committee shall meet
monthly unless there are no proposed rules in dispute, in which case it
need not meet.
(4)(a) If fifteen members vote in favor of the proposed rule, it
may be implemented or adopted, as appropriate.
(b) If the proposed rule does not receive a favorable vote by at
least fifteen members, then the proposed rule shall be presented to the
legislature in the next legislative session for a yes or a no vote.
Until such a vote is taken, the proposed rule shall remain suspended or
on hold. If the legislature takes no action, the proposed rule may not
be implemented or adopted.

--- END ---