BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.08.065 and 1998 c 111 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any public officer having charge of any
vehicle owned or controlled by the state of Washington or any agency
thereof, any county, city, town, or public body in this state ((other
than the state of Washington)), and used in public business to operate
the same upon the public highways of this state, unless and until there
shall be displayed upon such automobile or other motor vehicle in
letters of contrasting color not less than one and one-quarter inches
in height in a conspicuous place on the right and left sides thereof,
the name of such state agency, county, city, town, or other public
body, together with the name of the department or office upon the
business of which the said vehicle is used. This section shall not
apply to vehicles of a sheriff's office, local police department, or
any vehicles used by the Washington state patrol or by local peace
officers under public authority for special undercover or confidential
investigative purposes. ((This subsection shall not apply to: (a) Any
municipal transit vehicle operated for purposes of providing public
mass transportation; (b) any vehicle governed by the requirements of
subsection (4) of this section; nor to (c) any motor vehicle on loan to
a school district for driver training purposes.)) It shall be lawful
and constitute compliance with the provisions of this section((,
however,)) for the governing body of the appropriate state agency,
county, city, town, or public body ((other than the state of Washington
or its agencies)) to adopt and use a distinctive insignia which shall
be not less than six inches in diameter across its smallest dimension
and which shall be displayed conspicuously on the right and left sides
of the vehicle. Such insignia shall be in a color or colors
contrasting with the vehicle to which applied for maximum visibility.
The name of the public body owning or operating the vehicle shall also
be included as part of or displayed above such approved insignia in
colors contrasting with the vehicle in letters not less than one and
one-quarter inches in height. Immediately below the lettering
identifying the public entity and agency operating the vehicle or below
an approved insignia shall appear the words "for official use only" in
letters at least one inch high in a color contrasting with the color of
the vehicle. ((The appropriate governing body may provide by rule or
ordinance for marking of passenger motor vehicles as prescribed in
subsection (2) of this section or for exceptions to the marking
requirements for local governmental agencies for the same purposes and
under the same circumstances as permitted for state agencies under
subsection (3) of this section.))
(2) ((Except as provided by subsections (3) and (4) of this
section,)) Passenger motor vehicles owned or controlled by the state of
Washington((, and purchased after July 1, 1989,)) must be plainly and
conspicuously marked on the lower left-hand corner of the rear window
with the name of the operating agency or institution or the words
"state motor pool," as appropriate, the words "state of Washington -- for official use only," and the seal of the state of Washington or the
appropriate agency or institution insignia, approved by the department
of general administration. Markings must be on a transparent adhesive
material and conform to the standards established by the department of
general administration. For the purposes of this section, "passenger
motor vehicles" means sedans, station wagons, vans, light trucks, or
other motor vehicles under ten thousand pounds gross vehicle weight.
(3) ((Subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to vehicles
used by the Washington state patrol for general undercover or
confidential investigative purposes. Traffic control vehicles of the
Washington state patrol may be exempted from the requirements of
subsection (2) of this section at the discretion of the chief of the
Washington state patrol.)) The department of general administration
shall adopt general rules permitting other exceptions to the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section for other vehicles used
for special undercover or confidential investigative law enforcement
purposes, confidential public health work, and public assistance fraud
or support investigative purposes, ((for vehicles leased or rented by
the state on a casual basis for a period of less than ninety days,))
and those provided for in RCW 46.08.066(3). The exceptions in this
subsection, subsection (4) of this section, and those provided for in
RCW 46.08.066(3) shall be the only exceptions permitted to the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Any motorcycle, vehicle over 10,000 pounds gross vehicle
weight, or other vehicle that for structural reasons cannot be marked
as required by subsection (1) or (2) of this section that is owned or
controlled by the state of Washington or by any county, city, town, or
other public body in this state and used for public purposes on the
public highways of this state shall be conspicuously marked in letters
of a contrasting color with the words "State of Washington" or the name
of such county, city, town, or other public body, together with the
name of the department or office that owns or controls the vehicle.
(5) All motor vehicle markings required under the terms of this
chapter shall be maintained in a legible condition at all times.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.08.066 and 1986 c 158 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the
department of licensing is authorized to issue confidential motor
vehicle license plates to units of local government and to agencies of
the federal government for special undercover or confidential
investigative law enforcement purposes only.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section,
the use of confidential plates on vehicles owned or operated by the
state of Washington by any officer or employee thereof, shall be
limited to confidential, investigative, or undercover work of state law
enforcement agencies, confidential public health work, and confidential
public assistance fraud or support investigations.
(3) ((Any state official elected on a statewide basis shall be
provided on request with one set of confidential plates for use on
official business.)) When necessary for the personal security of any
((other)) state official, public officer, or public employee, the chief
of the Washington state patrol may recommend that the director issue
confidential plates for use on an unmarked publicly owned or controlled
vehicle of the appropriate governmental unit for the conduct of
official business for the period of time that the personal security of
such state official, public officer, or other public employee may
require. The office of the state treasurer may use an unmarked state
owned or controlled vehicle with confidential plates where required for
the safe transportation of either state funds or negotiable securities
to or from the office of the state treasurer.
(4) The director of licensing may issue rules and regulations
governing applications for, and the use of, such plates by law
enforcement and other public agencies.

--- END ---