BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington's dependence on energy supplied from outside the
state and volatile global energy markets makes its economy and citizens
vulnerable to unpredictable and high energy prices;
(2) Washington's dependence on petroleum-based fuels increases
energy costs for citizens and businesses;
(3) Diesel soot from diesel engines ranks as the highest toxic air
pollutant in Washington, leading to hundreds of premature deaths and
increasing rates of asthmas and other lung diseases;
(4) The use of biodiesel results in significantly less air
pollution than traditional diesel fuels;
(5) Improper disposal and treatment of organic waste from farms and
livestock operations can have a significant negative impact on water
quality;
(6) Washington has abundant supplies of organic wastes from farms
that can be used for energy production and abundant farmland where
crops could be grown to supplement or supplant petroleum-based fuels;
(7) The use of energy and fuel derived from these sources can help
citizens and business conserve energy and reduce the use of petroleum-based fuels, would improve air and water quality in Washington, reduce
environmental risks from farm wastes, create new markets for farm
products, and provide new industries and jobs for Washington citizens;
and
(8) The bioenergy industry is a new and developing industry that
is, in part, limited by the availability of capital for the
construction of facilities for converting farm and forest products into
energy and fuels.
Therefore, the legislature finds that it is in the public interest
to encourage the rapid adoption and use of bioenergy, to develop a
viable bioenergy industry within Washington state, and to support a
viable agriculture industry to grow bioenergy crops. To accomplish
this, the Washington bioenergy loan program is established to stimulate
the construction of facilities in Washington to generate energy from
farm sources or convert organic matter into fuels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.
(3) "Project" means the construction of facilities, including the
purchase of equipment, to convert farm products or wastes into
electricity or gaseous and liquid fuels. These specifically include
facilities to generate electricity or methane from the anaerobic
digestion of organic matter, and facilities for the extracting oils
from canola, rape, mustard, and other oilseeds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A bioenergy loan program is established
within the department. The director may only approve an application
providing a loan for a project that the director finds:
(a) Will convert farm products or wastes directly into electricity
or into gaseous or liquid fuels;
(b) Demonstrates technical feasibility and probable business
success;
(c) The business or facility produces long-term economic benefits
to the state, a region of the state, or a particular community in the
state;
(d) The project does not require continuing state support;
(e) The expenditure will result in new jobs, job retention, or
higher incomes for citizens of the state; and
(f) The expenditure is accompanied by private investment.
(2) The director may not approve an application if it fails to
provide for adequate reporting or disclosure of financial and
employment data to the director. The director may require an annual or
other periodic audit of the project books.
(3) The director may approve an application that results in a loan
of up to five million dollars.
(4) The director shall fix the terms and rates of these loans to
minimize the costs to the borrowers and to encourage establishment of
a viable bioenergy industry. The interest rates for these loans must
be one percent below the prime interest rate offered by private lending
institutions.
(5) The director may defer loan repayment for up to twelve months
or until the project starts to receive revenue from operations,
whichever is sooner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The director may establish policies and
procedures necessary for processing, reviewing, and approving loan
applications made under this section.
(2) Each application must show in detail the nature of the project,
the source of the feedstock, and the technologies that will be used.
Each application must contain a credit analysis of the business to
receive the loan and a detailed feasibility analysis and business plan.
(3) The director shall consult with those agencies having expertise
and knowledge to assess the technical and business feasibility of the
project and probability of success. These agencies may include, but
are not limited to, Washington State University, the University of
Washington, the department of ecology, the department of agriculture,
and the Washington state conservation commission.
(4) If the total requested dollar amount of loans exceeds the
amount available in the Washington bioenergy loan account created in
section 5 of this act, the applications must be prioritized based upon
the following criteria:
(a) The extent to which the project will help conserve energy and
reduce dependence on petroleum fuels and imported energy either
directly or indirectly;
(b) The extent to which the project will reduce air and water
pollution either directly or indirectly;
(c) The extent to which the project will establish a viable
bioenergy production capacity in Washington;
(d) The benefits to Washington's agriculture producers; and
(e) The number and quality of jobs and economic benefits created by
the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The Washington bioenergy loan account is
created in the state treasury. All receipts from appropriations made
to the account and loan payments of principal and interest derived from
loans made under this chapter must be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for loans for projects
consistent with this chapter. Administrative costs of the department
may not exceed three percent of the annual funds available for this
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The director shall report to the legislature
and governor on the status of the Washington bioenergy loan program
created under this chapter, on or before December 1st of the years
2006, 2007, and 2009. This report must include information on the
projects that have been funded, the status of these projects, and their
environmental, energy savings, and job creation benefits.

Sec. 7 RCW 42.56.270 and 2005 c 274 s 407 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.-- (sections 1 through 6, 9, and 10 of
this act), 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and 43.168 RCW, or during
application for economic development loans or program services provided
by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011; and
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
community, trade, and economic development:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development pursuant to RCW 43.330.050(8) and 43.330.080(4); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the office of the governor in connection with the
siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that
person's business and until a siting decision is made, identifying
information of any person supplying information under this subsection
and the locations being considered for siting, relocation, or expansion
of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of community, trade, and
economic development based on information as described in (a)(i) of
this subsection, any work product is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of community, trade, and economic development from a
person connected with siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or
relocation of that person's business, information described in (a)(ii)
of this subsection will be available to the public under this chapter.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.84.092 and 2005 c 514 s 1106, 2005 c 353 s 4, 2005
c 339 s 23, 2005 c 314 s 110, 2005 c 312 s 8, and 2005 c 94 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the emergency reserve fund, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the freight mobility investment account, the health
services account, the public health services account, the health system
capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the regional transportation investment district
account, the resource management cost account, the rural Washington
loan fund, the site closure account, the small city pavement and
sidewalk account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
transportation partnership account, the tuition recovery trust fund,
the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
bioenergy loan account, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 6 and 9 of this act
expire June 30, 2016. Any moneys in the Washington bioenergy loan
account on that date and any moneys received pursuant to loans made
under this chapter must be deposited in the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 6, 9, 10, and 12 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---