BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS AND INTENT. The legislature finds
that paid sick leave from employment is critical to the economic well-being of the state and its workers and to public health. Paid sick
leave helps workers maintain their own health and the health of their
coworkers, care for their families, and maintain financial stability.
It also helps employers retain trained workers and operate
competitively, and ensures that workers remain productive members of
the work force, and not face poverty or dependence on public programs.
The legislature intends to require employers to provide workers
with a minimum amount of paid sick leave, to allow employers to adopt
reasonable policies concerning the administration of paid sick leave,
and to encourage employers to adopt or retain leave policies more
generous than the minimum requirements of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 MINIMUM PAID SICK LEAVE. (1) An employee
shall accrue at least forty hours of paid sick leave for each six
months of full-time work for an employer, or a proportionate amount of
paid sick leave for each six months of less than full-time work, or
otherwise have available an equivalent amount of paid sick leave.
(2) An employee is entitled to take paid sick leave only after
completing the first six consecutive months of work for an employer.
An employee taking paid sick leave must comply with the terms of the
collective bargaining agreement or employer policy applicable to the
leave, except for any terms relating to the choice of leave.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Full-time work" means a work week of forty hours. However:
(i) If a collective bargaining agreement provides for a work week other
than forty hours, "full-time work" means the same as in the collective
bargaining agreement; or (ii) if federal law provides for an overtime
payment based on a work week other than forty hours, "full-time work"
means the same as under federal law.
(b) "Paid sick leave" means leave from employment with full pay
for: (i) Illness; and (ii) family care as set forth in RCW 49.12.270.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 POSTER. The department of labor and
industries shall include notice of the provisions of this act in each
reprinting of the poster required under RCW 49.12.275.

Sec. 4 RCW 49.12.280 and 1988 c 236 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENT. The department shall administer
and investigate violations of RCW 49.12.270 ((and)), 49.12.275,
49.12.287, and section 2 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 49.12.285 and 1988 c 236 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
INFRACTIONS AND PENALTIES. The department may issue a notice of
infraction if the department reasonably believes that an employer has
failed to comply with RCW 49.12.270 ((or)), 49.12.275, 49.12.287, or
section 2 of this act. The form of the notice of infraction shall be
adopted by rule pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. An employer who is
found to have committed an infraction under RCW 49.12.270 ((or)),
49.12.275, 49.12.287, or section 2 of this act may be assessed a
monetary penalty not to exceed two hundred dollars for each violation.
An employer who repeatedly violates RCW 49.12.270 ((or)), 49.12.275,
49.12.287, or section 2 of this act may be assessed a monetary penalty
not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation. For purposes of
this section, the failure to comply with RCW 49.12.275 as to an
employee ((or)), the failure to comply with RCW 49.12.270 as to a
period of leave sought by an employee, the failure to comply with RCW
49.12.287 as to prohibited discrimination against an employee, or the
failure to comply with any requirement of section 2 of this act shall
each constitute separate violations. An employer has twenty days to
appeal the notice of infraction. Any appeal of a violation determined
to be an infraction shall be heard and determined by an administrative
law judge. Monetary penalties collected under this section shall be
deposited into the general fund.

Sec. 6 RCW 49.12.287 and 2002 c 243 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
NONDISCRIMINATION. An employer shall not discharge, threaten to
discharge, demote, suspend, discipline, or otherwise discriminate
against an employee because the employee: (1) Has exercised, or
attempted to exercise, any right provided under RCW 49.12.270 through
49.12.295 or section 2 of this act; or (2) has filed a complaint,
testified, or assisted in any proceeding under RCW 49.12.270 through
49.12.295 or section 2 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 49.12.290 and 1988 c 236 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING. Nothing in RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295
or section 2 of this act shall be construed to reduce any provision in
a collective bargaining agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 OTHER LAWS. (1) The rights under section 2
of this act are not in addition to any other rights provided by the
federal family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L.
103-3, 107 Stat. 6).
(2) Nothing in section 2 of this act shall be construed to
discourage employers from adopting policies which provide greater leave
rights to employees than those required by section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RULE MAKING. The director of the department
of labor and industries may adopt rules as necessary to implement
sections 1 through 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 CODIFICATION. Sections 1 through 3 and 8
of this act are each added to chapter 49.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---