BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a nonprofit
corporation organized under chapter 24.03 RCW as payments or
contributions from the state or any county, city, town, municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, port district, or public
corporation for the promotion of conventions and tourism.

--- END ---