BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.230 and 2002 c 61 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any official of the state authorized to disburse funds in payment
of salaries and wages of public officers or employees is authorized,
upon written request of the officer or employee, to deduct from the
salaries or wages of the officers or employees, the amount or amounts
of subscription payments, premiums, contributions, or continuation
thereof, for payment of the following:
(1) Credit union deductions: PROVIDED, That twenty-five or more
employees of a single state agency or a total of one hundred or more
state employees of several agencies have authorized such a deduction
for payment to the same credit union. An agency may, in its own
discretion, establish a minimum participation requirement of fewer than
twenty-five employees.
(2) Parking fee deductions: PROVIDED, That payment is made for
parking facilities furnished by the agency or by the department of
general administration.
(3) U.S. savings bond deductions: PROVIDED, That a person within
the particular agency shall be appointed to act as trustee. The
trustee will receive all contributions; purchase and deliver all bond
certificates; and keep such records and furnish such bond or security
as will render full accountability for all bond contributions.
(4) Board, lodging or uniform deductions when such board, lodging
and uniforms are furnished by the state, or deductions for academic
tuitions or fees or scholarship contributions payable to the employing
institution.
(5) Dues and other fees deductions: PROVIDED, That the deduction
is for payment of membership dues to any professional organization
formed primarily for public employees or college and university
professors: AND PROVIDED, FURTHER, That twenty-five or more employees
of a single state agency, or a total of one hundred or more state
employees of several agencies have authorized such a deduction for
payment to the same professional organization.
(6) Labor or employee organization dues, and voluntary employee
contributions to any funds, committees, or subsidiary organizations
maintained by labor or employee organizations, may be deducted in the
event that a payroll deduction is not provided under a collective
bargaining agreement under the provisions of ((RCW 41.06.150)) chapter
41.80 RCW: PROVIDED, That each labor or employee organization chooses
only one fund for voluntary employee contributions: PROVIDED, FURTHER,
That twenty-five or more officers or employees of a single agency, or
a total of one hundred or more officers or employees of several
agencies have authorized such a deduction for payment to the same labor
or employee organization: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That labor or employee
organizations with five hundred or more members in state government may
have payroll deduction for employee benefit programs.
(7) Insurance contributions to the authority for payment of
premiums under contracts authorized by the state health care authority.
However, enrollment or assignment by the state health care authority to
participate in a health care benefit plan, as required by RCW
41.05.065(5), shall authorize a payroll deduction of premium
contributions without a written consent under the terms and conditions
established by the public employees' benefits board.
(8) Deductions to a bank, savings bank, or savings and loan
association if (a) the bank, savings bank, or savings and loan
association is authorized to do business in this state; and (b) twenty-five or more employees of a single agency, or fewer, if a lesser number
is established by such agency, or a total of one hundred or more state
employees of several agencies have authorized a deduction for payment
to the same bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association.
Deductions from salaries and wages of public officers and employees
other than those enumerated in this section or by other law, may be
authorized by the director of financial management for purposes clearly
related to state employment or goals and objectives of the agency and
for plans authorized by the state health care authority.
(9) Contributions to the Washington state combined fund drive.
The authority to make deductions from the salaries and wages of
public officers and employees as provided for in this section shall be
in addition to such other authority as may be provided by law:
PROVIDED, That the state or any department, division, or separate
agency of the state shall not be liable to any insurance carrier or
contractor for the failure to make or transmit any such deduction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2007.

--- END ---