BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any dissolution, legal separation, declaration concerning
validity of marriage, nonparental custody, or petition for residential
schedule/parenting plan proceeding, the court clerk shall certify to
the superintendent of public instruction a copy of that portion of the
dissolution, legal separation, declaration concerning validity of
marriage, nonparental custody, or petition for residential
schedule/parenting plan decree, order, residential schedule, or
parenting plan that describes the person or persons who have legal
custody, care, or control of any child subject to the decree, order,
schedule, or plan.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide the
information as received from the court clerk to the superintendent of
the school district in which any child subject to a decree, order,
schedule, or plan is registered. The superintendent of the school
district shall provide the information as received from the
superintendent of public instruction to the principal of the school in
which any child subject to a decree, order, schedule, or plan is
registered.
(3) The school shall provide notice to the person or persons
indicated in the decree, order, schedule, or plan, who have legal
custody, care, or control of any child who is registered with the
school, of matters for which notice is required to be given such
persons or is otherwise generally provided to such persons, including
notice of any meetings, events, trips, tests, grades, and disciplinary
actions.

--- END ---