BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that it is in the public interest of the
state to encourage and facilitate the formation of cooperative
relationships between business and labor and educational institutions
that provide for the development and expansion of programs of
educational skills training consistent with employment needs.
(2) Further, the legislature finds that it is in the state's
interest to make students aware of the educational training programs
and career employment opportunities.
(3) Therefore, the following shall be implemented to expand
opportunities for secondary school students to prepare for technical
careers and related apprenticeships:
(a) Centers of excellence and other colleges with a high density of
apprenticeship programs shall act as brokers of relevant information
and resources as provided for in section 2 of this act;
(b) An educational outreach program coordinated by the Washington
state apprenticeship and training council as provided for in section 3
of this act; and
(c) The development of direct-entry programs for graduating
secondary students, approved and overseen by the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council as provided for in section 4 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Centers of excellence, as designated by the state board for
community and technical colleges, and other colleges identified by the
Washington state apprenticeship and training council as having a high
density of apprenticeship programs, shall act as a broker of relevant
information and resources on available grants, scholarship
opportunities, job openings, and industries of growth.
(2) Centers under subsection (1) of this section, in conjunction
with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall aid
all local school districts in meeting the goals of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state apprenticeship and training council, in
conjunction with individual state-approved apprenticeship training
programs and the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall lead and coordinate an educational outreach program for middle
and secondary school students, parents, and educators about
apprenticeship and career opportunities.
(2) As part of the educational outreach program, the Washington
state apprenticeship and training council shall communicate work force
projections to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to distribute to all local school districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state apprenticeship and training council shall
approve and oversee direct-entry programs for graduating secondary
students into building and construction-related apprenticeships by:
(a) Assisting individual school districts in using and leveraging
existing resources;
(b) Developing guidelines, including guidelines that ensure that
graduating secondary school students will receive appropriate education
and training and will have the opportunity to transition to local
apprenticeship programs. The guidelines must be developed with input
from apprenticeship coordinators, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, the state board for community and technical
colleges, the work force training and education coordinating board, the
governor's policy office, and other interested stakeholders for direct-entry programs; and
(c) Awarding ten incentive grants, based on guidelines established
under (b) of this subsection, to school districts statewide solely for
personnel to negotiate and implement agreements with local
apprenticeships based upon state apprenticeship use requirements, as
described in RCW 39.04.320, to accept graduating secondary school
students with appropriate training into apprenticeship programs. In
awarding the ten incentive grants, the Washington state apprenticeship
and training council must award the grants evenly across the state.
(2) Beginning December 1, 2006, the Washington state apprenticeship
and training council shall provide an annual report to the education
and commerce and labor committees of the legislature. The report may
be provided in conjunction with the report required under section 5 of
this act and must include:
(a) The guidelines established under subsection (1)(b) of this
section;
(b) The names of the school districts receiving incentive grants
under subsection (1)(c) of this section;
(c) The results of negotiations between school districts receiving
incentive grants and local apprenticeship programs;
(d) A list of apprenticeship programs that have agreed, pursuant to
negotiated agreements, to accept qualified graduating secondary
students; and
(e) The number of qualified graduating secondary students entering
into apprenticeship programs each year through direct-entry programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28C.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funding provided for the purposes of this section,
the superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the
Washington state apprenticeship and training council shall allocate
grants on a competitive basis to up to four pilot projects to expand
enrollment of secondary school students in career and technical
programs that enable them to enter apprenticeships, particularly
building and construction apprenticeships, upon graduation. The
purpose of the pilot projects is to develop new collaborations among K-12 education and work force education providers and try new approaches
to delivering instruction and career and technical education to
secondary school students.
(a) Two of the pilot projects shall involve skill centers or high
schools working collaboratively with local or regional apprenticeship
programs and the Washington state apprenticeship and training council
to design and offer the programs.
(b) Two of the pilot projects shall involve community or technical
colleges working collaboratively with local high schools, local or
regional apprenticeship programs, and the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council to design and offer the programs.
(c) At least one of the pilot projects is encouraged to involve
small or rural high schools.
(d) In reviewing the grant applications, the superintendent of
public instruction and the Washington state apprenticeship and training
council shall convene a review committee representing the state board
for community and technical colleges, the work force training and
education coordinating board, business and labor interests with ties to
apprenticeship fields, apprenticeship program coordinators, and career
and technical educators in the public schools.
(e) Pilot projects must be ready to enroll students for the 2006-07
school year.
(f) The pilot projects shall operate for a three-year period.
(2) In addition to enrolling students in career and technical
programs that enable them to enter apprenticeships upon graduation, the
pilot projects under this section may engage in but are not limited to
the following activities:
(a) Developing or modifying curriculum to align with apprenticeship
entry requirements and skill expectations or to adjust curriculum to
the secondary level;
(b) Negotiating agreements to use local or regional apprenticeship
program training facilities to offer programs;
(c) Negotiating agreements with local or regional apprenticeship
programs, community or technical colleges, or other contractors to
provide specialized instruction within the program;
(d) Based on guidelines and assistance from the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council, negotiating direct-entry
agreements with local or regional apprenticeship programs to accept
pilot project graduates into the programs;
(e) In conjunction with educational outreach efforts by the
Washington state apprenticeship and training council and local or
regional apprenticeship programs, conducting marketing, advertising,
and communication about the pilot project to area teachers, counselors,
students, and parents;
(f) Providing tutoring and other academic support services to
ensure students have the necessary academic skills for the program and
for high school graduation; and
(g) Offering other support services such as counseling, community
service referral, and assistance for low-income students such as tools,
supplies, books, or transportation to nonschool facilities.
(3) To the maximum extent possible, students enrolled in a pilot
project shall receive both high school and college credit for their
courses through tech-prep agreements or the high school program created
in RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400 (running start).
(4) The state funding formula for a skill center student enrolled
in a pilot project under this section shall be determined based on the
student's aggregate enrolled hours of instruction, not to exceed 1.2
full-time equivalent.
(5) Funding for a student enrolled in a community or technical
college pilot project under this section shall be provided through the
funding mechanism under RCW 28A.600.310 (running start), including any
enrollment in courses offered by the college through the pilot project
that are eligible for high school but not college credit. The
superintendent of public instruction and the state board for community
and technical colleges may jointly adopt rules regarding enrollment
reporting and allocation of funds under RCW 28A.600.310 for the
community or technical college pilot projects.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall convene a work
group to identify barriers and opportunities for further expansion of
secondary career and technical programs that enable graduates to enter
apprenticeships, particularly building and construction-related
apprenticeships, beyond the pilot project stage. The work group shall
include representatives from the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council, local or regional apprenticeship programs, community
and technical colleges, high schools, and skill centers. The
superintendent shall submit a report with recommendations to the
education and commerce and labor committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2006. Issues to be considered by the work group may
include:
(a) Expanding participation and opportunities in running start for
career and technical students, particularly in apprenticeship
preparation programs, including the role of using parent involvement in
guidance and counseling for students to expand participation;
(b) Addressing highly qualified teacher requirements under the
federal no child left behind act;
(c) Cross-crediting of career and technical and core academic
courses;
(d) The funding model for skill centers;
(e) Creating benchmarks to measure outcomes from the pilot projects
and from possible expansion of the projects; and
(f) The impact of current student assessment and achievement
requirements on student participation in apprenticeship preparation
programs and opportunities for developing alternative assessment and
achievement requirements.
(7) This section expires August 31, 2009.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2003 c 232 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(3) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities,
the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.
(4) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2009-10, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2008-09 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
under section 5 of this act.
(7) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the University
of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases beginning
in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to assist needy
low and middle income resident law students.
(((7))) (8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09,
institutions of higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten
percent of all revenues received as a result of graduate academic
school tuition increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through
academic year 2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident
graduate academic students.

--- END ---