BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.43.600 and 2005 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except in the case of fraud, or as provided in subsections (2)
and (3) of this section, a carrier may not: (a) Request a refund from
a health care provider of a payment previously made to satisfy a claim
unless it does so in writing to the provider within twenty-four months
after the date that the payment was made; or (b) request that a
contested refund be paid any sooner than six months after receipt of
the request. Any such request must specify why the carrier believes
the provider owes the refund. If a provider fails to contest the
request in writing to the carrier within thirty days of its receipt,
the request is deemed accepted and the refund must be paid.
(2) A carrier may not, if doing so for reasons related to
coordination of benefits with another carrier or entity responsible for
payment of a claim: (a) Request a refund from a health care provider
of a payment previously made to satisfy a claim unless it does so in
writing to the provider within thirty months after the date that the
payment was made; or (b) request that a contested refund be paid any
sooner than six months after receipt of the request. Any such request
must specify why the carrier believes the provider owes the refund, and
include the name and mailing address of the entity that has primary
responsibility for payment of the claim. If a provider fails to
contest the request in writing to the carrier within thirty days of its
receipt, the request is deemed accepted and the refund must be paid.
(3) A carrier may at any time request a refund from a health care
provider of a payment previously made to satisfy a claim if: (a) A
third party, including a government entity, is found responsible for
satisfaction of the claim as a consequence of liability imposed by law,
such as tort liability; and (b) the carrier is unable to recover
directly from the third party because the third party has either
already paid or will pay the provider for the health services covered
by the claim.
(4) If a contract between a carrier and a health care provider
conflicts with this section, this section shall prevail. However, (a)
nothing in this section precludes a mutual agreement between a carrier
and a health care provider from including periods of limitation shorter
than those set forth in subsections (1)(a) and (2)(a) of this section
or limits the enforceability of the shorter periods of limitation; and
(b) nothing in this section prohibits a health care provider from
choosing at any time to refund to a carrier any payment previously made
to satisfy a claim.
(5) For purposes of this section, "refund" means the return, either
directly or through an offset to a future claim, of some or all of a
payment already received by a health care provider.
(6) This section neither permits nor precludes a carrier from
recovering from a subscriber, enrollee, or beneficiary any amounts paid
to a health care provider for benefits to which the subscriber,
enrollee, or beneficiary was not entitled under the terms and
conditions of the health plan, insurance policy, or other benefit
agreement.
(7) This section does not apply to claims for health care services
provided through dental-only health carriers, health care services
provided under Title XVIII (medicare) of the social security act, or
medicare supplemental plans regulated under chapter 48.66 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.43.605 and 2005 c 278 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except in the case of fraud, or as provided in subsection (2)
of this section, a health care provider may not: (a) Request
additional payment from a carrier to satisfy a claim unless he or she
does so in writing to the carrier within twenty-four months after the
date that the claim was denied or payment intended to satisfy the claim
was made; or (b) request that the additional payment be made any sooner
than six months after receipt of the request. Any such request must
specify why the provider believes the carrier owes the additional
payment.
(2) A health care provider may not, if doing so for reasons related
to coordination of benefits with another carrier or entity responsible
for payment of a claim: (a) Request additional payment from a carrier
to satisfy a claim unless he or she does so in writing to the carrier
within thirty months after the date the claim was denied or payment
intended to satisfy the claim was made; or (b) request that the
additional payment be made any sooner than six months after receipt of
the request. Any such request must specify why the provider believes
the carrier owes the additional payment, and include the name and
mailing address of any entity that has disclaimed responsibility for
payment of the claim.
(3) If a contract between a carrier and a health care provider
conflicts with this section, this section shall prevail. However, (a)
nothing in this section precludes a mutual agreement between a carrier
and a health care provider from including periods of limitation shorter
than those set forth in subsections (1)(a) and (2)(a) of this section
or limits the enforceability of the shorter periods of limitation; and
(b) nothing in this section prohibits a carrier from choosing at any
time to make additional payments to a provider to satisfy a claim.
(4) This section does not apply to claims for health care services
provided through dental-only health carriers, health care services
provided under Title XVIII (medicare) of the social security act, or
medicare supplemental plans regulated under chapter 48.66 RCW.

--- END ---