BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.42 RCW
to read as follows:
A designated test site supervisor must ensure that when the test
site tests a specimen to determine a patient's serum creatinine level,
the test site calculates the patient's glomerular filtration rate using
information provided by the patient or the health care professional
requesting the test. The test site must include the patient's
glomerular filtration rate with its report to the patient's health care
professional.

--- END ---