BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.19.1905 and 2002 c 299 s 5 and 2002 c 285 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The director of general administration shall establish overall
state policy for compliance by all state agencies, including
educational institutions, regarding the following purchasing and
material control functions:
(1) Development of a state commodity coding system, including
common stock numbers for items maintained in stores for reissue;
(2) Determination where consolidations, closures, or additions of
stores operated by state agencies and educational institutions should
be initiated;
(3) Institution of standard criteria for determination of when and
where an item in the state supply system should be stocked;
(4) Establishment of stock levels to be maintained in state stores,
and formulation of standards for replenishment of stock;
(5) Formulation of an overall distribution and redistribution
system for stock items which establishes sources of supply support for
all agencies, including interagency supply support;
(6) Determination of what function data processing equipment,
including remote terminals, shall perform in statewide purchasing and
material control for improvement of service and promotion of economy;
(7) Standardization of records and forms used statewide for supply
system activities involving purchasing, receiving, inspecting, storing,
requisitioning, and issuing functions, including a standard
notification form for state agencies to report cost-effective direct
purchases, which shall at least identify the price of the goods as
available through the division of purchasing, the price of the goods as
available from the alternative source, the total savings, and the
signature of the notifying agency's director or the director's
designee;
(8) Screening of supplies, material, and equipment excess to the
requirements of one agency for overall state need before sale as
surplus;
(9) Establishment of warehouse operation and storage standards to
achieve uniform, effective, and economical stores operations;
(10) Establishment of time limit standards for the issuing of
material in store and for processing requisitions requiring purchase;
(11) Formulation of criteria for determining when centralized
rather than decentralized purchasing shall be used to obtain maximum
benefit of volume buying of identical or similar items, including
procurement from federal supply sources;
(12) Development of criteria for use of leased, rather than state
owned, warehouse space based on relative cost and accessibility;
(13) Institution of standard criteria for purchase and placement of
state furnished materials, carpeting, furniture, fixtures, and nonfixed
equipment, in newly constructed or renovated state buildings;
(14) Determination of how transportation costs incurred by the
state for materials, supplies, services, and equipment can be reduced
by improved freight and traffic coordination and control;
(15) Establishment of a formal certification program for state
employees who are authorized to perform purchasing functions as agents
for the state under the provisions of chapter 43.19 RCW;
(16) Development of performance measures for the reduction of total
overall expense for material, supplies, equipment, and services used
each biennium by the state;
(17) Establishment of a standard system for all state organizations
to record and report dollar savings and cost avoidance which are
attributable to the establishment and implementation of improved
purchasing and material control procedures;
(18) Development of procedures for mutual and voluntary cooperation
between state agencies, including educational institutions, and
political subdivisions for exchange of purchasing and material control
services;
(19) Resolution of all other purchasing and material matters which
require the establishment of overall statewide policy for effective and
economical supply management;
(20) Development of guidelines and criteria for the purchase of
vehicles, high gas mileage vehicles, alternate vehicle fuels, plug-in
hybrid electric vehicles and systems, equipment, and materials that
reduce overall energy-related costs and energy use by the state,
including investigations into all opportunities to aggregate the
purchasing of clean technologies, including plug-in hybrid electric
vehicles, by state and local governments, and including the requirement
that new passenger vehicles purchased by the state meet the minimum
standards for passenger automobile fuel economy established by the
United States secretary of transportation pursuant to the energy policy
and conservation act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2002);
(21) Development of goals for state use of recycled or
environmentally preferable products through specifications for products
and services, processes for requests for proposals and requests for
qualifications, contractor selection, and contract negotiations.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.19.570 and 2002 c 285 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall direct and be responsible for the
acquisition, operation, maintenance, storage, repair, and replacement
of state motor vehicles under its control. The department shall
utilize state facilities available for the maintenance, repair, and
storage of such motor vehicles, and may provide directly or by contract
for the maintenance, repair, and servicing of all motor vehicles, and
other property related thereto and under its control.
(2) The department may arrange, by agreement with agencies, for the
utilization by one of the storage, repair, or maintenance facilities of
another, with such provision for charges and credits as may be agreed
upon. The department may acquire and maintain storage, repair, and
maintenance facilities for the motor vehicles under its control from
such funds as may be appropriated by the legislature.
(3)(a) The legislature finds that a clean environment is important
and that global warming effects may be offset by decreasing the
emissions of harmful compounds from motor vehicles. The legislature
further finds that the state is in a position to set an example of
large scale use of alternative fuels in motor vehicles and other clean
technologies, including the use of plug-in hybrid electric vehicles.
(b) The department shall consider the use of state vehicles to
conduct field tests on alternative fuels in areas where air pollution
constraints may be eased by these optional fuels. These fuels should
include but are not limited to gas-powered and electric-powered
vehicles.
(c) For planned purchases of vehicles using alternative fuels or
plug-in hybrid electric vehicles, the department and other state
agencies shall explore opportunities to purchase these vehicles
together with the federal government, agencies of other states, other
Washington state agencies, local governments, or private organizations
for less cost. All state agencies must investigate and determine
whether or not they can make clean technologies, including plug-in
hybrid electric vehicles, more cost-effective by combining their
purchasing power before completing a planned vehicle purchase.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must solicit the purchase of one hundred plug-in
hybrid electric vehicles for use in the state motor pool by November
30, 2010.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 43.19.1905 and 43.19.570,
"plug-in hybrid electric vehicle" is a hybrid vehicle that:
(a) Can run for several miles on battery power alone; and
(b) Can be plugged in to the electric grid in order to recharge its
batteries.

--- END ---