BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that energy efficiency
and conservation should be a priority for the state and its local
communities. The legislature recognizes that opportunities exist for
funding energy efficiency and conservation. In addition, there are
models from other jurisdictions for increasing energy efficiency and
conservation. It is the intent of the legislature that the Washington
State University energy program study these issues and create a
Washington state energy efficiency program road map.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington State University energy program must conduct a
study to create a Washington state energy efficiency program road map.
The study must:
(a) Evaluate the state's current efforts with respect to energy
efficiency and conservation;
(b) Evaluate the state's role in regional efforts to improve energy
efficiency and conservation;
(c) Evaluate the effectiveness of other jurisdictions with
established programs for funding energy efficiency and conservation;
(d) Evaluate methods for funding energy efficiency and
conservation;
(e) Identify areas where the state needs to increase energy
efficiency and conservation;
(f) Identify areas where the state could establish, expand, or fund
efforts related to energy efficiency and conservation;
(g) Identify methods and create recommended strategies to fund
energy efficiency and conservation in areas where increased efforts are
needed; and
(h) Create the Washington state energy efficiency program road map
containing recommended steps to be taken by the state, local
governments, the Washington State University energy program, and other
interested parties to establish, fund, and expand energy efficiency and
conservation.
(2) In conducting the study to create the Washington state energy
efficiency program road map, the Washington State University energy
program may consult with the following:
(a) Representatives from all state agencies that deal with energy
issues;
(b) Representatives from public utility districts;
(c) Representatives from electric utilities regulated by the
utilities and transportation commission;
(d) A representative from a private industry engaged in business
related to energy efficiency and conservation;
(e) A representative from an environmental organization;
(f) A representative of energy users including commercial,
industrial, and residential users; and
(g) A representative from a regional organization involved in
energy planning and distribution.
(3) The Washington State University energy program must report
results and provide the Washington state energy efficiency program road
map to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature
by December 31, 2007.
(4) This section expires January 31, 2008.

--- END ---