BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
A telecommunications company may not charge a customer a fee to
receive a paper copy of a bill when the bill includes charges for
intrastate service. For purposes of this section, "intrastate service"
means a communication that originates and terminates in the state of
Washington, without regard to whether the communication went through
any place outside the state.

--- END ---