BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there were over
forty-six thousand reports of persons missing nationwide and over five
hundred missing persons in the state of Washington. Major catastrophic
events in other parts of the United States this year have also
emphasized that identifying victims in mass disasters is often
impossible, due to the deficiency in planning by communities and
governments. It is the intent of this act to build upon the research
and findings of the Washington state missing persons task force,
assembled by the state attorney general in 2003, the United States
department of justice, and others to aid in recovery of missing persons
and the identification of human remains.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington association of county officials, in consultation
with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the
Washington association of coroners and medical examiners, the forensic
investigations council, the Washington state patrol, and other
interested agencies and individuals, shall convene a committee to
coordinate the use of the latest technology and available science to
improve reporting of missing persons, to improve the communication
within the state and with national data bases, to enhance the
dissemination of information to other agencies and the public, and to
improve reporting for missing persons and the collection and
preservation of evidence.
Protocols for the investigation of reported missing persons,
identification of human remains, and recommended protocols for the
reporting and identification of persons missing as the result of major
events not limited to tsunami, earthquake, or acts of terrorism shall
be endorsed by the groups named in this section who shall then seek the
voluntary adoption of the same by all local law enforcement agencies,
coroners, medical examiners, and others charged with locating missing
persons or identifying human remains.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.103 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state forensic investigations council, in
cooperation with the Washington association of coroners and medical
examiners and other interested agencies, shall develop training modules
that are essential to the effective implementation and use of missing
persons protocols using funds provided in RCW 43.79.445. The training
modules must provide training through classes and media that will train
and educate small departments or those at remote locations with the
least disruption. The modules will include, but will not be limited
to: The reporting process, the use of forms and protocols, the
effective use of resources, the collection and importance of evidence
and preservation of biological evidence, and risk assessment of the
individuals reported missing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
create and maintain a statewide web site, which shall be available to
the public. The web site shall post relevant information concerning
persons reported missing in the state of Washington. For missing
persons, the web site shall contain, but is not limited to: The
person's name, physical description, photograph, and other information
that is deemed necessary according to the adopted protocols. This web
site shall allow citizens to more broadly disseminate information
regarding missing persons for at least thirty days. Due to the large
number of reports received on persons who are overdue and subsequently
appear, the information will be removed from the web site after thirty
days, unless persons filing the report have notified local law
enforcement that the person is still missing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state patrol shall establish an interface with local
law enforcement and the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs missing persons web site, the toll-free twenty-four hour
hotline, and national and other statewide missing persons systems or
clearinghouses.
Local law enforcement agencies shall file an official missing
persons report and enter biographical information into the state
missing persons computerized network within twelve hours after
notification of a missing person's report is received under this
chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 68.50.320 and 2001 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When a person reported missing has not been found within thirty
days of the report, or at any time the investigating agency suspects
criminal activity to be the basis of the victim being missing, the
sheriff, chief of police, county coroner or county medical examiner, or
other law enforcement authority initiating and conducting the
investigation for the missing person shall: (1) File a missing
person's report with the Washington state patrol missing and
unidentified persons unit; (2) initiate the collection of DNA samples
from the known missing person and their family members for nuclear and
mitochondrial DNA testing along with the necessary consent forms; and
(3) ask the missing person's family or next of kin to give written
consent to contact the dentist or dentists of the missing person and
request the person's dental records.
((When a person reported missing has not been found within thirty
days, the sheriff, chief of police, or other law enforcement authority
initiating and conducting the investigation for the missing person
shall confer with the county coroner or medical examiner prior to the
preparation of a missing person's report. After conferring with the
coroner or medical examiner, the sheriff, chief of police, or other law
enforcement authority shall submit a missing person's report and the
dental records received under this section to the dental identification
system of the state patrol identification and criminal history section
on forms supplied by the state patrol for such purpose.))
As soon as possible after collecting the DNA samples and obtaining
the dental records, the sheriff, chief of police, or other law
enforcement authority shall submit the DNA samples for nuclear DNA
testing to the Washington state patrol crime laboratory in their
jurisdiction. The DNA samples for mitochondrial DNA testing shall be
submitted to the federal bureau of investigation. Dental records shall
be submitted as soon as possible to the Washington state patrol missing
and unidentified persons unit.
The descriptive information from missing person's reports and
dental data submitted to the state patrol missing persons and
unidentified persons unit shall be recorded and maintained by the
Washington state patrol missing and unidentified persons unit in the
applicable dedicated missing person's data bases.
In cases where criminal activity is suspected, the state patrol
shall conduct nuclear DNA typing for entry into the state missing
person's DNA data base as soon as possible.
When a person reported missing has been found, the sheriff, chief
of police, coroner or medical examiner, or other law enforcement
authority shall report such information to the state patrol.
The dental identification system shall maintain a file of
information regarding persons reported to it as missing. The file
shall contain the information referred to in this section and such
other information as the state patrol finds relevant to assist in the
location of a missing person.
The files of the dental identification system shall, upon request,
be made available to law enforcement agencies attempting to locate
missing persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
Biological samples taken for a missing person's investigation under
RCW 68.50.320 shall be forwarded as appropriate to the federal bureau
of investigation upon receipt of the DNA samples and to the Washington
state patrol crime lab as soon as possible. The crime laboratory of
the state patrol will provide guidance to agencies regarding where
samples should be sent, conduct nuclear DNA testing of the biological
sample where appropriate and, in the event additional testing is
required, the mitochondrial DNA testing will be conducted through the
federal bureau of investigation. Priority for testing shall be given
to active criminal cases. If substantial delays in testing occur or
federal testing is no longer available, the legislature should provide
funding to implement mitochondrial technology in the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 4 of this act, referencing this act and section 4 of this act
by bill or chapter number and section number, is not provided by June
30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, section 4 of this act is
null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 5 of this act, referencing this act and section 5 of this act
by bill or chapter number and section number, is not provided by June
30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, section 5 of this act is
null and void.

--- END ---