BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.80.100 and 2002 c 354 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A collective bargaining agreement may contain a union security
provision requiring as a condition of employment the payment, no later
than the thirtieth day following the beginning of employment or July 1,
2004, whichever is later, of an agency shop fee to the employee
organization that is the exclusive bargaining representative for the
bargaining unit in which the employee is employed. The amount of the
fee shall be equal to the amount required to become a member in good
standing of the employee organization. Each employee organization
shall establish a procedure by which any employee so requesting may pay
a representation fee no greater than the part of the membership fee
that represents a pro rata share of expenditures for purposes germane
to the collective bargaining process, to contract administration, or to
pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of
employment.
(2) An employee who is covered by a union security provision and
who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide religious
tenets, or teachings of a church or religious body of which the
employee is a member, shall, as a condition of employment, make
payments to the employee organization, for purposes within the program
of the employee organization as designated by the employee that would
be in harmony with his or her individual conscience. The amount of the
payments shall be equal to the periodic dues and fees uniformly
required as a condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the
employee organization minus any included monthly premiums for insurance
programs sponsored by the employee organization. The employee shall
not be a member of the employee organization but is entitled to all the
representation rights of a member of the employee organization.
(3) ((Upon filing with the employer the written authorization of a
bargaining unit employee)) Under a union security provision negotiated
under this chapter, the employee organization that is the exclusive
bargaining representative of the bargaining unit shall have the
exclusive right to have deducted from the salary of the employee an
amount equal to the fees and dues uniformly required as a condition of
acquiring or retaining membership in the employee organization. The
fees and dues shall be deducted each pay period from the pay of all
bargaining unit employees ((who have given authorization for the
deduction)) and shall be transmitted by the employer as provided for by
agreement between the employer and the employee organization.
(4) Employee organizations that before July 1, 2004, were entitled
to the benefits of this section shall continue to be entitled to these
benefits.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.04.230 and 2002 c 61 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any official of the state authorized to disburse funds in payment
of salaries and wages of public officers or employees is authorized,
upon written request of the officer or employee, or under a union
security provision in a collective bargaining agreement, to deduct from
the salaries or wages of the officers or employees, the amount or
amounts of subscription payments, premiums, contributions, or
continuation thereof, for payment of the following:
(1) Credit union deductions: PROVIDED, That twenty-five or more
employees of a single state agency or a total of one hundred or more
state employees of several agencies have authorized such a deduction
for payment to the same credit union. An agency may, in its own
discretion, establish a minimum participation requirement of fewer than
twenty-five employees.
(2) Parking fee deductions: PROVIDED, That payment is made for
parking facilities furnished by the agency or by the department of
general administration.
(3) U.S. savings bond deductions: PROVIDED, That a person within
the particular agency shall be appointed to act as trustee. The
trustee will receive all contributions; purchase and deliver all bond
certificates; and keep such records and furnish such bond or security
as will render full accountability for all bond contributions.
(4) Board, lodging or uniform deductions when such board, lodging
and uniforms are furnished by the state, or deductions for academic
tuitions or fees or scholarship contributions payable to the employing
institution.
(5) Dues and other fees deductions: PROVIDED, That the deduction
is for payment of membership dues to any professional organization
formed primarily for public employees or college and university
professors: AND PROVIDED, FURTHER, That twenty-five or more employees
of a single state agency, or a total of one hundred or more state
employees of several agencies have authorized such a deduction for
payment to the same professional organization.
(6) Labor or employee organization dues may be deducted in the
event that a payroll deduction is not provided under a collective
bargaining agreement under the provisions of ((RCW 41.06.150)) chapter
41.80 RCW: PROVIDED, That twenty-five or more officers or employees of
a single agency, or a total of one hundred or more officers or
employees of several agencies have authorized such a deduction for
payment to the same labor or employee organization: PROVIDED, FURTHER,
That labor or employee organizations with five hundred or more members
in state government may have payroll deduction for employee benefit
programs.
(7) Insurance contributions to the authority for payment of
premiums under contracts authorized by the state health care authority.
However, enrollment or assignment by the state health care authority to
participate in a health care benefit plan, as required by RCW
41.05.065(5), shall authorize a payroll deduction of premium
contributions without a written consent under the terms and conditions
established by the public employees' benefits board.
(8) Deductions to a bank, savings bank, or savings and loan
association if (a) the bank, savings bank, or savings and loan
association is authorized to do business in this state; and (b) twenty-five or more employees of a single agency, or fewer, if a lesser number
is established by such agency, or a total of one hundred or more state
employees of several agencies have authorized a deduction for payment
to the same bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association.
Deductions from salaries and wages of public officers and employees
other than those enumerated in this section or by other law, may be
authorized by the director of financial management for purposes clearly
related to state employment or goals and objectives of the agency and
for plans authorized by the state health care authority.
(9) Contributions to the Washington state combined fund drive.
The authority to make deductions from the salaries and wages of
public officers and employees as provided for in this section shall be
in addition to such other authority as may be provided by law:
PROVIDED, That the state or any department, division, or separate
agency of the state shall not be liable to any insurance carrier or
contractor for the failure to make or transmit any such deduction.

--- END ---