BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for an employee or an employee organization,
directly or indirectly, to induce, instigate, encourage, authorize,
ratify, or participate in a strike.
(2) It is unlawful for an employer to authorize, consent to, or
condone a strike, to conduct a lockout, to pay or agree to pay an
employee for any day in which the employee participates in a strike, or
to pay or agree to pay any increase in compensation or benefits to an
employee in response to or as a result of a strike or any act that
violates subsection (1) of this section. It is unlawful for any
representative of the employer to authorize, ratify, or participate in
any violation of this subsection.
(3)(a) If a violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this section
occurs, or is imminently threatened, any citizen domiciled within the
jurisdictional boundaries of the state may petition the superior court
of the county in which the school district, or any part thereof, is
situated for an injunction restraining the violation or imminently
threatened violation. Rules of civil procedure regarding injunctions
apply to the action. However, the court shall grant a temporary
injunction if it appears to the court that a violation has occurred or
is imminently threatened; the plaintiff need not show that the
violation or threatened violation would greatly or irreparably injure
him or her. A bond may not be required of the plaintiff unless the
court determines that a bond is necessary in the public interest.
(b) Failure to comply with any temporary or permanent injunction
granted under this subsection is contempt of court as provided in
chapter 7.21 RCW. The court may impose a penalty of up to ten thousand
dollars for an employee organization or the employer, for each day
during which the failure to comply continues. The sanctions for an
employee found to be in contempt shall be as provided in chapter 7.21
RCW. An individual or an employee organization that makes an active
good faith effort to comply fully with the injunction shall not be
deemed to be in contempt.
(4) Nothing in this section prevents new or renewed bargaining and
agreement within the scope of bargaining, as defined by this chapter,
at any time. However, the parties may not agree to a provision
regarding suspension or modification of any court-ordered penalty
provided in this section and any such agreement is void.
(5) Each of the remedies and penalties provided by this section is
separate and several and is in addition to any other legal or equitable
remedy or penalty.
(6) In addition to the remedies and penalties provided by this
section, the successful litigant is entitled to recover costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in the litigation.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.59.020 and 1989 c 11 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) ((The term)) "Employee organization" means any organization,
union, association, agency, committee, council, or group of any kind in
which employees participate, and which exists for the purpose, in whole
or in part, of collective bargaining with employers.
(2) ((The term)) "Collective bargaining" or "bargaining" means the
performance of the mutual obligation of the representatives of the
employer and the exclusive bargaining representative to meet at
reasonable times in light of the time limitations of the budget-making
process, and to bargain in good faith in an effort to reach agreement
with respect to the wages, hours, and terms and conditions of
employment: PROVIDED, That prior law, practice or interpretation shall
be neither restrictive, expansive, nor determinative with respect to
the scope of bargaining. A written contract incorporating any
agreements reached shall be executed if requested by either party. The
obligation to bargain does not compel either party to agree to a
proposal or to make a concession.
In the event of a dispute between an employer and an exclusive
bargaining representative over the matters that are terms and
conditions of employment, the commission shall decide which item(s) are
mandatory subjects for bargaining and which item(s) are nonmandatory.
(3) ((The term)) "Commission" means the public employment relations
commission established by RCW 41.58.010.
(4) ((The terms)) "Employee" and "educational employee" means any
certificated employee of a school district, except:
(a) The chief executive officer of the employer.
(b) The chief administrative officers of the employer, which shall
mean the superintendent of the district, deputy superintendents,
administrative assistants to the superintendent, assistant
superintendents, and business manager. Title variation from all
positions enumerated in this subsection (4)(b) may be appealed to the
commission for determination of inclusion in, or exclusion from, the
term "educational employee".
(c) Confidential employees, which shall mean:
(i) Any person who participates directly on behalf of an employer
in the formulation of labor relations policy, the preparation for or
conduct of collective bargaining, or the administration of collective
bargaining agreements, except that the role of such person is not
merely routine or clerical in nature but calls for the consistent
exercise of independent judgment; and
(ii) Any person who assists and acts in a confidential capacity to
such person.
(d) Unless included within a bargaining unit pursuant to RCW
41.59.080, any supervisor, which means any employee having authority,
in the interest of an employer, to hire, assign, promote, transfer,
layoff, recall, suspend, discipline, or discharge other employees, or
to adjust their grievances, or to recommend effectively such action, if
in connection with the foregoing the exercise of such authority is not
merely routine or clerical in nature but calls for the consistent
exercise of independent judgment, and shall not include any persons
solely by reason of their membership on a faculty tenure or other
governance committee or body. The term "supervisor" shall include only
those employees who perform a preponderance of the above-specified acts
of authority.
(e) Unless included within a bargaining unit pursuant to RCW
41.59.080, principals and assistant principals in school districts.
(5) ((The term)) "Employer" means any school district.
(6) ((The term)) "Exclusive bargaining representative" means any
employee organization which has:
(a) Been selected or designated pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter as the representative of the employees in an appropriate
collective bargaining unit; or
(b) Prior to January 1, 1976, been recognized under a predecessor
statute as the representative of the employees in an appropriate
collective bargaining or negotiations unit.
(7) ((The term)) "Person" means one or more individuals,
organizations, unions, associations, partnerships, corporations,
boards, committees, commissions, agencies, or other entities, or their
representatives.
(8) ((The term)) "Nonsupervisory employee" means all educational
employees other than principals, assistant principals and supervisors.
(9) "Labor dispute" means a controversy concerning terms or
conditions of employment, or concerning the association or
representation of persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining,
changing, or seeking to arrange terms or conditions of their public
employment, regardless of whether the disputants in the controversy
stand in the proximate relation of employer and employee.
(10) "Lockout" means the refusal of the employer, in connection
with a labor dispute, to permit its employees to commence or continue
the full performance of their normal duties and services as employees.
(11) "Strike" means any concerted action by employees or employee
organizations, in connection with a labor dispute, to suspend, curtail,
interrupt, withhold, or otherwise fail or refuse to perform fully their
normal duties or services as employees.

--- END ---