BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.84.010 and 2003 c 111 s 2101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A county auditor who suspects a person of fraudulent voter
registration, vote tampering, or irregularities in voting shall
transmit his or her suspicions and observations without delay to the
canvassing board.
(2) The county auditor shall make a good faith effort to contact
the person in question without delay. If the county auditor is unable
to contact the person, or if, after contacting the person, the auditor
still suspects fraudulent voter registration, vote tampering, or
irregularities in voting, the auditor shall refer the issue to the
county prosecuting attorney to determine if further action is
warranted.
(3) When a complaint providing information concerning fraudulent
voter registration, vote tampering, or irregularities in voting is
presented to the office of the prosecuting attorney, that office shall
file charges, or issue a notice of civil infraction as provided in
chapter 7.80 RCW, in all cases where warranted.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.84.130 and 2003 c 111 s 2107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person ((who:
(1) Knowingly)) is guilty of a class C felony if he or she
knowingly:
(a) Provides false information on an application for voter
registration under any provision of this title;
(((2) Knowingly)) (b) Makes or attests to a false declaration as to
his or her qualifications as a voter;
(((3) Knowingly)) (c) Causes or permits himself or herself to be
registered using the name of another person;
(((4) Knowingly)) (d) Causes himself or herself to be registered
under two or more different names;
(((5) Knowingly)) (e) Causes himself or herself to be registered in
two or more counties;
(((6))) (f) Offers to pay another person to assist in registering
voters, where payment is based on a fixed amount of money per voter
registration;
(((7))) (g) Accepts payment for assisting in registering voters,
where payment is based on a fixed amount of money per voter
registration; ((or
(8) Knowingly)) (h) Causes any person to be registered or causes
any registration to be transferred or canceled except as authorized
under this title((,
is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021)); or
(i) Induces another to violate this section.
(2) Any person who recklessly violates this section is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor.
(3) Any person who negligently violates this section commits a
class 1 civil infraction, as provided in RCW 7.80.120.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.84.140 and 2005 c 246 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person ((who)) is guilty of a class C felony if he or she:
(a) Registers to vote and knows that he or she does not possess the
legal qualifications of a voter ((and who registers to vote is guilty
of a class C felony)); or
(b) Induces another to violate this section.
(2) A person commits a class 1 civil infraction, as provided in RCW
7.80.120, if he or she negligently violates this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.84.610 and 2003 c 111 s 2127 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor ((who)) if he or she
knowingly:
(((1))) (a) Deceives any voter in recording his or her vote by
providing incorrect or misleading recording information or by providing
faulty election equipment or records; ((or
(2))) (b) Records the vote of any voter in a manner other than as
designated by the voter((.
Such a gross misdemeanor is punishable to the same extent as a
gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021)); or
(c) Induces another to violate this section.
(2) A person commits a class 1 civil infraction, as provided in RCW
7.80.120, if he or she negligently violates this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.84.650 and 2005 c 243 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person who intentionally:
(a) Votes or attempts to vote in this state more than once at any
election((, or who intentionally));
(b) Votes or attempts to vote in both this state and another state
at any election; or
(c) Induces another to violate this section,
is guilty of a class C felony.
(2) Any person who recklessly or negligently violates this section
commits a class 1 civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.84.660 and 2003 c 111 s 2133 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person who:
(a) Knows that he or she does not possess the legal qualifications
of a voter and who votes at any primary ((or)), special, or general
election authorized by law to be held in this state for any office
whatever; or
(b) Induces another to violate this section,
is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.
(2) Any person who negligently violates this section commits a
class 1 civil infraction, as provided in RCW 7.80.120.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.84.670 and 2003 c 111 s 2134 and 2003 c 53 s 181
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a voter to:
(a) Show his or her ballot after it is marked to any person in such
a way as to reveal the contents thereof or the name of any candidate
for whom he or she has marked his or her vote;
(b) Receive a ballot from any person other than the election
officer having charge of the ballots;
(c) Vote or offer to vote any ballot except one that he or she has
received from the election officer having charge of the ballots;
(d) Place any mark upon his or her ballot by which it may afterward
be identified as the one voted by him or her;
(e) Fail to return to the election officers any ballot he or she
received from an election officer; or
(f) Induce another to violate this section.
(2) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor, punishable by a
fine not exceeding one hundred dollars, plus costs of prosecution.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.84.680 and 2003 c 111 s 2136 and 2003 c 53 s 179
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A person who:
(a) Willfully violates any provision of chapter 29A.40 RCW
regarding the assertion or declaration of qualifications to receive or
cast an absentee ballot ((or));
(b) Unlawfully casts a vote by absentee ballot; or
(c) Induces another to violate this section,
is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.
(2) A person who recklessly violates this section is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor.
(3) A person who negligently violates this section commits a class
1 civil infraction, as provided in RCW 7.80.120.
(4) Except as provided in this chapter, a person who willfully
violates any other provision of chapter 29A.40 RCW, or who induces
another to do so, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

--- END ---