BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Eligible electronic products" means the following product
categories:
(i) Central processing units whether sold alone or with
accessories;
(ii) Computer monitors;
(iii) Computer printers;
(iv) Laptop computers; and
(v) Televisions.
(b) "Eligible electronic products" does not mean devices that are:
(i) Parts of a motor vehicle, component parts of motor vehicles
assembled by or for a vehicle manufacturer or franchised dealer, or
replacement parts for use in motor vehicles;
(ii) Functionally or physically part of a larger piece of medical,
commercial, or industrial equipment primarily used for diagnosis,
control, or monitoring of a medical, industrial, or commercial process;
and
(iii) Contained within a clothes washer or dryer, refrigerator,
freezer, microwave oven, conventional oven or range, dishwasher, room
air conditioner, dehumidifier, or air purifier.
(2) "Manufacturer" means any person that manufactures an eligible
electronic product sold in Washington.
(3) "Seller" means a person that sells new eligible electronic
products to ultimate consumers in this state by any means.
(4) "Television" means a stand-alone display system that has a
viewable area greater than nine inches when measured diagonally, is
able to adhere to standard consumer video formats such as phase
alternate line, sequential color with memory, national television
systems committee, and high definition television, and has the
capability of selecting different broadcast channels and can support
sound capability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The electronic product stewardship account
is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
moneys collected by the department of revenue under section 4 of this
act after payment to the department of revenue for the costs associated
with collecting the fees under section 3 of this act must be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
the costs of the department of ecology to implement this chapter,
including educational programs. Only the director of ecology or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A seller shall collect an advance
recycling fee from the first in-state buyer of an eligible electronic
product as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The seller
shall designate the fee as an advance recycling fee for the purpose of
funding reuse and recycling of electronic products and shall indicate
that the fee is an advance recycling fee in a manner that is clearly
visible to the buyer of the product.
(2) The amount of the fee is:
(a) Six dollars for flat-screen devices;
(b) Eight dollars for computer monitors that are not flat-screen
devices; and
(c) Ten dollars for televisions.
(3) If, under a retailer return policy or warranty, a buyer returns
an eligible electronic product for which an advance recycling fee has
been paid to a seller, the fee shall be refunded to the buyer. The
seller may claim a refund or credit in the amount of the returned fee
from any future remittance to the department of revenue under section
4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Each seller of electronic products must
register with the department of revenue. Sellers must report to the
department of revenue on a quarterly basis the number of eligible
electronic products sold and remit the collected advance recycling
fees, less three percent for administrative costs.
(2) The department of revenue shall deposit moneys collected under
this section into the electronic product stewardship account created in
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department of ecology may adopt
administrative rules to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department of ecology shall select,
through a request for proposal process, an entity to manage the
electronic product stewardship program to collect, reuse, recycle, and
dispose of eligible electronic products.
(2) The department of ecology shall appoint an advisory committee
to assist in drafting the request for proposal. The advisory committee
shall consist of manufacturers and sellers of electronic products,
representatives of reuse and recycling businesses, and other parties
interested in and affected by this chapter.
(3) The request for proposal shall:
(a) Describe the duties of the selected entity;
(b) Set outcome criteria for collection, reuse, recycling, and
disposal of the materials;
(c) Describe a public education process;
(d) Set requirements for making the entire process accessible to
consumers;
(e) Ensure that all regions of the state are adequately served; and
(f) Include any other provisions the department of ecology
determines are necessary to implement this chapter.
(4) Upon selecting an entity, the department of ecology shall enter
into a contract with the entity that specifies:
(a) A methodology for selecting businesses or organizations that
receive contracts or grants from the selected entity. The methodology
must employ open and competitive procurement practices for selecting
collectors, transporters, recyclers, and processors and for setting
reimbursement rates;
(b) Methods to encourage collectors, transporters, recyclers, and
processors to coordinate their efforts in order to minimize costs;
(c) Qualification requirements that businesses or organizations
must meet in order to receive funds from the selected entity;
(d) Provisions addressing environmentally responsible management;
(e) Procedures for monitoring the performance of recyclers,
including periodic audits, to ensure that the outcome criteria in the
selected entity request for proposal are met; and
(f) An educational component that encourages the public to use the
services of eligible electronic product collectors and recyclers.
(5) The contract shall require that the selected entity make
reports to the department to identify:
(a) The total weight and number of eligible electronic products
collected during the preceding year, listed by category;
(b) The total weight and number of products reused, products
recycled, and products disposed of during the preceding year, listed by
category; and
(c) All collectors, transporters, recyclers, processors, and other
entities involved in the recycling of the products during the preceding
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A manufacturer shall provide the following:
(1) Assurances to the department of revenue that the manufacturer
has notified all sellers known to the manufacturer of eligible
electronic products made by the manufacturer that the advance recycling
fee must be collected from a buyer and remitted to the department;
(2) A list to the department of revenue of all sellers known to the
manufacturer of eligible electronic products made by the manufacturer;
(3) A report to the department of ecology, due on April 1st of each
year, containing a description of the efforts and successes in
implementing a product stewardship approach, including reducing the use
of hazardous materials and increasing the reuse and recycling of waste
electronics; and
(4) A visible label on each eligible electronic product sold in
Washington that designates the name of the manufacturer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department of ecology shall periodically
determine whether a nationally implemented reuse and recycling program
for eligible electronic products exists. If the department determines
that such a program exists and provides equal or greater opportunities
for the collection, reuse, and recycling of eligible electronic
products with equal or better environmentally responsible management
than this chapter, then the department shall submit proposed
legislation to repeal this chapter and adopt the nationally recognized
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The advisory committee appointed under
section 6 of this act shall review the advance recycling fees set in
section 3 of this act to determine whether a product category fee
reflects the cost of management of the products in that category. If
the fee collected for a product exceeds the cost of collecting,
transporting, recycling, and processing the product, the advisory
committee shall recommend an adjustment of the fee to the legislature.
(2) The advisory committee shall monitor the costs to the selected
entity of meeting the outcome criteria and providing the services
specified in the request for proposal under section 6 of this act. If
the advisory committee determines that the advance recycling fee is
inadequate to meet performance goals or to provide the specified
services, the advisory committee shall recommend an adjustment of the
fee to the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect January 1, 2007.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2005 c 424 s 18, 2005 c 402 s 8, 2005
c 215 s 10, and 2005 c 16 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers
conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the produce railcar
pool account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and
exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the
self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account,
the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission
Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing
commission class C purse fund account, the individual development
account program account, the Washington horse racing commission
operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing commission
operating account must be credited to the Washington horse racing
commission class C purse fund account), ((and)) the life sciences
discovery fund, and the electronic product stewardship account.
However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---