BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Cathode ray tube" or "CRT" means a vacuum tube or picture tube
used to convert an electronic signal into a visual image.
(3) "Consumer" means a person who purchases a covered electronic
device in a transaction that is a sale.
(4) "Computer" means an electronic, magnetic, optical,
electrochemical, or other high speed data processing device performing
logical, arithmetic, or storage function, and may include both a
computer central processing unit and a monitor. "Computer" does not
include an automated typewriter or typesetter, a portable hand held
calculator or device, or other similar device.
(5)(a) "Covered electronic device" means desktop/personal
computers, computer monitors, portable computers, desktop printers,
televisions, and video displays.
(b) "Covered electronic device" does not include:
(i) A covered electronic device that is a part of a motor vehicle,
or any component part of a motor vehicle assembled by, or for, a
vehicle manufacturer or franchised dealer, including replacement parts
for use in a motor vehicle;
(ii) A covered electronic device that is contained within, or a
part of a piece of industrial, commercial, or medical equipment,
including monitoring or control equipment; and
(iii) A covered electronic device that is contained within a
clothes washer, clothes dryer, refrigerator, refrigerator and freezer,
microwave oven, conventional oven or range, dishwasher, room air
conditioner, dehumidifier, or air purifier.
(6) "Not-for-profit corporation" or "corporation" means the
corporation established under section 6 of this act.
(7) "Manufacturer" means any person who, on or after the effective
date of this act, and irrespective of the selling technique used,
including by means of remote sale: (a) Manufactures electronic
equipment under its own brand; (b) manufactures electronic equipment
without affixing a brand; (c) resells equipment produced by other
suppliers under its own brand and label; or (d) imports or exports
electronic equipment into the United States.
(8) "Monitor" means a separate visual display component of a
computer, whether sold separately or together with a computer central
processing unit/computer box, and includes a cathode ray tube, liquid
crystal display, gas plasma, digital light processing, or other image
projection technology, greater than nine inches when measured
diagonally, its case, interior wires and circuitry, cable to the
central processing unit, and power cord.
(9) "Orphan products" are covered electronic devices for which (a)
the manufacturer no longer exists and a successor cannot be identified,
or (b) no manufacturer can be identified.
(10) "Portable computer" means a computer and video display that
can be carried on a person.
(11) "Product category" means computer monitors, portable
computers, and televisions.
(12) "Purchase" means the taking, by sale, of title or of the right
to use, in exchange for consideration.
(13) "Recycling" means any process by which covered electronic
devices that would otherwise become solid waste are collected,
separated, and processed to be returned to use in the form of raw
materials or products.
(14) "Retailer" means a person who owns or operates a business that
sells new covered electronic devices by any means to an end user.
(15) "Reuse" means any operation by which a covered electronic
device changes ownership to be used for the same purpose for which it
was originally put on the market without additional processing or
remanufacturing.
(16) "ROHS" means restrictions on hazardous substances directive
2002/95/EC of the European Union, adopted by the European parliament
and the council of the European Union on January 27, 2003.
(17) "Sell" or "sale" means any transfer for consideration of title
or of the right to use to a consumer, by lease, donation, or sales
contract, including, but not limited to, transactions conducted through
sales outlets, catalogs, or the internet, or any other, similar
electronic means, and excluding wholesale transactions with
distributors or dealers.
(18) "Television" means a stand-alone display system having a
viewable area greater than nine inches when measured diagonally and
able to adhere to standard consumer video formats such as PAL, SECAM,
NTSC and HDTV and has the capability of selecting different broadcast
channels and support sound capability.
(19) "Video display" means an output surface having a viewable area
greater than nine inches when measured diagonally that displays moving
graphical images or a visual representation of image sequences or
pictures, showing a number of quickly changing images on a screen in
fast succession to create the illusion of motion, including, if
applicable, a device that is an integral part of the display (and
cannot be easily removed from the display by the consumer) that
produces the moving image on the screen. Displays typically use a
cathode ray tube (CRT), liquid crystal display (LCD), gas plasma,
digital light processing, or other image projection technology.
(20) "Visible fee" means a fee that is added to a new product at
the point of purchase and is identified to the consumer separately from
the product price.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Beginning July 1, 2008, a covered electronic
device recycling fee is hereby imposed upon every sale in the state of
a new covered electronic device. The fee amount is established under
this section and may not exceed eight dollars.
(1) Every retailer that sells a new covered electronic device shall
collect at the time of sale the fee imposed under this section for each
new covered electronic device sold to an end user in this state.
(2) Each retailer shall transmit all fees collected under this
section, minus three percent of total fee revenues which may be
retained by the retailer for administrative costs associated with
collecting the fee, to the corporation on or before the last day of the
month following each quarter, accompanied by any forms prescribed by
the department. If a covered electronic device for which the fee has
been paid is returned to a retailer under warranty, the fee may be
refunded, and the retailer may deduct the amount of returned fee from
their remittance to the corporation.
(3) Funds collected by the corporation shall be used solely for the
purpose of funding collection, transportation, and recycling of covered
electronic devices, including the discretionary use of funds by the
corporation to promote the collection and recycling of covered
electronic devices and market development. Collected funds may not be
used to pay for activities associated with refurbishment or reuse of
covered electronic devices.
(4) The department shall establish separate fees for different
categories of products based on the estimated costs of collection,
transportation, and recycling for similar products. Fees collected on
one category of product shall not be used to subsidize the collection,
transportation, and recycling of different categories of covered
electronic devices.
(5) The fee imposed under this section shall be a visible fee at
the point of sale, and imposed after any state, local, or federal sales
tax.
(6) The corporation shall submit a plan to the department for
approval. The plan shall provide a funding methodology for collectors
and recyclers that utilizes competitive bidding to set reimbursement
rates. The development of the funding methodology shall be by rule and
must include at least two public hearings in different geographical
regions of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The corporation shall do the following:
(1) Establish procedures for the imposition of the visible fee on
covered electronic devices sold in this state;
(2) Beginning January 1, 2008, report to the legislature on an
annual basis. The purpose of the report is to update the legislature
regarding the progress on the implementation of this chapter, including
recommendations for changes to this chapter that will ensure the most
effective collection of electronic product recycling fees and whether
the cap on the fee imposed under section 3 of this act should be
adjusted;
(3) Working with the department, publish the schedule of fees for
covered electronic products based on product category by January 1,
2007, and every two years thereafter, taking into consideration the
following factors: (a) Current collection, transportation, and
recycling costs of covered electronic devices; (b) projected sales of
covered electronic devices; (c) projected volume of returns of covered
electronic devices to meet performance measures; and (d) actual
collection rates during the previous twelve-month period plus a yearly
growth projection. The corporation and the department may also take
into consideration any surplus funds carried forward and reduce the fee
when making fee amount determinations. Any changes in fee levels take
effect January 1st of the following year, provided the department
publishes the new schedule at least thirty days in advance;
(4) Organize and coordinate public outreach using existing funds
and resources appropriated to the corporation. The corporation shall
utilize local and/or regional authorities to reach local residents and
determine appropriate methods for education; and
(5) Achieve the mandated performance goals. The corporation must
establish the first year baseline performance goal as a measure of
pounds collected per capita, and project the performance goal for
subsequent years to meet the performance goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any party receiving funding under this
chapter is prohibited from charging fees for collecting and/or
recycling covered electronic devices, except under specified situations
to be addressed by the corporation in the development of its plan.
Such a situation may include when funding from the corporation does not
fully cover the net cost of collection and/or recycling of the covered
electronic devices. This chapter does not impact end-of-life fees in
effect for products not covered by the chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A not-for-profit corporation or corporation
is hereby established as a 501(c)(3) organization to administer
collected fee proceeds from the retail sale of covered electronic
devices under this chapter. The purpose of the corporation is to
collect fee proceeds from retailers, distribute fee proceeds, work with
the department in development and approval of an electronics collection
and recycling plan, provide reports on the program to the department
and the legislature, and make recommendations regarding the improvement
of the collection system. The corporation must submit a budget
annually to the department and utilize for administrative expenses no
more than five percent of the total funds collected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The corporation plan submitted must
incorporate, to the extent feasible, a geographic scope to serve all
consumers who are subject to the fee. The plan must also rely
primarily on existing collection and consolidation infrastructure
available for handling covered electronic devices.
(2) The corporation is hereby established to receive funds
collected by the retailers, provide a funding methodology for
reimbursement of collectors and recyclers, and to create a recycling
system that results in the environmentally sound and cost-efficient
collection, transportation, and recycling of covered electronic
devices.
(3)(a) The corporation shall utilize the funding for the sole
purpose of carrying out the duties of this chapter. In the event that
expenses from collection, transportation, and recycling activities
exceed revenues, the corporation is authorized to borrow up to ten
percent of the projected annual net fee funds from outside sources.
Borrowed funds must be repaid within two years.
(b) By April 1, 2007, the corporation shall submit a plan to the
department describing the details of the program. The plan shall be
resubmitted to the department every two years, and presumed approved if
the plan includes all of the following:
(i) An estimate of the weight of covered electronic devices
expected to be recycled to meet the performance measures;
(ii) Details on the funding methodology to be used to fund the
system;
(iii) Details on how the state's existing solid waste and recycling
collection infrastructure will be used to maximize product collection
activities;
(iv) A demonstration that the collection system will provide
collection opportunities across the state, covering all areas where
products are sold; and
(v) Procedures for monitoring the performance of product recyclers,
including periodic audits, to meet the environmentally sound management
requirements. Corporation activities may not interfere with or
supersede existing roles and responsibilities of applicable state
regulatory agencies.
(c)(i) Once the corporation plan has been submitted to and approved
by the department, the corporation may begin to disburse the funds and
implement the plan. If the department, upon review of the plan, finds
that it fails to meet any of the requirements, or that the plan cannot
reasonably be expected to achieve the performance measures, then the
department has the authority to suspend fee collection until the plan
has been modified and the modifications are approved by the department.
(ii) Once per calendar year, the corporation shall file a report
with the department that describes the implementation of the system
during the year. The report shall identify the total weight of covered
electronic devices received during the preceding year by product
category, together with the total weight of products recycled in each
product category. The report shall also include a list of all parties
participating in the system.
(d) The corporation must have a board of directors consisting of
eleven members appointed by the department. The board members are
appointed for two-year terms, except that for the initial term, three
members are appointed to one-year terms and four members are appointed
to two-year terms. The department shall appoint a replacement if any
vacancy occurs. The board must consist of representatives of the
following:
(i) Five manufacturers of covered electronic devices;
(ii) Two retailers of covered electronic devices;
(iii) One recycler of covered electronic devices;
(iv) One environmental not-for-profit organization with experience
in the recycling of covered electronic devices; and
(v) Two government representatives, including one from local
government.
(e) The board shall select the chief executive officer along with
the officers of the corporation. The chief executive officer and
officers run the day-to-day operations of the corporation and report to
the board at least once a year.
(4) The corporation shall encourage collectors, transporters, and
recyclers to coordinate their efforts in order to minimize costs. All
contracts issued by the corporation for recyclers must be competitively
bid and the contracts may not prohibit or affect any contract,
franchise, permit, or other arrangement regarding the collection or
recycling of other solid or household hazardous waste.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The corporation may not disburse funds
unless the plan demonstrates that the covered electronic devices
collected by the applicant will be recycled, refurbished, or disposed
in a manner that is in compliance with all applicable federal, state,
and local laws, regulations, and ordinances, and that the devices will
not be exported for disposal in a manner that poses a significant risk
to the public health or the environment.
(2) The department shall establish performance requirements for
recyclers eligible to receive funds from the corporation. The
department shall require recycling vendors, at a minimum, to
demonstrate compliance with the United States environmental protection
agency's guidance on environmentally sound management of electronic
products in addition to any other requirements mandated by state law.
(3) The department shall keep on file and update a list of
recyclers approved to recycle the covered electronic devices. A copy
of the list, including all changes to the list since the previous year,
shall be sent to the corporation annually for use in fulfilling its
requirements under section 6 of this act.
(4) The department shall immediately remove from the list any
recycler who, as the result of an audit by the corporation or the
department, has failed to meet the criteria established under
subsection (1) of this section, or who has been convicted of violating
any federal, state, or local statute related to the collection,
transport, or processing of covered electronic products.
(5) The corporation and its board are not financially liable for
any violation of a federal, state, or local law, by a recycler
appearing on the list created and updated by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Beginning July 1, 2007, a manufacturer
may not offer for sale in this state a covered electronic device unless
a visible, permanent label clearly identifying the brand or
manufacturer of that device is affixed to it.
(2) By April 1, 2007, manufacturers of covered electronic devices
must notify retailers or distributors that the covered electronic
device is subject to the advance recovery fee.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2007, whichever is later, it is unlawful for
a retailer to sell a covered electronic device in the state unless a
visible fee is collected and remitted back to the corporation.
(4) In the event that a company is found in violation of this
section, a civil penalty of twenty-five dollars per violation will be
assessed by the department. Penalty amounts and violations will be
calculated based on the number of individual units sold.
(5) Any fine collected under this chapter must be transferred to
the department. The money collected and distributed must be used to
offset enforcement expenses.
(6) Manufacturers and retailers, upon providing a sixty-day notice
to the attorney general and to a manufacturer or retailer who is not
collecting and remitting the fee, have the right to sue that
manufacturer or retailer for failure to collect and/or remit the fee to
the corporation. During the sixty-day notice period, if the attorney
general initiates action against the manufacturer or retailer, then the
ability of the manufacturer to sue is extinguished. Manufacturers and
retailers who successfully challenge a noncompliant manufacturer shall
be entitled to receive their litigation costs as well as double the
penalties assessed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The department, upon review of the
second annual report of the corporation, has the authority to ban the
disposal of covered electronic products in the state. When making that
determination, the department must find that the program has sufficient
infrastructure in place to handle the collection and processing of all
covered electronic products generated annually in the state. The
department must also take into account market development for uses of
the recycled materials, both within and outside the state, and other
factors prior to proposing a disposal ban.
(2) If the department does institute such a ban, the department has
the authority to fine anyone who knowingly disposes of a covered
product in violation of the ban twenty-five dollars per unauthorized
unit of product plus the cost of recycling that product.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The corporation shall establish a market
development program to enhance existing, or develop new, end markets
for remanufactured products and recycled materials. No more than one
percent of the funds may be spent on this program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Any state department or local
government that purchases or leases equipment, materials, or supplies
shall require each prospective bidder, to certify that it, and its
agents, subsidiaries, partners, joint ventures, and subcontractors for
the procurement, are in compliance with this chapter. Failure to
provide the certification renders the prospective bidder and its
agents, subsidiaries, partners, joint ventures, and subcontractors
ineligible to bid on the procurement.
(2) Any person awarded a contract by a state department or local
government that is found to be in violation of this chapter is subject
to the following sanctions:
(a) The contract must be voided by the entity to which the
equipment, materials, or supplies were provided;
(b) The contractor is ineligible to bid on any contract for a
period of three years; and
(c) If the attorney general establishes that a contractor as a
result of violating this chapter obtained any money, property, or
benefit, the court may, in addition to any other remedy, order the
disgorgement of the unlawfully obtained money, property, or benefit in
the interest of justice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The fifth year collection goal is one
and three-quarters pounds per capita of covered electronic devices.
After the fifth year or upon achievement of this collection goal, the
department, working with the corporation, will establish the
performance goals as measure of pounds collected per capita for future
years.
(2) In establishing annual performance goals for the first five
years, the corporation shall take into consideration the time required
for ramping up the required infrastructure for such a system. If at
any point following enactment of this chapter the corporation concludes
that the one and three-quarters pounds per capita goal is not
practicable, the corporation shall report such a finding to the
department and the legislature and recommend that the goal be adjusted.
(3) The corporation is responsible for achieving the collection
goal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) Manufacturers are responsible for all
of the following:
(a) Collecting and remitting the advanced recycling fee on all
direct sales to final customers in the state, including telephone,
catalogue, and internet sales;
(b) Making information available to consumers describing where and
how to return, recycle, and dispose of the covered electronic products,
through the use of product operation manuals, industry or manufacturer
web sites, product labels, packaging inserts, or toll-free telephone
numbers;
(c) Providing recyclers with information on the type and location
of hazardous substances in the covered products.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2007, and annually thereafter, manufacturers
must submit a report to the department on their environmental
improvements. As a minimum, the report shall contain the following:
(a) The estimated sale of the covered products within the state in
the past year;
(b) A baseline, or set of baselines that shows the total estimated
amounts of lead, mercury, hexavalent chrome, and cadmium utilized in
ROHS exempt applications in products sold within the state in the
previous year;
(c) A baseline, or set of baselines that shows the total estimated
amounts of recyclable materials contained in covered electronic
products sold within the state in the previous year, and increases the
use of those materials over previous years; and
(d) A baseline, or set of baselines that describes any efforts to
design covered electronic products for recycling and goals or plans for
further increasing design for recycling.
(3) In lieu of an individual report, manufacturers may submit the
information in a collated report submitted via a trade association
provided that information about an individual company can be made
available to the state upon written request by the department. The
department can only make such a request for auditing purposes and not
more than once during a five-year period. The state may not make
public any confidential business information claimed by the
manufacturer in the report.
(4) A report submitted to another state or to the federal
government that contains the same information as required in this
section may be accepted by the department in lieu of a separate report
for the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The department may adopt rules for the
purpose of administering this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 During 2014, the department shall convene
a stakeholder group to evaluate the program and make recommendations to
the legislature by January 1, 2015, as to whether to:
(1) Continue the advanced recycling fee;
(2) Implement another financing alternative; or
(3) Determine that no outside financing mechanism is required to
ensure that the system is financially solvent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 15 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---