BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2004 c 21 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsections (3) and (4)
of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as
defined in subsection (5) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (5) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2005 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year and the amounts determined under subsection (4) of
this section, including allocations for compensation increases, plus
the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per full
time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) For levy collections in calendar years 2005 through ((2007))
2011, in addition to the allocations included under subsection (3)(a)
through (c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include
the following:
(a) The difference between the allocation the district would have
received in the current school year had RCW 84.52.068 not been amended
by chapter 19, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocation the
district received in the current school year pursuant to RCW 84.52.068.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offset the
amount added to a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection
(4)(a) by any additional per student allocations included in a
district's levy base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the
people subsequent to June 10, 2004; and
(b) The difference between the allocations the district would have
received the prior school year had RCW 28A.400.205 not been amended by
chapter 20, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocations the district
actually received the prior school year pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offset the
amount added to a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection
(4)(b) by any additional salary increase allocations included in a
district's levy base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the
people subsequent to June 10, 2004.
(5) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-two
percent in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year
thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the grandfathered
percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (6) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(6) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsections (3) and
(4) of this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment
changes, compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b)
that are or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year" means the
most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies
are to be collected.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "current school year" means
the year immediately following the prior school year.
(9) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

Sec. 2 2004 c 21 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
This act expires January 1, ((2008)) 2012.

--- END ---