BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 There is a statewide interest in maintaining
coordinated planning as called for in the legislative findings of the
growth management act, RCW 36.70A.010. It is the intent of the
legislature that smaller, slower-growing counties and cities be
provided with flexibility in meeting the requirements to review local
plans and development regulations in RCW 36.70A.130, while ensuring
coordination and consistency with the plans of neighboring cities and
counties.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.130 and 2005 c 423 s 6 and 2005 c 294 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
shall be subject to continuing review and evaluation by the county or
city that adopted them. Except as otherwise provided, a county or city
shall take legislative action to review and, if needed, revise its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure the
plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter
according to the time periods specified in subsection (4) of this
section.
(b) Except as otherwise provided, a county or city not planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if needed, revise
its policies and development regulations regarding critical areas and
natural resource lands adopted according to this chapter to ensure
these policies and regulations comply with the requirements of this
chapter according to the time periods specified in subsection (4) of
this section. Legislative action means the adoption of a resolution or
ordinance following notice and a public hearing indicating at a
minimum, a finding that a review and evaluation has occurred and
identifying the revisions made, or that a revision was not needed and
the reasons therefor.
(c) The review and evaluation required by this subsection may be
combined with the review required by subsection (3) of this section.
The review and evaluation required by this subsection shall include,
but is not limited to, consideration of critical area ordinances and,
if planning under RCW 36.70A.040, an analysis of the population
allocated to a city or county from the most recent ten-year population
forecast by the office of financial management.
(d) Any amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan
shall conform to this chapter. Any amendment of or revision to
development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan.
(2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate
to the public a public participation program consistent with RCW
36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140 that identifies procedures and schedules
whereby updates, proposed amendments, or revisions of the comprehensive
plan are considered by the governing body of the county or city no more
frequently than once every year. "Updates" means to review and revise,
if needed, according to subsection (1) of this section, and the time
periods specified in subsection (4) of this section or in accordance
with the provisions of subsection (8) of this section. Amendments may
be considered more frequently than once per year under the following
circumstances:
(i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan that does not modify the
comprehensive plan policies and designations applicable to the subarea;
(ii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under
the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW;
(iii) The amendment of the capital facilities element of a
comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the adoption or
amendment of a county or city budget; and
(iv) Until June 30, 2006, the designation of recreational lands
under RCW 36.70A.1701. A county amending its comprehensive plan
pursuant to this subsection (2)(a)(iv) may not do so more frequently
than every eighteen months.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all
proposals shall be considered by the governing body concurrently so the
cumulative effect of the various proposals can be ascertained.
However, after appropriate public participation a county or city may
adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform
with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board
or with the court.
(3)(a) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW
36.70A.110 shall review, at least every ten years, its designated urban
growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the
incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In
conjunction with this review by the county, each city located within an
urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within its
boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within
the county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions
of the urban growth areas.
(b) The county comprehensive plan designating urban growth areas,
and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by the
comprehensive plans of the county and each city located within the
urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth
projected to occur in the county for the succeeding twenty-year period.
The review required by this subsection may be combined with the review
and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.
(4) The department shall establish a schedule for counties and
cities to take action to review and, if needed, revise their
comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and
regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter. Except as
provided in subsection (8) of this section, the schedule established by
the department shall provide for the reviews and evaluations to be
completed as follows:
(a) On or before December 1, 2004, and every seven years
thereafter, for Clallam, Clark, Jefferson, King, Kitsap, Pierce,
Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those
counties;
(b) On or before December 1, 2005, and every seven years
thereafter, for Cowlitz, Island, Lewis, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and
Skamania counties and the cities within those counties;
(c) On or before December 1, 2006, and every seven years
thereafter, for Benton, Chelan, Douglas, Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and
Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and
(d) On or before December 1, 2007, and every seven years
thereafter, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield,
Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille,
Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the cities
within those counties.
(5)(a) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from
conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before
the time limits established in subsection (4) of this section.
Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be eligible
for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.
(b) State agencies are encouraged to provide technical assistance
to the counties and cities in the review of critical area ordinances,
comprehensive plans, and development regulations.
(6) A county or city subject to the time periods in subsection
(4)(a) of this section that, pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the
county or city establishing a schedule for periodic review of its
comprehensive plan and development regulations, has conducted a review
and evaluation of its comprehensive plan and development regulations
and, on or after January 1, 2001, has taken action in response to that
review and evaluation shall be deemed to have conducted the first
review required by subsection (4)(a) of this section. Subsequent
review and evaluation by the county or city of its comprehensive plan
and development regulations shall be conducted in accordance with the
time periods established under subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(7) The requirements imposed on counties and cities under this
section shall be considered "requirements of this chapter" under the
terms of RCW 36.70A.040(1). Only those counties and cities in
compliance with the schedules in this section and those counties and
cities demonstrating substantial progress towards compliance with the
schedules in this section for development regulations that protect
critical areas may receive grants, loans, pledges, or financial
guarantees from those accounts established in RCW 43.155.050 and
70.146.030. A county or city that is fewer than twelve months out of
compliance with the schedules in this section for development
regulations that protect critical areas is deemed to be making
substantial progress towards compliance. Only those counties and
cities in compliance with the schedules in this section may receive
preference for grants or loans subject to the provisions of RCW
43.17.250.
(8)(a) Except as otherwise provided, counties and cities required
to satisfy the requirements of this section according to the schedule
established by subsection (4)(b) through (d) of this section may comply
with the requirements of this section for development regulations that
protect critical areas one year after the dates established in
subsection (4)(b) through (d) of this section.
(b)(i) Counties required to satisfy the requirements of this
section according to the schedule established by subsection (4)(b)
through (d) of this section may comply with the requirements of this
section for comprehensive plans and development regulations at any time
three or fewer years after the applicable dates established in
subsection (4)(b) through (d) of this section. Counties exercising
this extension must have:
(A) A population of less than fifty thousand; and
(B) Had a population increase of seventeen percent or less in the
ten years preceding the applicable date established in subsection
(4)(b) through (d) of this section.
(ii) Population eligibility determinations for purposes of (b)(i)
of this subsection shall be made using the population of the county on
the applicable date established in subsection (4)(b) through (d) of
this section.
(c)(i) Cities required to satisfy the requirements of this section
according to the schedule established by subsection (4)(b) through (d)
of this section may comply with the requirements of this section for
comprehensive plans and development regulations at any time three or
fewer years after the applicable dates established in subsection (4)(b)
through (d) of this section. Cities exercising this extension must
have a population of less than five thousand and had a population
increase of one hundred or fewer persons, or seventeen percent or less,
in the ten years preceding the applicable date established in
subsection (4)(b) through (d) of this section.
(ii) Population eligibility determinations for purposes of (c)(i)
of this subsection shall be made using the population of the city on
the applicable date established in subsection (4)(b) through (d) of
this section.
(d) Counties and cities complying with the ((requirements of this
section one year after the dates established in subsection (4)(b)
through (d) of this section for development regulations that protect
critical areas shall be deemed in)) extension provisions of (a), (b),
or (c) of this subsection that satisfy the requirements of those
provisions within the applicable extension periods may not be deemed
out of compliance with the requirements of this section.
(((c) This)) (e) Subsection (8)(a) of this section applies only to
the counties and cities specified in subsection (4)(b) through (d) of
this section, and only to the requirements of this section for
development regulations that protect critical areas that must be
satisfied by December 1, 2005, December 1, 2006, ((and)) or December 1,
2007. The extension provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply
to a jurisdiction exercising an extension under (b) or (c) of this
subsection.
(9) Notwithstanding ((subsection (8) of this section and)) the
substantial progress provisions of subsections (7) and (10) of this
section, only those counties and cities complying with the schedules in
subsections (4) and (8) of this section may receive preferences for
grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees from those accounts
established in RCW 43.155.050 and 70.146.030.
(10) Until December 1, 2005, and notwithstanding subsection (7) of
this section, a county or city subject to the time periods in
subsection (4)(a) of this section demonstrating substantial progress
towards compliance with the schedules in this section for its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations may receive
grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees from those accounts
established in RCW 43.155.050 and 70.146.030. A county or city that is
fewer than twelve months out of compliance with the schedules in this
section for its comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
is deemed to be making substantial progress towards compliance.

--- END ---