BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes the vital importance to the state's
economic prosperity and the economic benefit of placing an emphasis on
enrolling and conferring degrees upon students in the fields of
engineering, technology, biotechnology, science, computer science, and
mathematics.
(2) The legislature has significant concerns that other countries
are outpacing the United States in graduating qualified engineers, and
that major corporations within Washington state are searching out-of-state and even outside the United States to find the qualified and
trained employees they need.
(3) Data compiled by the technology alliance shows that Washington
state ranks thirty-fourth among the fifty states in the percentage of
residents who have earned a science or engineering degree, per capita.
(4) Data collected by the office of financial management indicates
that between the academic years of 1993-94 and 2003-04 at public four-year institutions of higher education in Washington state:
(a) There was a twelve percent decline in the number of full-time
equivalents enrolled in the fields of engineering and related
technologies; and
(b) There was nearly a nine percent decline in the number of
bachelor's degrees conferred in the fields of engineering and related
technologies.
(5) Data collected by the office of financial management also shows
that for the 2003-04 academic year, only four percent of all full-time
equivalents were enrolled in engineering and related technologies and
just two percent of all full-time equivalents were enrolled in computer
science studies at public four-year institutions of higher education in
the state.
(6) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to promote
increased access, delivery models, enrollment slots, and degree
opportunities in the fields of engineering, technology, biotechnology,
sciences, computer science, and mathematics. It is recognized that
these areas of study and training are integrally linked to ensuring
that Washington state's economy can compete nationally and globally in
the twenty-first century marketplace. It is also recognized that
community colleges play a unique role in supporting degree attainment
in the fields of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics
through the development of transferable curricula and the maintenance
of viable articulation agreements with both public and private
universities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A state emphasis is established for institutions of higher
education, including community colleges, to ensure that growing numbers
of enrollments and degrees are secured in the fields of engineering,
technology, biotechnology, sciences, computer science, and mathematics.
(2) The legislature understands and recognizes that the demands of
the economic marketplace and the desires of students are not always on
parallel tracks. Therefore, institutions of higher education shall be
provided with a three-year period in which to establish student demand
for programs in the fields of engineering, technology, biotechnology,
sciences, computer science, and mathematics.
(3) While it is understood that these areas of emphasis should not
be the sole focus of institutions of higher education, steady progress
in these areas shall occur. The higher education coordinating board
shall track and report progress in the fields of engineering,
technology, biotechnology, sciences, computer science, and mathematics
including, but not limited to, the following information:
(a) The number of students enrolled in these fields on an annual
basis;
(b) The number of associate, bachelor's, and master's degrees
conferred in these fields on an annual basis;
(c) The amount of expenditures in enrollment and degree programs in
these fields; and
(d) The number and type of public-private partnerships established
relating to these fields among institutions of higher education,
including community colleges, and leading corporations in Washington
state.
(4) Institutions of higher education, including community colleges,
shall be provided discretion and flexibility in achieving the
objectives under this section, and are strongly urged to consider
program growth in areas of the state that exhibit a high concentration
of aerospace, biotechnology, and technology industrial presence.

--- END ---