BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts received by a business that is located on a parcel of real
property any portion of which is less than five hundred feet from the
right of way of Martin Luther King Jr. Way between McClellan Street and
Boeing Access Road. As used in this section, "parcel of real property"
has the meaning given in RCW 84.04.130.
(2) This section expires on the earlier of:
(a) The first day of the month that is at least six months after
the date the department of revenue certifies that light rail
construction is substantially complete near businesses described in
subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An amount equal to the total of deductions claimed under
section 1 of this act in the previous month shall be deducted from the
amount to be distributed under RCW 81.104.170 to a regional transit
authority and deposited to the state general fund.
(2) This section expires when section 1 of this act expires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---