BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.165 and 1999 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state department of transportation and the local
authorities are authorized to reserve all or any portion of any highway
under their respective jurisdictions, including any designated lane or
ramp, for the exclusive or preferential use of public transportation
vehicles or private motor vehicles carrying no fewer than a specified
number of passengers when such limitation will increase the efficient
utilization of the highway or will aid in the conservation of energy
resources. Regulations authorizing such exclusive or preferential use
of a highway facility may be declared to be effective ((at all times or
at specified times of day or on specified days)) only during the
following times on Monday through Friday:
(a) 6:00 a.m. to 9:00 a.m.;
(b) 3:00 p.m. to 7:00 p.m.
(2) Violation of a restriction of highway usage prescribed by the
appropriate authority under this section is a traffic infraction.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.52.025 and 1974 ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Highway authorities of the state, counties, and incorporated cities
and towns, in addition to the specific powers granted in this chapter,
shall also have, and may exercise, relative to limited access
facilities, any and all additional authority, now or hereafter vested
in them relative to highways or streets within their respective
jurisdictions, and may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the use of such
limited access facilities by various classes of vehicles or traffic.
Such highway authorities may reserve any limited access facility or
portions thereof, including designated lanes or ramps for the exclusive
or preferential use of public transportation vehicles, privately owned
buses, or private motor vehicles carrying not less than a specified
number of passengers when such limitation will increase the efficient
utilization of the highway facility or will aid in the conservation of
energy resources. Regulations authorizing such exclusive or
preferential use of a highway facility may be declared to be effective
((at all time or at specified times of day or on specified days)) only
during the following times on Monday through Friday:
(1) 6:00 a.m. to 9:00 a.m.;
(2) 3:00 p.m. to 7:00 p.m.

--- END ---