BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person convicted of taking a motor vehicle without permission
in the first degree shall be sentenced to the following minimums:
(a) For an offender with no prior convictions for taking a motor
vehicle without permission in the first or second degree:
(i) A term of total confinement of not less than two hundred days;
(ii) A term of community custody of not less than ninety days;
(iii) A term of community restitution of not less than forty-five
hours; and
(iv) A fine of not less than one hundred fifty dollars.
(b) For an offender with one prior conviction for taking a motor
vehicle without permission in the first or second degree:
(i) A term of total confinement of not less than three hundred
eighty days;
(ii) A term of community custody of not less than one hundred
twenty days;
(iii) A term of community restitution of not less than sixty hours;
and
(iv) A fine of not less than two hundred dollars.
(c) For an offender with two or more prior convictions for taking
a motor vehicle without permission in the first or second degree:
(i) A term of total confinement of not less than four hundred
eighty days;
(ii) A term of community custody of not less than one hundred
eighty days;
(iii) A term of community restitution of not less than ninety
hours; and
(iv) A fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars.
(2) A person convicted of taking a motor vehicle without permission
in the second degree shall be sentenced to the following minimums:
(a) For an offender with no prior convictions for taking a motor
vehicle without permission in the first or second degree:
(i) A term of total confinement of not less than twenty days;
(ii) A term of community custody of not less than sixty days;
(iii) A term of community restitution of not less than thirty
hours; and
(iv) A fine of not less than one hundred dollars.
(b) For an offender with one prior conviction for taking a motor
vehicle without permission in the first or second degree:
(i) A term of total confinement of not less than thirty days;
(ii) A term of community custody of not less than ninety days;
(iii) A term of community restitution of not less than forty-five
hours; and
(iv) A fine of not less than one hundred fifty dollars.
(c) For an offender with two or more prior convictions for taking
a motor vehicle without permission in the first or second degree:
(i) A term of total confinement of not less than eighty days;
(ii) A term of community custody of not less than one hundred
twenty days;
(iii) A term of community restitution of not less than sixty hours;
and
(iv) A fine of not less than two hundred dollars.
(3) A minimum term of total confinement imposed under this section
may not be varied or modified under RCW 9.94A.535. During a minimum
term of total confinement, no offender subject to the provisions of
this section is eligible for community custody, earned release time,
furlough, home detention, partial confinement, work crew, work release,
or any other form of early release authorized under RCW 9.94A.728, or
any other form of authorized leave of absence from the correctional
facility while not in the direct custody of a corrections officer. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply: (a) In the case of an
offender in need of emergency medical treatment; (b) for the purpose of
commitment to an inpatient treatment facility in the case of an
offender convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree; or (c) for
an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW
9.94A.728(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person who makes or mends, or causes to be made or mended,
or has in his or her possession, any shaved key commonly used for the
commission of taking a motor vehicle without permission, shall be
guilty of possession of shaved keys.
(2) Possession of a shaved key is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.505 and 2002 c 290 s 17, 2002 c 289 s 6, and
2002 c 175 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) When a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose
punishment as provided in this chapter.
(2)(a) The court shall impose a sentence as provided in the
following sections and as applicable in the case:
(i) Unless another term of confinement applies, the court shall
impose a sentence within the standard sentence range established in RCW
9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517;
(ii) RCW 9.94A.700 and 9.94A.705, relating to community placement;
(iii) RCW 9.94A.710 and 9.94A.715, relating to community custody;
(iv) RCW 9.94A.545, relating to community custody for offenders
whose term of confinement is one year or less;
(v) RCW 9.94A.570, relating to persistent offenders;
(vi) RCW 9.94A.540, relating to mandatory minimum terms;
(vii) RCW 9.94A.650, relating to the first-time offender waiver;
(viii) RCW 9.94A.660, relating to the drug offender sentencing
alternative;
(ix) RCW 9.94A.670, relating to the special sex offender sentencing
alternative;
(x) RCW 9.94A.712, relating to certain sex offenses;
(xi) RCW 9.94A.535, relating to exceptional sentences;
(xii) RCW 9.94A.589, relating to consecutive and concurrent
sentences;
(xiii) Section 1 of this act, relating to minimum sentences for
taking a motor vehicle without permission in the first and second
degrees.
(b) If a standard sentence range has not been established for the
offender's crime, the court shall impose a determinate sentence which
may include not more than one year of confinement; community
restitution work; until July 1, 2000, a term of community supervision
not to exceed one year and on and after July 1, 2000, a term of
community custody not to exceed one year, subject to conditions and
sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.710 (2) and (3); and/or other
legal financial obligations. The court may impose a sentence which
provides more than one year of confinement if the court finds reasons
justifying an exceptional sentence as provided in RCW 9.94A.535.
(3) If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty
days or less, the court may, in its discretion, specify that the
sentence be served on consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence
requiring more than thirty days of confinement shall be served on
consecutive days. Local jail administrators may schedule court-ordered
intermittent sentences as space permits.
(4) If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial
obligation, it shall be imposed as provided in RCW 9.94A.750,
9.94A.753, 9.94A.760, and 43.43.7541.
(5) Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.750(4) and 9.94A.753(4), a
court may not impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or
community supervision, community placement, or community custody which
exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as provided in chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(6) The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all
confinement time served before the sentencing if that confinement was
solely in regard to the offense for which the offender is being
sentenced.
(7) The court shall order restitution as provided in RCW 9.94A.750
and 9.94A.753.
(8) As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce
crime-related prohibitions and affirmative conditions as provided in
this chapter.
(9) The court may order an offender whose sentence includes
community placement or community supervision to undergo a mental status
evaluation and to participate in available outpatient mental health
treatment, if the court finds that reasonable grounds exist to believe
that the offender is a mentally ill person as defined in RCW 71.24.025,
and that this condition is likely to have influenced the offense. An
order requiring mental status evaluation or treatment must be based on
a presentence report and, if applicable, mental status evaluations that
have been filed with the court to determine the offender's competency
or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may order
additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.
(10) In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require
the offender to serve the partial confinement in work release, in a
program of home detention, on work crew, or in a combined program of
work crew and home detention.
(11) In sentencing an offender convicted of a crime of domestic
violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, if the offender has a minor
child, or if the victim of the offense for which the offender was
convicted has a minor child, the court may, as part of any term of
community supervision, community placement, or community custody, order
the offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator program
approved under RCW 26.50.150.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.545 and 2003 c 379 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 9.94A.650 and section 1 of this act, on
all sentences of confinement for one year or less, in which the
offender is convicted of a sex offense, a violent offense, a crime
against a person under RCW 9.94A.411, or felony violation of chapter
69.50 or 69.52 RCW or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit
such a crime, the court may impose up to one year of community custody,
subject to conditions and sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.715 and
9.94A.720. An offender shall be on community custody as of the date of
sentencing. However, during the time for which the offender is in
total or partial confinement pursuant to the sentence or a violation of
the sentence, the period of community custody shall toll.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The sum of seven million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007, from the state general fund to the Washington state
patrol to establish and operate three regional auto theft task forces
in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The sum of three million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007, from the state general fund to the Washington state
patrol to establish and operate proaction auto theft swat units in
Washington.

--- END ---