BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that in the global
economy of the twenty-first century, all students, regardless of their
own background, must be prepared to interact successfully with people
from a wide variety of cultures.
(2) The legislature also finds that results from the Washington
assessment of student learning show a persistent pattern of
underachievement by many students of color, even though it is clear
that these students are innately no less intelligent or capable than
their peers. While there are multiple causes for this pattern, one
cause may be the lack of a curriculum that accurately includes the
history, contributions, and contemporary experiences of people of
color. The absence of such a curriculum may lead students of color to
conclude that school is not relevant to their lives and that the
education system does not value them.
(3) The absence of curriculum that accurately includes diverse
cultures also constricts the ability of all students to succeed in the
culturally diverse world of the twenty-first century.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature that every student in
Washington should see his or her culture fully and accurately included
in the public school curriculum in every grade, and that all students
should learn about the cultures and histories of all of their peers in
the state and the world. To make progress toward achieving this goal,
the legislature requires additional information about the degree to
which school districts have such a curriculum and what barriers may
impede them from adopting and using such a curriculum.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The college of education at the
University of Washington shall conduct a review of the curriculum
offered by public schools in Washington. The review shall examine the
degree to which the curriculum accurately includes the history,
contributions, and contemporary experiences of people of color. The
review shall also identify barriers that may impede schools and school
districts from successfully adopting and using such a curriculum.
(2) The college shall submit a report to the education committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2007, including findings and
recommendations for strategies and policies that could improve the
public school curriculum.

--- END ---