BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, acting alone or with
others, to threaten to use a firearm against any persons on public or
private elementary or secondary school premises, school-provided
transportation, or areas of facilities while being used exclusively by
public or private schools, who are engaged in the peaceful discharge of
their studies, duties, or activities; or to communicate or repeat any
information concerning such a threatened use of a firearm, knowing such
information to be false and with intent to alarm the person or persons
to whom the information is communicated or repeated.
(2) It shall not be a defense to any prosecution under this section
that the threatened use of a firearm was a hoax.
(3) A violation of this section is a class B felony punishable
according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

--- END ---