BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this section, an eligible
person is allowed a credit against the tax due. The credit is equal to
one thousand dollars per year for each qualified person rehired after
the effective date of this act and reemployed for three hundred sixty-five consecutive days.
(2) Credits may not be claimed for any rehiring prior to the
effective date of this act. The credit is authorized for the rehiring
of a qualified person on or after the effective date of this act.
(3) A credit is earned for the calendar year following the rehire
of a qualified person. The credit may be accrued and carried over
until it is used. No refunds may be granted for credits under this
section.
(4) If at any time the department finds that a qualified person is
not reemployed for at least three hundred sixty-five consecutive days
or is not in an employment position equal or better to his or her prior
employment position, the amount of taxes for which a credit has been
claimed is immediately due and payable. The department shall assess
interest, but not penalties, on the credited taxes for which the person
is not eligible. The interest shall be assessed at the rate provided
for the delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW and shall
accrue until the taxes against which the credit has been claimed are
repaid.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Active duty" means full-time duty in the national guard and
deployment internationally or domestically for at least one year.
(b) "Eligible person" means a person as defined in RCW 82.04.030:
(i) Who has fifty or less employees;
(ii) Who files electronically with the department; and
(iii)(A) Who rehires a returning active duty national guard member
to an employment position equal to or better than the employment
position that the returning active duty national guard member held
prior to his or her active duty employment; and (B) who continues to
employ the returning active duty national guard member for three
hundred sixty-five consecutive days.
(c) "Qualified person" means a person who was employed by an
eligible person prior to being on active duty and is rehired into an
equal or better employment position by the eligible person immediately
after his or her active duty ends.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act shall be known as the "patriotic
employer act."

--- END ---