BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.020 and 2005 c 445 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Actual malice" means to act with knowledge of falsity or with
reckless disregard as to truth or falsity.
(2) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(3) "Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized
by a candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges
have been filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf
of the candidate or public official.
(4) "Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
29A.04.091, or any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition
proposed to be submitted to the voters of the state or any municipal
corporation, political subdivision, or other voting constituency from
and after the time when the proposition has been initially filed with
the appropriate election officer of that constituency prior to its
circulation for signatures.
(5) "Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic,
or monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary,
financial, economic, or monetary disadvantage.
(6) "Bona fide political party" means:
(a) An organization that has filed a valid certificate of
nomination with the secretary of state under chapter 29A.20 RCW;
(b) The governing body of the state organization of a major
political party, as defined in RCW 29A.04.086, that is the body
authorized by the charter or bylaws of the party to exercise authority
on behalf of the state party; or
(c) The county central committee or legislative district committee
of a major political party. There may be only one legislative district
committee for each party in each legislative district.
(7) "Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or
political committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.
(8) "Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW
42.17.050, to perform the duties specified in that section.
(9) "Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for
election or election to public office. An individual seeks nomination
or election when he or she first:
(a) Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space
or facilities with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;
(b) Announces publicly or files for office;
(c) Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to
promote his or her candidacy; or
(d) Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of
the individual any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.
(10) "Caucus political committee" means a political committee
organized and maintained by the members of a major political party in
the state senate or state house of representatives.
(11) "Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service
of communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast
or distribution to the general public or segments of the general public
whether through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio
stations, billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies,
printing companies, or otherwise.
(12) "Commercial purposes" includes, regardless of physical form or
characteristic: All direct marketing or other targeted contact of
persons or businesses related to any advertisement, offer, or
solicitation for anything of value. Commercial purposes does not
include the broadcast or distribution of information to the general
public or segments of the general public through the use of any form of
news media, whether or not a fee is charged for the service, or the
solicitation of votes by or on behalf of a political candidate or in
favor of or in opposition to ballot measures.
(13) "Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.
(((13))) (14) "Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower
meaning, includes payment in any form for real or personal property or
services of any kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance
with RCW 42.17.241, the term "compensation" shall not include per diem
allowances or other payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse
a public official for expenses incurred while the official is engaged
in the official business of the governmental entity.
(((14))) (15) "Continuing political committee" means a political
committee that is an organization of continuing existence not
established in anticipation of any particular election campaign.
(((15))) (16)(a) "Contribution" includes:
(i) A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of
indebtedness, donation, advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds
between political committees, or anything of value, including personal
and professional services for less than full consideration;
(ii) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation,
or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a
political committee, or their agents;
(iii) The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution,
or republication, in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic,
or other form of political advertising or electioneering communication
prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized
agent;
(iv) Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners
and parties, except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at
the event.
(b) "Contribution" does not include:
(i) Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's
account;
(ii) Ordinary home hospitality;
(iii) A contribution received by a candidate or political committee
that is returned to the contributor within five business days of the
date on which it is received by the candidate or political committee;
(iv) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is of primary interest to the general
public, that is in a news medium controlled by a person whose business
is that news medium, and that is not controlled by a candidate or a
political committee;
(v) An internal political communication primarily limited to the
members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(vi) The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses
personally incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of
fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services,"
for the purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the
individual is not compensated by any person;
(vii) Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or
window signs displayed on a person's own property or property occupied
by a person. However, a facility used for such political advertising
for which a rental charge is normally made must be reported as an in-
kind contribution and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the person providing the facility;
(viii) Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:
(A) A political party or caucus political committee if the person
paying for the services is the regular employer of the person rendering
such services; or
(B) A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for
the services is the regular employer of the individual rendering the
services and if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with state election or public disclosure laws.
(c) Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to
have a monetary value equivalent to the fair market value of the
contribution. Services or property or rights furnished at less than
their fair market value for the purpose of assisting any candidate or
political committee are deemed a contribution. Such a contribution
must be reported as an in-kind contribution at its fair market value
and counts towards any applicable contribution limit of the provider.
(((16))) (17) "Elected official" means any person elected at a
general or special election to any public office, and any person
appointed to fill a vacancy in any such office.
(((17))) (18) "Election" includes any primary, general, or special
election for public office and any election in which a ballot
proposition is submitted to the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in
which the qualifications for voting include other than those
requirements set forth in Article VI, section 1 (Amendment 63) of the
Constitution of the state of Washington shall not be considered an
election for purposes of this chapter.
(((18))) (19) "Election campaign" means any campaign in support of
or in opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any
campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.
(((19))) (20) "Election cycle" means the period beginning on the
first day of December after the date of the last previous general
election for the office that the candidate seeks and ending on November
30th after the next election for the office. In the case of a special
election to fill a vacancy in an office, "election cycle" means the
period beginning on the day the vacancy occurs and ending on November
30th after the special election.
(((20))) (21) "Electioneering communication" means any broadcast,
cable, or satellite television or radio transmission, United States
postal service mailing, billboard, newspaper, or periodical that:
(a) Clearly identifies a candidate for a state, local, or judicial
office either by specifically naming the candidate, or identifying the
candidate without using the candidate's name;
(b) Is broadcast, transmitted, mailed, erected, distributed, or
otherwise published within sixty days before any election for that
office in the jurisdiction in which the candidate is seeking election;
and
(c) Either alone, or in combination with one or more communications
identifying the candidate by the same sponsor during the sixty days
before an election, has a fair market value of five thousand dollars or
more.
(((21))) (22) "Electioneering communication" does not include:
(a) Usual and customary advertising of a business owned by a
candidate, even if the candidate is mentioned in the advertising when
the candidate has been regularly mentioned in that advertising
appearing at least twelve months preceding his or her becoming a
candidate;
(b) Advertising for candidate debates or forums when the
advertising is paid for by or on behalf of the debate or forum sponsor,
so long as two or more candidates for the same position have been
invited to participate in the debate or forum;
(c) A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly
scheduled news medium that is:
(i) Of primary interest to the general public;
(ii) In a news medium controlled by a person whose business is that
news medium; and
(iii) Not a medium controlled by a candidate or a political
committee;
(d) Slate cards and sample ballots;
(e) Advertising for books, films, dissertations, or similar works
(i) written by a candidate when the candidate entered into a contract
for such publications or media at least twelve months before becoming
a candidate, or (ii) written about a candidate;
(f) Public service announcements;
(g) A mailed internal political communication primarily limited to
the members of or contributors to a political party organization or
political committee, or to the officers, management staff, or
stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or to the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization;
(h) An expenditure by or contribution to the authorized committee
of a candidate for state, local, or judicial office; or
(i) Any other communication exempted by the commission through rule
consistent with the intent of this chapter.
(((22))) (23) "Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution,
subscription, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or
anything of value, and includes a contract, promise, or agreement,
whether or not legally enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term
"expenditure" also includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer
of anything of value in exchange for goods, services, property,
facilities, or anything of value for the purpose of assisting,
benefiting, or honoring any public official or candidate, or assisting
in furthering or opposing any election campaign. For the purposes of
this chapter, agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and promises
to pay may be reported as estimated obligations until actual payment is
made. The term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or complete
repayment by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a
loan, the receipt of which loan has been properly reported.
(((23))) (24) "Final report" means the report described as a final
report in RCW 42.17.080(2).
(((24))) (25) "General election" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640
means the election that results in the election of a person to a state
office. It does not include a primary.
(((25))) (26) "Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.
(((26))) (27) "Immediate family" includes the spouse, dependent
children, and other dependent relatives, if living in the household.
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, "immediate family"
means an individual's spouse, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent,
stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister
of the individual and the spouse of any such person and a child,
stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half
brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's spouse and the
spouse of any such person.
(((27))) (28) "Incumbent" means a person who is in present
possession of an elected office.
(((28))) (29) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that
has each of the following elements:
(a) It is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office by a person who is not (i) a candidate for that office, (ii) an
authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii) a person
who has received the candidate's encouragement or approval to make the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office, or (iv) a person with
whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any
other candidate or candidates for that office;
(b) The expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate supported or
opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt identifies the candidate
without using the candidate's name; and
(c) The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another
expenditure or other expenditures of the same person in support of or
opposition to that candidate, has a value of ((five)) six hundred
seventy-five dollars or more. A series of expenditures, each of which
is under five hundred dollars, constitutes one independent expenditure
if their cumulative value is five hundred dollars or more.
(((29))) (30)(a) "Intermediary" means an individual who transmits
a contribution to a candidate or committee from another person unless
the contribution is from the individual's employer, immediate family as
defined for purposes of RCW 42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an
association to which the individual belongs.
(b) A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes
of the committee that the treasurer or candidate serves.
(c) A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and
customary rate.
(d) A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's
home is not an intermediary for purposes of that event.
(((30))) (31) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions,
amendments, nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in
either house of the state legislature, and includes any other matter
that may be the subject of action by either house or any committee of
the legislature and all bills and resolutions that, having passed both
houses, are pending approval by the governor.
(((31))) (32) "List" has its ordinary meaning, and also means any
collection of similar forms or records, whether obtained as a result of
a single or multiple request from any state or local government agency.
(33) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to influence the
passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the state of
Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate,
or other legislative enactment of any state agency under the state
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor
"lobbying" includes an association's or other organization's act of
communicating with the members of that association or organization.
(((32))) (34) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in
his or her own or another's behalf.
(((33))) (35) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by
whom a lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is
compensated for acting as a lobbyist.
(((34))) (36) "Participate" means that, with respect to a
particular election, an entity:
(a) Makes either a monetary or in-kind contribution to a candidate;
(b) Makes an independent expenditure or electioneering
communication in support of or opposition to a candidate;
(c) Endorses a candidate prior to contributions being made by a
subsidiary corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or
that candidate's opponent;
(d) Makes a recommendation regarding whether a candidate should be
supported or opposed prior to a contribution being made by a subsidiary
corporation or local unit with respect to that candidate or that
candidate's opponent; or
(e) Directly or indirectly collaborates or consults with a
subsidiary corporation or local unit on matters relating to the support
of or opposition to a candidate, including, but not limited to, the
amount of a contribution, when a contribution should be given, and what
assistance, services or independent expenditures, or electioneering
communications, if any, will be made or should be made in support of or
opposition to a candidate.
(((35))) (37) "Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint
venture, public or private corporation, association, federal, state, or
local governmental entity or agency however constituted, candidate,
committee, political committee, political party, executive committee
thereof, or any other organization or group of persons, however
organized.
(((36))) (38) "Person in interest" means the person who is the
subject of a record or any representative designated by that person,
except that if that person is under a legal disability, the term
"person in interest" means and includes the parent or duly appointed
legal representative.
(((37))) (39) "Political advertising" includes any advertising
displays, newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles,
tabloids, flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, or other
means of mass communication, used for the purpose of appealing,
directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or other support or
opposition in any election campaign.
(((38))) (40) "Political committee" means any person (except a
candidate or an individual dealing with his or her own funds or
property) having the expectation of receiving contributions or making
expenditures in support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any
ballot proposition.
(((39))) (41) "Primary" for the purposes of RCW 42.17.640 means the
procedure for nominating a candidate to state office under chapter
29A.52 RCW or any other primary for an election that uses, in large
measure, the procedures established in chapter 29A.52 RCW.
(((40))) (42) "Public office" means any federal, state, judicial,
county, city, town, school district, port district, special district,
or other state political subdivision elective office.
(((41))) (43) "Public record" includes any writing containing
information relating to the conduct of government or the performance of
any governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or
retained by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(((42))) (44) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning
on the date of the filing of recall charges under RCW 29A.56.120 and
ending thirty days after the recall election.
(((43))) (45) "Sponsor of an electioneering communications,
independent expenditures, or political advertising" means the person
paying for the electioneering communication, independent expenditure,
or political advertising. If a person acts as an agent for another or
is reimbursed by another for the payment, the original source of the
payment is the sponsor.
(((44))) (46) "State legislative office" means the office of a
member of the state house of representatives or the office of a member
of the state senate.
(((45))) (47) "State office" means state legislative office or the
office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney
general, commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner,
superintendent of public instruction, state auditor, or state
treasurer.
(((46))) (48) "State official" means a person who holds a state
office.
(((47))) (49) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political
committee or candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the
possession or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the
election for which the contributions were received, and that are in
excess of the amount necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the
committee or candidate prior to that election. In the case of a
continuing political committee, "surplus funds" mean those
contributions remaining in the possession or control of the committee
that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay all remaining debts
when it makes its final report under RCW 42.17.065.
(((48))) (50) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.
As used in this chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any
gender, the other, as the context requires.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.070 and 2005 c 274 s 284 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each agency, in accordance with published rules, shall make
available for public inspection and copying all public records, unless
the record falls within the specific exemptions of subsection (6) of
this section, this chapter, or other statute which exempts or prohibits
disclosure of specific information or records. To the extent required
to prevent an unreasonable invasion of personal privacy interests
protected by this chapter, an agency shall delete identifying details
in a manner consistent with this chapter when it makes available or
publishes any public record; however, in each case, the justification
for the deletion shall be explained fully in writing.
(2) For informational purposes, each agency shall publish and
maintain a current list containing every law, other than those listed
in this chapter, that the agency believes exempts or prohibits
disclosure of specific information or records of the agency. An
agency's failure to list an exemption shall not affect the efficacy of
any exemption.
(3) Each local agency shall maintain and make available for public
inspection and copying a current index providing identifying
information as to the following records issued, adopted, or promulgated
after January 1, 1973:
(a) Final opinions, including concurring and dissenting opinions,
as well as orders, made in the adjudication of cases;
(b) Those statements of policy and interpretations of policy,
statute, and the Constitution which have been adopted by the agency;
(c) Administrative staff manuals and instructions to staff that
affect a member of the public;
(d) Planning policies and goals, and interim and final planning
decisions;
(e) Factual staff reports and studies, factual consultant's reports
and studies, scientific reports and studies, and any other factual
information derived from tests, studies, reports, or surveys, whether
conducted by public employees or others; and
(f) Correspondence, and materials referred to therein, by and with
the agency relating to any regulatory, supervisory, or enforcement
responsibilities of the agency, whereby the agency determines, or
opines upon, or is asked to determine or opine upon, the rights of the
state, the public, a subdivision of state government, or of any private
party.
(4) A local agency need not maintain such an index, if to do so
would be unduly burdensome, but it shall in that event:
(a) Issue and publish a formal order specifying the reasons why and
the extent to which compliance would unduly burden or interfere with
agency operations; and
(b) Make available for public inspection and copying all indexes
maintained for agency use.
(5) Each state agency shall, by rule, establish and implement a
system of indexing for the identification and location of the following
records:
(a) All records issued before July 1, 1990, for which the agency
has maintained an index;
(b) Final orders entered after June 30, 1990, that are issued in
adjudicative proceedings as defined in RCW 34.05.010 and that contain
an analysis or decision of substantial importance to the agency in
carrying out its duties;
(c) Declaratory orders entered after June 30, 1990, that are issued
pursuant to RCW 34.05.240 and that contain an analysis or decision of
substantial importance to the agency in carrying out its duties;
(d) Interpretive statements as defined in RCW 34.05.010 that were
entered after June 30, 1990; and
(e) Policy statements as defined in RCW 34.05.010 that were entered
after June 30, 1990.
Rules establishing systems of indexing shall include, but not be
limited to, requirements for the form and content of the index, its
location and availability to the public, and the schedule for revising
or updating the index. State agencies that have maintained indexes for
records issued before July 1, 1990, shall continue to make such indexes
available for public inspection and copying. Information in such
indexes may be incorporated into indexes prepared pursuant to this
subsection. State agencies may satisfy the requirements of this
subsection by making available to the public indexes prepared by other
parties but actually used by the agency in its operations. State
agencies shall make indexes available for public inspection and
copying. State agencies may charge a fee to cover the actual costs of
providing individual mailed copies of indexes.
(6) A public record may be relied on, used, or cited as precedent
by an agency against a party other than an agency and it may be invoked
by the agency for any other purpose only if:
(a) It has been indexed in an index available to the public; or
(b) Parties affected have timely notice (actual or constructive) of
the terms thereof.
(7) Each agency shall establish, maintain, and make available for
public inspection and copying a statement of the actual per page cost
or other costs, if any, that it charges for providing photocopies of
public records and a statement of the factors and manner used to
determine the actual per page cost or other costs, if any.
(a) In determining the actual per page cost for providing
photocopies of public records, an agency may include all costs directly
incident to copying such public records including the actual cost of
the paper and the per page cost for use of agency copying equipment.
In determining other actual costs for providing photocopies of public
records, an agency may include all costs directly incident to shipping
such public records, including the cost of postage or delivery charges
and the cost of any container or envelope used.
(b) In determining the actual per page cost or other costs for
providing copies of public records, an agency may not include staff
salaries, benefits, or other general administrative or overhead
charges, unless those costs are directly related to the actual cost of
copying the public records. Staff time to copy and mail the requested
public records may be included in an agency's costs.
(8) An agency need not calculate the actual per page cost or other
costs it charges for providing photocopies of public records if to do
so would be unduly burdensome, but in that event: The agency may not
charge in excess of fifteen cents per page for photocopies of public
records or for the use of agency equipment to photocopy public records
and the actual postage or delivery charge and the cost of any container
or envelope used to mail the public records to the requestor.
(9) A list obtained from any state or local government agency,
whether or not obtained as a result of a public records request, and
whether the request was made directly by the person himself or herself
or by another person, may not be used for commercial purposes or for
any type of solicitation by or on behalf of a nonprofit or charitable
organization. This chapter shall not be construed as giving authority
to any agency, the office of the secretary of the senate, or the office
of the chief clerk of the house of representatives to give, sell or
provide access to lists of individuals or businesses requested for
commercial purposes, and agencies, the office of the secretary of the
senate, and the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives shall not do so unless specifically authorized or
directed by law: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That lists of applicants for
professional licenses and of professional licensees shall be made
available to those professional associations or educational
organizations recognized by their professional licensing or examination
board, upon payment of a reasonable charge therefor: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That such recognition may be refused only for a good cause pursuant to
a hearing under the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative
Procedure Act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under RCW
9A.20.021 if he or she:
(1) Uses a list obtained, either by the person himself or herself
or by another person, from any state or local agency for commercial
purposes or for any type of solicitation by or on behalf of a nonprofit
or charitable organization, and does so knowing that the list came from
or was compiled, whether by the person himself or herself or by a third
party, from records obtained from a state or local government agency;
or
(2) Induces another to violate this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---