BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.40.042 and 2002 c 168 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When real property is divided in accordance with chapter 58.17
RCW, the assessor shall carefully investigate and ascertain the true
and fair value of each lot and assess each lot on that same basis,
unless specifically provided otherwise by law. For purposes of this
section, "lot" has the same definition as in RCW 58.17.020.
(a) For each lot on which an advance tax deposit has been paid in
accordance with RCW 58.08.040, the assessor shall establish the true
and fair value by October 30 of the year following the recording of the
plat, replat, or altered plat((, or binding site plan)). The value
established shall be the value of the lot as of January 1 of the year
the original parcel of real property was last revalued. An additional
property tax shall not be due on the land until the calendar year
following the year for which the advance tax deposit was paid if the
deposit was sufficient to pay the full amount of the taxes due on the
property.
(b) For each lot on which an advance tax deposit has not been paid,
the assessor shall establish the true and fair value not later than the
calendar year following the recording of the plat, map, subdivision, or
replat. For purposes of this section, "subdivision" means a division
of land into two or more lots.
(c) For each subdivision, all current year and delinquent taxes and
assessments on the entire tract must be paid in full in accordance with
RCW 58.17.160 and 58.08.030 except when property is being acquired by
a government for public use. For purposes of this section, "current
year taxes" means taxes that are collectible under RCW 84.56.010
subsequent to February 14.
(2) When the assessor is required by law to segregate any part or
parts of real property, assessed before or after July 27, 1997, as one
parcel or when the assessor is required by law to combine parcels of
real property assessed before or after July 27, 1997, as two or more
parcels, the assessor shall carefully investigate and ascertain the
true and fair value of each part or parts of the real property and each
combined parcel and assess each part or parts or each combined parcel
on that same basis.

Sec. 2 RCW 58.08.040 and 1997 c 393 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Prior to any person recording a plat, replat, or altered plat((, or
binding site plan)) subsequent to May 31st in any year and prior to the
date of the collection of taxes in the ensuing year, the person shall
deposit with the county treasurer a sum equal to the product of the
county assessor's latest valuation on the property less improvements in
such subdivision multiplied by the current year's dollar rate increased
by twenty-five percent on the property platted. The treasurer's
receipt shall be evidence of the payment. The treasurer shall
appropriate so much of the deposit as will pay the taxes and
assessments on the property when the levy rates are certified by the
assessor using the value of the property at the time of filing a plat,
replat, or altered plat, ((or binding site plan,)) and in case the sum
deposited is in excess of the amount necessary for the payment of the
taxes and assessments, the treasurer shall return, to the party
depositing, the amount of excess.

--- END ---