BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.46.010 and 2002 c 354 s 231 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Average tipped wage rate" means the total amount received by
a tipped employee in tips for a calendar month divided by the total
number of hours worked in that month by the tipped employee.
(2) "Director" means the director of labor and industries;
(((2))) (3) "Wage" means compensation due to an employee by reason
of employment, payable in legal tender of the United States or checks
on banks convertible into cash on demand at full face value, subject to
such deductions, charges, or allowances as may be permitted by rules of
the director;
(((3))) (4) "Employ" includes to permit to work;
(((4))) (5) "Employer" includes any individual, partnership,
association, corporation, business trust, or any person or group of
persons acting directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in
relation to an employee;
(((5))) (6) "Employee" includes any individual employed by an
employer but shall not include:
(a) Any individual (i) employed as a hand harvest laborer and paid
on a piece rate basis in an operation which has been, and is generally
and customarily recognized as having been, paid on a piece rate basis
in the region of employment; (ii) who commutes daily from his or her
permanent residence to the farm on which he or she is employed; and
(iii) who has been employed in agriculture less than thirteen weeks
during the preceding calendar year;
(b) Any individual employed in casual labor in or about a private
home, unless performed in the course of the employer's trade, business,
or profession;
(c) Any individual employed in a bona fide executive,
administrative, or professional capacity or in the capacity of outside
salesman as those terms are defined and delimited by rules of the
director. However, those terms shall be defined and delimited by the
director of personnel pursuant to chapter 41.06 RCW for employees
employed under the director of personnel's jurisdiction;
(d) Any individual engaged in the activities of an educational,
charitable, religious, state or local governmental body or agency, or
nonprofit organization where the employer-employee relationship does
not in fact exist or where the services are rendered to such
organizations gratuitously. If the individual receives reimbursement
in lieu of compensation for normally incurred out-of-pocket expenses or
receives a nominal amount of compensation per unit of voluntary service
rendered, an employer-employee relationship is deemed not to exist for
the purpose of this section or for purposes of membership or
qualification in any state, local government or publicly supported
retirement system other than that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;
(e) Any individual employed full time by any state or local
governmental body or agency who provides voluntary services but only
with regard to the provision of the voluntary services. The voluntary
services and any compensation therefor shall not affect or add to
qualification, entitlement or benefit rights under any state, local
government, or publicly supported retirement system other than that
provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;
(f) Any newspaper vendor or carrier;
(g) Any carrier subject to regulation by Part 1 of the Interstate
Commerce Act;
(h) Any individual engaged in forest protection and fire prevention
activities;
(i) Any individual employed by any charitable institution charged
with child care responsibilities engaged primarily in the development
of character or citizenship or promoting health or physical fitness or
providing or sponsoring recreational opportunities or facilities for
young people or members of the armed forces of the United States;
(j) Any individual whose duties require that he or she reside or
sleep at the place of his or her employment or who otherwise spends a
substantial portion of his or her work time subject to call, and not
engaged in the performance of active duties;
(k) Any resident, inmate, or patient of a state, county, or
municipal correctional, detention, treatment or rehabilitative
institution;
(l) Any individual who holds a public elective or appointive office
of the state, any county, city, town, municipal corporation or quasi
municipal corporation, political subdivision, or any instrumentality
thereof, or any employee of the state legislature;
(m) All vessel operating crews of the Washington state ferries
operated by the department of transportation;
(n) Any individual employed as a seaman on a vessel other than an
American vessel;
(((6))) (7) "Occupation" means any occupation, service, trade,
business, industry, or branch or group of industries or employment or
class of employment in which employees are gainfully employed;
(((7))) (8) "Retail or service establishment" means an
establishment seventy-five percent of whose annual dollar volume of
sales of goods or services, or both, is not for resale and is
recognized as retail sales or services in the particular industry;
(9) "Tipped employee" means an employee who regularly and
customarily receives gratuities directly from the customer in
recognition of the service performed and who is employed by an employer
with a standard industry code of 58, 70, or 79, or a North American
industry code of 713, 721, or 722.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.46.020 and 1999 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Until January 1, 1999, every employer shall pay to each of his
or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a
rate of not less than four dollars and ninety cents per hour.
(2) Beginning January 1, 1999, and until January 1, 2000, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than five dollars and
seventy cents per hour.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2000, and until January 1, 2001, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than six dollars and
fifty cents per hour.
(4)(a) Except as provided under (c) of this subsection, beginning
on January 1, 2001, and each following January 1st as set forth under
(b) of this subsection, every employer shall pay to each of his or her
employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of
not less than the amount established under (b) of this subsection.
(b) On September 30, 2000, and on each following September 30th,
the department of labor and industries shall calculate an adjusted
minimum wage rate to maintain employee purchasing power by increasing
the current year's minimum wage rate by the rate of inflation. The
adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to the nearest cent
using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical
workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months prior to
each September 1st as calculated by the United States department of
labor. Each adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under this
subsection (4)(b) takes effect on the following January 1st.
(c) Beginning July 1, 2006, every employer shall pay to each of his
or her tipped employees who have reached the age of eighteen years,
wages at a rate of seven dollars and sixty-three cents per hour.
(5) The director shall by ((regulation)) rule establish the minimum
wage for employees under the age of eighteen years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
Employers shall determine the average tipped wage rate for each
tipped employee for the previous calendar month. If the average tipped
wage rate does not equal or exceed the minimum wage rate under RCW
49.46.020(4)(a) for any tipped employee, the employer shall pay the
tipped employee an amount equal to the number of hours worked for the
previous calendar month multiplied by the difference of the minimum
wage rate under RCW 49.46.020(4)(a) and the minimum wage rate under RCW
49.46.020(4)(c). Employers shall pay the tipped employee this amount
at any time during the month subsequent to the month used for the
calculation under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 By July 1, 2016, the department of labor and
industries shall convene a study group to compile a report assessing
the effectiveness of this act in enabling restaurateurs to provide
adequate wages and benefits for all employees working in restaurants.
The study group shall consist of a member from each of the two largest
caucuses in both the house of representatives and senate, the director
of the department of labor and industries or the director's designee,
one representative of the restaurant industry appointed by the
governor, and one member of the labor industry appointed by the
governor. The department of labor and industries and senate and house
of representatives committee staff shall provide research and other
services necessary to prepare the report. The study group shall
present the report to the governor and the appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2016, and the report shall include
recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---