BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2005 c 436 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670,
9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or 9.94A.545, served in the
community subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and
activities by the department. For offenders placed on community
custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department
shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and
modify conditions of community custody, in addition to those imposed by
the court, based upon the risk to community safety.
(6) "Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum period
of community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW
9.94A.715, as established by the commission or the legislature under
RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000.
(7) "Community placement" means that period during which the
offender is subject to the conditions of community custody and/or
postrelease supervision, which begins either upon completion of the
term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release.
Community placement may consist of entirely community custody, entirely
postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.
(8) "Community protection zone" means the area within eight hundred
eighty feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or private
school.
(9) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(10) "Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other
sentence conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW
16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the court finds that any offender has
a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense, the
conditions of supervision may, subject to available resources, include
treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for out-of-state
supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be
considered the same as probation by other states.
(11) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(12) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles
10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and
acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(13) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(14) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior
convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(15) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that
equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the
reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the
offender and any dependents.
(16) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision
designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with
sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report
daily to a specific location designated by the department or the
sentencing court.
(17) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(18) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with
exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community supervision, the
number of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or
dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of
confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a
determinate sentence.
(19) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(20) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option
available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent
offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW
9.94A.660.
(21) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(22) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as
provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(23) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(24) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(25) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of
time.
(26) "First-time offender" means any person who has no prior
convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender
waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(27) "Home detention" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private
residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(28) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is
ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal
financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim,
statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as assessed
pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds,
court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any
other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result
of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense
of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction,
subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(29) "Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or
a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Identity theft in the first degree;
(h) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(((h))) (i) Indecent liberties;
(((i))) (j) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(((j))) (k) Leading organized crime;
(((k))) (l) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(((l))) (m) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(((m))) (n) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(((n))) (o) Rape in the third degree;
(((o))) (p) Robbery in the second degree;
(((p))) (q) Sexual exploitation;
(((q))) (r) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or
driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a
vehicle in a reckless manner;
(((r))) (s) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the
driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the
operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(((s))) (t) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of
sexual motivation;
(((t))) (u) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(((u))) (v) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to
December 2, 1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under
this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an
offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified
as a most serious offense under this subsection;
(((v))) (w)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.
(30) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent
offense.
(31) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(32) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one
year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract
by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home detention or
work crew has been ordered by the court, in an approved residence, for
a substantial portion of each day with the balance of the day spent in
the community. Partial confinement includes work release, home
detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.
(33) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit
any crime listed in this subsection (33)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(34) "Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's
community placement that is not community custody.
(35) "Private school" means a school regulated under chapter
28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.
(36) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.
(37) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(38) "Risk assessment" means the application of an objective
instrument supported by research and adopted by the department for the
purpose of assessing an offender's risk of reoffense, taking into
consideration the nature of the harm done by the offender, place and
circumstances of the offender related to risk, the offender's
relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be
based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(39) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug (RCW 46.61.502), actual physical control while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving
(RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5));
or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(40) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense
and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(41) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.130(11);
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.070 or 9.68A.080; or
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(42) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which
the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her
sexual gratification.
(43) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing court's
discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(44) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time
for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime as
prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the
crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(45) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical
boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four
hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(46) "Transition training" means written and verbal instructions
and assistance provided by the department to the offender during the
two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of the work
ethic camp program. The transition training shall include instructions
in the offender's requirements and obligations during the offender's
period of community custody.
(47) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as
a direct result of the crime charged.
(48) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(49) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting
of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that
complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(50) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program
as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower
the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(51) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2003 c 53 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.505(2)(b), 9.94A.650 through 9.94A.670,
9.94A.690, 9.94A.700 through 9.94A.715, or 9.94A.545, served in the
community subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and
activities by the department. For offenders placed on community
custody for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department
shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and
modify conditions of community custody, in addition to those imposed by
the court, based upon the risk to community safety.
(6) "Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum period
of community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW
9.94A.715, as established by the commission or the legislature under
RCW 9.94A.850, for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000.
(7) "Community placement" means that period during which the
offender is subject to the conditions of community custody and/or
postrelease supervision, which begins either upon completion of the
term of confinement (postrelease supervision) or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release.
Community placement may consist of entirely community custody, entirely
postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.
(8) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(9) "Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other
sentence conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW
16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524. Where the court finds that any offender has
a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense, the
conditions of supervision may, subject to available resources, include
treatment. For purposes of the interstate compact for out-of-state
supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community
supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and should be
considered the same as probation by other states.
(10) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(11) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles
10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and
acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(12) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(13) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior
convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(14) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that
equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the
reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the
offender and any dependents.
(15) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision
designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with
sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report
daily to a specific location designated by the department or the
sentencing court.
(16) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(17) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with
exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community supervision, the
number of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or
dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an
offender through earned release can reduce the actual period of
confinement shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a
determinate sentence.
(18) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(19) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option
available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent
offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW
9.94A.660.
(20) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(21) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as
provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(22) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(23) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(24) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of
time.
(25) "First-time offender" means any person who has no prior
convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender
waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(26) "Home detention" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private
residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(27) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is
ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal
financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim,
statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as assessed
pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds,
court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any
other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result
of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense
of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction,
subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(28) "Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or
a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Identity theft in the first degree;
(h) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(((h))) (i) Indecent liberties;
(((i))) (j) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(((j))) (k) Leading organized crime;
(((k))) (l) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(((l))) (m) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(((m))) (n) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(((n))) (o) Rape in the third degree;
(((o))) (p) Robbery in the second degree;
(((p))) (q) Sexual exploitation;
(((q))) (r) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or
driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a
vehicle in a reckless manner;
(((r))) (s) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the
driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the
operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(((s))) (t) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of
sexual motivation;
(((t))) (u) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(((u))) (v) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to
December 2, 1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under
this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an
offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified
as a most serious offense under this subsection;
(((v))) (w)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.
(29) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent
offense.
(30) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(31) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one
year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract
by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home detention or
work crew has been ordered by the court, in an approved residence, for
a substantial portion of each day with the balance of the day spent in
the community. Partial confinement includes work release, home
detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.
(32) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, or burglary in the first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit
any crime listed in this subsection (32)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(33) "Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's
community placement that is not community custody.
(34) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(35) "Risk assessment" means the application of an objective
instrument supported by research and adopted by the department for the
purpose of assessing an offender's risk of reoffense, taking into
consideration the nature of the harm done by the offender, place and
circumstances of the offender related to risk, the offender's
relationship to any victim, and any information provided to the
department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be
based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.
(36) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any
drug (RCW 46.61.502), actual physical control while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving
(RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5));
or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(37) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense
and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(38) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.130(11);
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.070 or 9.68A.080; or
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(39) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which
the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her
sexual gratification.
(40) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing court's
discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(41) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time
for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime as
prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the
crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(42) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical
boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four
hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(43) "Transition training" means written and verbal instructions
and assistance provided by the department to the offender during the
two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of the work
ethic camp program. The transition training shall include instructions
in the offender's requirements and obligations during the offender's
period of community custody.
(44) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as
a direct result of the crime charged.
(45) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(46) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting
of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that
complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(47) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program
as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower
the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(48) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.540 and 2005 c 437 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except to the extent provided in subsection (3) of this
section, the following minimum terms of total confinement are mandatory
and shall not be varied or modified under RCW 9.94A.535:
(a) An offender convicted of the crime of murder in the first
degree shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than
twenty years.
(b) An offender convicted of the crime of assault in the first
degree or assault of a child in the first degree where the offender
used force or means likely to result in death or intended to kill the
victim shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than
five years.
(c) An offender convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree
shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than five
years.
(d) An offender convicted of the crime of sexually violent predator
escape shall be sentenced to a minimum term of total confinement not
less than sixty months.
(e) An offender convicted of the crime of identity theft in the
first degree shall be sentenced to a minimum term of total confinement
not less than twenty-four months.
(f) An offender convicted of the crime of identity theft in the
second degree shall be sentenced to a minimum term of total confinement
not less than twelve months.
(2) During such minimum terms of total confinement, no offender
subject to the provisions of this section is eligible for community
custody, earned release time, furlough, home detention, partial
confinement, work crew, work release, or any other form of early
release authorized under RCW 9.94A.728, or any other form of authorized
leave of absence from the correctional facility while not in the direct
custody of a corrections officer. The provisions of this subsection
shall not apply: (a) In the case of an offender in need of emergency
medical treatment; (b) for the purpose of commitment to an inpatient
treatment facility in the case of an offender convicted of the crime of
rape in the first degree; or (c) for an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4).
(3)(a) Subsection (1) of this section shall not be applied in
sentencing of juveniles tried as adults pursuant to RCW
13.04.030(1)(e)(i).
(b) This subsection (3) applies only to crimes committed on or
after July 24, 2005.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.411 and 2000 c 119 s 28 and 2000 c 28 s 17 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Decision not to prosecute.
STANDARD: A prosecuting attorney may decline to prosecute, even
though technically sufficient evidence to prosecute exists, in
situations where prosecution would serve no public purpose, would
defeat the underlying purpose of the law in question or would result in
decreased respect for the law.
GUIDELINE/COMMENTARY:
Examples
The following are examples of reasons not to prosecute which could
satisfy the standard.
(a) Contrary to Legislative Intent - It may be proper to decline to
charge where the application of criminal sanctions would be clearly
contrary to the intent of the legislature in enacting the particular
statute.
(b) Antiquated Statute - It may be proper to decline to charge
where the statute in question is antiquated in that:
(i) It has not been enforced for many years; and
(ii) Most members of society act as if it were no longer in
existence; and
(iii) It serves no deterrent or protective purpose in today's
society; and
(iv) The statute has not been recently reconsidered by the
legislature.
This reason is not to be construed as the basis for declining cases
because the law in question is unpopular or because it is difficult to
enforce.
(c) De Minimis Violation - It may be proper to decline to charge
where the violation of law is only technical or insubstantial and where
no public interest or deterrent purpose would be served by prosecution.
(d) Confinement on Other Charges - It may be proper to decline to
charge because the accused has been sentenced on another charge to a
lengthy period of confinement; and
(i) Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional
direct or collateral punishment;
(ii) The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is
not particularly aggravated; and
(iii) Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant
deterrent purpose.
(e) Pending Conviction on Another Charge - It may be proper to
decline to charge because the accused is facing a pending prosecution
in the same or another county; and
(i) Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional
direct or collateral punishment;
(ii) Conviction in the pending prosecution is imminent;
(iii) The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is
not particularly aggravated; and
(iv) Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant
deterrent purpose.
(f) High Disproportionate Cost of Prosecution - It may be proper to
decline to charge where the cost of locating or transporting, or the
burden on, prosecution witnesses is highly disproportionate to the
importance of prosecuting the offense in question. This reason should
be limited to minor cases and should not be relied upon in serious
cases.
(g) Improper Motives of Complainant - It may be proper to decline
charges because the motives of the complainant are improper and
prosecution would serve no public purpose, would defeat the underlying
purpose of the law in question or would result in decreased respect for
the law.
(h) Immunity - It may be proper to decline to charge where immunity
is to be given to an accused in order to prosecute another where the
accused's information or testimony will reasonably lead to the
conviction of others who are responsible for more serious criminal
conduct or who represent a greater danger to the public interest.
(i) Victim Request - It may be proper to decline to charge because
the victim requests that no criminal charges be filed and the case
involves the following crimes or situations:
(i) Assault cases where the victim has suffered little or no
injury;
(ii) Crimes against property, not involving violence, where no
major loss was suffered;
(iii) Where doing so would not jeopardize the safety of society.
Care should be taken to insure that the victim's request is freely
made and is not the product of threats or pressure by the accused.
The presence of these factors may also justify the decision to
dismiss a prosecution which has been commenced.
Notification
The prosecutor is encouraged to notify the victim, when practical,
and the law enforcement personnel, of the decision not to prosecute.
(2) Decision to prosecute.
(a) STANDARD:
Crimes against persons will be filed if sufficient admissible
evidence exists, which, when considered with the most plausible,
reasonably foreseeable defense that could be raised under the evidence,
would justify conviction by a reasonable and objective fact-finder.
With regard to offenses prohibited by RCW 9A.44.040, 9A.44.050,
9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086, 9A.44.089, and
9A.64.020 the prosecutor should avoid prefiling agreements or
diversions intended to place the accused in a program of treatment or
counseling, so that treatment, if determined to be beneficial, can be
provided pursuant to RCW 9.94A.670.
Crimes against property/other crimes will be filed if the
admissible evidence is of such convincing force as to make it probable
that a reasonable and objective fact-finder would convict after hearing
all the admissible evidence and the most plausible defense that could
be raised.
See table below for the crimes within these categories.

CATEGORIZATION OF CRIMES FOR PROSECUTING STANDARDS

CRIMES AGAINST PERSONS
Aggravated Murder
1st Degree Murder
2nd Degree Murder
1st Degree Manslaughter
2nd Degree Manslaughter
1st Degree Kidnapping
2nd Degree Kidnapping
1st Degree Assault
2nd Degree Assault
3rd Degree Assault
1st Degree Assault of a Child
2nd Degree Assault of a Child
3rd Degree Assault of a Child
1st Degree Rape
2nd Degree Rape
3rd Degree Rape
1st Degree Rape of a Child
2nd Degree Rape of a Child
3rd Degree Rape of a Child
1st Degree Robbery
2nd Degree Robbery
1st Degree Arson
1st Degree Burglary
1st Degree Identity Theft
2nd Degree Identity Theft
1st Degree Extortion
2nd Degree Extortion
Indecent Liberties
Incest
Vehicular Homicide
Vehicular Assault
1st Degree Child Molestation
2nd Degree Child Molestation
3rd Degree Child Molestation
1st Degree Promoting Prostitution
Intimidating a Juror
Communication with a Minor
Intimidating a Witness
Intimidating a Public Servant
Bomb Threat (if against person)
Unlawful Imprisonment
Promoting a Suicide Attempt
Riot (if against person)
Stalking
Custodial Assault
Domestic Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050,
26.09.300, 26.10.220, 26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145)
Counterfeiting (if a violation of RCW 9.16.035(4))

CRIMES AGAINST PROPERTY/OTHER CRIMES
2nd Degree Arson
1st Degree Escape
2nd Degree Escape
2nd Degree Burglary
1st Degree Theft
2nd Degree Theft
1st Degree Perjury
2nd Degree Perjury
1st Degree Introducing Contraband
2nd Degree Introducing Contraband
1st Degree Possession of Stolen Property
2nd Degree Possession of Stolen Property
Bribery
Bribing a Witness
Bribe received by a Witness
Bomb Threat (if against property)
1st Degree Malicious Mischief
2nd Degree Malicious Mischief
1st Degree Reckless Burning
Taking a Motor Vehicle without Authorization
Forgery
2nd Degree Promoting Prostitution
Tampering with a Witness
Trading in Public Office
Trading in Special Influence
Receiving/Granting Unlawful Compensation
Bigamy
Eluding a Pursuing Police Vehicle
Willful Failure to Return from Furlough
Escape from Community Custody
Riot (if against property)
1st Degree Theft of Livestock
2nd Degree Theft of Livestock

ALL OTHER UNCLASSIFIED FELONIES
Selection of Charges/Degree of Charge
(i) The prosecutor should file charges which adequately describe
the nature of defendant's conduct. Other offenses may be charged only
if they are necessary to ensure that the charges:
(A) Will significantly enhance the strength of the state's case at
trial; or
(B) Will result in restitution to all victims.
(ii) The prosecutor should not overcharge to obtain a guilty plea.
Overcharging includes:
(A) Charging a higher degree;
(B) Charging additional counts.
This standard is intended to direct prosecutors to charge those
crimes which demonstrate the nature and seriousness of a defendant's
criminal conduct, but to decline to charge crimes which are not
necessary to such an indication. Crimes which do not merge as a matter
of law, but which arise from the same course of conduct, do not all
have to be charged.

(b) GUIDELINES/COMMENTARY:
(i) Police Investigation
A prosecuting attorney is dependent upon law enforcement agencies
to conduct the necessary factual investigation which must precede the
decision to prosecute. The prosecuting attorney shall ensure that a
thorough factual investigation has been conducted before a decision to
prosecute is made. In ordinary circumstances the investigation should
include the following:
(A) The interviewing of all material witnesses, together with the
obtaining of written statements whenever possible;
(B) The completion of necessary laboratory tests; and
(C) The obtaining, in accordance with constitutional requirements,
of the suspect's version of the events.
If the initial investigation is incomplete, a prosecuting attorney
should insist upon further investigation before a decision to prosecute
is made, and specify what the investigation needs to include.
(ii) Exceptions
In certain situations, a prosecuting attorney may authorize filing
of a criminal complaint before the investigation is complete if:
(A) Probable cause exists to believe the suspect is guilty; and
(B) The suspect presents a danger to the community or is likely to
flee if not apprehended; or
(C) The arrest of the suspect is necessary to complete the
investigation of the crime.
In the event that the exception to the standard is applied, the
prosecuting attorney shall obtain a commitment from the law enforcement
agency involved to complete the investigation in a timely manner. If
the subsequent investigation does not produce sufficient evidence to
meet the normal charging standard, the complaint should be dismissed.
(iii) Investigation Techniques
The prosecutor should be fully advised of the investigatory
techniques that were used in the case investigation including:
(A) Polygraph testing;
(B) Hypnosis;
(C) Electronic surveillance;
(D) Use of informants.
(iv) Pre-Filing Discussions with Defendant
Discussions with the defendant or his/her representative regarding
the selection or disposition of charges may occur prior to the filing
of charges, and potential agreements can be reached.
(v) Pre-Filing Discussions with Victim(s)
Discussions with the victim(s) or victims' representatives
regarding the selection or disposition of charges may occur before the
filing of charges. The discussions may be considered by the prosecutor
in charging and disposition decisions, and should be considered before
reaching any agreement with the defendant regarding these decisions.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2005 c 458 s 2 and 2005 c 183 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit
conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of
a Signal Preemption Device
(RCW 46.37.675)

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW
9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of dependent person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a
Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW
9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW
9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

((Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting
Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(3))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Abandonment of dependent person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace
Officer With a Projectile Stun
Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except
subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily
Harm By Use of a Signal
Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.674)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

((Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 6 RCW 9A.82.090 and 2003 c 267 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
During the pendency of any criminal case charging a violation of
RCW 9.35.020, 9A.82.060, or 9A.82.080, or an offense defined in RCW
9A.40.100, the superior court may, in addition to its other powers,
issue an order pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 (2) or (3). Upon conviction
of a person for a violation of RCW 9.35.020, 9A.82.060, or 9A.82.080,
or an offense defined in RCW 9A.40.100, the superior court may, in
addition to its other powers of disposition, issue an order pursuant to
RCW 9A.82.100.

Sec. 7 RCW 9A.82.100 and 2003 c 267 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person who sustains injury to his or her person, business,
or property by an act of criminal profiteering that is part of a
pattern of criminal profiteering activity, or by an offense defined in
RCW 9A.40.100, or by a violation of RCW 9.35.020, 9A.82.060, or
9A.82.080 may file an action in superior court for the recovery of
damages and the costs of the suit, including reasonable investigative
and attorney's fees.
(b) The attorney general or county prosecuting attorney may file an
action: (i) On behalf of those persons injured or, respectively, on
behalf of the state or county if the entity has sustained damages, or
(ii) to prevent, restrain, or remedy a pattern of criminal profiteering
activity, or an offense defined in RCW 9A.40.100, or a violation of RCW
9.35.020, 9A.82.060, or 9A.82.080.
(c) An action for damages filed by or on behalf of an injured
person, the state, or the county shall be for the recovery of damages
and the costs of the suit, including reasonable investigative and
attorney's fees.
(d) In an action filed to prevent, restrain, or remedy a pattern of
criminal profiteering activity, or an offense defined in RCW 9A.40.100,
or a violation of RCW 9.35.020, 9A.82.060, or 9A.82.080, the court,
upon proof of the violation, may impose a civil penalty not exceeding
two hundred fifty thousand dollars, in addition to awarding the cost of
the suit, including reasonable investigative and attorney's fees.
(2) The superior court has jurisdiction to prevent, restrain, and
remedy a pattern of criminal profiteering, or an offense defined in RCW
9A.40.100, or a violation of RCW 9.35.020, 9A.82.060, or 9A.82.080
after making provision for the rights of all innocent persons affected
by the violation and after hearing or trial, as appropriate, by issuing
appropriate orders.
(3) Prior to a determination of liability, orders issued under
subsection (2) of this section may include, but are not limited to,
entering restraining orders or prohibitions or taking such other
actions, including the acceptance of satisfactory performance bonds, in
connection with any property or other interest subject to damages,
forfeiture, or other restraints pursuant to this section as the court
deems proper. The orders may also include attachment, receivership, or
injunctive relief in regard to personal or real property pursuant to
Title 7 RCW. In shaping the reach or scope of receivership,
attachment, or injunctive relief, the superior court shall provide for
the protection of bona fide interests in property, including community
property, of persons who were not involved in the violation of this
chapter, except to the extent that such interests or property were
acquired or used in such a way as to be subject to forfeiture under RCW
9A.82.100(4)(f).
(4) Following a determination of liability, orders may include, but
are not limited to:
(a) Ordering any person to divest himself or herself of any
interest, direct or indirect, in any enterprise.
(b) Imposing reasonable restrictions on the future activities or
investments of any person, including prohibiting any person from
engaging in the same type of endeavor as the enterprise engaged in, the
activities of which affect the laws of this state, to the extent the
Constitutions of the United States and this state permit.
(c) Ordering dissolution or reorganization of any enterprise.
(d) Ordering the payment of actual damages sustained to those
persons injured by a violation of RCW 9.35.020, 9A.82.060, or
9A.82.080, or an offense defined in RCW 9A.40.100, or an act of
criminal profiteering that is part of a pattern of criminal
profiteering, and in the court's discretion, increasing the payment to
an amount not exceeding three times the actual damages sustained.
(e) Ordering the payment of all costs and expenses of the
prosecution and investigation of a pattern of criminal profiteering, or
an offense defined in RCW 9A.40.100, activity or a violation of RCW
9.35.020, 9A.82.060, or 9A.82.080, civil and criminal, incurred by the
state or county, including any costs of defense provided at public
expense, as appropriate to the state general fund or the
antiprofiteering revolving fund of the county.
(f) Ordering forfeiture first as restitution to any person damaged
by a violation of RCW 9.35.020, by an act of criminal profiteering that
is part of a pattern of criminal profiteering, or by an offense defined
in RCW 9A.40.100, then to the state general fund or antiprofiteering
revolving fund of the county, as appropriate, to the extent not already
ordered to be paid in other damages, of the following:
(i) Any property or other interest acquired or maintained in
violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 to the extent of the investment
of funds, and any appreciation or income attributable to the
investment, from a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.
(ii) Any property, contractual right, or claim against property
used to influence any enterprise that a person has established,
operated, controlled, conducted, or participated in the conduct of, in
violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.
(iii) All proceeds traceable to or derived from a violation of RCW
9.35.020, an offense included in the pattern of criminal profiteering
activity, or an offense defined in RCW 9A.40.100, and all moneys,
negotiable instruments, securities, and other things of value
significantly used or intended to be used significantly to facilitate
commission of the offense.
(g) Ordering payment to the state general fund or antiprofiteering
revolving fund of the county, as appropriate, of an amount equal to the
gain a person has acquired or maintained through an offense included in
the definition of criminal profiteering.
(5) In addition to or in lieu of an action under this section, the
attorney general or county prosecuting attorney may file an action for
forfeiture to the state general fund or antiprofiteering revolving fund
of the county, as appropriate, to the extent not already ordered paid
pursuant to this section, of the following:
(a) Any interest acquired or maintained by a person in violation of
RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 to the extent of the investment of funds
obtained from a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080 and any
appreciation or income attributable to the investment.
(b) Any property, contractual right, or claim against property used
to influence any enterprise that a person has established, operated,
controlled, conducted, or participated in the conduct of, in violation
of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.
(c) All proceeds traceable to or derived from a violation of RCW
9.35.020, an offense included in the pattern of criminal profiteering
activity, or an offense defined in RCW 9A.40.100, and all moneys,
negotiable instruments, securities, and other things of value
significantly used or intended to be used significantly to facilitate
the commission of the offense.
(6) A defendant convicted in any criminal proceeding is precluded
in any civil proceeding from denying the essential allegations of the
criminal offense proven in the criminal trial in which the defendant
was convicted. For the purposes of this subsection, a conviction shall
be deemed to have occurred upon a verdict, finding, or plea of guilty,
notwithstanding the fact that appellate review of the conviction and
sentence has been or may be sought. If a subsequent reversal of the
conviction occurs, any judgment that was based upon that conviction may
be reopened upon motion of the defendant.
(7) The initiation of civil proceedings under this section shall be
commenced within three years after discovery of the pattern of criminal
profiteering activity or after the pattern should reasonably have been
discovered or, in the case of an offense that is defined in RCW
9A.40.100 or a violation of RCW 9.35.020, within three years after the
final disposition of any criminal charges relating to the offense,
whichever is later.
(8) The attorney general or county prosecuting attorney may, in a
civil action brought pursuant to this section, file with the clerk of
the superior court a certificate stating that the case is of special
public importance. A copy of that certificate shall be furnished
immediately by the clerk to the presiding chief judge of the superior
court in which the action is pending and, upon receipt of the copy, the
judge shall immediately designate a judge to hear and determine the
action. The judge so designated shall promptly assign the action for
hearing, participate in the hearings and determination, and cause the
action to be expedited.
(9) The standard of proof in actions brought pursuant to this
section is the preponderance of the evidence test.
(10) A person other than the attorney general or county prosecuting
attorney who files an action under this section shall serve notice and
one copy of the pleading on the attorney general within thirty days
after the action is filed with the superior court. The notice shall
identify the action, the person, and the person's attorney. Service of
the notice does not limit or otherwise affect the right of the state to
maintain an action under this section or intervene in a pending action
nor does it authorize the person to name the state or the attorney
general as a party to the action.
(11) Except in cases filed by a county prosecuting attorney, the
attorney general may, upon timely application, intervene in any civil
action or proceeding brought under this section if the attorney general
certifies that in the attorney general's opinion the action is of
special public importance. Upon intervention, the attorney general may
assert any available claim and is entitled to the same relief as if the
attorney general had instituted a separate action.
(12) In addition to the attorney general's right to intervene as a
party in any action under this section, the attorney general may appear
as amicus curiae in any proceeding in which a claim under this section
has been asserted or in which a court is interpreting RCW 9A.82.010,
9A.82.080, 9A.82.090, 9A.82.110, or 9A.82.120, or this section.
(13) A private civil action under this section does not limit any
other civil or criminal action under this chapter or any other
provision. Private civil remedies provided under this section are
supplemental and not mutually exclusive.
(14) Upon motion by the defendant, the court may authorize the sale
or transfer of assets subject to an order or lien authorized by this
chapter for the purpose of paying actual attorney's fees and costs of
defense. The motion shall specify the assets for which sale or
transfer is sought and shall be accompanied by the defendant's sworn
statement that the defendant has no other assets available for such
purposes. No order authorizing such sale or transfer may be entered
unless the court finds that the assets involved are not subject to
possible forfeiture under RCW 9A.82.100(4)(f). Prior to disposition of
the motion, the court shall notify the state of the assets sought to be
sold or transferred and shall hear argument on the issue of whether the
assets are subject to forfeiture under RCW 9A.82.100(4)(f). Such a
motion may be made from time to time and shall be heard by the court on
an expedited basis.
(15) In an action brought under subsection (1)(a) and (b)(i) of
this section, either party has the right to a jury trial.

Sec. 8 RCW 9A.82.120 and 2003 c 267 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state, upon filing a criminal action under RCW 9.35.020,
9A.82.060, or 9A.82.080 or for an offense defined in RCW 9A.40.100, or
a civil action under RCW 9A.82.100, may file in accordance with this
section a criminal profiteering lien. A filing fee or other charge is
not required for filing a criminal profiteering lien.
(2) A criminal profiteering lien shall be signed by the attorney
general or the county prosecuting attorney representing the state in
the action and shall set forth the following information:
(a) The name of the defendant whose property or other interests are
to be subject to the lien;
(b) In the discretion of the attorney general or county prosecuting
attorney filing the lien, any aliases or fictitious names of the
defendant named in the lien;
(c) If known to the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney
filing the lien, the present residence or principal place of business
of the person named in the lien;
(d) A reference to the proceeding pursuant to which the lien is
filed, including the name of the court, the title of the action, and
the court's file number for the proceeding;
(e) The name and address of the attorney representing the state in
the proceeding pursuant to which the lien is filed;
(f) A statement that the notice is being filed pursuant to this
section;
(g) The amount that the state claims in the action or, with respect
to property or other interests that the state has requested forfeiture
to the state or county, a description of the property or interests
sought to be paid or forfeited;
(h) If known to the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney
filing the lien, a description of property that is subject to
forfeiture to the state or property in which the defendant has an
interest that is available to satisfy a judgment entered in favor of
the state; and
(i) Such other information as the attorney general or county
prosecuting attorney filing the lien deems appropriate.
(3) The attorney general or the county prosecuting attorney filing
the lien may amend a lien filed under this section at any time by
filing an amended criminal profiteering lien in accordance with this
section that identifies the prior lien amended.
(4) The attorney general or the county prosecuting attorney filing
the lien shall, as soon as practical after filing a criminal
profiteering lien, furnish to any person named in the lien a notice of
the filing of the lien. Failure to furnish notice under this
subsection does not invalidate or otherwise affect a criminal
profiteering lien filed in accordance with this section.
(5)(a) A criminal profiteering lien is perfected against interests
in personal property in the same manner as a security interest in like
property pursuant to RCW 62A.9A-301 through 62A.9A-316 or as otherwise
required to perfect a security interest in like property under
applicable law. In the case of perfection by filing, the state shall
file, in lieu of a financing statement in the form prescribed by RCW
62A.9A-502, a notice of lien in substantially the following form:

On receipt of such a notice from the state, a filing officer shall,
without payment of filing fee, file and index the notice as if it were
a financing statement naming the state as secured party and the
defendant as debtor.
(b) A criminal profiteering lien is perfected against interests in
real property by filing the lien in the office where a mortgage on the
real estate would be filed or recorded. The filing officer shall file
and index the criminal profiteering lien, without payment of a filing
fee, in the same manner as a mortgage.
(6) The filing of a criminal profiteering lien in accordance with
this section creates a lien in favor of the state in:
(a) Any interest of the defendant, in real property situated in the
county in which the lien is filed, then maintained, or thereafter
acquired in the name of the defendant identified in the lien;
(b) Any interest of the defendant, in personal property situated in
this state, then maintained or thereafter acquired in the name of the
defendant identified in the lien; and
(c) Any property identified in the lien to the extent of the
defendant's interest therein.
(7) The lien created in favor of the state in accordance with this
section, when filed or otherwise perfected as provided in subsection
(5) of this section, has, with respect to any of the property described
in subsection (6) of this section, the same priority determined
pursuant to the laws of this state as a mortgage or security interest
given for value (but not a purchase money security interest) and
perfected in the same manner with respect to such property; except that
any lien perfected pursuant to Title 60 RCW by any person who, in the
ordinary course of his or her business, furnishes labor, services, or
materials, or rents, leases, or otherwise supplies equipment, without
knowledge of the criminal profiteering lien, is superior to the
criminal profiteering lien.
(8) Upon entry of judgment in favor of the state, the state may
proceed to execute thereon as in the case of any other judgment, except
that in order to preserve the state's lien priority as provided in this
section the state shall, in addition to such other notice as is
required by law, give at least thirty days' notice of the execution to
any person possessing at the time the notice is given, an interest
recorded subsequent to the date the state's lien was perfected.
(9) Upon the entry of a final judgment in favor of the state
providing for forfeiture of property to the state, the title of the
state to the property:
(a) In the case of real property or a beneficial interest in real
property, relates back to the date of filing the criminal profiteering
lien or, if no criminal profiteering lien is filed, then to the date of
recording of the final judgment or the abstract thereof; or
(b) In the case of personal property or a beneficial interest in
personal property, relates back to the date the personal property was
seized by the state, or the date of filing of a criminal profiteering
lien in accordance with this section, whichever is earlier, but if the
property was not seized and no criminal profiteering lien was filed
then to the date the final judgment was filed with the department of
licensing and, if the personal property is an aircraft, with the
federal aviation administration.
(10) This section does not limit the right of the state to obtain
any order or injunction, receivership, writ, attachment, garnishment,
or other remedy authorized under RCW 9A.82.100 or appropriate to
protect the interests of the state or available under other applicable
law.
(11) In a civil or criminal action under this chapter, the superior
court shall provide for the protection of bona fide interests in
property, including community property, subject to liens of persons who
were not involved in the violation of this chapter, except to the
extent that such interests or property were acquired or used in such a
way as to be subject to forfeiture pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100(4)(f).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
The state patrol is authorized to accept private donations for the
purpose of supporting education, training, staffing, and equipment to
combat identity theft.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

--- END ---