BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the use of
anatomical gifts, including the donation of organ or tissue, for the
purpose of transplantation is of great interest to the citizens of
Washington state and may save or prolong the life or improve the health
of extremely ill and dying persons. The legislature further finds that
more than ninety thousand people are currently waiting for life-saving
organ transplants on the national transplant waiting list. More than
one thousand two hundred of these people are listed at Washington state
transplant centers. Nationally, eighteen people die each day as a
result of the shortage of donated organs.
The legislature further finds that continuing education as to the
existence and maintenance of a statewide organ and tissue donor
registry is in the best interest of the people of the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Organ donation awareness shall be taught in the public schools
of this state in driver training courses. Organ donation education
shall include instruction explaining the organ and tissue donor
registry created in RCW 68.50.635.
(2) Instructional materials shall be developed in coordination with
the federally designated organ procurement organization for Washington
state.
(3) All costs associated with the development, distribution, and
implementation of this curriculum shall be the responsibility of the
foundation established in RCW 46.12.510.
(4) At least fourteen days before teaching organ donation
awareness, each school district shall notify parents or guardians of
the presentation, that the curricula materials are available for
inspection, and that parents or guardians may request in writing that
their students be excused from the instruction. No student may be
required to participate in organ donation awareness instruction if the
student's parent or guardian requests in writing that the student be
excused from such instruction, and the student shall not be
academically penalized due to being excused.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.82.420 and 2004 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The advisory committee shall compile and furnish to each
qualifying applicant for an instructor's license or a driver training
school license a basic minimum required curriculum.
(2) The basic minimum required curriculum shall also include
(((1))):
(a) Information on the effects of alcohol and drug use on motor
vehicle operators, including information on drug and alcohol related
traffic injury and mortality rates in the state of Washington;
(((2))) (b) Current penalties for driving under the influence of
drugs or alcohol;
(c) Organ donation awareness education, including instruction
explaining the organ and tissue donor registry created in RCW
68.50.635. Instructional materials regarding organ donation awareness
shall be developed in coordination with the federally designated organ
procurement organization for Washington state, and instruction shall be
provided by a qualified instructor. All costs associated with the
development, distribution, and implementation of this curriculum shall
be the responsibility of the foundation established in RCW 46.12.510
with no additional charge to students; and
(((3))) (d) Information on motorcycle awareness, approved by the
Motorcycle Safety Foundation, to ensure new operators of motor vehicles
have been instructed in the importance of safely sharing the road with
motorcyclists.
(3) Should the director be presented with acceptable proof that any
licensed instructor or driver training school is not showing proper
diligence in teaching such basic minimum curriculum as required, the
instructor or school shall be required to appear before the advisory
committee and show cause why the license of the instructor or school
should not be revoked for such negligence. If the committee does not
accept such reasons as may be offered, the director may revoke the
license of the instructor or school, or both.

--- END ---