BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
Before final certification of election returns, the county must
report and explain, by precinct, any variance between the number of
ballots counted and the number of voters credited with voting.
If there are differences between the number of ballots counted and
the number of voters credited with voting that cannot be explained, and
that difference exceeds the winning margin in any election or primary,
the election or primary as to that election is void. No certificate of
election may be issued. A revote of that election must be held within
sixty days.

--- END ---