BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
When a water supply for built-in automatic residential fire
sprinkler suppression systems is installed by a property owner or
system contractor in a residence:
(1) The property owner or system contractor shall not be subject to
the imposition of additional meter charges by a municipality or water
district when flow and pressure requirements dictate that a larger
water supply is necessary, and standard residential water pricing
schedules shall be imposed by the municipality or water district;
(2) The property owner or system contractor shall not be subject to
the imposition of water system development assessments by the
municipality or water district; and
(3) The water must be supplied from a single metered connection to
the municipal or water district system and the connection must be sized
to supply both domestic and fire sprinkler system requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
When a water supply for built-in automatic residential fire
sprinkler suppression systems is installed by a property owner or
system contractor in a residence:
(1) The property owner or system contractor shall not be subject to
the imposition of additional meter charges by a code city or water
district when flow and pressure requirements dictate that a larger
water supply is necessary, and standard residential water pricing
schedules shall be imposed by the code city or water district;
(2) The property owner or system contractor shall not be subject to
the imposition of water system development assessments by the code city
or water district; and
(3) The water must be supplied from a single metered connection to
the code city or water district system and the connection must be sized
to supply both domestic and fire sprinkler system requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.94 RCW
to read as follows:
Water systems operating under this chapter are prohibited from
requiring residential water customers to pay a water service
availability charge, standby charge, consumption charge, or any other
similar types of charges associated with available but unused water
service, including any interest or penalties for nonpayment or
enforcement charges, when the water connection is installed for built-in automatic fire sprinkler suppression systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Cities and towns are prohibited from requiring residential water
customers to pay a water service availability charge, standby charge,
consumption charge, or any other similar types of charges associated
with available but unused water service, including any interest or
penalties for nonpayment or enforcement charges, when the water
connection is installed for built-in automatic fire sprinkler
suppression systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Code cities are prohibited from requiring residential water
customers to pay a water service availability charge, standby charge,
consumption charge, or any other similar types of charges associated
with available but unused water service, including any interest or
penalties for nonpayment or enforcement charges, when the water
connection is installed for built-in automatic fire sprinkler
suppression systems.

--- END ---