BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2005 c 296 s 5 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
This act takes effect ((January 1, 2009)) July 1, 2007.

Sec. 2 2005 c 296 s 6 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
This act expires ((January 1, 2011)) July 1, 2017.

--- END ---