BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the public health, safety, and
welfare require that the sale and consumption of alcoholic beverages be
prohibited on state ferries.
(2) It is unlawful to sell or consume alcoholic beverages on state
ferries. The department shall post signs to this effect at all ferry
terminals and on all vessels.

--- END ---