BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.28.050 and 1984 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
No application shall be valid or claim thereunder enforceable
unless filed within one year after the day upon which the injury
occurred, the disabling effect of the injury was discovered, or the
rights of dependents or beneficiaries accrued, except as provided in
RCW 51.28.055.

--- END ---