BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) There is a growing interest in the tracking, registering, and
reduction of greenhouse gas emissions at both the state and federal
levels of government. This growing interest is evidenced by
Washington's creation of the center for climate and rural energy
development at Washington State University in 2002, as well as the 2003
west coast governor's global warming initiative launched by the
governors of Washington, Oregon, and California.
(2) Although regulatory regimes will likely be necessary to create
a framework for greenhouse gas reductions, market mechanisms will play
an integral role in any plan to reduce greenhouse gas emissions in the
next century. Emission credit trading systems provide greenhouse gas
emitting industries with an efficient market mechanism to comply with
greenhouse gas regulations. Activities that store or trap carbon, such
as growing forests, should be recognized in emission credit trading
systems.
(3) Forests and growing trees act as a sink for carbon by removing
carbon from the atmosphere through photosynthesis and storing the
carbon on a long-term basis in the biomass of the tree.
(4) The high productivity of northwest forests provide the capacity
to sequester large stocks of carbon as compared to forests in other
less productive parts of the country. Managing healthy forests in
longer rotations also provides greater stores of carbon than in young
trees.
(5) The owners of forest lands in the northwest have the
opportunity to participate in carbon emissions trading markets by
making voluntary, long-term commitments to managing their forests for
optimal carbon sequestration.
(6) An economic reward to the landowner can be achieved, in part,
by permitting Washington forest owners to earn a tradable carbon credit
that can be exchanged on the state, national, and international level
when the landowner commits to forest management practices that enhances
carbon sequestration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The forest carbon credits study panel is
created to study opportunities available to the state of Washington to
develop a robust carbon credit trading market for owners of forest
land.
(2) The study panel consists of twelve members as follows:
(a) One representative of the governor's office, appointed by the
governor;
(b) Two representatives of conservation or environmental groups,
appointed by the governor;
(c) Two representatives of industries or businesses that produce
carbon emissions within the state of Washington, appointed by the
governor;
(d) One representative of owners of small private forest lands,
appointed by the governor;
(e) One representative of owners of large or industrial private
forest lands, appointed by the governor;
(f) One representative of the department of natural resources,
appointed by the commissioner of public lands;
(g) One representative of the department of ecology, appointed by
the director of the department of ecology;
(h) One representative of the department of fish and wildlife,
appointed by the director of the department of fish and wildlife;
(i) One representative of the department of revenue, appointed by
the director of the department of revenue; and
(j) One representative of the department of community, trade, and
economic development, appointed by the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development.
(3) The study panel shall study and make recommendations on the
following topics:
(a) The existence or potential for development of sufficient
regulatory basis for a carbon trading market that can be accessed by
state forest landowners;
(b) A definition of the market to which state forest landowners
could access in selling credits;
(c) The benefits and drawbacks of existing models in other states
as applied to Washington;
(d) Whether the implementation of a consistent protocol in all
western states for the accounting of carbon sequestration capacity
value will enhance carbon trading for the owners of forest lands;
(e) What steps are necessary to create carbon credits and implement
a trading market; and
(f) Other topics decided by the study panel as necessary to explore
in order to meet the charge of the study panel.
(4) The study panel may, as necessary and as funding allows,
contract with the University of Washington's school of forestry,
Washington State University's center for climate and rural energy
development, or other suitable institutions to obtain technical
expertise on relevant forestry and economic issues pertaining to the
establishment of a forest carbon credit and trading system.
(5) Each member of the study panel shall serve without
compensation, but may be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized
in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) Staff support for the study panel shall be provided by the
department of community, trade, and economic development and the
department of natural resources.
(7) The findings of the study panel, along with draft legislation
developed by the study panel, shall be reported to the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature by January 2, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 31, 2007.

--- END ---