BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For storm water discharges associated with small construction
activity as identified in 40 C.F.R. 122.26(b)(15), the department may
include conditions that incorporate by reference qualified local
erosion and sediment control program requirements in construction storm
water general permits. A qualified local erosion and sediment control
program, at a minimum, must require construction site operators to:
(a) Implement appropriate erosion and sediment control best
management practices;
(b) Control at the construction site waste that may cause adverse
impacts to water quality, such as discarded building materials,
concrete truck washout, chemicals, litter, and sanitary waste;
(c) Develop and implement a storm water pollution prevention plan;
and
(d) Submit for review and approval by the qualified local program
a site plan that incorporates consideration of potential water quality
impacts.
(2) By December 1, 2006, the department shall publish an
interpretive or policy statement in the Washington State Register that
establishes the procedures and minimum requirements for recognition of
qualified local erosion and sediment control programs. Prior to the
publication of the interpretive or policy statement in the Washington
State Register, the department shall provide opportunity for public
review and comment on the proposed criteria and procedures for
qualified local erosion and sediment control programs.
(3)(a) A local government may apply in writing to the department to
be recognized as administering a qualified local erosion and sediment
control program. The department shall review and determine whether the
local erosion and sediment control program is operated and conducted in
a manner consistent with the minimum requirements for local erosion and
sediment control programs.
(b) If the department determines that the local erosion and
sediment control program is operated and conducted in a manner
consistent with the minimum requirements for local erosion and sediment
control programs, the department shall approve or approve with
conditions the local program as a qualified local program under this
section and incorporate the approved program by reference in the
department's construction storm water general permit.
(c) If the department determines that the local erosion and
sediment control program is not operated and conducted in a manner
consistent with the minimum requirements for local erosion and sediment
control programs, it may not approve the local program as a qualified
local program under this section.
(d)(i) The department may revoke recognition of a qualified local
erosion and sediment control program if the department determines the
local erosion and sediment control program is not implemented in a
manner consistent with the minimum requirements established by the
department for qualified local erosion and sediment control programs.
(ii) If the department revokes recognition of a qualified local
erosion and sediment control program, the local program shall
immediately notify all construction sites covered by the local erosion
and sediment control program that the local program has been revoked
and that the construction site must comply with all applicable
provisions of the department's construction storm water general permit
and must pay permit fees pursuant to RCW 90.48.465.
(4) A qualified local erosion and sediment control program shall
provide an opportunity for public review and comment of at least thirty
days on an application by a construction site operator for approval by
the qualified local program. The program may combine the public review
and comment period with other public review and comment periods
provided by the local government.
(5) The following actions under this section are appealable to the
pollution control hearings board under chapter 43.21B RCW:
(a) The department's decision to approve or approve with conditions
and incorporate a qualified local erosion and sediment control program
into the department's construction storm water general permit;
(b) The department's decision to deny approval of a local erosion
and sediment control program under this section;
(c) The department's determination of whether the minimum
requirements of a qualified local erosion and sediment control program
meet applicable requirements of the federal clean water act;
(d) The department's decision to revoke a qualified local erosion
and sediment control program; and
(e) The qualified local program's decision to approve, condition,
or deny an application by a construction site operator.
(6) The provisions of RCW 90.48.170 and 90.48.465 are not
applicable to a construction site operator with storm water discharges
associated with small construction activity as identified in 40 C.F.R.
122.26(b)(15) and that are located in areas with qualified local
erosion and sediment control programs if the construction site operator
is in full compliance with the requirements of a qualified local
erosion and sediment control program approved by the department.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.48.260 and 2003 c 325 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of ecology is hereby designated as the State Water
Pollution Control Agency for all purposes of the federal clean water
act as it exists on February 4, 1987, and is hereby authorized to
participate fully in the programs of the act as well as to take all
action necessary to secure to the state the benefits and to meet the
requirements of that act. With regard to the national estuary program
established by section 320 of that act, the department shall exercise
its responsibility jointly with the Puget Sound ((water quality
authority)) action team. The department of ecology may delegate its
authority under this chapter, including its national pollutant
discharge elimination permit system authority and duties regarding
animal feeding operations and concentrated animal feeding operations,
to the department of agriculture through a memorandum of understanding.
Until any such delegation receives federal approval, the department of
agriculture's adoption or issuance of animal feeding operation and
concentrated animal feeding operation rules, permits, programs, and
directives pertaining to water quality shall be accomplished after
reaching agreement with the director of the department of ecology.
Adoption or issuance and implementation shall be accomplished so that
compliance with such animal feeding operation and concentrated animal
feeding operation rules, permits, programs, and directives will achieve
compliance with all federal and state water pollution control laws.
The powers granted herein include, among others, and notwithstanding
any other provisions of chapter 90.48 RCW or otherwise, the following:
(1) Complete authority to establish and administer a comprehensive
state point source waste discharge or pollution discharge elimination
permit program which will enable the department to qualify for full
participation in any national waste discharge or pollution discharge
elimination permit system and will allow the department to be the sole
agency issuing permits required by such national system operating in
the state of Washington subject to the provisions of RCW 90.48.262(2)
and section 1 of this act. Program elements authorized herein may
include, but are not limited to: (a) Effluent treatment and limitation
requirements together with timing requirements related thereto; (b)
applicable receiving water quality standards requirements; (c)
requirements of standards of performance for new sources; (d)
pretreatment requirements; (e) termination and modification of permits
for cause; (f) requirements for public notices and opportunities for
public hearings; (g) appropriate relationships with the secretary of
the army in the administration of his responsibilities which relate to
anchorage and navigation, with the administrator of the environmental
protection agency in the performance of his duties, and with other
governmental officials under the federal clean water act; (h)
requirements for inspection, monitoring, entry, and reporting; (i)
enforcement of the program through penalties, emergency powers, and
criminal sanctions; (j) a continuing planning process; and (k) user
charges.
(2) The power to establish and administer state programs in a
manner which will ((insure)) ensure the procurement of moneys, whether
in the form of grants, loans, or otherwise; to assist in the
construction, operation, and maintenance of various water pollution
control facilities and works; and the administering of various state
water pollution control management, regulatory, and enforcement
programs.
(3) The power to develop and implement appropriate programs
pertaining to continuing planning processes, area-wide waste treatment
management plans, and basin planning.
The governor shall have authority to perform those actions required
of him or her by the federal clean water act.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.48.555 and 2004 c 225 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this section apply to the construction and
industrial storm water general permits issued by the department and to
construction permits issued by a qualified local program pursuant to
the federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., and this
chapter.
(1) Effluent limitations shall be included in construction and
industrial storm water general permits and in construction permits
issued by a qualified local program as required under the federal clean
water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., and its implementing
regulations. In accordance with federal clean water act requirements,
pollutant specific, water quality-based effluent limitations shall be
included in construction and industrial storm water general permits and
in construction permits issued by a qualified local program if there is
a reasonable potential to cause or contribute to an excursion of a
state water quality standard.
(2) Subject to the provisions of this section, both technology and
water quality-based effluent limitations may be expressed as:
(a) Numeric effluent limitations;
(b) Narrative effluent limitations; or
(c) A combination of numeric and narrative effluent discharge
limitations.
(3) The department must condition storm water general permits for
industrial and construction activities issued under the national
pollutant discharge elimination system of the federal clean water act
and a qualified local program must condition construction permits to
require compliance with numeric effluent discharge limits when such
discharges are subject to:
(a) Numeric effluent limitations established in federally adopted,
industry-specific effluent guidelines;
(b) State developed, industry-specific performance-based numeric
effluent limitations;
(c) Numeric effluent limitations based on a completed total maximum
daily load analysis or other pollution control measures; or
(d) A determination by the department or a qualified local program
that:
(i) The discharges covered under either the construction or
industrial storm water general permits or a construction permit issued
by a qualified local program have a reasonable potential to cause or
contribute to violation of state water quality standards; and
(ii) Effluent limitations based on nonnumeric best management
practices are not effective in achieving compliance with state water
quality standards.
(4) In making a determination under subsection (3)(d) of this
section, the department or a qualified local program shall use
procedures that account for:
(a) Existing controls on point and nonpoint sources of pollution;
(b) The variability of the pollutant or pollutant parameter in the
storm water discharge; and
(c) As appropriate, the dilution of the storm water in the
receiving waters.
(5) Narrative effluent limitations requiring both the
implementation of best management practices, when designed to satisfy
the technology and water quality-based requirements of the federal
clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., and compliance with water
quality standards, shall be used for construction and industrial storm
water general permits and for construction permits issued by a
qualified local program, unless the provisions of subsection (3) of
this section apply.
(6) Compliance with water quality standards shall be presumed,
unless discharge monitoring data or other site specific information
demonstrates that a discharge causes or contributes to violation of
water quality standards, when the permittee is:
(a) In full compliance with all permit conditions, including
planning, sampling, monitoring, reporting, and recordkeeping
conditions; and
(b)(i) Fully implementing storm water best management practices
contained in storm water technical manuals approved by the department
or a qualified local program, or practices that are demonstrably
equivalent to practices contained in storm water technical manuals
approved by the department or the qualified local program, including
the proper selection, implementation, and maintenance of all applicable
and appropriate best management practices for on-site pollution
control.
(ii) For the purposes of this section, "demonstrably equivalent"
means that the technical basis for the selection of all storm water
best management practices are documented within a storm water pollution
prevention plan. The storm water pollution prevention plan must
document:
(A) The method and reasons for choosing the storm water best
management practices selected;
(B) The pollutant removal performance expected from the practices
selected;
(C) The technical basis supporting the performance claims for the
practices selected, including any available existing data concerning
field performance of the practices selected;
(D) An assessment of how the selected practices will comply with
state water quality standards; and
(E) An assessment of how the selected practices will satisfy both
applicable federal technology-based treatment requirements and state
requirements to use all known, available, and reasonable methods of
prevention, control, and treatment.
(7)(a) The department shall modify the industrial storm water
general permit to require compliance by May 1, 2009, with appropriately
derived numeric water quality-based effluent limitations for existing
discharges to water bodies listed as impaired according to 33 U.S.C.
Sec. 1313(d) (Sec. 303(d) of the federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C.
Sec. 1251 et seq.).
(b) No later than September 1, 2008, the department shall report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature specifying how the
numeric effluent limitation in (a) of this subsection would be
implemented. The report shall identify the number of dischargers to
impaired water bodies and provide an assessment of anticipated
compliance with the numeric effluent limitation established by (a) of
this subsection.
(8)(a) Construction and industrial storm water general permits
issued by the department and construction permits issued by a qualified
local program shall include an enforceable adaptive management
mechanism that includes appropriate monitoring, evaluation, and
reporting. The adaptive management mechanism shall include elements
designed to result in permit compliance and shall include, at a
minimum, the following elements:
(i) An adaptive management indicator, such as monitoring
benchmarks;
(ii) Monitoring;
(iii) Review and revisions to the storm water pollution prevention
plan;
(iv) Documentation of remedial actions taken; and
(v) Reporting to the department or the qualified local program, as
appropriate.
(b) Construction and industrial storm water general permits issued
by the department and construction permits issued by a qualified local
program also shall include the timing and mechanisms for implementation
of treatment best management practices.
(9) Construction and industrial storm water discharges authorized
under general permits or under construction permits issued by a
qualified local program must not cause or have the reasonable potential
to cause or contribute to a violation of an applicable water quality
standard. Where a discharge has already been authorized under a
national pollutant discharge elimination system storm water permit and
it is later determined to cause or have the reasonable potential to
cause or contribute to the violation of an applicable water quality
standard, the department or qualified local program may notify the
permittee of such a violation.
(10) Once notified by the department or qualified local program of
a determination of reasonable potential to cause or contribute to the
violation of an applicable water quality standard, the permittee must
take all necessary actions to ensure future discharges do not cause or
contribute to the violation of a water quality standard and document
those actions in the storm water pollution prevention plan and a report
timely submitted to the department or qualified local program. If
violations remain or recur, coverage under the construction or
industrial storm water general permits may be terminated by the
department, and an alternative general permit or individual permit may
be issued. Compliance with the requirements of this subsection does
not preclude any enforcement activity provided by the federal clean
water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., for the underlying violation.
(11) Receiving water sampling shall not be a requirement of an
industrial or construction storm water general permit except to the
extent that it can be conducted without endangering the health and
safety of persons conducting the sampling.
(12) The department may authorize mixing zones only in compliance
with and after making determinations mandated by the procedural and
substantive requirements of applicable laws and regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 3 of this act expires January 1,
2015.

--- END ---