BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
2005-07 BIENNIUM
Sec. 1 2005 c 313 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) The transportation budget of the state is hereby adopted and,
subject to the provisions set forth, the several amounts specified, or
as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes
designated, are hereby appropriated from the several accounts and funds
named to the designated state agencies and offices for employee
compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and for other
specified purposes, including the payment of any final judgments
arising out of such activities, for the period ending June 30, 2007.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2006" or "FY 2006" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2006.
(b) "Fiscal year 2007" or "FY 2007" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified
purpose which is not expended subject to the specified conditions and
limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.
(f) "Reappropriation" means appropriation and, unless the context
clearly provides otherwise, is subject to the relevant conditions and
limitations applicable to appropriations.
(g) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES -- OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to 2005 c 313
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $200,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided to conduct a marine finance study to:
(a) Identify operating and capital program assumptions for the current
biennium and subsequent ten-year period between 2007-09 and 2015-17;
(b) evaluate cash flow needs; (c) analyze bond sale projections and
debt-service levels; (d) analyze current passenger fare box recovery
ratio estimates used in ten-year financial plans and provide
recommendations for a stable, predictable, and sustainable fare box
recovery ratio; (e) analyze statutory distributions and transfers to
and from the Puget Sound ferry operating account and the Puget Sound
capital construction account to assess the adequacy of these
distributions and transfers to sustain a balanced operating and capital
program; (f) evaluate forecasts and budgeting methodologies used for
projecting ferry compensation increases and fuel costs, and (g)
identify other emerging pressures on the operating and capital budgets
over the next decade. The study is due to the director of the office
of financial management by September 30, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to 2005 c 313
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--DISABILITY SURVIVOR'S BENEFIT
State Patrol Highway Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $507,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
allocation to the department of retirement systems for the Washington
state patrol retirement system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 A new section is added to 2005 c 313
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--PENSION PLAN 1 UNFUNDED
LIABILITIES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
purposes designated in this section and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is sufficient to fund an
additional 0.87% contribution to the public employees' retirement
system and an additional 1.29% contribution to the teachers' retirement
system for legislative and judicial employees from July 1, 2006, until
June 30, 2007. The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriation schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section as identified by agency in OFM document #2006-6R, dated
December 20, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 A new section is added to 2005 c 313
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CENTRAL SERVICE AGENCY CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
central service agency charge adjustments for legislative and judicial
agencies. The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriation schedules to reflect the addition of the funding in this
section as identified by agency in OFM document #2006-90, dated
December 20, 2005.

Sec. 105 2005 c 313 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($390,000))
$394,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: To address its growing caseload, the
marine employees commission shall develop a plan for prioritizing cases
to schedule for hearings. The commission shall report back to the
transportation committees of the legislature on its case prioritization
plan by December 15, 2005.

Sec. 106 2005 c 313 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($200,000))
$436,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) ((If Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5056 is not enacted by
June 30, 2005, the entire appropriation shall lapse.
(2) The entire)) $200,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is for additional staffing costs to be dedicated to state
transportation activities. Furthermore, any staff hired to support
transportation activities must have practical experience with complex
construction projects.
(2) $236,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for legal expenses related to the Lower Elwha Klallam
Tribe v. Washington (graving dock) case.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 A new section is added to 2005 c 313
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $491,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $491,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is provided solely for increased costs
associated with the discovery of Native American remains at the station
camp unit of the Lewis and Clark national historic park.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- OPERATING
Sec. 201 2005 c 313 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,135,000))
$2,145,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,828,000))
$15,833,000
School Zone Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000
Bicycle and Pedestrian Safety Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,303,000))
$21,318,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The Washington traffic safety commission
shall contract with the Washington state institute for public policy to
conduct a study of the impact of state programs concerning the
reduction of DUI recidivism. The study must include, on a prioritized
basis to the extent federal funds are made available for the study, the
following components: (1) The state's existing deferred prosecution
program; (2) the state's vehicle impound program; and (3) other states'
programs that restrict a person's access to the vehicle, or suspend the
vehicle license and registration, upon arrest or conviction.
The completed study must be submitted to the appropriate
legislative committees by December 1, 2006.

Sec. 202 2005 c 313 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($821,000))
$823,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,942,000))
$1,950,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($777,000))
$780,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,540,000))
$3,553,000

Sec. 203 2005 c 313 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,624,000))
$1,630,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,625,000))
$1,632,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,249,000))
$3,262,000

Sec. 204 2005 c 313 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS
Pilotage Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($417,000))
$420,000

Sec. 205 2005 c 313 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,607,000))
$4,610,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,757,000))
$5,760,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,500,000 of the motor vehicle fund account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a comprehensive tolling study.
The transportation commission, with the technical assistance of the
department, must conduct a study of the state's transportation system
to determine the feasibility of administering tolls on specific
transportation facilities or a network of facilities. This study shall
serve as the statewide tolling feasibility study required in Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1541, and shall serve as the tolling study
necessary to implement toll facilities within a regional transportation
investment district or its successor entity.
(a) The study must include an analysis of the only currently-authorized toll facility, the Tacoma Narrows bridge project. The study
findings must include (i) the development of more uniform and equitable
policies regarding the distribution of financial obligations imposed on
those paying the tolls on the Tacoma Narrows bridge, and (ii)
opportunities and options for reducing the outstanding indebtedness on
the bridge project, including the possibility of buy-downs and other
means of spreading the cost of the project more equitably.
(b) The study element for the benefit of a regional transportation
investment district or regional transportation improvement authority
must also address the state highway system and other transportation
facilities in King, Pierce, and Snohomish counties to determine the
feasibility of value pricing on a facility or network of facilities.
This study element should: (i) Determine the potential for value
pricing to generate revenues for needed transportation facilities; (ii)
maximize the efficient operation of facilities and the transportation
network; and (iii) provide economic indicators for future system
investments. This element of the study must take into account
congestion levels, facility and corridor capacity, time of use,
economic considerations, and other factors deemed appropriate. The
study must recommend any additional laws, rules, procedures, resources,
studies, reports, or support infrastructure necessary or desirable
before proceeding with the review, evaluation, or implementation of any
toll projects or a system-wide, value priced transportation structure.
(c) The study must specifically analyze the potential for a toll
facility on SR 704, the cross-base highway located in Pierce county.
(2) $2,270,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the transportation performance audit board. Within
this amount, the transportation performance audit board shall conduct
a study and make recommendations to the legislature regarding the
modification RCW 47.01.012, state transportation goals and benchmarks.
In conducting the study, the board shall consider at a minimum:
Original recommendations of the Blue Ribbon Commission on
Transportation; the current policy goals and benchmark categories; the
goals outlined in Substitute House Bill No. 1969; the recent work
related to benchmarks completed by the transportation commission and
the Washington state department of transportation; the measures review
completed by TPAB; and best practices.
The board shall submit study results, including any legislative
recommendations, to the transportation committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2006.
(3) $1,150,000 of the multimodal account--state appropriation is
provided solely for a statewide rail capacity and needs analysis. The
purpose of this study is to (a) assess the rail freight and rail
passenger infrastructure needs in this state; (b) review the current
powers, authorities, and interests the state has in both passenger and
freight rail; (c) recommend public policies for state participation and
ownership in rail infrastructure and service delivery, including but
not limited to planning and governance issues; and (d) develop a rail
asset management plan. The commission shall report their findings and
conclusions of the study to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2006.

Sec. 206 2005 c 313 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($664,000))
$666,000

Sec. 207 2005 c 313 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($202,530,000))
$202,826,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,544,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $169,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($213,243,000))
$213,539,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed
employment providing traffic control services to the department of
transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles
for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by
the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol
shall be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state
employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines
developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol. The patrol
shall report to the house of representatives and senate transportation
committees by December 31, 2005, on the use of agency vehicles by
officers engaging in the off-duty employment specified in this
subsection. The report shall include an analysis that compares cost
reimbursement and cost-impacts, including increased vehicle mileage,
maintenance costs, and indirect impacts, associated with the private
use of patrol vehicles.
(2) In addition to the user fees, the patrol shall transfer into
the state patrol nonappropriated airplane revolving account under RCW
43.79.470 no more than the amount of appropriated state patrol highway
account and general fund funding necessary to cover the costs for the
patrol's use of the aircraft. The state patrol highway account and
general fund--state funds shall be transferred proportionately in
accordance with a cost allocation that differentiates between highway
traffic enforcement services and general policing purposes.
(3) The patrol shall not account for or record locally provided DUI
cost reimbursement payments as expenditure credits to the state patrol
highway account. The patrol shall report the amount of expected
locally provided DUI cost reimbursements to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 31st
of each year.
(4) The state patrol highway account--state appropriation for DUI
reimbursements shall only be spent for pursuit vehicle video cameras,
datamaster DUI testing equipment, tire deflator equipment, and taser
guns. The Washington state patrol prior to the issuance of any taser
guns will train the troopers on using the equipment. The agency will
provide a report to the transportation committees of the senate and
house of representatives by December 31st of each year on the
occurrences where the taser guns were utilized along with any issues
that have been identified.
(5) $29,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill
No. 1469. If House Bill No. 1469 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $5,580,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for a
3.8% salary increase for commissioned officers effective July 1, 2005,
in addition to any other salary increases provided for in this act.
(((8))) (7) The Washington state patrol is authorized to use
certificates of participation to fund the King Air aircraft replacement
over a term of not more than ten years and an amount not to exceed
$1,900,000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 A new section is added to 2005 c 313
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,358,000

Sec. 209 2005 c 313 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,748,000))
$92,210,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,008,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,756,000))
$94,218,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $247,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1188. If Second Substitute House Bill No.
1188 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(2) The Washington state patrol is instructed to work with the risk
management division in the office of financial management in compiling
the state patrol data for establishing the agency's risk management
insurance premiums to the tort claims account. The office of financial
management and the Washington state patrol shall submit a report to the
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 31st of each year on the number of claims, estimated claims to
be paid, method of calculation, and the adjustment in the premium.
(3) (($6,228,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
automobile fuel in the 2005-2007 biennium.
(4))) $8,678,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
the purchase of pursuit vehicles.
(((5))) (4) $5,254,000 of the total appropriation is provided
solely for vehicle repair and maintenance costs of vehicles used for
highway purposes.
(((6))) (5) $384,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely
for the purchase of mission vehicles used for highway purposes in the
commercial vehicle and traffic investigation sections of the patrol.

Sec. 210 2005 c 313 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,000))
$95,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,418,000))
$11,686,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,043,000))
$7,391,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,000))
$102,000
((Biometric Security Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,000))
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,787,000))
$19,373,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,134,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6103. If Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6103 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 211 2005 c 313 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- INFORMATION SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,698,000))
$22,896,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,095,000))
$12,297,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,825,000))
$5,919,000
((Biometric Security Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $728,000))
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,985,000))
$41,751,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall submit a report to the transportation
committees of the legislature, detailing the progress made in
transitioning from the HP3000 system, by December 30, 2005, and each
December 1st thereafter until the project is fully completed.
(2) $357,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of all special license plate
bills introduced during the 2005 legislative session and approved by
the special license plate review board. The amount provided in this
subsection shall be reduced accordingly for any of those bills that are
not enacted by June 30, 2005.
(3) $58,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5423. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5423 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $145,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6103. If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6103 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec. 212 2005 c 313 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- VEHICLE SERVICES
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($626,000))
$627,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,894,000))
$51,234,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $872,000
DOL Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,146,000
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $404,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,968,000))
$54,309,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $247,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of all special license plate
bills introduced during the 2005 legislative session and approved by
the special license plate review board. The amount provided in this
subsection shall be reduced accordingly for any of those bills that are
not enacted by June 30, 2005.
(2) $11,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No.
5423. If Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5423 is not enacted by June 30,
2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $404,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6103. If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6103 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec. 213 2005 c 313 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- DRIVER SERVICES
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,005,000))
$3,006,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,051,000))
$87,078,000
Highway Safety Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000
((Biometric Security Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,523,000))
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($89,587,000))
$90,092,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $970,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the commercial driver license program. The
department shall informally report to the transportation committees of
the legislature on the progress made in addressing federal audit
findings and in implementing the federal motor carrier safety
improvement act. Reports shall be made by the following dates:
November 1, 2005, and each November 1st thereafter.
(2) $412,000 of the motorcycle safety and education account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department's motorcycle safety
program. The department shall informally report to the transportation
committees of the legislature detailing the progress made in
implementing national highway traffic safety assessment guidelines.
Reports shall be made by the following dates: November 1, 2005, and
each November 1st thereafter.
(3) The department of licensing, in consultation with the
department of transportation and other stakeholders, shall draft
legislation to bring the state into compliance with any federal
legislation or rules enacted relative to identification necessary for
persons crossing international borders. The department shall report to
the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005,
on the recommended legislation for bringing the state into compliance
with federal requirements.

Sec. 214 2005 c 313 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TOLL OPERATIONS AND
MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,615,000))
$8,624,000

Sec. 215 2005 c 313 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM
C
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($55,941,000))
$56,630,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,973,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,558,000))
$8,572,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,835,000))
$67,538,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $850,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided for the continued maintenance and support of the
transportation executive information system (TEIS). The TEIS shall be
enhanced during the 2005 legislative interim to shift towards a
monitoring and reporting system capable of tracking and reporting on
major project milestones and measurements. The department shall work
with the legislature to identify and define meaningful milestones and
measures to be used in monitoring the scope, schedule, and cost of
projects.
(2) $350,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for a financial and capital project system needs
assessment for future automation development and enhancements. The
completed assessment will identify options which shall be presented to
the transportation committees of the senate and the house of
representatives by December 31, 2005.
(3) The department shall consult with the office of financial
management and the department of information services to ensure that
(a) the department's current and future system development is
consistent with the overall direction of other key state systems; and
(b) when possible, use or develop common statewide information systems
to encourage coordination and integration of information used by the
department and other state agencies and to avoid duplication.
(4) $245,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for expanding the department's existing agreement with
the department of information services. This amount is provided for
additional bandwidth to accommodate web demand, particularly during
peak periods.
(5) $302,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department's share of the costs for the Union
Gap disaster recovery facility.

Sec. 216 2005 c 313 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS
AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,499,000))
$33,640,000

Sec. 217 2005 c 313 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,632,000))
$7,137,000
Aeronautics Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
((Aircraft Search and Rescue Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,000))
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,044,000))
$10,287,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) $433,000 of the aeronautics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for airport pavement projects. The department's
aviation division shall complete a priority airport pavement project
list by January 1, 2006, to be considered by the legislature in the
2006 supplemental budget. If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5414 is not
enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(b) ((The entire aircraft search and rescue safety and education
account appropriation shall lapse if Substitute Senate Bill No. 5414 is
enacted by June 30, 2005.
(c))) If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5414 is enacted by July 1,
2005, then the remaining unexpended fund balance in the aircraft search
and rescue, safety, and education account shall be deposited into the
state aeronautics account.
(2) The entire multimodal transportation account--state and federal
appropriations are provided solely for implementing Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121. If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5121 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, or if federal funds are not
received by March 1, 2006, for the purpose of implementing Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 218 2005 c 313 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,961,000))
$49,128,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Multimodal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,711,000))
$49,878,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided to the department in accordance with RCW 46.68.110(2) and
46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department solely for the
purposes of providing contract services to the association of
Washington cities and Washington state association of counties for (a)
activities of the transportation permit efficiency and accountability
committee, including pilot mitigation banking activities, and (b) other
permit delivery efforts.
(2) $1,475,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the staffing activities of the transportation
permit efficiency and accountability committee.

Sec.219 2005 c 313 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS -- PROGRAM
K
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,068,000))
$1,072,000

Sec. 220 2005 c 313 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($296,648,000))
$299,393,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,426,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,315,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($302,389,000))
$305,134,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) If portions of the appropriations in this section are required
to fund maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by
federal emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides,
supplemental appropriations must be requested to restore state funding
for ongoing maintenance activities.
(2) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
federal moneys received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall
place an equal amount of the motor vehicle account -- state into
unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the amount of
funding available for snow and ice removal.
(3) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
private or local funds received for reimbursements of third party
damages that are in excess of the motor vehicle account -- private/local
appropriation.
(4) Funding is provided for maintenance on the state system to
allow for a continuation of the level of service targets included in
the 2003-05 biennium. In delivering the program, the department should
concentrate on the following areas:
(a) Meeting or exceeding the target for structural bridge repair on
a statewide basis;
(b) Eliminating the number of activities delivered in the "f" level
of service at the region level;
(c) Reducing the number of activities delivered in the "d" level of
service by increasing the resources directed to those activities on a
statewide and region basis; and
(d) Evaluating, analyzing, and potentially redistributing resources
within and among regions to provide greater consistency in delivering
the program statewide and in achieving overall level of service
targets.
(5) The department shall develop and implement a plan to improve
work zone safety on a statewide basis. As part of the strategy
included in the plan, the department shall fund equipment purchases
using a portion of the money from the annual OTEF equipment purchasing
and replacement process. The department shall also identify and
evaluate statewide equipment needs (such as work zone safety equipment)
and prioritize any such needs on a statewide basis. Substitute
purchasing at the statewide level, when appropriate, shall be utilized
to meet those identified needs. The department must report to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2005, on
the plan, and by December 1, 2006, on the status of implementing the
plan.

Sec. 221 2005 c 313 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q--OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,811,000))
$43,847,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,989,000))
$46,025,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $4,400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The
department shall give priority to low-cost enhancement projects that
improve safety or provide congestion relief. The department shall
prioritize low-cost enhancement projects on a statewide rather than
regional basis.

Sec. 222 2005 c 313 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,434,000))
$25,516,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,321,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,758,000))
$27,840,000

Sec. 223 2005 c 313 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA,
AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,390,000))
$22,502,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,756,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,267,000))
$1,374,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,829,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,000,000))
$2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,342,000))
$45,561,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In order to qualify for state planning funds available to
regional transportation planning organizations under this section, a
regional transportation planning organization containing any county
with a population in excess of one million shall provide voting
membership on its executive board to any incorporated principal city of
a metropolitan statistical area within the region, as designated by the
United States census bureau, and to any incorporated city within the
region with a population in excess of eighty thousand as of July 1,
2005. Additionally, a regional transportation planning organization
described under this subsection shall conduct a review of its executive
board membership criteria to ensure that the criteria appropriately
reflects a true and comprehensive representation of the organization's
jurisdictions of significance within the region.
(((3))) (2) $2,000,000 of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation is provided solely for the costs of the regional
transportation investment district (RTID) election and department of
transportation project oversight. These funds are provided as a loan
to the RTID and shall be repaid to the state motor vehicle account
within one year following the certification of the election results
related to the RTID. If either Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2157 or Senate Bill No. 6089 are enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse. None of this appropriation
may be used for election expenses for an election held before January
1, 2006.
(((4))) (3) $175,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided to the department in accordance with RCW
46.68.110(2) and 46.68.120(3) and shall be used by the department to
support the processing and analysis of the backlog of city and county
collision reports by January 2006. The amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse if federal funds become available for this
purpose.
(((5))) (4) $150,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1565. If Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1565 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((6))) (5) The department of transportation shall evaluate the
number of spaces available for long-haul truck parking relative to
current and projected future needs. The department of transportation
shall also explore options for augmenting the number of spaces
available, including, but not limited to, expanding state-owned rest
areas or modifying regulations governing the use of these facilities,
utilizing weigh stations and park and ride lots, and encouraging the
expansion of the private sector's role. Finally, the department shall
explore the utility of coordinating with neighboring states on
long-haul truck parking and evaluate methodologies for alleviating any
air quality issues relative to the issue. The department must report
to the transportation committees of the legislature by December 1,
2005, on the options, strategies, and recommendations for long-haul
truck parking.
(((7))) (6) $50,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for evaluating high-speed passenger
transportation facilities and services, including rail or magnetic
levitation transportation systems, to connect airports as a means to
more efficiently utilize airport capacity, as well as connect major
population and activity centers. This evaluation shall be coordinated
with the airport capacity and facilities market analysis conducted
pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121 and results of
the evaluation shall be submitted by July 1, 2007. If Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, or if
federal funds are not received by March 1, 2006, for the purpose of
implementing Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5121, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 224 2005 c 313 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES--PROGRAM U
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,030,000))
$46,874,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,430,000))
$47,274,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $31,749,000 of the motor vehicle fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for the liabilities attributable to the department of
transportation. The office of financial management must provide a
detailed accounting of the revenues and expenditures of the self-insurance fund to the transportation committees of the legislature on
December 31st and June 30th of each year.
(2) Payments in this section represent charges from other state
agencies to the department of transportation.
(a) FOR PAYMENT OF OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
DIVISION OF RISK MANAGEMENT FEES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,667,000
(b) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,017,000))
$1,026,000
(c) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED
MAIL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,049,000
(d) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,572,000))
$4,548,000
(e) FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY
PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,749,000
(f) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS SURCHARGE . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,717,000
(g) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . $545,000
(h) FOR OFFICE OF MINORITIES AND WOMEN BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,114,000))
$1,124,000
(i) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
HRMS PAYROLL SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . $817,000
(j) FOR PAYMENT OF THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT ROADMAP CHARGES . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
(k) FOR PAYMENT OF OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
CAPITAL BUDGET SYSTEM CHARGES . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
(l) FOR PAYMENT OF DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES
RATE INCREASES . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000

Sec. 225 2005 c 313 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM
V
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,269,000))
$82,283,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,603,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,027,000))
$85,041,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs
transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of
transportation.
(a) $5,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs
transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers shall be based on need,
including the availability of other providers of service in the area,
efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost
effectiveness of trips provided.
(b) $19,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons
with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit
agency must have a maintenance of effort for special needs
transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of
effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies
shall be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response
service and route deviated service in calendar year 2003 as reported in
the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2003" published by the
department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than
thirty percent of these distributions. The first $450,000 provided to
King county shall be used as follows:
(i) $320,000 shall be used to provide electric buses, instead of
diesel buses, for service on Capital Hill in Seattle, Washington
through June 30, 2007;
(ii) $130,000 shall be used to provide training for blind
individuals traveling through Rainier Valley and the greater Seattle
area. The training is to include destination training and retraining
due to the expected closure of the downtown bus tunnel and training on
how to use the Sound Transit light rail system.
(2) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the Summary of
Public Transportation - 2003 published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served or underserved by transit agencies through a
competitive grant process.
(3) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (a)
Public transit agencies to add vanpools; and (b) incentives for
employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for
public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; no operating
costs for public transit agencies are eligible for funding under this
grant program. No additional employees may be hired from the funds
provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and supplanting
of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed. Additional
criteria for selecting grants must include leveraging funds other than
state funds.
(4) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the city of Seattle for the
Seattle streetcar project on South Lake Union. ((Should the city
receive any state funds for this purpose during the 2003-05 or 2005-07
biennium, the amount provided in this subsection must be reduced
accordingly.))
(5) $1,200,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2124. If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2124 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6) ((Pursuant to the grant program established in Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2124, the department shall issue a call for
projects and/or service proposals. Applications must be received by
the department by November 1, 2005, and November 1, 2006. The
department must submit a prioritized list for funding to the
transportation committees of the legislature that reflects the
department's recommendation, as well as, a list of all project or
service proposals received.))
(7))) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for new tri-county connection service
for Island, Skagit, and Whatcom transit agencies.
(((8))) (7) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided solely to King county as a state match
to obtain federal funding for a car sharing program for persons meeting
certain income or employment criteria.
(8) $20,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for regional mobility grant projects
authorized by chapter 318, Laws of 2005.

Sec. 226 2005 c 313 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($350,454,000))
$364,933,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,660,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($354,114,000))
$368,593,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($57,928,000)) $71,718,000 of the total appropriation is
provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel in the 2005-2007
biennium.
(2) The total appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry
employees. The expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees
during the 2005-2007 biennium may not exceed (($222,356,000, plus a
dollar amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management,
that is equal to any insurance benefit increase granted general
government employees in excess of $584.58 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine
employees for fiscal year 2006 and $584.58 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine
employees for fiscal year 2007, a dollar amount as prescribed by the
office of financial management for costs associated with pension
amortization charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of
financial management for salary increases during the 2005-2007
biennium. For the purposes of this section, the expenditures for
compensation paid to ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and
wages and employee benefits as defined in the office of financial
management's policies, regulations, and procedures named under objects
of expenditure "A" and "B" (7.2.6.2))) $223,059,000.
(3) $1,116,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for ferry security operations
necessary to comply with the ferry security plan submitted by the
Washington state ferry system to the United States coast guard. The
department shall track security costs and expenditures. Ferry security
operations costs shall not be included as part of the operational costs
that are used to calculate farebox recovery.
(4) The Washington state ferries must work with the department's
information technology division to implement an electronic fare system,
including the integration of the regional fare coordination system
(smart card). Each December and June, semi-annual updates must be
provided to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning
the status of implementing and completing this project, with updates
concluding the first December after full project implementation.
(5) The Washington state ferries shall continue to provide service
to Sidney, British Columbia.
(6) $3,660,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to provide passenger-only ferry
service. The ferry system shall continue passenger-only ferry service
from Vashon Island to Seattle through June 30, 2007. Beginning
September 1, 2005, ferry system management shall implement its
agreement with the Inlandboatmen's Union of the Pacific and the
International Organization of Masters, Mates and Pilots providing for
part-time passenger-only work schedules. Funds may not be spent to
implement the results of the passenger-only ferry study conducted by
the joint transportation committee provided in section 205 of this act
until approved by the legislature.

Sec. 227 2005 c 313 s 227 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,420,000))
$36,266,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $29,091,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service contract and
Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and maintaining
the state-supported passenger rail service.
(2) $2,750,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a new round trip rail service
between Seattle and Portland beginning July 1, 2006.
(3) No AMTRAK Cascade runs may be eliminated.
(4) (($200,000)) $40,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided solely for the produce railcar program.
The department is encouraged to implement the produce railcar program
by maximizing private investment.

Sec. 228 2005 c 313 s 228 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z--OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,947,000))
$8,275,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,597,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $211,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,755,000))
$11,083,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $211,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation and
$211,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
are provided solely for the state's contribution to county and city
studies of flood hazards in association with interstate highways.
First priority shall be given to threats along the I-5 corridor.
(2) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for contract services with the association of
Washington cities and the Washington state association of counties for
improving transportation permitting and mitigation processes.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES--CAPITAL
Sec. 301 2005 c 313 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,933,000))
$64,933,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,392,000))
$32,697,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($98,680,000))
$97,985,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $355,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided for county ferries as set forth in RCW
47.56.725(4).

Sec. 302 2005 c 313 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,425,000))
$101,425,000
Small City Preservation and Sidewalk
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($103,601,000))
$94,401,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($205,026,000))
$197,826,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The transportation improvement account -- state appropriation
includes $14,143,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
RCW 47.26.500. The transportation improvement board may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the agency in lieu of bond
proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) $2,000,000 of the small city preservation and sidewalk
account--state appropriation is provided to fund the provisions of
chapter 83, Laws of 2005 (Substitute Senate Bill No. 5775).

Sec. 303 2005 c 313 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,492,000))
$2,328,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($601,000)) $584,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for ((the)) statewide administration.
(2) $632,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for regional minor projects.
(3) (($224,000)) $305,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for designing the replacement of the
existing outdated maintenance facility in Ephrata.
(4) (($219,000)) $239,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the designing of the northwest
regional maintenance complex in Seattle.
(5) (($833,000)) $568,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Olympic region headquarters
project.
(a) The department of transportation is authorized to use
certificates of participation for the financing of the Olympic region
project in the amount of $34,874,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.
(b) The Washington state department of transportation may utilize
the design-build process in accordance with chapter 39.10 RCW for the
Olympic region project. If the design-build process is used, it may be
developed in partnership with the department of general administration.

Sec. 304 2005 c 313 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,175,004,000))
$1,200,020,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,359,000))
$87,445,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($229,036,000))
$369,463,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,893,000))
$58,522,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,419,000))
$3,479,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($272,329,000))
$274,038,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($519,786,000))
$390,333,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,002,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,303,826,000))
$2,384,302,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account
appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as
listed by fund, project and amount in ((LEAP Transportation Document
2005-6, Highway Improvement Program (I) as developed April 24,)) the
governor's 2006 supplemental budget request, dated December 20, 2005.
However, limited transfers of allocations between projects may occur
for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in
section 603 of this act.
(((b))) (a) Within the amounts provided in this subsection,
(($5,000,000)) $6,835,000 of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation ((is)), $5,002,000 of the transportation 2003
account (nickel account)--state appropriation, and $2,645,000 of the
motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are provided solely for
project ((109040S)) 109040T: I-90/Seattle to Mercer Island – Two way
transit/HOV. Expenditure of these funds is contingent upon the
development of an access plan that provides equitable and dependable
access for I-90 Mercer Island exit and entry.
(((c))) (b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection,
$500,000 of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation
is provided solely for a west Olympia access study, to complete an
access study for state route 101/west Olympia.
(((d))) (c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection,
$800,000 of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation
is provided solely for an SR 534 access point decision report.
(((f))) (d) Within the amounts provided within this subsection,
(($435,000,000)) $6,000,000 of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation is provided solely for project 509009B: I-90
Snoqualmie Pass East - Hyak to Keechelus dam. However, if the
preferred alternative selected for this project results in a lower
total project cost, the remaining funds may be used for concrete
rehabilitation on I-90 in the vicinity of this project.
(2) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
(($53,000,000)) $50,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.
(3) The department shall not commence construction on any part of
the SR 520 bridge project until agreements have been reached with the
incorporated towns or cities that represent the communities affected by
the SR 520 project. The agreements must provide reasonable assurance
that no further degradation will occur to the citizens' current use and
enjoyment of their properties as a result of repairs and improvements
made to the SR 520 bridge and its connecting roadways. Such assurances
may be achieved through engineering design choices, mitigation
measures, or a combination of both.
(4) The transportation partnership account--state appropriation
includes (($400,000,000)) $200,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized ((by Substitute House Bill No. 2311 (or the version as
enacted into law))) in RCW 47.10.873. The transportation commission
may authorize the use of current revenues available to the department
of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.
(5) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state appropriation
includes $257,016,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843. The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account--state
appropriation includes (($15,313,000)) $17,022,000 in unexpended
proceeds from the ((January 2003)) March 2005 bond sale authorized in
RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma Narrows bridge project.
(6) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation includes $940,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by chapter 147, Laws of 2003. The transportation commission
may authorize the use of current revenues available to the department
of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.
(7) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to program I and replaced with state funds
in a dollar-for-dollar match. Fund transfers authorized under this
subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
((The department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2006.))
(8) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2005, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each project in the project lists
submitted pursuant to this act and on any additional projects for which
the department has expended funds during the 2005-07 fiscal biennium.
The department shall work with the office of financial management and
the transportation committees of the legislature to agree on report
formatting and elements. Elements shall include, but not be limited
to, project scope, schedule, and costs. The department shall also
provide the information required under this subsection via the
transportation executive information systems (TEIS).
(9) The department of transportation shall conduct an analysis of
the causes of traffic congestion on I-5 in the vicinity of Fort Lewis
and develop recommendations for alleviating the congestion. The
department must report to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2005, on its analysis and recommendations
regarding traffic congestion on I-5 in the vicinity of Fort Lewis.
(10) The department of transportation is authorized to proceed with
the SR 519 Intermodal Access project if the city of Seattle has not
agreed to a project configuration or design by July 1, 2006.
(((12))) (11) $13,000,000 of the transportation 2003 account
(nickel account)--state appropriation and $5,000,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation are provided
solely for construction of a new interchange on SR 522 to provide
direct access to the University of Washington Bothell/Cascadia
community college joint campus. This appropriation assumes an
additional $8,000,000 will be provided in the 2007-09 biennium from the
transportation partnership account.
(12) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$14,214,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
RCW 47.10.843.
(13) The special category C account--state appropriation includes
$1,710,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
RCW 47.10.812.
(14) $962,500 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for consultant contracts to assist the department in
the delivery of the capital construction program by identifying
improvements to program delivery, program management, project controls,
program and project monitoring, forecasting, and reporting.
Recognizing that a number of efforts are emerging that will impact the
way the department budgets, programs, and reports on capital projects
it is important that standardized terms and common definitions be used,
common milestones be identified to report against, and projects be
summarized at the project group, corridor, subcorridor, or mega-project
level. The consultants shall develop a capital construction strategic
plan, due to the office of financial management and the house of
representatives and senate transportation committees by March 1, 2006,
with a final due date of June 30, 2006. The consultants shall work
with the department of information services as they undertake the
assessment of the information technology resources necessary to support
program and project management systems and include department of
information services recommendations in their reports. The consultants
shall also coordinate their work with the roadmap for Washington state
financial and administrative policies and processes and systems
(Roadmap); the joint transportation committee budget study; the
findings of the critical applications modernization and integration
strategies study, including proposed next steps; and consider the
indicators, strategies, and performance measures of the priorities of
government. The department shall report to the office of financial
management by August 31, 2006, on recommended capital budgeting and
reporting options, including criteria and processes for project
transfers.

Sec. 305 2005 c 313 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,622,000))
$1,687,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($76,824,000))
$96,568,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($404,360,000))
$419,474,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,656,000))
$8,485,000
Puyallup Tribal Settlement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($139,533,000))
$24,540,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($648,995,000))
$561,754,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account
appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as
listed by fund, project and amount in ((LEAP Transportation Document
2005-6, Highway Preservation Program (P) as developed April 24,)) the
governor's 2006 supplemental budget request, dated December 20, 2005.
However, limited transfers of allocations between projects may occur
for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in
section 603 of this act.
(((a) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $139,033,000
of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of structures preservation (P2)
projects.
(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $500,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation is provided
solely for implementation of other facilities (P3) projects.))
(2) $11,000,000 of the Puyallup tribal settlement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for mitigation costs associated with
the Murray Morgan/11st Street Bridge demolition. The department may
negotiate with the city of Tacoma for the purpose of transferring
ownership of the Murray Morgan/11th Street Bridge to the city. The
department may use the Puyallup tribal settlement account
appropriation, as well as any funds appropriated in the current
biennium and planned in future biennia for the demolition and
mitigation for the demolition of the bridge to rehabilitate or replace
the bridge, if agreed to by the city. In no event shall the
department's participation exceed $26,500,000 and no funds may be
expended unless the city of Tacoma agrees to take ownership of the
bridge in its entirety and provide that the payment of these funds
extinguishes any real or implied agreements regarding future
expenditures on the bridge.
(3) (($11,590,000)) $740,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation, (($95,299,000)) $106,149,000 of the motor vehicle
account--federal appropriation, and (($113,591,000)) $10,305,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the Hood Canal bridge project.
(4) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
(($530,000)) $735,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized in RCW 47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for emergency purposes.
(5) The department of transportation shall continue to implement
the lowest life cycle cost planning approach to pavement management
throughout the state to encourage the most effective and efficient use
of pavement preservation funds. Emphasis should be placed on
increasing the number of roads addressed on time and reducing the
number of roads past due.
(6) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to program P and replaced with state funds
in a dollar-for-dollar match. Fund transfers authorized under this
subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
((The department shall not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission and the
director of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 1,
2006.))
(7) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2005, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each project in the project lists
submitted pursuant to this act and on any additional projects for which
the department has expended funds during the 2005-07 fiscal biennium.
The department shall work with the office of financial management and
the transportation committees of the legislature to agree on report
formatting and elements. Elements shall include, but not be limited
to, project scope, schedule, and costs. The department shall also
provide the information required under this subsection via the
transportation executive information systems (TEIS).
(8) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$912,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
RCW 47.10.843.
(9) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$3,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(10) $2,537,500 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for consultant contracts to assist the department in
the delivery of the capital construction program by identifying
improvements to program delivery, program management, project controls,
program and project monitoring, forecasting, and reporting.
Recognizing that a number of efforts are emerging that will impact the
way the department budgets, programs, and reports on capital projects
it is important that standardized terms and common definitions be used,
common milestones be identified to report against, and projects be
summarized at the project group, corridor, subcorridor, or mega-project
level. The consultants shall develop a capital construction strategic
plan, due to the office of financial management and the house of
representatives and senate transportation committees by March 1, 2006,
with a final due date of June 30, 2006. The consultants shall work
with the department of information services as they undertake the
assessment of the information technology resources necessary to support
program and project management systems and include department of
information services recommendations in their reports. The consultants
shall also coordinate their work with the roadmap for Washington state
financial and administrative policies and processes and systems
(Roadmap); the joint transportation committee budget study; the
findings of the critical applications modernization and integration
strategies study, including proposed next steps; and consider the
indicators, strategies, and performance measures of the priorities of
government. The department shall report to the office of financial
management by August 31, 2006, on recommended capital budgeting and
reporting options, including criteria and processes for project
transfers.

Sec. 306 2005 c 313 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($153,184,000))
$122,134,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($59,967,000))
$73,590,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,249,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,987,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($261,413,000))
$243,986,000

The appropriations in this section are provided for improving the
Washington state ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel preservation, and terminal
preservation, construction, and improvements. The appropriations in
this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The Puget Sound capital construction account -- state
appropriation includes (($72,000,000)) $40,950,000 in proceeds from the
sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and terminal
acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long lead time materials
acquisition for the Washington state ferries. The transportation
commission may authorize the use of current revenues available to the
motor vehicle account in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the
state appropriation.
(2) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes $10,249,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.867. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds from any part of the state appropriation.
(3) $15,617,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for the Eagle Harbor Terminal
Preservation project.
(4) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation and $10,249,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation are provided solely for the projects and
activities as listed by fund, project and amount in ((LEAP
Transportation Document 2005-6, Ferries Construction Program (W) as
developed April 24,)) the governor's 2006 supplemental budget request,
dated December 20, 2005. However, limited transfers of allocations
between projects may occur for those amounts listed subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act.
(5) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2005, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each project in the project lists
submitted pursuant to this act and on any additional projects for which
the department has expended funds during the 2005-07 fiscal biennium.
Elements shall include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule,
and costs. The department shall also provide the information required
under this subsection via the transportation executive information
systems (TEIS).
(6) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement approved recommendations
of the stakeholder task force convened to study the most reliable and
cost-effective means of providing passenger-only ferry service. The
funds provided in this subsection shall be placed in reserve by the
office of financial management. The funds may not be released until
approved by the legislature.
(7) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes $1,170,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized in RCW 47.10.867.

Sec. 307 2005 c 313 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL
Essential Rail Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,158,000))
$67,846,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,287,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,966,000))
$17,262,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,161,000))
$93,645,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The multimodal transportation account -- state appropriation
includes $33,435,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds and $830,000 in
unexpended bond proceeds authorized by RCW 47.10.867. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues
available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) If federal block grant funding for freight or passenger rail is
received, the department shall consult with the transportation
committees of the legislature prior to spending the funds on additional
projects.
(3)(a) (($67,158,000)) $67,846,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation, (($11,966,000)) $17,262,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--federal appropriation, $8,287,000 of
the multimodal transportation account--local appropriation, and
$250,000 of the essential rail assistance account are provided solely
for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project and amount
in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2005-2, Rail Capital Program (Y) as
developed April 23,)) the governor's 2006 supplemental budget request,
dated December 20, 2005. However, limited transfers of allocations
between projects may occur for those amounts listed subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act.
(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $6,500,000 of
the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided
solely for the two commuter rail projects listed in the ((LEAP
Transportation Document 2005-6, Rail Capital Program (Y) as developed
April 24,)) governor's 2006 supplemental budget request, dated December
20, 2005.
(4) If the department issues a call for projects, applications must
be received by the department by November 1, 2005, and November 1,
2006.
(5) $50,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a study of eastern Skagit county
freight rail. The study shall examine the feasibility of restoring
portions of freight rail line to the towns of Lyman, Hamilton, and
Concrete. The study must also identify existing and potential
industrial sites available for development and redevelopment, and the
freight rail service needs of the identified industrial sites.

Sec. 308 2005 c 313 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z--CAPITAL
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,221,000))
$17,110,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,702,000))
$6,140,000
Freight Mobility Investment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,000,000))
$6,000,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,002,000))
$38,593,000
Transportation 2003 Account (nickel account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $557,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,700,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($74,734,000))
$79,909,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) To manage some projects more efficiently, federal funds may be
transferred from program Z to programs I and P and state funds shall be
transferred from programs I and P to program Z to replace those federal
funds in a dollar-for-dollar match. Fund transfers authorized under
this subsection shall not affect project prioritization status.
Appropriations shall initially be allotted as appropriated in this act.
((The department may not transfer funds as authorized under this
subsection without approval of the transportation commission. The
department shall submit a report on those projects receiving fund
transfers to the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives by December 1, 2006.))
(2) The department shall, on a quarterly basis, provide status
reports to the legislature on the delivery of projects as outlined in
the project lists distributed with this act, and on any additional
projects for which the department has expended funds during the 2005-07
fiscal biennium. The department shall work with the transportation
committees of the legislature to agree on report formatting and
elements. For projects funded by new revenue in the 2003 and 2005
transportation packages, reporting elements shall include, but not be
limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs. Other projects may be
reported on a programmatic basis. The department shall also provide
the information required under this subsection via the transportation
executive information system (TEIS).
(3) The multimodal transportation account -- state appropriation
includes $6,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.867. The transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.
(4) (($3,545,000)) $1,545,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely to
fund the multiphase cooperative project with the state of Oregon to
dredge the Columbia River. The amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse unless the state of Oregon appropriates a dollar-for-dollar
match to fund its share of the project.
(5) (($274,000)) $206,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for additional
traffic and pedestrian safety improvements near schools. The highways
and local programs division within the department of transportation
shall administer this program. The department shall review all
projects receiving grant awards under this program at least
semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory
progress. Any project that has been awarded traffic and pedestrian
safety improvement grant funds, but does not report activity on the
project within one year of grant award should be reviewed by the
department to determine whether the grant should be terminated. The
department must promptly close out grants when projects have been
completed, and identify where unused grant funds remain because actual
project costs were lower than estimated in the grant award. The
department shall expeditiously extend new grant awards to qualified
projects when funds become available either because grant awards have
been rescinded for lack of sufficient project activity or because
completed projects returned excess grant funds upon project closeout.
(6) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes
$905,000 in unexpended proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
RCW 47.10.843.
(7) (($867,000)) $607,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely to
support the safe routes to school program.
(8) (($18,221,000)) $16,110,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation is provided solely for the local freight capital
projects in progress identified in this subsection. The specific
funding listed is provided solely for the respective projects: SR 397
Ainsworth Ave. Grade Crossing, (($5,180,000)) $4,992,000; Colville
Alternate Truck Route, (($2,000,000)) $1,746,000; S. 228th Street
Extension and Grade Separation, $6,500,000; Bigelow Gulch Road-Urban
Boundary to Argonne Rd., $2,000,000; Granite Falls Alternate Route,
(($1,791,000)) $122,000; and Pacific Hwy. E./Port of Tacoma Road to
Alexander, $750,000.
(9) (($3,400,000)) $2,898,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the local freight capital projects
in progress identified in this subsection. The specific funding listed
is provided solely for the respective projects: Duwamish Intelligent
Transportation Systems (ITS), (($2,520,000)) $2,382,000; Port of
Kennewick/Piert Road, (($520,000; SR 397 Ainsworth Ave. Grade Crossing,
$360,000)) $516,000.
(10) $6,000,000 of the multimodal account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the local freight 'D' street grade separation
project.
(11) The department must issue a call for pedestrian safety
projects, such as safe routes to schools and transit, and bicycle and
pedestrian paths. Applications must be received by the department by
November 1, 2005, and November 1, 2006. The department shall identify
cost-effective projects, and submit a prioritized list to the
legislature for funding by December 15th of each year. Preference will
be given to projects that provide a local match. The grant recipients
may only be governmental entities.
(12) (($19,540,000)) $19,391,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation, $6,000,000 of the freight mobility
multimodal account--state appropriation, and (($12,000,000)) $6,000,000
of the freight investment account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project and
amount in ((LEAP Transportation Document 2005-6, Local Programs (Z) as
developed April 24, 2005. However, limited transfers of allocations
between projects may occur for those amounts listed subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act)) the governor's
2006 supplemental budget request, dated December 20, 2005.
(13) $870,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Yakima Avenue, 9th Street to
Front Street, pedestrian safety improvement project.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Sec. 401 2005 c 313 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND
DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND
REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($354,913,000))
$335,157,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,775,000))
$5,748,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,010,000))
$38,240,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,899,000))
$30,679,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,562,000))
$1,550,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,000))
$120,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($303,000))
$370,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,177,000))
$6,343,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,550,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($455,744,000))
$419,757,000

Sec. 402 2005 c 313 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND
FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($283,000))
$195,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($96,000))
$35,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,400,000))
$584,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,800,000))
$130,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,592,000))
$957,000

Sec. 403 2005 c 313 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS
(1) Motor Vehicle Account--State Reappropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $257,016,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$257,016,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for the Tacoma
Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be
deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound capital construction
account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($72,000,000))
$40,950,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
(($72,000,000)) $40,950,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for
vessel and terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long
lead-time materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries.

Sec. 404 2005 c 313 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($450,757,000))
$487,160,000

Sec. 405 2005 c 313 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account--State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . (($820,769,000))
$1,040,210,000

Sec. 406 2005 c 313 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSFERS
(1) RV Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000,000
(3) Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(4) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry Operations
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,087,000
(5) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Partnership
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,372,000
(6) Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Multimodal Transportation
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,170,000
(7) Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Small City Pavement and Sidewalk
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(8) Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Improvement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(9) Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Rural Arterial Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
(10) Technology Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
(11) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the State Patrol Highway Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,406,000
(12) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation 2003 Account
(Nickel Account)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $461,000
(13) Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Transportation Partnership
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,400,000
(14) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Freight Mobility Multimodal
Account--State, up to a maximum of . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000
(15) Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry Operations
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

The transfers identified in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(a) The department of transportation shall only transfer funds in
subsection (2) of this section up to the level provided, on an as-needed basis.
(b) The amount identified in subsection (3) of this section may not
include any revenues collected as passenger fares.
(c) The amount transferred in subsection (14) of this section shall
be the same as the Union Pacific Railroad's original contribution
adjusted for earned interest and expenditures and shall be made on June
30, 2006.

IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 A new section is added to 2005 c 313
(uncodified) to read as follows:
Executive Order number 05-05, archaeological and cultural
resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005. Agencies and higher
education institutions that issue grants or loans for capital projects
shall comply with the requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 2005 c 313 s 602 (uncodified) is repealed.

MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

BOARD OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 6, 29
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
DRIVER SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
VEHICLE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AVIATION -- PROGRAM F . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS -- PROGRAM K . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM C . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
MARINE -- PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
CENTRAL SERVICE AGENCY CHARGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
DISABILITY SURVIVOR'S BENEFIT . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
PENSION PLAN 1 UNFUNDED LIABILITIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 45, 46, 47
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 6, 30
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
--- END ---