BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 63.14 RCW
to read as follows:
If a retail installment contract for the purchase of a motor
vehicle meets the requirements of this chapter and meets the
requirements of any federal law applicable to a retail installment
contract for the purchase of a motor vehicle, the retail installment
contract shall be accepted for consideration by any lender, except for
lenders licensed and regulated under the provisions of chapter 31.04
RCW, to whom application is made for credit relating to the retail
installment contract.

--- END ---