BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall work in partnership with boarding homes,
and medicaid applicants and their families, to ensure that department
assessments of boarding home applicant care needs are completed in a
timely manner.
(2) The department shall complete an assessment of the care needs
of current or potential medicaid boarding home residents within ten
business days of application for services. If the department fails to
complete the assessment within ten business days, and following a
determination that the applicant qualifies for medicaid services, the
department shall pay for services from the date of the request for
assessment.

--- END ---