BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Each high school or school district board of directors shall
adopt course equivalencies for all career and technical high school
courses offered to students at the high school. A career and technical
course equivalency may be for whole or partial credit. Each school
district board of directors shall develop a course equivalency approval
procedure.
(2) Career and technical courses determined to be equivalent to
academic core courses, in full or in part, by the high school or school
district shall be accepted as meeting core requirements, including
graduation requirements, if the courses are transcripted on the
student's diploma using the equivalent academic high school department
designation and title. Full or partial credit shall be recorded as
appropriate.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2005 c 205 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except those
equivalencies as established by local high schools or school districts
under section 1 of this act.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of
education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.230.100 and 1991 c 116 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state board of education shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter
34.05 RCW, to implement the course requirements set forth in RCW
28A.230.090. The rules shall include, as the state board deems
necessary, granting equivalencies for and temporary exemptions from the
course requirements in RCW 28A.230.090 and special alterations of the
course requirements in RCW 28A.230.090. In developing such rules the
state board shall recognize the relevance of vocational and applied
courses and allow such courses to fulfill in whole or in part the
courses required for graduation in RCW 28A.230.090, as determined by
the high school or school district in accordance with section 1 of this
act. The rules may include provisions for competency testing in lieu
of such courses required for graduation in RCW 28A.230.090 or
demonstration of specific skill proficiency or understanding of
concepts through work or experience.

--- END ---