BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.45.030 and 2005 c 258 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Washington State University is responsible for providing
baccalaureate and graduate level higher education programs to the
citizens of the Tri-Cities area, under rules or guidelines adopted by
the higher education coordinating board and in accordance with
proportionality agreements emphasizing access for transfer students
developed with the state board for community and technical colleges.
Washington State University shall meet that responsibility through the
operation of a branch campus in the Tri-Cities area. The branch campus
shall replace and supersede the Tri-Cities university center. All
land, facilities, equipment, and personnel of the Tri-Cities university
center shall be transferred from the University of Washington to
Washington State University.
(2) In 2005, the legislature authorized the expansion on a limited
basis of Washington State University's branch campus in the Tri-Cities
area. The legislature authorized the Tri-Cities branch campus to
continue providing innovative coadmission and coenrollment options with
Columbia Basin College, and to expand its upper-division capacity for
transfer students and graduate capacity and programs. The branch
campus was given authority beginning in fall 2006 to offer lower-division courses linked to specific majors in fields not addressed at
the local community colleges. The campus was also authorized to
directly admit freshmen and sophomores for a bachelor's degree program
in biotechnology subject to approval by the higher education
coordinating board. The legislature finds that the Tri-Cities
community is very engaged in and committed to exploring the further
expansion of Washington State University Tri-Cities branch campus into
a four-year institution and considers this issue to be a top priority
for the larger Tri-Cities region.
(3) Washington State University Tri-Cities shall continue providing
innovative coadmission and coenrollment options with Columbia Basin
College, and expand its upper division capacity for transfer students
and graduate capacity and programs. The campus shall also seek
additional opportunities to collaborate with the Pacific Northwest
national laboratory. Beginning in the fall of 2006, the campus may
offer lower division courses linked to specific majors in fields not
addressed at local community colleges. The campus may admit lower
division students through coadmission or coenrollment agreements with
a community college, or through direct transfer for students who have
accumulated approximately one year of transferable college credits. In
addition to offering lower division courses linked to specific majors
as addressed above, the campus may also directly admit freshmen and
sophomores for a bachelor's degree program in biotechnology subject to
approval by the higher education coordinating board. ((The campus may
not directly admit freshmen and sophomores for degree programs other
than biotechnology, however this topic shall be the subject of further
study and recommendations by the higher education coordinating board.))
(4) The Washington State University Tri-Cities branch campus shall
develop a plan for expanding into a four-year institution and shall
identify new degree programs and course offerings focused on areas of
specific need in higher education that exist in southeastern
Washington. The branch campus's plan should examine the resources and
talent available in the Tri-Cities area, including but not limited to
resources and talent available at the Pacific Northwest national
laboratory, and how these resources and talent may best be used by the
Tri-Cities branch campus to expand into a four-year institution. The
branch campus shall submit its plan to the legislature and the higher
education coordinating board by November 30, 2006.
(5) Beginning in the fall of 2007, the Washington State University
Tri-Cities branch campus may begin, subject to approval by the higher
education coordinating board, admitting lower-division students
directly into programs beyond the biotechnology field that are
identified in its plan as being in high need in southeastern
Washington. Such fields may include but need not be limited to
science, engineering and technology, biomedical sciences, alternative
energy, and computational and information sciences. By gradually and
deliberately admitting freshmen and sophomores in accordance with its
plan, increasing transfer enrollment, and coadmitting transfer
students, the campus shall develop into a four-year institution serving
the southeastern Washington region.

--- END ---