BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2005 c 514 s 1003 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2) The credit ((shall be calculated as follows:
(a) Determine)) is equal to the greater of the amount of qualified
research and development expenditures of a person or eighty percent of
amounts received by a person other than a public educational or
research institution in compensation for the conduct of qualified
research and development((;
(b) Subtract 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount from the
amount determined under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Multiply the amount determined under (b) of this subsection)),
multiplied by the following:
(((i))) (a) For the period June 10, 2004, through December 31,
2006, the person's average tax rate for the calendar year for which the
credit is claimed;
(((ii))) (b) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2007, the
greater of the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 0.75
percent;
(((iii))) (c) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2008, the
greater of the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.0
percent;
(((iv))) (d) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2009, the
greater of the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.25
percent;
(((v))) (e) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2010, and
thereafter, 1.50 percent.
For purposes of calculating the credit, if a person's reporting
period is less than annual, the person may use an estimated average tax
rate for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed by using the
person's average tax rate for each reporting period. A person who uses
an estimated average tax rate must make an adjustment to the total
credit claimed for the calendar year using the person's actual average
tax rate for the calendar year when the person files its last return
for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(3) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(4) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section, shall be claimed against taxes due for
the same calendar year in which the qualified research and development
expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any credit assigned
to a person under subsection (3) of this section, for each calendar
year shall not exceed the lesser of two million dollars or the amount
of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the calendar year.
(5) For any person claiming the credit, including any credit
assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section, whose
research and development spending during the calendar year in which the
credit is claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the person's taxable
amount during the same calendar year or who is otherwise ineligible,
the department shall declare the taxes against which the credit was
claimed to be immediately due and payable. The department shall assess
interest, but not penalties, on the taxes against which the credit was
claimed. Interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the
date the credit was claimed, and shall accrue until the taxes against
which the credit was claimed are repaid. Any credit assigned to a
person under subsection (3) of this section that is disallowed as a
result of this section may be claimed by the person who performed the
qualified research and development subject to the limitations set forth
in subsection (4) of this section.
(6)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness
are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) A person claiming the credit shall file a complete annual
survey with the department. The survey is due by March 31st following
any year in which a credit is claimed. The department may extend the
due date for timely filing of annual surveys under this section as
provided in RCW 82.32.590. The survey shall include the amount of the
tax credit claimed, the qualified research and development expenditures
during the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, the taxable
amount during the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, the
number of new products or research projects by general classification,
the number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with the
research and development activities for which a credit was claimed, and
whether the credit has been assigned under subsection (3) of this
section and who assigned the credit. The survey shall also include the
following information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the tax credit program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d)(i) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax credit claimed, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax credit claimed is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request, except as provided in this
subsection (6)(d). If the amount of the tax credit as reported on the
survey is different than the amount actually claimed on the taxpayer's
tax returns or otherwise allowed by the department, the amount actually
claimed or allowed may be disclosed.
(ii) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax credit claimed
on the taxpayer's returns or otherwise allowed by the department is
less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the survey
may request the department to treat the tax credit amount as
confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(e) If a person fails to file a complete annual survey required
under this subsection with the department by the due date or any
extension under RCW 82.32.590, the person entitled to the credit
provided in subsection (2) of this section is not eligible to claim or
assign the credit provided in subsection (2) of this section in the
year the person failed to timely file a complete survey.
(7) The department shall use the information from subsection (6) of
this section to prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No
fewer than three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The
department shall report these statistics to the legislature each year
by September 1st.
(8) The department shall use the information from subsection (6) of
this section to study the tax credit program authorized under this
section. The department shall report to the legislature by December 1,
2009, and December 1, 2013. The reports shall measure the effect of
the program on job creation, the number of jobs created for Washington
residents, company growth, the introduction of new products, the
diversification of the state's economy, growth in research and
development investment, the movement of firms or the consolidation of
firms' operations into the state, and such other factors as the
department selects.
(9) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Average tax rate" means a person's total tax liability under
this chapter for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed
divided by the taxpayer's total taxable amount under this chapter for
the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(b) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development. Nor does
the term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(c) "Qualified research and development" shall have the same
meaning as in RCW 82.63.010.
(d) "Research and development spending" means qualified research
and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts paid to a
person other than a public educational or research institution to
conduct qualified research and development.
(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns for the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under
RCW 82.04.440.
(10) This section expires January 1, 2015.

--- END ---