BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.305.140 and 1990 c 33 s 267 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education may grant waivers to school
districts from the provisions of RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.220 on
the basis that such waiver or waivers are necessary to implement
successfully a local plan to provide for all students in the district
an effective education system that is designed to enhance the
educational program for each student. The local plan may include
alternative ways to provide effective educational programs for students
who experience difficulty with the regular education program.
(2) The state board of education may also grant waivers to school
districts from the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220(3) in cases where the
school district board of directors has adopted a resolution declaring
an energy-related fiscal emergency and where the local plan to reduce
operating and transportation costs to address the emergency
necessitates such a waiver.
(3) The state board shall adopt criteria to evaluate the need for
the waiver or waivers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 28A.305.145 (Application process for
waivers under RCW 28A.305.140) and 1993 c 336 s 302 are each repealed.

--- END ---