BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that effective
transportation planning in urbanized regions requires stronger and
clearer lines of responsibility and accountability.
The legislature further finds that integrated, multimodal
transportation planning will help reduce transportation congestion and
improve safety, and that streamlined decision making will help reduce
political congestion.
The legislature further finds that coordinated planning of,
investment in, and operation of transportation systems will have
significant benefit to the citizens of Washington, and that it is the
will of the people to fund regional transportation solutions, including
improving transit service in urbanized areas and among existing,
fragmented transit agencies in the region. Although equity
considerations must be respected, transportation problems are broader
and deeper than the sum of geographic subareas.
It is therefore the policy of the state of Washington to create a
regional transportation commission to develop a proposal for a regional
transportation governing entity more directly accountable to the
public, and to develop a comprehensive regional transportation finance
plan for the citizens of the Puget Sound metropolitan region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The regional transportation commission
is established.
(2) The commission shall consist of nine commissioners. Three of
the nine commissioners shall comprise the county executives of each of
those contiguous counties of the Puget Sound metropolitan region
comprising a county with a population over one million five hundred
thousand persons and the immediately adjacent counties each with a
population over five hundred thousand persons. The remaining six
commissioners shall be appointed by the governor by June 1, 2006.
Appointments of commissioners shall reflect geographical balance and
diversity of populations within the Puget Sound region and, to the
extent possible, include commissioners with special expertise in
relevant fields such as funding, planning, and construction of
transportation improvement projects and operation of transportation
systems. Vacancies for any appointed commission seat shall be filled
in the same manner as the original appointments were made.
(3) Each person appointed by the governor shall hold office until
the commission dissolves under section 6 of this act or until a
successor is appointed and qualified as set forth in subsection (4) of
this section, whichever is earlier.
(4) The term of office for a commissioner begins seven days
following appointment by the governor. A commissioner must be a
qualified elector under the state Constitution when his or her term of
office begins.
(5) The commission chair presides over the commission and sets the
commission agenda subject to general rules established by the
commission. Except as provided otherwise in this chapter, the
commission chair appoints all members of the committees, councils, and
boards created by the rules of the commission. The commission chair
shall be designated by the governor from among the six commissioners
appointed under subsection (2) of this section.
(6) Each member of the commission is eligible to receive
compensation in an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars for
each day during which the member attends an official meeting of the
group or performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the chair.
A person shall not receive compensation for a day of service under this
section if the person (a) occupies a position normally regarded as full
time in nature, in any agency of the federal government, Washington
state government, or Washington state local government, and (b)
receives any compensation from such government for working that day.
A commissioner may be compensated under this subsection only if the
compensation is necessarily incurred in the course of authorized
business, consistent with the responsibilities of the commission
established by this chapter.
(7) The commission may be entitled to state funding, as
appropriated by the legislature, to pay for expenses incurred by the
commission and the department of transportation and through contracts
in carrying out the duties authorized in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The commission has the following duties:
(1) Evaluate transportation governance in the central Puget Sound
area within the jurisdiction of the Puget Sound regional council. This
evaluation must include an assessment of the current roles of regional
transportation agencies, including regional transportation and
metropolitan planning organizations, the regional transit authority,
regional transportation investment districts, county and municipal
agencies operating transit services, and cities, counties, and other
public agencies providing transportation services or facilities. The
commission shall assess and develop recommendations for what steps
should be taken to:
(a) Consolidate governance among agencies, including changes in
institutional powers, structures, and relationships and governance
needed to improve accountability for transportation decisions, while
enhancing the regional focus for transportation decisions and
maintaining equity among citizens in the region;
(b) Improve coordination in the planning of transportation
investments and services;
(c) Improve investment strategies;
(d) Coordinate transportation planning and investments with adopted
land use policies within the region;
(e) Enhance efficiency and coordination in the delivery of services
provided;
(f) Adjust boundaries for agencies or functions within the region
to address existing and future transportation and land use issues; and
(g) Improve coordination between regional investments and federal
funds, and state funding, including those administered by the
transportation improvement board, the county road administration board,
and the freight mobility strategic investment board;
(2) Develop a regional transportation governance proposal that
includes, at a minimum, the formation of a regional transportation
governing entity, of which all or a majority of its members must be
directly elected, the revenue sources that will be available to such
entity, and the scope of planning authority of such entity;
(3) Publicize the commission's proposal referenced in subsection
(2) of this section by November 15, 2006, and provide at least fifteen
days for public comment;
(4) Adopt the proposal referenced in subsection (2) of this section
and submit it to the legislature by January 1, 2007;
(5) Develop a comprehensive, integrated transportation finance plan
for the metropolitan Puget Sound region to be submitted to the affected
voters by the regional transportation governing entity;
(6) Conduct public meetings to assure active public participation
in the development of the recommendations, proposal, and finance plan
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of transportation shall
provide staff support to the commission and, upon request of the
commission, contract with other parties for staff support to the
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The governing body of a city with a
population of five hundred sixty thousand or more, in which a city
transportation authority has been formed under chapter 35.95A RCW, may
set and impose any tax authorized under chapter 35.95A RCW, but only
(a) for funding nonmonorail transit within the city; (b) after the debt
and obligations, including judgments, of the city transportation
authority have been satisfied; and (c) if the grant of such taxing
authority is contained in the integrated regional transportation
finance plan developed by the regional transportation commission and
approved by the voters, within the city and region wide, as part of an
integrated regional transportation ballot measure.
(2) The transit projects and services funded under subsection (1)
of this section must be consistent with the metropolitan transportation
plan adopted under RCW 35.58.240 and any integrated transportation
finance plan developed by the commission under section 3 of this act.
(3) For purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section, the debt and
obligations of the city transportation authority are satisfied upon
receipt, by the governing body of the city, of a letter from the
governing body of the authority certifying that: (a) The debt is
retired; and (b) a contingency account has been funded in an amount
determined by the governing body of the authority to be sufficient to
resolve any existing and reasonably foreseeable legal claims against
the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Upon such time as the regional
transportation governing entity established by the legislature pursuant
to the commission's recommendations becomes fully operational: (1) All
of the powers, functions, and duties of the commission shall be
transferred to the regional transportation governing entity; (2) the
commission shall take such additional actions as needed to wind up its
affairs; and (3) the commission shall dissolve.

Sec. 7 RCW 35.58.250 and 1965 c 7 s 35.58.250 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except for a regional transit authority constructing or operating
a high capacity transportation service by contract under RCW
35.58.260(2) or in accordance with an agreement made as provided
herein, upon the effective date on which the metropolitan municipal
corporation commences to perform the metropolitan transportation
function, no person or private corporation shall operate a local public
passenger transportation service within the metropolitan area with the
exception of taxis, busses owned or operated by a school district or
private school, and busses owned or operated by any corporation or
organization solely for the purposes of the corporation or organization
and for the use of which no fee or fare is charged.
An agreement may be entered into between the metropolitan municipal
corporation and any person or corporation legally operating a local
public passenger transportation service wholly within or partly within
and partly without the metropolitan area and on said effective date
under which such person or corporation may continue to operate such
service or any part thereof for such time and upon such terms and
conditions as provided in such agreement. Where any such local public
passenger transportation service will be required to cease to operate
within the metropolitan area, the commission may agree with the owner
of such service to purchase the assets used in providing such service,
or if no agreement can be reached, the commission shall condemn such
assets in the manner provided herein for the condemnation of other
properties.
Wherever a privately owned public carrier operates wholly or partly
within a metropolitan municipal corporation, the Washington utilities
and transportation commission shall continue to exercise jurisdiction
over such operation as provided by law.

Sec. 8 RCW 35.58.260 and 1965 c 7 s 35.58.260 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, if a metropolitan
municipal corporation shall be authorized to perform the metropolitan
transportation function, it shall, upon the effective date of the
assumption of such power, have and exercise all rights with respect to
the construction, acquisition, maintenance, operation, extension,
alteration, repair, control, and management of passenger transportation
which any component city shall have been previously empowered to
exercise and such powers shall not thereafter be exercised by such
component cities without the consent of the metropolitan municipal
corporation: PROVIDED, That any city owning and operating a public
transportation system on such effective date may continue to operate
such system within such city until such system shall have been acquired
by the metropolitan municipal corporation and a metropolitan municipal
corporation may not acquire such system without the consent of the city
council of such city.
(2) The governing body of a city with a population of five hundred
sixty thousand or more that sets and imposes any tax under section 5 of
this act may plan and direct the expenditure of revenues from such tax
through contracting with a metropolitan municipal corporation or a
regional transit authority for the construction, acquisition,
maintenance, operation, extension, alteration, repair, control, and
management of those transit projects and services for which tax
revenues may be spent under section 5 of this act. If the city
exercises such authority under this subsection, neither the
metropolitan municipal corporation nor the regional transit authority
shall, as a result, reduce the hours of transit service it provides
within the corporate limits of the city.

Sec. 9 RCW 36.120.020 and 2002 c 56 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a regional transportation
investment district.
(2) "Department" means the Washington state department of
transportation.
(3) "Highway of statewide significance" means an existing or
proposed state route or federal interstate designated as a highway of
statewide significance by the transportation commission, its successor
entity, or the legislature.
(4) "Lead agency" means a public agency that by law can plan,
design, and build a transportation project and has been so designated
by the district.
(5) "Regional transportation investment district" or "district"
means a municipal corporation ((whose boundaries are coextensive with
two or more contiguous counties and)) that has been created by county
legislative authorities and a vote of the people under this chapter to
implement a regional transportation investment plan.
(6) "Regional transportation investment district planning
committee" or "planning committee" means the advisory committee created
under RCW 36.120.030 to create and propose to county legislative
authorities a regional transportation investment plan to develop,
finance, and construct transportation projects.
(7) "Regional transportation investment plan" or "plan" means a
plan to develop, construct, and finance a transportation project or
projects.
(8) "Transportation project" means:
(a) A capital improvement or improvements to a highway that has
been designated, in whole or in part, as a highway of statewide
significance, including an extension, that:
(i) Adds a lane or new lanes to an existing state or federal
highway; or
(ii) Repairs or replaces a lane or lanes damaged by an event
declared an emergency by the governor before January 1, 2002.
(b) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
highway of statewide significance, including an extension, and may
include the following associated multimodal capital improvements:
(i) Approaches to highways of statewide significance;
(ii) High-occupancy vehicle lanes;
(iii) Flyover ramps;
(iv) Park and ride lots;
(v) Bus pullouts;
(vi) Vans for vanpools;
(vii) Buses; and
(viii) Signalization, ramp metering, and other transportation
system management improvements.
(c) A capital improvement or improvements to all or a portion of a
city street, county road, or existing highway or the creation of a new
highway that intersects with a highway of statewide significance, if
all of the following conditions are met:
(i) The project is included in a plan that makes highway
improvement projects that add capacity to a highway or highways of
statewide significance;
(ii) The secretary of transportation determines that the project
would better relieve traffic congestion than investing that same money
in adding capacity to a highway of statewide significance;
(iii) Matching money equal to ((one-third)) fifteen percent of the
total cost of the project is provided by local entities, including but
not limited to a metropolitan planning organization, county, city,
port, or private entity in which a county participating in a plan is
located. Local entities may use federal grants to meet this matching
requirement;
(iv) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed ten percent of the revenues generated by the
district;
(v) In no case may the cumulative regional transportation
investment district contribution to all projects constructed under this
subsection (8)(c) exceed one billion dollars; and
(vi) The specific projects are included within the plan and
submitted as part of the plan to a vote of the people.
(d) Any project contained in the state transportation plan or a
regional transportation planning organization that is of statewide or
regional significance, including, without limitation, investment in new
or existing highways of statewide significance, principal arterials of
regional significance, high-capacity transportation, public
transportation, and other transportation projects of regional or
statewide significance, including transportation demand management.
(e) Operations, preservation, and maintenance ((are excluded from
this definition and)) of any facility or program authorized by this
section may ((not)) be included in a regional transportation investment
plan.
(9) "Weighted vote" means a vote that reflects the population each
board or planning committee member represents relative to the
population represented by the total membership of the board or planning
committee. Population will be determined using the federal 2000 census
or subsequent federal census data.

Sec. 10 RCW 36.120.030 and 2002 c 56 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
Regional transportation investment district planning committees are
advisory entities that are created, convened, and empowered as follows:
(1) A county with a population over one million five hundred
thousand persons and any adjoining counties with a population over five
hundred thousand persons may create a regional transportation
investment district and shall convene a regional transportation
investment district planning committee.
(a) The boundaries of the district should include at least the
contiguous areas within the regional transit authority serving the
counties. A city must be entirely within or entirely outside district
boundaries. The boundaries must be proposed by the district and
approved by the county legislative authorities by ordinance before or
in conjunction with approval of a regional transportation investment
plan. Boundaries must follow contiguous parcels of land. However, any
portion of a county that is located on a peninsula may be exempt from
a regional transportation investment district in which more than one
county is included if (i) the portion of the county located on the
peninsula is connected to the other portion of the county by a bridge
improved under chapter 47.46 RCW, and (ii) the county has a national
park and a population of more than five hundred thousand persons, but
less than one million five hundred thousand persons.
(b) After voters within the district boundaries have approved a
plan under RCW 36.120.070, elections to add areas to the district
boundaries may be called by a resolution of the board, after
consultation with the regional transportation planning organization and
affected transit agencies and with the concurrence of the legislative
authority of the city or town if the area is incorporated or with the
concurrence of the county legislative authority if the area is
unincorporated. The election may include a single ballot measure
providing annexation to the district, approval of the plan, and
approval of revenue sources necessary to finance the plan. The
electorate are the voters voting within the proposed area to be
annexed. A simple majority of the persons voting on the single ballot
measure is required for approval of the measure. This option for
annexation applies to areas within the counties initially establishing
a district and also to areas within a county having a population over
two hundred thirty thousand persons and whose boundaries abut three
counties eligible to form a district under this subsection.
(2) The members of the legislative authorities participating in
planning under this chapter shall serve as the district planning
committee. Members of the planning committee receive no compensation,
but may be reimbursed for travel and incidental expenses as the
planning committee deems appropriate.
The secretary of transportation, or the appropriate regional
administrator of the department, as named by the secretary, shall serve
on the committee as a nonvoting member.
(3) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee may be entitled to state funding, as appropriated by the
legislature, for start-up funding to pay for salaries, expenses,
overhead, supplies, and similar expenses ordinarily and necessarily
incurred in selecting transportation projects and funding for those
transportation projects under this chapter. Upon creation of a
regional transportation investment district, the district shall within
one year reimburse the state for any sums advanced for these start-up
costs from the state.
(4) The planning committee shall conduct its affairs and formulate
a regional transportation investment plan as provided under RCW
36.120.040, except that it shall elect an executive board of seven
members to discharge the duties of the planning committee and formulate
a regional transportation investment plan, subject to the approval of
the full committee.
(5) At its first meeting, a regional transportation investment
district planning committee may elect officers and provide for the
adoption of rules and other operating procedures.
(6) Governance of and decisions by a regional transportation
investment district planning committee must be by a sixty-percent
weighted majority vote of the total membership.
(7) The planning committee may dissolve itself at any time by a
two-thirds weighted majority vote of the total membership of the
planning committee.

Sec. 11 RCW 36.120.040 and 2003 c 194 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee shall adopt a regional transportation investment plan
providing for the development, construction, and financing of
transportation projects. The planning committee may consider the
following factors in formulating its plan:
(a) Land use planning criteria;
(b) The input of cities located within a participating county; and
(c) The input of regional transportation planning organizations
((in)) of which a participating county is ((located)) a member. A
regional transportation planning organization in which a participating
county is located shall review its adopted regional transportation plan
and submit, for the planning committee's consideration, its list of
transportation improvement priorities.
(2) The planning committee may coordinate its activities with the
department, which shall provide services, data, and personnel to assist
in this planning as desired by the planning committee. In addition,
the planning committee may coordinate its activities with affected
cities, towns, and other local governments, including any regional
transit authority existing within the participating counties'
boundaries, that engage in transportation planning.
(3) The planning committee shall:
(a) Conduct public meetings that are needed to assure active public
participation in the development of the plan;
(b) Adopt a plan proposing the:
(i) Creation of a regional transportation investment district,
including district boundaries; and
(ii) Construction of transportation projects to improve mobility
within each county and within the region. Operations, maintenance, and
preservation of facilities or systems may ((not)) be part of the plan;
(c) Recommend sources of revenue authorized by RCW 36.120.050 and
a financing plan to fund selected transportation projects. The overall
plan of the district must leverage the district's financial
contributions so that the federal, state, local, and other revenue
sources continue to fund major congestion relief and transportation
capacity improvement projects in each county and the district. A
combination of local, state, and federal revenues may be necessary to
pay for transportation projects, and the planning committee shall
consider all of these revenue sources in developing a plan.
(4) The plan must use tax revenues and related debt for projects
that generally benefit a participating county in proportion to the
general level of tax revenues generated within that participating
county. This equity principle applies to all modifications to the
plan, appropriation of contingency funds not identified within the
project estimate, and future phases of the plan. During implementation
of the plan, the board shall retain the flexibility to manage
distribution of revenues, debt, and project schedules so that the
district may effectively implement the plan. Nothing in this section
should be interpreted to prevent the district from pledging district-wide tax revenues for payment of any contract or debt entered into
under RCW 36.120.130.
(5) Before adopting the plan, the planning committee, with
assistance from the department, shall work with the lead agency to
develop accurate cost forecasts for transportation projects. This
project costing methodology must be integrated with revenue forecasts
in developing the plan and must at a minimum include estimated project
costs in constant dollars as well as year of expenditure dollars, the
range of project costs reflected by the level of project design,
project contingencies, identification of mitigation costs, the range of
revenue forecasts, and project and plan cash flow and bond analysis.
The plan submitted to the voters must provide cost estimates for each
project, including reasonable contingency costs. Plans submitted to
the voters must provide that the maximum amount possible of the funds
raised will be used to fund projects in the plan, including
environmental improvements and mitigation, and that administrative
costs be minimized. If actual revenue exceeds actual plan costs, the
excess revenues must be used to retire any outstanding debt associated
with the plan.
(6) If a county opts not to adopt the plan or participate in the
regional transportation investment district, but two or more contiguous
counties do choose to continue to participate, then the planning
committee may, within ninety days, redefine the regional transportation
investment plan and the ballot measure to be submitted to the people to
reflect elimination of the county, and submit the redefined plan to the
legislative authorities of the remaining counties for their decision as
to whether to continue to adopt the redefined plan and participate.
This action must be completed within sixty days after receipt of the
redefined plan.
(7) Once adopted by the planning committee, the plan must be
forwarded to the participating county legislative authorities to
initiate the election process under RCW 36.120.070. The planning
committee shall at the same time provide notice to each city and town
within the district, the governor, the chairs of the transportation
committees of the legislature, the secretary of transportation, and
each legislator whose legislative district is partially or wholly
within the boundaries of the district.
(8) If the ballot measure is not approved, the planning committee
may redefine the selected transportation projects, financing plan, and
the ballot measure. The county legislative authorities may approve the
new plan and ballot measure, and may then submit the revised
proposition to the voters at the next election or a special election.
If no ballot measure is approved by the voters by the third vote, the
planning committee is dissolved.

Sec. 12 RCW 36.120.070 and 2002 c 56 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
Beginning no sooner than the 2007 general election, and subject to
the approval of the regional transportation commission established in
section 2 of this act, or its successor entity, two or more contiguous
county legislative authorities, upon receipt of the regional
transportation investment plan under RCW 36.120.040, may ((certify the
plan to the ballot, including identification of the tax options))
submit to the voters of the proposed district a single ballot measure
that approves formation of the district, approves the regional
transportation investment plan, and approves the revenue sources
necessary to ((fund)) finance the plan. ((County legislative
authorities)) For a county to participate in the plan, the county
legislative authorities shall, within ninety days after receiving the
plan, adopt an ordinance indicating the county's participation. The
planning committee may draft ((a ballot title,)) the ballot measure on
behalf of the county legislative authorities, and the county
legislative authorities may give notice as required by law for ballot
measures, and perform other duties as required to ((put the plan
before)) submit the measure to the voters of the proposed district for
their approval or rejection ((as a single ballot measure that both
approves formation of the district and approves the plan)). Counties
may negotiate interlocal agreements necessary to implement the plan.
The electorate will be the voters voting within the boundaries of the
((participating counties)) proposed district. A simple majority of the
total persons voting on the single ballot measure ((to approve the
plan, establish the district, and approve the taxes and fees)) is
required for approval.

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.36.071 and 2004 c 271 s 169 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided to the contrary in RCW 82.14.036, 82.46.021,
or 82.80.090, the ballot title of any referendum filed on an enactment
or portion of an enactment of a local government and any other question
submitted to the voters of a local government consists of three
elements: (a) An identification of the enacting legislative body and
a statement of the subject matter; (b) a concise description of the
measure; and (c) a question. The ballot title must conform with the
requirements and be displayed substantially as provided under RCW
29A.72.050, except that the concise description must not exceed
seventy-five words; however, a concise description submitted on behalf
of a regional transportation investment district may exceed seventy-five words. If the local governmental unit is a city or a town, the
concise statement shall be prepared by the city or town attorney. If
the local governmental unit is a county, the concise statement shall be
prepared by the prosecuting attorney of the county. If the unit is a
unit of local government other than a city, town, or county, the
concise statement shall be prepared by the prosecuting attorney of the
county within which the majority area of the unit is located.
(2) A referendum measure on the enactment of a unit of local
government shall be advertised in the manner provided for nominees for
elective office.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if another
provision of law specifies the ballot title for a specific type of
ballot question or proposition.

Sec. 14 RCW 36.120.080 and 2002 c 56 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the voters approve the plan, including creation of a regional
transportation investment district and imposition of taxes and fees,
the district will be declared formed. The county election officials of
participating counties shall, within fifteen days of the final
certification of the election results, publish a notice in a newspaper
or newspapers of general circulation in the district declaring the
district formed, and mail copies of the notice to the governor, the
secretary of transportation, the executive director of the regional
transit authority in which any part of the district is located, and the
executive director of the regional transportation planning organization
in which any part of the district is located. A party challenging the
procedure or the formation of a voter-approved district must file the
challenge in writing by serving the prosecuting attorney of the
participating counties and the attorney general within thirty days
after the final certification of the election. Failure to challenge
within that time forever bars further challenge of the district's valid
formation.

Sec. 15 RCW 36.120.110 and 2002 c 56 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governing board of the district is responsible for the
execution of the voter-approved plan. The board shall:
(a) Impose taxes and fees authorized by district voters;
(b) Enter into agreements with state, local, and regional agencies
and departments as necessary to accomplish district purposes and
protect the district's investment in transportation projects;
(c) Accept gifts, grants, or other contributions of funds that will
support the purposes and programs of the district;
(d) Monitor and audit the progress and execution of transportation
projects to protect the investment of the public and annually make
public its findings;
(e) Pay for services and enter into leases and contracts, including
professional service contracts;
(f) Hire no more than ten employees, including a director or
executive officer, a treasurer or financial officer, a project manager
or engineer, a project permit coordinator, and clerical staff; and
(g) Coordinate its activities with affected cities, towns, and
other local governments, including any regional transit authority
existing either partially or entirely within the district area, that
engage in transportation planning; and
(h) Exercise other powers and duties as may be reasonable to carry
out the purposes of the district.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that existing staff
resources of lead agencies be used in implementing this chapter. A
district may coordinate its activities with the department, which shall
provide services, data, and personnel to assist as desired by the
regional transportation investment district. Lead agencies for
transportation projects that are not state facilities shall also
provide staff support for the board.
(3) A district may not acquire, hold, or dispose of real property.
(4) Except as provided in section 9(8)(e) of this act, a district
may not own, operate, or maintain an ongoing facility, road, or
transportation system.
(5) A district may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, or
donations.
(6) It is the intent of the legislature that administrative and
overhead costs of a regional transportation investment district be
minimized. For transportation projects costing up to fifty million
dollars, administrative and overhead costs may not exceed three percent
of the total construction and design project costs per year. For
transportation projects costing more than fifty million dollars,
administrative and overhead costs may not exceed three percent of the
first fifty million dollars in costs, plus an additional one-tenth of
one percent of each additional dollar above fifty million. These
limitations apply only to the district, and do not limit the
administration or expenditures of the department.
(7) A district may use the design-build procedure for
transportation projects developed by it. As used in this section
"design-build procedure" means a method of contracting under which the
district contracts with another party for that party to both design and
build the structures, facilities, and other items specified in the
contract. The requirements and limitations of RCW 47.20.780 and
47.20.785 do not apply to the transportation projects under this
chapter.

Sec. 16 RCW 81.112.030 and 1994 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Two or more contiguous counties each having a population of four
hundred thousand persons or more may establish a regional transit
authority to develop and operate a high capacity transportation system
as defined in chapter 81.104 RCW.
The authority shall be formed in the following manner:
(1) The joint regional policy committee created pursuant to RCW
81.104.040 shall adopt a system and financing plan, including the
definition of the service area. This action shall be completed by
September 1, 1992, contingent upon satisfactory completion of the
planning process defined in RCW 81.104.100. The final system plan
shall be adopted no later than June 30, 1993. In addition to the
requirements of RCW 81.104.100, the plan for the proposed system shall
provide explicitly for a minimum portion of new tax revenues to be
allocated to local transit agencies for interim express services. Upon
adoption the joint regional policy committee shall immediately transmit
the plan to the county legislative authorities within the adopted
service area.
(2) The legislative authorities of the counties within the service
area shall decide by resolution whether to participate in the
authority. This action shall be completed within forty-five days
following receipt of the adopted plan or by August 13, 1993, whichever
comes first.
(3) Each county that chooses to participate in the authority shall
appoint its board members as set forth in RCW 81.112.040 and shall
submit its list of members to the secretary of the Washington state
department of transportation. These actions must be completed within
thirty days following each county's decision to participate in the
authority.
(4) The secretary shall call the first meeting of the authority, to
be held within thirty days following receipt of the appointments. At
its first meeting, the authority shall elect officers and provide for
the adoption of rules and other operating procedures.
(5) The authority is formally constituted at its first meeting and
the board shall begin taking steps toward implementation of the system
and financing plan adopted by the joint regional policy committee. If
the joint regional policy committee fails to adopt a plan by June 30,
1993, the authority shall proceed to do so based on the work completed
by that date by the joint regional policy committee. Upon formation of
the authority, the joint regional policy committee shall cease to
exist. The authority may make minor modifications to the plan as
deemed necessary and shall at a minimum review local transit agencies'
plans to ensure feeder service/high capacity transit service
integration, ensure fare integration, and ensure avoidance of parallel
competitive services. The authority shall also conduct a minimum
thirty-day public comment period.
(6) If the authority determines that major modifications to the
plan are necessary before the initial ballot proposition is submitted
to the voters, the authority may make those modifications with a
favorable vote of two-thirds of the entire membership. Any such
modification shall be subject to the review process set forth in RCW
81.104.110. The modified plan shall be transmitted to the legislative
authorities of the participating counties. The legislative authorities
shall have forty-five days following receipt to act by motion or
ordinance to confirm or rescind their continued participation in the
authority.
(7) If any county opts to not participate in the authority, but two
or more contiguous counties do choose to continue to participate, the
authority's board shall be revised accordingly. The authority shall,
within forty-five days, redefine the system and financing plan to
reflect elimination of one or more counties, and submit the redefined
plan to the legislative authorities of the remaining counties for their
decision as to whether to continue to participate. This action shall
be completed within forty-five days following receipt of the redefined
plan.
(8) The authority shall place on the ballot within two years of the
authority's formation, a single ballot proposition to authorize the
imposition of taxes to support the implementation of an appropriate
phase of the plan within its service area. In addition to the system
plan requirements contained in RCW 81.104.100(2)(d), the system plan
approved by the authority's board before the submittal of a proposition
to the voters shall contain an equity element which:
(a) Identifies revenues anticipated to be generated by corridor and
by county within the authority's boundaries;
(b) Identifies the phasing of construction and operation of high
capacity system facilities, services, and benefits in each corridor.
Phasing decisions should give priority to jurisdictions which have
adopted transit-supportive land use plans; and
(c) Identifies the degree to which revenues generated within each
county will benefit the residents of that county, and identifies when
such benefits will accrue.
A simple majority of those voting within the boundaries of the
authority is required for approval. If the vote is affirmative, the
authority shall begin implementation of the projects identified in the
proposition. However, the authority may not submit any authorizing
proposition for voter-approved taxes prior to July 1, 1993; nor may the
authority issue bonds or form any local improvement district prior to
July 1, 1993.
(9) If the vote on a proposition fails, the board may redefine the
proposition, make changes to the authority boundaries, and make
corresponding changes to the composition of the board. If the
composition of the board is changed, the participating counties shall
revise the membership of the board accordingly. The board may then
submit the revised proposition or a different proposition to the
voters. No single proposition may be submitted to the voters more than
twice.
(10) Beginning no sooner than the 2007 general election, and
subject to the approval of the regional transportation commission
established in section 2 of this act, or its successor entity, the
authority may place additional propositions on the ballot to impose
taxes to support additional phases of plan implementation. In
conjunction with RCW 36.120.070, the proposition may be submitted to
the voters as a common ballot measure along with a proposed regional
transportation investment plan.
(11) If the authority is unable to achieve a positive vote on a
proposition within two years from the date of the first election on a
proposition, the board may, by resolution, reconstitute the authority
as a single-county body. With a two-thirds vote of the entire
membership of the voting members, the board may also dissolve the
authority.

Sec. 17 RCW 35.95A.080 and 2002 c 248 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every authority has the power to levy and collect a special
excise tax not exceeding two and one-half percent on the value of every
motor vehicle owned by a resident of the authority area for the
privilege of using a motor vehicle. ((Before utilization of any excise
tax money collected under this section for acquisition of right of way
or construction of a public monorail transportation facility on a
separate right of way, the authority must adopt rules affording the
public an opportunity for corridor public hearings and design public
hearings, which provide in detail the procedures necessary for public
participation in the following instances: (a) Prior to adoption of
location and design plans having a substantial social, economic, or
environmental effect upon the locality upon which they are to be
constructed; or (b) on the public transportation facilities operating
on a separate right of way whenever a substantial change is proposed
relating to location or design in the adopted plan. In adopting rules
the authority must adhere to the provisions of the administrative
procedure act.
(2) A "corridor public hearing" is a public hearing that: (a) Is
held before the authority is committed to a specific route proposal for
the public transportation facility, and before a route location is
established; (b) is held to afford an opportunity for participation by
those interested in the determination of the need for, and the location
of, the public transportation facility; and (c) provides a public forum
that affords a full opportunity for presenting views on the public
transportation facility route location, and the social, economic, and
environmental effects on that location and alternate locations.
However, the hearing is not deemed to be necessary before adoption of
a transportation plan as provided in section 7 of this act or a vote of
the qualified electors under subsection (5) of this section.
(3) A "design public hearing" is a public hearing that: (a) Is
held after the location is established but before the design is
adopted; (b) is held to afford an opportunity for participation by
those interested in the determination of major design features of the
public monorail transportation facility; and (c) provides a public
forum to afford a full opportunity for presenting views on the public
transportation system design, and the social, economic, and
environmental effects of that design and alternate designs, including
people-mover technology.
(4) An authority imposing a tax under subsection (1) of this
section may also impose a sales and use tax, in addition to any tax
authorized by RCW 82.14.030, upon retail car rentals within the city
that are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The
rate of tax must not exceed 1.944 percent of the base of the tax. The
base of the tax will be the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
the rental value of the vehicle used in the case of a use tax. The
revenue collected under this subsection will be distributed in the same
manner as sales and use taxes under chapter 82.14 RCW.
(5) Before any authority may impose any of the taxes authorized
under this section, the authorization for imposition of the taxes must
be approved by the qualified electors of the authority area.)) An
authority shall not decrease the tax rate levied as of January 1, 2006,
and shall not levy or collect the special excise tax under this section
once the debt and obligations, including judgments, of the authority
have been satisfied.
(2) After the debt and obligations, including judgments, of the
city transportation authority have been satisfied as determined under
section 5 of this act: (a) The governing body of the authority shall
send to the governing body of the city with a population of five
hundred sixty thousand or more in which the authority is wholly located
a letter certifying that the debt is retired and a contingency account
has been funded in an amount determined by the governing body of the
authority to be sufficient to resolve any existing and reasonably
foreseeable legal claims against the authority; and (b) the governing
body of a city with a population of five hundred sixty thousand or more
may, upon approval by the voters as part of an integrated regional
transportation ballot measure, levy and collect a special excise tax
not exceeding two and one-half percent on the value of every motor
vehicle owned by a resident of the authority area for the privilege of
using a motor vehicle.

Sec. 18 RCW 35.95A.110 and 2002 c 248 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All taxes and fees levied and collected by an authority must be
used solely for the purpose of paying all or any part of ((the cost of
acquiring, designing, constructing, equipping, maintaining, or
operating public monorail transportation facilities or contracting for
the services thereof, or to pay or secure the payment of all or part
of)) the principal of or interest on any general obligation bonds or
revenue bonds issued for authority purposes. ((Until expended, money
accumulated in the funds and accounts of an authority may be invested
in the manner authorized by the governing body of the authority,
consistent with state law.))
If any of the revenue from any tax or fee authorized to be levied
by an authority has been pledged by the authority to secure the payment
of any bonds as herein authorized, then as long as that pledge is in
effect the legislature will not withdraw from the authority the
authorization to levy and collect the tax or fee.
(2) All taxes and fees levied and collected by a city under section
5 of this act must be used for funding nonmonorail transit within the
city.

Sec. 19 RCW 36.120.050 and 2003 c 350 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district planning
committee may, as part of a regional transportation investment plan,
recommend the imposition of some or all of the following revenue
sources, which a regional transportation investment district may impose
upon approval of the voters as provided in this chapter:
(a) A regional sales and use tax, as specified in RCW 82.14.430, of
up to ((0.5)) 0.1 percent of the selling price, in the case of a sales
tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax, upon the
occurrence of any taxable event in the regional transportation
investment district;
(b) A local option vehicle license fee, as specified under RCW
82.80.100, of up to one hundred dollars per vehicle registered in the
district. As used in this subsection, "vehicle" means motor vehicle as
defined in RCW 46.04.320. Certain classes of vehicles, as defined
under chapter 46.04 RCW, may be exempted from this fee;
(c) A parking tax under RCW 82.80.030;
(d) A local motor vehicle excise tax under RCW 81.100.060 and
chapter 81.104 RCW;
(e) A local option fuel tax under RCW 82.80.120;
(f) An employer excise tax under RCW 81.100.030; and
(g) Vehicle tolls on new or reconstructed ((facilities.)) local or
regional arterials or state or federal highways within the boundaries
of the district, if the following conditions are met:
(i) Any such toll must be approved by the transportation commission
or its successor;
(ii) The regional transportation investment plan must identify the
facilities that may be tolled; and
(iii) Unless otherwise specified by law, the department shall
administer the collection of vehicle tolls on designated facilities,
and the state transportation commission, or its successor, shall be the
tolling authority.
(2) Taxes, fees, and tolls may not be imposed without an
affirmative vote of the majority of the voters within the boundaries of
the district voting on a ballot proposition as set forth in RCW
36.120.070. Revenues from these taxes and fees may be used only to
implement the plan as set forth in this chapter. A district may
contract with the state department of revenue or other appropriate
entities for administration and collection of any of the taxes or fees
authorized in this section.
(3) Existing statewide motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes,
at the distribution rates in effect on January 1, 2001, are not
intended to be altered by this chapter.

Sec. 20 RCW 81.100.080 and 1990 c 43 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
Funds collected under RCW 81.100.030 or 81.100.060 and any
investment earnings accruing thereon shall be used by the county or the
regional transportation investment district in a manner consistent with
the regional transportation plan only for costs of collection, costs of
preparing, adopting, and enforcing agreements under RCW 81.100.030(3),
for construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes and related
facilities, mitigation of environmental concerns that result from
construction or use of high occupancy vehicle lanes and related
facilities, by an investment district for projects contained in a plan
developed under chapter 36.120 RCW, payment of principal and interest
on bonds issued for the purposes of this section, for high occupancy
vehicle programs as defined in RCW 81.100.020(5), and for commuter rail
projects in accordance with RCW 81.104.120. Except for funds raised by
an investment district, no funds collected under RCW 81.100.030 or
81.100.060 after June 30, 2000, may be pledged for the payment or
security of the principal or interest on any bonds issued for the
purposes of this section. Not more than ten percent of the funds may
be used for transit agency high occupancy vehicle programs.
Priorities for construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes and
related facilities shall be as follows:
(1)(a) To accelerate construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes
on the interstate highway system, as well as related facilities;
(b) To finance or accelerate construction of high occupancy vehicle
lanes on the noninterstate state highway system, as well as related
facilities.
(2) To finance construction of high occupancy vehicle lanes on
local arterials, as well as related facilities.
Moneys received by ((an agency)) a county under this chapter shall
be used in addition to, and not as a substitute for, moneys currently
used by the ((agency)) county for the purposes specified in this
section.
Counties and investment districts may contract with cities or the
state department of transportation for construction of high occupancy
vehicle lanes and related facilities, and may issue general obligation
bonds to fund such construction and use funds received under this
chapter to pay the principal and interest on such bonds.

Sec. 21 RCW 81.100.060 and 2002 c 56 s 411 are each amended to
read as follows:
A county with a population of one million or more and a county with
a population of from two hundred ten thousand to less than one million
that is adjoining a county with a population of one million or more,
having within their boundaries existing or planned high-occupancy
vehicle lanes on the state highway system, or a regional transportation
investment district ((for capital improvements)), but only to the
extent that the surcharge has not already been imposed by the county,
may, with voter approval, impose a local surcharge of not more than
three-tenths of one percent in the case of a county, or six-tenths of
one percent in the case of a regional transportation investment
district, of the value on vehicles registered to a person residing
within the county or investment district and not more than 13.64
percent on the state sales and use taxes paid under the rate in RCW
82.08.020(2) on retail car rentals within the county or investment
district. A county may impose the surcharge only to the extent that it
has not been imposed by the district. No surcharge may be imposed on
vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070 except vehicles with an unladen
weight of six thousand pounds or less, RCW 46.16.079, 46.16.085, or
46.16.090.
Counties or investment districts imposing a tax under this section
shall contract, before the effective date of the resolution or
ordinance imposing a surcharge, administration and collection to the
state department of licensing, and department of revenue, as
appropriate, which shall deduct ((an)) a percentage amount, as provided
by contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes, for administration
and collection expenses incurred by the department. All administrative
provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.32, and 82.44 RCW shall, insofar as
they are applicable to motor vehicle excise taxes, be applicable to
surcharges imposed under this section. A local sales and use tax
change shall take effect no sooner than seventy-five days after the
department of revenue receives notice of the change and only on the
first day of January, April, July, or October. Notice includes
providing the department of revenue with the digital mapping and legal
descriptions of areas in which the tax will be collected. All
administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32
RCW shall, insofar as they are applicable to state sales and use taxes,
be applicable to surcharges imposed under this section.
If the tax authorized in RCW 81.100.030 is also imposed, the total
proceeds from tax sources imposed under this section and RCW 81.100.030
each year shall not exceed the maximum amount which could be collected
under this section.

Sec. 22 RCW 82.14.430 and 2002 c 56 s 405 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If approved by the majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, a regional transportation investment
district may impose a sales and use tax of up to ((0.5)) 0.1 percent of
the selling price or value of the article used in the case of a use
tax. The tax authorized by this section is in addition to the tax
authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and must be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing district. Motor
vehicles are exempt from the sales and use tax imposed under this
subsection.
(2) If approved by the majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, a regional transportation investment
district may impose a tax on the use of a motor vehicle within a
regional transportation investment district. The tax applies to those
persons who reside within the regional transportation investment
district. The rate of the tax may not exceed ((0.5)) 0.1 percent of
the value of the motor vehicle. The tax authorized by this subsection
is in addition to the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030 and must be
imposed and collected at the time a taxable event under RCW
82.08.020(1) or 82.12.020 takes place. All revenue received under this
subsection must be deposited in the local sales and use tax account and
distributed to the regional transportation investment district
according to RCW 82.14.050. The following provisions apply to the use
tax in this subsection:
(a) Where persons are taxable under chapter 82.08 RCW, the seller
shall collect the use tax from the buyer using the collection
provisions of RCW 82.08.050.
(b) Where persons are taxable under chapter 82.12 RCW, the use tax
must be collected using the provisions of RCW 82.12.045.
(c) "Motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but
does not include farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW
46.04.180 and 46.04.181, off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in
RCW 46.09.020, and snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(d) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(e) The value of a motor vehicle must be determined under RCW
82.12.010.
(f) Except as specifically stated in this subsection (2), chapters
82.12 and 82.32 RCW apply to the use tax. The use tax is a local tax
imposed under the authority of chapter 82.14 RCW, and chapter 82.14 RCW
applies fully to the use tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 36.120
RCW to read as follows:
A regional transportation investment district may adopt system-wide
pricing policies and an implementation plan for the regional
transportation system within its boundaries. "System-wide pricing"
includes the tolling authority provided in RCW 36.120.050, network
value-pricing authority provided in section 24 of this act, the
authority to set regional transit fares as provided in RCW
81.112.080(4), and other system pricing tools as determined by the
district governing board. System-wide pricing charges authorized by
this act may be imposed to improve performance of the regional
transportation system, improve integration of transportation modes,
finance transportation improvements, and measure needed investments.
Pricing charges may vary for type of vehicle, time of day, traffic
conditions, and other factors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A regional transportation investment district may impose a
network value-pricing charge based upon vehicle travel. This charge
may be, but is not limited to, a charge upon the vehicle miles traveled
within the district by a vehicle, or upon vehicle miles traveled within
certain corridors in the district, or upon total vehicle miles traveled
by a vehicle registered to a person whose legal residence is within the
district. Network value-pricing charges imposed may vary by type of
vehicle, time of day, traffic conditions, and other factors.
(2) Charges imposed may be collected either periodically in a
manner prescribed by the district governing board or annually by the
department of licensing upon renewal of the vehicle license. The
district governing board may identify categories of miles driven that
are subject to or exempt from the charge including, but not limited to,
travel outside the district, travel in specified corridors, time of
travel, or exempt or maximum mileage charges.
(3) The mileage charge under this section is subject to the
approval of the transportation commission or its statutory successor.
(4) A district governing board imposing a mileage charge collected
annually by the department of licensing upon renewal of the vehicle
license shall enter into a contract with the department of licensing.
The contract must contain provisions that fully recover the costs to
the department of licensing for collection and administration of the
charge. The district governing board imposing this charge or
initiating an exemption process shall provide at least six months'
notice to the department of licensing before the implementation of any
changes in registration amounts or exemptions.

Sec. 25 RCW 47.56.076 and 2005 c 335 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon approval of a majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, and ((only for the purposes
authorized in RCW 36.120.050(1)(g))) with the approval of the state
transportation commission or its successor, a regional transportation
investment district may authorize and set vehicle tolls on a state
((routes where improvements financed in whole or in part by a regional
transportation investment district add additional lanes to, or
reconstruct lanes on, a highway of statewide significance)) or federal
highway within the boundaries of the district. The department shall
administer the collection of vehicle tolls authorized on designated
facilities unless otherwise specified in law or by contract, and the
((state transportation)) commission((,)) or its successor((,)) shall
((be the tolling authority)) set and impose the tolls in amounts
sufficient to implement the regional transportation investment plan
under RCW 36.120.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this chapter, a
regional transportation investment district may impose vehicle tolls on
either Lake Washington bridge within its boundaries and to implement a
regional transportation investment plan as authorized in chapter 36.120
RCW and RCW 47.56.076.

Sec. 27 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2005 c 424 s 18, 2005 c 402 s 8, 2005
c 215 s 10, and 2005 c 16 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers
conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), and the life sciences discovery fund. However,
the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation
to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 28 RCW 43.84.092 and 2005 c 514 s 1105, 2005 c 353 s 3, 2005
c 339 s 22, 2005 c 314 s 109, 2005 c 312 s 7, and 2005 c 94 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the emergency reserve fund, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the freight mobility investment account, the health
services account, the public health services account, the health system
capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account,
the real estate appraiser commission account, ((the regional
transportation investment district account,)) the resource management
cost account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure account,
the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account,
the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington
bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 29 RCW 43.84.092 and 2005 c 514 s 1106, 2005 c 353 s 4, 2005
c 339 s 23, 2005 c 314 s 110, 2005 c 312 s 8, and 2005 c 94 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the emergency reserve fund, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the freight mobility investment account, the health
services account, the public health services account, the health system
capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, ((the regional transportation investment district
account, the resource management cost account,)) the rural Washington
loan fund, the site closure account, the small city pavement and
sidewalk account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
transportation partnership account, the tuition recovery trust fund,
the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
fruit express account, the Washington judicial retirement system
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3
account, the Washington state health insurance pool account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall not commence construction on any part of the
state route number 520 bridge project until agreements have been
reached with the incorporated towns or cities that represent the
communities affected by the state route number 520 project. The
agreements must provide reasonable assurance that no further
degradation will occur to the citizens' current use and enjoyment of
their properties as a result of repairs and improvements made to the
state route number 520 bridge and its connecting roadways. Such
assurances may be achieved through engineering design choices,
mitigation measures, or a combination of both.

Sec. 31 RCW 36.73.015 and 2005 c 336 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "District" means a transportation benefit district created
under this chapter.
(2) "City" means a city or town.
(3) "Transportation improvement" means a project contained in the
transportation plan of the state or a regional transportation planning
organization ((that is of statewide or regional significance)). A
project may include investment in new or existing highways of statewide
significance, principal arterials of regional significance, high-capacity transportation, public transportation, and other
transportation projects and programs of regional or statewide
significance including transportation demand management. Projects may
also include the operation, preservation, and maintenance of these
facilities or programs. ((Not more than forty percent of the revenues
generated by a district may be expended on city streets, county roads,
existing highways other than highways of statewide significance, and
the creation of a new highway that intersects with a highway of
statewide significance.))

Sec. 32 RCW 36.73.020 and 2005 c 336 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county or city may establish a
transportation benefit district within the county or city area or
within the area specified in subsection (2) of this section, for the
purpose of acquiring, constructing, improving, providing, and funding
a transportation improvement within the district that is consistent
with any existing state, regional, and local transportation plans and
necessitated by existing or reasonably foreseeable congestion levels.
The transportation improvements shall be owned by the county of
jurisdiction if located in an unincorporated area, by the city of
jurisdiction if located in an incorporated area, or by the state in
cases where the transportation improvement is or becomes a state
highway. However, if deemed appropriate by the governing body of the
transportation benefit district, a transportation improvement may be
owned by a participating port district or transit district, unless
otherwise prohibited by law. Transportation improvements shall be
administered and maintained as other public streets, roads, highways,
and transportation improvements. To the extent practicable, the
district shall consider the following criteria when selecting
transportation improvements:
(a) Reduced risk of transportation facility failure and improved
safety;
(b) Improved travel time;
(c) Improved air quality;
(d) Increases in daily and peak period trip capacity;
(e) Improved modal connectivity;
(f) Improved freight mobility;
(g) Cost-effectiveness of the investment;
(h) Optimal performance of the system through time; and
(i) Other criteria, as adopted by the governing body.
(2) ((Subject to subsection (6) of this section,)) The district may
include area within more than one county, city, port district, county
transportation authority, or public transportation benefit area, if the
legislative authority of each participating jurisdiction has agreed to
the inclusion as provided in an interlocal agreement adopted pursuant
to chapter 39.34 RCW. However, the boundaries of the district shall
include all territory within the boundaries of the participating
jurisdictions comprising the district.
(3) The members of the legislative authority proposing to establish
the district, acting ex officio and independently, shall constitute the
governing body of the district: PROVIDED, That where a district
includes area within more than one jurisdiction under subsection (2) of
this section, the district shall be governed under an interlocal
agreement adopted pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW. However, the
governing body shall be composed of at least five members including at
least one elected official from the legislative authority of each
participating jurisdiction.
(4) The treasurer of the jurisdiction proposing to establish the
district shall act as the ex officio treasurer of the district, unless
an interlocal agreement states otherwise.
(5) The electors of the district shall all be registered voters
residing within the district.
(((6) The authority under this section, regarding the establishment
of or the participation in a district, shall not apply to:
(a) Counties with a population greater than one million five
hundred thousand persons and any adjoining counties with a population
greater than five hundred thousand persons;
(b) Cities with any area within the counties under (a) of this
subsection; and
(c) Other jurisdictions with any area within the counties under (a)
of this subsection.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 (1) Prior to a regional transportation
public vote, the department of transportation must complete all of the
following requirements for both the Alaskan Way viaduct and Seattle
Seawall replacement project, and the state route number 520 bridge
replacement and HOV project: (a) In accordance with the national
environmental policy act, the department must designate the preferred
alternative, prepare a substantial project mitigation plan, and
complete a comprehensive cost estimate review using the department's
cost estimate validation process, for each project; (b) in accordance
with all applicable federal highway administration planning and project
management requirements, the department must prepare a project finance
plan for each project that clearly identifies secured and anticipated
fund sources, cash flow timing requirements, and project staging and
phasing plans if applicable; and (c) the department must report these
results for each project to the joint transportation committee.
(2) For purposes of this section, "regional transportation public
vote" means a public vote on: (a) Any integrated regional
transportation finance plan developed by the regional transportation
commission or its successor entity under section 3 of this act; (b) any
regional transportation investment plan developed by a regional
transportation investment district under RCW 36.120.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 Section 28 of this act expires July 1,
2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 Section 29 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

--- END ---