BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW
to read as follows:
In any advertising, including broadcast, print media, or written
advertising, on behalf of the state lottery, the state lottery or its
lottery sales agents may not actively target advertisement to persons
under the age of twenty-one years.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.46.0282 and 1997 c 118 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Social card game" as used in this chapter means a card game that
constitutes gambling and is authorized by the commission under RCW
9.46.070. Authorized card games may include a house-banked or a
player-funded banked card game, but no one may participate or attempt
to participate in a house-banked card game who is under the age of
twenty-one years. No one may participate in ((the)) a social card game
or have an interest in the proceeds of ((the)) a social card game who
is not a player or a person licensed by the commission to participate
in social card games. There shall be two or more participants in the
card game who are players or persons licensed by the commission. The
card game must be played in accordance with the rules adopted by the
commission under RCW 9.46.070, which shall include but not be limited
to rules for the collection of fees, limitation of wagers, and
management of player funds. The number of tables authorized shall be
set by the commission but shall not exceed a total of fifteen separate
tables per establishment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The Washington state gambling commission
shall, in collaboration with the appropriate committees of the
legislature, review the policy issues related to establishing a minimum
age of gambling for gambling activities under its jurisdiction. The
commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2006.

--- END ---