BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The system for determining how, when, and where former felons
have their right to vote restored is contributing to uncertainty about
the validity of the election process, and local county clerks and
auditors find it impossible to access clear information about this
determination;
(b) Washington currently denies the right to vote to all persons
who have not fully completed all conditions of their sentence,
including full payment of their legal financial obligations;
(c) Responsibility for monitoring compliance with the various
conditions of the sentence is placed at various times with the
department of corrections, the county clerk, and the sentencing judge;
and
(d) The current system for determining when the right to vote has
been restored takes away time from the other important duties of the
county clerks, county auditors, and secretary of state's staff.
(2) The legislature intends to establish a clear standard for
restricting and restoring the voting rights of felons that will provide
clear information about the status of former felon voting rights to all
state and local election officials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any felony case, when the court sentences the defendant to
a term of total confinement in the custody of the department of
corrections, the defendant is deprived of the right to register to
vote, update a registration or vote in any election in this state from
the date of sentencing until:
(a) The defendant is released from total confinement; or
(b) The defendant's conviction is reversed, dismissed, or vacated.
(2) In any felony case, when the defendant receives a subsequent
term of imprisonment of total confinement in the department of
corrections for violation of the conditions of community supervision,
community placement, and/or community custody, the defendant is
deprived of the right to register to vote, update a registration, or
vote in any election in this state from the date of sentencing until:
(a) The defendant is released from total confinement; or
(b) The defendant's conviction is reversed, dismissed, or vacated.
(3) A person convicted of any crime and serving a term of total
confinement in any federal correctional institution in this state is
deprived of the right to register to vote, update a registration, or
vote in any election in this state from the date of sentencing until:
(a) The person is released from total confinement; or
(b) The person's conviction is reversed, dismissed, or vacated.
(4) The rights and privileges withdrawn by this section are
restored automatically upon release from total confinement.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.08.520 and 2005 c 246 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Upon receiving official notice of a person's conviction of a
felony in either state or federal court, if the convicted person is a
registered voter in the county, the county auditor shall cancel the
defendant's voter registration. Additionally, the secretary of state
in conjunction with the department of corrections, the Washington state
patrol, the office of the administrator for the courts, and other
appropriate state agencies shall arrange for a quarterly comparison of
a list of known felons with the statewide voter registration list. If
a person is found on a felon list and the statewide voter registration
list, the secretary of state or county auditor shall confirm the match
through a date of birth comparison and suspend the voter registration
from the official state voter registration list. The canceling
authority shall send to the person at his or her last known voter
registration address a notice of the proposed cancellation and an
explanation of the requirements for restoring the right to vote once
all terms of sentencing have been completed. If the person does not
respond within thirty days, the registration must be canceled.
(2) The right to vote may be restored by, for each felony
conviction, one of the following:
(a) A certificate of discharge issued by the sentencing court, as
provided in RCW 9.94A.637;
(b) A court order restoring the right, as provided in RCW 9.92.066;
(c) A final order of discharge issued by the indeterminate sentence
review board, as provided in RCW 9.96.050; or
(d) A certificate of restoration issued by the governor, as
provided in RCW 9.96.020.)) The secretary of state shall maintain a
current list of all incarcerated felons in the department of
corrections.
(2) The department of corrections shall provide the secretary of
state's office with a list of the name and last known address of each
person who:
(a) Was convicted of a felony in a Washington state court; and
(b) Is currently incarcerated in the department of corrections to
a term of total confinement for commission of a felony. The secretary
of state shall arrange for a periodic transmittal of the information
after consultation with the department of corrections.
(3) The department of corrections shall provide the secretary of
state's office with a list of the name of each convicted felon who has
been released from total confinement at the department of corrections.
The secretary of state shall arrange for a periodic transmittal of the
information after consultation with the department of corrections.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.08.651 and 2005 c 246 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the secretary of state shall create and maintain
a statewide voter registration data base. This data base must be a
single, uniform, official, centralized, interactive computerized
statewide voter registration list defined, maintained, and administered
at the state level that contains the name and registration information
of every legally registered voter in the state and assigns a unique
identifier to each legally registered voter in the state.
(2) The computerized list must serve as the single system for
storing and maintaining the official list of registered voters
throughout the state.
(3) The computerized list must contain the name and registration
information of every legally registered voter in the state.
(4) Under the computerized list, a unique identifier is assigned to
each legally registered voter in the state.
(5) The computerized list must be coordinated with other agency
data bases within the state, including but not limited to the
department of corrections, the department of licensing, the department
of health, the Washington state patrol, and the office of the
administrator for the courts. The computerized list may also be
coordinated with the data bases of election officials in other states.
(6) Any election officer in the state, including any local election
officer, may obtain immediate electronic access to the information
contained in the computerized list.
(7) All voter registration information obtained by any local
election officer in the state must be electronically entered into the
computerized list on an expedited basis at the time the information is
provided to the local officer.
(8) The chief state election officer shall provide support, as may
be required, so that local election officers are able to enter
information as described in subsection (3) of this section.
(9) The computerized list serves as the official voter registration
list for the conduct of all elections.
(10) The secretary of state has data authority on all voter
registration data.
(11) The voter registration data base must be designed to
accomplish at a minimum, the following:
(a) Comply with the Help America Vote Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-252);
(b) Identify duplicate voter registrations;
(c) Identify suspected duplicate voters;
(d) Screen against the department of corrections, the Washington
state patrol, and other appropriate state agency data bases to aid in
the ((cancellation of voter registration of)) identification of felons
who are currently sentenced to a term of total confinement in the
department of corrections, of persons who have declined to serve on
juries by virtue of not being citizens of the United States, and of
persons determined to be legally incompetent to vote;
(e) Provide up-to-date signatures of voters for the purposes of
initiative signature checking;
(f) Provide for a comparison between the voter registration data
base and the department of licensing change of address data base;
(g) Provide online access for county auditors with the goal of real
time duplicate checking and update capabilities; and
(h) Provide for the cancellation of voter registration for persons
who have moved to other states and surrendered their Washington state
drivers' licenses.
(12) In order to maintain the statewide voter registration data
base, the secretary of state may, upon agreement with other appropriate
jurisdictions, screen against data bases maintained by election
officials in other states and data bases maintained by federal agencies
including, but not limited to, the federal bureau of investigation, the
federal court system, the federal bureau of prisons, and the bureau of
citizenship and immigration services.
(13) The secretary of state shall retain information regarding
previous successful appeals of proposed cancellations of registrations
in order to avoid repeated cancellations for the same reason.
(14) The secretary of state must review and update the records of
all registered voters on the computerized list on a quarterly basis to
make additions and corrections.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.68.020 and 2003 c 111 s 1702 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any registered voter may contest the right of any person declared
elected to an office to be issued a certificate of election for any of
the following causes:
(1) For misconduct on the part of any member of any precinct
election board involved therein;
(2) Because the person whose right is being contested was not at
the time the person was declared elected eligible to that office;
(3) Because the person whose right is being contested was
((previous to)), at the time of the election ((convicted of a)),
incarcerated in the department of corrections to a term of total
confinement pursuant to a felony sentence imposed by a court of
competent jurisdiction((, the conviction not having been reversed nor
the person's civil rights restored after the conviction));
(4) Because the person whose right is being contested gave a bribe
or reward to a voter or to an inspector or judge of election for the
purpose of procuring the election, or offered to do so;
(5) On account of illegal votes.
(a) Illegal votes include but are not limited to the following:
(i) More than one vote cast by a single voter;
(ii) A vote cast by a person disqualified under Article VI, section
3 of the state Constitution.
(b) Illegal votes do not include votes cast by improperly
registered voters who were not properly challenged under RCW 29A.08.810
and 29A.08.820.
All election contests must proceed under RCW ((29A.68.010))
29A.68.011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 10.64.021 (Notice of conviction) and
1994 c 57 s 1 are each repealed.

--- END ---