BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.20.785 and 2001 c 226 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of transportation may use the design-build
procedure for public works projects over ten million dollars where:
(((1))) (a) The construction activities are highly specialized and
a design-build approach is critical in developing the construction
methodology; or
(((2))) (b) The projects selected provide opportunity for greater
innovation and efficiencies between the designer and the builder; or
(((3))) (c) Significant savings in project delivery time would be
realized.
((This section expires April 30, 2008.))
(2) To test the applicability of the design-build procedure on
smaller projects and specialty projects, the department may conduct up
to five pilot projects on projects that cost between two and ten
million dollars. The department shall evaluate these pilot projects
with respect to cost, time to complete, efficiencies gained, if any,
and other pertinent information to facilitate analysis regarding the
further use of the design-build process on projects of this size.

--- END ---