BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may issue written permits authorizing permittees to
install or remove tire chains on motor vehicles with the following
conditions:
(1) Chains may only be installed or removed at locations designated
in the permit;
(2) Permittees must comply with terms and conditions in the permit
relating to the safe and orderly movement of traffic; and
(3) Permittees may charge a fee to drivers for their services.
The department may issue sufficient permits for the installation or
removal of tire chains that it finds necessary or desirable to
accommodate the demand for those services consistent with the maximum
convenience and safety to traffic. The department may charge a fee to
permittees for the issuance of permits. The department, in issuing a
permit for the installation or removal of tire chains, assumes no
responsibility for the actions, inactions, competence, or reliability
of the permittee in performing those services and shall not be liable
for the damages relating to acts or omissions of the permittees. The
department may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.32.120 and 1984 c 7 s 183 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in section 1 of this act, it is unlawful for any
person to erect a structure or establishment or maintain a business,
the nature of which requires the use by patrons or customers of
property adjoining the structure or establishment unless the structure
or establishment is located at a distance from the right of way of any
state highway so that none of the right of way thereof is required for
the use of the patrons or customers of the establishment. Any such
structure erected or business maintained that makes use of or tends to
invite patrons to use the right of way or any portion thereof of any
state highway by occupying it while a patron is a public nuisance, and
the department may fence the right of way of the state highway to
prevent such unauthorized use thereof.

--- END ---