BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.332 and 1998 c 312 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter does not apply to amounts received from buying bulk
raw milk, wheat, oats, dry peas, dry beans, lentils, triticale, canola,
corn, rye, and barley, but not including any manufactured products
thereof, and selling the same at wholesale.

--- END ---