BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.45.180 and 2005 c 486 s 2 and 2005 c 480 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) For taxes collected by the county under this chapter, the
county treasurer shall collect a five-dollar fee on all transactions
required by this chapter where the transaction does not require the
payment of tax. A total of five dollars shall be collected in the form
of a tax and fee, where the calculated tax payment is less than five
dollars. ((Through June 30, 2010, the county treasurer shall collect
an additional five-dollar fee on all transactions required by this
chapter where the transaction does not require the payment of a tax,
and on all taxable transactions required by this chapter where the
calculated tax payment is less than five dollars. This additional
five-dollar fee shall be deposited in the county treasurer's real
estate excise tax electronic technology account.)) Through June 30,
2006, the county treasurer shall place one percent of the taxes
collected by the county under this chapter and the treasurer's fee in
the county current expense fund to defray costs of collection. After
June 30, 2006, the county treasurer shall place one and three-tenths
percent of the taxes collected by the county under this chapter and the
treasurer's fee in the county current expense fund to defray costs of
collection. For taxes collected by the county under this chapter
before July 1, 2006, the county treasurer shall pay over to the state
treasurer and account to the department of revenue for the proceeds at
the same time the county treasurer remits funds to the state under RCW
84.56.280. For taxes collected by the county under this chapter after
June 30, 2006, on a monthly basis the county treasurer shall pay over
to the state treasurer the month's transmittal. The month's
transmittal must be received by the state treasurer by ((5:00)) 12:00
p.m. on the last working day of each month. The county treasurer shall
account to the department for the month's transmittal by the twentieth
day of the month following the month in which the month's transmittal
was paid over to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall
deposit the proceeds in the general fund.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the definitions in this
subsection apply.
(i) "Close of business" means the time when the county treasurer
makes his or her daily deposit of proceeds.
(ii) "Month's transmittal" means all proceeds deposited by the
county through the close of business of the day that is two working
days before the last working day of the month. This definition of
"month's transmittal" shall not be construed as requiring any change in
a county's practices regarding the timing of its daily deposits of
proceeds.
(iii) "Proceeds" means moneys collected and receipted by the county
from the taxes imposed by this chapter, less the county's share of the
proceeds used to defray the county's costs of collection allowable in
(a) of this subsection.
(iv) "Working day" means a calendar day, except Saturdays, Sundays,
and all legal holidays as provided in RCW 1.16.050.
(2) For taxes collected by the department of revenue under this
chapter, the department shall remit the tax to the state treasurer who
shall deposit the proceeds of any state tax in the general fund. The
state treasurer shall deposit the proceeds of any local taxes imposed
under chapter 82.46 RCW in the local real estate excise tax account
hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the local real estate
excise tax account may be spent only for distribution to counties,
cities, and towns imposing a tax under chapter 82.46 RCW. Except as
provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of investments of balances in
the local real estate excise tax account shall be credited to the local
real estate excise tax account and distributed to the counties, cities,
and towns monthly. Monthly the state treasurer shall make distribution
from the local real estate excise tax account to the counties, cities,
and towns the amount of tax collected on behalf of each taxing
authority. The state treasurer shall make the distribution under this
subsection without appropriation.
(3)(a) The real estate excise tax electronic technology account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures and the account is not subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(b) Through June 30, 2010, the county treasurer shall collect an
additional five-dollar fee on all ((taxable)) transactions required by
this chapter, regardless of whether the transaction requires the
payment of tax. The county treasurer shall remit this fee to the state
treasurer at the same time the county treasurer remits funds to the
state under subsection (1) of this section. The state treasurer shall
place money from this fee in the real estate excise tax electronic
technology account. By the twentieth day of the subsequent month, the
state treasurer shall distribute to each county treasurer according to
the following formula: Three-quarters of the funds available shall be
equally distributed among the thirty-nine counties; and the balance
shall be ratably distributed among the counties in direct proportion to
their population as it relates to the total state's population based on
most recent statistics by the office of financial management.
(c) When received by the county treasurer, the funds shall be
placed in a special real estate excise tax electronic technology fund
held by the county treasurer to be used exclusively for the
development, implementation, and maintenance of an electronic
processing and reporting system for real estate excise tax affidavits.
Funds may be expended to make the system compatible with the automated
real estate excise tax system developed by the department and
compatible with the processes used in the offices of the county
assessor and county auditor. Any funds held in the account that are
not expended by July 1, 2015, revert to the county capital improvements
fund in accordance with RCW 82.46.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.45.210 and 2005 c 480 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To the extent that funds are appropriated, the department shall
administer a grant program for counties to assist in the development,
implementation, and maintenance of an electronic processing and
reporting system for real estate excise tax affidavits that is
compatible with the automated real estate excise tax system developed
by the department, and to assist in complying with the requirements of
RCW 82.45.180(1).
(2) Subject to the limits in subsection (3) of this section, the
amount of the grant shall be equal to the amount paid by a county to:
(a) Purchase computer hardware or software, or to repair or upgrade
existing computer hardware or software, used for the electronic
processing and reporting of real estate excise tax affidavits and that
is compatible with the automated real estate excise tax system
developed by the department; and
(b) Make changes to existing software that are necessary to comply
with the requirements of RCW 82.45.180(1).
(3)(a) No county is eligible for grants under this section totaling
more than one hundred thousand dollars.
(b) Grant funds shall not be awarded for expenditures made by a
county with funds distributed to the county by the state treasurer
under RCW 82.45.180(3)(b).
(4) No more than three million nine hundred thousand dollars in
grants may be awarded under this section.
(5) The source of funds for this grant program is the real estate
excise tax grant account created in RCW 82.45.200.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---