BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.390 and 2002 c 363 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
governing body of a public facilities district created ((before July
31, 2002)) prior to June 30, 2008, under chapter 35.57 or 36.100 RCW
that commences construction of a new regional center, or improvement or
rehabilitation of an existing new regional center, before January 1,
((2004)) 2008, may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes
authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the public facilities district.
The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in
the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a
use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid over to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW. The department of revenue shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the public facilities
district.
(3) No tax may be collected under this section before August 1,
2000. The tax imposed in this section shall expire when the bonds
issued for the construction of the regional center and related parking
facilities are retired, but not more than twenty-five years after the
tax is first collected.
(4) Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the
purposes set forth in RCW 35.57.020 and must be matched with an amount
from other public or private sources equal to thirty-three percent of
the amount collected under this section, provided that amounts
generated from nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 35.57
RCW or nonvoter approved taxes authorized under chapter 36.100 RCW
shall not constitute a public or private source. For the purpose of
this section, public or private sources includes, but is not limited to
cash or in-kind contributions used in all phases of the development or
improvement of the regional center, land that is donated and used for
the siting of the regional center, cash or in-kind contributions from
public or private foundations, or amounts attributed to private sector
partners as part of a public and private partnership agreement
negotiated by the public facilities district.
(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the combined
total tax levied under this section shall not be greater than 0.033
percent. If both a public facilities district created under chapter
35.57 RCW and a public facilities district created under chapter 36.100
RCW impose a tax under this section, the tax imposed by a public
facilities district created under chapter 35.57 RCW shall be credited
against the tax imposed by a public facilities district created under
chapter 36.100 RCW.
(b) After July 1, 2006, a public facilities district is not subject
to the limits under (a) of this subsection if the tax is being levied
for the construction of a new regional center to be used for community
events, and artistic, musical, theatrical, or other cultural
exhibitions, presentations, or performances and having two thousand or
fewer permanent seats, or improvements or rehabilitation of an existing
regional center to be used for community events, and artistic, musical,
theatrical, or other cultural exhibitions, presentations, or
performances and having two thousand or fewer permanent seats provided
that the public facilities district is located in a county with a
population of less than three hundred thousand.
(6) A public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW
is not eligible to impose the tax under this section if the legislative
authority of the county where the public facilities district is located
has imposed a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.0485 or 82.14.0494.

--- END ---