BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of ecology shall, in coordination with the
department of health, adopt rules for reclaimed water use consistent
with this chapter. The rules must address all aspects of reclaimed
water use, including commercial and industrial uses, land applications,
direct recharge, wetland discharge, surface percolation, constructed
wetlands, stream flow augmentation, and greywater use. The rules must
also designate whether the department of ecology or the department of
health will be the lead permitting or regulatory agency responsible for
a particular aspect of reclaimed water use. In developing the rules,
the departments of health and ecology shall amend or rescind any
existing rules on reclaimed water in conflict with the new rules.
(2) All rules required to be adopted pursuant to this section must
be completed no later than December 31, 2010, although the department
of ecology is encouraged to adopt the final rules as soon as possible.
The department of ecology may not update the rules adopted under this
section unless specific legislative authority is provided to update the
standards.
(3) The department of ecology must consult with the advisory
committee created under RCW 90.46.050 in all aspects of rule
development required under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.46.050 and 1995 c 342 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of ((health)) ecology shall, before July 1, ((1995))
2006, form an advisory committee, in coordination with the department
of ((ecology)) health and the department of agriculture, which will
provide technical assistance in the development of standards,
procedures, and guidelines required by this chapter. ((Such)) The
advisory committee shall be composed of ((individuals from the public
water and wastewater utilities, landscaping enhancement industry,
commercial and industrial application community, and any other persons
deemed technically helpful by the department of health)) a broad range
of interested individuals representing the various stakeholders that
utilize or are potentially impacted by the use of reclaimed water. The
advisory committee must also contain individuals with technical
expertise and knowledge of new advancements in technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of ecology must present
interim reports to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2008, and January 1, 2009, that summarize the steps taken to
that date towards the final rule making required by section 1 of this
act. The reports must include, at a minimum, a summary of
participation in the advisory group and the topics considered by the
department.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.46.030 and 2005 c 59 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department of health shall, in coordination with the
department of ecology, adopt a single set of standards, procedures, and
guidelines on or before August 1, 1993, for the industrial and
commercial use of reclaimed water.
(b) Standards adopted under this section are superseded by any
rules adopted by the department of ecology pursuant to section 1 of
this act as they relate to the industrial and commercial use of
reclaimed water.
(2) Until the department of ecology adopts rules pursuant to
section 1 of this act that relate to the industrial and commercial use
of reclaimed water, the department of health may issue a reclaimed
water permit for industrial and commercial uses of reclaimed water to
the generator of reclaimed water who may then distribute the water,
subject to provisions in the permit governing the location, rate, water
quality, and purposes of use. Permits issued after the adoption of
rules under section 1 of this act must be consistent with the adopted
rules.
(3) The department of health in consultation with the advisory
committee established in RCW 90.46.050, shall develop recommendations
for a fee structure for permits issued under subsection (2) of this
section. Fees shall be established in amounts to fully recover, and
not exceed, expenses incurred by the department of health in processing
permit applications and modifications, monitoring and evaluating
compliance with permits, and conducting inspections and supporting the
reasonable overhead expenses that are directly related to these
activities. Permit fees may not be used for research or enforcement
activities. The department of health shall not issue permits under
this section until a fee structure has been established, or after the
rules required by section 1 of this act have been adopted.
(4) A permit under this section for use of reclaimed water may be
issued only to:
(a) A municipal, quasi-municipal, or other governmental entity;
(b) A private utility as defined in RCW 36.94.010; or
(c) The holder of a waste discharge permit issued under chapter
90.48 RCW.
(5) The authority and duties created in this section are in
addition to any authority and duties already provided in law with
regard to sewage and wastewater collection, treatment, and disposal for
the protection of health and safety of the state's waters. Nothing in
this section limits the powers of the state or any political
subdivision to exercise such authority.
(6) Until the department of ecology adopts rules pursuant to
section 1 of this act that relate to the industrial and commercial use
of reclaimed water, the department of health may implement the
requirements of this section through the department of ecology by
execution of a formal agreement between the departments. ((Upon
execution of such an agreement)) After the rules required by section 1
of this act are adopted, the department of ecology may issue reclaimed
water permits for industrial and commercial uses of reclaimed water by
issuance of permits under chapter 90.48 RCW, and may establish and
collect fees as required for permits issued under chapter 90.48 RCW.
(7) Until the department of ecology adopts rules pursuant to
section 1 of this act that relate to the industrial and commercial use
of reclaimed water, and before deciding whether to issue a permit under
this section to a private utility, the department of health may require
information that is reasonable and necessary to determine whether the
private utility has the financial and other resources to ((assure))
ensure the reliability, continuity, and supervision of the reclaimed
water facility.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.46.040 and 2005 c 59 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department of ecology shall, in coordination with the
department of health, adopt a single set of standards, procedures, and
guidelines, on or before August 1, 1993, for land applications of
reclaimed water.
(b) Standards adopted under this section are superseded by any
rules adopted by the department of ecology pursuant to section 1 of
this act as they relate to the land application of reclaimed water.
(2) A permit is required for any land application of reclaimed
water. The department of ecology may issue a reclaimed water permit
under chapter 90.48 RCW to the generator of reclaimed water who may
then distribute the water, subject to provisions in the permit
governing the location, rate, water quality, and purpose of use. The
department of ecology shall not issue more than one permit for any
individual land application of reclaimed water to a single generator.
(3) In cases where the department of ecology determines, in land
applications of reclaimed water, that a significant risk to the public
health exists, the department shall refer the application to the
department of health for review and consultation and the department of
health may require fees appropriate for review and consultation from
the applicant pursuant to RCW 43.70.250.
(4) A permit under this section for use of reclaimed water may be
issued only to:
(a) A municipal, quasi-municipal, or other governmental entity;
(b) A private utility as defined under RCW 36.94.010; or
(c) The holder of a waste discharge permit issued under chapter
90.48 RCW.
(5) The authority and duties created in this section are in
addition to any authority and duties already provided in law. Nothing
in this section limits the powers of the state or any political
subdivision to exercise such authority.
(6) Before deciding whether to issue a permit under this section to
a private utility, the department of ecology may require information
that is reasonable and necessary to determine whether the private
utility has the financial and other resources to ((assure)) ensure the
reliability, continuity, and supervision of the reclaimed water
facility.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.46.042 and 1995 c 342 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of ecology shall, in consultation with the
department of health, adopt a single set of standards, procedures, and
guidelines, on or before December 31, 1996, for direct recharge using
reclaimed water. The standards shall address both water quality
considerations and avoidance of property damage from excessive
recharge.
(2) Standards adopted under this section are superseded by any
rules adopted by the department of ecology pursuant to section 1 of
this act as they relate to direct recharge using reclaimed water.

Sec. 7 RCW 90.46.044 and 1995 c 342 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of ecology shall, in consultation with the
department of health, adopt a single set of standards, procedures, and
guidelines, on or before June 30, 1996, for discharge of reclaimed
water to wetlands.
(2) Standards adopted under this section are superseded by any
rules adopted by the department of ecology pursuant to section 1 of
this act as they relate to discharge of reclaimed water to wetlands.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.46.080 and 1997 c 444 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, reclaimed water
may be beneficially used for surface percolation provided the reclaimed
water meets the ground water recharge criteria as measured in ground
water beneath or down gradient of the recharge project site, and has
been incorporated into a sewer or water comprehensive plan, as
applicable, adopted by the applicable local government and approved by
the department of health or department of ecology as applicable.
(2) If the state ground water recharge criteria as defined by RCW
90.46.010 do not contain a standard for a constituent or contaminant,
the department of ecology shall establish a discharge limit consistent
with the goals of this chapter, except as otherwise provided in this
section.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, reclaimed water
that does not meet the ground water recharge criteria may be
beneficially used for surface percolation where the department of
ecology, in consultation with the department of health, has
specifically authorized such use at such lower standard.
(4) The provisions of this section are superseded by any rules
adopted by the department of ecology pursuant to section 1 of this act
as they relate to surface percolation.

Sec. 9 RCW 90.46.090 and 1997 c 444 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Reclaimed water may be beneficially used for discharge into
constructed beneficial use wetlands and constructed treatment wetlands
provided the reclaimed water meets the class A or B reclaimed water
standards as defined in the reclamation criteria, and the discharge is
incorporated into a sewer or water comprehensive plan, as applicable,
adopted by the applicable local government and approved by the
department of health or department of ecology as applicable.
(2) Reclaimed water that does not meet the class A or B reclaimed
water standards may be beneficially used for discharge into constructed
treatment wetlands where the department of ecology, in consultation
with the department of health, has specifically authorized such use at
such lower standards.
(3)(a) The department of ecology and the department of health must
develop appropriate standards for discharging reclaimed water into
constructed beneficial use wetlands and constructed treatment wetlands.
These standards must be considered as part of the approval process
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(b) Standards adopted under this section are superseded by any
rules adopted by the department of ecology pursuant to section 1 of
this act as they relate to discharge into constructed beneficial use
wetlands and constructed treatment wetlands.

Sec. 10 RCW 90.46.100 and 1995 c 342 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Reclaimed water intended for beneficial reuse may be discharged
for streamflow augmentation provided the reclaimed water meets the
requirements of the federal water pollution control act, chapter 90.48
RCW, and is incorporated into a sewer or water comprehensive plan, as
applicable, adopted by the applicable local government and approved by
the department of health or department of ecology as applicable.
(2) Standards adopted under this section are superseded by any
rules adopted by the department of ecology pursuant to section 1 of
this act as they relate to discharge of reclaimed water for streamflow
augmentation.

--- END ---