BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.095 and 1998 c 299 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tourism ((development advisory)) policy committee is
created within the department. The committee shall have a total of
fifteen members. There shall be one member from each of the two
largest political caucuses in the house of representatives and senate
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate, respectively. The remaining eleven members
shall be appointed by the ((director)) governor and shall represent the
travel industry. When making appointments, the ((director)) governor
shall ensure to the greatest extent possible that the industry
representatives include all sectors of the travel industry in
Washington state and are diverse with respect to region of the state,
gender, and ethnicity.
(2) The tourism ((development advisory)) policy committee shall
meet at such times designated by the director but not less than
((twice)) four times per calendar year. The committee shall ((review
and comment on)) develop the tourism development plan presented by the
department and advise the director ((concerning)) on tourism activities
the department should undertake.
(((3) This section expires June 30, 2008.))

--- END ---