BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.20.030 and 1984 c 287 s 75 and 1984 c 243 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The state board of health shall be composed of ten members. These
shall be the secretary or the secretary's designee and nine other
persons to be appointed by the governor, including four persons
experienced in matters of health and sanitation, one of whom is a
member of the American Indian health commission for Washington state;
an elected city official who is a member of a local health board((,));
an elected county official who is a member of a local health
board((,)); a local health officer((,)); and two persons representing
the consumers of health care. Before appointing the city official, the
governor shall consider any recommendations submitted by the
association of Washington cities. Before appointing the county
official, the governor shall consider any recommendations submitted by
the Washington state association of counties. Before appointing the
local health officer, the governor shall consider any recommendations
submitted by the Washington state association of local public health
officials. Before appointing one of the two consumer representatives,
the governor shall consider any recommendations submitted by the state
council on aging. The chairman shall be selected by the governor from
among the nine appointed members. The department of social and health
services shall provide necessary technical staff support to the board.
The board may employ an executive director and a confidential
secretary, each of whom shall be exempt from the provisions of the
state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW.
Members of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

--- END ---