BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the current
system in this state of allowing hospitals without on-site open heart
surgery programs to perform emergency but not nonemergency angioplasty
and stent placements, also known as percutaneous coronary intervention,
is an inefficient system and is impacting access to and quality of
cardiac services in many communities throughout the state. Negative
consequences of the current system include:
(a) An inability for many communities to recruit and retain
cardiologists resulting in a shortage of cardiologists that impacts the
availability, accessibility, and quality of comprehensive cardiac
services;
(b) Duplication of diagnostic tests, evaluations, and other
procedures, which leads to increased patient risk; and
(c) Higher costs associated with duplication, transfers, and longer
hospital stays.
(2) While advancements in technology have expanded the availability
of nonemergency percutaneous coronary interventions at many hospitals
without on-site open heart surgery programs both nationally and
internationally, Washington state only allows hospitals without on-site
open heart surgery programs to perform percutaneous coronary
interventions on an emergency basis. The number of hospitals
performing nonemergency percutaneous coronary interventions without
on-site open heart surgery programs continues to grow in the United
States. These interventions are being performed in every
industrialized country in Europe, and this practice is approved by the
European society for cardiology. Despite this growing trend, concerns
regarding whether nonemergency percutaneous coronary interventions can
be performed safely and effectively in hospitals without on-site open
heart surgery programs continue to be raised because existing data is
gathered from registries, not randomized trials.
(3) The Johns Hopkins cardiovascular patient outcomes research team
elective angioplasty study, conducted in partnership with nationally
renowned cardiologists and researchers from the nation's top research
institutions, is a randomized clinical trial comparing nonemergency
percutaneous coronary interventions performed at hospitals with and
without on-site open heart surgery programs. The Johns Hopkins study
is designed to gather the highest quality evidence-based data to answer
the concerns raised.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature that Washington state allow
qualified hospitals to participate in the Johns Hopkins study to ensure
that future decisions on cardiac service delivery in Washington are
made on evidence-based data, and where possible, such data shall
include data specific to Washington state. The legislature finds that
participation in the study is in the best interests of our citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) As used in sections 1 through 3 of this
act, "Johns Hopkins study" means the Johns Hopkins cardiovascular
patient outcomes research team elective angioplasty study.
(2) The department shall waive any existing rules, policies, or
directives that restrict or prohibit Washington state hospitals from
participating in the Johns Hopkins study.
(3) The waivers shall be granted only to those hospitals that:
(a) Meet the specific Johns Hopkins study criteria for
participation and any Washington state specific criteria;
(b) Are accepted by Johns Hopkins University into the Johns Hopkins
study; and
(c) Are approved for participation by the department.
(4) Waivers to existing rules, policies, or directives shall be
issued to hospitals only for the specific time period of the Johns
Hopkins study.
(5) The process used to determine which hospitals shall participate
in the Johns Hopkins study shall include the Johns Hopkins study
criteria as published in the Johns Hopkins Cardiovascular Patient
Outcomes Research Team Elective Angioplasty Study Manual of Operations.
(6) In addition, no hospital may be approved to participate in the
Johns Hopkins study if participation would reduce the number of
emergency and nonemergency percutaneous coronary interventions at any
hospital with an existing open heart surgery program to below two
hundred twenty interventions per year.
(7) The department shall monitor the outcomes of the Johns Hopkins
study, obtain quarterly reports from Johns Hopkins University, and send
those reports to the chairs of the house of representatives and senate
health committees.
(8) The department may terminate Washington state participation in
the Johns Hopkins study if, after consultation with Johns Hopkins
University, it finds that the study is endangering the health and
safety of Washington citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department shall require hospitals
participating in the Johns Hopkins study to submit an application fee
to the department to cover appropriate costs, not covered by the Johns
Hopkins study, for the administration of the Johns Hopkins study by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires December 31, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.70 RCW.

--- END ---