BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Currently, state employees are prohibited
from collectively bargaining any aspect of the state pension programs
provided by the state for its employees. The intent of this
legislation is to maintain the state's pension programs, benefits, and
systems as items not subject to collective bargaining between the state
and the representatives of its various employee units, but to expressly
allow negotiation for collectively bargained employee paid supplemental
pension programs provided by nonstate entities.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.80.020 and 2002 c 354 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the matters
subject to bargaining include wages, hours, and other terms and
conditions of employment, and the negotiation of any question arising
under a collective bargaining agreement.
(2) The employer is not required to bargain over matters pertaining
to:
(a) Health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits,
except as required in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Any retirement system or retirement benefit administered by the
department of retirement systems; or
(c) Rules of the director of personnel or the Washington personnel
resources board adopted under section 203, chapter 354, Laws of 2002.
(3) Matters subject to bargaining include the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits. However,
except as provided otherwise in this subsection for institutions of
higher education, negotiations regarding the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits shall be
conducted between the employer and one coalition of all the exclusive
bargaining representatives subject to this chapter. Any such provision
agreed to by the employer and the coalition shall be included in all
master collective bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties. For
institutions of higher education, promotional preferences and the
number of names to be certified for vacancies shall be bargained under
the provisions of RCW 41.80.010(4).
(4) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not agree to any proposal that would prevent the implementation of
approved affirmative action plans or that would be inconsistent with
the comparable worth agreement that provided the basis for the salary
changes implemented beginning with the 1983-1985 biennium to achieve
comparable worth.
(5) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not bargain over matters pertaining to management rights established in
RCW 41.80.040.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a conflict
exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or agency
policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment
and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter,
the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a
collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a
statute is invalid and unenforceable.
(7) This section does not prohibit bargaining that affects
contracts authorized by RCW 41.06.142.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.80.040 and 2002 c 354 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
The employer shall not bargain over rights of management which, in
addition to all powers, duties, and rights established by
constitutional provision or statute, shall include but not be limited
to the following:
(1) The functions and programs of the employer, the use of
technology, and the structure of the organization;
(2) The employer's budget and the size of the agency work force,
including determining the financial basis for layoffs;
(3) The right to direct and supervise employees;
(4) The right to take whatever actions are deemed necessary to
carry out the mission of the state and its agencies during emergencies;
and
(5) Retirement plans and retirement benefits provided by any state
retirement plan, but not including supplemental pension programs that
are provided other than by the state, and purchased entirely through
collectively bargained employee contributions.

--- END ---