BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a state employee from
distributing communications from an employee organization or charitable
organization to other state employees if the communications do not
support or oppose a ballot proposition or candidate for federal, state,
or local public office. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize any lobbying activity with public funds beyond the activity
permitted by RCW 42.17.190.
(2) "Employee organization," for purposes of this section, means
any organization, union, or association in which employees participate
and that exists for the purpose of collective bargaining with employers
or for the purpose of opposing collective bargaining or certification
of a union.

--- END ---