BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Carbon monoxide is a potentially deadly gas that can lead to
brain injury and death.
(2) Marine engines are not subject to the same federal and state-mandated emission controls as automobiles and, therefore, could emit
dangerously high concentrations of carbon monoxide into the atmosphere,
increasing the chance of exposure to potentially lethal amounts of
carbon monoxide.
(3) Federal agencies have found that carbon monoxide can gather in
deadly concentrations behind ski boats and cabin cruisers.
(4) Dangerous levels of carbon monoxide can accumulate around
vessel swim decks and areas where occupants frequently sit or swim at
the stern of the boat because the exhaust ports for both propulsion
engines and generators are located nearby.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79A.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person to operate a motor driven boat or
vessel, other than a personal watercraft, or have the engine of a
vessel run idle, when an individual is engaged in stern deck
recreation.
(2) A violation of this subsection is an infraction punishable by
a fine of up to one hundred dollars.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.60.630 and 2005 c 392 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall establish and implement by rule a program
to provide required boating safety education. The boating safety
education program shall include training on preventing the spread of
aquatic invasive species. The program shall be phased in so that all
boaters not exempted under RCW 79A.60.640(3) are required to obtain a
boater education card by January 1, 2016. To obtain a boater education
card, a boater shall provide a certificate of accomplishment issued by
a boating educator for taking and passing an accredited boating safety
education course, or pass an equivalency exam, or provide proof of
completion of a course that meets the standard adopted by the
commission.
(2) As part of the boating safety education program, the commission
shall:
(a) Establish a program to be phased over eleven years starting
July 1, 2005, with full implementation by January 1, 2016. The period
July 1, 2005, through December 31, 2007, will be program development,
boater notification of the new requirements for mandatory education,
and processing cards to be issued to individuals having taken an
accredited course prior to January 1, 2008. The schedule for phase-in
of the mandatory education requirement by age group is as follows:
January 1, 2008 - All boat operators twenty years old and younger;
January 1, 2009 - All boat operators twenty-five years old and younger;
January 1, 2010 - All boat operators thirty years old and younger;
January 1, 2011 - All boat operators thirty-five years old and younger;
January 1, 2012 - All boat operators forty years old and younger;
January 1, 2013 - All boat operators fifty years old and younger;
January 1, 2014 - All boat operators sixty years old and younger;
January 1, 2015 - All boat operators seventy years old and younger;
January 1, 2016 - All boat operators;
(b) Establish a minimum standard of boating safety education
accomplishment. The standard must be consistent with the applicable
standard established by the national association of state boating law
administrators;
(c) Adopt minimum standards for boating safety education course of
instruction and examination that ensures compliance with the national
association of state boating law administrators minimum standards;
(d) Approve and provide accreditation to boating safety education
courses operated by volunteers, or commercial or nonprofit
organizations, including, but not limited to, courses given by the
United States coast guard auxiliary and the United States power
squadrons;
(e) Include information about the dangers of carbon monoxide
poisoning at the stern of a vessel and how to prevent such poisoning;
(f) Develop an equivalency examination that may be taken as an
alternative to the boating safety education course;
(((f))) (g) Establish a fee of ten dollars for the boater education
card to fund all commission activities related to the boating safety
education program created by chapter 392, Laws of 2005, including the
initial costs of developing the program. Any surplus funds resulting
from the fees received shall be distributed by the commission as grants
to local marine law enforcement programs approved by the commission as
provided in RCW 88.02.040;
(((g))) (h) Establish a fee for the replacement of the boater
education card that covers the cost of replacement;
(((h))) (i) Consider and evaluate public agency and commercial
opportunities to assist in program administration with the intent to
keep administrative costs to a minimum;
(((i))) (j) Approve and provide accreditation to boating safety
education courses offered online; and
(((j))) (k) Provide a report to the legislature by January 1, 2008,
on its progress of implementation of the mandatory education program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any new or used motor driven boat or vessel, as that term is
defined in RCW 79A.60.010, other than a personal watercraft, sold
within this state must display a carbon monoxide warning sticker
developed by the department on the interior of the vessel.
(2) For vessels sold by a dealer, the dealer shall ensure that the
warning sticker has been affixed prior to completing a transaction.
(3) For a vessel sold by an individual, the department shall
include the sticker in the registration materials provided to the new
owner, and the department shall notify the new owner that the sticker
must be affixed as described in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A warning sticker already developed by a vessel manufacturer
may satisfy the requirements of this section if it has been approved by
the department. The department shall approve a carbon monoxide warning
sticker that has been approved by the United States coast guard for
similar uses in other states.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall include an informational brochure about the
dangers of carbon monoxide poisoning and vessels and the warning
stickers required by section 4 of this act as part of the registration
materials mailed by the department for two consecutive years for
registrations that are due or become due after the effective date of
this section, and thereafter upon recommendation by the director of the
department. The materials shall instruct the vessel owner to affix the
stickers as required by section 4 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 79A.60.010 and 2005 c 392 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Accredited course" means a mandatory course of instruction on
boating safety education that has been approved by the commission.
(2) "Boat wastes" includes, but is not limited to, sewage, garbage,
marine debris, plastics, contaminated bilge water, cleaning solvents,
paint scrapings, or discarded petroleum products associated with the
use of vessels.
(3) "Boater" means any person on a vessel on waters of the state of
Washington.
(4) "Boater education card" means a card issued to a person who has
successfully completed a boating safety education test and has paid the
registration fee for a serial number record to be maintained in the
commission's data base.
(5) "Boating educator" means a person providing an accredited
course.
(6) "Carrying passengers for hire" means carrying passengers in a
vessel on waters of the state for valuable consideration, whether given
directly or indirectly or received by the owner, agent, operator, or
other person having an interest in the vessel. This shall not include
trips where expenses for food, transportation, or incidentals are
shared by participants on an even basis. Anyone receiving compensation
for skills or money for amortization of equipment and carrying
passengers shall be considered to be carrying passengers for hire on
waters of the state.
(7) "Certificate of accomplishment" means a form of certificate
approved by the commission and issued by a boating educator to a person
who has successfully completed an accredited course.
(8) "Commission" means the state parks and recreation commission.
(9) "Darkness" means that period between sunset and sunrise.
(10) "Environmentally sensitive area" means a restricted body of
water where discharge of untreated sewage from boats is especially
detrimental because of limited flushing, shallow water, commercial or
recreational shellfish, swimming areas, diversity of species, the
absence of other pollution sources, or other characteristics.
(11) "Guide" means any individual, including but not limited to
subcontractors and independent contractors, engaged for compensation or
other consideration by a whitewater river outfitter for the purpose of
operating vessels. A person licensed under RCW 77.65.480 or 77.65.440
and acting as a fishing guide is not considered a guide for the
purposes of this chapter.
(12) "Marina" means a facility providing boat moorage space, fuel,
or commercial services. Commercial services include but are not
limited to overnight or live-aboard boating accommodations.
(13) "Motor driven boats and vessels" means all boats and vessels
which are self propelled.
(14) "Motor vessel safety operating and equipment checklist" means
a printed list of the safety requirements for a vessel with a motor
installed or attached to the vessel being rented, chartered, or leased
and meeting minimum requirements adopted by the commission in
accordance with RCW 79A.60.630.
(15) "Muffler" or "muffler system" means a sound suppression device
or system, including an underwater exhaust system, designed and
installed to abate the sound of exhaust gases emitted from an internal
combustion engine and that prevents excessive or unusual noise.
(16) "Operate" means to steer, direct, or otherwise have physical
control of a vessel that is underway.
(17) "Operator" means an individual who steers, directs, or
otherwise has physical control of a vessel that is underway or
exercises actual authority to control the person at the helm.
(18) "Observer" means the individual riding in a vessel who is
responsible for observing a water skier at all times.
(19) "Owner" means a person who has a lawful right to possession of
a vessel by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or legal
action whether or not the vessel is subject to a security interest.
(20) "Person" means any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, nonprofit corporation or organization,
limited liability company, firm, association, or other legal entity
located within or outside this state.
(21) "Personal flotation device" means a buoyancy device, life
preserver, buoyant vest, ring buoy, or buoy cushion that is designed to
float a person in the water and that is approved by the commission.
(22) "Personal watercraft" means a vessel of less than sixteen feet
that uses a motor powering a water jet pump, as its primary source of
motive power and that is designed to be operated by a person sitting,
standing, or kneeling on, or being towed behind the vessel, rather than
in the conventional manner of sitting or standing inside the vessel.
(23) "Polluted area" means a body of water used by boaters that is
contaminated by boat wastes at unacceptable levels, based on applicable
water quality and shellfish standards.
(24) "Public entities" means all elected or appointed bodies,
including tribal governments, responsible for collecting and spending
public funds.
(25) "Reckless" or "recklessly" means acting carelessly and
heedlessly in a willful and wanton disregard of the rights, safety, or
property of another.
(26) "Rental motor vessel" means a motor vessel that is legally
owned by a person that is registered as a rental and leasing agency for
recreational motor vessels, and for which there is a written and signed
rental, charter, or lease agreement between the owner, or owner's
agent, of the vessel and the operator of the vessel.
(27) "Sewage pumpout or dump unit" means:
(a) A receiving chamber or tank designed to receive vessel sewage
from a "porta-potty" or a portable container; and
(b) A stationary or portable mechanical device on land, a dock,
pier, float, barge, vessel, or other location convenient to boaters,
designed to remove sewage waste from holding tanks on vessels.
(28) "Stern deck recreation" means any aquatic recreation that
involves holding onto or otherwise being in direct contact with the
stern of a motor driven boat or vessel, other than a personal
watercraft, while the vessel is being operated at any speed or when the
vessel's engine is at idle. The term includes holding onto the swim
deck, swim platform, swim ladder, or any other portion of the exterior
or transom of the vessel and floating or swimming on one's stomach or
back in the wake directly behind a vessel. The term does not include
being dragged or pulled behind a vessel on the end of a length of rope,
and does not include activities required for docking, departing,
exiting, or entering the vessel, or for activities occurring when the
vessel is engaged in law enforcement or emergency rescue activities.
(29) "Underway" means that a vessel is not at anchor, or made fast
to the shore, or aground.
(((29))) (30) "Vessel" includes every description of watercraft on
the water, other than a seaplane, used or capable of being used as a
means of transportation on the water. However, it does not include
inner tubes, air mattresses, sailboards, and small rafts or flotation
devices or toys customarily used by swimmers.
(((30))) (31) "Water skiing" means the physical act of being towed
behind a vessel on, but not limited to, any skis, aquaplane, kneeboard,
tube, or any other similar device.
(((31))) (32) "Waters of the state" means any waters within the
territorial limits of Washington state.
(((32))) (33) "Whitewater river outfitter" means any person who is
advertising to carry or carries passengers for hire on any whitewater
river of the state, but does not include any person whose only service
on a given trip is providing instruction in canoeing or kayaking
skills.
(((33))) (34) "Whitewater rivers of the state" means those rivers
and streams, or parts thereof, within the boundaries of the state as
listed in RCW 79A.60.470 or as designated by the commission under RCW
79A.60.495.

Sec. 7 RCW 79A.60.610 and 1994 c 151 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall undertake a statewide recreational boating
fire prevention education program concerning the safe use of marine
fuels and electrical systems ((and the hazards of carbon monoxide)).
The boating fire prevention education program shall provide for the
distribution of fire safety materials and decals warning of fire
hazards and for educational opportunities to educate boaters on the
safety practices needed to operate heaters, stoves, and other
appliances in Washington's unique aquatic environment. The commission
shall evaluate the boating public's voluntary participation in the
program and the program's impact on safe boating.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act may be known and cited as the Jenda
Jones and Denise Colbert safe boating act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 4 and 5 of this act take effect
January 1, 2007.

--- END ---