BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.52.375 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 43 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The board of each joint operating agency shall by resolution
appoint a treasurer. The treasurer shall be the chief financial
officer of the operating agency, who shall report at least annually to
the board a detailed statement of the financial condition of the
operating agency and of its financial operations for the preceding
fiscal year. The treasurer shall advise the board on all matters
affecting the financial condition of the operating agency. Before
entering upon his or her duties the treasurer shall give bond to the
operating agency, with a surety company authorized to write such bonds
in this state as surety, in an amount which the board finds by
resolution will protect the operating agency against loss, conditioned
that all funds which he or she receives as such treasurer will be
faithfully kept and accounted for and for the faithful discharge of his
or her duties. The amount of such bond may be decreased or increased
from time to time as the board may by resolution direct.
(2) The board shall also appoint an auditor and may require him or
her to give a bond with a surety company authorized to do business in
the state of Washington in such amount as it shall by resolution
prescribe, conditioned for the faithful discharge of his or her duties.
The auditor shall report directly to the board and be responsible to it
for discharging his or her duties.
(3) The premiums on the bonds of the auditor and the treasurer
shall be paid by the operating agency. The board may provide for
coverage of said officers and other persons on the same bond.
(4) All funds of the joint operating agency shall be paid to the
treasurer and shall be disbursed by ((him)) the treasurer only on
checks or warrants issued by the auditor upon orders or vouchers
approved by the board: PROVIDED, That the board by resolution may
authorize the managing director or any other bonded officer or employee
as legally permissible to approve or disapprove vouchers presented to
defray salaries of employees and other expenses of the operating agency
arising in the usual and ordinary course of its business, including
expenses incurred by the board of directors, its executive committee,
or the executive board in the performance of their duties. All moneys
of the operating agency shall be deposited forthwith by the treasurer
in such depositaries, and with such securities as are designated by
rules of the board. The treasurer shall establish a general fund and
such special funds as shall be created by the board, into which he or
she shall place all money of the joint operating agency as the board by
resolution or motion may direct.
(5) The board may adopt a policy for the payment of claims or other
obligations of the operating agency, which are payable out of solvent
funds, and may elect to pay such obligations by check or warrant.
However, if the applicable fund is not solvent at the time payment is
ordered, then no check may be issued and payment shall be by warrant.
When checks are to be used, the board shall designate the qualified
public depositary upon which the checks are to be drawn as well as the
officers required or authorized to sign the checks. For the purposes
of this chapter, "warrant" includes checks where authorized by this
subsection.

--- END ---