BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.44.010 and 1999 c 292 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The words and phrases defined in this section shall have the
following meanings when used in this chapter unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise.
(1) "Authorized contractor" means a person who decontaminates,
demolishes, or disposes of contaminated property as required by this
chapter who is certified by the department as provided for in RCW
64.44.060.
(2) "Contaminated" or "contamination" means polluted by hazardous
chemicals so that the property is unfit for human habitation or use due
to immediate or long-term hazards. Property that at one time was
contaminated but has been satisfactorily decontaminated according to
procedures established by the state board of health is not
"contaminated."
(3) "Department" means the department of health.
(4) "Hazardous chemicals" means the following substances ((used
in)) associated with the manufacture of illegal drugs: (a) Hazardous
substances as defined in RCW 70.105D.020((, and)); (b) precursor
substances as defined in RCW 69.43.010 which the state board of health,
in consultation with the state board of pharmacy, has determined
present an immediate or long-term health hazard to humans; and (c) the
controlled substance or substances being manufactured, as defined in
RCW 69.50.101.
(((4))) (5) "Officer" means a local health officer authorized under
chapters 70.05, 70.08, and 70.46 RCW.
(((5))) (6) "Property" means any real or personal property, ((site,
structure, or part of a structure which)) or segregable part thereof,
that is involved in or affected by the unauthorized manufacture or
storage of hazardous chemicals. This includes but is not limited to
single-family residences, units of multiplexes, condominiums, apartment
buildings, boats, motor vehicles, trailers, manufactured housing,
((or)) any shop, booth, ((or)) garden, or storage shed, and all
contents of the items referenced in this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.44.020 and 1999 c 292 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever a law enforcement agency becomes aware that property has
been contaminated by hazardous chemicals, that agency shall report the
contamination to the local health officer. The local health officer
shall ((post)) cause a posting of a written warning on the premises
within one working day of notification of the contamination and shall
inspect the property within fourteen days after receiving the notice of
contamination. The warning shall inform the potential occupants that
hazardous chemicals may exist on, or have been removed from, the
premises and that entry is unsafe. If a property owner believes that
a tenant has contaminated property that was being leased or rented, and
the property is vacated or abandoned, then the property owner shall
contact the local health officer about the possible contamination.
Local health officers or boards may charge property owners reasonable
fees for inspections of suspected contaminated property requested by
property owners.
A local health officer may enter, inspect, and survey at reasonable
times any properties for which there are reasonable grounds to believe
that the property has become contaminated. If the property is
contaminated, the local health officer shall post a written notice
declaring that the officer intends to issue an order prohibiting use of
the property as long as the property is contaminated.
If access to the property is denied, a local health officer in
consultation with law enforcement may seek a warrant for the purpose of
conducting administrative inspections and seizure of property as
defined in RCW 69.50.505. A superior, district, or municipal court
within the jurisdiction of the property may, based upon probable cause
that the property is contaminated, issue warrants for the purpose of
conducting administrative inspections and seizure of property as
defined in RCW 69.50.505.
Local health officers must report all cases of contaminated
property to the state department of health. The department may make
the list of contaminated properties available to health associations,
landlord and realtor organizations, prosecutors, and other interested
groups. The department shall promptly update the list of contaminated
properties to remove those which have been decontaminated according to
provisions of this chapter.
The local health officer may determine when the services of an
authorized contractor are necessary.

Sec. 3 RCW 64.44.070 and 1999 c 292 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state board of health shall promulgate rules and standards
for carrying out the provisions in this chapter in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act. The local board
of health and the local health officer are authorized to exercise such
powers as may be necessary to carry out this chapter. The department
shall provide technical assistance to local health boards and health
officers to carry out their duties under this chapter.
(2) The department shall adopt rules for decontamination of a
property used as an illegal drug laboratory and methods for the testing
of ground water, surface water, soil, and septic tanks for
contamination. The rules shall establish decontamination standards for
hazardous chemicals, including but not limited to methamphetamine,
lead, mercury, and total volatile organic compounds. The department
shall also adopt rules pertaining to independent third party sampling
to verify satisfactory decontamination of property deemed contaminated
and unfit for use. For the purposes of this section, an independent
third party sampler is a person who is not an employee, agent,
representative, partner, joint venturer, shareholder, or parent or
subsidiary company of the clandestine drug laboratory decontamination
contractor, the contractor's company, or property owner.

--- END ---