BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.655.200 and 2005 c 217 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The legislature finds that the mandatory norm-referenced
student assessments eliminated under chapter 217, Laws of 2005 provide
information that teachers and parents use to improve student
learning.)) In the absence of mandatory, statewide, norm-referenced
assessments, the legislature intends to permit school districts to
offer norm-referenced assessments ((at the districts' own expense
and)), make diagnostic tools available ((that provide information that
is at least as valuable as the information eliminated under chapter
217, Laws of 2005)), and provide funding for diagnostic assessments for
early intervention before the high school Washington assessment of
student learning.
(2) In addition to the diagnostic assessments provided under
subsection (5) of this section, school districts may, at their own
expense, administer norm-referenced assessments to students.
(3) By September 1, 2005, subject to available funds, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall post on its web site for
voluntary use by school districts, a guide of diagnostic assessments.
The assessments in the guide, to the extent possible, shall include the
characteristics listed in subsection (4)(((a) through (e))) of this
section.
(4) ((By September 1, 2006, subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose)) Beginning September 1, 2007,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make
available to school districts diagnostic assessments that help improve
student learning. To the greatest extent possible, the assessments
shall be:
(a) Aligned to the state's grade level expectations;
(b) Individualized to each student's performance level;
(c) Administered efficiently to provide results either immediately
or within two weeks;
(d) Capable of measuring individual student growth over time and
allowing student progress to be compared to other students across the
country; ((and))
(e) Readily available to parents; and
(f) Cost-effective.
(5) Beginning with the 2006-07 school year, the superintendent of
public instruction shall reimburse school districts, from funds
appropriated for this purpose, for administration of diagnostic
assessments in grades nine and ten for the purpose of identifying
academic weaknesses and developing targeted instructional strategies to
assist students before the high school Washington assessment of student
learning.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction is
encouraged to offer at ((their)) statewide and regional staff
development activities training opportunities that would assist
practitioners in:
(a) The interpretation of diagnostic assessments; and
(b) Application of instructional strategies that will increase
student learning based on diagnostic assessment data.

--- END ---