BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of chapter 48.21 RCW, group and blanket disability
insurance, shall be terminated July 1, 2008, as provided in section 2
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2009:
(1) RCW 48.21.010 ("Group disability insurance" defined) and 1992
c 226 s 2, 1949 c 190 s 27, & 1947 c 79 s .21.01;
(2) RCW 48.21.015 ("Group stop loss insurance" defined for the
purpose of exemption -- Scope of application) and 2000 c 80 s 8 & 1992 c
226 s 3;
(3) RCW 48.21.020 ("Employees," "employer" defined) and 1947 c 79
s .21.02;
(4) RCW 48.21.030 (Health care groups) and 1947 c 79 s .21.03;
(5) RCW 48.21.040 ("Blanket disability insurance" defined) and 1959
c 225 s 7 & 1947 c 79 s .21.04;
(6) RCW 48.21.045 (Health plan benefits for small employers--Coverage -- Exemption from statutory requirements -- Premium rates--Requirements for providing coverage for small employers -- Definitions)
and 2004 c 244 s 1, 1995 c 265 s 14, & 1990 c 187 s 2;
(7) RCW 48.21.047 (Requirements for plans offered to small
employers -- Definitions) and 2005 c 223 s 11 & 1995 c 265 s 22;
(8) RCW 48.21.050 (Standard provisions required) and 1947 c 79 s
.21.05;
(9) RCW 48.21.060 (The contract -- Representations) and 1947 c 79 s
.21.06;
(10) RCW 48.21.070 (Payment of premiums) and 1947 c 79 s .21.07;
(11) RCW 48.21.075 (Payment of premiums by employee in event of
suspension of compensation due to labor dispute) and 1975 1st ex.s. c
117 s 1;
(12) RCW 48.21.080 (Certificates of coverage) and 1961 c 194 s 6 &
1947 c 79 s .21.08;
(13) RCW 48.21.090 (Age limitations) and 1947 c 79 s .21.09;
(14) RCW 48.21.100 (Examination and autopsy) and 1947 c 79 s
.21.10;
(15) RCW 48.21.110 (Payment of benefits) and 1955 c 303 s 17 & 1947
c 79 s .21.11;
(16) RCW 48.21.120 (Readjustment of premiums -- Dividends) and 1947
c 79 s .21.12;
(17) RCW 48.21.125 (When injury caused by intoxication or use of
narcotics) and 2004 c 112 s 3;
(18) RCW 48.21.130 (Chiropody) and 1963 c 87 s 2;
(19) RCW 48.21.140 (Optometry) and 1965 c 149 s 3;
(20) RCW 48.21.141 (Registered nurses or advanced registered
nurses) and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 730 & 1973 1st ex.s. c 188 s 4;
(21) RCW 48.21.142 (Chiropractic) and 1971 ex.s. c 13 s 2;
(22) RCW 48.21.143 (Diabetes coverage -- Definitions) and 2004 c 244
s 10 & 1997 c 276 s 3;
(23) RCW 48.21.144 (Psychological services) and 1971 ex.s. c 197 s
2;
(24) RCW 48.21.146 (Dentistry) and 1974 ex.s. c 42 s 2;
(25) RCW 48.21.148 (Denturist services) and 1995 c 1 s 22;
(26) RCW 48.21.150 (Dependent child coverage -- Continuation for
incapacity) and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 32 & 1969 ex.s. c 128 s 4;
(27) RCW 48.21.155 (Dependent child coverage -- From moment of
birth -- Congenital anomalies -- Notification of birth) and 1983 1st ex.s.
c 32 s 20 & 1974 ex.s. c 139 s 2;
(28) RCW 48.21.160 (Chemical dependency benefits -- Legislative
declaration) and 1987 c 458 s 13 & 1974 ex.s. c 119 s 1;
(29) RCW 48.21.180 (Chemical dependency benefits -- Contracts issued
or renewed after January 1, 1988) and 2003 c 248 s 9, 1990 1st ex.s. c
3 s 7, 1987 c 458 s 14, & 1974 ex.s. c 119 s 3;
(30) RCW 48.21.190 (Chemical dependency benefits -- RCW 48.21.160
through 48.21.190, 48.44.240 inapplicable, when) and 1975 1st ex.s. c
266 s 10 & 1974 ex.s. c 119 s 5;
(31) RCW 48.21.195 ("Chemical dependency" defined) and 1987 c 458
s 15;
(32) RCW 48.21.197 (Chemical dependency benefits -- Rules) and 1987
c 458 s 21;
(33) RCW 48.21.200 (Group disability, health care service contract,
health maintenance agreement -- Reduction or refusal of benefits on basis
of other existing coverages) and 1993 c 492 s 282;
(34) RCW 48.21.220 (Home health care, hospice care, optional
coverage required -- Standards, limitations, restrictions -- Rules--Medicare supplemental contracts excluded) and 1988 c 245 s 31, 1984 c
22 s 1, & 1983 c 249 s 1;
(35) RCW 48.21.225 (Mammograms -- Insurance coverage) and 1994 sp.s.
c 9 s 731 & 1989 c 338 s 2;
(36) RCW 48.21.230 (Reconstructive breast surgery) and 1985 c 54 s
6 & 1983 c 113 s 2;
(37) RCW 48.21.235 (Mastectomy, lumpectomy) and 1985 c 54 s 2;
(38) RCW 48.21.240 (Mental health treatment, optional supplemental
coverage -- Waiver) and 2005 c 6 s 7, 1987 c 283 s 3, 1986 c 184 s 2, &
1983 c 35 s 1;
(39) RCW 48.21.241 (Mental health services -- Definition -- Coverage
required, when) and 2005 c 6 s 3;
(40) RCW 48.21.242 (Mental health treatment -- Waiver of
preauthorization for persons involuntarily committed) and 1993 c 272 s
3;
(41) RCW 48.21.244 (Benefits for prenatal diagnosis of congenital
disorders -- Contracts entered into or renewed on or after January 1,
1990) and 1988 c 276 s 6;
(42) RCW 48.21.250 (Continuation option to be offered) and 1984 c
190 s 2;
(43) RCW 48.21.260 (Conversion policy to be offered -- Exceptions,
conditions) and 1984 c 190 s 3;
(44) RCW 48.21.270 (Conversion policy -- Restrictions and
requirements) and 1984 c 190 s 4;
(45) RCW 48.21.280 (Coverage for adopted children) and 1986 c 140
s 3;
(46) RCW 48.21.290 (Cancellation of rider) and 1987 c 37 s 2;
(47) RCW 48.21.300 (Phenylketonuria) and 1988 c 173 s 2;
(48) RCW 48.21.310 (Neurodevelopmental therapies -- Employer-sponsored group contracts) and 1989 c 345 s 2;
(49) RCW 48.21.320 (Temporomandibular joint disorders -- Insurance
coverage) and 1989 c 331 s 2;
(50) RCW 48.21.325 (Prescriptions -- Preapproval of individual
claims -- Subsequent rejection prohibited -- Written record required) and
1993 c 253 s 3; and
(51) RCW 48.21.330 (Nonresident pharmacies) and 2005 c 274 s 311 &
1991 c 87 s 8.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of chapter 48.43 RCW, insurance reform, shall be
terminated July 1, 2008, as provided in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2009:
(1) RCW 48.43.001 (Intent) and 1996 c 312 s 1;
(2) RCW 48.43.005 (Definitions) and 2004 c 244 s 2;
(3) RCW 48.43.012 (Individual health benefit plans -- Preexisting
conditions) and 2001 c 196 s 6 & 2000 c 79 s 19;
(4) RCW 48.43.015 (Health benefit plans -- Preexisting conditions)
and 2004 c 192 s 5, 2001 c 196 s 7, 2000 c 80 s 3, 2000 c 79 s 20, &
1995 c 265 s 5;
(5) RCW 48.43.018 (Requirement to complete the standard health
questionnaire -- Exemptions -- Results) and 2004 c 244 s 3, 2001 c 196 s 8,
2000 c 80 s 4, & 2000 c 79 s 21;
(6) RCW 48.43.021 (Personally identifiable health information--Restrictions on release) and 2000 c 79 s 22;
(7) RCW 48.43.022 (Enrollee identification card -- Social security
number restriction) and 2004 c 115 s 1;
(8) RCW 48.43.023 (Pharmacy identification cards--Rules) and 2001
c 106 s 2;
(9) RCW 48.43.025 (Group health benefit plans -- Preexisting
conditions) and 2001 c 196 s 9, 2000 c 79 s 23, & 1995 c 265 s 6;
(10) RCW 48.43.028 (Eligibility to purchase certain health benefit
plans--Small employers and small groups) and 2001 c 196 s 10;
(11) RCW 48.43.035 (Group health benefit plans -- Guaranteed issue
and continuity of coverage -- Exceptions -- Group of one) and 2004 c 244 s
4, 2000 c 79 s 24, & 1995 c 265 s 7;
(12) RCW 48.43.038 (Individual health plans -- Guarantee of
continuity of coverage--Exceptions) and 2000 c 79 s 25;
(13) RCW 48.43.041 (Individual health benefit plans -- Mandatory
benefits) and 2000 c 79 s 26;
(14) RCW 48.43.045 (Health plan requirements -- Annual reports--Exemptions) and 1997 c 231 s 205 & 1995 c 265 s 8;
(15) RCW 48.43.055 (Procedures for review and adjudication of
health care provider complaints -- Requirements) and 2005 c 172 s 19,
2002 c 300 s 6, & 1995 c 265 s 20;
(16) RCW 48.43.065 (Right of individuals to receive services -- Right
of providers, carriers, and facilities to refuse to participate in or
pay for services for reason of conscience or religion -- Requirements)
and 1995 c 265 s 25;
(17) RCW 48.43.085 (Health carrier may not prohibit its enrollees
from contracting for services outside the health care plan) and 1996 c
312 s 3;
(18) RCW 48.43.087 (Contracting for services at enrollee's
expense -- Mental health care practitioner -- Conditions -- Exception) and
2001 c 251 s 33 & 1996 c 304 s 1;
(19) RCW 48.43.091 (Health carrier coverage of outpatient mental
health services -- Requirements) and 1999 c 87 s 1;
(20) RCW 48.43.093 (Health carrier coverage of emergency medical
services -- Requirements -- Conditions) and 1997 c 231 s 301;
(21) RCW 48.43.097 (Filing of financial statements -- Every health
carrier) and 1999 c 33 s 3;
(22) RCW 48.43.105 (Preparation of documents that compare health
carriers -- Immunity -- Due diligence) and 1996 c 312 s 5;
(23) RCW 48.43.115 (Maternity services -- Intent -- Definitions--Patient preference -- Clinical sovereignty of provider -- Notice to
policyholders -- Application) and 2003 c 248 s 14 & 1996 c 281 s 1;
(24) RCW 48.43.125 (Coverage at a long-term care facility following
hospitalization -- Definition) and 1999 c 312 s 2;
(25) RCW 48.43.180 (Denturist services) and 1995 c 1 s 23;
(26) RCW 48.43.185 (General anesthesia services for dental
procedures) and 2001 c 321 s 2;
(27) RCW 48.43.200 (Disclosure of certain material transactions--Report -- Information is confidential) and 1995 c 86 s 7;
(28) RCW 48.43.205 (Material acquisitions or dispositions) and 1995
c 86 s 8;
(29) RCW 48.43.210 (Asset acquisitions -- Asset dispositions) and
1995 c 86 s 9;
(30) RCW 48.43.215 (Report of a material acquisition or disposition
of assets -- Information required) and 1995 c 86 s 10;
(31) RCW 48.43.220 (Material nonrenewals, cancellations, or
revisions of ceded reinsurance agreements) and 1995 c 86 s 11;
(32) RCW 48.43.225 (Report of a material nonrenewal, cancellation,
or revision of ceded reinsurance agreements -- Information required) and
1995 c 86 s 12;
(33) RCW 48.43.300 (Definitions) and 1998 c 241 s 1;
(34) RCW 48.43.305 (Report of RBC levels -- Distribution of report--Formula for determination -- Commissioner may make adjustments) and 1998
c 241 s 2;
(35) RCW 48.43.310 (Company action level event -- Required RBC plan--
Commissioner's review -- Notification -- Challenge by carrier) and 1998 c
241 s 3;
(36) RCW 48.43.315 (Regulatory action level event -- Required RBC
plan -- Commissioner's review -- Notification -- Challenge by carrier) and
1998 c 241 s 4;
(37) RCW 48.43.320 (Authorized control level event -- Commissioner's
options) and 1998 c 241 s 5;
(38) RCW 48.43.325 (Mandatory control level event -- Commissioner's
duty -- Regulatory control) and 1998 c 241 s 6;
(39) RCW 48.43.330 (Carrier's right to hearing -- Request by
carrier -- Date set by commissioner) and 1998 c 241 s 7;
(40) RCW 48.43.335 (Confidentiality of RBC reports and plans -- Use
of certain comparisons prohibited -- Certain information intended solely
for use by commissioner) and 1998 c 241 s 8;
(41) RCW 48.43.340 (Powers or duties of commissioner not limited--Rules) and 1998 c 241 s 9;
(42) RCW 48.43.345 (Foreign or alien carriers -- Required RBC
report -- Commissioner may require RBC plan -- Mandatory control level
event) and 1998 c 241 s 10;
(43) RCW 48.43.350 (No liability or cause of action against
commissioner or department) and 1998 c 241 s 11;
(44) RCW 48.43.355 (Notice by commissioner to carrier -- When
effective) and 1998 c 241 s 12;
(45) RCW 48.43.360 (Initial RBC reports -- Calculation of initial RBC
levels -- Subsequent reports) and 1998 c 241 s 13;
(46) RCW 48.43.365 (RBC report for 1998 calendar year) and 1998 c
241 s 14;
(47) RCW 48.43.366 (Self-funded multiple employer welfare
arrangements) and 2004 c 260 s 19;
(48) RCW 48.43.370 (RBC standards not applicable to certain
carriers) and 1998 c 241 s 15;
(49) RCW 48.43.500 (Intent -- Purpose -- 2000 c 5) and 2000 c 5 s 1;
(50) RCW 48.43.505 (Requirement to protect enrollee's right to
privacy or confidential services -- Rules) and 2000 c 5 s 5;
(51) RCW 48.43.510 (Carrier required to disclose health plan
information -- Marketing and advertising restrictions -- Rules) and 2000 c
5 s 6;
(52) RCW 48.43.515 (Access to appropriate health services -- Enrollee
options -- Rules) and 2000 c 5 s 7;
(53) RCW 48.43.520 (Requirement to maintain a documented
utilization review program description and written utilization review
criteria -- Rules) and 2000 c 5 s 8;
(54) RCW 48.43.525 (Prohibition against retrospective denial of
health plan coverage -- Rules) and 2000 c 5 s 9;
(55) RCW 48.43.530 (Requirement for carriers to have a
comprehensive grievance process -- Carrier's duties -- Procedures--Appeals -- Rules) and 2000 c 5 s 10;
(56) RCW 48.43.535 (Independent review of health care disputes--System for using certified independent review organizations -- Rules) and
2000 c 5 s 11;
(57) RCW 48.43.540 (Requirement to designate a licensed medical
director -- Exemption) and 2002 c 103 s 1 & 2000 c 5 s 13;
(58) RCW 48.43.545 (Standard of care -- Liability -- Causes of action--Defense -- Exception) and 2000 c 5 s 17;
(59) RCW 48.43.550 (Delegation of duties -- Carrier accountability)
and 2000 c 5 s 18;
(60) RCW 48.43.600 (Overpayment recovery -- Carrier) and 2005 c 278
s 1;
(61) RCW 48.43.605 (Overpayment recovery -- Health care provider) and
2005 c 278 s 2;
(62) RCW 48.43.901 (Captions not law -- 1996 c 312) and 1996 c 312 s
6;
(63) RCW 48.43.902 (Effective date -- 1996 c 312) and 1996 c 312 s 8;
and
(64) RCW 48.43.903 (Severability -- 1998 c 241) and 1998 c 241 s 17.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of chapter 48.44 RCW, health care services, shall be
terminated July 1, 2008, as provided in section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2009:
(1) RCW 48.44.010 (Definitions) and 1990 c 120 s 1 & 1986 c 223 s
1;
(2) RCW 48.44.011 (Agent -- Definition -- License required--Application, issuance, renewal, fees -- Penalties involving license) and
1983 c 202 s 1 & 1969 c 115 s 7;
(3) RCW 48.44.013 (Filings with secretary of state -- Copy for
commissioner) and 1998 c 23 s 16;
(4) RCW 48.44.015 (Registration by health care service contractors
required -- Penalty) and 2003 c 250 s 7, 1983 c 202 s 2, & 1969 c 115 s
6;
(5) RCW 48.44.016 (Unregistered activities -- Acts committed in this
state -- Sanctions) and 2003 c 250 s 8;
(6) RCW 48.44.017 (Schedule of rates for individual contracts -- Loss
ratio -- Remittance of premiums -- Definitions) and 2001 c 196 s 11 & 2000
c 79 s 29;
(7) RCW 48.44.020 (Contracts for services -- Examination of contract
forms by commissioner -- Grounds for disapproval -- Liability of
participant) and 2000 c 79 s 28, 1990 c 120 s 5, 1986 c 223 s 2, 1985
c 283 s 1, 1983 c 286 s 4, 1973 1st ex.s. c 65 s 1, 1969 c 115 s 1,
1961 c 197 s 2, & 1947 c 268 s 2;
(8) RCW 48.44.022 (Calculation of premiums -- Adjusted community
rate -- Definitions) and 2004 c 244 s 6, 2000 c 79 s 30, 1997 c 231 s
208, & 1995 c 265 s 15;
(9) RCW 48.44.023 (Health plan benefits for small employers--Coverage -- Exemption from statutory requirements -- Premium rates--Requirements for providing coverage for small employers) and 2004 c 244
s 7, 1995 c 265 s 16, & 1990 c 187 s 3;
(10) RCW 48.44.024 (Requirements for plans offered to small
employers -- Definitions) and 2003 c 248 s 15 & 1995 c 265 s 23;
(11) RCW 48.44.026 (Payment for certain health care services) and
1999 c 130 s 1, 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 732, 1990 c 120 s 6, 1989 c 122 s 1,
1984 c 283 s 1, & 1982 c 168 s 1;
(12) RCW 48.44.030 (Underwriting of indemnity by insurance policy,
bond, securities, or cash deposit) and 1990 c 120 s 7, 1986 c 223 s 3,
1981 c 339 s 22, 1969 c 115 s 2, 1961 c 197 s 3, & 1947 c 268 s 3;
(13) RCW 48.44.033 (Financial failure -- Supervision of
commissioner -- Priority of distribution of assets) and 1990 c 120 s 2;
(14) RCW 48.44.035 (Limited health care service -- Uncovered
expenditures -- Minimum net worth requirements) and 1997 c 212 s 1 & 1990
c 120 s 3;
(15) RCW 48.44.037 (Minimum net worth -- Requirement to maintain--Determination of amount) and 1997 c 212 s 2 & 1990 c 120 s 4;
(16) RCW 48.44.039 (Minimum net worth -- Domestic or foreign health
care service contractor) and 1997 c 212 s 3;
(17) RCW 48.44.040 (Registration with commissioner -- Fee) and 1947
c 268 s 4;
(18) RCW 48.44.050 (Rules and regulations) and 1947 c 268 s 5;
(19) RCW 48.44.055 (Plan for handling insolvency -- Commissioner's
review) and 1990 c 120 s 11;
(20) RCW 48.44.057 (Insolvency -- Commissioner's duties--Participants' options -- Allocation of coverage) and 1990 c 120 s 8;
(21) RCW 48.44.060 (Penalty) and 2003 c 250 s 9 & 1947 c 268 s 6;
(22) RCW 48.44.070 (Contracts to be filed with commissioner) and
1990 c 120 s 9, 1965 c 87 s 2, & 1961 c 197 s 4;
(23) RCW 48.44.080 (Master lists of contractor's participating
providers -- Filing with commissioner -- Notice of termination or
participation) and 1990 c 120 s 10, 1986 c 223 s 4, 1965 c 87 s 3, &
1961 c 197 s 5;
(24) RCW 48.44.090 (Refusal to register corporate, etc., contractor
if name confusing with existing contractor or insurance company) and
1961 c 197 s 6;
(25) RCW 48.44.095 (Annual financial statement -- Filings -- Contents--Fee -- Penalty for failure to file) and 1997 c 212 s 4, 1993 c 492 s 295,
1983 c 202 s 3, & 1969 c 115 s 5;
(26) RCW 48.44.100 (Filing inaccurate financial statement
prohibited) and 1961 c 197 s 7;
(27) RCW 48.44.110 (False representation, advertising) and 1961 c
197 s 8;
(28) RCW 48.44.120 (Misrepresentations of contract terms, benefits,
etc.) and 1961 c 197 s 9;
(29) RCW 48.44.130 (Future dividends or refunds -- When permissible)
and 1961 c 197 s 10;
(30) RCW 48.44.140 (Misleading comparisons to terminate or retain
contract) and 1961 c 197 s 11;
(31) RCW 48.44.145 (Examination of contractors -- Duties of
contractor, powers of commissioner -- Independent audit reports) and 1986
c 296 s 8, 1983 c 63 s 1, & 1969 c 115 s 12;
(32) RCW 48.44.150 (Certificate of registration not an
endorsement -- Display in solicitation prohibited) and 1961 c 197 s 12;
(33) RCW 48.44.160 (Revocation, suspension, refusal of
registration -- Hearing -- Cease and desist orders, injunctive action--Grounds) and 1988 c 248 s 19, 1973 1st ex.s. c 65 s 2, 1969 c 115 s 3,
& 1961 c 197 s 13;
(34) RCW 48.44.164 (Notice of suspension, revocation, or refusal to
be given contractor -- Authority of agents) and 1969 c 115 s 10;
(35) RCW 48.44.166 (Fine in addition to or in lieu of suspension,
revocation, or refusal) and 1983 c 202 s 4 & 1969 c 115 s 11;
(36) RCW 48.44.170 (Hearings and appeals) and 1961 c 197 s 14;
(37) RCW 48.44.180 (Enforcement) and 1961 c 197 s 15;
(38) RCW 48.44.200 (Individual health care service plan contracts--Coverage of dependent child not to terminate because of developmental
disability or physical handicap) and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 33 & 1969 ex.s.
c 128 s 1;
(39) RCW 48.44.210 (Group health care service plan contracts--Coverage of dependent child not to terminate because of developmental
disability or physical handicap) and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 34 & 1969 ex.s.
c 128 s 2;
(40) RCW 48.44.212 (Coverage of dependent children to include
newborn infants and congenital anomalies from moment of birth--Notification period) and 1984 c 4 s 1, 1983 c 202 s 5, & 1974 ex.s. c
139 s 3;
(41) RCW 48.44.220 (Discrimination prohibited) and 1983 c 154 s 4,
1979 c 127 s 1, & 1969 c 115 s 4;
(42) RCW 48.44.225 (Podiatrists not excluded) and 1983 c 154 s 5;
(43) RCW 48.44.230 (Individual health service plan contract -- Return
within ten days of delivery -- Refunds -- Void from beginning -- Notice
required) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 32 s 11 & 1973 1st ex.s. c 65 s 4;
(44) RCW 48.44.240 (Chemical dependency benefits -- Provisions of
group contracts delivered or renewed after January 1, 1988) and 2005 c
223 s 25, 1990 1st ex.s. c 3 s 12, 1987 c 458 s 16, 1975 1st ex.s. c
266 s 14, & 1974 ex.s. c 119 s 4;
(45) RCW 48.44.245 ("Chemical dependency" defined) and 1987 c 458
s 17;
(46) RCW 48.44.250 (Payment of premium by employee in event of
suspension of compensation due to labor dispute) and 1982 c 149 s 1 &
1975 1st ex.s. c 117 s 3;
(47) RCW 48.44.260 (Notice of reason for cancellation, denial, or
refusal to renew contract) and 1993 c 492 s 290 & 1979 c 133 s 3;
(48) RCW 48.44.270 (Immunity from libel or slander) and 1979 c 133
s 4;
(49) RCW 48.44.290 (Registered nurses or advanced registered
nurses) and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 733, 1986 c 223 s 6, & 1981 c 175 s 1;
(50) RCW 48.44.299 (Legislative finding) and 1983 c 154 s 1;
(51) RCW 48.44.300 (Podiatry -- Benefits not to be denied) and 1986
c 223 s 7 & 1983 c 154 s 2;
(52) RCW 48.44.305 (When injury caused by intoxication or use of
narcotics) and 2004 c 112 s 4;
(53) RCW 48.44.309 (Legislative finding) and 1983 c 286 s 1;
(54) RCW 48.44.310 (Chiropractic care, coverage required,
exceptions) and 1986 c 223 s 8 & 1983 c 286 s 2;
(55) RCW 48.44.315 (Diabetes coverage -- Definitions) and 2004 c 244
s 12 & 1997 c 276 s 4;
(56) RCW 48.44.320 (Home health care, hospice care, optional
coverage required -- Standards, limitations, restrictions -- Rules--Medicare supplemental contracts excluded) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 222,
1988 c 245 s 33, 1984 c 22 s 3, & 1983 c 249 s 3;
(57) RCW 48.44.325 (Mammograms -- Insurance coverage) and 1994 sp.s.
c 9 s 734 & 1989 c 338 s 3;
(58) RCW 48.44.330 (Reconstructive breast surgery) and 1985 c 54 s
7 & 1983 c 113 s 3;
(59) RCW 48.44.335 (Mastectomy, lumpectomy) and 1985 c 54 s 3;
(60) RCW 48.44.340 (Mental health treatment, optional supplemental
coverage -- Waiver) and 2005 c 6 s 8, 1987 c 283 s 4, 1986 c 184 s 3, &
1983 c 35 s 2;
(61) RCW 48.44.341 (Mental health services -- Definition -- Coverage
required, when) and 2005 c 6 s 4;
(62) RCW 48.44.342 (Mental health treatment -- Waiver of
preauthorization for persons involuntarily committed) and 1993 c 272 s
4;
(63) RCW 48.44.344 (Benefits for prenatal diagnosis of congenital
disorders -- Contracts entered into or renewed on or after January 1,
1990) and 1988 c 276 s 7;
(64) RCW 48.44.350 (Financial interests of health care service
contractors, restricted -- Exceptions, regulations) and 1986 c 223 s 9 &
1983 c 202 s 6;
(65) RCW 48.44.360 (Continuation option to be offered) and 1984 c
190 s 5;
(66) RCW 48.44.370 (Conversion contract to be offered -- Exceptions,
conditions) and 1984 c 190 s 6;
(67) RCW 48.44.380 (Conversion contract -- Restrictions and
requirements) and 1984 c 190 s 7;
(68) RCW 48.44.390 (Modification of basis of agreement, endorsement
required) and 1986 c 223 s 10;
(69) RCW 48.44.400 (Continuance provisions for former family
members) and 1986 c 223 s 11;
(70) RCW 48.44.420 (Coverage for adopted children) and 1986 c 140
s 4;
(71) RCW 48.44.430 (Cancellation of rider) and 1987 c 37 s 3;
(72) RCW 48.44.440 (Phenylketonuria) and 1988 c 173 s 3;
(73) RCW 48.44.450 (Neurodevelopmental therapies -- Employer-sponsored group contracts) and 1989 c 345 s 1;
(74) RCW 48.44.460 (Temporomandibular joint disorders -- Insurance
coverage) and 1989 c 331 s 3;
(75) RCW 48.44.465 (Prescriptions -- Preapproval of individual
claims -- Subsequent rejection prohibited -- Written record required) and
1993 c 253 s 4;
(76) RCW 48.44.470 (Nonresident pharmacies) and 2005 c 274 s 314 &
1991 c 87 s 9;
(77) RCW 48.44.500 (Denturist services) and 1995 c 1 s 24;
(78) RCW 48.44.530 (Disclosure of certain material transactions--Report -- Information is confidential) and 1995 c 86 s 13;
(79) RCW 48.44.535 (Material acquisitions or dispositions) and 1995
c 86 s 14;
(80) RCW 48.44.540 (Asset acquisitions -- Asset dispositions) and
1995 c 86 s 15;
(81) RCW 48.44.545 (Report of a material acquisition or disposition
of assets -- Information required) and 1995 c 86 s 16;
(82) RCW 48.44.550 (Material nonrenewals, cancellations, or
revisions of ceded reinsurance agreements) and 1995 c 86 s 17; and
(83) RCW 48.44.555 (Report of a material nonrenewal, cancellation,
or revision of ceded reinsurance agreements -- Information required) and
1995 c 86 s 18.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of chapter 48.46 RCW, health maintenance
organizations, shall be terminated July 1, 2008, as provided in section
8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2009:
(1) RCW 48.46.010 (Legislative declaration -- Purpose) and 1975 1st
ex.s. c 290 s 2;
(2) RCW 48.46.012 (Filings with secretary of state -- Copy for
commissioner) and 1998 c 23 s 17;
(3) RCW 48.46.020 (Definitions) and 1990 c 119 s 1, 1983 c 106 s 1,
1982 c 151 s 1, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 290 s 3;
(4) RCW 48.46.023 (Agent -- Definition -- License required--Application, issuance, renewal, fees -- Penalties involving license) and
1983 c 202 s 8;
(5) RCW 48.46.027 (Registration, required -- Issuance of securities--Penalty) and 2003 c 250 s 10 & 1983 c 202 s 9;
(6) RCW 48.46.030 (Eligibility requirements for certificate of
registration -- Application requirements, information) and 1990 c 119 s
2, 1985 c 320 s 1, 1983 c 106 s 2, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 290 s 4;
(7) RCW 48.46.033 (Unregistered activities -- Acts committed in this
state -- Sanctions) and 2003 c 250 s 11;
(8) RCW 48.46.040 (Certificate of registration -- Issuance -- Grounds
for refusal -- Name restrictions -- Inspection and review of facilities)
and 1990 c 119 s 3, 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 223, 1983 c 106 s 3, & 1975
1st ex.s. c 290 s 5;
(9) RCW 48.46.045 (Catastrophic health plans permitted) and 2000 c
79 s 27;
(10) RCW 48.46.060 (Prepayment agreements -- Standards for forms and
documents -- Grounds for disapproval -- Cancellation or failure to renew--Filing of agreement forms) and 2000 c 79 s 31 & 1989 c 10 s 10;
(11) RCW 48.46.062 (Schedule of rates for individual agreements--Loss ratio -- Remittance of premiums -- Definitions) and 2001 c 196 s 12 &
2000 c 79 s 32;
(12) RCW 48.46.064 (Calculation of premiums -- Adjusted community
rate -- Definitions) and 2004 c 244 s 8, 2000 c 79 s 33, 1997 c 231 s
209, & 1995 c 265 s 17;
(13) RCW 48.46.066 (Health plan benefits for small employers--Coverage -- Exemption from statutory requirements -- Premium rates--Requirements for providing coverage for small employers) and 2004 c 244
s 9, 1995 c 265 s 18, & 1990 c 187 s 4;
(14) RCW 48.46.068 (Requirements for plans offered to small
employers -- Definitions) and 2003 c 248 s 16 & 1995 c 265 s 24;
(15) RCW 48.46.070 (Governing body) and 1985 c 320 s 3, 1983 c 106
s 5, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 290 s 8;
(16) RCW 48.46.080 (Annual statement -- Filings -- Contents -- Fee--Penalty for failure to file -- Accuracy required) and 1997 c 212 s 5 &
1993 c 492 s 296;
(17) RCW 48.46.090 (Standard of services provided) and 1975 1st
ex.s. c 290 s 10;
(18) RCW 48.46.100 (Grievance procedure) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 290
s 11;
(19) RCW 48.46.110 (Name restrictions -- Discrimination -- Recovery of
costs of health care services participant not entitled to) and 1983 c
202 s 11 & 1975 1st ex.s. c 290 s 12;
(20) RCW 48.46.120 (Examination of health maintenance
organizations -- Duties of organizations, powers of commissioner--Independent audit reports -- Assessment of organizations for costs,
conditions) and 1987 c 83 s 1, 1986 c 296 s 9, 1985 c 7 s 115, 1983 c
63 s 2, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 290 s 13;
(21) RCW 48.46.130 (Investigation of violations -- Hearing--Findings -- Penalties -- Order requiring compliance, etc. -- Suspension or
revocation of certificate, effect -- Application to courts) and 1975 1st
ex.s. c 290 s 14;
(22) RCW 48.46.135 (Fine in addition to or in lieu of suspension,
revocation, or refusal) and 1983 c 202 s 15;
(23) RCW 48.46.140 (Fees) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 290 s 15;
(24) RCW 48.46.170 (Effect of chapter as to other laws--Construction) and 2003 c 248 s 17, 1996 c 178 s 13, 1983 c 106 s 7, &
1975 1st ex.s. c 290 s 18;
(25) RCW 48.46.180 (Duty of employer to inform and make available
to employees option of enrolling in health maintenance organization)
and 1975 1st ex.s. c 290 s 19;
(26) RCW 48.46.200 (Rules and regulations) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 290
s 21;
(27) RCW 48.46.210 (Compliance with federal funding requirements--Construction) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 290 s 22;
(28) RCW 48.46.220 (Review of administrative action) and 1975 1st
ex.s. c 290 s 23;
(29) RCW 48.46.225 (Financial failure -- Supervision of
commissioner -- Priority of distribution of assets) and 2003 c 248 s 18
& 1990 c 119 s 4;
(30) RCW 48.46.235 (Minimum net worth -- Requirement to maintain--Determination of amount) and 1997 c 212 s 6 & 1990 c 119 s 5;
(31) RCW 48.46.237 (Minimum net worth -- Domestic or foreign health
maintenance organization) and 1997 c 212 s 7;
(32) RCW 48.46.240 (Funded reserve requirements) and 1990 c 119 s
6, 1985 c 320 s 4, & 1982 c 151 s 3;
(33) RCW 48.46.243 (Contract -- Participant liability -- Commissioner's
review) and 1990 c 119 s 7;
(34) RCW 48.46.245 (Plan for handling insolvency -- Commissioner's
review) and 1990 c 119 s 8;
(35) RCW 48.46.247 (Insolvency -- Commissioner's duties--Participants' options -- Allocation of coverage) and 1990 c 119 s 9;
(36) RCW 48.46.250 (Coverage of dependent children -- Newborn
infants, congenital anomalies -- Notification period) and 1984 c 4 s 2 &
1983 c 202 s 12;
(37) RCW 48.46.260 (Individual health maintenance agreement -- Return
within ten days of delivery -- Refunds -- Void from beginning) and 1983 c
202 s 13;
(38) RCW 48.46.270 (Financial interests of health maintenance
organization authorities, restricted -- Exceptions, regulations) and 1985
c 320 s 5 & 1983 c 202 s 14;
(39) RCW 48.46.272 (Diabetes coverage -- Definitions) and 2004 c 244
s 14 & 1997 c 276 s 5;
(40) RCW 48.46.275 (Mammograms -- Insurance coverage) and 1994 sp.s.
c 9 s 735 & 1989 c 338 s 4;
(41) RCW 48.46.280 (Reconstructive breast surgery) and 1985 c 54 s
8 & 1983 c 113 s 4;
(42) RCW 48.46.285 (Mastectomy, lumpectomy) and 1985 c 54 s 4;
(43) RCW 48.46.290 (Mental health treatment, optional supplemental
coverage -- Waiver) and 2005 c 6 s 9, 1987 c 283 s 5, 1986 c 184 s 4, &
1983 c 35 s 3;
(44) RCW 48.46.291 (Mental health services -- Definition -- Coverage
required, when) and 2005 c 6 s 5;
(45) RCW 48.46.292 (Mental health treatment -- Waiver of
preauthorization for persons involuntarily committed) and 1993 c 272 s
5;
(46) RCW 48.46.300 (Future dividends or refunds, restricted--Issuance or sale of securities regulated) and 1983 c 106 s 8;
(47) RCW 48.46.310 (Registration not endorsement) and 1983 c 106 s
9;
(48) RCW 48.46.320 (Dependent children, termination of coverage,
conditions) and 1985 c 320 s 6 & 1983 c 106 s 10;
(49) RCW 48.46.340 (Return of agreement within ten days) and 1983
c 106 s 12;
(50) RCW 48.46.350 (Chemical dependency treatment) and 2003 c 248
s 19, 1990 1st ex.s. c 3 s 14, 1987 c 458 s 18, & 1983 c 106 s 13;
(51) RCW 48.46.355 ("Chemical dependency" defined) and 1987 c 458
s 19;
(52) RCW 48.46.360 (Payment of cost of agreement directly to holder
during labor dispute -- Changes restricted -- Notice to employee) and 1985
c 7 s 116 & 1983 c 106 s 14;
(53) RCW 48.46.370 (Coverage not denied for handicap) and 1983 c
106 s 15;
(54) RCW 48.46.375 (Benefits for prenatal diagnosis of congenital
disorders -- Agreements entered into or renewed on or after January 1,
1990) and 1988 c 276 s 8;
(55) RCW 48.46.380 (Notice of reason for cancellation, denial, or
refusal to renew agreement) and 1993 c 492 s 291 & 1983 c 106 s 16;
(56) RCW 48.46.390 (Providing information on cancellation or
refusal -- No liability for insurance commissioner or health maintenance
organization) and 1983 c 106 s 17;
(57) RCW 48.46.400 (False or misleading advertising prohibited) and
1983 c 106 s 18;
(58) RCW 48.46.410 (Misrepresentations to induce termination or
retention of agreement prohibited) and 1983 c 106 s 19;
(59) RCW 48.46.420 (Penalty for violations) and 2003 c 250 s 12,
1990 c 119 s 10, & 1983 c 106 s 20;
(60) RCW 48.46.430 (Enforcement authority of commissioner) and 1983
c 106 s 21;
(61) RCW 48.46.440 (Continuation option to be offered) and 1984 c
190 s 8;
(62) RCW 48.46.450 (Conversion agreement to be offered -- Exceptions,
conditions) and 1984 c 190 s 9;
(63) RCW 48.46.460 (Conversion agreement -- Restrictions and
requirements) and 1984 c 190 s 10;
(64) RCW 48.46.470 (Endorsement of modifications) and 1985 c 320 s
7;
(65) RCW 48.46.480 (Continuation of coverage of former family
members) and 1985 c 320 s 8;
(66) RCW 48.46.490 (Coverage for adopted children) and 1986 c 140
s 5;
(67) RCW 48.46.500 (Cancellation of rider) and 1987 c 37 s 4;
(68) RCW 48.46.510 (Phenylketonuria) and 1988 c 173 s 4;
(69) RCW 48.46.520 (Neurodevelopmental therapies -- Employer-sponsored group contracts) and 1989 c 345 s 3;
(70) RCW 48.46.530 (Temporomandibular joint disorders -- Insurance
coverage) and 1989 c 331 s 4;
(71) RCW 48.46.535 (Prescriptions -- Preapproval of individual
claims -- Subsequent rejection prohibited -- Written record required) and
1993 c 253 s 5;
(72) RCW 48.46.540 (Nonresident pharmacies) and 2005 c 274 s 315 &
1991 c 87 s 10;
(73) RCW 48.46.565 (Foot care services) and 1999 c 64 s 1;
(74) RCW 48.46.570 (Denturist services) and 1995 c 1 s 25;
(75) RCW 48.46.575 (Doctor of osteopathic medicine and surgery--
Discrimination based on board certification is prohibited) and 1995 c
64 s 1;
(76) RCW 48.46.580 (When injury caused by intoxication or use of
narcotics) and 2004 c 112 s 5;
(77) RCW 48.46.600 (Disclosure of certain material transactions--Report -- Information is confidential) and 1995 c 86 s 19;
(78) RCW 48.46.605 (Material acquisitions or dispositions) and 1995
c 86 s 20;
(79) RCW 48.46.610 (Asset acquisitions -- Asset dispositions) and
1995 c 86 s 21;
(80) RCW 48.46.615 (Report of a material acquisition or disposition
of assets -- Information required) and 1995 c 86 s 22;
(81) RCW 48.46.620 (Material nonrenewals, cancellations, or
revisions of ceded reinsurance agreements) and 1995 c 86 s 23;
(82) RCW 48.46.625 (Report of a material nonrenewal, cancellation,
or revision of ceded reinsurance agreements -- Information required) and
1995 c 86 s 24;
(83) RCW 48.46.900 (Liberal construction) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 290
s 24;
(84) RCW 48.46.910 (Severability -- 1975 1st ex.s. c 290) and 1975
1st ex.s. c 290 s 26; and
(85) RCW 48.46.920 (Short title) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 290 s 27.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---