BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.177 and 2004 c 207 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county or a city may use a variety of innovative zoning
techniques in areas designated as agricultural lands of long-term
commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170. The innovative zoning
techniques should be designed to conserve agricultural lands and
encourage the agricultural economy. A county or city should encourage
nonagricultural uses to be limited to lands with poor soils or
otherwise not suitable for agricultural purposes.
(2) Innovative zoning techniques a county or city may consider
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Agricultural zoning, which limits the density of development
and ((restricts or prohibits nonfarm uses of agricultural land and may
allow accessory uses that support, promote, or sustain)) supports
accessory nonfarm home-based or similar businesses that supplement on-
farm income, agricultural operations, and production, as provided in
subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Cluster zoning, which allows new development on one portion of
the land, leaving the remainder in agricultural or open space uses;
(c) Large lot zoning, which establishes as a minimum lot size the
amount of land necessary to achieve a successful farming practice;
(d) Quarter/quarter zoning, which permits one residential dwelling
on a one-acre minimum lot for each one-sixteenth of a section of land;
and
(e) Sliding scale zoning, which allows the number of lots for
single-family residential purposes with a minimum lot size of one acre
to increase inversely as the size of the total acreage increases.
(3)(((a))) Accessory uses allowed under subsection (2)(a) of this
section shall comply with the following:
(((i))) (a) Accessory uses shall be located, designed, and operated
so as not to interfere with natural resource land uses ((and shall be
accessory to the growing of crops or raising of animals;
(ii) Accessory commercial or retail uses shall predominately
produce, store, or sell regionally produced agricultural products from
one or more producers, products derived from regional agricultural
production, agriculturally related experiences, or products produced
on-site. Accessory commercial and retail uses shall offer for sale
predominantly products or services produced on-site; and));
(((iii))) (b) Accessory uses may operate out of existing or new
buildings with parking and other supportive uses consistent with the
size and scale of existing agricultural buildings on the site but shall
not otherwise convert agricultural land to nonagricultural uses((.));
and
(((b))) (c) Accessory uses may include compatible commercial or
retail uses ((including, but not limited to:
(i) Storage and refrigeration of regional agricultural products;
(ii) Production, sales, and marketing of value-added agricultural
products derived from regional sources;
(iii) Supplemental sources of on-farm income that support and
sustain on-farm agricultural operations and production;
(iv) Support services that facilitate the production, marketing,
and distribution of agricultural products; and
(v) Off-farm and on-farm sales and marketing of predominately
regional agricultural products and experiences, locally made art and
arts and crafts, and ancillary retail sales or service activities)).

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.280 and 2003 c 332 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A growth management hearings board shall hear and determine
only those petitions alleging either:
(a) That a state agency, county, or city planning under this
chapter is not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter,
chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption of shoreline master
programs or amendments thereto, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to
plans, development regulations, or amendments, adopted under RCW
36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW; or
(b) That the twenty-year growth management planning population
projections adopted by the office of financial management pursuant to
RCW 43.62.035 should be adjusted.
(2) A petition may be filed only by: (a) The state, or a county or
city that plans under this chapter; (b) a person who has participated
orally or in writing before the county or city regarding the matter on
which a review is being requested; (c) a person who is certified by the
governor within sixty days of filing the request with the board; or (d)
a person qualified pursuant to RCW 34.05.530.
(3) For purposes of this section "person" means any individual,
partnership, corporation, association, state agency, governmental
subdivision or unit thereof, or public or private organization or
entity of any character.
(4) The board's authority to hear and determine petitions alleging
noncompliance with the requirements of this chapter does not include
the authority to review policies and development regulations regarding
innovative zoning techniques in areas designated as agricultural lands
of long-term commercial significance and accessory uses on those lands
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.177.
(5) To establish participation standing under subsection (2)(b) of
this section, a person must show that his or her participation before
the county or city was reasonably related to the person's issue as
presented to the board.
(((5))) (6) When considering a possible adjustment to a growth
management planning population projection prepared by the office of
financial management, a board shall consider the implications of any
such adjustment to the population forecast for the entire state.
The rationale for any adjustment that is adopted by a board must be
documented and filed with the office of financial management within ten
working days after adoption.
If adjusted by a board, a county growth management planning
population projection shall only be used for the planning purposes set
forth in this chapter and shall be known as a "board adjusted
population projection". None of these changes shall affect the
official state and county population forecasts prepared by the office
of financial management, which shall continue to be used for state
budget and planning purposes.

--- END ---