BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.04.150 and 1891 c 119 p 217 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Island county shall consist of all of the islands known as Whidbey,
Camano, Smith(('s)), Deception, Strawberry, Baby, Minor, Kalamut, and
Ben Ure(('s)) and shall extend into the adjacent channels to connect
with the boundaries of adjoining counties as defined by statute.

--- END ---