BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The office of superintendent of public
instruction shall conduct an environmental education study in
partnership with public and private entities invested in strategies to
reach every student, family, and community with quality environmental
education experiences. The study shall provide empirical evidence,
exemplary models, and recommendations focused on:
(a) Career development;
(b) Good citizenship as proven through service learning;
(c) Graduation requirements, specifically addressing senior
culminating projects;
(d) Underserved youth and demographic groups; and
(e) Models of professional development for community-based service
organizations including state and local agencies.
(2) The study in this section shall provide findings and
recommendations useful to the Washington state comprehensive
environmental education plan, a comprehensive public-private endeavor
to develop local and statewide strategies to ensure quality outdoor
environmental education opportunities for every student, family, and
community in Washington.
(3) By studying the concepts in this section, the study shall
evaluate how environmental, natural science, wildlife, forestry, and
agriculture education benefits Washington's students, families, and
communities. Outdoor environmental education provides relevant quality
education set in real world contexts of the built, natural, cultural,
social, and economic environments. It provides opportunities for
direct natural experiences to help Washington's youth develop
self-esteem and personal responsibility. Washington benefits from
exemplary environmental education programs and public-private
environmental education partnerships across the state including
outdoor, agriculture, forestry, angling and hunting, cultural
competency, natural resource, natural science, and wildlife education
programs. The study will be useful in identifying outdoor
environmental education opportunities for Washington's students,
families, and communities.
(4) The office of superintendent of public instruction shall
provide an interim update to the legislature by December 1, 2006, and
shall complete the study no later than October 1, 2007.

--- END ---