BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) An alternative case management model, program for assertive
community treatment, has been used in many other states in the last
thirty years;
(2) Program for assertive community treatment uses
multidisciplinary teams of mental health professionals who provide
comprehensive care and services to people in the community with serious
and persistent mental health issues;
(3) Rather than have a single case manager who has to provide the
client links to a range of services, the team of professionals works
with the client on a twenty-four/seven basis and provides all the
necessary services through team members;
(4) Studies have shown that such an alternative case management
approach has reduced hospitalization, homelessness, and criminal
incarceration, thus improving the lives of clients and also reducing
overall government and social costs;
(5) In recent years there has been a small program for assertive
community treatment project in Clark county;
(6) Initial studies indicate that the project is successful in
getting clients help they need, and also in reducing overall
governmental costs; and
(7) More extensive examination of this model is necessary to
determine if it has wider applicability in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By September 1, 2006, the department of
social and health services shall establish a pilot project in
alternative case management, using program for assertive community
treatment teams, in one urban regional support network and one rural
regional support network in the state.
(2) The department shall adopt program standards for the pilot
project based on national program standards for assertive community
treatment teams. The standards shall include:
(a) Admission and discharge criteria;
(b) Staff requirements;
(c) Service intensity and capacity;
(d) Required services;
(e) Performance improvement and program evaluation; and
(f) Other program requirements as deemed appropriate by the
department.
(3) The department shall submit to the appropriate committees of
the legislature an evaluation of the pilot project by January 1, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of . . . . . . dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending
June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the department of social and
health services for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---