BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2005 c 503 s 14 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) A joint legislative and executive task force on mental health
services delivery and financing is created. The joint task force shall
consist of eight members, as follows: The secretary of the department
of social and health services or his or her designee; the president of
the Washington state association of counties or his or her designee; a
representative from the governor's office; two members of the senate
appointed by the president of the senate, one of whom shall be a member
of the majority caucus and one of whom shall be a member of the
minority caucus; two members of the house of representatives appointed
by the speaker of the house of representatives, one of whom shall be a
member of the majority caucus and one of whom shall be a member of the
minority caucus; and the chair of the joint legislative audit and
review committee or his or her designee. Staff support for the joint
task force shall be provided by the office of financial management, the
house of representatives office of program research, and senate
committee services.
(2) The joint task force may create advisory committees to assist
the joint task force in its work.
(3) Joint task force members may be reimbursed for travel expenses
as authorized under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and chapter 44.04 RCW,
as appropriate. Advisory committee members, if appointed, shall not
receive compensation or reimbursement for travel or expenses.
(4) The joint task force shall oversee and make recommendations
related to:
(a) The reorganization of the mental health administrative
structure within the department of social and health services;
(b) The standards and correction process and the procurement
process established by sections 4 through 6 of this act, including the
establishment of regional support networks through a procurement
process;
(c) The extent to which the current funding distribution
methodology achieves equity in funding and access to services for
mental health services consumers;
(d) Serving the needs of nonmedicaid consumers for the priority
populations under chapter 71.24 RCW; ((and))
(e) The types, numbers, and locations of inpatient psychiatric
hospital and community residential beds needed to serve persons with a
mental illness; and
(f) The caseloads maintained by community mental health workers and
the extent to which high caseloads pose health and safety risks to
clients, workers, and the general public.
(5) The joint task force shall report its initial findings and
recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature by January 1, 2006, and its final findings and
recommendations by June 30, 2007.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2007.

--- END ---