BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.70.020 and 1995 c 323 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Emergency facility health care" means any health care,
including, but not limited to, screenings, examinations, evaluations,
treatments, surgeries, and services pursuant to obligations imposed by
the federal emergency medical treatment and active labor act (42 U.S.C.
Sec. 1395dd), provided by a physician, or, to the extent permitted by
law, other health professional, hospital, institution, organization, or
person licensed by this state to provide health care or related
services, to a person while admitted to an emergency health care
facility.
(2) "Emergency health care facility" means: (a) A hospital
emergency department or other department of the hospital, surgical or
otherwise, where an admitted hospital emergency department patient is
taken for further treatment, or (b) other locally recognized emergency
care facility.
(3) "Health care provider" means either:
(((1))) (a) A person licensed by this state to provide health care
or related services, including, but not limited to, a licensed
acupuncturist, a physician, osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse,
optometrist, podiatric physician and surgeon, chiropractor, physical
therapist, psychologist, pharmacist, optician, physician(('s))
assistant, midwife, osteopathic physician's assistant, nurse
practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive care paramedic,
including, in the event such person is deceased, his or her estate or
personal representative;
(((2))) (b) An employee or agent of a person described in ((part
(1) above)) subsection (1)(a) of this section, acting in the course and
scope of his employment, including, in the event such employee or agent
is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative; or
(((3))) (c) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in ((part (1)
above)) subsection (1)(a) of this section, including, but not limited
to, a hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, or nursing
home; or an officer, director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the
course and scope of his or her employment, including in the event such
officer, director, employee, or agent is deceased, his or her estate or
personal representative.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.70.030 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) No award shall be made in any action or arbitration for damages
for injury occurring as the result of health care which is provided
after June 25, 1976, unless the plaintiff establishes one or more of
the following propositions:
(((1))) (a) That injury resulted from the failure of a health care
provider to follow the accepted standard of care;
(((2))) (b) That a health care provider promised the patient or his
representative that the injury suffered would not occur;
(((3))) (c) That injury resulted from health care to which the
patient or his representative did not consent.
((Unless)) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section or
as otherwise provided in this chapter, the plaintiff shall have the
burden of proving each fact essential to an award by a preponderance of
the evidence.
(2) In any action or arbitration for damages for injury incurring
as the result of emergency facility health care provided after July 1,
2006, the plaintiff shall have the burden of proving each fact
essential to an award by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence.

--- END ---