BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.177 and 2004 c 207 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county or a city may use a variety of innovative zoning
techniques in areas designated as agricultural lands of long-term
commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170. The innovative zoning
techniques should be designed to conserve agricultural lands and
encourage the agricultural economy. Except as provided in subsection
(3) of this section, a county or city should encourage nonagricultural
uses to be limited to lands with poor soils or otherwise not suitable
for agricultural purposes.
(2) Innovative zoning techniques a county or city may consider
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Agricultural zoning, which limits the density of development
and restricts or prohibits nonfarm uses of agricultural land and may
allow accessory uses, including nonagricultural related uses, that
support, promote, or sustain agricultural operations and production, as
provided in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Cluster zoning, which allows new development on one portion of
the land, leaving the remainder in agricultural or open space uses;
(c) Large lot zoning, which establishes as a minimum lot size the
amount of land necessary to achieve a successful farming practice;
(d) Quarter/quarter zoning, which permits one residential dwelling
on a one-acre minimum lot for each one-sixteenth of a section of land;
and
(e) Sliding scale zoning, which allows the number of lots for
single-family residential purposes with a minimum lot size of one acre
to increase inversely as the size of the total acreage increases.
(3)(((a))) Accessory uses allowed under subsection (2)(a) of this
section shall comply with the following:
(((i))) (a) Accessory uses shall be located, designed, and operated
so as not to interfere with natural resource land uses and shall ((be
accessory to the growing of crops or raising of animals)) comply with
the goals and requirements of this chapter;
(((ii))) (b) Accessory ((commercial or retail)) uses ((shall
predominately produce, store, or sell regionally produced)) may
include:
(i) Agricultural activities, including but not limited to the
production, storage, distribution, and marketing of agricultural
products from one or more producers, products derived from ((regional))
agricultural production, agriculturally related experiences, or
products produced on-site((. Accessory commercial and retail uses
shall offer for sale predominantly products or services produced on-site)), including support services that facilitate these uses; and
(((iii))) (ii) Nonagricultural related activities as long as they
are compatible in size, scale, and intensity with, will not interfere
with, and will support the continuation of the agricultural use of the
property and neighboring properties; and
(c) Accessory uses may operate out of existing or new buildings
with parking and other supportive uses consistent with the size
((and)), scale, and intensity of the existing agricultural use of the
property and the existing buildings on the site but shall not otherwise
convert more than one acre of agricultural land to nonagricultural
uses. Unless predominately used for regionally produced agricultural
products, any accessory uses including new buildings, parking, or
supportive uses shall not be located outside the general area already
developed for buildings and residential uses and shall not take more
than one acre of agricultural land out of production.
(((b) Accessory uses may include compatible commercial or retail
uses including, but not limited to:
(i) Storage and refrigeration of regional agricultural products;
(ii) Production, sales, and marketing of value-added agricultural
products derived from regional sources;
(iii) Supplemental sources of on-farm income that support and
sustain on-farm agricultural operations and production;
(iv) Support services that facilitate the production, marketing,
and distribution of agricultural products; and
(v) Off-farm and on-farm sales and marketing of predominately
regional agricultural products and experiences, locally made art and
arts and crafts, and ancillary retail sales or service activities.))

--- END ---