BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide an annual combined level of state and federal funding for
multijurisdictional drug task forces and local government drug
prosecution assistance at a minimum of four million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide assistance for jurisdictions enforcing illegal drug laws that
have historically been underserved by federally funded state narcotics
task forces and are considered to be major transport areas of narcotics
traffickers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Three pilot enforcement areas shall be
established for a period of four fiscal years, beginning July 1, 2006,
and ending June 30, 2010, with one in the southwestern region of the
state, comprising of Pacific, Wahkiakum, Lewis, Grays Harbor, and
Cowlitz counties; one in the southeastern region of the state,
comprising of Walla Walla, Columbia, Garfield, and Asotin counties; and
one in the northeastern part of the state, comprising of Stevens,
Ferry, Pend Oreille, and Lincoln counties. The counties comprising a
specific pilot area will coordinate with each other to establish and
implement a regional strategy to enforce illegal drug laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide funding of no less than one million five hundred seventy-five
thousand dollars annually. The funding is to be divided equally among
the three pilot enforcement areas. This funding is intended to provide
a minimum of four additional sheriff deputies for each pilot area, two
deputy prosecutors who will support the counties that are included in
the pilot area, a court clerk, and clerical staff to serve the pilot
area. It is the intent of the legislature that those counties that
have not previously received significant federal narcotics task force
funding shall be allocated funding for at least one additional
sheriff's deputy. Counties are encouraged to utilize drug courts and
treatment programs, and to share resources that operate in the region
through the use of interlocal agreements. The funding appropriated for
this purpose must not be used to supplant existing funding and cannot
be used for any purpose other than the enforcement of illegal drug
laws.
The criminal justice training commission will allocate funds to the
Washington association of prosecuting attorneys and the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The Washington association
of prosecuting attorneys is responsible for administration of the
funding and programs for the prosecution of crimes and court
proceedings. The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
shall administer the funds provided for law enforcement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, and
the Washington association of county officials shall jointly develop
measures to determine the efficacy of the programs in the pilot area.
These measures will include comparison of arrest rates before the
implementation of this act and after, reduction of recidivism, and any
other factors that are determined to be relevant to evaluation of the
programs. The organizations named in this section will present their
findings to the legislature by December 1, 2008.

--- END ---