BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Within thirty days of the effective date of this section, each
school district shall cause a true and correct copy of all collective
bargaining agreements then in effect entered into by the district and
an employee organization, and all subsequent collective bargaining
agreements entered into by the district, within ten working days
following the date of ratification of each agreement, to be:
(a) Filed with the superintendent of public instruction;
(b) Posted on the school district's web site, if the school
district maintains a web site;
(c) Made available to the public for inspection during regular
business hours in a convenient and identified location at the main
administrative office of the school district;
(d) Filed with the superintendent of the educational service
district in which the district is located; and
(e) Filed with the board of trustees of the largest public library
serving the school district.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Collective bargaining agreement" means a master agreement and
any amendments, addendums, memorandums, or any other documents
modifying the master agreement entered into by a school district and an
employee organization.
(b) "Employee organization" means any organization, union,
association, agency, committee, council, or group of any kind, in which
employees participate, and that exists for the purpose, in whole or in
part, of collectively bargaining with employers.

--- END ---