BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a capital add-on rate, not less
than the July 1, 2005, capital add-on rate established by the
department, for those assisted living facilities contracting with the
department that have a medicaid minimum occupancy percentage of sixty
percent or greater. The medicaid minimum occupancy percentage shall be
determined on an annual basis. In determining whether an assisted
living facility meets the medicaid minimum occupancy percentage
established under this section, the department shall include in the
calculation of medicaid days those clients who are enrolled in a
managed care delivery system for receipt of long-term care services,
including but not limited to the program for all inclusive care and the
medicaid integration project.
(2) This section applies to assisted living facility rates
established on or after January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---