BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.63.030 and 2005 c 167 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A law enforcement officer has the authority to issue a notice
of traffic infraction:
(a) When the infraction is committed in the officer's presence;
(b) When the officer is acting upon the request of a law
enforcement officer in whose presence the traffic infraction was
committed;
(c) If an officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle
accident has reasonable cause to believe that the driver of a motor
vehicle involved in the accident has committed a traffic infraction;
(d) When the ((notice of)) infraction is detected through the use
of a photo enforcement system under RCW 46.63.160; or
(e) When the ((notice of)) infraction is detected through the use
of an automated traffic safety camera under RCW 46.63.170.
(2) A court may issue a notice of traffic infraction upon receipt
of a written statement of the officer that there is reasonable cause to
believe that an infraction was committed.
(3) If any motor vehicle without a driver is found parked,
standing, or stopped in violation of this title or an equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution, the officer finding the vehicle shall take its registration
number and may take any other information displayed on the vehicle
which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously affix to the
vehicle a notice of traffic infraction.
(4) In the case of failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle under RCW
46.55.120, upon receiving a complaint by a registered tow truck
operator that has incurred costs in removing, storing, and disposing of
an abandoned vehicle, an officer of the law enforcement agency
responsible for directing the removal of the vehicle shall send a
notice of infraction by certified mail to the last known address of the
person responsible under RCW 46.55.105. The notice must be entitled
"Littering -- Abandoned Vehicle" and give notice of the monetary penalty.
The officer shall append to the notice of infraction, on a form
prescribed by the department of licensing, a notice indicating the
amount of costs incurred as a result of removing, storing, and
disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount realized at
auction, and a statement that monetary penalties for the infraction
will not be considered as having been paid until the monetary penalty
payable under this chapter has been paid and the court is satisfied
that the person has made restitution in the amount of the deficiency
remaining after disposal of the vehicle.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.63.160 and 2004 c 231 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies only to traffic infractions issued under
RCW 46.61.690 for toll collection evasion.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer
from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of
a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a),
(b), or (c).
(3) Toll collection systems include manual cash collection,
electronic toll collection, and photo enforcement systems.
(4) "Electronic toll collection system" means a system of
collecting tolls or charges that is capable of charging the account of
the toll patron the appropriate toll or charge by electronic
transmission from the motor vehicle to the toll collection system,
which information is used to charge the appropriate toll or charge to
the patron's account.
(5) "Photo enforcement system" means a vehicle sensor installed to
work in conjunction with an electronic toll collection system that
automatically produces one or more photographs, one or more
microphotographs, a videotape, or other recorded images of a vehicle
operated in violation of an infraction under this chapter.
(6) The use of a toll collection system is subject to the following
requirements:
(a) The department of transportation shall adopt rules that allow
an open standard for automatic vehicle identification transponders used
for electronic toll collection to be compatible with other electronic
payment devices or transponders from the Washington state ferry system,
other public transportation systems, or other toll collection systems
to the extent that technology permits. The rules must also allow for
multiple vendors providing electronic payment devices or transponders
as technology permits.
(b) The department of transportation may not sell, distribute, or
make available in any way, the names and addresses of electronic toll
collection system account holders.
(7) The use of a photo enforcement system for issuance of notices
of infraction is subject to the following requirements:
(a) Photo enforcement systems may take photographs, digital
photographs, microphotographs, videotapes, or other recorded images of
the vehicle and vehicle license plate only.
(b) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered owner
of the vehicle or to the renter of a vehicle within sixty days of the
violation. The law enforcement officer issuing the notice of
infraction shall include with it a certificate or facsimile thereof,
based upon inspection of photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or
other recorded images produced by a photo enforcement system, stating
the facts supporting the notice of infraction. This certificate or
facsimile is prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it and is
admissible in a proceeding charging a violation under this chapter.
The photographs, digital photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or
other recorded images evidencing the violation must be available for
inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to adjudicate
the liability for the infraction.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs,
digital photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or other recorded
images prepared under this chapter are for the exclusive use of the
tolling agency and law enforcement in the discharge of duties under
this section and are not open to the public and may not be used in a
court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding
relates to a violation under this chapter. No photograph, digital
photograph, microphotograph, videotape, or other recorded image may be
used for any purpose other than enforcement of violations under this
chapter nor retained longer than necessary to enforce this chapter or
verify that tolls are paid.
(d) All locations where a photo enforcement system is used must be
clearly marked by placing signs in locations that clearly indicate to
a driver that he or she is entering a zone where traffic laws are
enforced by a photo enforcement system.
(8) Infractions detected through the use of photo enforcement
systems are not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW
46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated by the
use of photo enforcement systems under this section shall be processed
in the same manner as parking infractions, including for the purposes
of RCW 3.46.120, 3.50.100, 35.20.220, 46.16.216, and 46.20.270(3).
(9) The penalty for infractions issued under this section shall be
forty dollars.
(10) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business the department of transportation or a law enforcement agency
shall, before a notice of infraction being issued under this section,
provide a written notice to the rental car business that a notice of
infraction may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car
business does not, within eighteen days of the mailing of the written
notice, provide to the issuing agency by return mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred; or
(c) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car
business may pay the applicable toll and fee.
Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
chapter for the notice of infraction.

--- END ---