BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the focus of
college-readiness standards for students has been on courses and
credits. It is the legislature's intent to change the focus of
college-readiness to student skills and abilities.
(2) The higher education coordinating board, with cooperation and
assistance from the state board for community and technical colleges,
the council of presidents, and representatives from each of the
research universities, branch campuses, and regional universities, and
with approval from the state board of education, shall create a
description of the minimum skills and abilities necessary for students
to enter and succeed in postsecondary education. This work shall be
structured so that the costs are absorbed within existing agency and
institution budgets.
(3)(a) The higher education coordinating board shall report to
appropriate committees of the legislature on the progress and status of
the project in this section by March 1, 2007. The report shall
identify any barriers encountered by the project.
(b) The higher education coordinating board shall submit a final
report to appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1,
2007. The report shall identify the skills and abilities necessary for
students to enter and succeed in postsecondary education.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2008.

--- END ---