BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington's dependence on energy supplied from outside the
state and volatile energy markets makes our economy and citizens
vulnerable to unpredictable and high energy prices;
(2) Washington's dependence on petroleum-based fuels increases
energy costs for citizens and businesses;
(3) Experts tell us that the global oil shortage will only worsen,
making the three dollars per gallon gasoline of the summer of 2005 seem
affordable;
(4) Each year, citizens and businesses in Washington state spend
nine billion dollars on gasoline and diesel, with those funds drained
from the state economy;
(5) Diesel soot from diesel engines ranks as the highest toxic air
pollutant in Washington, leading to hundreds of premature deaths and
increasing rates of asthma and other lung-related diseases;
(6) The use of biodiesel results in significantly less air
pollution than traditional diesel fuels and can help our citizens and
businesses conserve energy;
(7) Improper disposal and treatment of organic waste from farms and
livestock operations can have a significant negative impact on water
quality;
(8) Washington has abundant supplies of organic wastes from farms
that can be used for energy production and abundant farmland where
crops could be grown to supplement or supplant petroleum-based fuels;
(9) Instead of leaving our economy at the mercy of global events,
and the policies of foreign nations, Washington state should adopt a
policy of energy independence;
(10) The energy freedom program is meant to lead Washington state
towards energy independence;
(11) Producing more energy here means cleaner, renewable energy
that includes, but is not limited to, biofuels, solar power, and wind
power;
(12) The biofuels industry is a new and developing industry now
limited by the availability of capital for construction of facilities
for converting farm and forest products into energy and fuels; and
(13) For biofuels to be economically viable in Washington, it will
be necessary to grow dedicated crops, construct crushers near farms,
and build refineries to create fuel.
Therefore, the legislature finds it is in the public interest to
reduce Washington's dependence on imported oil, expand renewable fuel
production and use in Washington, conserve energy, improve use of
renewable energy and energy efficiency measures, and promote
sustainable rural economic development by creating new jobs and
stimulating business and economic activity in local communities across
Washington.
To accomplish this, the energy freedom program is established to
stimulate strategic investment in facilities, infrastructure,
technologies, and research and development that will advance
Washington's move toward energy independence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the energy freedom board.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) "Political subdivision" means any port district, county, city,
town, special purpose district, and any other municipal corporations or
quasi-municipal corporations in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The energy freedom board is created to
exercise the powers granted under this chapter.
(2) The board consists of thirteen members as follows:
(a) One member shall be the director of the department of
agriculture or the director's designated representative;
(b) One member shall be the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development or the director's designated
representative from the department's energy policy division;
(c) Four of the members shall be appointed as follows: Two members
from the house of representatives committee that has jurisdiction over
energy issues, one from each of the two major caucuses, to be appointed
by the speaker of the house of representatives; two members from the
senate committee that has jurisdiction over energy issues, one from
each of the two major caucuses, to be appointed by the president of the
senate; and
(d) Seven of the members shall be appointed by the governor: One
recognized expert in renewable energy; one representative from
Washington State University; one Washington state grower; one producer
of alternative fuels; one public fleet manager; one public buildings
manager; and one sustainable society advocate.
(3) The members appointed under subsection (2)(c) and (d) of this
section must initially be appointed to terms as follows: Three members
for two-year terms, four members for three-year terms, and four members
for four-year terms which includes the chair. Thereafter, each
succeeding term is four years. Appointees may be reappointed to serve
more than one term.
(4) The governor must select one of the members to serve as the
chair of the board. The members of the board shall elect one of their
members to serve as vice chair.
(5) The department must provide staff support to the board.
(6) Members of the board receive no compensation but shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In addition to other applicable provisions
of law pertaining to conflicts of interest of public officials, no
board member, appointive or otherwise, may participate in any decision
on any board contract in which the board member has any interests,
direct or indirect, with any entity that would be the recipient of any
aid under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The board may:
(1) Accept from any federal agency loans or grants for the planning
or financing of any project and enter into agreements with such an
agency concerning the loans or grants;
(2) Accept any gifts, grants, or loan of funds, property, or
financial or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms
and conditions that are not in conflict with this chapter;
(3) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter; and
(4) Perform all acts and functions as necessary or convenient to
carry out the powers expressly granted or implied under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The board shall:
(1) Establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and
prioritize project applications for potential funding;
(2) Adopt rules governing project eligibility and evaluation
criteria;
(3) Establish a peer review committee to include board members,
renewable energy specialists, energy conservation specialists,
scientists, and individuals with specific recognized expertise. The
peer review committee shall provide to the board an independent peer
review of all grant proposals submitted by Washington public research
institutions for the purposes specified in section 7(3) (a) and (c) of
this act that are determined to be competitive for a grant award. The
board shall review the findings of the peer review committee when
making final grant allocation decisions;
(4) Develop the prioritized list through open and public meetings;
(5) Establish performance measures against which the program will
be evaluated;
(6) Aggressively seek federal and other grant moneys;
(7) Report annually to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature on the implementation of this chapter. The report must
include, but is not limited to: Information on the number of
applications for financial assistance; the grant or loan amount awarded
each project; a description of each project; the status of each funded
project, including the agricultural and environmental benefits of each
project, as well as the progress made by each project in creating jobs
and moving towards energy independence; the documentation of nonstate
funds to be used for each project; and progress against performance
measures developed under this chapter. The first report must be
submitted by December 31, 2006, to committees in the house of
representatives and senate with jurisdiction over energy issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The board is authorized to make low-interest loans to political subdivisions of the state for the purposes
of assisting political subdivisions in financing the cost of new and
renewable energy and biofuel development projects and activities. A
grant may also be authorized for purposes designated in this chapter,
but only when, and to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably
possible, given the limited resources of the political subdivision and
the finding by the board that financial circumstances require grant
assistance to enable the project to move forward. Up to ten percent of
all financial assistance provided to political subdivisions by the
board may consist of grants. Political subdivisions applying for loans
and grants shall identify nonstate matching funds available for the
project, and shall specify deliverables to be achieved by proposed
projects and activities, including evidence that the proposed project
will result in a positive net energy output, if applicable.
(2) Applications for loans and grants must be made in the form and
manner as the board may prescribe.
(3) The board may provide financial assistance for the following
types of projects and activities including, but not limited to:
(a) Research and development of new and renewable energy and
biofuel sources including but not limited to biomass and associated
biofuel gases;
(b) Renewable energy and biofuel development infrastructure and
facilities;
(c) Research and development to develop markets for alternative
fuel byproducts; and
(d) Loans for small commercial energy audits and retrofits.
(4) Applications must be prioritized based on the following
criteria:
(a) The extent to which the project will contribute to the
establishment of a viable bioenergy production capacity in Washington;
(b) The benefits to Washington's agricultural producers;
(c) The extent to which the project will help conserve energy and
reduce dependence on petroleum fuels and imported energy, either
directly or indirectly;
(d) The extent to which the project will reduce air and water
pollution, either directly or indirectly;
(e) The number and quality of jobs, as well as the economic
benefits, created by the project;
(f) The extent to which the investment shows a direct link to
commercialization either by indirectly supporting the commercialization
of bioenergy intellectual property into a commercialized project, or by
directly assisting in moving a commercially viable project into the
marketplace for use by Washington state citizens; and
(g) The extent to which private funds have been leveraged.
(5) The board may approve an application that results in loans of
up to five million dollars. In no circumstances shall a loan approved
under this section constitute more than fifty percent of total project
funding.
(6) Financial assistance awarded to political subdivisions is one
time only and may not be used for ongoing operational expenses.
(7) Before any financial assistance application is approved, the
political subdivision must demonstrate to the board that no other
timely source of funding is available to it at costs reasonably similar
to financing available from the board.
(8) A responsible official of the political subdivision must be
present during board deliberations and provide information that the
board requests.
(9) The board may not approve an application if it fails to provide
for adequate reporting or disclosure of financial and employment data
to the board. The board may require an annual or other periodic audit
of the project books.
(10) The board may defer loan repayment for up to twenty-four
months or until the projects start to receive revenue from operations,
whichever is sooner.
(11) Upon receiving financial assistance, a political subdivision
must enter into appropriate contracts with any industry partners that
may be involved in the use of the facilities, infrastructure, or
equipment.
(12) Upon written notice to the political subdivision, the board
may suspend or cancel its loans or grants if any of the following
occur:
(a) The political subdivision fails to make satisfactory and
reasonable progress to complete the project, or the board concludes the
political subdivision will be unable to complete the project or any
portion of it; or
(b) The political subdivision or industry partners have made
misrepresentations in any information furnished to the board in
connection with the project.
(13) In the event that any portion of the loan or grant has been
paid to the political subdivision under this section at the time of
breach, or failure of the political subdivision to satisfactorily
perform, the board may require that the full amount of the loan or
grant, or a portion thereof, be repaid within a period specified by the
board.
(14) The board is authorized to award grants to Washington public
research institutions for the purposes specified in subsection (3)(a)
and (c) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The energy freedom account is created in the
state treasury. All receipts from appropriations made to the account,
proceeds from other lawful sources, and loan payments of principal and
interest derived from loans made under this chapter must be deposited
into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
loans and grants to political subdivisions for renewable energy and
biofuel development projects and activities authorized under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 In accordance with Article VIII, sections 5
and 7 of the state Constitution, the credit of the state and counties,
cities, towns, and other municipal corporations shall not in any manner
be given or loaned to any individual, association, company, or
corporation in the administration of the grant and loan program
established in this chapter.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.16.020 and 1996 c 150 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected from every person
a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one
or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax shall be equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after
the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses shall be deposited in the public works assistance
account created in RCW 43.155.050.
(4) Of amounts deposited into the general fund pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section, the legislature may authorize a
transfer of up to twenty-five million dollars for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2006, into the energy freedom account created in
section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act expires June 30, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Any moneys in the energy freedom account on
June 30, 2016, and all payments received after that date must be
deposited in the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 9 and 13 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If a transfer from the general fund to the
energy freedom account created in section 8 of this act for the
purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number,
is not provided by June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act,
this act is null and void.

--- END ---