BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The high school graduating class of 2008
will be the first class that must pass the Washington assessment of
student learning or an alternative assessment to earn the certificate
of academic achievement required to obtain a high school diploma.
However, the Washington assessment of student learning is not the only
graduation requirement students must meet. While some students may
need additional time beyond twelfth grade to pass the assessment, the
legislature finds that it is important to recognize and celebrate the
successes of students in meeting other graduation requirements.
Therefore, the legislature intends to create a certificate of
attainment to honor students' accomplishments while encouraging them to
continue working toward a high school diploma.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the high school graduating class of 2008, a
school district has the option to award a certificate of attainment to
students who meet the criteria under this section. The certificate of
attainment is not the equivalent of a high school diploma, but enables
students to participate in commencement ceremonies.
(2) To be eligible for a certificate of attainment, a student must:
(a) Meet all state and local high school graduation requirements
except for obtaining a certificate of academic achievement under RCW
28A.655.061 or a certificate of individual achievement under RCW
28A.155.045;
(b) Have retaken the Washington assessment of student learning at
least once;
(c) Maintain at least a ninety percent attendance level during the
senior year of high school, except that the school district
superintendent may waive this requirement if the student provides
documentation of circumstances such as illness that warrant this
waiver; and
(d) Meet with counselors and teachers to update the student's high
school and beyond plan.

--- END ---