BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every contract between a health care provider or facility and
a health carrier, an insurer, or other organization engaged in the
business of creating provider networks must conform to the provisions
of this section and rules adopted by the commissioner governing such
contracts. For the purpose of this section, "contractor" refers to
health carriers, insurers, and other organizations engaged in the
business of creating provider networks.
(2) Irrespective of any other remedy for violation of the
provisions of this section, a provider or facility contract that is
subject to this section and that fails to contain or otherwise
conflicts with the provisions of this section must be interpreted as
though the contract contained or conformed to provisions of this
section.
(3) Every provider contract must contain a "locum tenens" provision
that permits a contracted provider to select another licensed provider
who will serve in place of the contracted provider when the contracted
provider is temporarily unavailable to provide health care services.
The contracted provider need not select a substitute provider then
under contract with the contractor but the contractor may reject any
provider failing to meet the basic credentialing standards of the
contractor. The provider must notify the contractor of the
substitution in a reasonable time period and the substitute provider is
subject to the same terms and conditions as the absent, contracted
provider. The contractor may limit the time period of substitution to
sixty consecutive days in any one period of substitution.
(4) No contractor may directly or indirectly require a provider to
participate in all plans, programs, and health care arrangements as a
condition for participating in any of the contractor's other plans,
programs, or health care arrangements. For example and not as a
limitation of this subsection, a contractor may not require a provider
who has agreed to furnish care to enrollees of a health plan to also
participate in a discount program for uninsured health care services or
to participate in a property casualty insurance program.
(5) Every provider contract must contain procedures for an
independent, outside review of billing disputes. The costs for the
review must be borne by the provider if the independent review
substantially upholds the contractor's decision and by the contractor
if the review substantially overturns the contractor's decision. The
commissioner shall adopt rules governing procedures for independent
review of the billing disputes.
(6)(a) Initially upon contracting, upon the provider's or
facility's written request and annually thereafter on or before the
contract anniversary date, a contractor shall disclose to contracted
providers and facilities the following information in an electronic
format (or in writing, if agreeable to both parties):
(i) The complete fee schedule for the type of contracting provider
or facility; and
(ii) The detailed compensation policies and payment rules used to
adjudicate claims, which must, unless otherwise prohibited by state
law:
(A) When available, be consistent with current procedural
terminology and national medicare guidelines;
(B) Clearly and accurately state what is covered by any global
payment provisions for both professional and institutional services,
any global payment provisions for all services necessary as part of a
course of treatment in an institutional setting, and any other global
arrangements such as per diem hospital payments; and
(C) At a minimum, clearly and accurately state the policies
regarding: Reimbursement for multiple procedures, reimbursement for
assistant providers, recognition of current procedural terminology
modifiers, and bundling of current procedural terminology codes.
(b) The contractor may limit redisclosure of payment information
only as necessary to protect proprietary information.

--- END ---