BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.190 and 1999 c 303 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Counties may submit a petition for relief to the office of
public defense for reimbursement of extraordinary criminal justice
costs. Extraordinary criminal justice costs are defined as those
associated with investigation, prosecution, indigent defense, jury
impanelment, expert witnesses, interpreters, incarceration, and other
adjudication costs of aggravated murder cases.
(((1))) (a) The office of public defense, in consultation with the
Washington association of prosecuting attorneys and the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, shall develop procedures for
processing the petitions, for auditing the veracity of the petitions,
and for prioritizing the petitions. Prioritization of the petitions
shall be based on, but not limited to, such factors as disproportionate
fiscal impact relative to the county budget, efficient use of
resources, and whether the costs are extraordinary and could not be
reasonably accommodated and anticipated in the normal budget process.
(((2))) (b) Before January 1st of each year, the office of public
defense, in consultation with the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys and the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs,
shall develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives a prioritized list of submitted
petitions that are recommended for funding by the legislature.
(2) Cities and counties may submit a petition for relief to the
office of public defense for reimbursement of extraordinary criminal
justice medical costs. Extraordinary criminal justice medical costs
are defined as those associated with providing medically necessary care
to respond to the medical, dental, and mental health needs of adult
misdemeanor or felony suspects in custody or incarcerated adult
misdemeanor or felony offenders held in city or county facilities that
exceed fifteen thousand dollars per individual suspect or offender per
year.
(a) The office of public defense, in consultation with the
Washington association of counties, the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs, and the association of Washington cities,
shall develop procedures for processing the petitions, for auditing the
veracity of the petitions, and for prioritizing the petitions.
Prioritization of the petitions shall be based on, but not limited to,
such factors as disproportionate fiscal impact relative to the city or
county budget, efficient use of resources, and whether the costs are
extraordinary and could not be reasonably accommodated and anticipated
in the normal budget process.
(b) Before January 1st of each year, the office of public defense,
in consultation with the Washington association of counties, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and the
association of Washington cities, shall develop and submit to the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives a prioritized list of submitted petitions that are
recommended for funding by the legislature.

--- END ---