BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The purpose of this section is to establish a process for
issuing firearms certificates to residents of Washington who are
qualified retired law enforcement officers for the purpose of
satisfying the certification requirements contained in the federal law
enforcement officers safety act of 2004 (118 Stat. 865; 18 U.S.C. Sec.
926B and 926C).
(2) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
develop a firearms certificate form to be used by local law enforcement
agencies when issuing firearms certificates to retired law enforcement
officers under this section.
(3) A retired law enforcement officer who is a resident of
Washington may apply for a firearms certificate with a local law
enforcement agency. The local law enforcement agency may issue the
firearms certificate to a retired law enforcement officer if the
officer:
(a) Has been qualified or otherwise found to meet the standards
established by the criminal justice training commission for firearms
qualifications for active law enforcement officers in the state; and
(b) Has undergone the same background check as required under RCW
9.41.070 and is not ineligible to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.040
or 9.41.045.
(4) The qualification required under (3)(a) of this section may be
performed by the local law enforcement agency or by an individual or
entity certified to provide firearms training.
(5) The firearms certificate is valid for a period of one year. An
applicant for the firearms certificate shall pay a fee of thirty-six
dollars, plus additional charges imposed by the federal bureau of
investigation that are passed on to the applicant. The fee shall be
distributed in the same manner as the fee for a concealed pistol
license under RCW 9.41.070. The retired law enforcement officer is
also responsible for paying the costs of the firearms qualification
required under (3)(a) of this section.

--- END ---