BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds: (a) When retail
energy prices rise, the amount of taxes paid by consumers also
increase, because state and local public utility taxes are presently
levied as a fixed percentage of revenue derived by electric and natural
gas utilities from retail energy sales; (b) increased energy costs can
have an adverse impact on the economy of the state of Washington and
this impact is compounded by attendant increases in the amount of taxes
that must be paid on energy purchases; (c) volatility in wholesale
energy prices has become more common, compared to historical wholesale
market behavior, and changes in wholesale prices ultimately translate
into higher retail energy prices; and (d) further increases in
wholesale and retail energy prices appear imminent.
(2) The legislature declares that the rate of state and local
public utility taxes and the corresponding rate of use taxes on natural
gas purchases should be indexed to the cost of energy for residential
consumers, providing that tax rates should be adjusted downward when
energy prices rise and upward when energy prices fall, except that tax
rates should be capped at the rate currently provided under law so that
consumers would never pay a higher tax rate than they do at present.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.16.020 and 1996 c 150 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected from every person
a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one
or more of the businesses herein mentioned.
(a) For the following businesses, the tax shall be equal to the
gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after the
business, as follows:
(((a))) (i) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses:
Three and six-tenths percent;
(((b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d))) (ii) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one
percent;
(((e))) (iii) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except
tugboats, operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of
one percent;
(((f))) (iv) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and
tugboat businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones
mentioned above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(((g))) (v) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths
percent.
(b)(i) For a light and power business, the tax is equal to the
gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate determined under
section 3 of this act.
(ii) For a gas distribution business, the tax is equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate determined under section
4 of this act.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses shall be deposited in the public works assistance
account created in RCW 43.155.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The maximum tax rate that can be applied to the gross receipts
of a light and power business under RCW 82.16.020(1) is three and
sixty-two one-hundredths percent. The department shall annually adjust
the tax rate applied to a light and power business pursuant to this
section.
(2) Beginning October 1, 2006, and each October 1st thereafter, the
department shall calculate the tax rate for light and power businesses
to apply the following calendar year. To determine the annual tax
rate, the department shall perform the calculations required under this
section.
(3) By October 1, 2006, the department shall establish a base year
electric power rate by determining a state average electric power rate
for residential retail customers of all light and power businesses in
the state. The base year rate shall be the average of all residential
classification tariffs or schedules filed, published, or maintained by
light and power businesses effective on December 31, 2004. To perform
the calculation under this subsection (3), the department shall rely
solely upon customer classifications established by light and power
businesses; the department shall not define or otherwise determine the
class of residential customers. The base year rate shall be stated in
units of dollars per kilowatt-hour.
(4) Beginning October 1, 2006, and every October 1st thereafter,
the department shall annually calculate the state average electric
power rate for residential retail customers of all light and power
businesses in the state. The state average electric power rate shall
be the average of all residential classification tariffs or schedules
filed, published, or maintained by light and power businesses effective
on December 31st of the immediate prior year. To perform the
calculation under this subsection (4), the department shall rely upon
the customer classifications established by light and power businesses;
the department shall not define or otherwise determine the class of
residential customers. The annual state average electric power rate
shall be stated in units of dollars per kilowatt-hour.
(5) The department shall divide the base year state average
electric power rate, as calculated under subsection (3) of this
section, by the annual state average electric power rate, as calculated
annually under subsection (4) of this section, to determine a ratio of
state average electric power rates.
(6) The department shall multiply the ratio of state average
electric power rates, as calculated under subsection (5) of this
section, by the maximum tax rate specified in subsection (1) of this
section. The product of this calculation shall be the adjusted tax
rate for the following calendar year for light and power businesses.
At no time shall the adjusted tax rate exceed the maximum rate under
subsection (1) of this section.
(7) By November 1, 2006, and each November 1st thereafter, the
department shall inform taxpayers of its determinations under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The maximum tax rate that can be applied to the gross receipts
of a gas distribution business under RCW 82.16.020(1) is three and six-tenths percent. The department shall annually adjust the tax rate
applied to the gross revenue of a gas distribution business pursuant to
this section.
(2) Beginning October 1, 2006, and each October 1st thereafter, the
department shall calculate the tax rate for gas distribution businesses
to apply the following calendar year. To determine the annual tax
rate, the department shall perform the calculations required under this
section.
(3) By October 1, 2006, the department shall establish a base year
gas rate by determining a state average gas rate for residential retail
customers of all gas distribution businesses in the state. The base
year rate shall be the average of all residential classification
tariffs or schedules filed, published, or maintained by gas
distribution businesses effective on December 31, 2004. To perform the
calculation under this subsection (3), the department shall rely solely
upon customer classifications established by gas distribution
businesses; the department shall not define or otherwise determine the
class of residential customers. The base year rate shall be stated in
units of dollars per cubic feet.
(4) Beginning October 1, 2006, and every October 1st thereafter,
the department shall annually calculate the state average gas rate for
residential retail customers of all gas distribution businesses in the
state. The gas rate shall be the average of all residential
classification tariffs or schedules filed, published, or maintained by
gas distribution businesses effective on December 31st of the immediate
prior year. To perform the calculation performed under this subsection
(4), the department shall rely upon customer classifications
established by gas distribution businesses; the department shall not
define or otherwise determine the class of residential customers. The
annual state average gas rate shall be stated in units of dollars per
cubic feet.
(5) The department shall divide the base year state average gas
rate, as calculated under subsection (3) of this section, by the state
annual average gas rate, as calculated annually under subsection (4) of
this section, to determine a ratio of state average gas rates.
(6) The department shall multiply the ratio of state average gas
rates, as calculated under subsection (5) of this section, by the
maximum tax rate specified in subsection (1) of this section. The
product of this calculation shall be the adjusted tax rate for the
following calendar year for gas distribution businesses. At no time
shall the adjusted tax rate exceed the maximum rate under subsection
(1) of this section.
(7) By November 1, 2006, and each November 1st thereafter, the
department shall inform taxpayers of its determinations under this
section.

Sec. 5 RCW 35.21.870 and 1984 c 225 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No city or town may impose a tax on the privilege of conducting
an electrical energy, natural gas, steam energy, or telephone business
at a rate which exceeds six percent of gross receipts unless the rate
is first approved by a majority of the voters of the city or town
voting on such a proposition.
(2)(a) The maximum tax rate that can be applied to the gross
receipts of an electrical energy business is the rate provided in
subsection (1) of this section. The city or town shall annually adjust
the tax rate applied to electrical energy businesses pursuant to this
subsection (2).
(b) Beginning October 1, 2006, and each October 1st thereafter, the
city or town shall calculate the adjusted tax rate for electrical
energy businesses to apply the following calendar year, beginning
January 1, 2007, and each January 1st thereafter. To determine the
annual tax rate, the city or town shall perform the calculations
required under this subsection (2).
(c) By October 1, 2006, the city or town shall establish a base
year for the purpose of (e) of this subsection, by determining a local
average electric power rate for residential retail customers of all
electrical energy businesses providing retail electric service within
the city or town. The base year rate shall be the average of all
residential classification tariffs or schedules filed, published, or
maintained by light and power businesses effective on December 31,
2004. To perform the calculation under this subsection (2)(c), the
city or town shall rely solely upon customer classifications
established by electrical energy businesses; the city or town shall not
define or otherwise determine the class of residential customers. The
base year local average electric power rate shall be stated in units of
dollars per kilowatt-hour.
(d) Beginning October 1, 2006, and every October 1st thereafter,
the city or town shall annually calculate the local average electric
power rate for residential retail customers of all electrical energy
businesses providing retail electric service within the city or town.
The local annual average electric power rate shall be the average of
all residential classification tariffs or schedules filed, published,
or maintained by electrical energy businesses effective on December
31st of the immediate prior year. To perform the calculation under
this subsection (2)(d), the city or town shall rely upon the customer
classifications established by electrical energy businesses; the city
or town shall not define or otherwise determine the class of
residential customers. The local annual average electric power rate
shall be stated in units of dollars per kilowatt-hour.
(e) The city or town shall divide the base year local average
electric power rate, as calculated under (c) of this subsection, by the
local annual average electric power rate, as calculated annually under
(d) of this subsection, to determine a ratio of local average electric
power rates.
(f) The city or town shall multiply the ratio of local average
electric power rates, as calculated under (e) of this subsection, by
the rate imposed by the city or town under subsection (1) of this
section on January 1, 2006. The product of this calculation shall be
the adjusted tax rate for the following year for electrical energy
businesses. At no time shall the adjusted tax rate exceed the maximum
rate under subsection (1) of this section.
(g) Beginning November 1, 2006, and for each November 1st
thereafter, the city or town shall inform taxpayers of its
determinations under this subsection (2).
(3)(a) The maximum tax rate that can be applied to the gross
receipts of a natural gas business is the rate provided in subsection
(1) of this section. The city or town shall annually adjust the tax
rate applied to the gross revenue of a natural gas business pursuant to
this subsection (3).
(b) Beginning October 1, 2006, and each October 1st thereafter, the
city or town shall calculate the tax rate for natural gas businesses
for the following year, beginning January 1, 2007, and each January 1st
thereafter. To determine the annual tax rate, the city or town shall
perform the calculations required under this subsection (3).
(c) By October 1, 2006, the city or town shall establish a base
year for the purpose of (e) of this subsection, by determining a local
average gas rate for residential retail customers of all natural gas
businesses providing retail gas service within the city or town. The
base year local average gas rate shall be the average of all
residential classification tariffs or schedules filed, published, or
maintained by natural gas businesses effective on December 31, 2004.
To perform the calculation under this subsection (3)(c), the city or
town shall rely solely upon customer classifications established by
natural gas businesses; the city or town shall not define or otherwise
determine the class of residential customers. The base year local
average gas rate shall be stated in units of dollars per cubic feet.
(d) Beginning October 31, 2006, and every October 31st thereafter,
the city or town shall annually calculate the local average gas rate
for residential retail customers of all natural gas businesses
providing retail gas service within the city or town. The local annual
average gas rate through tariffs or schedules filed, published, or
maintained by natural gas businesses effective on December 31st of the
immediate prior year. To perform the calculation performed under this
subsection (3)(d), the city or town shall rely upon customer
classifications established by natural gas businesses; the city or town
shall not define or otherwise determine the class of residential
customers. The annual local average gas rate shall be stated in units
of dollars per cubic feet.
(e) The city or town shall divide the base year local average gas
rate, as calculated under (c) of this subsection, by the local annual
average gas rate, as calculated annually under (d) of this subsection,
to determine a ratio of local average gas rates.
(f) The city or town shall multiply the ratio of town average gas
rates, as calculated under (e) of this subsection, by the rate imposed
by the city or town under subsection (1) of this section on January 1,
2006. The product of this calculation shall be the adjusted tax rate
for the following year for natural gas businesses. At no time shall
the adjusted tax rate exceed the maximum rate under subsection (1) of
this section.
(g) By November 1, 2006, and for each November 1st thereafter, the
city or town shall inform taxpayers of its determinations under this
subsection (3).
(4) If a city or town is imposing a rate of tax under subsection
(1) of this section in excess of six percent on April 20, 1982, the
city or town shall decrease the rate to a rate of six percent or less
by reducing the rate each year on or before November 1st by ordinances
to be effective on January 1st of the succeeding year, by an amount
equal to one-tenth the difference between the tax rate on April 20,
1982, and six percent.
Nothing in this subsection prohibits a city or town from reducing
its rates by amounts greater than the amounts required in this
subsection.
Voter approved rate increases under subsection (1) of this section
shall not be included in the computations under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act shall be known and cited as the
"energy tax control act."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---