BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.037 and 2004 c 273 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((No later than January 1, 2006,)) The department ((shall)) may
implement a voluntary biometric matching system for driver's licenses
and identicards. ((The)) A biometric matching system shall be used
only to verify the identity of an applicant for a renewal or duplicate
driver's license or identicard by matching a biometric identifier
submitted by the applicant against the biometric identifier submitted
when the license was last issued. This project requires a full review
by the information services board using the criteria for projects of
the highest visibility and risk.
(2) ((The)) Any biometric matching system selected by the
department shall be capable of highly accurate matching, and shall be
compliant with biometric standards established by the American
association of motor vehicle administrators.
(3) ((The biometric matching system selected by the department must
incorporate a process that allows the owner of a driver's license or
identicard to present a personal identification number or other code
along with the driver's license or identicard before the information
may be verified by a third party.
(4))) Upon the establishment of a biometric driver's license and
identicard system as described in this section, the department shall
allow every person applying for an original, renewal, or duplicate
driver's license or identicard to voluntarily submit a biometric
identifier. Each applicant shall be informed of all ways in which the
biometric identifier may be used, all parties to whom the identifier
may be disclosed and the conditions of disclosure, the expected error
rates for the biometric matching system which shall be regularly
updated as the technology changes or empirical data is collected, and
the potential consequences of those errors. The department shall adopt
rules to allow applicants to verify the accuracy of the system at the
time that biometric information is submitted, including the use of at
least two separate devices.
(((5))) (4) The department may not disclose biometric information
to the public or any governmental entity except when authorized by
court order.
(((6))) (5) All biometric information shall be stored with
appropriate safeguards, including but not limited to encryption.
(((7))) (6) The department shall develop procedures to handle
instances in which the biometric matching system fails to verify the
identity of an applicant for a renewal or duplicate driver's license or
identicard. These procedures shall allow an applicant to prove identity
without using a biometric identifier.
(((8))) (7) Any person who has voluntarily submitted a biometric
identifier may choose to discontinue participation in the biometric
matching program at any time, provided that the department utilizes a
secure procedure to prevent fraudulent requests for a renewal or
duplicate driver's license or identicard. ((When the person
discontinues participation, any previously collected biometric
information shall be destroyed.
(9) If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5428 or House Bill No.
1681 is enacted into law,)) (8) This section does not apply when an
applicant renews his or her driver's license or identicard by mail or
electronic commerce.

--- END ---