BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.33A.040 and 1977 c 67 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Rates for the rental of equipment owned by the fund shall be set to
cover all costs of maintenance and repair, material and supplies
consumed in operating or maintaining the equipment, and the future
replacement thereof. The rates shall be determined by the county
engineer or other appointee of the county legislative body and shall be
subject to annual review by the legislative body.

--- END ---