BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The Columbia river safety and coastal
crab mitigation work group is established within the department of
ecology.
(2) The work group is composed of the following members:
(a) The director of the department of ecology, or the director's
designee;
(b) The director of the department of fish and wildlife, or the
director's designee;
(c) Three representatives of entities that are signatories to the
coastal communities of southwest Washington agreement, selected
collaboratively by the signatory entities;
(d) One representative each from the Columbia river crab
fisherman's association and the Washington Dungeness crab fishermen's
association;
(e) One representative of port districts within the lower Columbia
river watershed, selected by the Washington public ports association.
(3) The United States army corps of engineers and representatives
of Indian tribes with crab fishing rights in southwest Washington must
be invited by the work group to participate on the work group.
(4) Upon convening, the work group shall select a chair to preside
over committee meetings and a vice-chair to preside in the chair's
absence.
(5) Staff to the work group must be provided by the department of
ecology and the department of fish and wildlife.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The Columbia river safety and coastal crab
mitigation work group shall:
(1) Evaluate the safety risks from wave amplification and the
impacts to the coastal crab resource of the state from the Columbia
river channel improvement project, including annual maintenance at the
mouth of the Columbia river and all ocean and in river disposal
activity;
(2)(a) Examine the United States army corps of engineers'
responsibilities for the monitoring and mitigation of the potential
impacts identified in subsection (1) of this section; and (b) evaluate
the sufficiency of the United States army corps of engineers'
monitoring and mitigation plans and activities in light of its
responsibilities; and
(3) Adopt recommended practices or guidelines for monitoring,
dredging, or disposal activities that would help avoid, minimize, or
compensate for the impacts set forth in subsection (1) of this section,
should the work group find such practices or guidelines to be
necessary. The practices or guidelines must be completed by December
31, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The Columbia river safety and coastal crab
mitigation work group shall invite the United States army corps of
engineers to develop a mitigation and safety agreement incorporating
practices or guidelines consistent with the recommendations in section
2 of this act. The work group shall negotiate with the objective of
including enforceable measures in the agreement. The work group shall
also endeavor to secure agreement to the inclusion of numeric standards
for dredge deposition that vary by areal extent, height, and ocean
depth, with the overall objective of meeting a standard of inducing no
greater than ten percent wave amplification through dredge spoil
deposition. Each state agency and unit of local government proposed
for inclusion in the agreement retains independent authority to enter
the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If the agreement referenced in section 3 of
this act is not developed and signed by the United States army corps of
engineers and by the department of ecology and department of fish and
wildlife by December 31, 2007, the department of ecology and department
of fish and wildlife shall review the practices or guidelines adopted
under section 2 of this act for consistency with conditions previously
imposed by the state of Washington under the authority of section 401
of the federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. 1341, and of the federal
coastal zone management act, 16 U.S.C. 1451 et seq. Where the
conditions previously imposed are less protective of crab resources or
crab fisher safety, the departments shall use all available authorities
to revise such conditions and ensure that they are incorporated into
federal permits issued for the Columbia river channel improvement
project and maintenance activity. For any new or modified federal
permits requiring state certification, the departments shall include
conditions that incorporate the applicable practice or guideline
recommendations of the work group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 In carrying out its duties under section 2
of this act, the Columbia river safety and coastal crab mitigation work
group may contract with individuals or entities for technical
assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The Columbia river safety and coastal crab
mitigation work group and its powers and duties terminate June 30,
2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act expire June
30, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

--- END ---