BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.70.350 and 1994 c 260 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following restrictions apply to vessel designations and
substitutions on Dungeness crab-coastal fishery licenses ((and
Dungeness crab-coastal class B fishery licenses)):
(a) The holder of the license may not:
(i) Designate on the license a vessel the hull length of which
exceeds ninety-nine feet((, nor may the holder)); or
(ii) Change vessel designation if the hull length of the vessel
proposed to be designated exceeds the hull length ((of the currently
designated vessel)) designated on the license on the effective date of
this section by more than ten feet;
(b) If the hull length of the vessel proposed to be designated is
comparable to or exceeds by up to one foot the hull length of the
currently designated vessel, the department may change the vessel
designation no more than once in any two consecutive Washington state
coastal crab seasons unless the currently designated vessel is lost or
in disrepair such that it does not safely operate, in which case the
department may allow a change in vessel designation;
(c) If the hull length of the vessel proposed to be designated
exceeds by between one and ten feet the hull length of the
((currently)) designated vessel on the effective date of this section,
the department may change the vessel designation no more than once ((in
any five consecutive Washington state coastal crab seasons)) on or
after the effective date of this section, unless a request is made by
the license holder during a Washington state coastal crab season for an
emergency change in vessel designation. If such an emergency request
is made, the director may allow a temporary change in designation to
another vessel, if the hull length of the other vessel does not exceed
by more than ten feet the hull length of the currently designated
vessel.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "hull length" means the
length overall of a vessel's hull as shown by ((United States coast
guard documentation or)) marine survey((,)) or ((for vessels that do
not require United States coast guard documentation,)) by
manufacturer's specifications ((or marine survey)).
(3) By December 31, 2010, the department must, in cooperation with
the coastal crab fishing industry, evaluate the effectiveness of this
section and, if necessary, recommend any statutory changes to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives.

--- END ---