BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
diesel fuel to a logging operation for nonhighway use. This exemption
is available only if the buyer provides the seller with an exemption
certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. Fuel
used for space or water heating for human habitation is not exempt
under this section.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Diesel fuel" is defined as provided in 26 U.S.C. 4083, as
amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2006.
(b) "Logging operation" means an establishment primarily engaged in
one or more of the following activities: (i) Cutting timber; (ii)
transporting timber; (iii) producing wood chips in the field; or (iv)
operating timber tracts for the purpose of selling standing timber.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
nonhighway use of diesel fuel by a logging operation. Fuel used for
space or water heating for human habitation is not exempt under this
section.
(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---