BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that well-trained
commercial vehicle drivers will enhance safety and assist in
maintaining a competent work force in the state. Commercial vehicles
weigh several thousand pounds and are long in length which makes
handling, stopping, and cornering very difficult and creates
proportionally more wear and tear on the roads. The average commercial
vehicle operator will travel several thousand miles and will encounter
many different driving challenges each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Commercial trailers that are used in conjunction with vehicles
subject to RCW 46.16.070 licensed for 26,000 pounds or more will be
subject to an annual license fee of thirty-six dollars in addition to
all other vehicle licensing fees. The license fee shall be collected
at the time of original and renewal registration. The state treasurer
shall deposit twenty percent of the revenue in the commercial vehicle
operator account created in section 3 of this act. The remainder of
the revenue shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund and will be
used solely for local government road maintenance and local freight
mobility grants. The department of transportation will develop,
implement, and administer the grant program. The speaker of the house
of representatives will appoint two representatives, one from each
caucus in the house, the president of the senate shall appoint two
senators, one from each caucus in the senate, and the governor shall
appoint a person to represent cities and a person to represent counties
to work with the department of transportation to develop the criteria
for the grant program. Entities wanting to obtain grants from the
department of transportation will submit design proposals to the
department of transportation and compete based on the established
criteria.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The commercial vehicle operator account is created in the state
treasury. The state board of community and technical colleges shall
distribute the funds deposited into the account to community and
technical colleges to provide commercial vehicle operator training
programs. The funds shall be distributed to the technical and
community colleges each fiscal year based on the number of students
enrolled in the training programs in each college as a percentage of
the total state enrollment. The state board of community and technical
colleges will prepare and submit a report on the training programs to
the legislature for each fiscal year by September 1st of that year.
All receipts from the fee imposed in section 3 of this act must be
deposited in the account. Money in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used for
commercial vehicle operator training provided by community and
technical colleges.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.84.092 and 2005 c 514 s 1106, 2005 c 353 s 4, 2005
c 339 s 23, 2005 c 314 s 110, 2005 c 312 s 8, and 2005 c 94 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the commercial vehicle operator account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data
processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account,
the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental
disabilities community trust account, the drinking water assistance
account, the drinking water assistance administrative account, the
drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern Washington
University capital projects account, the education construction fund,
the education legacy trust account, the election account, the emergency
reserve fund, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the
federal forest revolving account, the freight mobility investment
account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health
services account, the state higher education construction account, the
higher education construction account, the highway infrastructure
account, the high-occupancy toll lanes operations account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement
account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial
retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund,
the multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal justice
assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public
facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004,
the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance
account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate
appraiser commission account, the regional transportation investment
district account, the resource management cost account, the rural
Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the small city pavement
and sidewalk account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 46.16.068 (Trailing units -- Permanent
plates) and 1998 c 321 s 32 & 1993 c 123 s 4 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act applies to registrations due on or
after April 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---