BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.28.010 and 1911 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
Any person having a valid subsisting interest in real property, and
a right to the possession thereof, may recover the same by action in
the superior court of the proper county, to be brought against the
tenant in possession; if there is no such tenant, then against the
person claiming the title or some interest therein, and may have
judgment in such action quieting or removing a cloud from plaintiff's
title; an action to quiet title may be brought by the known heirs of
any deceased person, or of any person presumed in law to be deceased,
or by the successors in interest of such known heirs against the
unknown heirs of such deceased person or against such person presumed
to be deceased and his or her unknown heirs, and if it shall be made to
appear in such action that the plaintiffs are heirs of the deceased
person, or the person presumed in law to be deceased, or the successors
in interest of such heirs, and have been in possession of the real
property involved in such action for ((ten)) twenty years preceding the
time of the commencement of such action, and that during said time no
person other than the plaintiff in the action or his or her grantors
has claimed or asserted any right or title or interest in said
property, the court may adjudge and decree the plaintiff or plaintiffs
in such action to be the owners of such real property, free from all
claims of any unknown heirs of such deceased person, or person presumed
in law to be deceased; and an action to quiet title may be maintained
by any person in the actual possession of real property against the
unknown heirs of a person known to be dead, or against any person where
it is not known whether such person is dead or not, and against the
unknown heirs of such person, and if it shall thereafter transpire that
such person was at the time of commencing such action dead the judgment
or decree in such action shall be as binding and conclusive on the
heirs of such person as though they had been known and named; and in
all actions, under this section, to quiet or remove a cloud from the
title to real property, if the defendant be absent or a nonresident of
this state, or cannot, after due diligence, be found within the state,
or conceals himself or herself to avoid the service of summons, service
may be made upon such defendant by publication of summons as provided
by law; and the court may appoint a trustee for such absent or
nonresident defendant, to make or cancel any deed or conveyance of
whatsoever nature, or do any other act to carry into effect the
judgment or the decree of the court. In an action claiming adverse
possession, continuity of possession for the requisite time limit is
not established by privity between successive occupants holding
adversely to the holder of the true title, unless the interest passed
to the plaintiff pursuant to a will or by intestate succession.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.16.020 and 2002 c 261 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The period prescribed for the commencement of actions shall be as
follows:
(1) Within ((ten)) twenty years:
(((1))) For actions for the recovery of real property, or for the
recovery of the possession thereof; and no action shall be maintained
for such recovery unless it appears that the plaintiff, his or her
ancestor, predecessor or grantor was seized or possessed of the
premises in question within ((ten)) twenty years before the
commencement of the action. In an action claiming adverse possession,
continuity of possession for the requisite time limit is not
established by privity between successive occupants holding adversely
to the holder of the true title, unless the interest passed to the
plaintiff pursuant to a will or by intestate succession.
(2) Within ten years:
(a) For an action upon a judgment or decree of any court of the
United States, or of any state or territory within the United States,
or of any territory or possession of the United States outside the
boundaries thereof, or of any extraterritorial court of the United
States, unless the period is extended under RCW 6.17.020 or a similar
provision in another jurisdiction.
(((3))) (b) Of the eighteenth birthday of the youngest child named
in the order for whom support is ordered for an action to collect past
due child support that has accrued under an order entered after July
23, 1989, by any of the above-named courts or that has accrued under an
administrative order as defined in RCW 74.20A.020(6), which is issued
after July 23, 1989.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 4.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The prevailing party in any proceeding concerning adverse
possession of real property must pay to the county auditor of the
county in which the real property is located an amount equal to the
property taxes paid by another party or owed with regard to the real
property during the period of the adverse possession. The county
auditor shall reimburse any party to the proceeding other than the
prevailing party for any taxes actually paid with regard to the real
property during the period of the adverse possession.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 7.28 RCW
to read as follows:
In any action involving adverse possession:
(1) It shall be an absolute defense to any claim of adverse
possession, if proved by a preponderance of the evidence, that the
person asserting adverse possession originally entered onto the land
with the intent to acquire fee title or use rights in the property.
(2) The person asserting adverse possession must show a clearly
identified boundary line demonstrating his or her use of the land for
the period of limitations.
(3) If the landowner gave written notice, by certified mail to the
person claiming adverse possession, that the landowner is aware of the
trespass at any time during the statutory period of limitations, any
use of the land subsequent to the date of notice by the person
asserting adverse possession, or anyone else residing at the address
where the notice was sent, shall be deemed to be permissive as of the
date of the notice.

--- END ---