BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that individuals in
state purchased health care programs need assurance that they will have
access to the medically necessary care ordered by their physician. The
best available clinical evidence should be used by the state to give
patients access to medically necessary care in a cost-effective manner.
Decisions for broad patient populations made by the state must not
jeopardize the ability of the physician and patient to choose the
medical items and services that best meet the needs of the individual.
The state must use open, transparent decision-making processes to
ensure individuals in state purchased health care programs have access
to medically necessary care. The state has significant opportunities
to improve the quality of health care received by citizens enrolled in
state purchased health care programs. Quality improvement is a
prerequisite for achieving more efficient utilization of health care
and control of state health expenditures; improving patient access to
medically necessary care in a cost-effective manner is an important
priority for the state. The state should use available, valid evidence
to improve access to needed medicines and other health care items and
services and improve the quality of care received by individuals in
state purchased health care programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Evidence report" means any document assembled as a result of
a systematic review of all evidence deemed relevant to a particular
health care question or decision.
(2) "Guidelines" means clinical practice guidelines that are
systematically developed statements to assist practitioner and patient
decisions about appropriate health care for specific clinical
circumstances.
(3) "Relevant evidence" means the entire body of available
clinical, humanistic, and economic evidence that is considered by
trained health care analysts as being scientifically valid and
applicable to both real world medical practice patterns as well as to
the target patient groups for which the product or service is being
considered. This relevant body of evidence may include evidence from
randomized clinical trials, meta-analyses, observational studies, and
economic or epidemiologic models.
(4) "Systematic review" means an unbiased, comprehensive analysis
of all evidence deemed relevant to a particular health care decision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The state shall ensure that there is broad
and ongoing consultation with the public regarding its use of evidence,
including its development and use of evidence reports, in making
decisions related to coverage or payment for health care items and
services. The consultation must include adequate public notice of
proposed and final decisions, adequate explanation of the reasons for
and evidence relied on in proposing and finalizing decisions, and
adequate opportunity for input from the public, including input from
patients and medical experts, including physicians licensed and
practicing in the state and specializing in the treatment of the
condition that is the subject of a report, on proposed and final
decisions. The public consultation must include:
(1)(a) Review by an advisory committee: A medical quality advisory
committee consists of members appointed by the governor and the
legislature. For review of individual evidence reports, the state
shall empanel members of the advisory committee as an advisory panel
with nine members possessing expertise in the clinical area or areas
represented in the report. Input from state medical and specialty
organizations must be considered when empaneling experts. No
specialist may be specifically excluded because of the nature or
funding source of ongoing or previously conducted research, provided
any and all conflicts are disclosed consistent with the manner
described in section 505(n)(4) of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic
act, and 18 U.S.C. Sec. 208. In the case of evidence reports on
pharmaceuticals, five members must be physicians, licensed under
chapter 18.71 RCW and four members must be pharmacists licensed under
chapter 18.64 RCW. The members must be appointed to serve for terms of
two years from the date of their appointment. Members may be appointed
to more than one term. The health care authority shall serve as staff
for the committee and assist them in their duties.
(b) The state shall ensure that a majority of advisory committee
members possess experience evaluating the medical, pharmacology, and
therapeutics literature and in treating the medical conditions for
which evidence reports are prepared. The medical quality advisory
committee shall take into consideration the unique characteristics and
needs of relevant patient populations within the state when reviewing
such reports. All evidence reports created or purchased must be
reviewed and approved by the committee in order for the state to
finalize and use them. In approving or rejecting a report for use by
the state, the medical quality advisory committee shall consider and
describe specific aspects of the report including methodology of data
analysis, data collection, and strength and use of evidence.
(2) Open and public procedures. In establishing such open, public
procedures, the state shall adhere to the open public meetings act,
chapter 42.30 RCW, and provide at least thirty days' notice and
adequate opportunity to comment on proposed questions to be addressed
in evidence reports prior to initiation of their development.
(3) Open public meetings with thirty days' advance notice to the
public must be held by the state on evidence reports that have been
developed or purchased by the state. At the meetings, the state shall
provide a description of the methods used in developing the reports,
the patient population studied, the intended use or uses of the
reports, and the potential effect on the quality and efficiency of
health care.
(4) Finalization of reports: No evidence report developed or
purchased by the state may be considered final and available for use in
the state until notice of at least thirty days and meetings have been
held. In order to finalize evidence reports, the state shall announce
through appropriate means, subsequent to the public meeting,
availability of the evidence reports. The announcement must provide an
adequate opportunity for public comment on evidence reports and their
proposed use by the state. The state shall then publish the evidence
report in final form taking into account input received on the report.
(5) Announcement of proposed decisions. In making coverage or
payment decisions that make use of evidence reports or other relevant
evidence as described in this section, the state shall announce
proposed decisions to the public and provide a period of sixty days for
public comment. The proposed decisions must describe the rationale,
the evidence used, the methods employed in analyzing the evidence, and
how different types of evidence were used in the proposed decision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) An evidence report must be used by the
state for the purposes of improving health care quality, effectiveness,
and efficiency. In making use of evidence reports, the state shall
describe how the information will be used and how such use will improve
health care quality, effectiveness, and efficiency.
(2) The state shall consider a broad range of evidence to improve
the quality and appropriateness of health care. The state shall not
specifically exclude nor consider any evidence report that specifically
excludes any relevant evidence. The state shall make a good faith
effort to identify, locate, and review all available evidence reports,
including those that may be prepared by public stakeholders affected by
the evidence reports.
(3) All reports considered and used by the state must be made
available upon request to physicians, providers, patients, and other
members of the public to improve health care decision making. To the
extent that reports include confidential or proprietary data provided
by manufacturers of other stakeholders, such data may not be disclosed
by a state agency, or contractor therewith, in a form that discloses
the identity of the entity providing the data or the confidential or
proprietary data. The data must be provided in a summary form that
does not disclose confidential or proprietary information.
(4) Any evidence reports developed, purchased, or used by the state
must: (a) Address a disease or condition that imposes a significant
health burden on state purchased health care programs; (b) address
health items or services for which utilization data or other
information indicates a pattern of poor care or inappropriate
utilization, including underuse, overuse, or misuse of items or
services for the specified disease or condition; (c) provide a
statement discussing both the strengths and limitations of the report's
conclusions, including the strength of the evidence considered in the
review and degree of uncertainty in the review results, the
applicability of the review findings to individuals in state purchased
health care programs, and the potential benefits and harm on the
quality and efficiency of health care for the patients being served by
the intervention/product; and (d) undergo review and approval by the
medical quality advisory committee and reflect input received from the
advisory committee and other members of the public. The description of
the methods used should be inclusive enough that a member of the public
wishing to replicate the review would have enough information to follow
the same process and arrive at the same conclusion.
(5) An evidence report must demonstrate the clinical superiority of
one item or service compared to alternatives in order for the state to
use the evidence report as the basis for determinations regarding the
relative effectiveness of alternative interventions. In the absence of
such evidence, the state shall not use the evidence report to make
determinations regarding the relative effectiveness of alternative
interventions.
(6) Notwithstanding the findings of any evidence report, an
individual enrolled in a state purchased health care program for whom
coverage or payment is limited under this section shall have access to
applicable appeal and hearing rights as afforded to them under state
and federal laws.
(7) In using evidence reports, the state shall base decisions that
affect payment or coverage of affected items, services, or modes of
delivery on the strength of scientific evidence and on expert medical
opinion, including peer-reviewed medical literature such as randomized
clinical trials, observational studies, health economics studies,
medical consensus, and input from physicians, patients, and others
received during public meetings and report finalization and such other
information as deemed appropriate.
(8) A legislative oversight committee shall review and report at
least yearly on the impact of evidence reports on patient access,
treatment quality, and overall health care costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---