BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08A.260 and 2003 c 383 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each recipient shall be assessed after determination of program
eligibility and before referral to job search. Assessments shall be
based upon factors that are critical to obtaining employment, including
but not limited to education, availability of child care, history of
family violence, history of substance abuse, and other factors that
affect the ability to obtain employment. Assessments may be performed
by the department or by a contracted entity. The assessment shall be
based on a uniform, consistent, transferable format that will be
accepted by all agencies and organizations serving the recipient.
Based on the assessment, an individual responsibility plan shall be
prepared that: (a) Sets forth an employment goal and a plan for moving
the recipient immediately into employment; (b) contains the obligation
of the recipient to become and remain employed; (c) moves the recipient
into whatever employment the recipient is capable of handling as
quickly as possible; and (d) describes the services available to the
recipient to enable the recipient to obtain and keep employment.
(2) Recipients who are not engaged in work and work activities, and
do not qualify for a good cause exemption under RCW 74.08A.270, shall
engage in self-directed service as provided in RCW 74.08A.330.
(3) If a recipient refuses to engage in work and work activities
required by the department, the family's grant: (a) Shall be reduced
by the recipient's share((,)); and (b) may, if the department
determines it appropriate, be terminated.
(4) The department shall exempt a recipient's family from
application of subsection (3)(b) of this section by providing child
safety net payments to maintain housing, basic utilities, and other
verified needs of children in a recipient's family if the recipient or
another adult in the recipient's family is in sanction status. The
child safety net payment shall not be less than sixty percent of the
assistance unit's regular monthly grant, and shall be sent to a
protective payee who shall pay only the family's verified rent and
utility costs with the child safety net payment. Any remaining amount
shall be used only to pay for children's expenses, such as clothing,
food, diapers, toiletries, school supplies, or other school-related
costs.
(5) The department may waive the penalties required under
subsection (3) of this section, subject to a finding that the recipient
refused to engage in work for good cause provided in RCW 74.08A.270.
(((5))) (6) In implementing this section, the department shall
assign the highest priority to the most employable clients, including
adults in two-parent families and parents in single-parent families
that include older preschool or school-age children to be engaged in
work activities.
(((6))) (7) In consultation with the recipient, the department or
contractor shall place the recipient into a work activity that is
available in the local area where the recipient resides.

--- END ---