BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.106.010 and 2003 c 399 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context,
the following words and phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter
shall have the following meaning:)) The definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Advisory board" means the state advisory board of
plumbers((;)).
(2) "Contractor" means any person, corporate or otherwise, who
engages in, or offers or advertises to engage in, any work covered by
the provisions of this chapter by way of trade or business, or any
person, corporate or otherwise, who employs anyone, or offers or
advertises to employ anyone, to engage in any work covered by the
provisions of this chapter((;)).
(3) "Department" means the department of labor and industries((;)).
(4) "Director" means the director of department of labor and
industries((;)).
(5) "Journeyman plumber" means any person who has been issued a
certificate of competency by the department of labor and industries as
provided in this chapter((;)).
(6) "Like-in-kind" means having similar characteristics such as
plumbing size, type, and function, and being in the same location((;)).
(7) "Medical gas piping" means oxygen, nitrous oxide, high pressure
nitrogen, medical compressed air, and medical vacuum systems((;)).
(8) "Medical gas piping installer" means a journeyman plumber who
has been issued a medical gas piping installer endorsement((;)).
(9) "Plumbing" means that craft involved in installing, altering,
repairing and renovating potable water systems, liquid waste systems,
and medical gas piping systems within a building. Installation in a
water system of water softening or water treatment equipment is not
within the meaning of plumbing as used in this chapter((;)).
(10) "Specialty plumber" means anyone who has been issued a
specialty certificate of competency limited to:
(a) Installation, maintenance, and repair of the plumbing of
single-family dwellings, duplexes, and apartment buildings that do not
exceed three stories; ((or))
(b) Maintenance and repair of backflow prevention assemblies; or
(c) Installation, maintenance, and repair of the pressurization,
treatment, and filtration components of a domestic well water system
consisting of: One or more pumps; pressure, storage, and other tanks;
filtration and treatment equipment; if appropriate, a pitless adapter;
along with valves, transducers, and other plumbing components and
electrical connections, including but not limited to conductors,
conduit, raceways, pump controls, control boxes, starters, relays,
floats switches, and solenoids, that:
(i) Are used to acquire, treat, store, or move water suitable for
either drinking or other domestic purposes, including irrigation, to:
(A) A single-family dwelling, duplex, or other similar place of
residence; (B) a public water system, as defined in RCW 70.119.020 and
as limited under RCW 70.119.040, that is designed to supply water at a
rate of less than five hundred gallons per minute; or (C) a farm owned
and operated by a person whose primary residence is located within
thirty miles of any part of the farm;
(ii) Are located: (A) Within a building used primarily to house a
well and the pressurization, treatment, and filtration components of a
domestic well water system; (B) within the interior space, including
but not limited to an attic, basement, crawl space, or garage, of a
residential structure, which space is separated from the living area of
the residence by a lockable entrance and fixed walls, ceiling, and
floor; or (C) outside of any building;
(iii) Include neither any: (A) Plumbing fixtures, mechanisms, or
devices to distribute or access potable water within a building; nor
(B) electric components, other than such plumbing or electrical
apparatus as are necessary for maintenance, safety, and testing
purposes relating to the pressurization, treatment, and filtration
portions of the domestic well water system;
(iv) If located within the interior space of a residential
structure, are connected to plumbing supplied and installed into the
interior space by either: (A) A person who, pursuant to RCW 18.106.070
or 18.106.090, possesses a valid temporary permit or certificate of
competency as a journeyman plumber, specialty plumber, or trainee, as
defined in this chapter; or (B) a person exempt from the requirement to
obtain a certified plumber to do such plumbing work under RCW
18.106.150;
(v) If located within the interior space of a building, are
connected to an electrical circuit at a junction box that has been
installed into the interior space for purposes compatible with such
components by either: (A) A person who, pursuant to RCW 19.28.161,
possesses a valid certificate of competency as a master journeyman
electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty residential
electrician, specialty residential electrician, or a properly
supervised electrical trainee; or (B) a person exempt from the
requirement to obtain a certified electrician to do such electrical
work under RCW 19.28.261; and
(vi) If located outside of a building, are connected to an
electrical circuit where a switch or other means of disconnecting the
circuit from a source of power has been installed by either: (A) A
person who, pursuant to RCW 19.28.161, possesses a valid certificate of
competency as a master journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician,
master specialty residential electrician, specialty residential
electrician, or a properly supervised electrical trainee; or (B) a
person exempt from the requirement to obtain a certified electrician to
do such electrical work under RCW 19.28.261.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.106.040 and 2001 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the application and evidence set forth in RCW
18.106.030, the director shall review the same and make a determination
as to whether the applicant is eligible to take an examination for the
certificate of competency. To be eligible to take the examination:
(a) Each applicant for a journeyman plumber's certificate of
competency shall furnish written evidence that he or she has completed
a course of study in the plumbing trade in the armed services of the
United States or at a school licensed by the work force training and
education coordinating board, or has had four or more years of
experience under the direct supervision of a licensed journeyman
plumber.
(b) Each applicant for a specialty plumber's certificate of
competency under RCW 18.106.010(((8))) (10)(a) shall furnish written
evidence that he or she has completed a course of study in the plumbing
trade in the armed services of the United States or at a school
licensed by the work force training and education coordinating board
under chapter 28C.10 RCW, or that he or she has had at least three
years practical experience in the specialty.
(c) Each applicant for a specialty plumber's certificate of
competency under RCW 18.106.010(((8))) (10) (b) or (c) shall furnish
written evidence that he or she is eligible to take the examination.
These eligibility requirements shall be adopted by rule by the director
pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(2)(a) The director shall establish reasonable rules for the
examinations to be given applicants for certificates of competency. In
establishing the rules, the director shall consult with the state
advisory board of plumbers as established in RCW 18.106.110.
(b) The director shall establish reasonable criteria by rule for
determining an applicant's eligibility to take an examination for the
certificate of competency for specialty plumbers under subsection
(1)(c) of this section. In establishing the criteria, the director
shall consult with the state advisory board of plumbers as established
in RCW 18.106.110. These rules must take effect by ((July 1, 2002))
December 31, 2006.
(3) Upon determination that the applicant is eligible to take the
examination, the director shall so notify the applicant, indicating the
time and place for taking the same.
(4) No other requirement for eligibility may be imposed.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.106.050 and 1997 c 326 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, with the advice of the advisory board, shall
prepare a written examination to be administered to applicants for
certificates of competency for journeyman plumber and specialty
plumber. The examination shall be constructed to determine:
(a) Whether the applicant possesses varied general knowledge of the
technical information and practical procedures that are identified with
the trade of journeyman plumber or specialty plumber; and
(b) Whether the applicant is familiar with the applicable plumbing
codes and the administrative rules of the department pertaining to
plumbing and plumbers.
((The department shall administer the examination to eligible
persons. All applicants shall, before taking the examination, pay to
the department a fee.))
(2) ((For purposes of the medical gas piping installer
endorsement,)) The department, with the consent of the advisory board,
may enter into a contract with a nationally recognized testing agency
to develop, administer, and score ((medical gas piping installer)) any
examinations required by this chapter. All applicants shall, before
taking an examination ((for a medical gas piping installer
endorsement)), pay the required examination fee. The department shall
set the examination fee by contract with a nationally recognized
testing agency. The fee shall cover but not exceed the costs of
preparing and administering the examination and the materials necessary
to conduct the practical elements of the examination. The department
shall approve training courses and set the fees for training courses
for ((the medical gas piping installer endorsement)) examinations
provided by this chapter.
(3) An examination to determine the competency of an applicant for
a specialty plumbing certificate for the installation, maintenance, and
repair of the pressurization and filtration components of a domestic
well water system must include questions designed to establish the
applicant's knowledge of electrical safety and technical requirements.
In developing the electrical portion of this examination, the
department shall consult with the electrical board created under RCW
19.28.311. Certification by a professional or trade association
recognized by the electrical board as equivalent to a domestic well
specialty electrician examination must be accepted as satisfying the
electrical portion of this examination.
(4) The department shall certify the results of the examinations
provided by this chapter, and shall notify the applicant in writing
whether he or she has passed or failed. Any applicant who has failed
the examination may retake the examination, upon the terms and after a
period of time that the director shall set by rule. The director may
not limit the number of times that a person may take the examination.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.106.110 and 1997 c 307 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created a state advisory board of plumbers, to be
composed of ((five)) seven members appointed by the governor. Two
members shall be journeyman plumbers, ((two)) one member shall be a
specialty plumber, three members shall be persons conducting a plumbing
business, at least one of which shall be primarily engaged in a
specialty plumbing business, and one member from the general public who
is familiar with the business and trade of plumbing.
(2) The term of one journeyman plumber expires July 1, 1995; the
term of the second journeyman plumber expires July 1, 2000; the term of
the specialty plumber expires July 1, 2008; the term of one person
conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 1996; the term of the
second person conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 2000; the
term of the third person conducting a plumbing business expires July 1,
2007; and the term of the public member expires July 1, 1997.
Thereafter, upon the expiration of said terms, the governor shall
appoint a new member to serve for a period of three years. However, to
ensure that the board can continue to act, a member whose term expires
shall continue to serve until his or her replacement is appointed. In
the case of any vacancy on the board for any reason, the governor shall
appoint a new member to serve out the term of the person whose position
has become vacant.
(3) The advisory board shall carry out all the functions and duties
enumerated in this chapter, as well as generally advise the department
on all matters relative to this chapter.
(4) Each member of the advisory board shall receive travel expenses
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now
existing or hereafter amended for each day in which such member is
actually engaged in attendance upon the meetings of the advisory board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.106 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall, in consultation with the advisory board
and the electrical board created under RCW 19.28.311, adopt reasonable
rules as are necessary to adequately coordinate the regulation of both
the plumbing and electrical aspects of domestic well water system
specialty plumbing.
(2) In adopting the rules as required under subsection (1) of this
section, the department shall establish, and seek the advice of, a
technical advisory committee. The technical advisory committee is
composed of at least five persons, appointed by the director from a
list of at least eight nominees supplied by a statewide organization of
persons engaged in the business of installing, maintaining, and
repairing domestic well water systems as described in RCW
18.106.010(10)(c).
(3) In adopting the rules required under subsection (1) of this
section, the department may provide for: (a) Categories of domestic
well water systems differentiating on the basis of pump capacity,
sizing, or other basis as the department may deem appropriate; and (b)
an alternative method of demonstrating the electrical and plumbing
competency of any person who has been actively, continually, and
primarily engaged in the business of installing, maintaining, and
repairing domestic well water systems during the twenty-four months
prior to the effective date of this section.
(4) The department shall refund any penalty paid by and rescind any
citation issued to a person for failing to be properly licensed under
RCW 19.28.010 if:
(a) The citation is issued on or after the effective date of this
section to a person installing, maintaining, or repairing electrical
components of a domestic well water system as defined in RCW
18.106.010(10)(c);
(b) The person receiving the citation timely appeals the citation
pursuant to RCW 19.28.131; and
(c) The person appealing the citation is issued, within one year of
the effective date of the rules adopted under this section, a
certificate of competency as a specialty plumber for the installation,
maintenance, and repair of the pressurization and filtration components
of a domestic well water system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.106 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation,
or other entity to advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, engage
in, conduct, or carry on the business of installing or maintaining
wires or equipment to convey electric current, or installing or
maintaining equipment to be operated by electric current as it pertains
to any domestic well water system, as described in RCW
18.106.010(10)(c), without having an unrevoked, unsuspended, and
unexpired: (a) Electrical contractor license as required by RCW
19.28.041 and a certificate of competency as a master journeyman
electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty residential
electrician, specialty residential electrician, or a properly
supervised electrical trainee, as required by RCW 19.28.161; or (b)
certificate of competency as a domestic well water system specialty
plumber issued by the department in accordance with this chapter.
(2) It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation,
or other entity to advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, engage
in, conduct, or carry on the business of plumbing, as defined in RCW
18.106.010, pertaining to any domestic well water system, as described
in RCW 18.106.010(10)(c), without having an unrevoked, unsuspended, and
unexpired: (a) Certificate of competency as a journeyman plumber,
specialty plumber, properly supervised plumbing trainee, or temporary
permit, as required by RCW 18.106.020, and provided in RCW 18.106.070;
or (b) certificate of competency as a domestic well water system
specialty plumber issued by the department in accordance with this
chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 19.28.041 and 2002 c 249 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided by section 6 of this act, it is unlawful for
any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity to engage
in, conduct, or carry on the business of installing or maintaining
wires or equipment to convey electric current, or installing or
maintaining equipment to be operated by electric current as it pertains
to the electrical industry, without having an unrevoked, unsuspended,
and unexpired electrical contractor license, issued by the department
in accordance with this chapter. All electrical contractor licenses
expire twenty-four calendar months following the day of their issue.
The department may issue an electrical contractors license for a period
of less than twenty-four months only for the purpose of equalizing the
number of electrical contractor licenses that expire each month.
Application for an electrical contractor license shall be made in
writing to the department, accompanied by the required fee. The
application shall state:
(a) The name and address of the applicant; in case of firms or
partnerships, the names of the individuals composing the firm or
partnership; in case of corporations, the names of the managing
officials thereof;
(b) The location of the place of business of the applicant and the
name under which the business is conducted;
(c) Employer social security number;
(d) Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's
employees working in Washington, as follows:
(i) The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by
the department;
(ii) The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department;
or
(iii) For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada
subject to an agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as
permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of coverage issued by
the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the
applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant
has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or
province's workers' compensation law;
(e) Employment security department number;
(f) State excise tax registration number;
(g) Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be
substituted for the information required by (d) of this subsection if
the applicant will not employ employees in Washington, and by (e) and
(f) of this subsection; and
(h) Whether a general or specialty electrical contractor license is
sought and, if the latter, the type of specialty. Electrical
contractor specialties include, but are not limited to: Residential,
pump and irrigation, limited energy system, signs, nonresidential
maintenance, restricted nonresidential maintenance, appliance repair,
and a combination specialty. A general electrical contractor license
shall grant to the holder the right to engage in, conduct, or carry on
the business of installing or maintaining wires or equipment to carry
electric current, and installing or maintaining equipment, or
installing or maintaining material to fasten or insulate such wires or
equipment to be operated by electric current, in the state of
Washington. A specialty electrical contractor license shall grant to
the holder a limited right to engage in, conduct, or carry on the
business of installing or maintaining wires or equipment to carry
electrical current, and installing or maintaining equipment; or
installing or maintaining material to fasten or insulate such wires or
equipment to be operated by electric current in the state of Washington
as expressly allowed by the license.
(2) The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage
information provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(d) of this
section, including but not limited to information regarding the
coverage of an individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is
provided under the laws of another state, the department may notify the
other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.
(3) The application for an electrical contractor license shall be
accompanied by a bond in the sum of four thousand dollars with the
state of Washington named as obligee in the bond, with good and
sufficient surety, to be approved by the department. The bond shall at
all times be kept in full force and effect, and any cancellation or
revocation thereof, or withdrawal of the surety therefrom, suspends the
license issued to the principal until a new bond has been filed and
approved as provided in this section. Upon approval of a bond, the
department shall on the next business day deposit the fee accompanying
the application in the electrical license fund and shall file the bond
in the office. The department shall upon request furnish to any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity a certified
copy of the bond upon the payment of a fee that the department shall
set by rule. The fee shall cover but not exceed the cost of furnishing
the certified copy. The bond shall be conditioned that in any
installation or maintenance of wires or equipment to convey electrical
current, and equipment to be operated by electrical current, the
principal will comply with the provisions of this chapter and with any
electrical ordinance, building code, or regulation of a city or town
adopted pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3) that is in effect at the time of
entering into a contract. The bond shall be conditioned further that
the principal will pay for all labor, including employee benefits, and
material furnished or used upon the work, taxes and contributions to
the state of Washington, and all damages that may be sustained by any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity due to a
failure of the principal to make the installation or maintenance in
accordance with this chapter or any applicable ordinance, building
code, or regulation of a city or town adopted pursuant to RCW
19.28.010(3). In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the
license applicant may file with the department a cash deposit or other
negotiable security acceptable to the department. If the license
applicant has filed a cash deposit, the department shall deposit the
funds in a special trust savings account in a commercial bank, mutual
savings bank, or savings and loan association and shall pay annually to
the depositor the interest derived from the account.
(4) The department shall issue general or specialty electrical
contractor licenses to applicants meeting all of the requirements of
this chapter. The provisions of this chapter relating to the licensing
of any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
including the requirement of a bond with the state of Washington named
as obligee therein and the collection of a fee therefor, are exclusive,
and no political subdivision of the state of Washington may require or
issue any licenses or bonds or charge any fee for the same or a similar
purpose. No person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
holding more than one specialty contractor license under this chapter
may be required to pay an annual fee for more than one such license or
to post more than one four thousand dollar bond, equivalent cash
deposit, or other negotiable security.
(5) To obtain a general or specialty electrical contractor license
the applicant must designate an individual who currently possesses a
valid master journeyman electrician's certificate of competency, master
specialty electrician's certificate of competency in the specialty for
which application has been made, or administrator's certificate as a
general electrical contractor administrator or as a specialty
electrical contractor administrator in the specialty for which
application has been made.
(6) Administrator certificate specialties include but are not
limited to: Residential, pump and irrigation, limited energy system,
signs, nonresidential maintenance, restricted nonresidential
maintenance, appliance repair, and combination specialty. To obtain an
administrator's certificate an individual must pass an examination as
set forth in RCW 19.28.051 unless the applicant was a licensed
electrical contractor at any time during 1974. Applicants who were
electrical contractors licensed by the state of Washington at any time
during 1974 are entitled to receive a general electrical contractor
administrator's certificate without examination if the applicants apply
prior to January 1, 1984. The board of electrical examiners shall
certify to the department the names of all persons who are entitled to
either a general or specialty electrical contractor administrator's
certificate.

--- END ---