BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington's
performance-based education system should seek not only to provide
fundamental academic knowledge and skills for all students, but also
provide the opportunity for students to acquire knowledge and skills
likely to contribute to their own economic well-being and that of their
families and communities.
(2) The legislature recognizes that although career and technical
options are available for students, other credit and course-oriented
graduation requirements beyond those necessary to assure students meet
fundamental academic standards may be prohibiting students from
pursuing a high quality career and technical education pathway.
(3) Furthermore, not enough high schools or school districts take
advantage of their opportunity to offer course credits, including
credits toward graduation requirements, for knowledge and skills in
fundamental academic content areas that students gain in career and
technical education courses.
(4) Therefore the legislature intends to create a rigorous and high
quality career and technical high school graduation option that assures
students meet state standards in fundamental academic content areas,
reflects nationally recognized standards for the knowledge and skills
needed to pursue employment and careers in technical fields, and
provides students with flexibility in other areas such as social
studies, health and fitness, or the arts. It is the legislature's
intent that the career and technical education within the new
graduation option be extensive and reflective of a significant,
multiyear commitment by the student.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Each high school or school district board of directors shall
adopt course equivalencies for career and technical high school courses
offered to students at the high school. A career and technical course
equivalency may be for whole or partial credit. Each school district
board of directors shall develop a course equivalency approval
procedure.
(2) Career and technical courses determined to be equivalent to
academic core courses, in full or in part, by the high school or school
district shall be accepted as meeting core requirements, including
graduation requirements, if the courses are recorded on the student's
transcript using the equivalent academic high school department
designation and title. Full or partial credit shall be recorded as
appropriate.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2005 c 205 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except those
equivalencies established by local high schools or school districts
under section 2 of this act.
(a) The board shall establish a career and technical high school
graduation option that:
(i) Requires completion of coursework in the fundamental academic
content areas necessary to prepare students to obtain the certificate
of academic achievement under RCW 28A.655.061;
(ii) Requires completion of a career and technical education
program approved by the superintendent of public instruction under
section 5 of this act and attainment of the nationally recognized
certificate or credential associated with the program; and
(iii) May contain other course requirements, but shall permit
students to not meet all of the state standards in content areas not
assessed by the Washington assessment of student learning so that
students may focus on completing the requirements under (a)(i) and (ii)
of this subsection.
(b) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(((b))) (c) The certificate of academic achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement
requirements under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a
public high school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(((c))) (d) Any decision on whether a student has met the state
board's high school graduation requirements for a high school and
beyond plan shall remain at the local level.
(2) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of
education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.230.100 and 1991 c 116 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state board of education shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter
34.05 RCW, to implement the course requirements set forth in RCW
28A.230.090, including the career and technical high school graduation
option. The rules shall include, as the state board deems necessary,
granting equivalencies for and temporary exemptions from the course
requirements in RCW 28A.230.090 and special alterations of the course
requirements in RCW 28A.230.090. In developing such rules the state
board shall recognize the relevance of vocational and applied courses
and allow such courses to fulfill in whole or in part the courses
required for graduation in RCW 28A.230.090, as determined by the high
school or school district in accordance with section 2 of this act.
The rules may include provisions for competency testing in lieu of such
courses required for graduation in RCW 28A.230.090 or demonstration of
specific skill proficiency or understanding of concepts through work or
experience.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28C.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall develop a list of
approved career and technical education programs that qualify for the
high school graduation option under RCW 28A.230.090. Programs on the
list must meet the following minimum criteria:
(1) Lead to a certificate or credential that is state or nationally
recognized by trades, industries, or other professional associations as
necessary for employment or advancement in that field;
(2) Require a sequenced progression of multiple courses, both
exploratory and preparatory, that are vocationally intensive and
rigorous; and
(3) Have a high potential for providing the program completer with
gainful employment or entry into a postsecondary work force training
program.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.225.290 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 207 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall prepare and
annually distribute an information booklet outlining parents' and
guardians' enrollment options for their children.
(2) Before the 1991-92 school year, the booklet shall be
distributed to all school districts by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction. School districts shall have a copy of the
information booklet available for public inspection at each school in
the district, at the district office, and in public libraries.
(3) The booklet shall include:
(a) Information about enrollment options and program opportunities,
including but not limited to programs in RCW 28A.225.220, 28A.185.040,
28A.225.200 through 28A.225.215, 28A.225.230 through 28A.225.250,
((28A.175.090,)) 28A.340.010 through 28A.340.070 (small high school
cooperative projects), and 28A.335.160((.));
(b) Information about the running start ((- community college or
vocational-technical institute choice)) high school and college dual
enrollment program under RCW 28A.600.300 through ((28A.600.395))
28A.600.400; ((and))
(c) Information about the seventh and eighth grade choice program
under RCW 28A.230.090; and
(d) Information about high school graduation requirements,
including the career and technical high school graduation option under
RCW 28A.230.090.

--- END ---