BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 21.20.320 and 1998 c 15 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following transactions are exempt from RCW 21.20.040 through
21.20.300 and 21.20.327 except as expressly provided:
(1) Any isolated transaction, or sales not involving a public
offering, whether effected through a broker-dealer or not; or any
transaction effected in accordance with any rule by the director
establishing a nonpublic offering exemption pursuant to this subsection
where registration is not necessary or appropriate in the public
interest or for the protection of investors.
(2) Any nonissuer transaction by a registered salesperson of a
registered broker-dealer, and any resale transaction by a sponsor of a
unit investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of
1940 pursuant to any rule adopted by the director.
(3) Any nonissuer transaction effected by or through a registered
broker-dealer pursuant to an unsolicited order or offer to buy; but the
director may by rule require that the customer acknowledge upon a
specified form that the sale was unsolicited, and that a signed copy of
each such form be preserved by the broker-dealer for a specified
period.
(4) Any transaction between the issuer or other person on whose
behalf the offering is made and an underwriter, or among underwriters.
(5) Any transaction in a bond or other evidence of indebtedness
secured by a real or chattel mortgage or deed of trust, or by an
agreement for the sale of real estate or chattels, if the entire
mortgage, deed of trust, or agreement, together with all the bonds or
other evidences of indebtedness secured thereby, is offered and sold as
a unit. A bond or other evidence of indebtedness is not offered and
sold as a unit if the transaction involves:
(a) A partial interest in one or more bonds or other evidences of
indebtedness secured by a real or chattel mortgage or deed of trust, or
by an agreement for the sale of real estate or chattels; or
(b) One of multiple bonds or other evidences of indebtedness
secured by one or more real or chattel mortgages or deeds of trust, or
agreements for the sale of real estate or chattels, sold to more than
one purchaser as part of a single plan of financing; or
(c) A security including an investment contract other than the bond
or other evidence of indebtedness.
(6) Any transaction by an executor, administrator, sheriff,
marshal, receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, guardian, or conservator.
(7) Any transaction executed by a bona fide pledgee without any
purpose of evading this chapter.
(8) Any offer or sale to a bank, savings institution, trust
company, insurance company, investment company as defined in the
Investment Company Act of 1940, pension or profit-sharing trust, or
other financial institution or institutional buyer, or to a broker-dealer, whether the purchaser is acting for itself or in some fiduciary
capacity.
(9) Any transaction effected in accordance with the terms and
conditions of any rule adopted by the director if:
(a) The aggregate offering amount does not exceed five million
dollars; and
(b) The director finds that registration is not necessary in the
public interest and for the protection of investors.
(10) Any offer or sale of a preorganization certificate or
subscription if (a) no commission or other remuneration is paid or
given directly or indirectly for soliciting any prospective subscriber,
(b) the number of subscribers does not exceed ten, and (c) no payment
is made by any subscriber.
(11) Any transaction pursuant to an offer to existing security
holders of the issuer, including persons who at the time of the
transaction are holders of convertible securities, nontransferable
warrants, or transferable warrants exercisable within not more than
ninety days of their issuance, if (a) no commission or other
remuneration (other than a standby commission) is paid or given
directly or indirectly for soliciting any security holder in this
state, or (b) the issuer first files a notice specifying the terms of
the offer and the director does not by order disallow the exemption
within the next five full business days.
(12) Any offer (but not a sale) of a security for which
registration statements have been filed under both this chapter and the
Securities Act of 1933 if no stop order or refusal order is in effect
and no public proceeding or examination looking toward such an order is
pending under either act.
(13) The issuance of any stock dividend, whether the corporation
distributing the dividend is the issuer of the stock or not, if nothing
of value is given by stockholders for the distribution other than the
surrender of a right to a cash dividend where the stockholder can elect
to take a dividend in cash or stock.
(14) Any transaction incident to a right of conversion or a
statutory or judicially approved reclassification, recapitalization,
reorganization, quasi reorganization, stock split, reverse stock split,
merger, consolidation, or sale of assets.
(15) The offer or sale by a registered broker-dealer, or a person
exempted from the registration requirements pursuant to RCW 21.20.040,
acting either as principal or agent, of securities previously sold and
distributed to the public: PROVIDED, That:
(a) Such securities are sold at prices reasonably related to the
current market price thereof at the time of sale, and, if such broker-dealer is acting as agent, the commission collected by such broker-dealer on account of the sale thereof is not in excess of usual and
customary commissions collected with respect to securities and
transactions having comparable characteristics;
(b) Such securities do not constitute the whole or a part of an
unsold allotment to or subscription or participation by such broker-dealer as an underwriter of such securities or as a participant in the
distribution of such securities by the issuer, by an underwriter or by
a person or group of persons in substantial control of the issuer or of
the outstanding securities of the class being distributed; and
(c) The security has been lawfully sold and distributed in this
state or any other state of the United States under this or any act
regulating the sale of such securities.
(16) Any transaction by a mutual or cooperative association meeting
the requirements of (a) and (b) of this subsection:
(a) The transaction:
(i) Does not involve advertising or public solicitation; or
(ii) Involves advertising or public solicitation, and:
(A) The association first files a notice of claim of exemption on
a form prescribed by the director specifying the terms of the offer and
the director does not by order deny the exemption within the next ten
full business days; or
(B) The association is an employee cooperative and identifies
itself as an employee cooperative in advertising or public
solicitation.
(b) The transaction involves an instrument or interest, that:
(i)(A) Qualifies its holder to be a member or patron of the
association;
(B) Represents a contribution of capital to the association by a
person who is or intends to become a member or patron of the
association;
(C) Represents a patronage dividend or other patronage allocation;
or
(D) Represents the terms or conditions by which a member or patron
purchases, sells, or markets products, commodities, or services from,
to, or through the association; and
(ii) Is nontransferable except in the case of death, operation of
law, bona fide transfer for security purposes only to the association,
a bank, or other financial institution, intrafamily transfer, ((or))
transfer to an existing member or person who will become a member, or
transfer by gift to a nonprofit entity and, in the case of an
instrument, so states conspicuously on its face.
(17) Any transaction effected in accordance with any rule adopted
by the director establishing a limited offering exemption which
furthers objectives of compatibility with federal exemptions and
uniformity among the states, provided that in adopting any such rule
the director may require that no commission or other remuneration be
paid or given to any person, directly or indirectly, for effecting
sales unless the person is registered under this chapter as a broker-dealer or salesperson.

--- END ---