BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2005 c 518 s 963 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--((WPEA)) PSE/PROFESSIONAL ((LOCAL
365 UNIT C)) TECHNICAL EMPLOYEES--WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY.
Budget amounts reflect the collective bargaining agreement reached
between the Western Washington University and the public school
employees of Washington ((Public Employees Association bargaining unit
C)) professional technical employees under the personnel system reform
act of 2002. For employees covered under this agreement, provisions
include a 3.2% salary increase effective retroactive to July 1, 2005.
Provisions also include a 1.6% increase effective July 1, 2006, until
June 30, 2007, and for implementation of the department of personnel
2002 salary survey for classes more than 25% below market rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---