BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.09.184 and 1991 c 367 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) OBJECTIVES. The objectives of the permanent parenting plan are
to:
(a) Provide for the child's physical care;
(b) Maintain the child's emotional stability;
(c) Provide for the child's changing needs as the child grows and
matures, in a way that minimizes the need for future modifications to
the permanent parenting plan;
(d) Set forth the authority and responsibilities of each parent
with respect to the child, consistent with the criteria in RCW
26.09.187 and 26.09.191;
(e) Minimize the child's exposure to harmful parental conflict;
(f) Encourage the parents, where appropriate under RCW 26.09.187
and 26.09.191, to meet their responsibilities to their minor children
through agreements in the permanent parenting plan, rather than by
relying on judicial intervention; and
(g) To otherwise protect the best interests of the child consistent
with RCW 26.09.002.
(2) CONTENTS OF THE PERMANENT PARENTING PLAN. The permanent
parenting plan shall contain provisions for resolution of future
disputes between the parents, allocation of decision-making authority,
and residential provisions for the child.
(3) CONSIDERATION IN ESTABLISHING THE PERMANENT PARENTING PLAN. In
establishing a permanent parenting plan, the court shall consider the
cultural heritage and religious beliefs of a child.
(4) DISPUTE RESOLUTION. A process for resolving disputes, other
than court action, shall be provided unless precluded or limited by RCW
26.09.187 or 26.09.191. A dispute resolution process may include
counseling, mediation, or arbitration by a specified individual or
agency, or court action. In the dispute resolution process:
(a) Preference shall be given to carrying out the parenting plan;
(b) The parents shall use the designated process to resolve
disputes relating to implementation of the plan, except those related
to financial support, unless an emergency exists;
(c) A written record shall be prepared of any agreement reached in
counseling or mediation and of each arbitration award and shall be
provided to each party;
(d) If the court finds that a parent has used or frustrated the
dispute resolution process without good reason, the court shall award
attorneys' fees and financial sanctions to the prevailing parent;
(e) The parties have the right of review from the dispute
resolution process to the superior court; and
(f) The provisions of (a) through (e) of this subsection shall be
set forth in the decree.
(((4))) (5) ALLOCATION OF DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY.
(a) The plan shall allocate decision-making authority to one or
both parties regarding the children's education, health care, and
religious upbringing. The parties may incorporate an agreement related
to the care and growth of the child in these specified areas, or in
other areas, into their plan, consistent with the criteria in RCW
26.09.187 and 26.09.191. Regardless of the allocation of decision-
making in the parenting plan, either parent may make emergency
decisions affecting the health or safety of the child.
(b) Each parent may make decisions regarding the day-to-day care
and control of the child while the child is residing with that parent.
(c) When mutual decision making is designated but cannot be
achieved, the parties shall make a good-faith effort to resolve the
issue through the dispute resolution process.
(((5))) (6) RESIDENTIAL PROVISIONS FOR THE CHILD. The plan shall
include a residential schedule which designates in which parent's home
each minor child shall reside on given days of the year, including
provision for holidays, birthdays of family members, vacations, and
other special occasions, consistent with the criteria in RCW 26.09.187
and 26.09.191.
(((6))) (7) PARENTS' OBLIGATION UNAFFECTED. If a parent fails to
comply with a provision of a parenting plan or a child support order,
the other parent's obligations under the parenting plan or the child
support order are not affected. Failure to comply with a provision in
a parenting plan or a child support order may result in a finding of
contempt of court, under RCW 26.09.160.
(((7))) (8) PROVISIONS TO BE SET FORTH IN PERMANENT PARENTING PLAN.
The permanent parenting plan shall set forth the provisions of
subsections (((3))) (4)(a) through (c), (((4))) (5) (b) and (c), and
(((6))) (7) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.09.015 and 2005 c 172 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In any proceeding under this chapter, the matter may be set for
mediation of the contested issues before or concurrent with the setting
of the matter for hearing. The purpose of the mediation proceeding
shall be to reduce acrimony which may exist between the parties and to
develop an agreement assuring the child's close and continuing contact
with both parents after the marriage is dissolved. The mediator shall
use his or her best efforts to effect a settlement of the dispute.
(2) Each superior court may make available a mediator. The
mediator may be a member of the professional staff of a family court or
mental health services agency, or may be any other person or agency
designated by the court. In order to provide mediation services, the
court is not required to institute a family court.
(3)(a) Mediation proceedings under this chapter shall be governed
in all respects by chapter 7.07 RCW, except as follows:
(i) Mediation communications in postdecree mediations mandated by
a parenting plan are admissible in subsequent proceedings for the
limited purpose of proving:
(A) Abuse, neglect, abandonment, exploitation, or unlawful
harassment as defined in RCW 9A.46.020(1), of a child;
(B) Abuse or unlawful harassment as defined in RCW 9A.46.020(1), of
a family or household member as defined in RCW 26.50.010(2); or
(C) That a parent used or frustrated the dispute resolution process
without good reason for purposes of RCW 26.09.184(((3))) (4)(d).
(ii) If a postdecree mediation-arbitration proceeding is required
pursuant to a parenting plan and the same person acts as both mediator
and arbitrator, mediation communications in the mediation phase of such
a proceeding may be admitted during the arbitration phase, and shall be
admissible in the judicial review of such a proceeding under RCW
26.09.184(((3))) (4)(e) to the extent necessary for such review to be
effective.
(b) None of the exceptions under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection
shall subject a mediator to compulsory process to testify except by
court order for good cause shown, taking into consideration the need
for the mediator's testimony and the interest in the mediator
maintaining an appearance of impartiality. If a mediation
communication is not privileged under (a)(i) of this subsection or that
portion of (a)(ii) of this subsection pertaining to judicial review,
only the portion of the communication necessary for the application of
the exception may be admitted, and such admission of evidence shall not
render any other mediation communication discoverable or admissible
except as may be provided in chapter 7.07 RCW.
(4) The mediator shall assess the needs and interests of the child
or children involved in the controversy and may interview the child or
children if the mediator deems such interview appropriate or necessary.
(5) Any agreement reached by the parties as a result of mediation
shall be reported to the court and to counsel for the parties by the
mediator on the day set for mediation or any time thereafter designated
by the court.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.09.187 and 1989 c 375 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESS. The court shall not order a
dispute resolution process, except court action, when it finds that any
limiting factor under RCW 26.09.191 applies, or when it finds that
either parent is unable to afford the cost of the proposed dispute
resolution process. If a dispute resolution process is not precluded
or limited, then in designating such a process the court shall consider
all relevant factors, including:
(a) Differences between the parents that would substantially
inhibit their effective participation in any designated process;
(b) The parents' wishes or agreements and, if the parents have
entered into agreements, whether the agreements were made knowingly and
voluntarily; and
(c) Differences in the parents' financial circumstances that may
affect their ability to participate fully in a given dispute resolution
process.
(2) ALLOCATION OF DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY.
(a) AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE PARTIES. The court shall approve
agreements of the parties allocating decision-making authority, or
specifying rules in the areas listed in RCW 26.09.184(((4))) (5)(a),
when it finds that:
(i) The agreement is consistent with any limitations on a parent's
decision-making authority mandated by RCW 26.09.191; and
(ii) The agreement is knowing and voluntary.
(b) SOLE DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY. The court shall order sole
decision-making to one parent when it finds that:
(i) A limitation on the other parent's decision-making authority is
mandated by RCW 26.09.191;
(ii) Both parents are opposed to mutual decision making;
(iii) One parent is opposed to mutual decision making, and such
opposition is reasonable based on the criteria in (c) of this
subsection;
(c) MUTUAL DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY. Except as provided in (a)
and (b) of this subsection, the court shall consider the following
criteria in allocating decision-making authority:
(i) The existence of a limitation under RCW 26.09.191;
(ii) The history of participation of each parent in decision making
in each of the areas in RCW 26.09.184(((4))) (5)(a);
(iii) Whether the parents have a demonstrated ability and desire to
cooperate with one another in decision making in each of the areas in
RCW 26.09.184(((4))) (5)(a); and
(iv) The parents' geographic proximity to one another, to the
extent that it affects their ability to make timely mutual decisions.
(3) RESIDENTIAL PROVISIONS.
(a) The court shall make residential provisions for each child
which encourage each parent to maintain a loving, stable, and nurturing
relationship with the child, consistent with the child's developmental
level and the family's social and economic circumstances. The child's
residential schedule shall be consistent with RCW 26.09.191. Where the
limitations of RCW 26.09.191 are not dispositive of the child's
residential schedule, the court shall consider the following factors:
(i) The relative strength, nature, and stability of the child's
relationship with each parent, including whether a parent has taken
greater responsibility for performing parenting functions relating to
the daily needs of the child;
(ii) The agreements of the parties, provided they were entered into
knowingly and voluntarily;
(iii) Each parent's past and potential for future performance of
parenting functions;
(iv) The emotional needs and developmental level of the child;
(v) The child's relationship with siblings and with other
significant adults, as well as the child's involvement with his or her
physical surroundings, school, or other significant activities;
(vi) The wishes of the parents and the wishes of a child who is
sufficiently mature to express reasoned and independent preferences as
to his or her residential schedule; and
(vii) Each parent's employment schedule, and shall make
accommodations consistent with those schedules.
Factor (i) shall be given the greatest weight.
(b) The court may order that a child frequently alternate his or
her residence between the households of the parents for brief and
substantially equal intervals of time only if the court finds the
following:
(i) No limitation exists under RCW 26.09.191;
(ii)(A) The parties have agreed to such provisions and the
agreement was knowingly and voluntarily entered into; or
(B) The parties have a satisfactory history of cooperation and
shared performance of parenting functions; the parties are available to
each other, especially in geographic proximity, to the extent necessary
to ensure their ability to share performance of the parenting
functions; and
(iii) The provisions are in the best interests of the child.

--- END ---