BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.25.010 and 2005 c 325 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Alcohol" means any substance containing any form of alcohol,
including but not limited to ethanol, methanol, propanol, and
isopropanol.
(2) "Alcohol concentration" means:
(a) The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of
blood; or
(b) The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of
breath.
(3) "Commercial driver's license" (CDL) means a license issued in
accordance with the requirements of this chapter to an individual that
authorizes the individual to drive a class of commercial motor vehicle.
(4) The "commercial driver's license information system" (CDLIS) is
the information system established pursuant to the CMVSA to serve as a
clearinghouse for locating information related to the licensing and
identification of commercial motor vehicle drivers.
(5) "Commercial driver's instruction permit" means a permit issued
under RCW 46.25.060(5).
(6) "Commercial motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle ((designed))
or combination of motor vehicles used in commerce to transport
passengers or property if the motor vehicle:
(a) ((If the vehicle)) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of
((26,001 or more pounds)) 11,794 kilograms or more (26,001 pounds or
more) inclusive of a towed unit with a gross vehicle weight rating of
more than 4,536 kilograms (10,000 pounds or more); or
(b) ((If the vehicle is designed to transport sixteen or more
passengers, including the driver)) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of
11,794 kilograms or more (26,001 pounds or more); or
(c) ((If the vehicle is transporting hazardous materials as defined
in this section)) Is designed to transport sixteen or more passengers,
including the driver; or
(d) ((If the vehicle)) Is of any size and is used in the
transportation of hazardous materials as defined in this section; or
(e) Is a school bus regardless of weight or size.
(7) "Conviction" has the definition set forth in RCW 46.20.270.
(8) "Disqualification" means a prohibition against driving a
commercial motor vehicle.
(9) "Drive" means to drive, operate, or be in physical control of
a motor vehicle in any place open to the general public for purposes of
vehicular traffic. For purposes of RCW 46.25.100, 46.25.110, and
46.25.120, "drive" includes operation or physical control of a motor
vehicle anywhere in the state.
(10) "Drugs" are those substances as defined by RCW 69.04.009,
including, but not limited to, those substances defined by 49 C.F.R.
40.3.
(11) "Employer" means any person, including the United States, a
state, or a political subdivision of a state, who owns or leases a
commercial motor vehicle, or assigns a person to drive a commercial
motor vehicle.
(12) "Gross vehicle weight rating" (GVWR) means the value specified
by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded weight of a single ((or a
combination or articulated vehicle, or the registered gross weight,
where this value cannot be determined)) vehicle. The GVWR of a
combination or articulated vehicle, commonly referred to as the "gross
combined weight rating" or GCWR, is the GVWR of the power unit plus the
GVWR of the towed unit or units. If the GVWR of any unit cannot be
determined, the actual gross weight will be used. If a vehicle with a
GVWR of less than 11,794 kilograms (26,001 pounds or less) has been
structurally modified to carry a heavier load, then the actual gross
weight capacity of the modified vehicle, as determined by RCW 46.44.041
and 46.44.042, will be used as the GVWR.
(13) "Hazardous materials" means any material that has been
designated as hazardous under 49 U.S.C. Sec. 5103 and is required to be
placarded under subpart F of 49 C.F.R. part 172 or any quantity of a
material listed as a select agent or toxin in 42 C.F.R. part 73.
(14) "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or
semitrailer propelled or drawn by mechanical power used on highways, or
any other vehicle required to be registered under the laws of this
state, but does not include a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or
semitrailer operated exclusively on a rail.
(15) "Out-of-service order" means a temporary prohibition against
driving a commercial motor vehicle.
(16) "Positive alcohol confirmation test" means an alcohol
confirmation test that:
(a) Has been conducted by a breath alcohol technician under 49
C.F.R. 40; and
(b) Indicates an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more.
A report that a person has refused an alcohol test, under
circumstances that constitute the refusal of an alcohol test under 49
C.F.R. 40, will be considered equivalent to a report of a positive
alcohol confirmation test for the purposes of this chapter.
(17) "School bus" means a commercial motor vehicle used to
transport preprimary, primary, or secondary school students from home
to school, from school to home, or to and from school-sponsored events.
School bus does not include a bus used as a common carrier.
(18) "Serious traffic violation" means:
(a) Excessive speeding, defined as fifteen miles per hour or more
in excess of the posted limit;
(b) Reckless driving, as defined under state or local law;
(c) A violation of a state or local law relating to motor vehicle
traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection
with an accident or collision resulting in death to any person;
(d) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without obtaining a
commercial driver's license;
(e) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without a commercial
driver's license in the driver's possession; however, any individual
who provides proof to the court by the date the individual must appear
in court or pay any fine for such a violation, that the individual held
a valid CDL on the date the citation was issued, is not guilty of a
"serious traffic offense";
(f) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without the proper class of
commercial driver's license endorsement or endorsements for the
specific vehicle group being operated or for the passenger or type of
cargo being transported; and
(g) Any other violation of a state or local law relating to motor
vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, that the
department determines by rule to be serious.
(19) "State" means a state of the United States and the District of
Columbia.
(20) "Substance abuse professional" means an alcohol and drug
specialist meeting the credentials, knowledge, training, and continuing
education requirements of 49 C.F.R. 40.281.
(21) "Tank vehicle" means a vehicle that is designed to transport
a liquid or gaseous material within a tank that is either permanently
or temporarily attached to the vehicle or the chassis. Tank vehicles
include, but are not limited to cargo tanks and portable tanks.
However, this definition does not include portable tanks having a rated
capacity under one thousand gallons.
(22) "United States" means the fifty states and the District of
Columbia.
(23) "Verified positive drug test" means a drug test result or
validity testing result from a laboratory certified under the authority
of the federal department of health and human services that:
(a) Indicates a drug concentration at or above the cutoff
concentration established under 49 C.F.R. 40.87; and
(b) Has undergone review and final determination by a medical
review officer.
A report that a person has refused a drug test, under circumstances
that constitute the refusal of a federal department of transportation
drug test under 49 C.F.R. 40, will be considered equivalent to a report
of a verified positive drug test for the purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.32.005 and 1993 c 403 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of this chapter "commercial motor vehicle" means a
self-propelled or towed vehicle ((designed or)) used on a highway in
interstate or intrastate commerce to transport passengers or property,
((if)) when the vehicle:
(1) Has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination weight
rating ((of ten thousand one or more pounds)) or gross weight or gross
combination weight of 4,536 kilograms or more (10,001 pounds or more);
or
(2) Is designed or used to transport ((sixteen or)) more than eight
passengers, including the driver, for compensation; or
(3) ((Is transporting hazardous materials and is required to be
identified by a placard in accordance with 49 C.F.R. Sec. 172.500-.560
(1991).)) Is designed or used to transport more than fifteen
passengers, including the driver, and is not used to transport
passengers for compensation; or
(4) Is used in transporting materials found by the secretary of
transportation to be hazardous under 49 U.S.C. Sec. 5103 and
transported in a quantity requiring placarding under regulations
prescribed by the secretary under 49 C.F.R., subtitle B, Chapter I,
subchapter C.
A recreational vehicle used for noncommercial purposes is not
considered a commercial motor vehicle. "Recreational vehicle" includes
a vehicle towing a horse trailer for a noncommercial purpose.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.37.395 and 2005 c 320 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies to all motor vehicles with a ((declared
gross weight in excess of 10,000 pounds)) gross vehicle weight rating
of 4,536 kilograms or more (10,001 pounds or more), registered and
domiciled in Washington state, operated on public roads and equipped
with engine compression brake devices. An engine compression brake
device is any device that uses the engine and transmission to impede
the forward motion of the motor vehicle by compression of the engine.
(2) The driver of a motor vehicle equipped with a device that uses
the compression of the motor vehicle engine shall not use the device
unless:
(((a))) The motor vehicle is equipped with an operational muffler
and exhaust system to prevent excess noise. ((The muffler and exhaust
system must maintain the noise level at eighty-three decibels or less
for motor vehicles manufactured after January 1, 1979, and eighty
decibels or less for motor vehicles manufactured after January 1, 1988;
or
(b) The driver reasonably believes that an emergency exists which
requires the use of the device to: (i) Protect against an immediate
threat to the physical safety of the driver or others; (ii) protect
against immediate threat of damage to property; or (iii) effectively
reduce the speed of the motor vehicle using the manufacturer's motor
vehicle braking system when declining from an elevated roadway)) A
muffler is part of an engine exhaust system which acts as a noise
dissipative device. A turbocharger is not permitted to be used as a
muffler or a noise dissipative device.
(3) The monetary penalty for violating subsection (2) of this
section is: (a) Two hundred fifty dollars for the first violation; (b)
five hundred dollars for the second violation; and (c) seven hundred
fifty dollars for each violation thereafter.
(4) ((The Washington state patrol must establish rules for
Washington state law enforcement agencies to enforce subsection (2) of
this section.
(5))) All medium and heavy trucks must comply with federal code 205
- transportation equipment noise emission controls, subpart B.
(((6))) (5) Nothing in this section prohibits a local jurisdiction
from implementing an ordinance that is more restrictive than the state
law and Washington state patrol rules regarding the use of compression
brakes.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.44.105 and 2002 c 254 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter is a traffic
infraction, and upon the first finding thereof shall be assessed a
basic penalty of not less than fifty dollars; and upon a second finding
thereof shall be assessed a basic penalty of not less than seventy-five
dollars; and upon a third or subsequent finding shall be assessed a
basic penalty of not less than one hundred dollars.
(2) In addition to the penalties imposed in subsection (1) of this
section, any person violating RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047,
46.44.090, 46.44.091, or 46.44.095 shall be assessed a penalty for each
pound overweight, as follows:
(a) One pound through four thousand pounds overweight is three
cents for each pound;
(b) Four thousand one pounds through ten thousand pounds overweight
is one hundred twenty dollars plus twelve cents per pound for each
additional pound over four thousand pounds overweight;
(c) Ten thousand one pounds through fifteen thousand pounds
overweight is eight hundred forty dollars plus sixteen cents per pound
for each additional pound over ten thousand pounds overweight;
(d) Fifteen thousand one pounds through twenty thousand pounds
overweight is one thousand six hundred forty dollars plus twenty cents
per pound for each additional pound over fifteen thousand pounds
overweight;
(e) Twenty thousand one pounds and more is two thousand six hundred
forty dollars plus thirty cents per pound for each additional pound
over twenty thousand pounds overweight.
Upon a first violation in any calendar year, the court may suspend
the penalty for five hundred pounds of excess weight for each axle on
any vehicle or combination of vehicles, not to exceed a two thousand
pound suspension. In no case may the basic penalty assessed in
subsection (1) of this section or the additional penalty assessed in
subsection (2) of this section, except as provided for the first
violation, be suspended.
(3) Whenever any vehicle or combination of vehicles is involved in
two violations of RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.090,
46.44.091, or 46.44.095 during any twelve-month period, the court may
suspend the certificate of license registration of the vehicle or
combination of vehicles for not less than thirty days. Upon a third or
succeeding violation in any twelve-month period, the court shall
suspend the certificate of license registration for not less than
thirty days. Whenever the certificate of license registration is
suspended, the court shall secure such certificate and immediately
forward the same to the director with information concerning the
suspension.
(4) Any person found to have violated any posted limitations of a
highway or section of highway shall be assessed a monetary penalty of
not less than one hundred and fifty dollars, and the court shall in
addition thereto upon second violation within a twelve-month period
involving the same power unit, suspend the certificate of license
registration for not less than thirty days.
(5) It is unlawful for the driver of a vehicle to fail or refuse to
stop and submit the vehicle and load to a weighing, or to fail or
refuse, when directed by an officer upon a weighing of the vehicle to
stop the vehicle and otherwise comply with the provisions of this
section. It is unlawful for a driver of a commercial motor vehicle as
defined in RCW 46.32.005, other than the driver of a bus as defined in
RCW 46.32.005(((2))) (3) or a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight
rating or gross combination weight ((not over sixteen thousand pounds))
rating of 7,257 kilograms or less (16,000 pounds or less) and not
transporting hazardous materials in accordance with RCW
46.32.005(((3))) (4), to fail or refuse to stop at a weighing station
when proper traffic control signs indicate scales are open. However,
unladen tow trucks regardless of weight and farm vehicles carrying farm
produce with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination weight
((not over twenty-six thousand pounds)) rating of 11,794 kilograms or
less (26,000 pounds or less) may fail or refuse to stop at a weighing
station when proper traffic control signs indicate scales are open.
Any police officer is authorized to require the driver of any
vehicle or combination of vehicles to stop and submit to a weighing
either by means of a portable or stationary scale and may require that
the vehicle be driven to the nearest public scale. Whenever a police
officer, upon weighing a vehicle and load, determines that the weight
is unlawful, the officer may require the driver to stop the vehicle in
a suitable location and remain standing until such portion of the load
is removed as may be necessary to reduce the gross weight of the
vehicle to the limit permitted by law. If the vehicle is loaded with
grain or other perishable commodities, the driver shall be permitted to
proceed without removing any of the load, unless the gross weight of
the vehicle and load exceeds by more than ten percent the limit
permitted by this chapter. The owner or operator of the vehicle shall
care for all materials unloaded at the risk of the owner or operator.
Any vehicle whose driver or owner represents that the vehicle is
disabled or otherwise unable to proceed to a weighing location shall
have its load sealed or otherwise marked by any police officer. The
owner or driver shall be directed that upon completion of repairs, the
vehicle shall submit to weighing with the load and markings and/or seal
intact and undisturbed. Failure to report for weighing, appearing for
weighing with the seal broken or the markings disturbed, or removal of
any cargo prior to weighing is unlawful. Any person so convicted shall
be fined one thousand dollars, and in addition the certificate of
license registration shall be suspended for not less than thirty days.
(6) Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding,
district courts having venue have concurrent jurisdiction with the
superior courts for the imposition of any penalties authorized under
this section.
(7) For the purpose of determining additional penalties as provided
by subsection (2) of this section, "overweight" means the poundage in
excess of the maximum allowable gross weight or axle/axle grouping
weight prescribed by RCW 46.44.041, 46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.091,
and 46.44.095.
(8) The penalties provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW or RCW
10.82.070. For the purpose of computing the basic penalties and
additional penalties to be imposed under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, the convictions shall be on the same vehicle or
combination of vehicles within a twelve-month period under the same
ownership.
(9) Any state patrol officer or any weight control officer who
finds any person operating a vehicle or a combination of vehicles in
violation of the conditions of a permit issued under RCW 46.44.047,
46.44.090, and 46.44.095 may confiscate the permit and forward it to
the state department of transportation which may return it to the
permittee or revoke, cancel, or suspend it without refund. The
department of transportation shall keep a record of all action taken
upon permits so confiscated, and if a permit is returned to the
permittee the action taken by the department of transportation shall be
endorsed thereon. Any permittee whose permit is suspended or revoked
may upon request receive a hearing before the department of
transportation or person designated by that department. After the
hearing the department of transportation may reinstate any permit or
revise its previous action.
Every permit issued as provided for in this chapter shall be
carried in the vehicle or combination of vehicles to which it refers
and shall be open to inspection by any law enforcement officer or
authorized agent of any authority granting such a permit.
Upon the third finding within a calendar year of a violation of the
requirements and conditions of a permit issued under RCW 46.44.095, the
permit shall be canceled, and the canceled permit shall be immediately
transmitted by the court or the arresting officer to the department of
transportation. The vehicle covered by the canceled permit is not
eligible for a new permit for a period of thirty days.
(10) For the purposes of determining gross weights the actual scale
weight taken by the arresting officer is prima facie evidence of the
total gross weight.
(11) It is a traffic infraction to direct the loading of a vehicle
with knowledge that it violates the requirements in RCW 46.44.041,
46.44.042, 46.44.047, 46.44.090, 46.44.091, or 46.44.095 and that it is
to be operated on the public highways of this state.
(12) The chief of the state patrol, with the advice of the
department, may adopt reasonable rules to aid in the enforcement of
this section.

--- END ---