BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.240 and 1987 c 330 s 704 and 1987 c 142 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The vehicle license number plates shall be attached conspicuously
at the front and rear of each vehicle for which the same are issued and
in such a manner that they can be plainly seen and read at all times((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, if only one license number plate is legally
issued for any vehicle such plate shall be conspicuously attached to
the rear of such vehicle. Each vehicle license number plate shall be
placed or hung in a horizontal position at a distance of not ((less
than one foot nor)) more than four feet from the ground and shall be
kept clean so as to be plainly seen and read at all times((: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That)). In cases where the body construction of the vehicle
is such that compliance with this section is impossible, permission to
deviate therefrom may be granted by the state patrol. It shall be
unlawful to display upon the front or rear of any vehicle, vehicle
license number plate or plates other than those furnished by the
director for such vehicle or to display upon any vehicle any vehicle
license number plate or plates which have been in any manner changed,
altered, disfigured or have become illegible. License plate frames may
be used on vehicle license number plates only if the frames do not
obscure license tabs or identifying letters or numbers on the plates
and the plates can be plainly seen and read at all times. It is
unlawful to use any holders, frames, or any materials that in any
manner change, alter, or make the vehicle license number plates
illegible. It shall be unlawful for any person to operate any vehicle
unless there shall be displayed thereon valid vehicle license number
plates attached as herein provided.

--- END ---