BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that as new market-rate housing developments are constructed and housing costs rise, there
is a significant and growing number of low-income households that
cannot afford market-rate housing in Washington state. The legislature
finds that assistance to low-income households that cannot afford
market-rate housing requires a broad variety of tools to address this
serious, statewide problem. The legislature further finds that absent
any incentives to provide low-income housing, market conditions will
result in housing developments in many areas that lack units affordable
to low-income households, circumstances that can cause adverse
socioeconomic effects.
The legislature encourages cities, towns, and counties to enact or
expand affordable housing incentive programs, including density bonuses
and other incentives, to increase the availability of low-income
housing for renter and owner occupancy that is located in largely
market-rate housing developments throughout the community, consistent
with local needs and adopted comprehensive plans. While this act
establishes minimum standards for those cities, towns, and counties
choosing to implement or expand upon an affordable housing incentive
program, cities, towns, and counties are encouraged to enact programs
that address local circumstances and conditions while simultaneously
contributing to the statewide need for additional low-income housing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Any city or county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may enact
or expand affordable housing incentive programs providing for the
development of low-income housing units through development
regulations. An affordable housing incentive program may include, but
is not limited to:
(i) Density bonuses within the urban growth area;
(ii) Height bonuses;
(iii) Fee waivers or exemptions;
(iv) Parking reductions; or
(v) Expedited permitting, conditioned on provision of low-income
housing units.
(b) The city or county may enact or expand such programs whether or
not the programs may impose a tax, fee, or charge on the development or
construction of property.
(c) A city, county, or town may not condition, deny, or delay the
issuance of a permit or development approval based on the provisions in
this chapter due to the absence of participation in a program adopted
under this section.
(2) Affordable housing incentive programs enacted or expanded under
this section or RCW 82.02.020 shall comply with the following:
(a) The incentives or bonuses shall provide for the construction of
low-income housing units;
(b) Jurisdictions shall establish standards for low-income renter
or owner occupancy housing, including income guidelines consistent with
local housing needs, to assist low-income households that cannot afford
market-rate housing. Low-income households are defined for renter and
owner occupancy program purposes as follows:
(i) Rental housing units to be developed shall be affordable to and
occupied by households with an income of fifty percent or less of the
county median family income, adjusted for family size; and
(ii) Owner occupancy housing units shall be affordable to and
occupied by households with an income of eighty percent or less of the
county median family income, adjusted for family size. The legislative
authority of a jurisdiction, after holding a public hearing, may
establish lower income levels. The legislative authority of a
jurisdiction, after holding a public hearing, may also establish higher
income levels for rental housing or for owner occupancy housing upon
finding that higher income levels are needed to address local housing
market conditions. The higher income level for rental housing may not
exceed eighty percent of the county area median family income. The
higher income level for owner occupancy housing may not exceed one
hundred percent of the county area median family income. These
established higher income levels must be considered "low-income" for
the purposes of this section;
(c) The jurisdiction shall establish a maximum rent level or sales
price for each low-income housing unit developed under the terms of a
program and may adjust these levels or prices based on the average size
of the household expected to occupy the unit. For renter-occupied
housing units, the total housing costs, including basic utilities as
determined by the jurisdiction, may not exceed thirty percent of the
income limit for the low-income housing unit;
(d) Low-income housing units shall be provided in a range of sizes
comparable to those units that are available to other residents. To
the extent practicable, the number of bedrooms in low-income units must
be in the same proportion as the number of bedrooms in units within the
entire building. The low-income units shall generally be distributed
throughout the building, except that units may be provided in an
adjacent building. The low-income units shall have substantially the
same equipment and amenities, excluding luxury amenities such as
fireplaces and spa bathtubs, as the other units in the building or
buildings;
(e) Low-income housing units developed under an affordable housing
incentive program shall be committed to continuing affordability for at
least fifty years. A local government, however, may accept payments in
lieu of continuing affordability. The program shall include measures
to enforce continuing affordability and income standards applicable to
low-income units constructed under this section that may include, but
are not limited to, covenants, options, or other agreements to be
executed and recorded by owners and developers;
(f) Programs authorized under subsection (1) of this section may
apply to part or all of a jurisdiction and different standards may be
applied to different areas within a jurisdiction. Programs authorized
under this section may be modified to meet local needs and may include
provisions not expressly provided in this section or RCW 82.02.020; and
(g) Required low-income housing units are encouraged to be provided
within market-rate housing developments for which a bonus or incentive
is provided. However, programs may allow units to be provided in an
adjacent building and may allow payments of money or property in lieu
of low-income housing units if the payment equals the approximate cost
of developing the same number and quality of housing units that would
otherwise be developed. Any city or county may use these funds or
property to support the development of low-income housing, including
support provided through loans or grants to public or private owners or
developers of housing.
(3) Affordable housing incentive programs enacted or expanded under
this section may be applied within the jurisdiction to address the need
for increased residential development, consistent with local growth
management and housing policies, as follows:
(a) The jurisdiction shall identify certain land use designations
within a geographic area where increased residential development will
assist in achieving local growth management and housing policies;
(b) The jurisdiction shall provide increased residential
development capacity through zoning changes, bonus densities, height
increases, parking reductions, or other regulatory changes or other
incentives;
(c) The jurisdiction shall determine that increased residential
development capacity or other incentives can be achieved within the
identified area, subject to consideration of other regulatory controls
on development; and
(d) The jurisdiction may establish a minimum amount of affordable
housing that must be provided by all residential developments being
built under the revised regulations, consistent with the requirements
of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.02.020 and 2005 c 502 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except only as expressly provided in chapters 67.28 and 82.14 RCW,
the state preempts the field of imposing taxes upon retail sales of
tangible personal property, the use of tangible personal property,
parimutuel wagering authorized pursuant to RCW 67.16.060, conveyances,
and cigarettes, and no county, town, or other municipal subdivision
shall have the right to impose taxes of that nature. Except as
provided in RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090, no county, city, town, or
other municipal corporation shall impose any tax, fee, or charge,
either direct or indirect, on the construction or reconstruction of
residential buildings, commercial buildings, industrial buildings, or
on any other building or building space or appurtenance thereto, or on
the development, subdivision, classification, or reclassification of
land. However, this section does not preclude dedications of land or
easements within the proposed development or plat which the county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation can demonstrate are
reasonably necessary as a direct result of the proposed development or
plat to which the dedication of land or easement is to apply.
This section does not prohibit voluntary agreements with counties,
cities, towns, or other municipal corporations that allow a payment in
lieu of a dedication of land or to mitigate a direct impact that has
been identified as a consequence of a proposed development,
subdivision, or plat. A local government shall not use such voluntary
agreements for local off-site transportation improvements within the
geographic boundaries of the area or areas covered by an adopted
transportation program authorized by chapter 39.92 RCW. Any such
voluntary agreement is subject to the following provisions:
(1) The payment shall be held in a reserve account and may only be
expended to fund a capital improvement agreed upon by the parties to
mitigate the identified, direct impact;
(2) The payment shall be expended in all cases within five years of
collection; and
(3) Any payment not so expended shall be refunded with interest to
be calculated from the original date the deposit was received by the
county and at the same rate applied to tax refunds pursuant to RCW
84.69.100; however, if the payment is not expended within five years
due to delay attributable to the developer, the payment shall be
refunded without interest.
No county, city, town, or other municipal corporation shall require
any payment as part of such a voluntary agreement which the county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation cannot establish is
reasonably necessary as a direct result of the proposed development or
plat.
Nothing in this section prohibits cities, towns, counties, or other
municipal corporations from collecting reasonable fees from an
applicant for a permit or other governmental approval to cover the cost
to the city, town, county, or other municipal corporation of processing
applications, inspecting and reviewing plans, or preparing detailed
statements required by chapter 43.21C RCW.
This section does not limit the existing authority of any county,
city, town, or other municipal corporation to impose special
assessments on property specifically benefitted thereby in the manner
prescribed by law.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
imposing or permits counties, cities, or towns to impose water, sewer,
natural gas, drainage utility, and drainage system charges: PROVIDED,
That no such charge shall exceed the proportionate share of such
utility or system's capital costs which the county, city, or town can
demonstrate are attributable to the property being charged: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That these provisions shall not be interpreted to expand or
contract any existing authority of counties, cities, or towns to impose
such charges.
Nothing in this section prohibits a transportation benefit district
from imposing fees or charges authorized in RCW 36.73.120 nor prohibits
the legislative authority of a county, city, or town from approving the
imposition of such fees within a transportation benefit district.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
imposing transportation impact fees authorized pursuant to chapter
39.92 RCW.
Nothing in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from
requiring property owners to provide relocation assistance to tenants
under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450.
Nothing in this section limits the authority of counties, cities,
or towns to implement programs consistent with section 2 of this act,
nor to enforce agreements made pursuant to such programs.
This section does not apply to special purpose districts formed and
acting pursuant to Titles 54, 57, or 87 RCW, nor is the authority
conferred by these titles affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The powers granted in this act are
supplemental and additional to the powers otherwise held by local
governments, and nothing in this act shall be construed as a limit on
such powers. The authority granted in this act shall extend to any
affordable housing incentive program enacted or expanded prior to the
effective date of this act if the extension is adopted by the
applicable local government in an ordinance or resolution.

--- END ---