BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature, in the
interest of student confidentiality, that school districts minimize the
release of student telephone numbers and other directory information in
the absence of express parental consent. The legislature finds that
the nondisclosure of student telephone numbers and other directory
information reduces the possibility of harassment of students and their
families by organizations that received student information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) "Directory information" has the same meaning as in 20 U.S.C.
Sec. 1232g(a)(5)(A), which states that "the term... relating to a
student includes the following: the student's name, address, telephone
listing, date and place of birth, major field of study, participation
in officially recognized activities and sports, weight and height of
members of athletic teams, dates of attendance, degrees and awards
received, and the most recent previous educational agency or
institution attended by the student."
(2) "Recruiter" means anyone who seeks to solicit a student to
attend or apply to a particular educational or vocational institution
or program, apply for employment with a private or public employer, or
enlist in the military.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2006, each school district shall provide
separate written notice to every public high school student and his or
her parent or legal guardian informing the students, parents, and
guardians:
(a) Of their right to request, pursuant to 20 U.S.C. Sec.
7908(a)(2), that the student's directory information not be released to
recruiters without the prior written consent of the student's parent or
guardian or the student;
(b) That if they do not request that the student's directory
information be withheld from some or all recruiters by the thirtieth
day of the new school year, the school may release the student's
directory information if requested to do so by a recruiter; and
(c) Of the obligation of all males between the ages of eighteen and
twenty-five years to register with selective services within thirty
days of their eighteenth birthday and information regarding how to
register.
(2) The district shall provide the notice required by subsection
(1) of this section in English and in any other languages the district
provides other district-wide written notice to students, parents, or
guardians.
(3) The notice provided under subsection (1) of this section shall
clearly distinguish among categories of recruiters and provide parents,
guardians, and students with the option of requesting that directory
information not be released to a particular category or categories of
recruiters. At a minimum, the categories of recruiters shall be broken
into (a) higher education and vocational education recruiters and
employers and (b) military recruiters. A request that a student's
information not be released to a particular category of recruiters does
not prohibit a school from releasing information to recruiters in any
other category.
(4) The notice required by this section shall be sent to parents or
guardians and students for each new school year. A school district
shall not release directory information to any recruiter, except upon
express written consent from the parent, guardian, or student, after
the last day of the school year or before the forty-fifth day of the
new school year.
(5) A student, parent, or guardian may request at any time that the
student's directory information not be released, and such a request
shall be honored by the school district.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and post
on its web site a model notice and request form for withholding
directory information and regarding selective service obligations that
complies with the requirements of this section. The model notice and
request form must provide a brief explanation of the federal
requirement that student directory information be shared unless the
student, parent, or guardian requests the information be withheld.
School districts may adopt the model notice and request form or may use
a form developed by the school district.

--- END ---