BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington
students are not adequately prepared in mathematics and science:
(a) Despite steady annual improvement, fewer than half of the
seventh and tenth grade students met the state standard in mathematics
on the Washington assessment of student learning in 2004;
(b) Early results from the eighth grade students taking the
Washington assessment of student learning in science show that under
forty percent met the standard;
(c) In 2003, nearly half of recent high school graduates attending
community and technical colleges enrolled in remedial mathematics
courses because they were not ready for college-level mathematics; and
(d) In 2003, fewer than seventeen percent of bachelor's degrees
awarded by public colleges and universities in Washington were in
science and engineering fields, a proportion that declined over the
previous ten years.
(2) The legislature further finds that knowledge and skills in
mathematics and science are critical for Washington's future economic
development and the state's overall well-being:
(a) Jobs at all levels of training and in multiple fields - from
manufacturing and construction, to accounting and finance, to computer
technical support and programming - increasingly require workers to
perform calculations and analysis at higher levels of complexity;
(b) Shortages in the state's health care work force are well
documented. Health care providers at all levels need strong
backgrounds in physical and life sciences;
(c) Growth in the state's technology, biotechnology, and
engineering industries is dependent on ready access to individuals with
advanced training and degrees in mathematics and science.
(3) Finally, the legislature finds that a critical bottleneck for
future improvement in students' mathematics and science capabilities is
the availability of highly qualified mathematics and science teachers,
particularly in secondary schools.
(4) Therefore, the legislature intends to take a comprehensive
approach to improving the quantity and quality of secondary school
mathematics and science teachers by creating the Washington teach math-science program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The Washington teach math-science program is
hereby created. The program consists of the following components:
(1) The teacher preparation programs developed under section 4 of
this act;
(2) The public-private advisory committee established under section
5 of this act;
(3) Targeted conditional scholarships and loan repayments for
future secondary mathematics and science teachers authorized under
section 6 of this act; and
(4) Targeted alternative routes conditional scholarships and loan
repayments for future mathematics and science teachers authorized under
section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Residency certification" means the first-level teaching
certification established under RCW 28A.410.010.
(2) "Secondary mathematics or science" means academic courses and
majors that would qualify a teacher for an endorsement on his or her
teaching certificate in middle-level mathematics and science; secondary
mathematics; secondary science; or the secondary designated sciences of
biology, chemistry, earth science, or physics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The higher education coordinating board
and the professional educator standards board shall jointly select two
institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, to
develop and implement a comprehensive program to prepare secondary
mathematics and science teachers. The programs shall be available for
students by the fall 2007 term and shall include the following
components:
(a) A streamlined curriculum collaboratively designed by the
college of education and the college of arts and sciences or their
equivalents that permits students to earn a bachelor's degree and
residency certification in secondary mathematics or science within four
academic years;
(b) Recruitment and outreach to prospective high school and college
students who have expressed interest in mathematics and science,
informing them about the program and encouraging them to explore a
teaching career;
(c) Internship experiences during students' first two years of
college that provide early exposure to secondary mathematics and
science classrooms; and
(d) Best practice seminars taught by exemplary secondary
mathematics and science teachers.
(2) Requests for proposals to participate under subsection (1) of
this section shall be developed and released by the higher education
coordinating board and the professional educator standards board by
June 15, 2006.
(3) The institutions of higher education selected under this
section may partner with one or more community or technical colleges in
the development and implementation of the comprehensive program
provided by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall convene and assist an advisory committee
consisting of representatives of the institutions of higher education
selected under section 4 of this act and business and community
leaders. The advisory committee shall:
(a) Solicit for and accept grants and donations from public and
private sources for industry-based professional development and
internship opportunities related to mathematics and science for
students participating in a program established under section 4 of this
act and for practicing teachers who completed a program established
under section 4 of this act;
(b) Identify existing and develop new industry-based professional
development and internship opportunities related to mathematics and
science for students participating in a program established under
section 4 of this act and for practicing teachers who completed a
program established under section 4 of this act;
(c) Advise the board on development of rules regarding expenditures
for professional development and internship opportunities authorized
under this section; and
(d) Approve expenditures from the math-science professional
development account for professional development and internship
opportunities authorized under this section.
(2) The Washington teach math-science professional development
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts
from private moneys solicited from public and private sources for
authorized professional development opportunities under this section
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for professional development opportunities as provided
under this section. Only the director of the higher education
coordinating board or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.102.040 and 2005 c 518 s 918 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board may select participants based on an application
process conducted by the board or the board may ((utilize)) use
selection processes for similar students in cooperation with the
professional educator standards board or the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(2) If the board selects participants for the program, it shall
establish a selection committee for screening and selecting recipients
of the conditional scholarships. The criteria shall emphasize factors
demonstrating excellence including but not limited to superior
scholastic achievement, leadership ability, community contributions,
bilingual ability, willingness to commit to providing teaching service
in shortage areas, and an ability to act as a role model for students.
Priority will be given to individuals seeking certification or an
additional endorsement in math, science, technology, or special
education.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2006, the board shall increase the number of
conditional scholarships awarded by as many qualified applicants who
intend to teach secondary mathematics or science as the appropriation
will sustain, with a goal of at least seventy additional awards.
(4) For fiscal years 2006 and 2007, additional priority shall be
given to such individuals who are also bilingual. It is the intent of
the legislature to develop a pool of dual-language teachers in order to
meet the challenge of educating students who are dominant in languages
other than English.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.102.060 and 2004 c 58 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Participants in the conditional scholarship program incur an
obligation to repay the conditional scholarship, with interest and an
equalization fee, unless they teach for two years in an approved
education program for each year of scholarship received, under rules
adopted by the board. Participants who teach in a designated teacher
shortage area or those receiving funds under RCW 28B.102.040(3) shall
have one year of loan canceled for each year they teach in the shortage
area.
(2) The interest rate shall be determined annually by the board.
Participants who fail to complete the teaching service shall incur an
equalization fee based on the remaining unforgiven balance of the loan.
The equalization fee shall be added to the remaining balance and repaid
by the participant.
(3) The minimum payment shall be set by the board. The maximum
period for repayment shall be ten years, with payments of principal and
interest accruing quarterly commencing six months from the date the
participant completes or discontinues the course of study. Provisions
for deferral of payment shall be determined by the board.
(4) The entire principal and interest of each payment shall be
forgiven for each payment period in which the participant teaches in an
approved education program until the entire repayment obligation is
satisfied. Should the participant cease to teach in an approved
education program in this state before the participant's repayment
obligation is completed, payments on the unsatisfied portion of the
principal and interest shall begin the next payment period and continue
until the remainder of the participant's repayment obligation is
satisfied.
(5) The board is responsible for collection of repayments made
under this section and shall exercise due diligence in such collection,
maintaining all necessary records to insure that maximum repayments are
made. Collection and servicing of repayments under this section shall
be pursued using the full extent of the law, including wage garnishment
if necessary. The board is responsible to forgive all or parts of such
repayments under the criteria established in this section and shall
maintain all necessary records of forgiven payments.
(6) Receipts from the payment of principal or interest or any other
subsidies to which the board as administrator is entitled, which are
paid by or on behalf of participants under this section, shall be
deposited in the future teachers conditional scholarship account and
shall be used to cover the costs of granting the conditional
scholarships, maintaining necessary records, and making collections
under subsection (5) of this section. The board shall maintain
accurate records of these costs, and all receipts beyond those
necessary to pay such costs shall be used to grant conditional
scholarships to eligible students.
(7) The board shall adopt rules to define the terms of repayment,
including applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.660.050 and 2004 c 23 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The alternative route conditional scholarship program is created
under the following guidelines:
(1) The program shall be administered by the higher education
coordinating board. In administering the program, the higher education
coordinating board has the following powers and duties:
(a) To adopt necessary rules and develop guidelines to administer
the program;
(b) To collect and manage repayments from participants who do not
meet their service obligations; and
(c) To accept grants and donations from public and private sources
for the program.
(2) Participation in the alternative route conditional scholarship
program is limited to interns of the partnership grant programs under
RCW 28A.660.040. The Washington professional educator standards board
shall select interns to receive conditional scholarships.
(3) In order to receive conditional scholarship awards, recipients
shall be accepted and maintain enrollment in alternative certification
routes through the partnership grant program, as provided in RCW
28A.660.040. Recipients must continue to make satisfactory progress
towards completion of the alternative route certification program and
receipt of a residency teaching certificate.
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, a conditional scholarship is
a loan that is forgiven in whole or in part in exchange for service as
a certificated teacher employed in a Washington state K-12 public
school. The state shall forgive one year of loan obligation for every
two years a recipient teaches in a public school. Recipients that fail
to continue a course of study leading to residency teacher
certification or cease to teach in a public school in the state of
Washington in their endorsement area are required to repay the
remaining loan principal with interest.
(5) Recipients who fail to fulfill the required teaching obligation
are required to repay the remaining loan principal with interest and
any other applicable fees. The higher education coordinating board
shall adopt rules to define the terms for repayment, including
applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.
(6) Beginning July 1, 2006, the board shall increase the number of
conditional scholarships awarded to eligible participants who intend to
teach secondary mathematics or science by thirty more than the number
awarded to prospective secondary mathematics or science teachers for
the 2005-06 academic year. Participants who teach mathematics or
science shall have one year of loan canceled for each year they teach
in a district with a documented shortage of mathematics or science
teachers.
(7) To the extent funds are appropriated for this specific purpose,
the annual amount of the scholarship is the annual cost of tuition;
fees; and educational expenses, including books, supplies, and
transportation for the alternative route certification program in which
the recipient is enrolled, not to exceed eight thousand dollars. The
board may adjust the annual award by the average rate of resident
undergraduate tuition and fee increases at the state universities as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(((7))) (8) The higher education coordinating board may deposit all
appropriations, collections, and any other funds received for the
program in this chapter in the ((student loan)) account authorized in
RCW 28B.102.060.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2005 c 424 s 18, 2005 c 402 s 8, 2005
c 215 s 10, and 2005 c 16 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund,
the fruit and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers
conditional scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the
grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' plan 2
expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the produce railcar
pool account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and
exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility account, the
self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account,
the children's trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission
Washington bred owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing
commission class C purse fund account, the individual development
account program account, the Washington horse racing commission
operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing commission
operating account must be credited to the Washington horse racing
commission class C purse fund account), the Washington teach math-science professional development account, and the life sciences
discovery fund. However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---