BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.61.130 and 1969 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A metropolitan park district has the right of eminent domain,
and may purchase, acquire and condemn lands lying within or without the
boundaries of said park district, for public parks, parkways,
boulevards, aviation landings and playgrounds, and may condemn such
lands to widen, alter and extend streets, avenues, boulevards,
parkways, aviation landings and playgrounds, to enlarge and extend
existing parks, and to acquire lands for the establishment of new
parks, boulevards, parkways, aviation landings and playgrounds. The
right of eminent domain shall be exercised and instituted pursuant to
resolution of the board of park commissioners and conducted in the same
manner and under the same procedure as is or may be provided by law for
the exercise of the power of eminent domain by incorporated cities and
towns of the state of Washington in the acquisition of property rights:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, Funds to pay for condemnation allowed by this
section shall be raised only as specified in this chapter.
(2) The board of park commissioners shall have power to employ
counsel, and to regulate, manage and control the parks, parkways,
boulevards, streets, avenues, aviation landings and playgrounds under
its control, and to provide for park ((policemen)) police, for a
secretary of the board of park commissioners and for all necessary
employees, to fix their salaries and duties.
(3) The board of park commissioners shall have power to improve,
acquire, extend and maintain, open and lay out, parks, parkways,
boulevards, avenues, aviation landings and playgrounds, within or
without the park district, and to authorize, conduct and manage the
letting of boats, or other amusement apparatus, the operation of bath
houses, the purchase and sale of foodstuffs or other merchandise, the
giving of vocal or instrumental concerts or other entertainments, the
establishment and maintenance of aviation landings and playgrounds, and
generally the management and conduct of such forms of recreation or
business as it shall judge desirable or beneficial for the public, or
for the production of revenue for expenditure for park purposes; and
may pay out moneys for the maintenance and improvement of any such
parks, parkways, boulevards, avenues, aviation landings and playgrounds
as now exist, or may hereafter be acquired, within or without the
limits of said city and for the purchase of lands within or without the
limits of said city, whenever it deems the purchase to be for the
benefit of the public and for the interest of the park district, and
for the maintenance and improvement thereof and for all expenses
incidental to its duties: PROVIDED, That all parks, boulevards,
parkways, aviation landings and playgrounds shall be subject to the
police regulations of the city within whose limits they lie.
(4) The board of park commissioners shall adopt rules establishing
the requirements for a criminal history record information search for
the following: Job applicants, volunteers, and independent contractors
who have unsupervised access to children or vulnerable adults, or who
will be responsible for collecting or disbursing cash or processing
credit/debit card transactions. These background checks will be done
through the Washington state patrol criminal identification section and
may include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation,
which shall be through the submission of fingerprints. A permanent
employee of a metropolitan park district, employed as of the effective
date of this section, is exempt from the provisions of this subsection.

--- END ---