BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.41.190 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 29 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Nonpreferred drug" means all other drugs in the same
therapeutic class as any preferred drug.
(b) "Preferred drug" means any drug that is preferred pursuant to
an evidence-based prescription drug program established under RCW
70.14.050.
(2) Any pharmacist filling a prescription under a state purchased
health care program as defined in RCW 41.05.011(2) shall substitute,
where identified, a preferred drug for any nonpreferred drug in a given
therapeutic class, unless the endorsing practitioner has indicated on
the prescription that the nonpreferred drug must be dispensed as
written, or the prescription is for a refill of an antipsychotic,
antidepressant, chemotherapy, antiretroviral, or immunosuppressive
drug, in which case the pharmacist shall dispense the prescribed
nonpreferred drug.
(((2))) (3) When a substitution is made under subsection (((1)))
(2) of this section, the dispensing pharmacist shall notify the
prescribing practitioner of the specific drug and dose dispensed.

--- END ---