BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that certain groups of
children have dramatically higher rates of exposure to trauma,
including children who have been abused or neglected, children in
foster care, and children who witness domestic violence. The
legislature also finds that there is a growing number of untreated
trauma-affected children exhibiting severe stress reactions. When left
untreated, the psychological distress caused by trauma in infancy and
early childhood compromises healthy brain development and may result in
a lifetime of lost potential. The legislature further finds that over
the past two decades, significant theoretical, empirical, and clinical
developments have emerged to guide practitioners in effectively
treating trauma-exposed children. The legislature also finds that safe
harbor crisis nursery provides a model for group receiving homes where
children who have been removed from their home are cared for in a
family home-like setting that reduces further trauma by allowing
sibling groups to remain together while future placement plans are
being made. The legislature intends to create a pilot program to
demonstrate the effectiveness of trauma mitigation strategies for the
treatment of trauma-exposed children.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The trauma mitigation for children pilot program is
established. The pilot program shall be administered jointly by the
children's administration and the division of mental health, within the
department of social and health services. The pilot program shall
promote evidence-based trauma mitigation interventions for children who
are removed from their home by child protective services.
(2) The pilot program shall provide a structure for:
(a) Implementing a regional trauma mitigation early intervention
program to reduce the effects on children of exposure to trauma through
the use of evidence-based practice, including trauma-focused cognitive
behavioral therapy;
(b) Creating a community-based response to the impacts of trauma on
children; and
(c) Identifying and strengthening local resources for
developmentally appropriate services for children and families who have
experienced trauma.
(3) The pilot program shall be implemented at safe harbor crisis
nursery located in Kennewick, Washington. One additional site may be
selected on the basis of need as determined by:
(a) The relative availability or unavailability of comparable
services locally; and
(b) The relative at-risk population within the community.
(4) The pilot program shall consist of the following services for
children:
(a) For children birth to six years of age, and sibling groups with
children under six years of age and siblings through age twelve,
twenty-four hour group receiving care for a maximum of seven days.
Receiving care under this subsection (4)(a) shall be designed to assist
children in their transition to foster care;
(b) For children not enrolled in school, post-trauma child day care
for a maximum of thirty days after transition from group receiving care
to foster care. Child day care under this subsection (4)(b) includes
play therapy, art therapy, music therapy, and physical activities as
developmentally appropriate;
(c) For school age siblings, post-trauma interventions once per
week for a maximum of thirty days after transition from group receiving
care to foster care; and
(d) Follow-up assessments of each child at the time of exit, and at
six months and one year after exit, from the day care program or the
weekly intervention program.
(5) The pilot program shall also provide for the dissemination of
information and training for professionals, parents, foster parents,
and caregivers regarding:
(a) The long-term impacts of exposure to trauma; and
(b) Evidence-based practices, strategies, and resources for
mitigating the impact of exposure to trauma.
(6) In collaboration with safe harbor crisis nursery, the
children's administration and the division of mental health shall
report to the legislature regarding the pilot program not later than
September 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires December 31, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---