BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 31.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall develop an internet-based education program
for the employees of a licensee that has a small loan endorsement. The
program must instruct employees about applicable state laws that
pertain to payday lending.
(2) This section applies only to those employees who make small
loans and are involved in the making, approval, or collection of a
small loan. New employees must complete the program within six months
after the date they are hired. All employees must complete the program
at least once every two years.
(3) All required materials must be available via the internet.
(4) The department must create an online system to track employee
compliance with the requirements in this section.
(5) The director may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of forty thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the department of
financial institutions for the purposes of section 1 of this act.

--- END ---