BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The state of Washington supports and shall participate in the
implementation of a pilot intergovernmental program with federally
recognized Indian tribes to voluntarily find collaborative solutions in
water management. This program shall be mediated by the United States
government's institute on conflict resolution and follow a process
similar to the national environmental policy act. All agreed upon
results of the process shall be adopted by rule and incorporated into
the management of water resources by the state.

--- END ---