BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) From the effective date of this act until July 1, 2007, any
adult or juvenile residing whether or not the person has a fixed
residence, or who is a student, is employed, or carries on a vocation
in this state shall register with the county sheriff for the county of
the person's residence, or if the person is not a resident of
Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of employment
or vocation, or as otherwise specified in this section if he or she has
been convicted of a felony methamphetamine drug offense under RCW
69.50.401(2)(b).
(2) Any person required to register under this section shall follow
all of the requirements applicable to kidnapping offenders under RCW
9A.44.130.
(3) Public agencies are authorized to release information to the
public regarding methamphetamine offenders when the agency determines
that disclosure of the information is relevant and necessary to protect
the public and counteract the danger created by the particular
offender. The extent of the public disclosure of relevant and
necessary information shall be rationally related to: (a) The level of
risk posed by the offender to the community; (b) the locations where
the offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly found; and (c)
the needs of the affected community members for information to enhance
their individual and collective safety.
(4) This section applies only to offenders residing in any county
with a population of more than six hundred thousand, but less than
seven hundred thousand.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2007.

--- END ---