BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Quarterly during each fiscal year, the treasurer shall transfer
from the state general fund or any successor fund to the required
reserve fund an amount equal to one percent of the forecasted general
state revenues for that fiscal year. Nothing in this subsection
prevents the appropriation of additional amounts to the required
reserve fund. Amounts in the required reserve fund may be invested as
provided by law and interest earnings retained in that fund.
(2) If the forecasted growth of general state revenues for any
fiscal year, excluding legislation, is estimated to be less than one
percent, as adjusted for inflation, then for that fiscal year moneys
may be appropriated from the required reserve fund by a majority vote
of the members elected to each house of the legislature, and then only
if the appropriation does not cause total expenditures to exceed the
state expenditure limit under this chapter. Any amount may be
appropriated from the required reserve fund at any time by the
favorable vote of at least three-fifths of the members elected to each
house of the legislature.
(3) When the balance in the required reserve fund, including
investment earnings, equals more than ten percent of the estimated
general state revenues in the prior fiscal year, then any amounts in
excess of ten percent of the estimated general state revenues in the
prior fiscal year may be appropriated only for costs of capital
construction in public schools and higher education.
(4) Transfers of general state revenue to the required reserve fund
are general revenue for purposes of the debt limit calculation.
Neither transfers of general state revenue to nor expenditures from the
required reserve fund shall result in an adjustment to any state
expenditure limit.
(5) As used in this section, "general state revenues" has the
meaning set forth in Article VIII, section 1 of the Constitution. As
used in this section, "inflation" means the implicit price deflator for
the United States as published by the United States department of
commerce. Forecasts and estimates shall be those made by the state
economic and revenue forecast council or its successor agency.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.42.070 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 9 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) On or after the effective date of this act, the treasurer shall
compute general state revenues for the three fiscal years immediately
preceding such date and shall determine the arithmetic mean thereof.
As soon as is practicable after the close of each fiscal year
thereafter, he or she shall do likewise. In determining the amount of
general state revenues, the treasurer shall include all state money
received in the treasury from each and every source whatsoever except:
(a) Fees and revenues derived from the ownership or operation of any
undertaking, facility or project; (b) moneys received as gifts, grants,
donations, aid or assistance or otherwise from the United States or any
department, bureau or corporation thereof, or any person, firm or
corporation, public or private, when the terms and conditions of such
gift, grant, donation, aid or assistance require the application and
disbursement of such moneys otherwise than for the general purposes of
the state of Washington; (c) moneys to be paid into and received from
retirement system funds, and performance bonds and deposits; (d) moneys
to be paid into and received from trust funds including but not limited
to moneys received from taxes levied for specific purposes and the
several permanent and irreducible funds of the state and the moneys
derived therefrom but excluding bond redemption funds; (e) proceeds
received from the sale of bonds or other evidences of indebtedness.
Upon computing general state revenues, the treasurer shall make and
file in the office of the secretary of state, a certificate containing
the results of such computations. Copies of said certificate shall be
sent to each elected official of the state and each member of the
legislature. The treasurer shall, at the same time, advise each
elected official and each member of the legislature of the current
available debt capacity of the state, and may make estimated
projections for one or more years concerning debt capacity.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, general state revenues shall also
include revenues that are deposited in the general fund under RCW
82.45.180(2), lottery revenues as provided in RCW 67.70.240(3),
revenues paid into the general fund under RCW 84.52.067, revenues
deposited in the required reserve fund under section 1 of this act, and
revenues deposited into the student achievement fund and distributed to
school districts as provided in RCW 84.52.068.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.135.035 and 2005 c 72 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax
shifts may be taken only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each
house, and then only if state expenditures in any fiscal year,
including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure limits
established under this chapter. However, for legislation enacted
between the effective date of this 2005 act and June 30, 2007, any
action or combination of actions by the legislature that raises state
revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax shifts may be taken with the
approval of a majority of members elected to each house, so long as
state expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will
not exceed the state expenditure limits established under this chapter.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until
approved by a vote of the people at a November general election. The
state expenditure limit committee shall adjust the state expenditure
limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the voters under
this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of revenue
generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be
adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
inflation and population increases?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the nature of the
emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require immediate
government action to alleviate human suffering and provide humanitarian
assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no more
than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund on or after January 1, 1993, to another source
of funding, or if moneys are transferred from the state general fund to
another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee, acting
pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure limit
to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a transfer of
money from the state general fund to another fund or account includes
any state legislative action taken that has the effect of reducing
revenues from a particular source, where such revenues would otherwise
be deposited into the state general fund, while increasing the revenues
from that particular source to another state or local government
account. This subsection does not apply to the dedication or use of
lottery revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW
84.52.068, in support of education or education expenditures. This
subsection does not apply to transfers to the required reserve fund.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted to the
state general fund on or after January 1, 2000, from another source of
funding, or if moneys are transferred to the state general fund from
another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee, acting
pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall increase the state expenditure
limit to reflect the shift.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.135.035 and 2005 c 72 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax
shifts may be taken only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each
house, and then only if state expenditures in any fiscal year,
including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure limits
established under this chapter.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until
approved by a vote of the people at a November general election. The
state expenditure limit committee shall adjust the state expenditure
limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the voters under
this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of revenue
generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be
adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
personal income growth?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the nature of the
emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require immediate
government action to alleviate human suffering and provide humanitarian
assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no more
than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund or a related fund to another source of funding,
or if moneys are transferred from the state general fund or a related
fund to another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee,
acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure
limit to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a
transfer of money from the state general fund or a related fund to
another fund or account includes any state legislative action taken
that has the effect of reducing revenues from a particular source,
where such revenues would otherwise be deposited into the state general
fund or a related fund, while increasing the revenues from that
particular source to another state or local government account. This
subsection does not apply to the dedication or use of lottery revenues
under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW 84.52.068, in
support of education or education expenditures. This subsection does
not apply to transfers to the required reserve fund.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function and the ongoing
revenue necessary to fund the program or function are shifted to the
state general fund or a related fund on or after January 1, 2007, the
state expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW
43.135.025(5), shall increase the state expenditure limit to reflect
the shift.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.505
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated
to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution
to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the student
achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time
equivalent student basis to each school district.
(2) When per-student state funding for the maintenance and
operation of K-12 education meets a level of no less than ninety
percent of the national average of total funding from all sources per
student as determined by the most recent published data from the
national center for education statistics of the United States
department of education, as calculated by the office of financial
management, further deposits to the student achievement fund shall be
required only to the extent necessary to maintain the ninety-percent
level. Remaining funds are part of the general fund balance and these
funds are subject to the expenditure limits of chapter 43.135 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(1) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2005, and
ending June 30, 2007, funds may also be used for higher education
facilities preservation and maintenance.
(2) An excess balance in the required reserve fund under Article
VIII, section . . . (HJR . . ., H-4157/06) shall be deposited into the
education construction fund and may be appropriated only for costs of
capital construction in public schools and higher education.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.135.051 and 1999 c 288 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state investment board has the full power to invest,
reinvest, manage, contract, sell, or exchange investment moneys in the
((emergency)) required reserve fund. All investment and operating
costs associated with the investment of money shall be paid pursuant to
RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception of these expenses,
the earnings from the investment of the money shall be retained by the
fund.
(2) All investments made by the state investment board shall be
made with the exercise of that degree of judgment and care pursuant to
RCW 43.33A.140 and the investment policies established by the state
investment board.
(3) As deemed appropriate by the state investment board, moneys in
the fund may be commingled for investment with other funds subject to
investment by the board.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.84.092 and 2005 c 514 s 1106, 2005 c 353 s 4, 2005
c 339 s 23, 2005 c 314 s 110, 2005 c 312 s 8, and 2005 c 94 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, ((the emergency reserve fund,)) The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the freight mobility investment account, the health
services account, the public health services account, the health system
capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the high-occupancy toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the multimodal
transportation account, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the regional transportation investment district
account, the required reserve fund, the resource management cost
account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the
small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special wildlife account,
the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the
volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account,
the aircraft search and rescue account, the county arterial
preservation account, the department of licensing services account, the
essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget
Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RCW 43.135.045 (Emergency reserve fund--Excess balance to education construction fund -- Appropriation
conditions -- Transfer of earnings to multimodal transportation account)
and 2005 c 518 s 931, 2005 c 488 s 920, 2005 c 314 s 401, 2005 c 72 s
6, & 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 920 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1,
2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect if the proposed
amendment to Article VIII, section . . . of the state Constitution (HJR
. . . ., H-4157/06) is validly submitted to and is approved and
ratified by the voters at a general election held in November 2006. If
the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void
in its entirety.

--- END ---