BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.135.035 and 2005 c 72 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that ((raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax
shifts)) constitutes a tax increase may be taken only if approved by a
((two-thirds)) three-fifths vote of each house, and then only if state
expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will not
exceed the state expenditure limits established under this chapter.
((However, for legislation enacted between the effective date of this
2005 act and June 30, 2007, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax
shifts may be taken with the approval of a majority of members elected
to each house, so long as state expenditures in any fiscal year,
including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure limits
established under this chapter.)) This section does not apply to a tax
that will be used exclusively for highway purposes under Article II,
section 40 of the state Constitution.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until
approved by a vote of the people at a November general election. The
state expenditure limit committee shall adjust the state expenditure
limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the voters under
this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of revenue
generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be
adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
inflation and population increases?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a ((two-thirds)) three-fifths vote of each house of the
legislature and signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the
nature of the emergency((, which is limited to natural disasters that
require immediate government action to alleviate human suffering and
provide humanitarian assistance)). The state expenditure limit may be
exceeded for no more than twenty-four months following the declaration
of the emergency and only for the purposes contained in the emergency
declaration.
(b) ((Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.)) Taxes enacted pursuant to an
emergency previously declared under this section may be imposed with a
favorable vote of a majority of members elected to each house of the
legislature, and shall expire not later than twelve months after the
effective date of the emergency declaration.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund on or after January 1, 1993, to another source
of funding, or if moneys are transferred from the state general fund to
another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee, acting
pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure limit
to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a transfer of
money from the state general fund to another fund or account includes
any state legislative action taken that has the effect of reducing
revenues from a particular source, where such revenues would otherwise
be deposited into the state general fund, while increasing the revenues
from that particular source to another state or local government
account. This subsection does not apply to the dedication or use of
lottery revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW
84.52.068, in support of education or education expenditures.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted to the
state general fund on or after January 1, 2000, from another source of
funding, or if moneys are transferred to the state general fund from
another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee, acting
pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall increase the state expenditure
limit to reflect the shift.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.135.035 and 2005 c 72 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that ((raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax
shifts)) constitutes a tax increase may be taken only if approved by a
((two-thirds)) three-fifths vote of each house, and then only if state
expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will not
exceed the state expenditure limits established under this chapter.
This section does not apply to a tax that will be used exclusively for
highway purposes under Article II, section 40 of the state
Constitution.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until
approved by a vote of the people at a November general election. The
state expenditure limit committee shall adjust the state expenditure
limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the voters under
this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of revenue
generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be
adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
personal income growth?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a ((two-thirds)) three-fifths vote of each house of the
legislature and signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the
nature of the emergency((, which is limited to natural disasters that
require immediate government action to alleviate human suffering and
provide humanitarian assistance)). The state expenditure limit may be
exceeded for no more than twenty-four months following the declaration
of the emergency and only for the purposes contained in the emergency
declaration.
(b) ((Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.)) Taxes enacted pursuant to an
emergency previously declared under this section may be imposed with a
favorable vote of a majority of members elected to each house of the
legislature, and shall expire not later than twelve months after the
effective date of the emergency declaration.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund or a related fund to another source of funding,
or if moneys are transferred from the state general fund or a related
fund to another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee,
acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure
limit to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a
transfer of money from the state general fund or a related fund to
another fund or account includes any state legislative action taken
that has the effect of reducing revenues from a particular source,
where such revenues would otherwise be deposited into the state general
fund or a related fund, while increasing the revenues from that
particular source to another state or local government account. This
subsection does not apply to the dedication or use of lottery revenues
under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW 84.52.068, in
support of education or education expenditures.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function and the ongoing
revenue necessary to fund the program or function are shifted to the
state general fund or a related fund on or after January 1, 2007, the
state expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW
43.135.025(5), shall increase the state expenditure limit to reflect
the shift.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1,
2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect if the proposed
amendment to Article VII, section . . . of the state Constitution (HJR
. . . ., H-4178/06) is validly submitted to and is approved and
ratified by the voters at a general election held in November 2006. If
the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void
in its entirety.

--- END ---