BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.135.025 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The state shall not expend from the general fund during any
fiscal year state moneys in excess of the state expenditure limit
established under this chapter.
(2) Except pursuant to a declaration of emergency under RCW
43.135.035 or pursuant to an appropriation under RCW 43.135.045(4)(b),
the state treasurer shall not issue or redeem any check, warrant, or
voucher that will result in a state general fund expenditure for any
fiscal year in excess of the state expenditure limit established under
this chapter. A violation of this subsection constitutes a violation
of RCW 43.88.290 and shall subject the state treasurer to the penalties
provided in RCW 43.88.300.
(3) The state expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the
previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit increased by a
percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth factor.
(4) For purposes of computing the state expenditure limit for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, 1995, the phrase "the previous fiscal
year's state expenditure limit" means the total state expenditures from
the state general fund, not including federal funds, for the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 1989, plus the fiscal growth factor. This
calculation is then computed for the state expenditure limit for fiscal
years 1992, 1993, 1994, and 1995, and as required under RCW
43.135.035(4).
(5) A state expenditure limit committee is established for the
purpose of determining and adjusting the state expenditure limit as
provided in this chapter. The members of the state expenditure limit
committee are the director of financial management, the attorney
general or the attorney general's designee, and the chairs and ranking
minority members of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on appropriations. All actions of
the state expenditure limit committee taken pursuant to this chapter
require an affirmative vote of at least ((three)) four members.
(6)(a) Prior to final passage of the omnibus operating budget by
the legislature, the expenditure limit committee shall meet to adjust
the expenditure limit for transfers and cost shifts under RCW
43.135.035 (4) and (5) and 43.135.060(2). If necessary, the committee
shall make further adjustments after the governor signs the omnibus
operating budget.
(b) Each November, the state expenditure limit committee shall
adjust the expenditure limit for the preceding fiscal year based on
actual expenditures and known changes in the fiscal growth factor and
then project an expenditure limit for the next two fiscal years. If,
by November 30th, the state expenditure limit committee has not adopted
the expenditure limit adjustment and projected expenditure limit as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, the attorney general or his
or her designee shall adjust or project the expenditure limit, as
necessary.
(7) "Fiscal growth factor" means the average of the sum of
inflation and population change for each of the prior three fiscal
years.
(8) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for the United States for each fiscal year as published by the
federal bureau of labor statistics.
(9) "Population change" means the percentage change in state
population for each fiscal year as reported by the office of financial
management.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.135.025 and 2005 c 72 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state shall not expend from the general fund and related
funds during any fiscal year state moneys in excess of the state
expenditure limit established under this chapter.
(2) Except pursuant to a declaration of emergency under RCW
43.135.035 or pursuant to an appropriation under RCW 43.135.045(4)(b),
the state treasurer shall not issue or redeem any check, warrant, or
voucher that will result in a state general fund or related fund
expenditure for any fiscal year in excess of the state expenditure
limit established under this chapter. A violation of this subsection
constitutes a violation of RCW 43.88.290 and shall subject the state
treasurer to the penalties provided in RCW 43.88.300.
(3) The state expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the
previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit increased by a
percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth factor.
(4) For purposes of computing the state expenditure limit for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, the phrase "the previous fiscal
year's state expenditure limit" means the total state expenditures from
the state general fund and related funds, not including federal funds,
for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, plus the fiscal growth
factor.
(5) A state expenditure limit committee is established for the
purpose of determining and adjusting the state expenditure limit as
provided in this chapter. The members of the state expenditure limit
committee are the director of financial management, the attorney
general or the attorney general's designee, and the chairs and ranking
minority members of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on appropriations. All actions of
the state expenditure limit committee taken pursuant to this chapter
require an affirmative vote of at least four members.
(6)(a) Prior to final passage of the omnibus operating budget by
the legislature, the expenditure limit committee shall meet to adjust
the expenditure limit for transfers and cost shifts under RCW
43.135.035 (4) and (5) and 43.135.060(2). If necessary, the committee
shall make further adjustments after the governor signs the omnibus
operating budget.
(b) Each November, the state expenditure limit committee shall
adjust the expenditure limit for the preceding fiscal year based on
actual expenditures and known changes in the fiscal growth factor and
then project an expenditure limit for the next two fiscal years. If,
by November 30th, the state expenditure limit committee has not adopted
the expenditure limit adjustment and projected expenditure limit as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, the attorney general or his
or her designee shall adjust or project the expenditure limit, as
necessary.
(7) "Fiscal growth factor" means the average ((growth in state
personal income for the prior ten fiscal years)) of the sum of
inflation and population change for each of the prior three fiscal
years.
(8) "General fund" means the state general fund.
(9) "Related fund" means the health services account, violence
reduction and drug enforcement account, public safety and education
account, water quality account, education legacy accountant, or student
achievement fund.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.135.035 and 2005 c 72 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax
shifts may be taken only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each
house, and then only if state expenditures in any fiscal year,
including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure limits
established under this chapter. However, for legislation enacted
between the effective date of this 2005 act and June 30, 2007, any
action or combination of actions by the legislature that raises state
revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax shifts may be taken with the
approval of a majority of members elected to each house, so long as
state expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will
not exceed the state expenditure limits established under this chapter.
(2)(a) ((If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until))
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, total
expenditures from the state general fund and related funds may exceed
the expenditure limit only after the expenditures are approved by a
vote of the people at a November general election. ((The state
expenditure limit committee shall adjust the state expenditure limit by
the amount of additional revenue approved by the voters under this
section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of revenue
generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be
adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative
action.))
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall ((taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a))
state spending ((increase)) be increased above last year's authorized
spending adjusted for inflation and population increases?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a ((two-thirds)) three-fifths vote of each house of the
legislature and signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the
nature of the emergency((, which is limited to natural disasters that
require immediate government action to alleviate human suffering and
provide humanitarian assistance)). The state expenditure limit may be
exceeded for no more than twenty-four months following the declaration
of the emergency and only for the purposes contained in the emergency
declaration.
(b) ((Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c))) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund on or after January 1, 1993, to another source
of funding, or if moneys are transferred from the state general fund to
another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee, acting
pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure limit
to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a transfer of
money from the state general fund to another fund or account includes
any state legislative action taken that has the effect of reducing
revenues from a particular source, where such revenues would otherwise
be deposited into the state general fund, while increasing the revenues
from that particular source to another state or local government
account. This subsection does not apply to the dedication or use of
lottery revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW
84.52.068, in support of education or education expenditures.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted to the
state general fund on or after January 1, 2000, from another source of
funding, or if moneys are transferred to the state general fund from
another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee, acting
pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall increase the state expenditure
limit to reflect the shift.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.135.035 and 2005 c 72 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax
shifts may be taken only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each
house, and then only if state expenditures in any fiscal year,
including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure limits
established under this chapter.
(2)(a) ((If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until))
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, total
expenditures from the state general fund and related funds may exceed
the expenditure limit only after the expenditures are approved by a
vote of the people at a November general election. ((The state
expenditure limit committee shall adjust the state expenditure limit by
the amount of additional revenue approved by the voters under this
section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of revenue
generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be
adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative
action.))
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall ((taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a))
state spending ((increase)) be increased above last year's authorized
spending adjusted for ((personal income growth)) inflation and
population increases?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a ((two-thirds)) three-fifths vote of each house of the
legislature and signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the
nature of the emergency((, which is limited to natural disasters that
require immediate government action to alleviate human suffering and
provide humanitarian assistance)). The state expenditure limit may be
exceeded for no more than twenty-four months following the declaration
of the emergency and only for the purposes contained in the emergency
declaration.
(b) ((Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c))) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund or a related fund to another source of funding,
or if moneys are transferred from the state general fund or a related
fund to another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee,
acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure
limit to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a
transfer of money from the state general fund or a related fund to
another fund or account includes any state legislative action taken
that has the effect of reducing revenues from a particular source,
where such revenues would otherwise be deposited into the state general
fund or a related fund, while increasing the revenues from that
particular source to another state or local government account. This
subsection does not apply to the dedication or use of lottery revenues
under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW 84.52.068, in
support of education or education expenditures.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function and the ongoing
revenue necessary to fund the program or function are shifted to the
state general fund or a related fund on or after January 1, 2007, the
state expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW
43.135.025(5), shall increase the state expenditure limit to reflect
the shift.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 2005 c 72 s 3 is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 and 3 of this act expire July 1,
2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2 and 4 of this act take effect
July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Except for sections 1, 2, and 5 of this act,
this act takes effect if the proposed amendment to Article VIII,
section . . . of the state Constitution (HJR . . . ., H-4189/06) is
validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at a
general election held in November 2006. If the proposed amendment is
not approved and ratified, sections 3 and 4 of this act are void in
their entirety.

--- END ---