BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.26.080 and 1999 c 94 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created in the motor vehicle fund the urban
arterial trust account. The intent of the urban arterial trust account
program is to improve the arterial street system of the state by
improving mobility and safety while supporting an environment essential
to the quality of life of the citizens of the state of Washington. The
((city hardship assistance)) road transfer program, as provided in RCW
47.26.164, and the small city arterial program, as provided for in RCW
47.26.115, are implemented within the urban arterial trust account.
The board shall not allocate funds, nor make payments of the funds
under RCW 47.26.260, to any county, city, or town identified by the
governor under RCW 36.70A.340.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.26.115 and 1999 c 94 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
The intent of the small city arterial program is to preserve and
improve the roadway system consistent with local needs of incorporated
cities and towns with a population of less than five thousand. The
board shall adopt rules and procedures to govern the allocation of
funds distributed to the small city arterial program.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.26.121 and 1996 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((There is hereby created a)) The transportation improvement
board of ((twenty-one)) twenty members is created, six of whom shall be
county members and six of whom shall be city members. The remaining
members shall be: (a) One representative ((appointed by the governor))
who shall be a state employee with responsibility for transportation
policy, planning, or funding; (b) two representatives from the
department of transportation; (c) ((two)) one representative((s)) of
public transit systems; (d) a private sector representative; (e) a
member representing the ports; (f) a member representing nonmotorized
transportation; and (g) a member representing special needs
transportation.
(2) Of the county members of the board, one shall be a county
engineer or public works director of a county with a population of one
hundred twenty-five thousand or more; one shall be ((the executive
director of the county road administration board)) a county engineer or
public works director of a county of less than one hundred twenty-five
thousand population; one shall be a county planning director or
planning manager; one shall be a county executive, councilmember, or
commissioner from a county with a population of one hundred twenty-five
thousand or more; one shall be a county executive, councilmember, or
commissioner of a county who serves on the board of a public transit
system; and one shall be a county executive, councilmember, or
commissioner from a county with a population of less than one hundred
twenty-five thousand. ((All county members of the board, except the
executive director of the county road administration board, shall be
appointed.)) Not more than one county member of the board shall be
from any one county. No more than two of the three county-elected
officials may represent counties located in either the eastern or
western part of the state as divided north and south by the summit of
the Cascade mountains.
(3) Of the city members of the board one shall be a chief city
engineer, public works director, or other city employee with
responsibility for public works activities, of a city with a population
of twenty thousand or more; one shall be a chief city engineer, public
works director, or other city employee with responsibility for public
works activities, of a city of less than twenty thousand population;
one shall be a city planning director or planning manager; one shall be
a mayor, commissioner, or city councilmember of a city with a
population of twenty thousand or more; one shall be a mayor,
commissioner, or city councilmember of a city who serves on the board
of a public transit system; and one shall be a mayor, commissioner, or
councilmember of a city of less than twenty thousand population. ((All
of the city members shall be appointed.)) Not more than one city
member of the board shall be from any one city. No more than two of
the three city-elected officials may represent cities located in either
the eastern or western part of the state as divided north and south by
the summit of the Cascade mountains.
(4) ((Of)) The transit member((s, at least one shall)) must be a
general manager, executive director, or transit director of a public
transit system ((in an urban area with a population over two hundred
thousand and at least one representative from a rural or small urban
transit system in an area with a population less than two hundred
thousand)).
(5) The private sector member shall be a citizen with business,
management, and transportation related experience and shall be active
in a business community-based transportation organization.
(6) The port member shall be a commissioner or senior staff person
of a public port.
(7) The nonmotorized transportation member shall be a citizen with
a demonstrated interest and involvement with a nonmotorized
transportation group.
(8) The specialized transportation member shall be a citizen with
a demonstrated interest and involvement with a statewide specialized
needs transportation group.
(9) The governor shall make all appointments ((of county, city,
Washington department of transportation, transit, port, nonmotorized
transportation, special needs transportation, and private sector
representatives shall be made by the secretary of the department of
transportation. Appointees shall be chosen)) from a list of two
persons for each position nominated by the Washington state association
of counties for county members, the association of Washington cities
for city members, the Washington state transit association for the
transit member((s)), and the Washington public ports association for
the port member. The private sector, nonmotorized transportation, and
special needs members shall be sought through classified advertisements
in selected newspapers collectively serving all urban areas of the
state, and other appropriate means. Persons applying for the private
sector, nonmotorized transportation, or special needs transportation
member position must provide a letter of interest and a resume to the
((secretary of the department of transportation)) governor. In the
case of a vacancy, the appointment shall be only for the remainder of
the unexpired term in which the vacancy has occurred. A vacancy shall
be deemed to have occurred on the board when any member elected to
public office completes that term of office or is removed therefrom for
any reason or when any member employed by a political subdivision
terminates such employment for whatsoever reason or when a private
sector, nonmotorized transportation, or special needs transportation
member resigns or is unable or unwilling to serve.
(10) Appointments shall be for terms of four years. Terms of all
appointed members shall expire on June 30th of even-numbered years.
The initial term of appointed members may be for less than four years.
No appointed member may serve more than two consecutive four-year
terms.
(11) The board shall elect a chair from among its members for a
two-year term.
(12) Expenses of the board shall be paid in accordance with RCW
47.26.140.
(13) For purposes of this section, "public transit system" means a
city-owned transit system, county transportation authority,
metropolitan municipal corporation, public transportation benefit area,
or regional transit authority.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.26.140 and 1999 c 94 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
The transportation improvement board shall appoint an executive
director, who shall serve at its pleasure and whose salary shall be set
by the board, and may employ additional staff as it deems appropriate.
All costs associated with staff, together with travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, shall be paid from the
urban arterial trust account((, public transportation systems
account,)) and the transportation improvement account in the motor
vehicle fund as determined by the biennial appropriation.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.26.164 and 1999 c 94 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall adopt reasonable rules necessary to implement the
((city hardship assistance)) road transfer program as recommended by
the road jurisdiction study.
The following criteria shall be used to implement the program:
(1) Only those cities with a net gain in cost responsibility due to
jurisdictional transfers in chapter 342, Laws of 1991, as determined by
the board, may participate;
(2) Cities with populations of fifteen thousand or less, as
determined by the office of financial management, may participate;
(3) The board shall develop criteria and procedures under which
eligible cities may request funding for rehabilitation projects on city
streets acquired under chapter 342, Laws of 1991; and
(4) The board shall also be authorized to allocate funds from the
((city hardship assistance)) road transfer program to cities with a
population under twenty thousand to offset extraordinary costs
associated with the transfer of roadways other than pursuant to chapter
342, Laws of 1991, that occur after January 1, 1991.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.26.190 and 1994 c 179 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall adopt rules that provide geographical diversity in
selecting improvement projects to be funded from the urban arterial
trust account and ((small city)) transportation improvement account
funds.

--- END ---