BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission shall establish an annual big game special hunting
season, as defined in RCW 77.32.007, which shall be known as the
"active duty special hunt." The commission shall grant permits for the
hunt only to individuals who can demonstrate absence from the most
recent big game hunting seasons for deer or elk due to active duty in
the United States armed forces, national guard, or the reserves. The
season may be no longer than seven days and is limited to game
management units, as that term is defined in chapter 232-28 WAC as
existing on the effective date of this section, that provided deer and
elk hunting opportunities during the previous general hunting season.

--- END ---