BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.070 and 2005 c 418 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Applicants for a license, permit, tag, or stamp shall furnish
the information required by the director. However, the director may
not require the purchaser of a razor clam license under RCW 77.32.520
to provide any personal information except for proof of residency. The
commission may adopt rules requiring licensees or permittees to keep
records and make reports concerning the taking of or effort to harvest
fish, shellfish, and wildlife. The reporting requirement may be waived
where, for any reason, the department is not able to receive the
report. The department must provide reasonable options for a licensee
to submit information to a live operator prior to the reporting
deadline.
(2) The commission may, by rule, set an administrative penalty for
failure to comply with rules requiring the reporting of taking or
effort to harvest wildlife. The commission may also adopt rules
requiring hunters who have not reported for the previous license year
to complete a report and pay the assessed administrative penalty before
a new hunting license is issued.
(a) The total administrative penalty per hunter set by the
commission must not exceed ten dollars.
(b) By December 31st of each year, the department shall report the
rate of hunter compliance with the harvest reporting requirement, the
administrative penalty imposed for failing to report, and the amount of
administrative penalties collected during that year to the appropriate
fiscal and policy committees of the senate and house of
representatives.
(3) The commission shall annually collect information from hunters
regarding the estimated number of miles driven and the consumption of
fuel while hunting and operating a motor vehicle or an off-road vehicle
on nonhighway roads as defined in RCW 46.09.020.

--- END ---