BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.260 and 1994 c 249 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each growth management hearings board shall consist of three
members qualified by experience or training in matters pertaining to
land use planning and residing within the jurisdictional boundaries of
the applicable board. At least one member of each board must be
admitted to practice law in this state and at least one member must
have been a city or county elected official. Each board shall be
appointed by the governor ((and)) with the advice and consent of the
senate. Not more than two members at the time of appointment or during
their term shall be members of the same political party. No more than
two members at the time of appointment or during their term shall
reside in the same county.
(2) Each member of a board shall be appointed for a term of six
years. A vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the governor for
the unexpired portion of the term in which the vacancy occurs. The
terms of the first three members of a board shall be staggered so that
one member is appointed to serve until July 1, 1994, one member until
July 1, 1996, and one member until July 1, 1998.

--- END ---