BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.06.022 and 2002 c 354 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter, "manager" means any employee who:
(1) Formulates statewide policy ((or)) and directs the work of an
agency or agency subdivision;
(2) Is responsible to administer one or more statewide ((policies
or)) programs of an agency or agency subdivision; or
(3) Manages, administers, and controls a local branch office of an
agency or agency subdivision, including the direct responsibility and
spending authority for at least one percent of the assigned agency's
physical, financial, or personnel resources((;
(4) Has substantial responsibility in personnel administration,
legislative relations, public information, or the preparation and
administration of budgets; or
(5) Functionally is above the first level of supervision and
exercises authority that is not merely routine or clerical in nature
and requires the consistent use of independent judgment)).
No employee who is a member of the Washington management service
may be included in a collective bargaining unit established under RCW
41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130.

--- END ---