BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.10.067 and 2003 c 301 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the projects authorized in RCW 39.10.061, public
bodies may also use the general contractor/construction manager
contracting procedure for the construction of school district capital
demonstration projects, subject to the following conditions:
(1) The project must receive approval from the school district
project review board established under RCW 39.10.115.
(2) The school district project review board may not authorize more
than ((sixteen)) twenty-three demonstration projects valued over ten
million dollars.
(3) The school district project review board may not authorize more
than two demonstration projects valued between five and ten million
dollars and the authorization for the two demonstration projects shall
expire upon the completion of the two projects.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.10.115 and 2001 c 328 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The school district project review board is established to
review school district proposals submitted by school districts to use
alternative public works contracting procedures. The board shall
select and approve qualified projects based upon an evaluation of the
information submitted by the school district under subsection (2) of
this section. After July 1, 2001, any appointments for full terms or
to fill a vacancy shall be made by the governor and shall include the
following representatives, each having experience with public works or
commercial construction: One representative from the office of the
superintendent of public instruction; one representative from the
office of financial management; two representatives from the
construction industry, one of whom works for a construction company
with gross annual revenues of twenty million dollars or less; one
representative from the specialty contracting industry; one
representative from organized labor; one representative from the design
industry; one representative from a public body previously authorized
under this chapter to use an alternative public works contracting
procedure who has experience using such alternative contracting
procedures; one representative from school districts with ten thousand
or more annual average full-time equivalent pupils; and one
representative from school districts with fewer than ten thousand
average full-time equivalent pupils. Each member shall be appointed
for a term of three years, with the first three-year term commencing
after June 8, 2000. Any member of the school district project review
board who is directly affiliated with any applicant before the board
must recuse him or herself from consideration of the application.
(2) A school district seeking to use alternative contracting
procedures authorized under this chapter shall file an application with
the school district project review board. The application form shall
require the district to submit a detailed statement of the proposed
project, including the school district's name; student population based
upon October full-time equivalents; the current projected total budget
for the project, including the estimated construction costs, costs for
professional services, equipment and furnishing costs, off-site costs,
contract administration costs, and other related project costs; the
anticipated project design and construction schedule; a summary of the
school district's construction activity for the preceding six years;
and an explanation of why the school district believes the use of an
alternative contracting procedure is in the public interest and why the
school district is qualified to use an alternative contracting
procedure, including a summary of the relevant experience of the school
district's management team. The applicant shall also provide in a
timely manner any other information concerning implementation of
projects under this chapter requested by the school district project
review board to assist in its consideration.
(3) Any school district whose application is approved by the school
district project review board shall comply with the public notification
and review requirements in RCW 39.10.030.
(4) Any school district whose application is approved by the school
district project review board shall not use as an evaluation factor
whether a contractor submitting a bid for the approved project has had
prior general contractor/construction manager procedure experience.
(5) The school district project review board shall prepare and
issue a report reviewing the use of the alternative public works
contracting procedures by school districts. The board shall report to
the capital projects advisory review board created under RCW 39.10.810
at least thirty days before January 8, 2007.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.10.902 and 2005 c 469 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2007:
(1) RCW 39.10.010 and 1994 c 132 s 1;
(2) RCW 39.10.020 and 2005 c 469 s 3, 2003 c 352 s 1, 2003 c 301 s
2, 2003 c 300 s 3, 2001 c 328 s 1, 2000 c 209 s 1, 1997 c 376 s 1, &
1994 c 132 s 2;
(3) RCW 39.10.030 and 1997 c 376 s 2 & 1994 c 132 s 3;
(4) RCW 39.10.040 and 1994 c 132 s 4;
(5) RCW 39.10.051 and 2003 c 352 s 2, 2003 c 300 s 4, 2002 c 46 s
1, & 2001 c 328 s 2;
(6) RCW 39.10.061 and 2003 c 352 s 3, 2003 c 300 s 5, 2002 c 46 s
2, & 2001 c 328 s 3;
(7) RCW 39.10.065 and 1997 c 376 s 5;
(8) RCW 39.10.067 and 2006 c --- s 1 (section 1 of this act), 2003
c 301 s 3, 2002 c 46 s 3, & 2000 c 209 s 3;
(9) RCW 39.10.070 and 1994 c 132 s 7;
(10) RCW 39.10.080 and 1994 c 132 s 8;
(11) RCW 39.10.090 and 1994 c 132 s 9;
(12) RCW 39.10.100 and 1994 c 132 s 10;
(13) RCW 39.10.115 and 2006 c --- s 2 (section 2 of this act), 2001
c 328 s 4, & 2000 c 209 s 4;
(14) RCW 39.10.900 and 1994 c 132 s 13;
(15) RCW 39.10.901 and 1994 c 132 s 14;
(16) RCW 39.10.068 and 2003 c 300 s 6;
(17) RCW 39.10.117 and 2003 c 300 s 7; and
(18) RCW 39.10.130 and 2003 c 301 s 1.

--- END ---