BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In a prosecution for assault in the first degree, assault in
the second degree, assault in the third degree, indecent liberties,
manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second degree,
murder in the second degree, rape in the first degree, rape in the
second degree, rape in the third degree, robbery in the first degree,
or robbery in the second degree, the prosecutor may file a special
allegation that the victim of the crime stopped his or her vehicle
while traveling on a public road to provide roadside assistance to the
perpetrator of the crime, and the crime occurred while the victim was
providing such assistance.
(2) Once a special allegation has been made under this section, the
state has the burden to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the victim
of the crime stopped his or her vehicle while traveling on a public
road to provide roadside assistance to the perpetrator of the crime,
and the crime occurred while the victim was providing such assistance.
If a jury is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty,
also find a special verdict as to whether the victim of the crime
stopped his or her vehicle while traveling on a public road to provide
roadside assistance to the perpetrator of the crime, and the crime
occurred while the victim was providing such assistance. If no jury is
had, the court shall make a finding of fact as to whether the victim of
the crime stopped his or her vehicle while traveling on a public road
to provide roadside assistance to the perpetrator of the crime, and the
crime occurred while the victim was providing such assistance.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.533 and 2003 c 53 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section apply to the standard sentence
ranges determined by RCW 9.94A.510 or 9.94A.517.
(2) For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the
standard sentence range is determined by locating the sentencing grid
sentence range defined by the appropriate offender score and the
seriousness level of the completed crime, and multiplying the range by
seventy-five percent.
(3) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes
listed in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the
offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm
enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is
subject to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was
armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is
being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to
commit one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to
the standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class
C felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both,
and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements
under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has
previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July
23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection
(4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all firearm
enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of the
enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all firearm
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all
felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a firearm enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(4) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range for felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
deadly weapon enhancements based on the classification of the completed
felony crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or enhancements must be added to
the total period of confinement for all offenses, regardless of which
underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon enhancement. If the
offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other than a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of
the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon
enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this section
based on the felony crime of conviction as classified under RCW
9A.28.020:
(a) Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of at least twenty years,
or both, and not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(b) One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(c) Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C
felony or with a statutory maximum sentence of five years, or both, and
not covered under (f) of this subsection;
(d) If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c)
of this subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender
has previously been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after
July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or
subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section, or both, all deadly
weapon enhancements under this subsection shall be twice the amount of
the enhancement listed;
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all deadly weapon
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing
provisions, including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for
all offenses sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a sentence
under this subsection may be granted an extraordinary medical placement
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.728(4);
(f) The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to
all felony crimes except the following: Possession of a machine gun,
possessing a stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm,
unlawful possession of a firearm in the first and second degree, and
use of a machine gun in a felony;
(g) If the standard sentence range under this section exceeds the
statutory maximum sentence for the offense, the statutory maximum
sentence shall be the presumptive sentence unless the offender is a
persistent offender. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement
increases the sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum
for the offense, the portion of the sentence representing the
enhancement may not be reduced.
(5) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range if the offender or an accomplice committed the offense
while in a county jail or state correctional facility and the offender
is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection. If
the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in
this subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility,
and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory offense under
chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the
standard sentence range determined under subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(a) or (b) or 69.50.410;
(b) Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(2)
(c), (d), or (e);
(c) Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.4013.
For the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a
state correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part
of that facility or county jail.
(6) An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the standard
sentence range for any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter
69.50 RCW if the offense was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435 or
9.94A.605.
(7) An additional two years shall be added to the standard sentence
range for vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each
prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055.
(8) The following additional times shall be added to the standard
sentence range if there has been a finding under section 1 of this act
that the victim of the crime stopped his or her vehicle while traveling
on a public road to provide roadside assistance to the perpetrator of
the crime, and the crime occurred while the victim was providing such
assistance:
(a) Eighteen months for assault in the first degree, assault in the
second degree with a finding of sexual motivation, indecent liberties
with forcible compulsion, manslaughter in the first degree, murder in
the second degree, rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree,
or robbery in the first degree;
(b) Twelve months for assault in the second degree with no finding
of sexual motivation, indecent liberties without forcible compulsion,
manslaughter in the second degree, or robbery in the second degree;
(c) Six months for assault in the third degree or rape in the third
degree.

--- END ---