BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.50.465 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Academic employees of community and technical college districts
shall be provided an annual salary cost-of-living increase in
accordance with this section. For purposes of this section, "academic
employee" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28B.52.020.
(a) Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year, except as provided in (d) of this subsection,
each ((college)) district shall receive a cost-of-living allocation
sufficient to increase its full-time academic employee salaries,
including mandatory salary-related benefits, by the rate of the yearly
increase in the cost-of-living index.
(b)(i) Beginning with the 2006-2007 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year, each district that does not have pay parity
shall receive a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to increase its
part-time academic employee salaries, including mandatory salary-
related benefits, by the rate of two times the yearly increase in the
cost-of-living index. For purposes of this subsection (1)(b), "pay
parity" means that a district provides each of its part-time academic
employees with a salary and mandatory salary-related benefits
proportional to the percentage of a full-time faculty teaching load, as
defined by the district, the part-time academic employee works.
(ii) When a district achieves pay parity, the district shall
receive for the next fiscal year, and for each subsequent fiscal year,
a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to increase its part-time
academic employee salaries, including mandatory salary-related
benefits, by the rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living
index.
(c) A ((college)) district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
other compensation policies, except that a district shall distribute
the cost-of-living allocation under (b)(ii) of this subsection to its
part-time academic employees to ensure those employees receive an
annual cost-of-living increase equal to two times the yearly increase
in the cost-of-living index. No later than the end of the fiscal year,
each ((college)) district shall certify to the college board that it
has spent funds provided for cost-of-living increases on salaries and
salary-related benefits.
(((c))) (d) The college board shall include any funded cost-of-living increase in the salary base used to determine cost-of-living
increases for academic employees in subsequent years.
(((d))) (e) Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year except for the 2003-04 and 2004-05 fiscal years,
the state shall fully fund the cost-of-living increase set forth in
this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any fiscal year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

--- END ---