BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71A.12.025 and 1998 c 297 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that among those persons who endanger the
safety of others by committing crimes are a small number of persons
with developmental disabilities or traumatic brain injury. While their
conduct is not typical of the vast majority of persons with
developmental disabilities or traumatic brain injury who are
responsible citizens, for their own welfare and for the safety of
others the state may need to exercise control over those few dangerous
individuals who are developmentally disabled or who have traumatic
brain injury, have been charged with crimes that involve a threat to
public safety or security, and have been found either incompetent to
stand trial or not guilty by reason of insanity.
The legislature finds, however, that the use of civil commitment
procedures under chapter 71.05 RCW to effect state control over
dangerous developmentally disabled persons or dangerous persons with
traumatic brain injury has resulted in their commitment to institutions
for the mentally ill. The legislature finds that existing programs in
mental institutions may be inappropriate for persons who are
developmentally disabled or who have traumatic brain injury because the
services provided in mental institutions are oriented to persons with
mental illness, a condition not necessarily associated with
developmental disabilities or traumatic brain injury.
Therefore, the legislature believes that, where appropriate, and
subject to available funds, persons with developmental disabilities or
traumatic brain injury who have been charged with crimes that involve
a threat to public safety or security and have been found incompetent
to stand trial or not guilty by reason of insanity should receive state
services addressing their needs, that such services must be provided in
conformance with an individual habilitation plan, and that their
initial treatment should be separate and discrete from treatment for
persons involved in any other treatment or habilitation program in a
manner consistent with the needs of public safety.
The legislature intends to transfer all individuals who meet the
criteria specified in this section to Fircrest school, Seattle, King
county.

--- END ---