BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that classified
school employees are an integral part of the K-12 school system of
services and supports to our students. The public school system would
not function without the significant contributions of these employees.
Services range from maintaining our investment in the physical plants;
keeping our schools sanitary and clean; getting our students safely to
and from school; maintaining a safe and secure environment; providing
health services, food services, and clerical and financial support
services; and providing library assistance and instructional assistance
to students in the classroom, as well as many other invaluable supports
to our students, parents, and other staff within the school community.
Classified school employees provide a significant learning resource to
our younger students in preparing them to meet the state learning
standards. Classified school employees also play a major role in
developing supportive and caring relationships with our students of all
ages. The legislature believes the contribution of classified school
employees can and should be enhanced to help all of our students
succeed in meeting state learning standards.
(2) The legislature finds that the K-12 funding formula for the
allocation of classified school employees has remained unchanged since
the inception of the basic education act in 1977. The legislature
acknowledges that significant changes in the delivery of services to
students have occurred since 1977. The legislature also finds that
parental and societal expectations are dramatically different.
Furthermore, the state, with the 1993 enactment of House Bill No. 1209,
established world class learning standards for students to meet prior
to graduation from public schools. The federal government also
increased expectations for students with the 2001 passage of the no
child left behind act.
(3) The legislature has reviewed a number of previous funding
studies and conducted its own review of our state's funding of public
schools. Now the governor is in the process of studying school funding
under chapter 496, Laws of 2005 (Washington Learns). The legislature
hereby directs that the funding review by the Washington Learns
steering committee include a thorough review of funding for classified
school employees and that the Washington Learns steering committee
report findings and recommendations that include recommendations on how
classified school employees can enhance our students' abilities to meet
state learning standards.

--- END ---