BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.57.220 and 2003 c 326 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided for in RCW 16.65.090 and ((subsection (2),
(3), or (4) of)) otherwise in this section, the fee for livestock
inspection is ((eighty-five)) one dollar and sixty cents per head for
cattle and three dollars and fifty cents for horses or ((fifteen
dollars per hour and the current mileage rate set by the office of
financial management)) the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater.
(2) When cattle are identified with the owner's brand or other form
of identification specified by the director by rule, the fee for
livestock inspection is one dollar and ten cents per head or the time
and mileage fee, whichever is greater. This fee does not apply for
inspection of cattle when documenting a change of ownership with a
self-inspection certificate.
(3) No inspection is charged for a calf that is inspected before
moving out-of-state under an official temporary grazing permit if the
calf is part of a cow-calf unit and the calf is identified with the
owner's Washington-recorded brand or other form of identification
specified by the director by rule.
(4) The fee for inspection of cattle at a processing plant with a
daily capacity of no more than five hundred head of cattle where the
United States department of agriculture maintains a meat inspection
program is four dollars per head.
(5) When a single inspection certificate issued for thirty or more
horses belonging to one person, the fee for livestock inspection is two
dollars per head or ((fifteen dollars per hour and the current mileage
rate set by the office of financial management)) the time and mileage
fee, whichever is greater.
(((3))) (6) The fee for individual identification certificates is
twenty dollars for an annual certificate and sixty dollars for a
lifetime certificate or ((fifteen dollars per hour and the current
mileage rate set by the office of financial management)) the time and
mileage fee, whichever is greater. However, the fee for an annual
certificate listing thirty or more animals belonging to one person is
five dollars per head or ((fifteen dollars per hour and the current
mileage rate set by the office of financial management)) the time and
mileage fee, whichever is greater. A lifetime certificate shall not be
issued until the fee has been paid to the director.
(((4))) (7) The minimum fee for the issuance of an inspection
certificate by the director is five dollars. The minimum fee does not
apply to livestock consigned to a public livestock market or special
sale or inspected at a cattle processing plant.
(8) For purposes of this section, "the time and mileage fee" means
seventeen dollars per hour and the current mileage rate set by the
office of financial management.

Sec. 2 RCW 16.58.130 and 2003 c 326 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each licensee shall pay to the director a fee of ((seventeen))
twenty-five cents for each head of cattle handled through the
licensee's feed lot. Payment of the fee shall be made by the licensee
on a monthly basis. Failure to pay as required shall be grounds for
suspension or revocation of a certified feed lot license. The director
shall not renew a certified feed lot license if a licensee has failed
to make prompt and timely payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2006.

--- END ---