BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to: (a)
Required college textbooks sold by an institution of higher education
or at a bookstore whose principal place of business is in Washington
state to enrolled students of the institution of higher education; or
(b) required college textbooks sold by an internet retailer to enrolled
students of an institution of higher education if the internet
retailer's principal place of business is in the state of Washington.
(2) The seller shall obtain from the instructor or the institution
of higher education, in good faith, documentation showing that the
textbooks are required for the course. The seller shall maintain this
documentation as part of the records required under RCW 82.32.070.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Institution of higher education" means a college or university
which is accredited by an accrediting association recognized as such by
rule of the higher education coordinating board.
(b) "Required" means required by the instructor of a course.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of college textbooks required for courses at institutions of higher
education. The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this
section.

--- END ---