BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.84.010 and 1993 c 48 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The measure and mode of compensation of attorneys and
counselors, shall be left to the agreement, expressed or implied, of
the parties, but there shall be allowed to the prevailing party upon
the judgment certain sums ((by way of indemnity)) for the prevailing
party's expenses in the action, which allowances are termed costs,
including, in addition to costs otherwise authorized by law, the
following expenses:
(((1))) (a) Filing fees;
(((2))) (b) Fees for the service of process by a public officer,
registered process server, or other means, as follows:
(((a))) (i) When service is by a public officer, the recoverable
cost is the fee authorized by law at the time of service.
(((b))) (ii) If service is by a process server registered pursuant
to chapter 18.180 RCW or a person exempt from registration, the
recoverable cost is the amount reasonably incurred in effecting
service;
(((3))) (c) Fees for service by publication;
(((4))) (d) Notary fees, but only to the extent the fees are for
services that are expressly required by law and only to the extent they
represent actual costs incurred by the prevailing party;
(((5))) (e) Reasonable expenses, exclusive of attorneys' fees,
incurred in obtaining reports and records, which are admitted into
evidence at trial or in mandatory arbitration in superior or district
court, including but not limited to medical records, tax records,
personnel records, insurance reports, employment and wage records,
police reports, school records, bank records, and legal files;
(((6))) (f) Statutory attorney and witness fees; and
(((7))) (g) To the extent that the court or arbitrator finds that
it was necessary to achieve the successful result, the reasonable
expense of the transcription of depositions used at trial or at the
mandatory arbitration hearing: PROVIDED, That the expenses of
depositions shall be allowed on a pro rata basis for those portions of
the depositions introduced into evidence or used for purposes of
impeachment.
(2)(a) For purposes of awarding costs, including a statutory
attorneys' fee, and except as provided in RCW 4.84.110 and 4.84.120,
the plaintiff shall be considered the prevailing party if, after
commencement of the action, the defendant tenders and the plaintiff
accepts full or partial payment of the amounts sued for, and if before
such tender and acceptance the plaintiff has in writing notified the
defendant that full or partial payment of the amounts sued for may
nevertheless result in an award of costs. In such case the plaintiff
is entitled to its costs, and the court shall, upon the plaintiff's
application, enter judgment for the plaintiff for costs, except such
costs as are paid before entry of judgment.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "plaintiff" includes a
counter-claimant, cross-claimant, and third-party plaintiff; and
"defendant" includes a party defending a counter-claim, cross-claim, or
third-party claim.
(3) Nothing prevents a party from demanding, offering, or accepting
payment of statutory costs, or from reducing or waiving statutory
costs, before the entry of judgment in an action.

Sec. 2 RCW 12.20.060 and 2004 c 123 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the prevailing party in district court is entitled to
recover costs as authorized in RCW 4.84.010 in a civil action, the
judge shall add the amount thereof to the judgment; in case of failure
of the plaintiff to recover or of dismissal of the action, the judge
shall enter up a judgment in favor of the defendant for the amount of
his or her costs; and in case any party so entitled to costs is
represented in the action by an attorney, the judge shall include
((attorney's)) attorneys' fees in the amount provided in RCW 4.84.060
as part of the costs: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the plaintiff shall not
be entitled to such attorneys' fee unless he or she obtains, exclusive
of costs, a judgment in the sum of fifty dollars or more: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That if the plaintiff obtains judgment, exclusive of costs, of
at least fifty dollars but less than two hundred dollars, the judge
shall include attorneys' fees of one hundred twenty-five dollars as
part of the costs.
(2)(a) For purposes of awarding costs, including a statutory
attorneys' fee, and except as provided in RCW 12.20.040, the plaintiff
shall be considered the prevailing party if, after commencement of the
action, the defendant tenders and the plaintiff accepts full or partial
payment of the amounts sued for, and if before such tender and
acceptance the plaintiff has in writing notified the defendant that
full or partial payment of the amounts sued for may nevertheless result
in an award of costs. In such case the plaintiff is entitled to its
costs, and the court shall, upon the plaintiff's application, enter
judgment for the plaintiff for costs, except such costs as are paid
before entry of judgment. However, the plaintiff is not entitled to
statutory attorneys' fees unless the amount prayed for, exclusive of
costs, is fifty dollars or more, and if the amount prayed for,
exclusive of costs, is at least fifty dollars but less than two hundred
dollars, the judgment shall include attorneys' fees of one hundred
twenty-five dollars as part of the costs.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "plaintiff" includes a
counter-claimant, cross-claimant, and third-party plaintiff; and
"defendant" includes a party defending a counter-claim, cross-claim, or
third-party claim.
(3) Nothing prevents a party from demanding, offering, or accepting
payment of statutory costs, or from reducing or waiving statutory
costs, before the entry of judgment in an action.

--- END ---