BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before issuing or renewing a permit for a sewage system within
an aquatic rehabilitation zone in Hood Canal established under RCW
90.88.010(2), the department shall ensure that the system removes
nitrogen from the wastewater to the fullest extent practical. The
department shall specify conditions in each permit necessary to ensure
that nitrogen removal is effective. This requirement must be
implemented without requiring rule making by the department.
(2) Existing permittees under RCW 90.48.160 and 90.48.162 that
operate a sewage system within an aquatic rehabilitation zone in Hood
Canal established under RCW 90.88.010(2), may have a compliance
schedule established by the department to adopt nitrogen removal
treatment. The compliance schedule must be as short as possible and
may not extend beyond January 1, 2014. Any new system or replacement
system permitted after the effective date of this section must install
nitrogen removing treatment before a permit may be granted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within an aquatic rehabilitation zone in Hood Canal established
under RCW 90.88.010(2) the local health officer must:
(a) Designate nitrogen as a contaminant of concern for purposes of
on-site sewage system rules adopted by the state board of health under
RCW 43.20.050;
(b) Require that any on-site sewage system that is installed or
repaired on or after January 1, 2009, address nitrogen before it is
approved for use; and
(c) Require that any on-site sewage system that is in use or
approved for use before January 1, 2009, address nitrogen by January 1,
2014.
(2) If the department finds that technology to treat nitrogen from
an on-site sewage system has not been approved by the department as
required under rules adopted by the state board of health under RCW
43.20.050, or that the technology that is available has limited
performance or is prohibitively expensive, the department may in
writing authorize the local health officer up to a three-year extension
on the deadlines set out in subsection (1) of this section. If the
department authorizes an extension, it shall include the findings of
the department on the need for the extension and notify the appropriate
committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW
to read as follows:
Within an aquatic rehabilitation zone established under RCW
90.88.010(2), the department must:
(1) Require that any large on-site sewage system that is installed
or repaired on or after January 1, 2009, address nitrogen before it is
approved for use; and
(2) Require that any large on-site sewage system that is in use or
approved for use before January 1, 2009, address nitrogen by January 1,
2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of ecology shall offer financial and technical
assistance to local governments and tribal entities in the aquatic
rehabilitation zone established under RCW 90.88.010(2) to establish or
expand on-site sewage system repair and replacement local loan and
grant programs. The programs shall give priority to low-income home
owners and award grants based on financial need.

--- END ---