BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that on-going
competent operation, monitoring, and maintenance of an on-site sewage
disposal system is necessary for the protection of the consumers'
health and the environment, and therefore it is of vital interest to
the public. The legislature further finds that to protect the public
health and conserve and protect the water resources of the state, it is
necessary to require the examination and certification of the persons
responsible for providing technical maintenance of such systems and to
provide for the adoption of rules to carry out this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(3) "Maintenance" means actions necessary to keep the on-site
sewage disposal system functioning as designed, including, but not
limited to pumping tanks, cleaning and replacing pumps or filters, and
replacement of baffles in tanks.
(4) "Maintenance service provider" means an individual certified to
perform operation, monitoring, and maintenance activities for on-site
sewage disposal systems. This does not include an individual certified
by a local health officer solely to pump septic tanks.
(5) "Monitoring" means periodic or continuous checking of on-site
sewage disposal systems performed by making observations or
measurements to determine if the system is functioning as intended and
if maintenance or repairs are needed.
(6) "Operation" means adjustments made to treatment or disposal
processes to ensure proper treatment and disposal of wastewater.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Operation, monitoring, and maintenance
services for on-site sewage disposal systems may not be provided by an
individual unless the individual possesses a maintenance service
provider certificate issued by the department.
(2) This section does not apply to a homeowner operating,
monitoring, or maintaining his or her own system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The director shall adopt rules as
necessary for the administration of a system to certify persons who
provide, for a fee, operation, monitoring, and maintenance services for
on-site sewage disposal systems. The rules must include provisions
establishing minimum qualifications and procedures for the
certification of on-site sewage system maintenance service providers
and criteria for determining the kind and nature of continuing
educational requirements for renewal of certification, if any.
(2) The department may establish different levels of certification
for maintenance service providers that account for varying levels of
system complexity or geographical requirements due to soil types or
other conditions.
(3) The director must enforce rules adopted under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The issuance and renewal of a maintenance
service provider certificate is subject to the following conditions:
(1) A certificate must be issued if the maintenance service
provider has:
(a) Satisfactorily passed an examination;
(b) Paid the department an application fee as established by the
department under RCW 43.70.250; and
(c) Met the requirements specified in the rules adopted in
accordance with this chapter.
(2) Every certificate must be renewed annually upon the payment of
a fee as established by the department under RCW 43.70.250 and
satisfactory evidence is presented to the department that the
maintenance service provider has fulfilled the continuing education
requirements, if any, as prescribed by rules adopted in accordance with
this chapter.
(3) The department shall provide for reciprocal certification of
any individual certified as an on-site sewage operation and maintenance
specialist by a local health jurisdiction in Washington state without
additional examination until the certification issued by the local
health jurisdiction is required to be renewed.
(4) A maintenance service provider who has failed to renew a
certificate pursuant to the provisions of this section and the rules
adopted in accordance with this chapter may reapply for certification
and the director may require the provider to meet the requirements
established for new applicants.
(5) The department may deny, suspend, modify, or revoke a
certificate for failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter
or any rule adopted under this chapter. A certificate may be denied,
suspended, modified, or revoked on any of the following grounds:
(a) Committing fraud or misrepresentation in applying for or
obtaining a certificate or a recertification or reinstatement of a
certificate;
(b) Negligent maintenance or inspection of an on-site sewage
system;
(c) Violating the requirements of this chapter or any lawful rules
or orders of the department; or
(d) Receipt by the department from the department of social and
health services certification pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320(7) that the
maintenance service provider is not in compliance with a child support
order.
(6) No person whose certificate is revoked under this chapter is
eligible to apply for a certificate for one year from the effective
date of the final order of revocation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Any person violating a provision of this
chapter may be fined up to two hundred fifty dollars per day.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department shall adopt rules for
carrying out the provisions of this chapter in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW.
(2) The department shall develop the rules required to implement
this chapter with the advice of a committee composed of members from
agencies, professions, organizations, and individuals having knowledge
and interest in on-site sewage system operation, monitoring, and
maintenance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---