BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that there is a
need to assure that motor fuel and other petroleum products are
available at fair prices to all consumers in Washington. Although oil
companies are entitled to receive a fair return on their investments,
they should be discouraged from using natural disasters, emergencies,
or other events to dramatically increase profitability by raising
prices to Washington consumers. The legislature further recognizes
that prices and availability of petroleum impact the economy of the
state and the quality of life for Washington residents. It is the
intent of the legislature to require oil companies to disclose certain
materially significant information in order to protect consumers and
businesses from rising costs.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.01.040 and 1985 c 450 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The utilities and transportation commission shall:
(1) Exercise all the powers and perform all the duties prescribed
therefor by this title and by Title 81 RCW, or by any other law.
(2) Regulate in the public interest, as provided by the public
service laws, the rates, services, facilities, and practices of all
persons engaging in the transportation by whatever means of persons or
property within this state for compensation, and related activities;
including, but not limited to, air transportation companies, auto
transportation companies, express companies, freight and freight line
companies, motor freight companies, motor transportation agents,
private car companies, railway companies, sleeping car companies,
steamboat companies, street railway companies, toll bridge companies,
storage warehousemen, and wharfingers and warehousemen.
(3) Regulate in the public interest, as provided by the public
service laws, the rates, services, facilities, and practices of all
persons engaging within this state in the business of supplying any
utility service or commodity to the public for compensation, and
related activities; including, but not limited to, electrical
companies, gas companies, irrigation companies, telecommunications
companies, and water companies.
(4) Facilitate the availability of information to consumers
regarding the price and availability of petroleum products.
(5) Make such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry
out its other powers and duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Bulk quantities" means transactions of volumes exceeding the
capacity of trucks or vehicles utilizing public roads, including but
not limited to petroleum products transported via rail, ship, barge,
pipeline, or other means.
(2) "Class of trade" means a class of purchasers, such as motor
fuel retailers or wholesale distributors, that purchase petroleum
products from an oil company. Retail motor fuel outlets operated by an
oil company, its subsidiary, or its affiliate shall be considered in
the same class of trade as motor fuel retailers as defined in RCW
19.120.010(7). Class of trade does not include end users that purchase
petroleum products for their own consumption.
(3) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(4) "Oil company" means any person, firm, corporation, or entity
engaged in the refining of crude oil into petroleum products within
Washington state or the exporting of bulk quantities of petroleum
products refined in Washington outside the boundaries of the state.
"Oil company" includes any person, firm, corporation, or entity that
controls or is controlled by an oil company, and includes any
subsidiary or affiliated corporation in which the oil company or its
shareholders, officers, agents, or employees hold more than twenty-five
percent of the voting shares.
(5) "Petroleum products" means gasoline, gasoline components,
diesel, and residential heating oil.
(6) "Price" means the net purchase price, after adjustment for
commission, brokerage, rebate, discount, or any other adjustment. The
value of petroleum products exchanged or transferred between oil
companies or motor fuel delivered to a retail motor fuel outlet
operated by the same oil company, its subsidiary, or its affiliate
shall be considered the price.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Each oil company must file with the
commission schedules in the form the commission prescribes, containing
the following information:
(a) All prices established, enforced, or to be charged in each
location of the state that are set and known to the oil company before
a sale, transfer, or assignment of petroleum products to any persons
within any class of trade;
(b) All recent intrastate transactions or export shipments of bulk
quantities of petroleum products, including but not limited to the
following information:
(i) The date and location of the petroleum products;
(ii) The type, volume, and price of the petroleum products;
(iii) The parties involved in the transaction; and
(iv) The port of exit and final destination of petroleum products
exported out of the state;
(c) The recent refining profit margins for each petroleum product
refined in a refinery within the state of Washington; and
(d) Any other information deemed necessary by the commission.
(2) An oil company shall not charge, demand, collect, or receive
compensation for any product at a rate or price that differs from the
schedule that is effective on the date of the transaction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) No change shall be made in any price for
petroleum products contained in a schedule filed by an oil company in
compliance with section 4 of this act without filing prior notice to
the commission, in the form the commission prescribes, stating the
changes to be made to the schedule then in force.
(2) The commission shall provide oil companies with the ability to
file notices at any point in time throughout the year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The commission shall:
(a) Exercise all the powers and perform all the duties prescribed
by this chapter;
(b) Make rules necessary to carry out the purposes, powers, or
duties assigned by this chapter;
(c) Utilizing the best technology then readily available, provide
public access to petroleum pricing and supply information; and
(d) Regulate, make rules, or enforce this chapter consistent with
the powers and duties granted to the commission and attorney general
for public service companies under this title.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to give the
commission the power to set or establish prices, rates, charges, or
compensation of an oil company.
(3) In all respects in which the commission has power and authority
under this chapter, complaints may be made and filed with it, process
issued, hearings held, opinions, orders, and decisions made and filed,
petitions for rehearing filed and acted upon, and petitions for writs
of review, to the superior court filed therewith, appeals or mandate
filed with the supreme court of this state, considered and disposed of
by the courts in the manner, under the conditions, and subject to the
limitations, and with the effect specified in this title for public
service companies generally.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Any oil company that violates or fails
to comply with the provisions of this chapter is subject to a civil
penalty of not less than two thousand dollars for each violation or
failure to comply.
(2) Each day upon which a violation occurs constitutes a separate
violation for the purposes of subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The attorney general may bring an action
in the name of the state against any oil company to restrain and
prevent the doing of any act prohibited or declared unlawful in this
chapter. The attorney general may, in the discretion of the court,
recover the costs of an action, including reasonable attorneys' fees.
The court may make such additional orders or judgments as may be
necessary to restore to any person in interest any moneys or property,
real or personal, which may have been acquired by means of an act
prohibited or declared to be unlawful in this chapter.
(2) Nothing in this chapter limits the power of the state to punish
any oil company for any conduct that constitutes a crime by statute or
at common law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Every oil company subject to regulation
by the commission shall, by April 1st of each year, file with the
commission a statement on oath showing its gross operating revenue from
intrastate operations for the preceding calendar year.
(2) Unless decreased as provided in subsection (3) of this section,
every oil company subject to regulation by the commission shall pay to
the commission a fee equal to one-tenth of one percent of the first
fifty thousand dollars of gross operating revenue, plus two-tenths of
one percent of any gross operating revenue in excess of fifty thousand
dollars. The fee shall, in no case, be less than one dollar.
(3) The percentage rates of fees as set forth in subsection (2) of
this section may be decreased by the commission by general order
entered before March 1st of such year.
(4) All money collected under the provisions of this section shall
within thirty days be paid to the state treasurer and credited to the
public service revolving fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act may be known and cited as the
petroleum consumers bill of rights act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act applies prospectively to all
actions and conduct occurring after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act shall be liberally construed to
give full effect to the objectives and purposes for which it was
enacted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 3 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---