BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory board" means the state advisory board of sprinkler
fitters.
(2) "Certificate" means a certificate of competency granted by the
director under the terms of this chapter, and is valid within the state
and all political subdivisions and meets all of the requirements for
license or certification that may be applied by the political
subdivisions.
(3) "Contractor" means any person, corporation, or other entity,
licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.160 RCW, which performs any
work covered by the provisions of this chapter.
(4) "Director" means the state director of fire protection.
(5) "Fire protection sprinkler fitting" means installing, testing,
altering, repairing, inspecting, renovating, and maintaining sprinkler,
standpipe, hose, or other hazard systems for fire protection purposes,
that is an assembly of underground or overhead piping or conduit
beginning at the connection to the primary water supply, whether public
or private, fire hydrants, hydrant mains, sprinkler tank heaters, air
lines, linear detection systems, aspirating detection systems, and all
tanks and pumps attached thereto.
(6) "Journey-level sprinkler fitter" means any person who has been
issued a certificate of competency by the director as provided by this
chapter.
(7) "NFPA 13-D" means the standard in use by the national fire
protection association for the installation of fire protection
sprinkler systems in one and two-family dwellings and manufactured
homes whenever the provisions of this chapter are applied.
(8) "NFPA 13-R" means the standard in use by the national fire
protection association for the installation of fire protection
sprinkler systems in residential dwellings up to and including four
stories in height whenever the provisions of this chapter are applied.
(9) "Residential sprinkler fitter" means anyone who has been issued
a residential certificate of competency limited to installation,
maintenance, and repair of the fire protection sprinkler system of
residential occupancies as defined by NFPA 13-D and NFPA 13-R.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) No person may engage in the trade of
fire protection sprinkler fitting without having a valid journey-level
sprinkler fitter certificate of competency, residential sprinkler
fitter certificate of competency, or temporary permit.
(2) No contractor may employ a person in violation of subsection
(1) of this section to perform fire protection sprinkler fitting work.
(3) A person found by the director to have committed an infraction
under this chapter shall be assessed a monetary penalty of five hundred
dollars.
(4) Each day in which a person engages in the trade of fire
protection sprinkler fitting in violation of subsection (1) of this
section or employs a person in violation of subsection (2) of this
section is considered a separate infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A person who applies for a journey-level
sprinkler fitter certificate of competency as provided in this chapter
shall provide evidence to the director that he or she has completed
eight thousand hours of trade-related fire protection sprinkler fitting
experience.
(2) Any person who applies for a residential sprinkler fitter
certificate of competency as provided in this chapter shall provide
evidence to the director that he or she has completed four thousand
hours of trade-related fire protection sprinkler fitting or residential
fire protection sprinkler experience.
(3) An applicant for a certificate of competency shall submit an
application to the director and pay a fifty-dollar application fee.
(4) The director may grant and issue temporary permits in lieu of
certificates of competency when a journey-level sprinkler fitter or
residential sprinkler fitter from another state, who meets the
requirements of this section, submits an application with a fifty-dollar filing fee for a temporary permit to engage in fire protection
sprinkler fitting as a journey-level sprinkler fitter or as a
residential sprinkler fitter until such time as an application for a
certificate of competency is submitted and approved. A temporary
certificate may not be granted for a period of more than ninety days
from the date of issuance.
(5) The director may, upon receipt of an application for
examination waiver, grant a certificate of competency without
examination to any applicant who is a certified journey-level sprinkler
fitter or residential sprinkler fitter from a state whose requirements
for certification are at least substantially equivalent to the
requirements of this state, and which extends the same privileges of
reciprocity to journey-level sprinkler fitters or residential sprinkler
fitters certified in this state.
(6) The director shall grant a certificate of competency without an
examination to all applicants who, during the ninety days following the
effective date of this section, submit an application for such
certification, along with a fifty-dollar filing fee and evidence of his
or her employment as a journey-level sprinkler fitter or residential
sprinkler fitter for a period of not less than eight thousand hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The director, with the advice of the
advisory board established in section 6 of this act, shall prepare a
written examination to be administered to applicants for certificates
of competency for journey-level sprinkler fitter and residential
sprinkler fitter.
(2) The director shall administer the written examination to
eligible persons. Prior to taking the examination, all applicants
shall pay an examination fee of fifty dollars to the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The director shall issue a certificate
of competency to all eligible applicants who pass the written
examination required under section 4 of this act. The certificate must
bear the date of issuance and expires three years following the date of
issuance. A person may renew his or her certification by submitting to
the director an application for renewal with an application fee of
fifty dollars.
(2) If a person fails to renew the certificate prior to its
expiration, he or she must reapply for certification in accordance with
this section, and retake the written examination required under section
4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) There is created a state advisory board
of sprinkler fitters, composed of five members as follows: Two
journey-level sprinkler fitters, appointed by the governor; two
contractors licensed under chapter 18.160 RCW, appointed by the
governor; and the director or the director's designee.
(2) The terms of one journey-level sprinkler fitter and one
contractor expire two years after appointment; and the terms of the
second journey-level sprinkler fitter and the second contractor expire
three years after appointment. Upon the expiration of each term, a new
member must be appointed by the governor to serve for a term of three
years.
(3) The advisory board shall carry out all the functions and duties
set forth in this chapter, as well as generally advise the director on
all matters relating to this chapter.
(4) Each member of the advisory board must be reimbursed for travel
expenses when attending scheduled meetings of the advisory board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The fire protection sprinkler fitting
certificate account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All receipts from fees established under this chapter must be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
administering this chapter. Only the director or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 An authorized representative of the director
may investigate alleged violations of this chapter. Upon request of an
authorized representative, a person performing fire protection
sprinkler fitting or residential sprinkler fitting work must produce
evidence that he or she has a certificate or permit issued by the
director in accordance with this chapter. Failure to produce such
evidence is an infraction as provided in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A person wishing to appeal a determination
of infraction under this chapter must file an appeal within twenty days
of the date of the notice of infraction in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---