BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.48.030 and 1994 c 81 s 83 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except to the extent preempted by federal law, the right to fix and
regulate the speed of railway trains within the limits of any city or
town other than a first class city, and at grade crossings as defined
in RCW 81.53.010 where such grade crossings are outside the limits of
cities and towns, is vested exclusively in the commission: PROVIDED,
That RCW 81.48.030 and 81.48.040 shall not apply to street railways
which may be operating or hereafter operated within the limits of said
cities and towns.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.48.040 and 1994 c 81 s 84 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After due investigation, the commission shall make and issue an
order fixing and regulating the speed of railway trains within the
limits of cities and towns other than first class cities. Except to
the extent preempted by federal law, the speed limit to be fixed by the
commission shall be discretionary, and it may fix different rates of
speed for different cities and towns, which rates of speed shall be
commensurate with the hazard presented and the practical operation of
the trains. Except to the extent preempted by federal law, the
commission shall also fix and regulate the speed of railway trains at
grade crossings as defined in RCW 81.53.010 where such grade crossings
are outside the limits of cities and towns when in the judgment of the
commission the public safety so requires; such speed limit to be fixed
shall be discretionary with the commission and may be different for
different grade crossings and shall be commensurate with the hazard
presented and the practical operation of trains. The commission shall
have the right from time to time, as conditions change, to either
increase or decrease speed limits established under RCW 81.48.030 and
81.48.040.
(2) Any speed limit that the commission fixed by order prior to the
effective date of this act, but without finding an "essentially local
safety hazard" within the meaning of P.L. 91-458, Sec. 205 (49 U.S.C.
Sec. 20106), has no force or effect.
(3) Before increasing operating speeds, the railroad company,
government agency, or jurisdiction that owns or operates the railroad
must provide a sixty-day written notice to the commission and to either
the governing body of the city or town within which the limit applies
or the road authority that has control over the grade crossing at which
the limit applies. In the notice, the railroad company, government
agency, or jurisdiction must provide the existing timetable speed
limits and new passenger and freight speed limits, the milepost limits
where the speed increase is to occur, and the federal track class
standard to which the track will be maintained. At the end of sixty
days, the railroad company, government agency, or jurisdiction may
raise the speed limit unless the commission staff, after investigation,
finds that a limit lower than any allowed by federal regulation is
necessary to reduce or eliminate an essentially local safety hazard.
In the event of such a finding by the staff that is not agreed to by
the railroad company, government agency, or jurisdiction, the matter
shall be scheduled for a hearing before the commission. A railroad
company, government agency, or jurisdiction may provide no more than
five notices in any sixty-day period without the consent of the
commission. The railroad company, government agency, or jurisdiction
and the commission may extend the sixty-day period by mutual consent.

--- END ---