BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.041 and 1985 c 390 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The term "services and activities fees" as used in this
chapter is defined to mean fees, other than tuition fees, charged to
all students registering at the state's community colleges, regional
universities, The Evergreen State College, and state universities.
(b) Services and activities fees shall be used as otherwise
provided by law or by rule ((or regulation)) of the board of trustees
or regents of each of the state's community colleges, The Evergreen
State College, the regional universities, or the state universities for
the express purpose of funding student activities and programs of their
particular institution.
(c) Student activity fees, student use fees, student building use
fees, special student fees, or other similar fees charged to all full
time students, or to all students, as the case may be, registering at
the state's colleges or universities and pledged for the payment of
bonds heretofore or hereafter issued for, or other indebtedness
incurred to pay, all or part of the cost of acquiring, constructing or
installing any lands, buildings, or facilities of the nature described
in RCW 28B.10.300 as now or hereafter amended, shall be included within
and deemed to be services and activities fees.
(2) Only the portion of the services and activities fees that is
used for the purposes in subsection (1)(c) of this section is
mandatory.
(3) Services and activities fees used for purposes other than those
in subsection (1)(c) of this section are voluntary. The proportionate
amount of the services and activities fees assessed for each voluntary
purpose shall be itemized on each student's billing statement. The
statement shall provide a method for students to designate those
purposes and their respective fees that the student wishes to include
in his or her services and activities fees.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.045 and 1994 c 41 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature recognizes that institutional governing boards have
a responsibility to manage and protect institutions of higher
education. This responsibility includes ensuring certain lawful
agreements for which revenues from services and activities fees have
been pledged. Such lawful agreements include, but are not limited to,
bond covenant agreements and other contractual obligations.
Institutional governing boards are also expected to protect the
stability of programs that benefit students.
The legislature also recognizes that services and activities fees
are paid by students for the express purpose of funding student
services and programs. It is the intent of the legislature that
governing boards ensure that students have a strong voice in
recommending budgets for services and activities fees. The boards of
trustees and the boards of regents of the respective institutions of
higher education shall adopt guidelines governing the establishment and
funding of programs supported by services and activities fees. Such
guidelines shall stipulate procedures for budgeting and expending
services and activities fee revenue. Any such guidelines shall be
consistent with the following provisions:
(1) Student representatives from the services and activities fee
committee and representatives of the college or university
administration shall have an opportunity to address the board before
board decisions on services and activities fee budgets and dispute
resolution actions are made.
(2) Members of the governing boards shall adhere to the principle
that services and activities fee committee desires be given priority
consideration on funding items that do not fall into the categories of
preexisting contractual obligations, bond covenant agreements, or
stability for programs affecting students.
(3) Responsibility for proposing to the administration and the
governing board program priorities and budget levels for that portion
of program budgets that derive from services and activities fees shall
reside with a services and activities fee committee, on which students
shall hold at least a majority of the voting memberships, such student
members shall represent diverse student interests, and shall be
recommended by the student government association or its equivalent.
The chairperson of the services and activities fee committee shall be
selected by the members of that committee. The governing board shall
insure that the services and activities fee committee provides an
opportunity for all viewpoints to be heard at a public meeting during
its consideration of the funding of student programs and activities.
(4) The services and activities fee committee shall evaluate
existing and proposed programs and submit budget recommendations for
the expenditure of those services and activities fees with supporting
documents simultaneously to the college or university governing board
and administration.
(5) The college or university administration shall review the
services and activities fee committee budget recommendations and
publish a written response to the services and activities fee
committee. This response shall outline potential areas of difference
between the committee recommendations and the administration's proposed
budget recommendations. This response, with supporting documentation,
shall be submitted to the services and activities fee committee in a
timely manner to allow adequate consideration.
(6)(a) In the event of a dispute or disputes involving the services
and activities fee committee recommendations, the college or university
administration shall meet with the services and activities fee
committee in a good faith effort to resolve such dispute or disputes
prior to submittal of final recommendations to the governing board.
(b) If said dispute is not resolved within fourteen days, a dispute
resolution committee shall be convened by the chair of the services and
activities fee committee within fourteen days.
(7) The dispute resolution committee shall be selected as follows:
The college or university administration shall appoint two nonvoting
advisory members; the governing board shall appoint three voting
members; and the services and activities fee committee chair shall
appoint three student members of the services and activities fee
committee who will have a vote, and one student representing the
services and activities fee committee who will chair the dispute
resolution committee and be nonvoting. The committee shall meet in
good faith, and settle by vote any and all disputes. In the event of
a tie vote, the chair of the dispute resolution committee shall vote to
settle the dispute.
(8) The governing board may take action on those portions of the
services and activities fee budget not in dispute in accordance with
the customary budget approval timeline established by the board. The
governing board shall consider the results, if any, of the dispute
resolution committee and shall take action.
(9) Services and activities fees and revenues generated by programs
and activities funded by such fees shall be deposited and expended
through the office of the chief fiscal officer of the institution.
(10) Services and activities fees and revenues generated by
programs and activities funded by such fees shall be subject to the
applicable policies, regulations, and procedures of the institution and
the budget and accounting act, chapter 43.88 RCW.
(11) ((All information pertaining to services and activities fees
budgets shall be made available to interested parties.
(12))) With the exception of any funds needed for bond covenant
obligations, once the budget for expending service and activities fees
is approved by the governing board, funds shall not be shifted from
funds budgeted for associated students or departmentally related
categories or the reserve fund until the administration provides
written justification to the services and activities fee committee and
the governing board, and the governing board and the services and
activities fee committee give their express approval. In the event of
a fund transfer dispute among the services and activities fee
committee, the administration, or the governing board, said dispute
shall be resolved pursuant to subsections (6)(b), (7), and (8) of this
section.
(((13))) (12) Any service and activities fees collected which
exceed initially budgeted amounts are subject to subsections (1)
through (((10) and (12))) (11) of this section.

--- END ---