BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In 1993, Washington state embarked on an
ambitious path to establish statewide standards for the knowledge,
skills, and abilities that all students should know and be able to do
before graduating from high school. The intent of Washington's
education reform was to focus on the competencies desired of students
at graduation. Since that time, a great deal of effort has gone into
developing and implementing the state's essential academic learning
requirements, grade level expectations, and statewide assessment
system. However, the legislature finds that high school graduation
requirements remain focused on accumulation of credits, taking a set of
required courses, and achieving a particular score on a single
assessment of learning. Furthermore, there is not a consensus within
the state as to the overall purpose of the high school diploma and what
accomplishment it is intended to signify. Therefore, the legislature
intends to direct a critical reevaluation and redefinition of the high
school diploma in Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The state board of education shall
develop and propose a revised definition of the purpose and
expectations for high school diplomas issued by public schools in
Washington state. The revised definition shall address whether
attainment of a high school diploma is intended to signify that a
student is ready for success in college, ready for successful and
gainful employment in the workplace, or some combination of these and
other objectives. The revised definition shall focus on the knowledge,
skills, and abilities that students are expected to demonstrate to
receive a high school diploma, as well as the various methods to be
used to measure student performance, rather than focusing on courses,
credits, seat time, and test scores.
(2) In developing the revised definition of the high school
diploma, the state board of education shall consult with educators,
parents, institutions of higher education, employers, and community
leaders. The board shall also work with the state board for community
and technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board, and
the work force training and education coordinating board.
(3) The state board of education shall submit the proposed revised
definition of the high school diploma, along with any necessary
revisions to state statutes and rules, to the education committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2007.

--- END ---