BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.29.008 and 1993 c 433 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Personal services may be procured only to resolve a particular
agency problem or issue or to expedite a specific project that is
temporary in nature. An agency may procure personal services only if:
(1) It documents that:
(((1))) (a) The service is critical to agency responsibilities or
operations, or is mandated or authorized by the legislature;
(((2))) (b) Sufficient staffing or expertise is not available
within the agency to perform the service; ((and
(3))) (c) Other qualified public resources are not available to
perform the service; and
(d) Procedures are in place to monitor, audit, and enforce the
terms of the contract and the agency can report on the status and
results of the contract upon request.
(2)(a) An agency must establish a contract review committee to
ensure compliance with the requirements under subsection (1) of this
section and RCW 39.29.100 and 41.06.142 to assist in preparing the
proposal or personal service contract. The committee must have
representation from all staffing levels.
(b) An agency must notify the contract review committee, exclusive
bargaining unit representative, and the appropriate committees of the
legislature about:
(i) Who the contractors are;
(ii) The work the contractors are doing;
(iii) Where the work will be performed and whether any work will be
done out-of-state or offshore;
(iv) Any problems that may have occurred under prior contracts
including, but not limited to, breach of contract, cost overruns,
failure to perform in a timely manner, or failure to complete; and
(v) Other contracts the contractors have, or had, with the agency
or other agencies of state government.
(c) An agency, through the contract review committee, shall
establish and include in any proposal for purchase of personal services
and subsequent contract written criteria regarding those terms of the
contract for which a breach in performance requires the cancellation of
the contract and the procurement of a new contract under subsection (1)
of this section.

--- END ---