BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The division of archives and records management is established in
the office of the secretary of state to ensure the proper management
and safeguarding of public records. All public records remain the
property of the state of Washington. Public records must be delivered
by outgoing officials and employees to their successors and must be
retained, preserved, stored, transferred, destroyed, or disposed of in
accordance with this chapter. The state archivist will administer the
division and must have reasonable access to all public records,
wherever kept, for the purposes of information, surveying, or
cataloging.

PART II
DEFINITIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "General retention schedule" means a records retention schedule
applicable to any state or local agency.
(2) "Legislative record" means correspondence, amendments, reports,
and minutes of meetings made by or submitted to legislative committees
or subcommittees and transcripts or other records of hearings or
supplementary written testimony or data thereof filed with committees
or subcommittees in connection with the exercise of legislative or
investigatory functions. "Legislative record" does not include the
records of an official act of the legislature kept by the secretary of
state, bills and their copies, published materials, digests, or
multicopied matter that are routinely retained and otherwise available
at the state library or in a public repository, or reports or
correspondence made or received by or in any way under the personal
control of the individual members of the legislature.
(3) "Public record" means any record, original or copy, containing
information relating to the conduct of government or the performance of
any governmental or proprietary function prepared, received, used, or
owned by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristic. "Public records" includes legislative records.
(4) "Records retention schedule" means a legal document approved by
the state or local records committee that specifies required retention
periods for a records series and gives agencies ongoing disposition
authority for the records series after its approved retention period
has been satisfied.
(5) "Records series" means a class of public records with a
specific or common function or purpose of state or local agencies as
identified and defined by the state or local records committee.
(6) "Retention period" means the required amount of time, approved
by the state or local records committee, that a state or local
government agency is required to retain records within a records
series.
(7) "Unique retention schedule" means a records retention schedule
applicable to a specific state or local agency.

PART III
STATE ARCHIVIST--DUTIES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The state archivist shall:
(1) Centralize, administer, and manage the archives of the state of
Washington, make them available for reference and scholarship, and
ensure their proper preservation;
(2) Inspect, inventory, catalog, and arrange retention and transfer
schedules on public records of all state agencies;
(3) Ensure the maintenance and security of all state agency public
records and establish safeguards against their unauthorized removal or
destruction;
(4) Approve of the transfer of local agency records of historical
or legal significance as provided by section 7(4) of this act;
(5) Establish and operate such state records centers as may from
time to time be authorized by appropriation, for the purpose of
preserving, servicing, screening, and protecting all state agency
public records which must be preserved temporarily or permanently, but
which need not be retained in office space and equipment;
(6) Gather and disseminate to interested agencies information on
all phases of records management to provide for the efficient and
economical management and preservation of public records;
(7) Operate at cost an imaging service for state or local agency
records;
(8) Approve imaging projects of public records undertaken by state
agencies and, upon request, by local agencies, and develop and maintain
standards for this work;
(9) Maintain facilities necessary to review records approved for
destruction and to cost-efficiently dispose of them by sale or burning.
The destruction of public records as authorized by this chapter must be
supervised by the state archivist;
(10) Assist and train state and local agencies in the proper
methods of creating, maintaining, cataloging, indexing, transmitting,
storing, and reproducing photographic, optical, electronic, or other
images used as public records;
(11) Solicit, accept, and expend donations as provided in RCW
43.07.037 for the purpose of the archive program. These purposes
include, but are not limited to, acquisition, accession,
interpretation, and display of archival materials. Donations that do
not meet the criteria of the archive program may not be accepted;
(12) Upon availability of resources, furnish appropriate
information, suggestions, and guidelines to local government agencies
for their assistance in the preparation of records series and retention
schedules or any other matter relating to the retention, preservation,
disposition, or destruction of records under this chapter; and
(13) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that:
(a) Set standards for the durability and permanence of public
records maintained by state and local agencies;
(b) Govern procedures for the creation, maintenance, transmission,
cataloging, indexing, storage, or reproduction of photographic,
optical, electronic, or other images of public documents or records in
a manner consistent with current standards, policies, and procedures of
the department of information services for the acquisition of
information technology;
(c) Govern the accuracy and durability of, and facilitate access
to, photographic, optical, electronic, or other images used as public
records; or
(d) Carry out any other provision of this chapter.

PART IV
TRANSFER OF RECORDS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All state agency public records, not required in the current
operation of the office where they are made or kept, and all records of
every agency, commission, committee, or any other activity of state
government which may be abolished or discontinued, shall be transferred
to the state archives so that the valuable historical records of the
state may be centralized, made more widely available, and ensured
permanent preservation. However, this section does not apply to public
records approved for destruction under this chapter.
When transferred, copies of the public records concerned shall be
made and certified by the archivist, which certification shall have the
same force and effect as though made by the officer originally in
charge of them. Fees may be charged to cover the cost of reproduction.
In turning over the archives of his or her office, the officer in
charge of those archives, or his or her successor, retains the rights
of access to them, without charge, whenever necessary.
(2)(a) Records that are confidential, privileged, or exempt from
public disclosure under state or federal law while in the possession of
the originating agency, commission, board, committee, or other entity
of state or local government retain their confidential, privileged, or
exempt status after transfer to the state archives unless the
archivist, with the concurrence of the originating jurisdiction,
determines that the records must be made accessible to the public
according to proper and reasonable rules adopted by the secretary of
state, in which case the records may be open to inspection and
available for copying after the expiration of seventy-five years from
creation of the record. If the originating jurisdiction is no longer
in existence, the archivist shall make the determination of
availability according to the rules. If, while in the possession of
the originating agency, commission, board, committee, or other entity,
any record is determined to be confidential, privileged, or exempt from
public disclosure under state or federal law for a period of less than
seventy-five years, then the record must be made accessible to the
public upon the expiration of the shorter period of time according to
proper and reasonable rules adopted by the secretary of state.
(b) Records of investigative reports prepared by any state, county,
municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex offenders
contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as defined
in RCW 71.09.020 that are not required in the current operation of the
law enforcement agency or for pending judicial proceedings shall,
following the expiration of the applicable schedule of the law
enforcement agency's retention of the records, be transferred to the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent
electronic retention and retrieval. Upon electronic retention of any
document, the association may destroy the paper copy of the document.
(c) Any record transferred to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs under (b) of this subsection is no longer a
public record under RCW 42.17.020 and is exempt from public disclosure.
Such records shall be disseminated only to criminal justice agencies as
defined in RCW 10.97.030 to determine if a sex offender meets the
criteria of a sexually violent predator as defined in chapter 71.09
RCW.

PART V
STATE RECORDS COMMITTEE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state records committee is created. Membership on the
state records committee consists of the state archivist or his or her
designee, a representative appointed by the state auditor, a
representative appointed by the attorney general, and a representative
appointed by the director of the office of financial management. The
appointing authority for each committee member may appoint an alternate
member to serve in the absence of the primary appointee.
(2) The state records committee shall meet at least once every
quarter or more often as business dictates. Action by the committee
shall be by majority vote and records shall be kept of all committee
business. The state records committee may adopt appropriate policies
and procedures to be followed in implementing its authority under this
chapter.
(3) The state records committee must approve, modify, or disapprove
records retention schedules for state agency public records and must
act upon requests to dispose of or to destroy such records. However,
any modification of a request or recommendation must be approved by the
head of the agency originating the request or recommendation.
(4) The state records committee shall establish general retention
schedules for state agency records when practical. Upon a
determination of the state records committee, unique retention
schedules may be approved for a state agency. The committee's
determination shall include consideration of factors justifying the use
of a unique retention schedule in lieu of, or the absence of, a general
retention schedule.
(5) Except as otherwise provided by law, no public records of a
state agency shall be disposed of or destroyed until approved for
disposition or destruction by the state records committee. State
agencies may apply for authority to dispose of or destroy public
records having no further administrative or legal value by submitting
retention schedules for approval to the state records committee.
Submittals shall be made to the state records committee through the
division of archives and records management on forms approved by the
state records committee. The division shall facilitate the state
agency's submittal to the state records committee and provide
administrative support as needed.

PART VI
STATE RECORDS OFFICERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Each department or other agency of the state government shall
designate a records officer to supervise its records management and
retention program under this chapter and to represent the office in all
contacts with the state records committee and the division of archives
and records management. The records officer shall:
(1) Coordinate all aspects of the records management and retention
program;
(2) Inventory, or manage the inventory, of all public records at
least once during a biennium for disposition scheduling and transfer
action, in accordance with procedures prescribed by the state archivist
and state records committee. However, essential records shall be
inventoried and processed in accordance with chapter 40.10 RCW at least
annually;
(3) Consult with any other personnel responsible for maintenance of
specific records within the officer's state organization regarding
records retention and transfer recommendations;
(4) Analyze records inventory data, examine and compare divisional
or unit inventories for duplication of records, and recommend to the
state archivist and state records committee minimal retentions for all
copies commensurate with legal, financial, and administrative needs;
(5) Approve all records inventory and destruction requests which
are submitted to the state records committee;
(6) Review established records retention schedules at least
annually to ensure that they are complete and current;
(7) Exercise internal control over the acquisition of imaging and
records storage equipment.
If a particular agency or department does not wish to transfer
records at a time previously scheduled therefor, the records officer
shall, within thirty days, notify the archivist and request a change in
such previously set schedule, including the officer's reasons therefor.

PART VII
LOCAL RECORDS COMMITTEE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The local records committee is created. Membership on the
committee consists of the state archivist or his or her designee, a
representative appointed by the state auditor, and a representative
appointed by the attorney general. The appointing authority for each
committee member may appoint an alternate member to serve in the
absence of the primary appointee. The committee shall meet at least
once every quarter or more often as business dictates. Records shall
be kept of all committee business.
(b) Approval, amendment, or veto of any retention schedule shall be
by unanimous vote of the local records committee. Upon such approval,
the retention schedule shall constitute authority for the local agency
to dispose of or destroy the records listed thereon consistent with the
conditions of the retention schedule.
(c) The local records committee may adopt appropriate policies and
procedures to be followed in implementing its authority under this
chapter.
(2) No local agency public records shall be disposed of or
destroyed until the expiration of applicable retention periods on
records retention schedules approved by the local records committee.
(3)(a) The local records committee shall establish general
retention schedules for local agency records when practical. Upon a
determination of the local records committee, unique retention
schedules may be approved for a local agency. The committee's
determination shall include consideration of factors justifying the use
of a unique retention schedule in lieu of, or the absence of, a general
retention schedule.
(b) Local government agencies may apply for authority to dispose of
or destroy public records having no further administrative or legal
value by submitting retention schedules for approval to the local
records committee. Submittals shall be made to the local records
committee through the division of archives and records management on
forms approved by the local records committee. The division shall
facilitate the local agency's submittal to the local records committee
and provide administrative support as needed.
(c) Except as otherwise provided by law, local agencies may, as an
alternative to destroying public records having no further
administrative or legal value, donate the public records to the state
library, local library, historical society, genealogical society, or
similar society or organization. Public records may not be donated
under this subsection unless:
(i) The records are seventy years old or older;
(ii) The local records committee has approved the destruction of
the public records; and
(iii) The state archivist has determined that the public records
have no historic or legal significance.
(4) Records of local agencies, designated by the archivist as
having historical or legal significance, may be transferred to a
repository approved by the archivist.

PART VIII
RETENTION REQUIREMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Public records shall not be disposed of or destroyed until the
expiration of applicable retention periods on records retention
schedules approved by the state or local records committee. Unless
otherwise provided by state or federal law, rule, or regulation,
retention periods approved for records series that serve as primary
documentation of official actions, transactions, contracts, or
agreements must be at least six years. The state or local records
committee may approve retention periods of less than six years for
records series that:
(1) The department of origin of the records has made a satisfactory
showing to the state or local records committee that the retention of
the records for a minimum of six years is unnecessary and that such
records serve only an administrative value; or
(2) The originals of the official public records less than six
years old have been copied or reproduced by any photographic or other
process approved by the state archivist which accurately reproduces or
forms a durable medium for so reproducing the original.

PART IX
LEGISLATIVE RECORDS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter prohibits a legislator or legislative
employee from contributing his or her personal papers to any private
library, public library, or the state archives. The state archivist is
authorized to receive papers of legislators and legislative employees
and is directed to encourage the donation of such personal papers to
the state. The state archivist is authorized to establish such
guidelines and procedures for the collection of personal papers and
correspondence relating to the legislature as the archivist sees fit.
Legislators and legislative employees are encouraged to contribute
their personal papers to the state for preservation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislative committee chair, subcommittee chair, committee
member, or employed personnel of the state legislature having
possession of legislative records that are not required for the regular
performance of official duties shall, within ten days after the
adjournment sine die of a regular or special session, deliver all such
legislative records to the chief clerk of the house of representatives
or the secretary of the senate.
The chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary
of the senate are charged to include requirements and responsibilities
for keeping committee minutes and records as part of their instructions
to committee chairs and employees.
The chief clerk or the secretary, with the assistance of the state
archivist, shall classify and arrange the legislative records delivered
to the chief clerk or secretary in a manner that he or she considers
best suited to carry out the efficient and economical utilization,
maintenance, preservation, and disposition of the records. The chief
clerk or the secretary may deliver to the state archivist all
legislative records in his or her possession when such records have
been classified and arranged and are no longer needed by either house.
The state archivist shall thereafter be custodian of the records so
delivered, but shall deliver such records back to either the chief
clerk or secretary upon his or her request.
The chair, member, or employee of a legislative interim committee
responsible for maintaining the legislative records of that committee
shall, on a scheduled basis agreed upon by the chair, member, or
employee of the legislative interim committee, deliver to the chief
clerk or secretary all legislative records in his or her possession, as
long as such records are not required for the regular performance of
official duties. He or she shall also deliver to the chief clerk or
secretary all records of an interim committee within ten days after the
committee ceases to function.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
It shall be the duty of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives and the secretary of the senate to advise the party
caucuses in each house concerning the necessity to keep public records.
The state archivist or his or her representative shall work with the
chief clerk and secretary to provide information and instructions on
the best method for keeping legislative records.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Committee records may be used by legislative employees for research
at the discretion of the chief clerk of the house of representatives or
the secretary of the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The chief clerk of the house of representatives or the secretary of
the senate shall, with advice of the state archivist, prescribe rules
for access to records more than three years old when such records have
been delivered to the state archives for preservation and maintenance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Any sound recording of debate in the house of representatives or
senate made by legislative employees shall be preserved by the chief
clerk of the house and by the secretary of the senate, respectively,
for two years from the end of the session at which made, and thereafter
shall be transmitted to the state archivist. The chief clerk and the
secretary shall catalogue or index the recordings in their custody
according to a uniform system, in order to allow easy access to the
debate on specific questions before either house, and shall make
available to any court of record, at the cost of reproduction, such
portions of the recordings as the court may request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not repeal or modify any other acts or parts of
acts authorizing the retention or destruction of public records. This
chapter does not affect the provisions of chapter 40.07 RCW requiring
the deposit of all state publications in the state library or the
confidentiality of the bill drafting records of the code reviser's
office.

PART X
FUNDING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is created the archives and records management account in
the state treasury which shall consist of all fees and charges
collected under this section. The account shall be appropriated
exclusively for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the
operation of the division of archives and records management as
specified by law.
(2) The secretary of state and the director of financial management
shall jointly establish a procedure and formula for allocating the
costs of services provided by the division of archives and records
management to state agencies. The total amount allotted for services
to state agencies shall not exceed the appropriation to the archives
and records management account during any allotment period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The local government archives account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts collected by the county auditors under section
18 of this act and RCW 36.22.175 for local government services, such as
providing records scheduling, security microfilm inspection and
storage, archival preservation, cataloging, and indexing for local
government records and digital data and access to those records and
data through the regional branch archives of the division of archives
and records management, must be deposited into the account, and
expenditures from the account may be used only for these purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
State agencies shall collect a surcharge of twenty dollars from the
judgment debtor upon the satisfaction of a warrant filed in superior
court for unpaid taxes or liabilities. The surcharge is imposed on the
judgment debtor in the form of a penalty in addition to the filing fee
provided in RCW 36.18.012(10). The surcharge revenue shall be
transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the local government
archives account under section 17 of this act.
Surcharge revenue shall be expended by the secretary of state
exclusively for disaster recovery, essential records protection
services, and records management training for local government agencies
by the division of archives and records management. The secretary of
state shall, with local government representatives, establish a
committee to advise the state archivist on the local government
archives and records management program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The imaging account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts collected for contract imaging, micrographics,
reproduction, and duplication services provided by the division of
archives and records management must be deposited into the account, and
expenditures from the account may be used only for these purposes.
Only the secretary of state or the secretary's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

Sec. 20 RCW 36.22.175 and 2003 c 163 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to any other charge authorized by law, the county
auditor shall charge a surcharge of one dollar per instrument for each
document recorded. Revenue generated through this surcharge shall be
transmitted monthly to the state treasurer for deposit in the local
government archives account under ((RCW 40.14.024)) section 17 of this
act. These funds shall be used solely for providing records
scheduling, security microfilm inspection and storage, archival
preservation, cataloging, and indexing for local government records and
digital data and access to those records and data through the regional
branch archives of the division of archives and records management.
The division of archives and records management within the office
of the secretary of state shall provide records management training for
local governments and shall establish a competitive grant program to
solicit and prioritize project proposals from local governments for
potential funding to be paid for by funds from the auditor surcharge
and tax warrant surcharge revenues. Application for specific projects
may be made by local government agencies only. The state archivist in
consultation with the advisory committee established under ((RCW
40.14.027)) section 18 of this act shall adopt rules governing project
eligibility, evaluation, awarding of grants, and other criteria
including requirements for records management training for grant
recipients.
(2) The advisory committee established under ((RCW 40.14.027))
section 18 of this act shall review grant proposals and establish a
prioritized list of projects to be considered for funding by January
1st of each even-numbered year, beginning in 2002. The evaluation of
proposals and development of the prioritized list must be developed
through open public meetings. Funding for projects shall be granted
according to the ranking of each application on the prioritized list
and projects will be funded only to the extent that funds are
available. A grant award may have an effective date other than the
date the project is placed on the prioritized list.
(3) In addition to any other surcharge authorized by law, the
county auditor shall charge a surcharge of one dollar per instrument
for every document recorded after January 1, 2002. Revenue generated
through this surcharge shall be transmitted to the state treasurer
monthly for deposit in the local government archives account under
((RCW 40.14.024)) section 17 of this act to be used exclusively for the
construction and improvement of a specialized regional facility located
in eastern Washington designed to serve the archives, records
management, and digital data management needs of local government.
To the extent the facilities are used for the storage and retrieval
of state agency records and digital data, that portion of the
construction of such facilities used for state government records and
data shall be supported by other charges and fees paid by state
agencies and shall not be supported by the surcharge authorized in this
subsection.
At such time that all debt service from construction on such
facility has been paid, fifty percent of the surcharge authorized by
this subsection shall be reverted to the centennial document
preservation and modernization account as prescribed in RCW 36.22.170
and fifty percent of the surcharge authorized by this section shall be
reverted to the state treasurer for deposit in the archives and records
management account to serve the archives, records management, and
digital data management needs of local government.

PART XI
CONSTRUCTION AND REPEALERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 40.14 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not repeal or modify any other acts or parts of
acts authorizing the destruction of public records. This chapter does
not affect the provisions of chapter 40.07 RCW requiring the deposit of
all state publications in the state library.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 40.14.010 (Definition and classification of public records)
and 1996 c 71 s 1, 1982 c 36 s 3, 1981 c 32 s 4, 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 1,
& 1957 c 246 s 1;
(2) RCW 40.14.020 (Division of archives and records management--State archivist -- Powers and duties -- Duties of public officials) and
2002 c 358 s 4 & 1995 c 326 s 1;
(3) RCW 40.14.022 (Division of archives and records management--Imaging account) and 2003 c 163 s 2;
(4) RCW 40.14.024 (Division of archives and records management--Local government archives account) and 2003 c 163 s 3;
(5) RCW 40.14.025 (Division of archives and records management--Allocation of costs of services -- Archives and records management
account) and 2003 c 163 s 1, 1996 c 245 s 3, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 5, 1985
c 57 s 22, & 1981 c 115 s 4;
(6) RCW 40.14.027 (Public archives and records management
services -- Judgment debtor surcharge) and 2003 c 163 s 4, 2001 c 146 s
4, 1996 c 245 s 4, 1995 c 292 s 17, & 1994 c 193 s 2;
(7) RCW 40.14.030 (Transfer to state archives -- Certified copies,
cost -- Public disclosure) and 2003 c 305 s 1 & 1957 c 246 s 3;
(8) RCW 40.14.040 (Records officers -- Designation -- Powers and
duties) and 1982 c 36 s 4, 1979 c 151 s 51, 1973 c 54 s 3, & 1957 c 246
s 4;
(9) RCW 40.14.050 (Records committee -- Composition, travel expenses,
meetings, powers and duties -- Retention schedules) and 1985 c 192 s 1,
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 83, & 1957 c 246 s 5;
(10) RCW 40.14.060 (Destruction, disposition of official public
records or office files and memoranda -- Record retention schedules) and
1999 c 326 s 1, 1982 c 36 s 5, 1979 c 151 s 52, 1973 c 54 s 4, & 1957
c 246 s 6;
(11) RCW 40.14.070 (Destruction, disposition, donation of local
government records -- Preservation for historical interest -- Local records
committee, duties -- Record retention schedules -- Sealed records) and 2005
c 227 s 1, 2003 c 240 s 1, 1999 c 326 s 2, 1995 c 301 s 71, 1982 c 36
s 6, 1973 c 54 s 5, 1971 ex.s. c 10 s 1, & 1957 c 246 s 7;
(12) RCW 40.14.080 (Chapter not to affect other laws) and 1983 c 3
s 84 & 1957 c 246 s 8;
(13) RCW 40.14.100 (Legislative records -- Defined) and 1971 ex.s. c
102 s 2;
(14) RCW 40.14.110 (Legislative records -- Contribution of papers by
legislators and employees) and 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 3;
(15) RCW 40.14.120 (Legislative records -- "Clerk," "secretary"
defined) and 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 4;
(16) RCW 40.14.130 (Legislative records -- Duties of legislative
officials, employees and state archivist -- Delivery of records--Custody -- Availability) and 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 5;
(17) RCW 40.14.140 (Legislative records -- Party caucuses to be
advised -- Information and instructions) and 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 6;
(18) RCW 40.14.150 (Legislative records -- Use for research) and 1971
ex.s. c 102 s 7;
(19) RCW 40.14.160 (Legislative records -- Rules for access to
records) and 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 8;
(20) RCW 40.14.170 (Legislative records -- Sound recordings) and 1971
ex.s. c 102 s 9; and
(21) RCW 40.14.180 (Legislative records -- Construction--Confidentiality of bill drafting records) and 1983 c 3 s 85 & 1971
ex.s. c 102 s 10.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

--- END ---