BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Professional employer organizations provide a valuable service
to commerce and the citizens of this state by increasing the
opportunities of employers to develop cost-effective methods of
satisfying their personnel requirements and providing employees with
access to certain employment benefits which might otherwise not be
available to them;
(2) Professional employer organizations operating in this state
should be properly recognized; and
(3) Any allocation of the employer duties and responsibilities
pursuant to this chapter shall preserve all rights to which covered
employees would be entitled under a traditional employment
relationship.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 As used in this chapter:
(1) "Administrative fee" means the fee charged to a client by a
professional employer organization for professional employer services.
However, the administrative fee shall not be deemed to include any
amount of a fee by the professional employer organization that is for
wages and salaries, benefits, workers' compensation, payroll taxes,
withholding, or other assessments paid by the professional employer
organization to or on behalf of covered employees under the
professional employer agreement.
(2) "Client" means any person who enters into a professional
employer agreement with a professional employer organization.
(3) "Coemployer" means either a professional employer organization
or a client.
(4) "Coemployment relationship" means a relationship which is
intended to be an ongoing relationship rather than a temporary or
project-specific one, wherein the rights, duties, and obligations of an
employer which arise out of an employment relationship have been
allocated between coemployers pursuant to a professional employer
agreement and this chapter. In such a coemployment relationship:
(a) The professional employer organization is entitled to enforce
only such employer rights and is subject to only those obligations
specifically allocated to the professional employer organization by the
professional employer agreement or this chapter;
(b) The client is entitled to enforce those rights and obligated to
provide and perform those employer obligations allocated to such client
by the professional employer agreement and this chapter; and
(c) The client is entitled to enforce any right and obligated to
perform any obligation of an employer not specifically allocated to the
professional employer organization by the professional employer
agreement or this chapter.
(5) "Covered employee" means an individual having a coemployment
relationship with a professional employer organization and a client who
meets all of the following criteria: (a) The individual has received
written notice of coemployment with the professional employer
organization, and (b) the individual's coemployment relationship is
pursuant to a professional employer agreement subject to this chapter.
Individuals who are officers, directors, shareholders, partners, and
managers of the client are covered employees to the extent the
professional employer organization and the client have expressly agreed
in the professional employer agreement that such individuals would be
covered employees and provided such individuals meet the criteria of
this subsection and act as operational managers or perform day-to-day
operational services for the client.
(6) "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation,
limited liability company, association, or any other form of legally
recognized entity.
(7) "Professional employer agreement" means a written contract by
and between a client and a professional employer organization that
provides:
(a) For the coemployment of covered employees;
(b) For the allocation of employer rights and obligations between
the client and the professional employer organization with respect to
the covered employees; and
(c) That the professional employer organization and the client
assume the responsibilities required by this chapter.
(8) "Professional employer organization" means any person engaged
in the business of providing professional employer services. A person
engaged in the business of providing professional employer services is
subject to this chapter regardless of its use of the term or conducting
business as a "professional employer organization," "PEO," "staff
leasing company," "registered staff leasing company," "employee leasing
company," "administrative employer," or any other name.
The following shall not be deemed to be professional employer
organizations or the providing of professional employer services for
purposes of this chapter:
(a) Arrangements wherein a person, whose principal business
activity is not entering into professional employer arrangements and
which does not hold itself out as a professional employer organization,
shares employees with a commonly owned company within the meaning of
section 414(b) and (c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended;
(b) Independent contractor arrangements by which a person assumes
responsibility for the product produced or service performed by such
person or his or her agents and retains and exercises primary direction
and control over the work performed by the individuals whose services
are supplied under such arrangements; or
(c) Providing temporary help services.
(9) "Professional employer services" means the service of entering
into coemployment relationships under this chapter in which all or a
majority of the employees providing services to a client or to a
division or work unit of a client are covered employees.
(10) "Temporary help services" means services consisting of a
person:
(a) Recruiting and hiring its own employees;
(b) Finding other organizations that need the services of those
employees;
(c) Assigning those employees to perform work at or services for
the other organizations to support or supplement the other
organizations' work forces, or to provide assistance in special work
situations such as, but not limited to, employee absences, skill
shortages, seasonal workloads, or to perform special assignments or
projects; and
(d) Customarily attempting to reassign the employees to other
organizations when they finish each assignment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Nothing contained in this chapter or in
any professional employer agreement shall affect, modify, or amend any
collective bargaining agreement, or the rights or obligations of any
client, professional employer organization, or covered employee under
the federal national labor relations act or the federal railway labor
act.
(2) Nothing in this chapter or in any professional employer
agreement shall:
(a) Diminish, abolish, or remove rights of covered employees to a
client or obligations of such client to a covered employee existing
prior to the effective date of the professional employer agreement;
(b) Affect, modify, or amend any contractual relationship or
restrictive covenant between a covered employee and any client in
effect at the time a professional employer agreement becomes effective.
Nor shall it prohibit or amend any contractual relationship or
restrictive covenant that is entered into subsequently between a client
and a covered employee. A professional employer organization shall
have no responsibility or liability in connection with, or arising out
of, any such existing or new contractual relationship or restrictive
covenant unless the professional employer organization has specifically
agreed otherwise in writing;
(c) Create any new or additional enforceable right of a covered
employee against a professional employer organization that is not
specifically provided by the professional employer agreement or this
chapter.
(3) Nothing contained in this chapter or any professional employer
agreement shall affect, modify, or amend any state, local, or federal
licensing, registration, or certification requirement applicable to any
client or covered employee.
(a) A covered employee who must be licensed, registered, or
certified according to law or regulation is deemed solely an employee
of the client for purposes of any such license, registration, or
certification requirement.
(b) A professional employer organization shall not be deemed to
engage in any occupation, trade, profession, or other activity that is
subject to licensing, registration, or certification requirements, or
is otherwise regulated by a governmental entity, solely by entering
into and maintaining a coemployment relationship with a covered
employee who is subject to such requirements or regulation.
(c) A client shall have the sole right of direction and control of
the professional or licensed activities of covered employees and of the
client's business. Such covered employees and clients shall remain
subject to regulation by the regulatory or governmental entity
responsible for licensing, registration, or certification of such
covered employees or clients.
(4) For purposes of determination of tax credits and other economic
incentives provided by this state or other government entity and based
on employment, covered employees shall be deemed employees solely of
the client. A client shall be entitled to the benefit of any tax
credit, economic incentive, or other benefit arising as the result of
the employment of covered employees of such client. If the grant or
amount of any such incentives is based on number of employees, then
each client shall be treated as employing only those covered employees
coemployed by the client. Covered employees working for other clients
of the professional employer organization shall not be counted. Each
professional employer organization shall provide, upon request by a
client or an agency or department of this state, employment information
reasonably required by any agency or department of this state
responsible for administration of any such tax credit or economic
incentive and necessary to support any request, claim, application, or
other action by a client seeking any such tax credit or economic
incentive.
(5) With respect to a bid, contract, purchase order, or agreement
entered into with the state or a political subdivision of the state, a
client company's status or certification as a small, minority-owned, or
woman-owned business enterprise or as a historically underutilized
business is not affected because the client company has entered into an
agreement with a professional employer organization or uses the
services of a professional employer organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as specifically provided in this
chapter or in the professional employer agreement, in each coemployment
relationship:
(a) The client shall be entitled to exercise all rights, and shall
be obligated to perform all duties and responsibilities, otherwise
applicable to an employer in an employment relationship;
(b) The professional employer organization shall be entitled to
exercise only those rights, and obligated to perform only those duties
and responsibilities, specifically required by this chapter or set
forth in the professional employer agreement. The rights, duties, and
obligations of the professional employer organization as coemployer
with respect to any covered employee shall be limited to those arising
pursuant to the professional employer agreement and this chapter during
the term of coemployment by the professional employer organization of
such covered employee; and
(c) Unless otherwise expressly agreed by the professional employer
organization and the client in a professional employer agreement, the
client retains the exclusive right to direct and control the covered
employees as is necessary to conduct the client's business, to
discharge any of the client's fiduciary responsibilities, or to comply
with any licensure requirements applicable to the client or to the
covered employees.
(2) Except as specifically provided in this chapter, the
coemployment relationship between the client and the professional
employer organization, and between each coemployer and each covered
employee, shall be governed by the professional employer agreement.
Each professional employer agreement shall include the following:
(a) The allocation of rights, duties, and obligations as described
in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) That the professional employer organization shall have
responsibility to pay wages to covered employees; to withhold, collect,
report, and remit payroll-related and unemployment taxes; and, to the
extent the professional employer organization has assumed
responsibility in the professional employer agreement, to make payments
for employee benefits for covered employees. As used in this section,
the term "wages" does not include any obligation between a client and
a covered employee for payments beyond or in addition to the covered
employee's salary, draw, or regular rate of pay, such as bonuses,
commissions, severance pay, deferred compensation, profit sharing, or
vacation, sick, or other paid time-off pay, unless the professional
employer organization has expressly agreed to assume liability for such
payments in the professional employer agreement;
(c) That the professional employer organization shall have a right
to hire, discipline, and terminate a covered employee, as may be
necessary to fulfill the professional employer organization's
responsibilities under this chapter and the professional employer
agreement. The client shall have a right to hire, discipline, and
terminate a covered employee.
(3) With respect to each professional employer agreement entered
into by a professional employer organization, such professional
employer organization shall provide written notice to each covered
employee affected by such agreement of the general nature of the
coemployment relationship between and among the professional employer
organization, the client, and such covered employee.
(4) Except to the extent otherwise expressly provided by the
applicable professional employer agreement:
(a) A client shall be solely responsible for the quality, adequacy,
or safety of the goods or services produced or sold in the client's
business.
(b) A client shall be solely responsible for directing,
supervising, training, and controlling the work of the covered
employees with respect to the business activities of the client and
solely responsible for the acts, errors, or omissions of the covered
employees with regard to such activities.
(c) A client shall not be liable for the acts, errors, or omissions
of a professional employer organization or of any covered employee of
the client and a professional employer organization when such covered
employee is acting under the express direction and control of the
professional employer organization.
(d) A professional employer organization shall not be liable for
the acts, errors, or omissions of a client or of any covered employee
of the client when such covered employee is acting under the express
direction and control of the client.
(e) Nothing in this subsection shall serve to limit any contractual
liability or obligation specifically provided in the written
professional employer agreement.
(f) A covered employee is not, solely as the result of being a
covered employee of a professional employer organization, an employee
of the professional employer organization for purposes of general
liability insurance, fidelity bonds, surety bonds, employer's liability
which is not covered by liability insurance carried by the professional
employer organization unless the covered employees are included by
specific reference in the professional employer agreement and
applicable prearranged employment contract, insurance contract, or
bond.
(5) A professional employer organization under this chapter is not
engaged in the sale of insurance or in acting as a third-party
administrator by offering, marketing, selling, administering, or
providing professional employer services which include services and
employee benefit plans for covered employees.
(6)(a) Covered employees whose services are subject to sales tax
shall be deemed the employees of the client for purposes of collecting
and levying sales tax on the services performed by the covered
employee. Nothing contained in this chapter shall relieve a client of
any sales tax liability with respect to its goods or services.
(b) Any tax upon professional employer services or any business
license or other fee, including but not limited to chapter 82.04 RCW,
which is based upon gross receipts shall be limited to the
administrative fee of the professional employer organization.
(c) Any tax assessed on a per capita or per employee basis shall be
assessed against the client for covered employees and against the
professional employer organization for its employees who are not
covered employees coemployed with a client.
(d) In the case of tax imposed or calculated upon the basis of
total payroll, the professional employer organization shall be eligible
to apply any small business allowance or exemption available to the
client for the covered employees for the purpose of computing the tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---