BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of hands-free equipment for use with a wireless communications device. For the
purposes of this section, "hands-free equipment" means a speaker phone,
headset, earphone, or earpiece that is designed for use with a wireless
communications device.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of hands-free equipment for use with a wireless communications device.
"Hands-free equipment" has the meaning provided in section 1 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---