BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the following:
(1) The United States Constitution, Amendment II (Bill of Rights),
guarantees that, "A well regulated militia being necessary to the
security of a free state, the right of the people to keep and bear
arms, shall not be infringed."
(2) The Washington State Constitution, Article I (Declaration of
Rights), Section 24 (Right to Bear Arms), guarantees that, "The right
of the individual citizen to bear arms in defense of himself, or the
state, shall not be impaired..."
(3) The castle doctrine is a common-law doctrine of ancient origins
that declares that a person's home is his or her castle.
(4) Persons residing in or visiting within this state have a right
to expect to remain unmolested by criminals within their homes and
vehicles.
(5) Persons should not be required to surrender their personal
safety and well-being to criminals, nor should such persons be forced
to retreat in the face of criminal intrusion or attack.
(6) A person who is not engaged in an unlawful activity and who is
attacked in a place where he or she has a right to be should have no
duty to retreat and should have the right to stand his or her ground
and meet force with defensive force, including deadly force in certain
circumstances.
(7) It is proper for law-abiding persons to protect themselves,
their families, and other innocent persons from intruders and attackers
without fear of prosecution or civil action for acting in the lawful
defense of themselves and others.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.16.050 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.16.050 are
each amended to read as follows:
((Homicide is also justifiable when committed either:
(1) In the lawful defense of the slayer, or his or her husband,
wife, parent, child, brother, or sister, or of any other person in his
presence or company, when there is reasonable ground to apprehend a
design on the part of the person slain to commit a felony or to do some
great personal injury to the slayer or to any such person, and there is
imminent danger of such design being accomplished; or
(2) In the actual resistance of an attempt to commit a felony upon
the slayer, in his presence, or upon or in a dwelling, or other place
of abode, in which he is.))
(1) A person who is not engaged in an unlawful activity and is
attacked in a place where he or she reasonably believes he or she has
a right to be has no duty to retreat and has the right to stand his or
her ground and meet force with defensive force, including deadly force.
(2) A person is justified in the use of defensive force, except
deadly force, against another person when and to the extent that the
person reasonably believes that such force is necessary to defend
himself or herself or another against the other person's imminent use
of unlawful force against himself or herself or another.
(3) A person is justified in the use of deadly force if:
(a) He or she reasonably believes that such force is necessary to
prevent imminent death or great bodily harm to himself or herself or
another or to prevent the imminent commission of a felony involving
force or violence against himself or herself or another; or
(b) Under those circumstances permitted under RCW 9A.16.040.
(4) A person who unlawfully and by force enters or attempts to
enter a person's dwelling, residence, or occupied vehicle is presumed
to be doing so with the intent to commit an unlawful act involving
force or violence.
(5) A person is presumed to have held a reasonable fear of imminent
peril of death or great bodily harm to himself or herself or another
when using defensive force that is intended or likely to cause death or
great bodily harm to another person if:
(a) The person against whom the defensive force was used was in the
process of unlawfully and forcibly entering or had unlawfully and
forcibly entered a dwelling, residence, or occupied vehicle or if that
person was unlawfully and forcibly attempting to remove or had
unlawfully and forcibly removed another person against that person's
will from the dwelling, residence, or occupied vehicle; and
(b) The person who used defensive force knew or reasonably believed
that an unlawful and forcible entry or unlawful and forcible removal
was occurring or had occurred.
(6) The presumption set forth in subsection (5) of this section
does not apply if at the time defensive force was used:
(a) The person who used defensive force was engaged in an unlawful
activity or was using the dwelling, residence, or occupied vehicle to
further an unlawful activity; or
(b) The person against whom the defensive force was used had the
right to be in or was a lawful resident of the dwelling, residence, or
vehicle, such as an owner, lessee, or title holder, and there was no
relevant protection order in effect against the person; or
(c) The person sought to be removed was a child or grandchild or
other person otherwise in the lawful custody or under the lawful
guardianship of the person against whom the defensive force was used;
or
(d) The person against whom the defensive force was used was a
peace officer who had entered or had attempted to enter a dwelling,
residence, or vehicle in the performance of his or her official duties
and the officer had identified himself or herself in accordance with
any applicable law or the person using defensive force knew or
reasonably should have known that the person who had entered or had
attempted to enter was a peace officer.
(7) As used in this section, "residence" means a dwelling in which
a person resides either temporarily or permanently or is visiting as an
invited guest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9A.16 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who is not engaged in an unlawful activity and is in a
place where he or she reasonably believes he or she has a right to be
is justified in the use of defensive force, except deadly force,
against another person when and to the extent that the person, or a
person lawfully aiding him or her, reasonably believes that such force
is necessary to prevent or terminate the other person's trespass on or
other tortious or criminal act against either real property or personal
property lawfully in his or her possession or in the possession of
another person who is a member of his or her immediate family or
household or in the possession of a person whose property he or she has
a legal duty to protect. However, a person is justified in the use of
deadly force if he or she reasonably believes that such force is
necessary to prevent the imminent commission of a felony involving
force or violence against himself or herself or another, in which case
the person has no duty to retreat and has the right to stand his or her
ground.

Sec. 4 RCW 9A.16.020 and 1986 c 149 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The use, attempt, or offer to use force upon or toward the person
of another is not unlawful in the following cases:
(1) Whenever necessarily used by a public officer in the
performance of a legal duty, or a person assisting the officer and
acting under the officer's direction;
(2) Whenever necessarily used by a person arresting one who has
committed a felony and delivering him or her to a public officer
competent to receive him or her into custody;
(3) Whenever used (( by a party about to be injured, or by another
lawfully aiding him or her, in preventing or attempting to prevent an
offense against his or her person, or a malicious trespass, or other
malicious interference with real or personal property lawfully in his
or her possession, in case the force is not more than is necessary)) in
accordance with RCW 9A.16.050 or section 3 of this act;
(4) Whenever reasonably used by a person to detain someone who
enters or remains unlawfully in a building or on real property lawfully
in the possession of such person, so long as such detention is
reasonable in duration and manner to investigate the reason for the
detained person's presence on the premises, and so long as the premises
in question did not reasonably appear to be intended to be open to
members of the public;
(5) Whenever used by a carrier of passengers or the carrier's
authorized agent or servant, or other person assisting them at their
request in expelling from a carriage, railway car, vessel, or other
vehicle, a passenger who refuses to obey a lawful and reasonable
regulation prescribed for the conduct of passengers, if such vehicle
has first been stopped and the force used is not more than is necessary
to expel the offender with reasonable regard to the offender's personal
safety;
(6) Whenever used by any person to prevent a mentally ill, mentally
incompetent, or mentally disabled person from committing an act
dangerous to any person, or in enforcing necessary restraint for the
protection or restoration to health of the person, during such period
only as is necessary to obtain legal authority for the restraint or
custody of the person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 9A.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who uses defensive force as permitted in RCW 9A.16.050
or section 3 of this act is justified in using such force and is immune
from criminal prosecution and civil action for the use of such force,
unless the person against whom force was used was a peace officer who
was acting in the performance of his or her official duties and the
officer had identified himself or herself in accordance with any
applicable law or the person using force knew or reasonably should have
known that the person was a peace officer. As used in this subsection,
"criminal prosecution" includes arresting, detaining in custody, and
charging or prosecuting the defendant.
(2) A law enforcement agency may use standard procedures for
investigating the use of force as described in subsection (1) of this
section, but the agency may not arrest the person for using force
unless it determines that there is probable cause that the force that
was used was unlawful.
(3) The court shall award reasonable costs, including loss of time,
legal fees incurred, and other expenses involved in his or her defense,
incurred by the defendant in defense of a civil action brought by a
plaintiff if the court finds that the defendant is immune from
prosecution as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect June 30, 2006.

--- END ---