BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) It is unlawful for an employer to require its employees to
attend an employer-sponsored meeting or to participate in any
communications with the employer if the primary purpose is to
communicate the employer's opinion about religious or political
matters.
(b) This subsection does not:
(i) Apply to communications about religious or political matters
that the employer is required by law to communicate to employees, but
only to the extent of such requirement;
(ii) Prohibit a religious organization from requiring its employees
to attend an employer-sponsored meeting or to participate in any
communications with the employer if the primary purpose is to
communicate the employer's religious beliefs, practices, or tenets;
(iii) Prohibit a political organization from requiring its
employees to attend an employer-sponsored meeting or to participate in
any communications with the employer if the primary purpose is to
communicate the employer's political tenets or purposes; or
(iv) Prohibit an educational institution from requiring student
instructors to attend lectures on political or religious matters that
are part of the regular coursework at such institution.
(2) An employer may not discharge or in any manner discriminate
against, or threaten to discharge or discriminate against, an employee
because the employee, or a person acting on behalf of the employee,
makes a good faith report, orally or in writing, of a violation or a
suspected violation of this section. This subsection does not apply
when the employee knows that such report is false.
(3)(a) An employee aggrieved by a violation of this section may,
within ninety days after the date of the alleged violation, bring a
civil action in the superior court for the county where the violation
is alleged to have occurred or where the employer has its principal
office. The court may award a prevailing employee all appropriate
relief, including rehiring or reinstatement of the employee to the
employee's former position with back pay and without loss of seniority
or benefits to which the employee would otherwise have been eligible if
such violation had not occurred. The court shall award a prevailing
employee treble damages, together with reasonable costs and attorneys'
fees.
(b) This subsection does not limit an employee's right to bring a
common law cause of action against an employer for wrongful termination
or diminish or impair the rights of a person under a collective
bargaining agreement.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Employer" means the same as the definition in RCW
49.12.005(3)(b) and includes any person acting in the interest of an
employer.
(b) "Employee" means the same as the definition in RCW
49.12.005(4).
(c) "Labor organization" means any organization that exists for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining or of dealing
with employers concerning grievances, terms or conditions of
employment, or of other mutual aid or protection in connection with
employment.
(d) "Political matters" includes political party affiliation or the
decision to join or not join a lawful, political, social, or community
group or activity, or a labor organization.

--- END ---