BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 59.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that there are factors unique to the
relationship between a manufactured/mobile home owner and a
manufactured/mobile home park owner. Once occupancy has commenced, the
difficulty and expense in moving and relocating a manufactured/mobile
home can affect the operation of market forces, and lead to an
inequality of the bargaining position of the parties. Once occupancy
has commenced, a homeowner may be subject to violations of the
manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act or unfair practices
without a timely and cost-effective conflict resolution process.
Although a homeowner, landlord, or park owner may take legal action as
prescribed in the manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act, the
judicial process is often time and cost prohibitive. This act is
created for the purpose of protecting the public, fostering fair and
honest competition, and regulating the factors unique to the
relationship between the manufactured/mobile home owner and park owner.
(2) The legislature finds that taking legal action against a park
owner for violations of the manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant
act can be a costly and lengthy process, and that many people cannot
afford to pursue a court process to vindicate statutory rights. Park
owners similarly are impacted by legal fees and lengthy proceedings
resulting from pursuing a remedy through the legal system and would
also, therefore, benefit from having access to an appropriate,
effective process that resolves disputes quickly and efficiently.
(3) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to provide a
less costly and more efficient way for manufactured/mobile home owners
and park owners to resolve disputes, and to provide a mechanism for
state authorities to quickly locate owners of manufactured housing
communities. The legislature further intends to authorize the
department of community, trade, and economic development to:
(a) Register mobile home parks or manufactured housing communities;
(b) Maintain and update its current ombudsman program by retaining
or securing the necessary staffing level of hired or contracted persons
used to operate and implement the program under chapter 429, Laws of
2005;
(c) Take complaints, conduct investigations, and resolve disputes
through the ombudsman complaint resolution program; and
(d) Collect and report upon data related to conflicts and
violations.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.20.030 and 2003 c 127 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Abandoned" as it relates to a mobile home, manufactured home,
or park model owned by a tenant in a mobile home park, mobile home park
cooperative, or mobile home park subdivision or tenancy in a mobile
home lot means the tenant has defaulted in rent and by absence and by
words or actions reasonably indicates the intention not to continue
tenancy;
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development;
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of community,
trade, and economic development;
(4) "Landlord" or "park owner" means the owner of a mobile home
park or a manufactured housing community and includes the agents of a
landlord;
(((3))) (5) "Manufactured home" means a single-family dwelling
built according to the United States department of housing and urban
development manufactured home construction and safety standards act,
which is a national preemptive building code. A manufactured home
also: (a) Includes plumbing, heating, air conditioning, and electrical
systems; (b) is built on a permanent chassis; and (c) can be
transported in one or more sections with each section at least eight
feet wide and forty feet long when transported, or when installed on
the site is three hundred twenty square feet or greater;
(((4))) (6) "Mobile home" means a factory-built dwelling built
prior to June 15, 1976, to standards other than the United States
department of housing and urban development code, and acceptable under
applicable state codes in effect at the time of construction or
introduction of the home into the state. Mobile homes have not been
built since the introduction of the United States department of housing
and urban development manufactured home construction and safety act;
(((5))) (7) "Mobile home lot" means a portion of a mobile home park
or manufactured housing community designated as the location of one
mobile home, manufactured home, or park model and its accessory
buildings, and intended for the exclusive use as a primary residence by
the occupants of that mobile home, manufactured home, or park model;
(((6))) (8) "Mobile home park" or "manufactured housing community"
means any real property which is rented or held out for rent to others
for the placement of two or more mobile homes, manufactured homes,
((or)) park models, or recreational vehicles for the primary purpose of
production of income, except where such real property is rented or held
out for rent for seasonal recreational ((purpose)) purposes only and is
not ((intended)) used for year-round occupancy;
(((7))) (9) "Mobile home park cooperative" or "manufactured housing
cooperative" means real property consisting of common areas and two or
more lots held out for placement of mobile homes, manufactured homes,
or park models in which both the individual lots and the common areas
are owned by an association of shareholders which leases or otherwise
extends the right to occupy individual lots to its own members;
(((8))) (10) "Mobile home park subdivision" or "manufactured
housing subdivision" means real property, whether it is called a
subdivision, condominium, or planned unit development, consisting of
common areas and two or more lots held for placement of mobile homes,
manufactured homes, or park models in which there is private ownership
of the individual lots and common, undivided ownership of the common
areas by owners of the individual lots;
(((9))) (11) "Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or
severally, in whom is vested:
(a) All or part of the legal title to the real property; or
(b) All or part of the beneficial ownership, and a right to present
use and enjoyment of the real property;
(12) "Park model" means a recreational vehicle intended for
permanent or semi-permanent installation and is used as a ((primary))
permanent residence;
(((10))) (13) "Recreational vehicle" means a travel trailer, motor
home, truck camper, or camping trailer that is primarily ((designed
and)) used ((as temporary living quarters, is either self-propelled or
mounted on or drawn by another vehicle, is transient, is not occupied))
as a ((primary)) permanent residence((, and is not immobilized or
permanently affixed to)) located in a mobile home ((lot)) park or
manufactured housing community;
(((11))) (14) "Tenant" or "homeowner" means any person, except a
transient, who rents or occupies a mobile home lot;
(((12))) (15) "Transient" means a person who rents a mobile home
lot for a period of less than one month for purposes other than as a
primary residence;
(((13))) (16) "Occupant" means any person, including a live-in care
provider, other than a tenant, who occupies a mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model and mobile home lot;
(17) "Unfair practice" means any act that would constitute an
unfair or deceptive act or practice under chapter 19.86 RCW;
(18) "Complainant" means a landlord, park owner, tenant, or
homeowner, who has a complaint alleging an unfair practice or violation
of this chapter;
(19) "Respondent" means a landlord, park owner, tenant, or
homeowner, alleged to have committed an unfair practice or violation of
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 59.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A complainant has the right to file a complaint with the
department alleging an unfair practice or a violation of chapter 59.20
RCW.
(2) Upon receiving a complaint under this chapter, the department
shall utilize the ombudsman complaint resolution program and must:
(a) Inform the complainant of the time frame to remedy the
complaint under RCW 59.20.080 for tenant violations or RCW 59.20.200
for landlord violations; and
(b) Encourage the complainant to notify the respondent of the
complaint.
(3) After receiving a complaint under this chapter, the department
may:
(a) Investigate the alleged violations at its discretion upon
receipt of a complaint alleging unfair practices or violations of
chapter 59.20 RCW;
(b) Utilize investigative ombudsman staff or contractors to
investigate and evaluate complaints alleging unfair practices or
violations of chapter 59.20 RCW;
(c) Discuss the issues surrounding or relating to the complaint
with the complainant, respondent, or any witnesses, either individually
or jointly;
(d) Explain options available to the complainant or respondent,
including the involvement of other agencies; and
(e) Negotiate an agreement that is agreed upon by both the
complainant and the respondent.
(4) The department may require or permit any person to file a
complaint or statement in writing or otherwise as the department
determines, as to the facts and circumstances concerning a matter to be
investigated.
(5) The department has the power to employ investigative,
administrative, and clerical staff as necessary for administration of
this chapter.
(6)(a) Complainants and respondents shall cooperate with the
department in the course of an investigation by:
(i) Furnishing any papers or documents requested;
(ii) Furnishing in writing an explanation covering the matter
contained in a complaint when requested by the department; and
(iii) Allowing authorized access to department representatives for
inspection of mobile home parks/manufactured housing community
facilities relevant to the alleged violation being investigated.
(b) Failure to cooperate with the department in the course of an
investigation is a violation of this chapter.
(7) After the department has completed its investigation and other
duties, the department shall provide the interested parties to the
dispute with documentation of the complaint process and documentation
on the resolution of the complaint investigation. The department may
make or issue written findings, conclusions, decisions, or rulings on
whether there was a violation of chapter 59.20 or 19.86 RCW.
(8) The department shall (a) provide notice of the ombudsman
complaint resolution program to each mobile/manufactured home landlord
or park owner upon completed registration or (b) to the best of its
ability, provide such notice even if a mobile/manufactured home park or
housing community has failed to register. The landlord shall post an
easily visible notice in all common areas of mobile/manufactured home
communities, including in each clubhouse, summarizing mobile home park
tenant rights and responsibilities, in a style and format to be
determined by the department, and including information on how to file
a complaint with the office of manufactured housing and a toll-free
telephone number that mobile home park owners and tenants can use to
seek additional information and communicate complaints.
(9) The department shall review all unresolved complaints from the
previous twelve-month period and make or issue findings, conclusions,
decisions, or rulings on whether there was a violation of chapter 59.20
or 19.86 RCW. The department shall provide interested parties to the
dispute with documentation of these findings, conclusions, decisions,
or rulings.
(10) This section is not exclusive and does not limit the right of
landlords or tenants to take legal action against another party as
provided in chapter 59.20 RCW or otherwise. Exhaustion of this
ombudsman complaint resolution program is not required before bringing
legal action. This section does not apply to unlawful detainer actions
initiated under chapters 59.20, 59.12, and 59.18 RCW; however, a tenant
is not precluded from seeking relief under this chapter if the
complaint claims the notice of termination violates RCW 59.20.080.
Filing a complaint with the department is not a defense nor shall it in
any way delay or otherwise affect an unlawful detainer action.
Department-written reports documenting the process and resolution of
the complaint investigation, any written explanation covering the
matter requested by the department, any other documents or papers
requested or produced by the department, or any other record of the
complaint may be admissible for any reason, including for purposes of
impeachment, in accordance with the rules of evidence in any unlawful
detainer or other administrative or legal action in regard to chapter
59.20 or 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 59.22 RCW
to read as follows:
The director or individuals acting on the director's behalf are
immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based upon any
disciplinary actions or other official acts performed in the course of
their duties under this chapter, except their intentional or willful
misconduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 59.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All mobile home parks and manufactured housing communities must
be registered annually with the department.
(2) To apply for registration, the owner of a mobile home park or
manufactured housing community must file with the department an
application for registration on a form prescribed by the department.
The application must include, but is not limited to:
(a) The name and address of the owner of the mobile home park or
manufactured housing community;
(b) The name and address of the mobile home park or manufactured
housing community;
(c) The name and address of the manager of the mobile home park or
manufactured housing community; and
(d) The number of lots within the mobile home park or manufactured
housing community that are subject to chapter 59.20 RCW.
(3) Registration is effective on the date determined by the
department. All registrations must be assigned an expiration date by
the department. The department must:
(a) Establish a process for the annual renewal of registrations;
and
(b) Mail annually a letter with the effective registration and
expiration date to each owner of a mobile home park or manufactured
housing community, who has been registered by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 59.22 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must continually maintain and update a data base, in
which the following information is contained at a minimum:
(1) The number and names of all mobile home parks and manufactured
communities, and their owners, in the state;
(2) The number of complaints received;
(3) The nature and extent of the complaints received;
(4) The violation of law or unfair practice complained of; and
(5) The outcomes of resolution program complaints.
A summary analysis of this data base shall be provided to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31st of each
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 59.22 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must:
(1) Compile, update, and maintain the most accurate list possible
of all the mobile home parks or manufactured housing communities in the
state, the number of lots subject to chapter 59.20 RCW located in each
mobile home park or manufactured housing community, and the names and
addresses of the owners of these parks. The department is encouraged
to work with groups including, but not limited to: Mobile homeowners'
associations, tenant advocacy groups, park owners' associations, and
county assessors to generate the list;
(2) Send out notifications to all known mobile home park owners or
manufactured housing community owners regarding the due date of the
assessment under section 8 of this act. These notifications must
include information about late fees and passing costs on to tenants;
and
(3) Collect the registration assessment due from all mobile home
park owners or manufactured housing community owners, and allow ninety
days to pass before sending notices of late fees to noncomplying owners
as provided in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 59.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The owner of each mobile home park or manufactured housing
community shall annually pay to the department a registration
assessment of five dollars for each mobile home or manufactured home
that is subject to chapter 59.20 RCW within a park or community to fund
the costs associated with administering this chapter. Manufactured
housing community owners or mobile home park owners may pass on no more
than two dollars and fifty cents of this assessment to tenants.
(2) If an owner fails to pay the assessment before the registration
expiration date, a late fee shall be assessed, as provided in this
subsection for each mobile home or manufactured home that is subject to
chapter 59.20 RCW. The owner is not entitled to any reimbursement of
this fee from the tenants.
(a) A late fee shall be assessed at fifty percent of the total
amount due for registration, if the fee is received by the department
more than thirty, but less than sixty days after the registration fee
due date.
(b) A late fee shall be assessed at one hundred percent of the
total amount due for registration, if the fee is received by the
department more than sixty days late.

Sec. 9 RCW 59.22.050 and 1991 c 327 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to provide general assistance to mobile home resident
organizations, park owners, and landlords and tenants, the department
shall establish an office of ((mobile home affairs)) manufactured
housing which will serve as the coordinating office within state
government for matters relating to mobile homes or manufactured
housing.
This office will provide an ombudsman ((service)) complaint
resolution program to assist mobile home park owners and mobile home
tenants ((with respect to)) resolve problems and disputes ((between
park owners and park residents and to)). The office will also provide
technical assistance to resident organizations or persons in the
process of forming a resident organization pursuant to chapter 59.22
RCW. The office will keep records of its activities in this area.
(2) The office shall perform all the consumer complaint and related
functions of the state administrative agency that are required for
purposes of complying with the regulations established by the federal
department of housing and urban development for manufactured housing,
including the preparation and submission of the state administrative
plan.
(3) The office shall administer the mobile/manufactured home
community registration program including the collection of assessments,
associated late fees, and the compilation of data related to the number
of communities and number of lots within the community that are subject
to chapter 59.20 RCW.
(4) The office shall administer the mobile home relocation
assistance program established in chapter 59.21 RCW, including
verifying the eligibility of tenants for relocation assistance.

Sec. 10 RCW 59.22.070 and 1995 c 399 s 156 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created in the custody of the state treasurer a
special account known as the ((mobile home affairs)) office of
manufactured housing account.
((Disbursements from this special account shall be as follows:
(1) For the two-year period beginning July 1, 1988, forty thousand
dollars, or so much thereof as may be necessary for costs incurred in
registering landlords and collecting fees, and thereafter five thousand
dollars per year for that purpose.
(2))) All ((remaining)) amounts shall be remitted to the department
for the purpose of implementing RCW 59.22.050 ((and 59.22.060)).
(2) All funds collected by the department under section 8 of this
act shall be transferred to the state treasurer for deposit into the
office of manufactured housing account.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used only for the costs
associated with administering this chapter. Only the director or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---