BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.180 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that nonprofit organizations that develop
affordable housing for low-income households are critical in addressing
the growing affordable housing crisis in Washington state. Nonprofit
housing developers are mission-driven entities that prioritize the
needs and interests of residents over maximizing profits and,
therefore, have a vested interest in developing, maintaining, and
preserving safe, quality, and affordable housing options for low-income
and indigent individuals and families.
The state also finds, however, that organizational capacity and
housing development experience among nonprofit organizations is
inconsistent across the state. This inconsistency is reflected in the
relative lack of nonprofit housing developers that exist in rural areas
of the state.
The legislature finds that many nonprofit housing developers choose
not to develop condominiums and other multiunit residential buildings
because private market insurance rates to cover the construction
liability insurance required for such projects by many lenders is
unaffordable. Construction liability insurance costs are particularly
cost prohibitive for nonprofit organizations that, rather than selling
or reselling individual units when construction is complete and thereby
recouping the cost of the construction insurance, typically retain
ownership of units for the purpose of maintaining affordability for
low-income or indigent households.
Given the nonprofit status and focus on serving low-income and
indigent households over the long term, nonprofit housing developers
are unique and critical to ensuring that low-income and indigent
households have the opportunity to obtain and retain stable housing in
Washington.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to establish
policies and provide incentives that will increase the number of
nonprofit housing developers that create affordable housing
opportunities for low-income and indigent households, and which will
simultaneously increase the ability of existing nonprofit housing
developers to expand housing development programs and to sustain the
resulting affordable housing units over the long term.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.180.160 and 1999 c 131 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The total amount of outstanding indebtedness of the commission may
not exceed ((three)) four billion dollars at any time. The calculation
of outstanding indebtedness shall include the initial principal amount
of an issue and shall not include interest that is either currently
payable or that accrues as a part of the face amount of an issue
payable at maturity or earlier redemption. Outstanding indebtedness
shall not include notes or bonds as to which the obligation of the
commission has been satisfied and discharged by refunding or for which
payment has been provided by reserves or otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.185 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall contract with the Washington state housing
finance commission to establish a multiunit residential building
construction liability revolving fund program to provide supplemental
funding for liability claims arising from the construction or
rehabilitation of condominium or other multiunit residential buildings,
as defined in RCW 64.55.010, that are owned or controlled by nonprofit
corporations, as defined in RCW 43.180.300, for developing affordable
housing for low-income households. The revolving fund program shall
include the following elements:
(a) Criteria for the eligibility of multiunit residential projects
and project owners for participation in the revolving fund program;
(b) Provisions governing the scope of coverage and other policies
and operating procedures for the revolving fund program;
(c) Establishment of premiums to be paid by project owners to
ensure the viability of the revolving fund program and that all costs
incurred by the commission in administering the revolving fund program
will be paid or reimbursed as provided in subsection (3) of this
section;
(d) Provisions for the reimbursement of premiums to the extent not
required for the orderly and cost-effective administration of the
revolving fund program;
(e) Establishment of procedures for the investigation, defense, and
payment of claims and the recoupment of claim payments made and costs
associated with respect to participating projects from the project
owners over time; and
(f) Any other elements necessary and desirable to implement the
revolving fund program in order to provide a cost-effective source of
liability funding which is supplemental to insurance and other
resources available to project owners.
(2) The authority to enter into a contract with the commission
under this section is contingent on the commission's contribution of
one million dollars of commission funds to assist in capitalizing the
revolving fund program.
(3) Any claims against the commission arising from or with respect
to the revolving fund program may be paid only from amounts provided by
the commission for this purpose, provided by the contract entered into
pursuant to this section, or provided by premiums paid under the
revolving fund program, and neither the commission, the department, nor
the state of Washington shall have any liability with respect to such
claims.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 3 of this act, referencing section 3 of this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2006, in the capital
appropriations act, section 3 of this act is null and void.

--- END ---