BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall review Washington law to determine all areas in
Washington law in which the age of consent is statutorily established
including but not limited to entering a marriage contract, entering
into a legal contractual obligation, executing a will, the ability to
vote, making health care decisions, receiving mental health or chemical
dependency treatment, and obtaining body piercings or tattoos.
(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall review
available studies and reports pertaining to the ability of a minor to
provide consent, including studies on adolescent brain development.
The review should include information available on the ability of a
minor to understand the long-term effects or consequences of his or her
decisions, his or her ability to provide consent at various ages, and
at what age is a minor best able to provide consent.
(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall provide
a report to the appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 2006.
The report shall include a comparison of the Washington statutes
reviewed in subsection (1) of this section that includes the age at
which a minor is statutorily permitted to consent.

--- END ---