BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.42.050 and 2005 c 254 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies to any civil action or proceeding in which
a service member or his or her dependent is a defendant and does not
make an appearance under applicable court rules or by law.
(2) In any action or proceeding covered by this section, the court,
before entering judgment for the plaintiff, shall require the plaintiff
to file with the court an affidavit:
(a) Stating whether the defendant is in military service, or is a
dependent of a service member in military service, and showing
necessary facts to support the affidavit; or
(b) If the plaintiff is unable to determine whether the defendant
is in military service or is a dependent of a service member in
military service, stating that the plaintiff is unable to determine
whether the defendant is in military service or is a dependent of a
service member in military service.
(3)(a) To determine whether or not a defendant is a dependent of a
person in the military service under this chapter, the plaintiff may
serve on or mail via first-class mail to the defendant a written notice
in substantially the following form:

"NOTICE: State and federal law provide protections to defendants
who are on active duty in the military service, and to their
dependents. Dependents of a service member are the service member's
spouse, the service member's minor child, or an individual for whom the
service member provided more than one-half of the individual's support
for one hundred eighty days immediately preceding an application for
relief.
One protection provided is the protection against the entry of a
default judgment in certain circumstances. This notice only pertains
to a defendant who is a dependent of a member of the national guard or
a military reserve component under a call to active service for a
period of more than thirty consecutive days. Other defendants in
military service also have protections against default judgments not
covered by this notice. If you are the dependent of a member of the
national guard or a military reserve component under a call to active
service for a period of more than thirty consecutive days, you should
notify the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorneys in writing of your
status as such within twenty days of the receipt of this notice. If
you fail to do so, then a court or an administrative tribunal may
presume that you are not a dependent of an active duty member of the
national guard or reserves, and proceed with the entry of an order of
default and/or a default judgment without further proof of your status.
Your response to the plaintiff or plaintiff's attorneys about your
status does not constitute an appearance for jurisdictional purposes in
any pending litigation nor a waiver of your rights."

(b) If the notice is either served on the defendant twenty or more
days prior to an application for an order of default or a default
judgment, or mailed to the defendant more than twenty-three days prior
to such application, and the defendant fails to timely respond, then
for purposes of entry of an order of default or default judgment, the
court or administrative tribunal may presume that the defendant is not
a dependent of a person in the military service under this chapter.
(c) Nothing prohibits the plaintiff from allowing a defendant more
than twenty days to respond to the notice, or from amending the notice
to so provide.
(4) If in an action covered by this section it appears that the
defendant is in military service or is a dependent of a service member
in military service, the court may not enter a judgment until after the
court appoints an attorney to represent the defendant. If an attorney
appointed under this section to represent a service member or his or
her dependent cannot locate the service member or dependent, actions by
the attorney in the case do not waive any defense of the service member
or dependent or otherwise bind the service member or dependent.
(((4))) (5) In an action covered by this section in which the
defendant is in military service or is a dependent of a service member
in military service, the court shall grant a stay of proceedings until
one hundred eighty days after termination of or release from military
service, upon application of defense counsel, or on the court's own
motion, if the court determines that:
(a) There may be a defense to the action and a defense cannot be
presented without presence of the defendant; or
(b) After due diligence, counsel has been unable to contact the
defendant or otherwise determine if a meritorious defense exists. The
defendant's failure to communicate or cooperate with counsel after
having been contacted is not grounds to find that counsel has been
unable to contact the defendant or that counsel has been unable to
determine if a meritorious defense exists.
(((5))) (6) No bar to entry of judgment under subsection (((3)))
(4) of this section or requirement for grant of stay under subsection
(((4))) (5) of this section precludes the entry of temporary orders in
domestic relations cases. If a court or administrative tribunal enters
a temporary order as allowed under this subsection, it shall include a
finding that failure to act, despite the absence of the service member,
would result in manifest injustice to the other interested parties.
Temporary orders issued without the service member's participation
shall not set any precedent for the final disposition of the matters
addressed therein.
(((6))) (7) If a service member or dependent who is a defendant in
an action covered by this section receives actual notice of the action,
the service member or dependent may request a stay of proceedings
pursuant to RCW 38.42.060.
(((7))) (8) A person who makes or uses an affidavit permitted under
this section knowing it to be false, is guilty of a class C felony.
(((8))) (9) If a default judgment is entered in an action covered
by this section against a service member or his or her dependent during
the service member's period of military service or within one hundred
eighty days after termination of or release from military service, the
court entering the judgment shall, upon application by or on behalf of
the service member or his or her dependent, reopen the judgment for the
purpose of allowing the service member or his or her dependent to
defend the action if it appears that:
(a) The service member or dependent was materially affected by
reason of that military service in making a defense to the action; and
(b) The service member or dependent has a meritorious or legal
defense to the action or some part of it.
(((9))) (10) If a court vacates, sets aside, or reverses a default
judgment against a service member or his or her dependent and the
vacating, setting aside, or reversing is because of a provision of this
chapter, that action does not impair a right or title acquired by a
bona fide purchaser for value.

--- END ---