BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of vessels
thirty feet or longer to residents of foreign countries, and other
states, for use outside of this state, even though delivery is made
within this state, but only if the vessel owner purchases and displays
a valid "use permit" issued by the department. A use permit may not be
issued to any vessel registered in Washington state nor may one be
issued for any vessel not registered to individuals in a foreign
country or another state. A corporation as a registered owner of a
vessel may not be issued a use permit under this section. The
department is authorized to impose a fee for a "use permit." A use
permit may be issued for twelve consecutive months from the date of
issue. A buyer at the time of purchase must make an irrevocable
election to take the exemption authorized in this section or the
exemption in either RCW 82.08.0266 or 82.08.02665.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---