BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.370 and 2005 c 75 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The World War II oral history project is established for the
purpose of providing oral history presentations, documentation, and
other materials to assist the ((office of the superintendent of public
instruction)) department and educators in the development of a
curriculum for use in kindergarten through twelfth grade.
(2) To the extent funds are appropriated or donated, the project
shall be administered by the ((office of the superintendent of public
instruction)) department. The ((office)) department shall convene an
advisory committee to assist in the design and implementation of the
project. The committee shall be composed of representatives of the
Washington state historical society, members of the World War II
memorial educational foundation, and representatives of the department
of veterans affairs((, the secretary of state's office, and legislators
involved with and interested in the development of the oral history
project. The committee may select its own chair and may expand its
membership to include the services of other individuals, agencies, or
organizations on the basis of need. The office shall provide staffing
and administrative support to the advisory committee)).
(3) The project will preserve for the education of Washington's
school children the memories and history of our state's citizens who
served their state and country as members of the armed forces or
through national or community contributions during World War II. The
project is intended to preserve these memories and history through
audiotapes, videotapes, films, stories, printed transcripts, digitally,
and through other appropriate methods.
(4) Any funding provided to the program through the omnibus
appropriations act for the 2005-2007 biennium shall be used to record
the memories of women who meet the requirements of subsection (3) of
this section.
(((5) As part of the project, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall identify the requirements regarding
instructional guides to help educators use the preserved material in
age and grade appropriate ways.
(6) In its administration of the project, the office may carry out
its responsibilities through contracts with filming and taping
specialists, mini-grants to schools, contracts with the World War II
memorial educational foundation, and through other means recommended by
the foundation.
(7) By December 1, 2000, and every second year thereafter in which
the project has received funding, the office shall report on the
results of the project to the governor and the house of representatives
and senate committees on education. The December 2000 report shall
include, but need not be limited to, identification of the project's
implementation strategies and resource requirements, and any curriculum
standards developed through the project.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of the
superintendent of public instruction pertaining to the World War II
oral history project are transferred to the department of veterans
affairs.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the superintendent of
public instruction pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department of
veterans affairs. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the superintendent of
public instruction in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be made available to the department of veterans
affairs. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with
the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the
department of veterans affairs.
(b) Any appropriations made to the superintendent of public
instruction for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the department of veterans affairs.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any tangible
property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance
of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial
management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and
certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the superintendent of
public instruction pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department of
veterans affairs. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain
in full force and shall be performed by the department of veterans
affairs.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the
superintendent of public instruction shall not affect the validity of
any act performed before the effective date of this section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 28A.300.370 is recodified as a new
section in chapter 43.60A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---