BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The health care authority, in coordination with the department
of social and health services, shall prepare a report on basic health
plan enrollees under this chapter who are employed by any employer with
thirty or more employees who are either basic health plan enrollees or
medical assistance recipients. The report shall include the following
composite information:
(a) The number of employees by employer;
(b) The employee size of the employer;
(c) The number of employees by industry type;
(d) The number of hours worked by employees;
(e) The number of employees with multiple employers;
(f) The number of employees who were receiving any government
assistance prior to being employed;
(g) The length of time the employee has been employed;
(h) The number of employees who chose the basic health plan instead
of insurance coverage offered by their employer, and why they did so;
and
(i) The number of employees referred to the basic health plan by
their employer and the number referred by others, including public
agencies, relatives, or friends.
(2) The report must be structured so as to identify seasonal
variations that may impact the composite information in the report.
(3) The report must include recommendations from the department of
social and health services for strategies to reduce state costs
associated with providing medical assistance coverage to individuals
who are employed on a full-time and year-round basis. The report shall
be prepared in consultation with the health care authority and other
interested organizations. The following principles shall guide
development of the recommendations:
(a) Employers who have the financial ability to contribute to the
cost of health care coverage for their employees should provide such
coverage; and
(b) Reduction of state costs should not come at the expense of
depriving low-wage employees of health care coverage.
(4) The report must be delivered electronically to appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives annually,
commencing no later than November 15, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services, in coordination
with the health care authority, shall prepare a report on recipients of
medical assistance under this chapter who are employed by any employer
with thirty or more employees who are either basic health plan
enrollees or medical assistance recipients. The report shall include
the following composite information:
(a) The number of employees by employer;
(b) The employee size of the employer;
(c) The number of employees by industry type;
(d) The number of hours worked by employees;
(e) The number of employees with multiple employers;
(f) The number of employees who were receiving any government
assistance prior to being employed;
(g) The length of time the employee has been employed;
(h) The number of employees who chose receipt of medical assistance
instead of insurance coverage offered by their employer, and why they
did so; and
(i) The number of employees referred to medical assistance by their
employer and the number referred by others, including public agencies,
relatives, or friends.
(2) The report must be structured so as to identify seasonal
variations that may impact the composite information in the report.
(3) The report must include recommendations from the department of
social and health services for strategies to reduce state costs
associated with providing medical assistance coverage to individuals
who are employed on a full-time and year-round basis. The report shall
be prepared in consultation with the health care authority and other
interested organizations. The following principles shall guide
development of the recommendations:
(a) Employers who have the financial ability to contribute to the
cost of health care coverage for their employees should provide such
coverage; and
(b) Reduction of state costs should not come at the expense of
depriving low-wage employees of health care coverage.
(4) The report must be delivered electronically to appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives annually,
commencing no later than November 15, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---