BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature intends to address the
needs of people with a mental illness with a targeted, coordinated, and
comprehensive set of evidence-based practices that are effective in
serving individuals in their community and will reduce the need for
placements in state mental hospitals. The legislature further intends
to explicitly hold regional support networks accountable for serving
people with a mental illness within their geographic boundaries and for
not exceeding their allocation of state hospital beds. Within funds
appropriated by the legislature for this purpose, regional support
networks shall develop the means to serve the needs of people with a
mental illness within their geographic boundaries. Elements of the
program may include:
(a) Crisis triage;
(b) Evaluation and treatment and community hospital beds;
(c) Residential beds;
(d) Program for community treatment teams; and
(e) Out-patient services.
(2) The regional support network will have the flexibility, within
the funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose, to design
the mix of services that will be most effective within their service
area of meeting the needs of people with a mental illness and avoiding
placement of such individuals at the state mental hospital.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.24.016 and 2001 c 323 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that the community mental
health service delivery system focus on maintaining mentally ill
individuals in the community, and reserve the use of state hospital
beds for individuals who cannot be served safely in the community. The
program shall be evaluated and managed through a limited number of
performance measures designed to hold each regional support network
accountable for program success.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.24.330 and 2005 c 503 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Contracts between a regional support network and the department
shall include mechanisms for monitoring performance under the contract
and remedies for failure to substantially comply with the requirements
of the contract including, but not limited to, financial penalties,
termination of the contract, and reprocurement of the contract.
(2) The procurement process shall encourage the preservation of
infrastructure previously purchased by the community mental health
service delivery system, the maintenance of linkages between other
services and delivery systems, and maximization of the use of available
funds for services versus profits. The procurement process shall
provide that public funds appropriated by the legislature shall not be
used to promote or deter, encourage, or discourage employees from
exercising their rights under Title 29, chapter 7, subchapter II,
United States Code or chapter 41.56 RCW.
(3) In addition to the requirements of RCW 71.24.035, contracts
shall:
(a) Define administrative costs and ensure that the regional
support network does not exceed an administrative cost of ten percent
of available funds;
(b) Require effective collaboration with law enforcement, criminal
justice agencies, and the chemical dependency treatment system;
(c) Require substantial implementation of department adopted
integrated screening and assessment process and matrix of best
practices; ((and))
(d) Maintain the decision-making independence of designated mental
health professionals; and
(e) Ensure that regional support networks do not exceed the state
hospital bed allocation established in their contract with the
department.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.05.560 and 1998 c 297 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to
effectuate the intent and purposes of this chapter, which shall include
but not be limited to evaluation of the quality of the program and
facilities operating pursuant to this chapter, evaluation of the
effectiveness and cost effectiveness of such programs and facilities,
implementation of a formula to allocate utilization of state hospital
beds among the regional support networks and hold the regional support
networks accountable for not over utilizing their allocation, and
procedures and standards for certification and other action relevant to
evaluation and treatment facilities.

--- END ---