BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the passage of
the oil and gas conservation act in 1951 established a regulatory
framework for the oil and gas industry in Washington, and that
subsequent amendments in 1971, 1983, and 1994 have maintained the
original framework and that the integration of the state environmental
policy act and administrative procedure act is needed to strengthen the
existing framework.
The legislature further finds that since the last amendment in
1994, there is increasing interest in oil and natural gas resources and
the underground storage of natural gas. The legislature further finds
that the absence of a modern, comprehensive financial and regulatory
approach to these related issues has placed Washington at a
disadvantage in ensuring environmental protection and realizing
appropriate economic benefits from this activity.
The legislature further finds that it is in the state's interest to
foster oil and natural gas resources-related activities in an
appropriate regulatory, technical, environmental, and financial
framework, and that the existing framework does not adequately allow
the state to respond to potential discoveries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The commissioner of public lands shall
develop recommendations to improve the regulatory, technical,
environmental, and financial framework of the oil and gas industry as
specified in section 1 of this act by December 30, 2006. In developing
statewide recommendations, the commissioner shall assemble and consult
the work group created in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A work group is created to study current
state regulation of the oil and gas industry and opportunities to
improve the oil and gas financial and regulatory program as specified
in section 1 of this act and to help the commissioner of public lands
develop recommendations under section 2 of this act.
(2) The work group is comprised of individuals selected on the
basis of their knowledge of regulatory, technical, environmental, and
financial issues related to oil and natural gas resources and, if
determined by the commissioner of public lands to be necessary, should
represent a mix of individuals with knowledge regarding specific
regions of the state. Members of the work group must be appointed by
the commissioner of public lands and must include:
(a) The commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's
designee, who shall serve as chair of the work group;
(b) A representative of the water quality program in the department
of ecology;
(c) A representative of the state environmental policy act program
in the department of ecology;
(d) A representative of the department of community, trade, and
economic development;
(e) A representative of the department of revenue;
(f) A representative of farm interests;
(g) A representative of cattle interests;
(h) A representative of independent producers and royalty owners
interests;
(i) A representative of a statewide environmental group;
(j) A representative of the utility industry with experience in the
operation of underground natural gas storage;
(k) A representative of the oil and gas industry with interest in
conventional oil and gas exploration and development;
(l) A representative of the oil and gas industry with interest in
coal bed methane exploration and development;
(m) Two representatives from forest landowners, one representing
small forest landowners and one representing large forest landowners;
and
(n) Two representatives of counties, one from east of the crest of
the Cascade mountains and one from west of the crest of the Cascade
mountains.
(3) The work group must assist the commissioner of public lands in
developing recommendations as specified under section 2 of this act and
shall consider:
(a) Existing financial and regulatory programs affecting the oil
and gas industry in Washington;
(b) Funding amounts and sources necessary for an effective and
efficient oil and gas regulatory program;
(c) Current and foreseeable activities related to oil and gas
exploration, development, and underground storage of natural gas in the
state;
(d) Adequacy of current programs to address the technical,
environmental, and financial aspects of oil and gas-related activities
such as exploration wells, field development, underground natural gas
storage, coal bed methane development, and conservation of the
resources; and
(e) Other related matters that may come to the work group's
attention regarding current and foreseeable activities related to oil
and gas exploration, development, and underground storage of natural
gas in the state.
(4) By December 30, 2006, the commissioner of public lands must
submit the work group's findings, and recommendations for legislation
that is necessary to implement the findings, to the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature. The department of natural
resources must provide technical and staff support from existing staff
for the work group created by this section.

--- END ---