BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.115 and 1999 c 301 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall develop and maintain a cross-state trail
facility with appropriate appurtenances.
(2) This section expires July 1, ((2006)) 2013, if the department
of transportation does not enter into a franchise agreement for a rail
line over portions of the Milwaukee Road corridor by July 1, ((2006))
2013.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.05.120 and 1999 c 301 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To facilitate completion of a cross-state trail under the
management of the parks and recreation commission, management and
control of lands known as the Milwaukee Road corridor shall be
transferred between state agencies as follows on the date a franchise
agreement is entered into for a rail line over portions of the
Milwaukee Road corridor:
(a) Portions owned by the state between Ellensburg and the Columbia
river that are managed by the parks and recreation commission are
transferred to the department of transportation;
(b) Portions owned by the state between the west side of the
Columbia river and Royal City Junction and between Warden and Lind that
are managed by the department of natural resources are transferred to
the department of transportation; and
(c) Portions owned by the state between Lind and the Idaho border
that are managed by the department of natural resources are transferred
to the parks and recreation commission.
(2) The department of natural resources and the parks and
recreation commission may by mutual agreement transfer the management
authority over portions of the Milwaukee Road corridor between their
two respective agencies without legislative approval if the portion
transferred does not exceed ten miles in length.
(3) This section expires July 1, ((2006)) 2013, and no transfers
shall occur if the department of transportation does not enter into a
franchise agreement for a rail line over portions of the Milwaukee Road
corridor by July 1, ((2006)) 2013.

--- END ---