BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.79.050 and 2000 c 64 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Advanced registered nursing practice" means the performance of the
acts of a registered nurse and the performance of an expanded role in
providing health care services as recognized by the medical and nursing
professions, including the nurse practitioner, clinical nurse
specialist, nurse anesthetist, or nurse midwife role, the scope of
which is defined by rule by the commission. Upon approval by the
commission, an advanced registered nurse practitioner may prescribe
legend drugs and controlled substances contained in Schedule V of the
Uniform Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW, and Schedules II
through IV subject to RCW 18.79.240(1) (r) or (s).
Nothing in this section prohibits a person from practicing a
profession for which a license has been issued under the laws of this
state or specifically authorized by any other law of the state of
Washington.
This section does not prohibit (1) the nursing care of the sick,
without compensation, by an unlicensed person who does not hold himself
or herself out to be an advanced registered nurse practitioner, or (2)
the practice of registered nursing by a licensed registered nurse or
the practice of licensed practical nursing by a licensed practical
nurse.

--- END ---