BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to ensure that the
state's investment in public safety radio communications facilities are
managed in a way to promote to the maximum extent possible the health
and safety of the state's citizens and the economic efficiencies of
coordinated planning, development, management, maintenance,
accountability, and performance. The legislature finds that an
interoperable and operational public safety communications system is
essential for disaster preparedness, emergency management, and public
safety, and that coordination for the purpose of development,
procurement, and deployment of a public safety communications system
will result in a more effective use of state resources and improvement
to government services.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.105.020 and 2003 c 18 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise,
the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Department" means the department of information services;
(2) "Board" means the information services board;
(3) "Committee" means the state interoperability executive
committee;
(4) "Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi municipal
corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such
corporations and subdivisions authorized to contract separately;
(5) "Director" means the director of the department;
(6) "Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing, and necessary functions. This term
includes, but is not limited to, services acquired for equipment
maintenance and repair, operation of a physical plant, security,
computer hardware and software installation and maintenance,
telecommunications installation and maintenance, data entry, keypunch
services, programming services, and computer time-sharing;
(7) "Backbone network" means the shared high-density portions of
the state's telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes
specially conditioned high-speed communications carrier lines,
multiplexors, switches associated with such communications lines, and
any equipment and software components necessary for management and
control of the backbone network;
(8) "Telecommunications" means the transmission of information by
wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other means;
(9) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, data, text,
voice, and video;
(10) "Information processing" means the electronic capture,
collection, storage, manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and
presentation of information in the form of data, text, voice, or image
and includes telecommunications and office automation functions;
(11) "Information services" means data processing,
telecommunications, office automation, and computerized information
systems;
(12) "Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission
facilities used in information processing, such as computers, word
processors, terminals, telephones, wireless communications system
facilities, cables, and any physical facility necessary for the
operation of such equipment;
(13) "Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a
strategic management process documenting relationships between agency
missions and information technology and telecommunications investments;
(14) "Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk analysis and
management designed to ensure optimum use of information technology
resources and telecommunications;
(15) "Proprietary software" means that software offered for sale or
license;
(16) "Video telecommunications" means the electronic
interconnection of two or more sites for the purpose of transmitting
and/or receiving visual and associated audio information. Video
telecommunications shall not include existing public television
broadcast stations as currently designated by the department of
community, trade, and economic development under chapter 43.330 RCW;
(17) "K-20 educational network board" or "K-20 board" means the K-20 educational network board created in RCW 43.105.800;
(18) "K-20 network technical steering committee" or "committee"
means the K-20 network technical steering committee created in RCW
43.105.810;
(19) "K-20 network" means the network established in RCW
43.105.820;
(20) "Educational sectors" means those institutions of higher
education, school districts, and educational service districts that use
the network for distance education, data transmission, and other uses
permitted by the K-20 board;
(21) "Public safety" means any public agency that provides services
that protect life, health, property, or natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By June 30, 2012, a statewide public safety communications
system must be built to achieve the highest level of interoperability
possible. This system must consist of the following:
(a) A centrally managed system of systems architectures that
facilitates the sharing of assets between state and local governments;
(b) A radio over internet protocol-based interoperability system
that enables nonstate agencies to interconnect their radio systems with
the state system;
(c) A statewide digital transport backbone system that provides
connectivity to all transmitter locations;
(d) A mutual-aid communications system deployed across the state to
enable interoperability at and across the commonly used public safety
frequency bands;
(e) A statewide, project 25 standards-based, frequency independent
system of systems that uses equipment common to all agency-focused
systems providing full interoperability; and
(f) A statewide mobile data system that provides low and medium
speed data communications capabilities for participating agency
subscribers.
(2) The state interoperability executive committee must provide an
annual report to the legislature and the office of financial management
that documents the design, accomplishments, remaining tasks, and
recommendations by September 1, 2006, and annually by September 1st
thereafter.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.105.080 and 1999 c 80 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is created a revolving fund to be known as the data
processing revolving fund in the custody of the state treasurer. The
revolving fund shall be used for the acquisition of equipment,
software, supplies, and services and the payment of salaries, wages,
and other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, operation,
and administration of information services, telecommunications,
systems, software, supplies and equipment, including the payment of
principal and interest on bonds issued for capital projects, by the
department, Washington State University's computer services center, the
department of personnel's personnel information systems division, the
office of financial management's financial systems management group,
and other users as jointly determined by the department and the office
of financial management. The revolving fund shall also be used for the
development, operation, maintenance, and administration of a shared
public safety communications system. The revolving fund is subject to
the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW.
Disbursements from the revolving fund for the services component of the
department are not subject to appropriation. Disbursements for the
strategic planning and policy component of the department are subject
to appropriation. All disbursements from the fund are subject to the
allotment procedures provided under chapter 43.88 RCW. The department
shall establish and implement a billing structure to assure all
agencies pay an equitable share of the costs.
As used in this section, the word "supplies" shall not be
interpreted to delegate or abrogate the division of purchasing's
responsibilities and authority to purchase supplies as described in RCW
43.19.190 and 43.19.200.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act shall be implemented to the extent
that sufficient funds are available from state, federal, and local
sources. Nothing in this act prevents the state from continuing
maintenance and operation of existing public safety communications and
information systems or programs.

--- END ---