BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that people of color experience significant
disparities from the general population in education, employment,
healthful living conditions, access to health care, and other social
determinants of health. The legislature finds that these circumstances
coupled with lower, slower, and less culturally appropriate access to
needed medical care result in higher rates of morbidity and mortality
for persons of color than observed in the general population. Health
disparities is defined by the national institute of health as the
differences in incidence, prevalence, mortality, and burden of disease
and other adverse health conditions that exist among specific
population groups in the United States. It is the intent of the
Washington state legislature to create the healthiest state in the
nation by striving to eliminate health disparities in women and people
of color. In meeting the intent of this act, the legislature creates
the governor's interagency council on health disparities.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.20.025 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 208 are each
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Commissions" means the Washington state commission on African-American affairs established in chapter 43.113 RCW, the Washington
state commission on Asian Pacific American affairs established in
chapter 43.117 RCW, the Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs
established in chapter 43.115 RCW, and the governor's office of Indian
affairs.
(2) "Consumer representative" means any person who is not an
elected official, who has no fiduciary obligation to a health facility
or other health agency, and who has no material financial interest in
the rendering of health services.
(((2))) (3) "Council" means the ((health care access and cost
control)) governor's health disparities coordinating council, convened
according to this chapter.
(((3))) (4) "Department" means the department of health.
(((4))) (5) "Health disparities" means the difference in incidence,
prevalence, mortality, or burden of disease and other adverse health
conditions, including lack of access to proven health care services
that exists between specific population groups in Washington state.
(6) "Health impact assessment" means a systematic review of a
legislative or budgetary proposal or other public policy, program, or
practice completed according to the terms of this chapter that
determines the extent to which such proposal, policy, program, or
practice improves or exacerbates health disparities.
(7) "Secretary" means the secretary of health, or the secretary's
designee.
(((5))) (8) "Local health board" means a health board created
pursuant to chapter 70.05, 70.08, or 70.46 RCW.
(((6))) (9) "Local health officer" means the legally qualified
physician appointed as a health officer pursuant to chapter 70.05,
70.08, or 70.46 RCW.
(((7))) (10) "Social determinants of health" means those elements
of social structure most closely shown to affect health and illness,
including at a minimum, early learning, education, socioeconomic
standing, safe housing, sanitary environmental conditions, gender,
incidence of violence, convenient and affordable access to safe
opportunities for physical activity, healthy diet, clean water, clean
air, toxin-free environments, and appropriate health care services.
(11) "State board" means the state board of health created under
chapter 43.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In collaboration with staff whom the office of financial
management may assign, and within funds made expressly available to the
state board for these purposes, the state board shall assist the
governor by convening and providing assistance to the governor's
interagency council on health disparities. The council shall include
one representative from each of the following groups: Each of the
commissions, the state board, the department, the department of social
and health services, the employment security department, the department
of community, trade, and economic development, the department of
corrections, the health care authority, the department of labor and
industries, the department of agriculture, the department of ecology,
the higher education coordinating board, the department of
transportation, the state board for community and technical colleges,
the work force training and education coordinating board, and two
members of the public who will represent the interests of health care
consumers. The governor or the governor's designee shall chair the
commission.
(2) The council shall promote and facilitate communication,
coordination, and collaboration among relevant state agencies and
communities of color to address health disparities. The council shall
conduct public hearings, inquiries, studies, or other forms of
information gathering to understand how the actions of state government
ameliorate or contribute to health disparities. Within the limits of
their resources, all state agencies must cooperate with the council's
efforts.
(3) The council with assistance from the state board, shall assess
through public hearings, review of existing data, and other means, and
recommend initiatives for improving the availability of culturally
appropriate health literature and interpretive services within public
and private health-related agencies.
(4) In order to assist with its work, the council may establish
advisory committees to include members from local communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The governor's interagency council on health disparities shall
consider in its deliberations an action plan for eliminating health
disparities by 2012. The action plan must address, but is not limited
to, the following diseases: Diabetes, asthma, infant mortality,
HIV/AIDS, heart disease, strokes, breast cancer, cervical cancer,
prostate cancer, sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS), mental health,
smoking cessation, and immunization rates of children. The action plan
shall be updated biannually. The council shall meet as often as
necessary but not less than six times per calendar year. The council
shall report its progress with the action plan to the governor and the
legislature no later than January 15, 2008. A second report shall be
presented no later than January 15, 2010, and a final report from the
council shall be presented to the governor and the legislature no later
than January 15, 2012.

--- END ---