BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that people of color
experience significant disparities from the general population in
education, employment, healthy living conditions, access to health
care, and other social determinants of health. The legislature intends
that state government policy leaders, program managers, and staff
increase their awareness of actions they take or that they contemplate
taking that contribute to health disparities. It shall be the policy
of the state of Washington to address health disparities in communities
of color and among women by creating an action plan and statewide
policy to include health impact assessments that measure and address
other social determinants of health that lead to disparities as well as
the contributing factors of health that can have broad impacts on
improving status, health literacy, physical activity, and nutrition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The state board, in collaboration with the governor's interagency
council on health disparities, shall complete health impact
assessments, in collaboration with the council, and with assistance
that shall be provided by any state agency of which the board makes a
request. The state board may limit the number of health impact
assessments it produces to retain quality while operating within its
available resources.
(1) A health impact assessment may be initiated by any council
member or by any state legislator by written request submitted
according to forms and procedures proposed by the council and approved
by the state board.
(2) The subject of the assessment may be any state government
program, policy, practice, or proposal for state legislative or
budgetary change that the requesting party believes may have a
significant impact on health disparities.
(3) Upon receiving a request for a health impact assessment from a
member of the legislature during a legislative session, the state board
shall deliver the health impact assessment to the requesting party in
no more than ten days. Requests made in the normal course of business
shall receive an assessment from the state board no later than ninety
days after a request is made.
(4) Upon delivery of the assessment to the requesting party, it
shall be a public document, and shall be available on the state board's
web site.
(5) The assessment shall be based on the best available empirical
information and professional assumptions available to the state board
regarding the most likely health impact of the subject program,
practice, or proposal. Such impacts may include changes in health
disparities or in the social determinants of health experienced by
racial or ethnic minorities.
(6) In fulfilling their responsibilities under this subsection, the
state board and the council may create ad hoc committees or other such
committees of limited duration as necessary.
(7) The state board and the department shall collaborate to obtain
any federal or private funding that may become available to implement
the state board's duties under this chapter. If the department
receives such funding, the department shall allocate it to the state
board to implement its duties under this chapter, and any state general
funds that may have been appropriated but are no longer needed by the
state board shall lapse to the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of three hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the department of
health for allotment to the state board of health for its use in
implementing this act.

--- END ---