BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.180 and 1991 sp.s. c 30 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the
state acting through its principal supervising official or governing
body may, whenever funds shall be available for that purpose provide
for all or a part of hospitalization and medical aid for its employees
and their dependents through contracts with regularly constituted
insurance carriers or with health care service contractors as defined
in chapter 48.44 RCW or self-insurers as provided for in chapter 48.62
RCW, for group hospitalization and medical aid policies or plans:
PROVIDED, That any county, municipality, or other political subdivision
of the state acting through its principal supervising official or
governing body shall provide the employees thereof a choice of policies
or plans through contracts with not less than two regularly constituted
insurance carriers or health care service contractors or other health
care plans, including but not limited to, trusts of self-insurance as
provided for in chapter 48.62 RCW: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That any
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state
acting through its principal supervising official or governing body may
provide such hospitalization and medical aid to ((county)) their
elected officials and commissioners and ((their)) the dependents of
these officials and commissioners on the same basis as such
hospitalization and medical aid is provided to all other ((county))
employees thereof and their dependents: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
provision for school district personnel shall not be made under this
section but shall be as provided for in RCW 28A.400.350.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.04.190 and 1996 c 230 s 1610 are each amended to
read as follows:
The cost of a policy or plan to a public agency or body is not
additional compensation to the employees or elected officials covered
thereby. The elected officials to whom this section applies include,
but are not limited to, commissioners elected under chapters 28A.315,
52.14, 53.12, 54.12, 57.12, 70.44, and 87.03 RCW, as well as any
((county)) elected officials and commissioners who are provided
insurance coverage under RCW 41.04.180. Any officer authorized to
disburse such funds may pay in whole or in part to an insurance carrier
or health care service contractor the amount of the premiums due under
the contract.

--- END ---