BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the
department of ecology adopted ground water management subarea rules to
manage aquifer depletions in the Odessa subarea, which includes
undeveloped portions of the federal Columbia basin project.
(2) The legislature also finds that deep well agricultural
irrigation was permitted within the Odessa subarea under the
expectation that federal Columbia basin project water would be
delivered to replace the temporary ground water withdrawals in time to
stabilize aquifer levels.
(3) The legislature further finds that because federal project
water has not been delivered as anticipated, aquifer levels have
continued to decline despite department of ecology and community
efforts to manage ground water withdrawals in a sustainable manner.
(4) The legislature further finds that, because substantial project
expansion and aquifer recharge is a long-term effort, the continued
availability of ground water for domestic, municipal, industrial, and
agricultural uses in the region is in great jeopardy.
(5) The legislature therefore declares that immediate relief is
needed to encourage more efficient use of water and to protect the
region's citizens from economic hardships and public health and safety
risks that can result from declining aquifer levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to encourage more efficient use of water, where the
source of water is an aquifer within the Odessa ground water subarea as
defined in chapter 173-128A WAC:
(a) Any period of nonuse of a right to withdraw ground water from
the aquifer is deemed to be involuntary due to a drought or low flow
period under RCW 90.14.140(2)(b); and
(b) Such unused water is deemed a standby or reserve water supply
that may again be used after the period of nonuse, as long as: (i)
Reductions in water use are a result of conservation practices,
irrigation or water use efficiencies, long or short-term changes in the
types or rotations of crops grown, economic hardship, pumping or system
infrastructure costs, unavailability or unsuitability of water, or
willing and documented participation in cooperative efforts to reduce
aquifer depletion and optimize available water resources; (ii)
withdrawal or diversion facilities are maintained in good operating
condition; and (iii) the department has not issued a superseding water
right permit or certificate to designate a portion of the ground water
right replaced by federal Columbia basin project water as a standby or
reserve right under RCW 90.44.510.
(2) If water from the federal Columbia basin project has been
delivered to a place of use authorized under a right to withdraw ground
water from the aquifer, the provisions of RCW 90.44.510 apply and
supersede the provisions of this section.
(3) Portions of rights protected under this section may not be
transferred outside Odessa subarea boundaries as defined in WAC 173-128A-040. Transfers within Odessa subarea boundaries remain subject to
the provisions of RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390, 90.44.100, and WAC 173-130A-200.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---