BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.09.120 and 2005 c 213 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a traffic infraction for any person to operate any
nonhighway vehicle:
(a) In such a manner as to endanger the property of another;
(b) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without a lighted headlight and taillight between the hours of
dusk and dawn, or when otherwise required for the safety of others
regardless of ownership;
(c) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without an adequate braking device or when otherwise required
for the safety of others regardless of ownership;
(d) Without a spark arrester approved by the department of natural
resources;
(e) Without an adequate, and operating, muffling device which
effectively limits vehicle noise to no more than eighty-six decibels on
the "A" scale at fifty feet as measured by the Society of Automotive
Engineers (SAE) test procedure J 331a, except that a maximum noise
level of ((one hundred and five)) ninety-six decibels on the "A" scale
at a distance of twenty inches from the exhaust outlet shall be an
acceptable substitute in lieu of the Society of Automotive Engineers
test procedure J 331a when measured:
(i) At a forty-five degree angle at a distance of twenty inches
from the exhaust outlet;
(ii) With the vehicle stationary and the engine running at a steady
speed equal to one-half of the manufacturer's maximum allowable ("red
line") engine speed or where the manufacturer's maximum allowable
engine speed is not known the test speed in revolutions per minute
calculated as sixty percent of the speed at which maximum horsepower is
developed; and
(iii) With the microphone placed ten inches from the side of the
vehicle, one-half way between the lowest part of the vehicle body and
the ground plane, and in the same lateral plane as the rearmost exhaust
outlet where the outlet of the exhaust pipe is under the vehicle;
(f) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle upon the shoulder or inside bank or slope of any nonhighway
road or highway, or upon the median of any divided highway;
(g) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle in any area or in such a manner so as to unreasonably expose
the underlying soil, or to create an erosion condition, or to injure,
damage, or destroy trees, growing crops, or other vegetation;
(h) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle or on any nonhighway road or trail, when these are restricted
to pedestrian or animal travel;
(i) On any public lands in violation of rules and regulations of
the agency administering such lands; ((and))
(j) On any lands, highways, or public easements by the operator in
a repetitive manner in a residential setting or in close proximity to
a residential dwelling; and
(k) On a private nonhighway road in violation of RCW 46.09.115(3).
(2) It is a misdemeanor for any person to operate any nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance.
(3)(a) Except for an off-road vehicle equipped with seat belts and
roll bars or an enclosed passenger compartment, it is a traffic
infraction for any person to operate or ride an off-road vehicle on a
nonhighway road without wearing upon his or her head a motorcycle
helmet fastened securely while in motion. For purposes of this
section, "motorcycle helmet" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
46.37.530.
(b) Subsection (3)(a) of this section does not apply to an off-road
vehicle operator operating on his or her own land.
(c) Subsection (3)(a) of this section does not apply to an off-road
vehicle operator operating on agricultural lands owned or leased by the
off-road vehicle operator or the operator's employer.

--- END ---