BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.350 and 2001 c 38 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the cost to The Evergreen State College, or any regional
university, ((or)) state university, or community college of any
building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition other
than maintenance or repairs will equal or exceed the sum of ((thirty-five)) fifty thousand dollars, complete plans and specifications for
such work shall be prepared and such work shall be put out for public
bids and the contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder
if in accordance with the bid specifications: PROVIDED, That when the
estimated cost of such building, construction, renovation, remodeling,
or demolition equals or exceeds the sum of twenty-five thousand
dollars, such project shall be deemed a public works and "the
prevailing rate of wage," under chapter 39.12 RCW shall be applicable
thereto: PROVIDED FURTHER, That when such building, construction,
renovation, remodeling, or demolition involves one trade or craft area
and the estimated cost exceeds ((fifteen)) twenty thousand dollars,
complete plans and specifications for such work shall be prepared and
such work shall be put out for public bids, and the contract shall be
awarded to the lowest responsible bidder if in accordance with the bid
specifications. This subsection shall not apply when a contract is
awarded by the small works roster procedure authorized in RCW 39.04.155
or under any other procedure authorized for an institution of higher
education.
(2) The Evergreen State College, any regional university, or state
university may require a project to be put to public bid even when it
is not required to do so under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Where the estimated cost to The Evergreen State College, or any
regional university, ((or)) state university, or community college of
any building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition is
less than twenty-five thousand dollars or the contract is awarded by
the small works roster procedure authorized in RCW 39.04.155, the
publication requirements of RCW 39.04.020 shall be inapplicable.
(4) In the event of any emergency when the public interest or
property of The Evergreen State College, regional university, or state
university would suffer material injury or damage by delay, the
president of such college or university may declare the existence of
such an emergency and reciting the facts constituting the same may
waive the requirements of this section with reference to any contract
in order to correct the condition causing the emergency: PROVIDED,
That an "emergency," for the purposes of this section, means a
condition likely to result in immediate physical injury to persons or
to property of such college or university in the absence of prompt
remedial action or a condition which immediately impairs the
institution's ability to perform its educational obligations.

--- END ---