BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Depleted uranium" means uranium containing less uranium-235
than the naturally occurring distribution of uranium isotopes.
(2) "Eligible member" means a member of the Washington national
guard who served in the Persian Gulf war, as provided in RCW 41.04.005,
or in an area designated as a combat zone by the president of the
United States during Operation Enduring Freedom or Operation Iraqi
Freedom.
(3) "Military physician" includes a physician who is under contract
with the United States department of defense to provide physician
services to members of the armed forces.
(4) "Veteran" means a veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007, who
served as an eligible member.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) Beginning October 1, 2006, the
adjutant general must assist any eligible member or veteran in
obtaining federal treatment services, including the services under (b)
of this subsection, who:
(i) Has been assigned a risk level I, II, or III for depleted
uranium exposure by his or her branch of service;
(ii) Is referred by a military physician; or
(iii) Has reason to believe that he or she was exposed to depleted
uranium during such service.
(b) Federal treatment services for eligible members or veterans
include a best practice health screening test for exposure to depleted
uranium using a bioassay procedure involving sensitive methods capable
of detecting depleted uranium at low levels and the use of equipment
with the capacity to discriminate between different radioisotopes in
naturally occurring levels of uranium and the characteristic ratio and
marker for depleted uranium. No state funds may be used to pay for
these tests or other federal treatment services.
(2) By October 1, 2006, the adjutant general must submit a report
to the joint veterans and military affairs committee on the scope and
adequacy of training received by members of the Washington national
guard on detecting whether their service as eligible members is likely
to entail, or to have entailed, exposure to depleted uranium. The
report must include an assessment of the feasibility and cost of adding
predeployment training concerning potential exposure to depleted
uranium and other toxic chemical substances and the precautions
recommended under combat and noncombat conditions while in a combat
zone.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A task force that studies the health
effects of hazardous materials exposure including, but not limited to,
depleted uranium, as they relate to military service is created. The
task force must:
(a) Initiate a health registry for veterans and military personnel
returning from Afghanistan, Iraq, or other countries in which depleted
uranium or other hazardous materials may be found;
(b) Develop a plan for outreach to and follow-up of military
personnel;
(c) Prepare a report for service members concerning potential
exposure to depleted uranium and other toxic chemical substances and
the precautions recommended under combat and noncombat conditions while
in a combat zone; and
(d) Make other recommendations the task force considers
appropriate.
(2) The task force consists of the following members or their
designees:
(a) The adjutant general;
(b) The director of the department of veterans affairs;
(c) The secretary of the department of health;
(d) Six members who are members of the legislature, appointed, one
each, by the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of
representatives, the majority leader of the senate, the minority leader
of the senate, the majority leader of the house of representatives, and
the minority leader of the house of representatives;
(e) Two members who are veterans with knowledge of or experience
with exposure to hazardous materials, appointed, one each, by the
president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(f) Four members who are physicians or scientists with knowledge of
or experience in the detection or health effects of exposure to
depleted uranium or other hazardous materials, appointed, one each, by
the majority leader of the senate, the minority leader of the senate,
the majority leader of the house of representatives, and the minority
leader of the house of representatives.
(3) All appointments to the task force must be made within thirty
days of the effective date of this act. Vacancies must be filled by
the appointing authority.
(4) Task force members must select as cochairs one senator and one
representative from among the members appointed under subsection (2)(d)
of this section. The cochairs must schedule the first meeting of the
task force within sixty days of the effective date of this act.
(5) Staff support for the task force shall be provided by the staff
of the joint veterans and military affairs committee.
(6) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses under RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except
those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to be
reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7) The expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(8) By January 31, 2007, the task force must submit a report on its
findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires January 31, 2007.

--- END ---