BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
A school or a school district that allows access to students or
student records by military recruiters also must allow access on the
same basis and to the same extent to students and student records by
recruiters and representatives of the job corps, the peace corps, and
AmeriCorps. This section does not permit a school or a school district
to release student or family information except as allowed under the
federal family educational rights and privacy act.

--- END ---