BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08A.270 and 2002 c 89 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Good cause reasons for failure to participate in WorkFirst
program components include: (a) Situations where the recipient is a
parent or other relative personally providing care for a child under
the age of six years, and formal or informal child care, or day care
for an incapacitated individual living in the same home as a dependent
child, is necessary for an individual to participate or continue
participation in the program or accept employment, and such care is not
available, and the department fails to provide such care; or (b) the
recipient is a parent with a child under the age of one year((, except
that at the time a child reaches the age of three months, the recipient
is required to participate in one of the following for up to twenty
hours per week:
(i) Instruction or training which has the purpose of improving
parenting skills or child well-being;
(ii) Preemployment or job readiness training;
(iii) Course study leading to a high school diploma or GED; or
(iv) Volunteering in a child care facility licensed under chapter
74.15 RCW so long as the child care facility agrees to accept the
recipient as a volunteer and the child without compensation while the
parent is volunteering at the facility. The volunteer recipient and
his or her child shall not be counted for the purposes of determining
licensed capacity or the staff to child ratio of the facility)).
(2) Nothing in this section shall prevent a recipient from
participating fully in the WorkFirst program on a voluntary basis. A
recipient who chooses to participate fully in the WorkFirst program
shall be considered to be fulfilling the requirements of this section.
(3) For any recipient who claims a good cause reason for failure to
participate in the WorkFirst program based on the fact that the
recipient has a child under the age of one year, the department shall,
within existing resources, conduct an assessment of the recipient
within ninety days and before a job search component is initiated in
order to determine if the recipient has any specific service needs or
employment barriers. As part of this assessment, or prior to it, a
caseworker shall assist the recipient in identifying and accessing
appropriate instruction, training, or counseling which has the purpose
of improving parenting skills or child well-being. The assessment may
also include identifying the need for substance abuse treatment, mental
health treatment, or domestic violence services, and shall be used in
developing the recipient's individual responsibility plan.
(4) A parent may only receive the exemption under subsection (1)(b)
of this section one time, for one child.

--- END ---