BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.63.073 and 2005 c 331 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In the event a traffic infraction is based on a vehicle's
identification, and the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business, the law enforcement agency shall, before a notice of
infraction may be issued, provide a written notice to the rental car
business that a notice of infraction may be issued to the rental car
business if the rental car business does not, within thirty days of
receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing agency by return
mail:
(((a))) (i) A statement under oath stating the name and known
mailing address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when
the infraction occurred; or
(((b))) (ii) A statement under oath that the business is unable to
determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the
infraction occurred.
Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
chapter for the notice of infraction. In lieu of identifying the
vehicle operator, the rental car business may pay the applicable
penalty.
(((2))) (b) For the purpose of this ((section)) subsection, a
"traffic infraction based on a vehicle's identification" includes, but
is not limited to, parking infractions, high-occupancy toll lane
violations, and violations recorded by automated traffic safety
cameras.
(2)(a) In the event a parking infraction is issued by a private
parking facility and is based on a vehicle's identification, and the
registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car business, the parking
facility shall provide a written notice of the infraction to the rental
car business within thirty days of the infraction date. The rental car
business receiving the written notice of the infraction shall provide
to the parking facility by return mail:
(i) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(ii) A statement under oath that the business is unable to
determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the
infraction occurred.
Timely mailing of this statement to the parking facility relieves
a rental car business of any liability under this chapter for the
notice of infraction. In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the
rental car business may pay the applicable penalty.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection, a "traffic infraction based
on a vehicle's identification" is limited to parking infractions
occurring on a parking facility's premises.

--- END ---