BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) RCW 28B.50.901 assigns responsibility
for the north Snohomish, Island, and Skagit counties higher education
consortium to Everett Community College. Everett Community College
submitted a report titled "Higher Education Opportunity in the NSIS
Region" on December 1, 2005, to the appropriate committees of the
legislature. The legislature accepts this report as representative of
the needs for higher education in the North Snohomish, Island, and
Skagit counties (NSIS) region. It is the intent of the legislature to
support enrollment growth in the NSIS county regions of the state as
represented in the report.
(2) The legislature finds that recent research by the state board
for community and technical colleges indicates that the immediate needs
of at least five hundred students are not being met in the NSIS region
at the upper-division level.
(3) The legislature further finds that long-term unmet need in the
Snohomish, Island, and Skagit county region is projected to reach four
thousand one hundred forty-one upper-division full-time equivalents by
the year 2025.
(4) Therefore, the legislature intends to provide funding for a
minimum of two hundred fifty full-time equivalents at the upper-division and graduate levels for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007.
This funding shall be used to meet the higher education needs of the
NSIS region.
(5) This funding shall be provided to support at least two hundred
fifty full-time equivalents at the upper-division and graduate levels
including but not limited to the following fields of study:
Engineering, technology, nursing and health professions, environmental
sciences, education, interdisciplinary studies, and other areas of
study based on student and employer demand. These fields of study
shall be offered using the university center model, centered on a
community college campus with a single point of accountability, and
hosted by the community colleges in Snohomish and Skagit counties.
Enrollment in these fields shall begin no later than the fall term of
2006.
(6) Everett Community College, with the assistance of Edmonds
Community College, Skagit Valley College, and the universities
participating in offering the enrollment subject to this section shall
submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
July 1, 2007. The report shall describe the number of enrollments and
degrees produced as a result of the funding provided in this act, as
well as the effect of those enrollments and degrees on local
communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

--- END ---