BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Foster parents are able to successfully maintain placements of
children who are sexually reactive, physically assaultive, or who have
other high-risk behaviors when they are provided with proper training
and support. Lack of support contributes to placement disruptions and
multiple moves between foster homes.
(2) Young children who have experienced repeated early abuse and
trauma are at high risk for behavior later in life that is sexually
deviant, if left untreated. Placement with a well-trained, prepared,
and supported foster family can break this cycle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A foster parent critical support and
retention program is established to retain foster parents who care for
children who act out sexually, are physically assaultive, or have other
high-risk behaviors. The foster parent critical support and retention
program is to be implemented under the division of children and family
services' contract and supervision. A contractor must demonstrate
experience providing in-home case management to foster homes that are
licensed through the division of children and family services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Under the foster parent critical support and
retention program, foster parents who care for children who act out
sexually and/or physically or have other high-risk behaviors shall
receive:
(1) Twenty-four/seven emergency assistance;
(2) Assessment of risk and development of a safety and supervision
plan;
(3) Home-based foster parent training utilizing evidence-based
models;
(4) Ongoing support groups; and
(5) Referral to community services.

--- END ---