BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.38 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature intends to provide more focus and efficient effort
of resources by centralizing technology missions and reducing
administrative overhead of the Spokane intercollegiate research and
technology institute. The state currently has a variety of entities
with conflicting or overlapping missions that cause confusion and
wastes tax dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature intends to provide more focus and efficient effort
of resources by centralizing technology missions and reducing
administrative overhead of the Washington technology center. The state
currently has a variety of entities with conflicting or overlapping
missions that cause confusion and wastes tax dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.30 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature intends to provide more focus and efficient effort
of resources by centralizing technology missions and reducing
administrative overhead of the Washington State University energy
program. The state currently has a variety of entities with
conflicting or overlapping missions that cause confusion and wastes tax
dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.21F RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature intends to provide more focus and efficient effort
of resources by centralizing technology missions and reducing
administrative overhead of the department of community, trade, and
economic development's energy policy office. The state currently has
a variety of entities with conflicting or overlapping missions that
cause confusion and wastes tax dollars.

--- END ---