BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall evaluate the
competitive business climate for encouraging a sustainable and mature
biotechnology and medical device manufacturing sector. The committee
shall review the top ten centers in the nation as listed in subsection
(2) of this section and identify the best practices in economic
development and public policy to identify the measures Washington
should take to encourage the formation and maturation, from start-up to
commercial business activity, of biotechnology and medical device
manufacturing businesses in Washington.
(1) The questions to be answered by this study may include, but are
not limited to, the following:
(a) Which biotechnology and medical device manufacturing clusters
have rapidly expanded and why;
(b) What role did state government play in creating an environment
that encouraged business growth;
(c) What incentives should Washington put in place to encourage a
sustainable biotechnology and medical device manufacturing sector;
(d) What aspects of these industries provide the greatest economic
benefits;
(e) What program should Washington establish to develop this
business sector.
(2) The ten centers to be studied are:
(a) Boston, Massachusetts;
(b) San Diego, California;
(c) Greater San Francisco, California;
(d) Greater Los Angeles, California;
(e) Greater Raleigh-Durham, North Carolina;
(f) Chicago, Illinois;
(g) Minneapolis, Minnesota; and
(h) Seattle, Washington.
(3) The report shall be delivered to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 15, 2006.

--- END ---