BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 4.92.100 and 2002 c 332 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
All claims against the state, or against the state's officers,
employees, or volunteers, acting in such capacity, for damages arising
out of tortious conduct shall be presented to and filed with the risk
management division. All such claims shall be verified and shall
accurately describe the conduct and circumstances which brought about
the injury or damage, describe the injury or damage, state the time and
place the injury or damage occurred, state the names of all persons
involved, if known, and shall contain the amount of damages claimed,
together with a statement of the actual residence of the claimant at
the time of presenting and filing the claim and for a period of six
months immediately prior to the time the claim arose. If the claimant
is incapacitated from verifying, presenting, and filing the claim or if
the claimant is a minor, or is a nonresident of the state, the claim
may be verified, presented, and filed on behalf of the claimant by any
relative, attorney, or agent representing the claimant.
With respect to the content of such claims this section shall be
liberally construed so that substantial compliance will be deemed
satisfactory.

Sec. 2 RCW 4.92.110 and 2002 c 332 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
No action shall be commenced against the state, or against any
state officer, employee, or volunteer, acting in such capacity, for
damages arising out of tortious conduct until sixty days have elapsed
after the claim is presented to and filed with the risk management
division. The applicable period of limitations within which an action
must be commenced shall be tolled during the sixty-day period.

Sec. 3 RCW 4.96.020 and 2001 c 119 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section apply to claims for damages
against all local governmental entities and their officers, employees,
or volunteers, acting in such capacity.
(2) The governing body of each local ((government [governmental]))
governmental entity shall appoint an agent to receive any claim for
damages made under this chapter. The identity of the agent and the
address where he or she may be reached during the normal business hours
of the local governmental entity are public records and shall be
recorded with the auditor of the county in which the entity is located.
All claims for damages against a local governmental entity, or against
any local governmental entity's officers, employees, or volunteers,
acting in such capacity, shall be presented to the agent within the
applicable period of limitations within which an action must be
commenced. The failure of a local governmental entity to comply with
the requirements of this section precludes that local governmental
entity from raising a defense under this chapter.
(3) All claims for damages arising out of tortious conduct must
locate and describe the conduct and circumstances which brought about
the injury or damage, describe the injury or damage, state the time and
place the injury or damage occurred, state the names of all persons
involved, if known, and shall contain the amount of damages claimed,
together with a statement of the actual residence of the claimant at
the time of presenting and filing the claim and for a period of six
months immediately prior to the time the claim arose. If the claimant
is incapacitated from verifying, presenting, and filing the claim in
the time prescribed or if the claimant is a minor, or is a nonresident
of the state absent therefrom during the time within which the claim is
required to be filed, the claim may be verified, presented, and filed
on behalf of the claimant by any relative, attorney, or agent
representing the claimant.
(4) No action shall be commenced against any local governmental
entity, or against any local governmental entity's officers, employees,
or volunteers, acting in such capacity, for damages arising out of
tortious conduct until sixty days have elapsed after the claim has
first been presented to and filed with the governing body thereof. The
applicable period of limitations within which an action must be
commenced shall be tolled during the sixty-day period.

--- END ---