BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.080 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A comprehensive plan may include additional elements, items, or
studies dealing with other subjects relating to the physical
development within its jurisdiction, including, but not limited to:
(a) Conservation;
(b) Solar energy; ((and))
(c) Recreation; and
(d) Population sustainability.
(2) A comprehensive plan may include, where appropriate, subarea
plans, each of which is consistent with the comprehensive plan.
(3) A population sustainability element must include provisions for
public education and outreach. Public education and outreach
provisions may include developing educational materials emphasizing the
benefits and importance of considering population sustainability and
family planning within the context of land use decisions.

--- END ---