BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that employees of the
department of social and health services who provide child protective,
child welfare, and adult protective services are sometimes faced with
highly volatile, hostile, and/or threatening situations during the
course of performing their official duties. The legislature finds that
the work group convened by the department of social and health services
pursuant to chapter 389, Laws of 2005, has made various recommendations
regarding policies and protocols to address the safety of workers. The
legislature intends to implement the work group's recommendations for
statutory changes in recognition of the sometimes hazardous nature of
employment in child protective, child welfare, and adult protective
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section only, "assault" means an
unauthorized touching of a child protective, child welfare, or adult
protective services worker employed by the department of social and
health services resulting in physical injury to the employee.
(2) In recognition of the hazardous nature of employment in child
protective, child welfare, and adult protective services, the
legislature hereby provides a supplementary program to reimburse
employees of the department, for some of their costs attributable to
their being the victims of assault while in the course of discharging
their assigned duties. This program shall be limited to the
reimbursement provided in this section.
(3) An employee is only entitled to receive the reimbursement
provided in this section if the secretary of social and health
services, or the secretary's designee, finds that each of the following
has occurred:
(a) A person has assaulted the employee while the employee was in
the course of performing his or her official duties and, as a result
thereof, the employee has sustained demonstrated physical injuries
which have required the employee to miss days of work;
(b) The assault cannot be attributable to any extent to the
employee's negligence, misconduct, or failure to comply with any rules
or conditions of employment; and
(c) The department of labor and industries has approved the
employee's workers' compensation application pursuant to chapter 51.32
RCW.
(4) The reimbursement authorized under this section shall be as
follows:
(a) The employee's accumulated sick leave days shall not be reduced
for the workdays missed;
(b) For each workday missed for which the employee is not eligible
to receive compensation under chapter 51.32 RCW, the employee shall
receive full pay; and
(c) In respect to workdays missed for which the employee will
receive or has received compensation under chapter 51.32 RCW, the
employee shall be reimbursed in an amount which, when added to that
compensation, will result in the employee receiving full pay for the
workdays missed.
(5) Reimbursement under this section may not last longer than three
hundred sixty-five consecutive days after the date of the injury.
(6) The employee shall not be entitled to the reimbursement
provided in subsection (4) of this section for any workday for which
the secretary, or the secretary's designee, finds that the employee has
not diligently pursued his or her compensation remedies under chapter
51.32 RCW.
(7) The reimbursement shall only be made for absences which the
secretary, or the secretary's designee, believes are justified.
(8) While the employee is receiving reimbursement under this
section, he or she shall continue to be classified as a state employee
and the reimbursement amount shall be considered as salary or wages.
(9) All reimbursement payments required to be made to employees
under this section shall be made by the department. The payments shall
be considered as a salary or wage expense and shall be paid by the
department in the same manner and from the same appropriations as other
salary and wage expenses of the department.
(10) Should the legislature revoke the reimbursement authorized
under this section or repeal this section, no affected employee is
entitled thereafter to receive the reimbursement as a matter of
contractual right.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.46.110 and 2003 c 53 s 70 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person commits the crime of stalking if, without lawful
authority and under circumstances not amounting to a felony attempt of
another crime:
(a) He or she intentionally and repeatedly harasses or repeatedly
follows another person; and
(b) The person being harassed or followed is placed in fear that
the stalker intends to injure the person, another person, or property
of the person or of another person. The feeling of fear must be one
that a reasonable person in the same situation would experience under
all the circumstances; and
(c) The stalker either:
(i) Intends to frighten, intimidate, or harass the person; or
(ii) Knows or reasonably should know that the person is afraid,
intimidated, or harassed even if the stalker did not intend to place
the person in fear or intimidate or harass the person.
(2)(a) It is not a defense to the crime of stalking under
subsection (1)(c)(i) of this section that the stalker was not given
actual notice that the person did not want the stalker to contact or
follow the person; and
(b) It is not a defense to the crime of stalking under subsection
(1)(c)(ii) of this section that the stalker did not intend to frighten,
intimidate, or harass the person.
(3) It shall be a defense to the crime of stalking that the
defendant is a licensed private investigator acting within the capacity
of his or her license as provided by chapter 18.165 RCW.
(4) Attempts to contact or follow the person after being given
actual notice that the person does not want to be contacted or followed
constitutes prima facie evidence that the stalker intends to intimidate
or harass the person. "Contact" includes, in addition to any other
form of contact or communication, the sending of an electronic
communication to the person.
(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a person who
stalks another person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(b) A person who stalks another is guilty of a class C felony if
any of the following applies: (i) The stalker has previously been
convicted in this state or any other state of any crime of harassment,
as defined in RCW 9A.46.060, of the same victim or members of the
victim's family or household or any person specifically named in a
protective order; (ii) the stalking violates any protective order
protecting the person being stalked; (iii) the stalker has previously
been convicted of a gross misdemeanor or felony stalking offense under
this section for stalking another person; (iv) the stalker was armed
with a deadly weapon, as defined in RCW 9.94A.602, while stalking the
person; (v) the stalker's victim is or was a law enforcement officer,
judge, juror, attorney, victim advocate, legislator, ((or)) community
correction's officer, or an employee of the child protective, child
welfare, or adult protective services division within the department of
social and health services, and the stalker stalked the victim to
retaliate against the victim for an act the victim performed during the
course of official duties or to influence the victim's performance of
official duties; or (vi) the stalker's victim is a current, former, or
prospective witness in an adjudicative proceeding, and the stalker
stalked the victim to retaliate against the victim as a result of the
victim's testimony or potential testimony.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) "Follows" means deliberately maintaining visual or physical
proximity to a specific person over a period of time. A finding that
the alleged stalker repeatedly and deliberately appears at the person's
home, school, place of employment, business, or any other location to
maintain visual or physical proximity to the person is sufficient to
find that the alleged stalker follows the person. It is not necessary
to establish that the alleged stalker follows the person while in
transit from one location to another.
(b) "Harasses" means unlawful harassment as defined in RCW
10.14.020.
(c) "Protective order" means any temporary or permanent court order
prohibiting or limiting violence against, harassment of, contact or
communication with, or physical proximity to another person.
(d) "Repeatedly" means on two or more separate occasions.

--- END ---