BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.13.182 and 1998 c 286 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a city or town planning under chapter
36.70A RCW as of June 30, 1994, may resolve to annex territory to the
city or town if there is, within the city or town, unincorporated
territory containing residential property owners within the same county
and within the same urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110
as the city or town:
(a) Containing less than one hundred acres and having at least
eighty percent of the boundaries of such area contiguous to the city or
town; ((or))
(b) Containing one hundred or more acres and having at least sixty
percent of the boundaries of such area contiguous to the city or town;
or
(c) Of any size and having at least eighty percent of the
boundaries of the area contiguous to the city if the area existed
before June 30, 1994.
(2) The resolution shall describe the boundaries of the area to be
annexed, state the number of voters residing in the area as nearly as
may be, and set a date for a public hearing on the resolution for
annexation. Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication of the
resolution at least once a week for two weeks before the date of the
hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
city or town and one or more newspapers of general circulation within
the area to be annexed.
(3) For purposes of subsection (1)(((b))) (c) of this section,
territory bounded by a river, lake, or other body of water is
considered contiguous to a city that is also bounded by the same river,
lake, or other body of water.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.13.1821 and 1998 c 286 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The annexation ordinance provided for in RCW 35.13.182 is subject
to referendum for forty-five days after its passage. Upon the filing
of a timely and sufficient referendum petition with the legislative
body, signed by qualified electors in number equal to not less than
((ten)) twenty-five percent of the votes cast in the last general state
election in the area to be annexed, the question of annexation shall be
submitted to the voters of the area in a general election if one is to
be held within ninety days or at a special election called for that
purpose not less than forty-five days nor more than ninety days after
the filing of the referendum petition. Notice of the election shall be
given as provided in RCW 35.13.080 and the election shall be conducted
as provided in the general election law. The annexation shall be
deemed approved by the voters unless a majority of the votes cast on
the proposition are in opposition thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the
date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed shall
become a part of the city or town upon the date fixed in the ordinance
of annexation.

Sec. 3 RCW 35A.14.295 and 1997 c 429 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of a code city may resolve to annex
territory containing residential property owners to the city if there
is within the city, unincorporated territory:
(a) Containing less than one hundred acres and having at least
eighty percent of the boundaries of such area contiguous to the code
city; ((or))
(b) Containing one hundred or more acres and having at least sixty
percent of the boundaries of such area contiguous to the code city; or
(c) Of any size and having at least eighty percent of the
boundaries of such area contiguous to the city if such area existed
before June 30, 1994, and is within the same county and within the same
urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110, and the city was
planning under chapter 36.70A RCW as of June 30, 1994.
(2) The resolution shall describe the boundaries of the area to be
annexed, state the number of voters residing therein as nearly as may
be, and set a date for a public hearing on such resolution for
annexation. Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication of the
resolution at least once a week for two weeks prior to the date of the
hearing, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
code city and one or more newspapers of general circulation within the
area to be annexed.
(3) For purposes of subsection (1)(((b))) (c) of this section,
territory bounded by a river, lake, or other body of water is
considered contiguous to a city that is also bounded by the same river,
lake, or other body of water.

Sec. 4 RCW 35A.14.299 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.299 are each
amended to read as follows:
Such annexation ordinance as provided for in RCW 35A.14.297 shall
be subject to referendum for forty-five days after the passage thereof.
Upon the filing of a timely and sufficient referendum petition with the
legislative body, signed by qualified electors in number equal to not
less than ((ten)) twenty-five percent of the votes cast in the last
general state election in the area to be annexed, the question of
annexation shall be submitted to the voters of such area in a general
election if one is to be held within ninety days or at a special
election called for that purpose not less than forty-five days nor more
than ninety days after the filing of the referendum petition. Notice
of such election shall be given as provided in RCW 35A.14.070 ((and the
election shall be conducted as provided in RCW 35A.14.060)). The
annexation shall be deemed approved by the voters unless a majority of
the votes cast on the proposition are in opposition thereto.
After the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the
date of passage of the annexation ordinance, if no timely and
sufficient referendum petition has been filed, the area annexed shall
become a part of the code city upon the date fixed in the ordinance of
annexation. From and after such date, if the ordinance so provided,
property in the annexed area shall be subject to the proposed zoning
regulation prepared and filed for such area as provided in RCW
35A.14.330 and 35A.14.340. If the ordinance so provided, all property
within the area annexed shall be assessed and taxed at the same rate
and on the same basis as the property of such annexing code city is
assessed and taxed to pay for any then outstanding indebtedness of such
city contracted prior to, or existing at, the date of annexation.

--- END ---