BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A joint task force on radio frequency
identification technology is established and consists of the following
members:
(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(c) The chief of the Washington state patrol, or the chief's
designee;
(d) The director of the department of motor vehicles, or the
director's designee;
(e) The director of the department of transportation, or the
director's designee;
(f) A representative from a business specializing in radio
frequency identification technologies;
(g) A representative from a business specializing in reader/tag
manufacturing;
(h) A representative from a business specializing in hardware or
software;
(i) A representative from a business specializing in license plate
manufacturing;
(j) A representative from a business specializing in electronic
tolling;
(k) A representative from a nonprofit, nationwide trade association
that represents all segments of the technology industry;
(l) A representative of the insurance industry; and
(m) The director of the freight mobility strategic investment
board, or the director's designee.
(2) The task force shall choose two cochairs from among its
membership.
(3) The task force shall review and make recommendations to the
legislature and the governor regarding radio frequency identification,
video, or other technologies, and their potential benefits and uses in
government regulator/operational functions. In preparing
recommendations, the committee shall, at a minimum, review:
(a) How radio frequency identification is currently being used in
governmental operations;
(b) The potential benefits of using radio frequency identification
to provide a means for dynamic traffic management;
(c) The potential uses of radio frequency identification in
governmental operations;
(d) The potential benefits of using radio frequency identification
to increase compliance with mandatory registrations such as insurance,
registration, and emission testing;
(e) The potential benefits of using radio frequency identification
to increase revenue generation for the state;
(f) The potential benefits of using radio frequency identification
to increase security for theft and property management and general
safety measures;
(g) The potential benefits of using radio frequency identification
for commercial carrier registration;
(h) The feasibility of using radio frequency identification as a
"port of entry" at the state's border crossings and ports of entry; and
(i) The feasibility of using radio frequency identification with
the expansion of electronic tolling in the state.
The task force may examine policies regarding the establishment of
requirements for any issuing agency of radio frequency identification,
video, or other technologies to clearly define: What personal
information is to be collected; how the information is to be collected;
how the information will be used; who can access the information; and
how the information will be protected.
(4) The task force may consult with individuals from the public and
private sector.
(5) The task force shall use legislative facilities and staff from
senate committee services and the house office of program research.
(6) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the legislature by December 30, 2006.
(7) The radio frequency identification task force terminates
December 31, 2006.

--- END ---