BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.130 and 1989 c 431 s 51 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a solid waste or
recyclable materials collection ordinance may:
(((1))) (a) Require property owners and occupants of premises to
use the solid waste collection and disposal system or recyclable
materials collection and disposal system, and to dispose of their solid
waste and recyclable materials as provided in the ordinance: PROVIDED,
That a solid waste or recycling ordinance shall not require any retail
enterprise engaged in the sale of consumer-packaged products to locate
or place a public recycling collection site or buy-back center upon or
within a certain distance of the retail establishment as a condition of
engaging in the sale of consumer-packaged products; and
(((2))) (b) Fix charges for solid waste collection and disposal,
recyclable materials collection and disposal, or both, and the manner
and time of payment therefor including therein a provision that upon
failure to pay the charges, the amount thereof shall become a lien
against the property for which the solid waste or recyclable materials
collection service is rendered. The ordinance may also provide
penalties for its violation.
(2) A solid waste or recyclable materials collection ordinance
adopted under subsection (1) of this section may not require the
occupants of a mobile or manufactured home park to:
(a) Use the solid waste collection and disposal system or
recyclable materials collection and disposal system as provided in the
ordinance; or
(b) Dispose of their solid waste and recyclable materials as
provided in the ordinance.
(3) A solid waste or recyclable materials collection ordinance
adopted under subsection (1) of this section must provide the owner or
manager of a mobile or manufactured home park the option, without
financial penalty to the occupants, of subjecting the park to or
exempting the park from the ordinance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A solid waste or recyclable materials collection ordinance may
not require the occupants of a mobile or manufactured home park to:
(a) Use the solid waste collection and disposal system or
recyclable materials collection and disposal system as provided in the
ordinance; or
(b) Dispose of their solid waste and recyclable materials as
provided in the ordinance.
(2) A solid waste or recyclable materials collection ordinance must
provide the owner or manager of a mobile or manufactured home park the
option, without financial penalty to the occupants, of subjecting the
park to or exempting the park from the ordinance.

--- END ---