BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that expanding
activity in educational research, educational restructuring, and
educational improvement initiatives has produced and continues to
produce much valuable information. The legislature finds that such
information should be shared with the citizens and educational
community of the state as widely as possible. The legislature further
finds that students and schools benefit from increased parental,
guardian, and community knowledge of and input regarding the delivery
of public education. The legislature further finds that increased
knowledge of and input regarding the public education system is
particularly needed in low-income and ethnic minority communities.
The legislature finds that the center for the improvement of
student learning, created by the legislature in 1993 under the auspices
of the superintendent of public instruction, has not been allocated
funding since the 2001-2003 biennium, and in effect no longer exists.
It is the intent of the legislature to reactivate the center for the
improvement of student learning, and to create an educational ombudsman
to serve as a resource for parents and students and as an advocate for
students in the public education system.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.300.130 and 1999 c 388 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Expanding activity in educational research, educational
restructuring, and educational improvement initiatives has produced and
continues to produce much valuable information. The legislature finds
that such information should be shared with the citizens and
educational community of the state as widely as possible.)) To
facilitate access to information and materials on educational
improvement and research, the superintendent of public instruction, to
the extent funds are appropriated, shall establish the center for the
improvement of student learning. ((The primary purpose of the center
is to provide assistance and advice to parents, school board members,
educators, and the public regarding strategies for assisting students
in learning the essential academic learning requirements pursuant to
RCW 28A.630.885.)) The center shall work in conjunction with ((the
academic achievement and accountability commission)) parents,
educational service districts, institutions of higher education, and
education, parent, community, and business organizations.
(2) The center, in conjunction with other staff in the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, shall:
(a) ((Serve as a clearinghouse for the completed work and
activities of the academic achievement and accountability commission;
(b))) Serve as a clearinghouse for information regarding successful
educational improvement and parental involvement programs in schools
and districts, and information about efforts within institutions of
higher education in the state to support educational improvement
initiatives in Washington schools and districts;
(((c))) (b) Provide best practices research ((and advice)) that can
be used to help schools develop and implement: Programs and practices
to improve instruction ((of the essential academic learning
requirements under section 701 of this act)); systems to analyze
student assessment data, with an emphasis on systems that will combine
the use of state and local data to monitor the academic progress of
each and every student in the school district; comprehensive, school-wide improvement plans; school-based shared decision-making models;
programs to promote lifelong learning and community involvement in
education; school-to- work transition programs; programs to meet the
needs of highly capable students; programs and practices to meet the
diverse needs of students based on gender, racial, ethnic, economic,
and special needs status; research, information, and technology
systems; and other programs and practices that will assist educators in
helping students learn the essential academic learning requirements;
(((d) Develop and distribute, in conjunction with the academic
achievement and accountability commission, parental involvement
materials, including instructional guides developed to inform parents
of the essential academic learning requirements. The instructional
guides also shall contain actions parents may take to assist their
children in meeting the requirements, and should focus on reaching
parents who have not previously been involved with their children's
education;
(e) Identify obstacles to greater parent and community involvement
in school shared decision-making processes and recommend strategies for
helping parents and community members to participate effectively in
school shared decision-making processes, including understanding and
respecting the roles of school building administrators and staff;
(f))) (c) Develop and maintain an internet web site to increase the
availability of information, research, and other materials;
(((g) Take other actions to increase public awareness of the
importance of parental and community involvement in education;
(h))) (d) Work with appropriate organizations to inform teachers,
district and school administrators, and school directors about the
waivers available and the broadened school board powers under RCW
28A.320.015;
(((i))) (e) Provide training and consultation services, including
conducting regional summer institutes;
(((j) Address methods for improving the success rates of certain
ethnic and racial student groups)) (f) Identify strategies for
improving the success rates of ethnic and racial student groups with
disproportionate academic achievement; and
(((k))) (g) Perform other functions consistent with the purpose of
the center as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction((, after consultation
with the academic achievement and accountability commission,)) shall
select and employ a director for the center.
(4) The superintendent may enter into contracts with individuals or
organizations including but not limited to: School districts;
educational service districts; educational organizations; teachers;
higher education faculty; institutions of higher education; state
agencies; business or community-based organizations; and other
individuals and organizations to accomplish the duties and
responsibilities of the center. In carrying out the duties and
responsibilities of the center, the superintendent, whenever possible,
shall use practitioners to assist agency staff as well as assist
educators and others in schools and districts.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
report to the legislature by September 1, 2007, and thereafter
biennially, regarding the effectiveness of the center for improvement
of student learning, how the services provided by the center for
improvement of student learning have been used and by whom, and
recommendations to improve the accessibility and application of
knowledge and information that leads to improved student learning and
greater family and community involvement in the public education
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The state board of education shall
establish an education ombudsman for all common school students in this
state. The purpose of the education ombudsman is to provide
information to parents, students, and others regarding their rights and
responsibilities with respect to the state's public elementary and
secondary education system, to monitor and ensure compliance with
administrative acts, statutes, and policies relating to public
elementary and secondary education, and to advocate on behalf of
elementary and secondary students.
(2)(a) The state board of education, in consultation with the
advisory committee established in section 10 of this act, shall conduct
a request for proposals process and select the entity that will operate
the education ombudsman's program. Entities eligible to apply for
selection include, but are not limited:
(i) Education service districts;
(ii) Private, nonprofit educational organizations;
(iii) Private, nonprofit community-based organizations; and
(iv) Federally recognized Indian tribes.
(b) Entities not eligible to serve as the education ombudsman are
school districts, schools, or the superintendent of public instruction,
or any employee of a school district, school, or the superintendent of
public instruction.
(3) The state board of education shall enter into a contract with
the entity selected pursuant to this section to establish and operate
the education ombudsman's program. The term of any contract between
the state board of education and the entity selected shall not be
greater than two years and may be renewed for terms of no longer than
two years. Upon receiving notification of selection, the entity
selected shall promptly retain a qualified director for the education
ombudsman's program.
(4) The education ombudsman shall contract with educational service
districts, nonprofit education or community organizations, or federally
recognized tribes to provide education ombudsman services throughout
the state. The education ombudsman shall delegate and certify regional
education ombudsmen. The education ombudsman shall ensure that the
regional ombudsmen selected are appropriate to the community in which
they serve. The education ombudsman may not contract with the
superintendent of public instruction, or any school, school district,
or current employee of a school, school district, or the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for the provision of regional
ombudsman services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The education ombudsman shall have the
following powers and duties:
(1) To develop parental involvement materials, including
instructional guides developed to inform parents of the essential
academic learning requirements required by the superintendent of public
instruction. The instructional guides also shall contain actions
parents may take to assist their children in meeting the requirements,
and should focus on reaching parents who have not previously been
involved with their children's education;
(2) To provide information to students, parents, and interested
members of the public regarding this state's public elementary and
secondary education system;
(3) To identify obstacles to greater parent and community
involvement in school shared decision-making processes and recommend
strategies for helping parents and community members to participate
effectively in school shared decision-making processes, including
understanding and respecting the roles of school building
administrators and staff;
(4) To identify and recommend strategies for improving the success
rates of ethnic and racial student groups with disproportionate
academic achievement;
(5) To investigate, upon the education ombudsman's initiative or
upon receipt of a complaint, an administrative act alleged to be
contrary to law, rule, or policy; however, the education ombudsman may
decline to investigate any complaint;
(6) To refer complainants and others to appropriate resources,
agencies, or departments;
(7) To assist in the resolution of complaints made by parents and
students with regard to the state's public elementary and secondary
education system; and
(8) To perform such other functions consistent with the purpose of
the education ombudsman.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The education ombudsman and any regional
education ombudsmen shall have training or experience or both in the
following areas:
(a) Public education law and policy in this state;
(b) Dispute resolution or problem resolution techniques, including
investigation, mediation, and negotiation; and
(c) Community outreach.
(2) The education ombudsman may not be an employee of any school
district, the office of the superintendent of public education or the
state board of education while serving as an education ombudsman.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Neither the education ombudsman nor any
regional educational ombudsmen are liable for good faith performance of
responsibilities under this chapter.
(2) No discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be
taken against any student or employee of any school district, the
office of the superintendent of public education, or the state board of
education, for any communication made, or information given or
disclosed, to aid the education ombudsman in carrying out his or her
duties and responsibilities, unless the same was done without good
faith or maliciously. This subsection is not intended to infringe upon
the rights of a school district to supervise, discipline, or terminate
an employee for other reasons or to discipline a student for other
reasons.
(3) All communications by the education ombudsman or the
ombudsman's staff or designee, if reasonably related to the education
ombudsman's duties and responsibilities and done in good faith, are
privileged and that privilege shall serve as a defense to any action in
libel or slander.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The education ombudsman shall treat all
matters under investigation, including the identities of students,
complainants, and individuals from whom information is acquired, as
confidential, except as necessary to enable the education ombudsman to
perform the duties of the office and to support any recommendations
resulting from the investigation. Upon receipt of information that by
law is confidential or privileged, the ombudsman shall maintain the
confidentiality of such information and shall not further disclose or
disseminate the information except as provided by applicable state or
federal law. Investigative records of the education ombudsman are
confidential and are exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 When the education ombudsman or a designee
of the ombudsman has reasonable cause to believe that any public
official, employee, or other person has acted in a manner warranting
criminal or disciplinary proceedings, he or she shall report the
matter, or cause a report to be made, to the appropriate authorities.
For purposes of this section, reasonable cause means the ombudsman or
the ombudsman's staff member or designee has direct knowledge of the
action warranting criminal or disciplinary proceedings or has
determined through an investigation that the allegations or information
provided by another person relating to such actions are credible. A
school district's use of information gained from the education
ombudsman regarding district staff misconduct shall be subject to the
district's policies regarding confidentiality and discipline.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The education ombudsman account is
hereby established in the custody of the state treasurer. The director
of the state board of education shall deposit in the account all moneys
received from gifts, grants, or endowments for the education ombudsman.
Moneys in the account may be spent only for activities of the education
ombudsman. Disbursements from the account shall be on authorization of
the director of the state board of education or the director's
designee. The account is subject to the allotment procedure provided
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
disbursements.
(2) The director of the state board of education may receive such
gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit
of the purposes of the education ombudsman and expend the same or any
income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or
endowments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The governor shall establish an
education advisory committee consisting of at least eleven and no more
than fifteen members. The superintendent of public education, or his
or her designee, shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member of the
committee.
(2) At least five members of the committee shall be parents or
guardians of children enrolled in the public elementary or secondary
education system in this state. At least one of these members shall be
a parent or guardian of a "special education student" as that term is
defined by the superintendent of public instruction. In addition, at
least one of these members shall be a member of the Washington Congress
of Parents and Teachers.
(3) At least one member shall be a certificated employee or
administrator in a public elementary or secondary school in this state.
(4) At least one member shall be a commissioner or director, or a
designee selected by a commissioner or director, from each of the
following:
(a) The Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs;
(b) The Washington state commission on African-American affairs;
(c) The Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American
affairs; and
(d) The governor's office of Indian affairs.
(5) The members of the education advisory committee shall be
representative of the geographic regions of the state, as well as
representative of the ethnic diversity of the state.
(6) Members of the committee shall serve at the pleasure of the
governor for three-year terms. Of the initial members appointed, two
members shall serve one-year terms, three members shall serve two-year
terms, and the remaining members shall serve three-year terms.
(7) The committee may establish subcommittees as it desires, and
may invite nonmembers to serve on these subcommittees.
(8) Nonlegislative members of the committee shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(9) As used in this section, "parent or guardian" means (a)
natural, adoptive, or foster parents, (b) guardians, (c) individuals
acting in the place of a parent, with whom the child lives, and who are
legally responsible for the child's welfare, and (d) surrogates acting
at the request of a person named in (a) through (c) of this subsection
(9).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The education advisory committee shall
advise and make recommendations to the legislature, the governor, and
the state board of education biennially. The education advisory
committee shall provide a preliminary report to the legislature, the
governor, and the state board of education by September 1, 2007.
Thereafter, the education advisory committee shall provide biennial
reports to the legislature and the state board of education regarding:
(1) How the education ombudsman's services have been used and by
whom;
(2) Methods for the education ombudsman to increase and enhance
family and community involvement in public education;
(3) Recommendations to eliminate barriers and obstacles to
meaningful family and community involvement in public education; and
(4) Strategies to improve the educational opportunities for all
students in the state.

Sec. 12 RCW 42.56.240 and 2005 c 274 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following investigative, law enforcement, and crime victim
information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this
chapter:
(1) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy;
(2) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the commission, if
disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical safety, or
property. If at the time a complaint is filed the complainant, victim,
or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure, such
desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with the commission
about any elected official or candidate for public office must be made
in writing and signed by the complainant under oath;
(3) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b);
(4) License applications under RCW 9.41.070; copies of license
applications or information on the applications may be released to law
enforcement or corrections agencies; ((and))
(5) Information revealing the identity of child victims of sexual
assault who are under age eighteen. Identifying information means the
child victim's name, address, location, photograph, and in cases in
which the child victim is a relative or stepchild of the alleged
perpetrator, identification of the relationship between the child and
the alleged perpetrator; and
(6) Investigative records of the education ombudsman, as provided
in section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 3 through 11, inclusive, of this
act are each added to chapter 28A.300 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Section 12 of this act takes effect July 1,
2006.

--- END ---