BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.360 and 1992 c 172 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The negotiation process for compacts with federally recognized
Indian tribes for conducting class III gaming, as defined in the Indian
Gaming Regulatory Act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq., on federal Indian
lands is governed by this section.
(2) The gambling commission through the director or the director's
designee shall negotiate compacts for class III gaming on behalf of the
state with federally recognized Indian tribes in the state of
Washington.
(3) When a tentative agreement with an Indian tribe on a proposed
compact is reached, the director shall immediately transmit a copy of
the proposed compact to all voting and ex officio members of the
gambling commission and to the standing committees designated pursuant
to subsection (5) of this section.
(4) Notwithstanding RCW 9.46.040, the four ex officio members of
the gambling commission shall be deemed voting members of the gambling
commission for the sole purpose of voting on proposed compacts
submitted under this section.
(5) Within thirty days after receiving a proposed compact from the
director, one standing committee from each house of the legislature
shall hold a public hearing on the proposed compact and forward its
respective recommendations for acceptance or rejection of the proposed
compact and other comments to the governor and gambling commission.
The president of the senate shall designate the senate standing
committee that is to carry out the duties of this section, and the
speaker of the house of representatives shall designate the house
standing committee that is to carry out the duties of this section.
The designated committees shall continue to perform under this section
until the president of the senate or the speaker of the house of
representatives, as the case may be, designates a different standing
committee.
(6) The gambling commission may hold public hearings on the
proposed compact any time after receiving a copy of the compact from
the director. Within forty-five days after receiving the proposed
compact from the director, the gambling commission, including the four
ex officio members, shall vote on whether to return the proposed
compact to the director with instructions for further negotiation or to
forward the proposed compact to the governor for review ((and final
execution)), rejection, or acceptance.
(7) Notwithstanding provisions in this section to the contrary, if
the director forwards a proposed compact to the gambling commission and
the designated standing committees within ten days before the beginning
of a regular session of the legislature, or during a regular or special
session of the legislature, the thirty-day time limit set forth in
subsection (5) of this section and the forty-five day limit set forth
in subsection (6) of this section are each forty-five days and sixty
days, respectively.
(8) Funding for the negotiation process under this section must
come from the gambling revolving fund.
(9) In addition to the powers granted under this chapter, the
commission, consistent with the terms of any compact, is authorized and
empowered to enforce the provisions of any compact between a federally
recognized Indian tribe and the state of Washington.
(10) Unless authorized by: (a) The affirmative vote of sixty
percent of the members of each house of the legislature; or (b) a
compact in effect before the effective date of this act; no compact
entered into or amended after the effective date of this act shall
authorize or propose to authorize class III gaming on lands acquired by
the United States in trust for the benefit of an Indian tribe after
October 17, 1988.
(11) Subsection (10) of this section does not apply to lands
acquired by the United States in trust for the benefit of an Indian
tribe after October 17, 1988:
(a) Located within or contiguous to the boundaries of the
reservation of an Indian tribe as the reservation existed on October
17, 1988; or
(b) Taken into trust as part of:
(i) A settlement of a land claim;
(ii) The initial reservation of an Indian tribe acknowledged under
the federal acknowledgment process; or
(iii) The restoration of lands for an Indian tribe that is restored
to federal recognition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---