BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
establish a goal of encouraging the construction and development of
renewable energy resource facilities in the state of Washington to meet
increasing demand for affordable and reliable electricity.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.16.010 and 1996 c 150 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the
context:
(1) "Railroad business" means the business of operating any
railroad, by whatever power operated, for public use in the conveyance
of persons or property for hire. It shall not, however, include any
business herein defined as an urban transportation business.
(2) "Express business" means the business of carrying property for
public hire on the line of any common carrier operated in this state,
when such common carrier is not owned or leased by the person engaging
in such business.
(3) "Railroad car business" means the business of operating stock
cars, furniture cars, refrigerator cars, fruit cars, poultry cars, tank
cars, sleeping cars, parlor cars, buffet cars, tourist cars, or any
other kinds of cars used for transportation of property or persons upon
the line of any railroad operated in this state when such railroad is
not owned or leased by the person engaging in such business.
(4) "Water distribution business" means the business of operating
a plant or system for the distribution of water for hire or sale.
(5) "Light and power business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the generation, production or distribution of
electrical energy for hire or sale and/or for the wheeling of
electricity for others.
(6) "Telegraph business" means the business of affording
telegraphic communication for hire.
(7) "Gas distribution business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the production or distribution for hire or sale of
gas, whether manufactured or natural.
(8) "Motor transportation business" means the business (except
urban transportation business) of operating any motor propelled vehicle
by which persons or property of others are conveyed for hire, and
includes, but is not limited to, the operation of any motor propelled
vehicle as an auto transportation company (except urban transportation
business), common carrier or contract carrier as defined by RCW
81.68.010 and 81.80.010: PROVIDED, That "motor transportation
business" shall not mean or include the transportation of logs or other
forest products exclusively upon private roads or private highways.
(9) "Urban transportation business" means the business of operating
any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or property for
hire, insofar as (a) operating entirely within the corporate limits of
any city or town, or within five miles of the corporate limits thereof,
or (b) operating entirely within and between cities and towns whose
corporate limits are not more than five miles apart or within five
miles of the corporate limits of either thereof. Included herein, but
without limiting the scope hereof, is the business of operating
passenger vehicles of every type and also the business of operating
cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including in such services the
collection and distribution of property arriving from or destined to a
point within or without the state, whether or not such collection or
distribution be made by the person performing a local or interstate
line-haul of such property.
(10) "Public service business" means any of the businesses defined
in subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), and (9) or any
business subject to control by the state, or having the powers of
eminent domain and the duties incident thereto, or any business
hereafter declared by the legislature to be of a public service nature,
except telephone business as defined in RCW 82.04.065 and low-level
radioactive waste site operating companies as redefined in RCW
81.04.010. It includes, among others, without limiting the scope
hereof: Airplane transportation, boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll
bridge, toll logging road, water transportation and wharf businesses.
(11) "Tugboat business" means the business of operating tugboats,
towboats, wharf boats or similar vessels in the towing or pushing of
vessels, barges or rafts for hire.
(12) "Gross income" means the value proceeding or accruing from the
performance of the particular public service or transportation business
involved, including operations incidental thereto, but without any
deduction on account of the cost of the commodity furnished or sold,
the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount, delivery
costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued and
without any deduction on account of losses.
(13) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the term "tax
year," "person," "value proceeding or accruing," "business," "engaging
in business," "in this state," "within this state," "cash discount" and
"successor" shall apply equally in the provisions of this chapter.
(14) "Renewable resource facility" means an electric generation
facility fueled by: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar energy; (d)
geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) biomass energy based on animal
waste or solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field residues, or
dedicated energy crops that do not include wood pieces that have been
treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (g) wave or tidal power;
(h) gas from sewage treatment facilities; or (i) municipal solid waste.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.16.020 and 1996 c 150 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected from every person
a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one
or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax shall be equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after
the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent except, for income from the sale of electricity produced at a
renewable resource facility, two and two-tenths percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses shall be deposited in the public works assistance
account created in RCW 43.155.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to charges made
for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing of new
renewable resource facilities, to sales of tangible personal property
that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of such
facilities during the course of the constructing, or to labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, during the course of
constructing, building fixtures. The exemption is available only when
the buyer provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form
and manner prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a
copy of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) No application is necessary for the tax exemption in this
section. A person taking the exemption under this section is subject
to all the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. In addition, the person
must report as required in section 9 of this act.
(3) The exemption in this section only applies to buildings, or
parts of buildings, that are used exclusively in the production of
electricity.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "renewable resource facility"
has the meaning provided in RCW 82.16.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an
ingredient or component of new renewable resource facilities, during
the course of constructing such facilities, or to labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, during the course of constructing,
building fixtures.
(2) The eligibility requirements, conditions, and definitions in
section 4 of this act apply to this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "renewable resource facility"
has the meaning provided in RCW 82.16.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.29A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All leasehold interests in renewable resource facilities exempt
from tax under sections 4 and 5 of this act and used exclusively for
the production of electricity are exempt from tax under this chapter.
A person taking the credit under section 8 of this act is not eligible
for the exemption under this section.
(2) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person taking the exemption under this section must report as required
in section 9 of this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "renewable resource facility"
has the meaning provided in RCW 82.16.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All buildings, machinery, equipment, and other personal
property of a lessee of a renewable resource facility exempt from tax
under sections 4 and 5 of this act are exempt from property taxation if
the buildings, machinery, equipment, and other personal property are
used exclusively for the production of electricity. A person taking
the credit under section 8 of this act is not eligible for the
exemption under this section.
(2) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person taking the exemption under this section must report as required
in section 9 of this act.
(3) Claims for exemption authorized by this section shall be filed
with the county assessor on forms prescribed by the department and
furnished by the assessor. The assessor shall verify and approve
claims as the assessor determines to be justified and in accordance
with this section. The department may adopt rules, under the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, as necessary to properly administer
this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "renewable resource facility"
has the meaning provided in RCW 82.16.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for property taxes paid during the calendar year.
(2) The credit is equal to:
(a)(i) Property taxes paid on new renewable resource facilities,
and land upon which this property is located, built after July 1, 2006,
and used exclusively for the production of electricity; or
(ii) Property taxes attributable to an increase in assessed value
of the property described in (a)(i) of this subsection due to the
renovation or expansion, after July 1, 2006, of a renewable resource
facility and the renovation or expansion is used exclusively for the
production of electricity; and
(b) Property taxes paid on machinery and equipment used at a new
renewable resource facility, used for the production of electricity,
and acquired after July 1, 2006.
(3) A person taking the credit under this section is subject to all
the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A credit earned during one
calendar year may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred
in a subsequent calendar year, but may not be carried over a second
year. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(4) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person taking the credit under this section must report as required in
section 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who claims the preferential tax rate under RCW
82.16.020 or an exemption or credit under sections 4 through 8 of this
act shall make an annual report to the department detailing employment,
wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits per job at
the site. The report shall not include names of employees. The report
shall also detail employment by the total number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions. The report shall also specify the
number of kilowatt-hours produced at the renewable resource facility
and the production cost per kilowatt-hour at the facility for the
twelve month period covered in the annual report. The first report
filed under this subsection shall include employment, wage, and benefit
information for the twelve-month period immediately before first use of
the preferential tax rate under RCW 82.16.020 or an exemption or credit
under sections 4 through 8 of this act. The first report filed under
this subsection shall also include information about the size,
location, fuel type, and generating capacity for the renewable resource
facility. The report is due by March 31st following any year in which
the preferential tax rate under RCW 82.16.020 or an exemption or credit
under sections 4 through 8 of this act is taken. This information is
not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may
be disclosed to the public upon request.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection by the due date of the report, the department shall declare
the amount of taxes exempted or credited for that year to be
immediately due and payable. Excise taxes payable under this
subsection are subject to interest but not penalties, as provided under
this chapter. This information is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon
request.
(3) By November 1, 2010, and by November 1, 2015, the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate, in
consultation with the department, shall report to the legislature on
the effectiveness of this act in regard to promoting the construction
and development of facilities that produce electricity using renewable
resources.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "renewable resource facility"
has the meaning provided in RCW 82.16.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 7 of this act applies to taxes
levied for collection in 2007 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---