BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.18.220 and 1983 c 194 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to license blind persons to
operate vending facilities and vending machines on federal property and
in public buildings.
(2) The state, political subdivisions thereof, and agencies of the
state, or political subdivisions thereof shall:
(a) Give priority to licensees in the operation of vending
facilities and vending machines in public buildings; and
(b) Allow licensees to operate vending facilities and vending
machines in public buildings rent free.
(3) A licensee may subcontract with food service providers in
operating vending facilities and vending machines in public buildings.
(4) Any private office building located in the capital area that
leases space to at least one hundred state employees shall contract
with the department of services for the blind to provide vending
facilities and/or vending machines in those facilities. If the
department indicates to the building owner that a vendor is not
available or that the building does not meet the needs of the blind
vendors' program, the building owner may then seek other vendors for
the facility; however, all vending machines in such facilities shall be
provided by the department.
(5) For purposes of this section, "capital area" includes the area
within the boundaries of Olympia, Tumwater, and Lacey, Washington.

--- END ---