BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.28.021 and 2004 c 163 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Physician assistants practicing with physician supervision as
required by chapters 18.57A and 18.71A RCW may ((assist workers who
suffer simple industrial injuries in making application for
compensation under this title as specified in RCW 51.28.020. Physician
assistants may not rate a worker's permanent partial disability under
RCW 51.32.055, or determine a worker's entitlement to benefits under
chapter 51.32 RCW)) execute the certificate required by RCW
51.28.020(1) for reports of noncompensable industrial injuries, but not
reports of any occupational diseases. Physician assistants may not
execute time loss cards related to any industrial injuries or any
occupational diseases. The department shall adopt rules necessary to
implement this section((, including rules identifying simple industrial
injuries using diagnosis codes and other relevant criteria)).

Sec. 2 2004 c 163 s 4 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
((Sections 1 and)) Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2007.

--- END ---