BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.32.225 and 1986 c 59 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For persons receiving compensation for temporary or permanent
total disability under this title, the compensation shall be reduced by
the department to allow an offset for social security retirement
benefits payable under the federal social security, old age survivors,
and disability insurance act, 42 U.S.C. This reduction shall not apply
to any worker who is receiving permanent total disability benefits
prior to July 1, 1986.
(2) Reductions for social security retirement benefits under this
section shall comply with the procedures in RCW 51.32.220 (1) through
(6)((, except those that relate to computation,)) and with any other
procedures established by the department to administer this section.
For any worker whose entitlement to social security retirement benefits
is immediately preceded by an entitlement to social security disability
benefits, the offset shall be based on the formulas provided under 42
U.S.C. Sec. 424a. For all other workers entitled to social security
retirement benefits, the offset shall be based on procedures
established and determined by the department to most closely follow the
intent of RCW 51.32.220.
(3) Any reduction in compensation made under chapter 58, Laws of
1986, shall be made before the reduction established in this section.

--- END ---