BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) In an action or arbitration for damages for injury or death
occurring as a result of providing health care, or arranging for the
provision of health care, whether brought under chapter 7.70, 4.20, or
4.24 RCW, or any other applicable law, the total amount of noneconomic
damages that may be awarded to the claimant shall not exceed one
million dollars unless the injury or death resulted from an act or
omission that constituted gross negligence, or that was reckless,
willful or wanton, or intentional, in which case there is no limitation
on the amount of noneconomic damages that may be awarded to the
claimant.
(b) In an action involving more than one defendant where at least
one defendant's acts or omissions are found to be negligent, and at
least one defendant's acts or omissions are found to be grossly
negligent, reckless, willful or wanton, or intentional:
(i) The amount of noneconomic damages that may be awarded to the
claimant from the judgment against a defendant whose acts or omissions
constituted simple negligence are limited to the amount specified in
subsection (1) of this section; and
(ii) There is no limitation on the amount of noneconomic damages
that may be awarded to the claimant from the judgment entered against
a defendant whose acts or omissions constituted gross negligence, or
were reckless, willful or wanton, or intentional.
(2) If the jury's assessment of noneconomic damages that are
attributable to a negligent defendant exceeds the amount that may be
awarded under subsection (1) of this section, the court shall enter a
judgment that:
(a) Limits the claimant's award of noneconomic damages from the
negligent defendant to the amount specified in subsection (1) of this
section; and
(b) Requires the negligent defendant to pay the amount of the
jury's assessment of noneconomic damages attributable to the negligent
defendant that is in excess of the limitation in subsection (1) of this
section to the court for deposit into the indigent emergency medical
care account established in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The indigent emergency medical care account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. The account shall receive deposits of
excess awards of noneconomic damages as provided in section 1 of this
act. Disbursements from the account shall be made by the department
subject to legislative appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used only to provide grants to health care facilities that
provide emergency room health care services. The department shall
distribute the funds under a formula that provides a relatively larger
share of the available funding to health care facilities that serve a
disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent patients
with emergency room health care services. Any residue in the account
shall accumulate in the account and shall not revert to the general
fund at the end of the biennium. Costs incurred by the department in
administering the account shall be paid from the account.

Sec. 3 RCW 4.22.070 and 1993 c 496 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In all actions involving fault of more than one entity, the
trier of fact shall determine the percentage of the total fault which
is attributable to every entity which caused the claimant's damages
except entities immune from liability to the claimant under Title 51
RCW. The sum of the percentages of the total fault attributed to at-fault entities shall equal one hundred percent. The entities whose
fault shall be determined include the claimant or person suffering
personal injury or incurring property damage, defendants, third-party
defendants, entities released by the claimant, entities with any other
individual defense against the claimant, and entities immune from
liability to the claimant, but shall not include those entities immune
from liability to the claimant under Title 51 RCW. Judgment shall be
entered against each defendant except those who have been released by
the claimant or are immune from liability to the claimant or have
prevailed on any other individual defense against the claimant in an
amount which represents that party's proportionate share of the
claimant's total damages. The liability of each defendant shall be
several only and shall not be joint except:
(a) A party shall be responsible for the fault of another person or
for payment of the proportionate share of another party where both were
acting in concert or when a person was acting as an agent or servant of
the party.
(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, if the
trier of fact determines that the claimant or party suffering bodily
injury or incurring property damages was not at fault, the defendants
against whom judgment is entered shall be jointly and severally liable
for the sum of their proportionate shares of the ((claimants
[claimant's])) claimant's total damages.
(ii) Subsection (1)(b)(i) of this section does not apply to health
care providers as defined in RCW 7.70.020, in an action or arbitration
for damages for injury or death occurring as a result of providing
health care, or arranging for the provision of health care, whether
brought under chapter 7.70, 4.20, or 4.24 RCW, or any other applicable
law, with respect to judgments for noneconomic damages. In such an
action or arbitration, the liability of health care providers for
noneconomic damages is several only. For the purposes of this section,
"noneconomic damages" has the meaning given in RCW 4.56.250.
(2) If a defendant is jointly and severally liable under one of the
exceptions listed in subsections (1)(a) or (1)(b) of this section, such
defendant's rights to contribution against another jointly and
severally liable defendant, and the effect of settlement by either such
defendant, shall be determined under RCW 4.22.040, 4.22.050, and
4.22.060.
(3)(a) Nothing in this section affects any cause of action relating
to hazardous wastes or substances or solid waste disposal sites.
(b) Nothing in this section shall affect a cause of action arising
from the tortious interference with contracts or business relations.
(c) Nothing in this section shall affect any cause of action
arising from the manufacture or marketing of a fungible product in a
generic form which contains no clearly identifiable shape, color, or
marking.

Sec. 4 RCW 7.70.070 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the court
shall, in any action under this chapter, determine the reasonableness
of each party's attorneys fees. The court shall take into
consideration the following:
(((1))) (a) The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty
of the questions involved, and the skill requisite to perform the legal
service properly;
(((2))) (b) The likelihood, if apparent to the client, that the
acceptance of the particular employment will preclude other employment
by the lawyer;
(((3))) (c) The fee customarily charged in the locality for similar
legal services;
(((4))) (d) The amount involved and the results obtained;
(((5))) (e) The time limitations imposed by the client or by the
circumstances;
(((6))) (f) The nature and length of the professional relationship
with the client;
(((7))) (g) The experience, reputation, and ability of the lawyer
or lawyers performing the services;
(((8))) (h) Whether the fee is fixed or contingent.
(2)(a) An attorney may not contract for or collect a contingency
fee for representing a person in connection with an action for damages
for injury or death occurring as a result of providing health care or
related services, or the arranging for the provision of health care or
related services, that exceeds twenty percent of the amount recovered.
(b) The limitation in this subsection (2) applies whether the
recovery is by judgment, settlement, arbitration, mediation, or other
form of alternative dispute resolution.
(c) For purposes of this subsection (2), "recovered" means the net
sum recovered after deducting any disbursements or costs incurred in
connection with the arbitration, litigation, or settlement of the
claim. Costs of medical care incurred by the plaintiff and the
attorney's office overhead costs or charges are not deductible
disbursements or costs for such purposes.

--- END ---