BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.135 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not prohibit or regulate the performance of
blood-drawing procedures by health care assistants in the residences of
research study participants when such procedures have been authorized
by the institutional review board of a comprehensive cancer center or
nonprofit degree-granting institution of higher education and are
conducted under the general supervision of a physician.

--- END ---