BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.70.065 and 2005 c 440 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Informed consent for health care for a patient who is not
competent, as defined in RCW 11.88.010(1)(e), to consent may be
obtained from a person authorized to consent on behalf of such patient.
(a) Persons authorized to provide informed consent to health care
on behalf of a patient who is not competent to consent, based upon a
reason other than incapacity as defined in RCW 11.88.010(1)(d), shall
be a member of one of the following classes of persons in the following
order of priority:
(i) The appointed guardian of the patient, if any;
(ii) The individual, if any, to whom the patient has given a
durable power of attorney that encompasses the authority to make health
care decisions;
(iii) The patient's spouse;
(iv) Children of the patient who are at least eighteen years of
age;
(v) Parents of the patient; and
(vi) Adult brothers and sisters of the patient.
(b) If the health care provider seeking informed consent for
proposed health care of the patient who is not competent to consent
under RCW 11.88.010(1)(e), other than a person determined to be
incapacitated because he or she is under the age of majority and who is
not otherwise authorized to provide informed consent, makes reasonable
efforts to locate and secure authorization from a competent person in
the first or succeeding class and finds no such person available,
authorization may be given by any person in the next class in the order
of descending priority. However, no person under this section may
provide informed consent to health care:
(i) If a person of higher priority under this section has refused
to give such authorization; or
(ii) If there are two or more individuals in the same class and the
decision is not unanimous among all available members of that class.
(c) Before any person authorized to provide informed consent on
behalf of a patient not competent to consent under RCW 11.88.010(1)(e),
other than a person determined to be incapacitated because he or she is
under the age of majority and who is not otherwise authorized to
provide informed consent, exercises that authority, the person must
first determine in good faith that that patient, if competent, would
consent to the proposed health care. If such a determination cannot be
made, the decision to consent to the proposed health care may be made
only after determining that the proposed health care is in the
patient's best interests.
(2) Informed consent for health care, including mental health care,
for a patient who is not competent, as defined in RCW 11.88.010(1)(e),
because he or she is under the age of majority and who is not otherwise
authorized to provide informed consent, may be obtained from a person
authorized to consent on behalf of such a patient.
(a) Persons authorized to provide informed consent to health care,
including mental health care, on behalf of a patient who is
incapacitated, as defined in RCW 11.88.010(1)(e), because he or she is
under the age of majority and who is not otherwise authorized to
provide informed consent, shall be a member of one of the following
classes of persons in the following order of priority:
(i) The appointed guardian, or legal custodian authorized pursuant
to Title 26 RCW, of the minor patient, if any;
(ii) A person authorized by the court to consent to medical care
for a child in out-of-home placement pursuant to chapter 13.32A or
13.34 RCW, if any;
(iii) Parents of the minor patient;
(iv) The individual, if any, to whom the minor's parent has given
a signed authorization to make health care decisions for the minor
patient; and
(v) A competent adult representing himself or herself to be a
relative responsible for the health care of such minor patient or a
competent adult who has signed and dated a declaration under penalty of
perjury pursuant to RCW 9A.72.085 stating that the adult person is a
relative responsible for the health care of the minor patient. Such
declaration shall be effective for up to six months from the date of
the declaration.
(b) A health care provider may, but is not required to, rely on the
representations or declaration of a person claiming to be a relative
responsible for the care of the minor patient, under (a)(v) of this
subsection, if the health care provider does not have actual notice of
the falsity of any of the statements made by the person claiming to be
a relative responsible for the health care of the minor patient.
(c) A health care facility or a health care provider may, in its
discretion, require documentation of a person's claimed status as being
a relative responsible for the health care of the minor patient.
However, there is no obligation to require such documentation.
(d) The health care provider or health care facility where services
are rendered shall be immune from suit in any action, civil or
criminal, or from professional or other disciplinary action when such
reliance is based on a declaration signed under penalty of perjury
pursuant to RCW 9A.72.085 stating that the adult person is a relative
responsible for the health care of the minor patient under (a)(v) of
this subsection.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "health care," "health care
provider," and "health care facility" shall be defined as established
in RCW 70.02.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.34.020 and 1998 c 296 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Child psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a
physician and surgeon in this state, who has had graduate training in
child psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical
Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and who is board
eligible or board certified in child psychiatry.
(2) "Children's mental health specialist" means:
(a) A mental health professional who has completed a minimum of one
hundred actual hours, not quarter or semester hours, of specialized
training devoted to the study of child development and the treatment of
children; and
(b) A mental health professional who has the equivalent of one year
of full-time experience in the treatment of children under the
supervision of a children's mental health specialist.
(3) "Commitment" means a determination by a judge or court
commissioner, made after a commitment hearing, that the minor is in
need of inpatient diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment or that the minor
is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment.
(4) "((County-d)) Designated mental health professional" means a
mental health professional designated by one or more counties to
perform the functions of a ((county-))designated mental health
professional described in this chapter.
(5) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(6) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means a public or private
facility or unit that is certified by the department to provide
emergency, inpatient, residential, or outpatient mental health
evaluation and treatment services for minors. A physically separate
and separately-operated portion of a state hospital may be designated
as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors. A facility which
is part of or operated by the department or federal agency does not
require certification. No correctional institution or facility,
juvenile court detention facility, or jail may be an evaluation and
treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter.
(7) "Evaluation and treatment program" means the total system of
services and facilities coordinated and approved by a county or
combination of counties for the evaluation and treatment of minors
under this chapter.
(8) "Gravely disabled minor" means a minor who, as a result of a
mental disorder, is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from
a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or
safety, or manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning
evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional
control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is
essential for his or her health or safety.
(9) "Inpatient treatment" means twenty-four-hour-per-day mental
health care provided within a general hospital, psychiatric hospital,
or residential treatment facility certified by the department as an
evaluation and treatment facility for minors.
(10) "Less restrictive alternative" or "less restrictive setting"
means outpatient treatment provided to a minor who is not residing in
a facility providing inpatient treatment as defined in this chapter.
(11) "Likelihood of serious harm" means either: (a) A substantial
risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon his or
her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide
or inflict physical harm on oneself; (b) a substantial risk that
physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon another, as
evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places
another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm;
or (c) a substantial risk that physical harm will be inflicted by an
individual upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which
has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others.
(12) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care means a requested
service which is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, correct,
cure, or alleviate a mental disorder; or (b) prevent the worsening of
mental conditions that endanger life or cause suffering and pain, or
result in illness or infirmity or threaten to cause or aggravate a
handicap, or cause physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no
adequate less restrictive alternative available.
(13) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional
impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's
cognitive or volitional functions. The presence of alcohol abuse, drug
abuse, juvenile criminal history, antisocial behavior, or mental
retardation alone is insufficient to justify a finding of "mental
disorder" within the meaning of this section.
(14) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist,
psychologist, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other
mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the
secretary under this chapter.
(15) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.
(16) "Outpatient treatment" means any of the nonresidential
services mandated under chapter 71.24 RCW and provided by licensed
services providers as identified by RCW 71.24.025(((3))).
(17) (a) Except for the purposes of RCW 71.34.600 through
71.34.660, "parent" means:
(((a))) (i) A biological or adoptive parent who has legal custody
of the child, including either parent if custody is shared under a
joint custody agreement; or
(((b))) (ii) A person or agency judicially appointed as legal
guardian or custodian of the child.
(b) For the purposes of RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.660, "parent"
means:
(i) A biological or adoptive parent who has legal custody of the
child, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint
custody agreement;
(ii) A person who is authorized to consent on behalf of the minor
pursuant to RCW 7.70.065; or
(iii) A person or agency judicially appointed as legal guardian or
custodian of the child.
(18) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means
a physician or other mental health professional empowered by an
evaluation and treatment facility with authority to make admission and
discharge decisions on behalf of that facility.
(19) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has a
bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university, and who has
had, in addition, at least two years' experience in the direct
treatment of mentally ill or emotionally disturbed persons, such
experience gained under the supervision of a mental health
professional. "Psychiatric nurse" shall also mean any other registered
nurse who has three years of such experience.
(20) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician
in this state who has completed residency training in psychiatry in a
program approved by the American Medical Association or the American
Osteopathic Association, and is board eligible or board certified in
psychiatry.
(21) "Psychologist" means a person licensed as a psychologist under
chapter 18.83 RCW.
(22) "Responsible other" means the minor, the minor's parent or
estate, or any other person legally responsible for support of the
minor.
(23) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or
secretary's designee.
(24) "Start of initial detention" means the time of arrival of the
minor at the first evaluation and treatment facility offering inpatient
treatment if the minor is being involuntarily detained at the time.
With regard to voluntary patients, "start of initial detention" means
the time at which the minor gives notice of intent to leave under the
provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.34.500 and 2005 c 371 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A minor thirteen years or older may admit himself or herself to
an evaluation and treatment facility for inpatient mental treatment,
without parental consent. The admission shall occur only if the
professional person in charge of the facility concurs with the need for
inpatient treatment. Parental authorization, or authorization from a
person who may consent on behalf of the minor pursuant to RCW 7.70.065,
is required for inpatient treatment of a minor under the age of
thirteen.
(2) When, in the judgment of the professional person in charge of
an evaluation and treatment facility, there is reason to believe that
a minor is in need of inpatient treatment because of a mental disorder,
and the facility provides the type of evaluation and treatment needed
by the minor, and it is not feasible to treat the minor in any less
restrictive setting or the minor's home, the minor may be admitted to
an evaluation and treatment facility.
(3) Written renewal of voluntary consent must be obtained from the
applicant no less than once every twelve months. The minor's need for
continued inpatient treatments shall be reviewed and documented no less
than every one hundred eighty days.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.34.530 and 1998 c 296 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any minor thirteen years or older may request and receive
outpatient treatment without the consent of the minor's parent.
Parental authorization, or authorization from a person who may consent
on behalf of the minor pursuant to RCW 7.70.065, is required for
outpatient treatment of a minor under the age of thirteen.

--- END ---