BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of ecology shall, by
December 31, 2006, study and prepare a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on ways that the department and other
stakeholders can better understand the competing interests of domestic
surface water users and other surface water users in regards to limited
water supplies who are affected by a curtailment of domestic water
right use that has been enacted by a court order.
(2) The study conducted under this section shall be limited to
basins currently involved in a water rights adjudication and must:
(a) Provide a summary of the circumstances that have contributed to
the competition between domestic water users and other water users;
(b) Include a survey involving the owners of the residences; and
(c) Recommend suggested legislation or other solutions for
resolving conflicts between competing interests for a limited water
resource.
(3) The study shall focus on seasonal residential uses; however,
other permanent residences may be included if the owners are
experiencing similar problems.
(4) When surveying residents under this section, the department
shall make a reasonable attempt to contact all property owners and
obtain, at a minimum, the following information:
(a) The location of the seasonal or permanent residence and the
number of days that the residence is in use;
(b) The months that the residence is occupied;
(c) Whether the property has a water right and relevant information
of the water right;
(d) The amount of water needed for the residence when it is
occupied;
(e) The specific use of the water used by the property owner;
(f) The location of the permanent residence of the property owner;
and
(g) Any other relevant information that the department determines
is necessary for the survey.

--- END ---