BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The state parks and recreation
commission shall convey Saint Edward state park to the city of Kenmore
for the price of one dollar. The city of Kenmore shall take all
measures necessary to accept these lands into ownership, including
forming a public utility district to care for the park.
(2) The city of Kenmore shall maintain as a park all conveyed land
that is currently dedicated to use as a state park. The title, and any
other documents necessary for the transfer of these lands, will include
covenants ensuring that the city of Kenmore will maintain the currently
dedicated park land as a city park. The city of Kenmore shall maintain
any undeveloped piece of property on Lake Washington in existing
condition, take measures to preserve near shore habitat for fresh water
mussels and other aquatic life, and may not build a marina on the lake
shore. If the city of Kenmore breaches these covenants, ownership of
the dedicated park lands reverts to the state parks and recreation
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---