BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Despite sustained efforts at the federal and state level, too
many people in Washington remain without access to appropriate health
care. Particularly alarming is the increase in the number of small
business employees who are uninsured. Without a health home, many low-income and other vulnerable populations are left to inefficiently
navigate a fragmented treatment system that fails to support their
long-term well-being.
(2) In recent years, numerous community-based organizations have
emerged around the state to address health care concerns at a local
level. Through innovation and public/private collaboration, they have
demonstrated great success and show even greater promise in improving
health care access for local residents. Less remote than state and
federal agencies, these organizations have built on local relationships
to increase the availability and affordability of services, and
coordinate care, making efficient use of a wide variety of community
resources to meet community needs.
(3) Many of these organizations have relied on grants from the
healthy communities access program, an initiative of the United States
department of health and human services that provided funding and
technical assistance to support collaborative efforts at the local
level to coordinate and strengthen health services for the uninsured
and underinsured. The program, however, was recently discontinued,
placing these local efforts at risk.
It is therefore the intent of the legislature to enhance and
support the development of collaborative community-based organizations
working at the local level to increase access to health care for
Washington residents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The community health care collaborative
grant program is established to further the efforts of community-based
organizations to increase access to appropriate, affordable health care
for Washington residents, particularly employed low-income persons who
are uninsured and underinsured, through local programs addressing one
or more of the following: (a) Access to medical treatment; (b) more
efficient use of health care resources; and (c) improvements in quality
of care.
(2) Grants of up to five hundred thousand dollars per organization
shall be awarded pursuant to sections 3 and 4 of this act by a board
consisting of: (a) The administrator of the health care authority; (b)
the secretary of the department of health; (c) the assistant secretary
of the health and recovery services administration within the
department of social and health services; (d) the insurance
commissioner; and (e) one other member, appointed by the governor, who
shall act as chair.
(3) Administrative support for the program shall be provided by the
health care authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Eligibility for grants shall be limited to
nonprofit organizations established to serve a defined substate
geographic region. The nature and format of the application, and the
application procedure, shall be determined by the board. At a minimum,
each application shall: (1) Identify the geographic region served by
the organization; (2) show how the structure and operation of the
organization reflects the interests of, and is accountable to, this
region; (3) indicate the size of the grant being requested, and how the
money will be spent; and (4) include sufficient information for the
board to evaluate the application based on the criteria established in
section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Grants shall be awarded on a competitive
basis based on the board's determination of which applicant
organization will best serve the purposes of the grant program. In
making this determination, the board shall consider the extent to
which:
(a) The programs to be supported by the grant are likely to
address, in a measurable fashion, documented health care access needs
within the region to be served;
(b) An applicant organization can be expected to successfully
implement these programs, including the extent to which the application
reflects active collaboration among key community members such as local
governments, school districts, large and small businesses, nonprofit
organizations, carriers, private health care providers, and public
health agencies;
(c) The applicant organization will match the grant with funds from
other sources. Grants may be awarded only to organizations providing
at least one dollar in new matching funds for each grant dollar
awarded;
(d) The grant will enhance the long-term capacity of the applicant
organization and its partners to serve the region's documented health
care access needs, including the sustainability of the programs to be
supported by the grant;
(e) The programs to be supported by the grant reflect creative,
innovative approaches which complement and enhance existing efforts to
address the needs of the uninsured and underinsured and, if successful,
could be replicated in other areas of the state; and
(f) The programs to be supported by the grant make efficient and
cost-effective use of available funds through administrative
simplification and improvements in the structure and operation of the
health care delivery system.
(2) The board shall endeavor to disburse grant funds throughout the
state, supporting organizations and programs of differing sizes and
scales, and serving differing populations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 One-half the total amount of any award shall
be disbursed to an organization upon its selection as a grant
recipient. The remaining half shall be disbursed one year later only
upon receipt by the board of a progress report from the organization,
and a determination by the board that the organization is
satisfactorily serving the purposes of the grant program and meeting
the objectives identified in its application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 By July 1, 2008, the board shall provide the
governor and the legislature with an evaluation of the community health
care collaborative grant program, describing the organizations and
programs funded and the results achieved. Particularly successful
programs shall be highlighted with recommendations on whether, and how,
the programs could be replicated statewide. The evaluation shall also
summarize any recommendations from the participating organizations
regarding ways to improve the grant program and for the state to
otherwise support community-based organizations working to improve
access to health care for Washington residents, including any changes
in state statutes or regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The sum of three million one hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund to the health care authority for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, to carry out the purposes of this
act. No more than one hundred thousand dollars may be used by the
health care authority for administrative expenses associated with the
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act expires June 30, 2009.

--- END ---