BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.09.170 and 2004 c 105 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each fiscal year, the
state treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of
the motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on a tax rate of: (a) ((Nineteen)) Twenty-three cents per gallon
of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, ((2003)) 2006, through June 30,
((2005)) 2007; (b) twenty-five cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel
from July 1, ((2005)) 2007, through June 30, ((2007)) 2008; (c) twenty-((one)) six cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1,
((2007)) 2008, through June 30, 2009; (d) twenty-((two)) seven cents
per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30,
((2011)) 2010; and (e) twenty-((three)) eight cents per gallon of motor
vehicle fuel beginning July 1, ((2011)) 2010, and thereafter, less
proper deductions for refunds and costs of collection as provided in
RCW 46.68.090.
(2) The treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as
follows:
(a) Thirty-six percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and
management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities, and information programs and maintenance of nonhighway
roads;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish
and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and the maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(c) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely
for the acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management
of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities; and
(d) Fifty-eight and one-half percent shall be credited to the
nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account to be
administered by the committee for planning, acquisition, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and for education, information, and law
enforcement programs. The funds under this subsection shall be
expended in accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than thirty percent may be expended for education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than seventy percent may be expended for ORV,
nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities. Except as
provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, of this amount:
(A) Not less than thirty percent, together with the funds the
committee receives under RCW 46.09.110, may be expended for ORV
recreation facilities;
(B) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonmotorized
recreation facilities. Funds expended under this subsection
(2)(d)(ii)(B) shall be known as Ira Spring outdoor recreation
facilities funds; and
(C) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(iii) The committee may waive the minimum percentage cited in
(d)(ii) of this subsection due to insufficient requests for funds or
projects that score low in the committee's project evaluation. Funds
remaining after such a waiver must be allocated in accordance with
committee policy.
(3) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.
(((4) During the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the NOVA
account to the interagency committee for outdoor recreation, the
department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife,
and the state parks and recreation commission. This appropriation is
not required to follow the specific distribution specified in
subsection (2) of this section.))

Sec. 2 RCW 46.10.170 and 2003 c 361 s 408 are each amended to
read as follows:
From time to time, but at least once each four years, the
department shall determine the amount of moneys paid to it as motor
vehicle fuel tax that is tax on snowmobile fuel. ((Such)) This
determination shall use one hundred thirty-five gallons as the average
yearly fuel usage per snowmobile, the number of registered snowmobiles
during the calendar year under determination, and a fuel tax rate of:
(1) ((Nineteen)) Twenty-three cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel
from July 1, ((2003)) 2006, through June 30, ((2005)) 2007; (2) twenty-five cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, ((2005)) 2007,
through June 30, ((2007)) 2008; (3) twenty-((one)) six cents per gallon
of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, ((2007)) 2008, through June 30,
2009; (4) twenty-((two)) seven cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel
from July 1, 2009, through June 30, ((2011)) 2010; and (5) twenty-((three)) eight cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel beginning July
1, ((2011)) 2010, and thereafter.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.25.070 and 2003 c 361 s 409 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon expiration of the time limited by RCW 82.36.330 for claiming
of refunds of tax on marine fuel, the state of Washington shall succeed
to the right to such refunds. The director of licensing, after taking
into account past and anticipated claims for refunds from and deposits
to the marine fuel tax refund account and the costs of carrying out the
provisions of RCW 79A.25.030, shall request the state treasurer to
transfer monthly from the marine fuel tax refund account an amount
equal to the proportion of the moneys in the account representing a
motor vehicle fuel tax rate of: (1) ((Nineteen)) Twenty-three cents
per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, ((2003)) 2006, through
June 30, ((2005)) 2007; (2) twenty-five cents per gallon of motor
vehicle fuel from July 1, ((2005)) 2007, through June 30, ((2007))
2008; (3) twenty-((one)) six cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel
from July 1, ((2007)) 2008, through June 30, 2009; (4) twenty-((two))
seven cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through
June 30, ((2011)) 2010; and (5) twenty-((three)) eight cents per gallon
of motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1, ((2011)) 2010, and thereafter,
to the recreation resource account and the remainder to the motor
vehicle fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---