BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon receiving a written complaint from an individual who has
been denied a petition for service extension by a telecommunications
company, the commission must conduct an investigation. The commission
must investigate the complaint and issue a written decision within
ninety days. In investigating a complaint, the commission must
consider:
(a) The total direct cost of the extension;
(b) The number of customers served;
(c) The comparative price and capabilities of radio communication
service or other alternatives available to customers;
(d) Technological difficulties and physical barriers presented by
the requested extensions;
(e) The likelihood that other neighboring customers may request
service if the service extension is granted;
(f) The effect on the individuals and communities involved;
(g) The effect on the public switched network; and
(h) The effect on the company.
(2) When reviewing a request for service extension, the commission
must make every effort to keep the petitioner informed and make the
petition process as straightforward as possible.

--- END ---