BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that there is
significant variation in the levels of risk presented by child abuse
and neglect referrals. The legislature also recognizes that in high-risk emergent cases there must be an immediate response and thorough
investigation of allegations. The legislature finds, however, that in
cases presenting a low-risk of child endangerment, families may be
better served through a more positive response that focuses less on
investigating specific allegations and more on assessing the family's
need for assistance and engaging the family in services to prevent
future maltreatment. The legislature intends to establish an
alternative, flexible approach to responding to allegations of child
maltreatment in low-risk families who do not present immediate child
safety concerns. This differential response is intended to reduce
disruption to families and improve child safety by assessing a family's
needs, engaging the family's protective capacities, and providing
appropriate services to prevent future maltreatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Family assessment" means a comprehensive assessment of child
safety, risk of subsequent child maltreatment, and family strengths and
needs based on available and relevant information.
(2) "Family assessment worker" means a social worker whose role is
to engage families for the purposes of conducting family assessments,
developing plans for services appropriate to reduce child safety risks,
and supporting the family's efforts to meet its needs.
(3) "Demonstration site" means a defined area or a specific child
welfare office within one of the six service delivery regions of
children's administration selected by the department under section 3 of
this act.
(4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department shall select one or more
demonstration sites for implementation of the family assessment
response demonstration program as described in section 4 of this act.
Selection of sites should, to the extent feasible, reflect the
geographic and demographic diversity of the state. Implementation of
the family assessment response shall incorporate evidence-based
practice and best practices for addressing allegations of child
maltreatment in low-risk families by focusing on the family's
situation, problems, and needs rather than on conducting a traditional
investigation of allegations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The family assessment response
demonstration program shall be implemented as follows:
(a) Upon receipt of a report alleging child abuse or neglect, the
department shall determine whether to conduct a family assessment or an
investigation. A family assessment completed by a family assessment
social worker shall be the preferred response when responding to
reports of child maltreatment not alleging substantial endangerment and
determined by the department to be nonemergent. In determining whether
a family assessment is appropriate, the department shall consider
issues of child safety, parental cooperation, and the need for an
immediate response;
(b) For those cases determined to be nonemergent, within seventy-two hours, the family assessment worker must conduct a face-to-face
contact with the child about whom a referral was made and with the
child's primary caregiver. Face-to-face contact with the child must be
sufficient to assess the immediate safety of the child. The primary
purpose of this contact is to (i) assess the immediate safety of the
child; (ii) determine immediate support needs; and (iii) engage the
family in addressing concerns regarding the safety and health of the
child;
(c) A full family assessment must be completed within thirty days
of receipt of the report;
(d) Upon completion of the assessment, the family assessment worker
must determine what services are needed to address the safety of the
child and other family members and the risk of child maltreatment;
(e) Within ten days of the completion of the assessment, the family
assessment worker must notify the parent or guardian of the child
regarding the availability of services to address child safety
concerns. The family assessment worker and the family may jointly
agree to services, however the department may seek court intervention
to order services if the family refuses to engage and complete
services;
(f) At the conclusion of a case in which services were offered, the
department shall document the outcome of the family assessment
response, including a description of services provided and the removal
or the reduction of risk to the child, if any; and
(g) Records of family assessment cases must be maintained for a
period of not less than seven years and shall be used to assist in any
future risk and safety assessments.
(2) The department shall begin an immediate investigation if, at
any time while using the family assessment response, there is reason to
believe that a serious threat to the child's safety exists or the
department determines the case is emergent. If an investigation is
started, the department may later elect to conduct a family assessment
if the department determines that a complete investigation is not
required. If such a determination is made, the department must
document the reason or reasons for terminating the investigation and
notify any local law enforcement agency that is conducting a joint
investigation.
(3) The following shall serve as guidelines for the family
assessment response model and the department shall, to the extent
resources are available, provide training and resources to assist
family assessment workers in implementing these guidelines intended to
minimize confrontation, enhance cooperation, and enhance the family's
ability to take care of itself:
(a) Contacts with families should focus on their situation,
problems, and needs in a manner that is positive and
nonconfrontational, supportive of family stability, and strengths-based
and safety-focused;
(b) Beginning with the first visit whenever possible, meetings
should be with the family as a unit, including parents, children, and
other family members;
(c) Unless doing so would compromise the safety assessment, it is
the preferred practice to request permission to interview a child prior
to conducting the interview;
(d) Family members should be involved in problem solving and
decisions about how to address their needs consistent with the safety
needs of the children;
(e) When possible, services and assistance should fit the broader
needs and situation of the family by linking the family to other
community resources and supports;
(f) Unless an investigation is started, the primary focus of the
family assessment response should be to help the family identify and
access the services and resources necessary to reduce child safety
risks and enhance family and child well-being;
(g) If it is determined an investigation should be started after a
family assessment is initiated, the family assessment worker should
refer the case to a child protective services social worker for the
investigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The Washington state institute for public
policy shall study the family assessment response demonstration program
and report to the legislature by January 31, 2009. In consultation
with the department, the institute shall define the data to be gathered
and maintained for the purpose of the study. At a minimum, the study
must review child safety outcomes and rereferrals to child protective
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act expire
January 31, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 74 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---