BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall retain records indefinitely regarding
child abuse and neglect referrals that, after investigation, result in:
(a) A founded complaint or for which the evidence indicates that
more likely than not the abuse or neglect occurred; or
(b) A termination of parental rights under chapter 13.34 RCW.
(2) Records must be maintained, electronically or otherwise, in
such a manner that the department can identify persons by name and date
of birth or by another means permitted by law. The department shall
use the information contained in the records when making decisions
related to child day care, adoptions, and out-of-home placements.

--- END ---