BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 An office of the ombudsman for persons with
developmental disabilities is created within the office of the governor
for the purpose of promoting public awareness and understanding of
developmental disabilities, identifying system issues and responses for
the governor and the legislature to act upon, and monitoring and
ensuring compliance with administrative acts, relevant statutes, rules,
and policies pertaining to services for persons with developmental
disabilities. The ombudsman shall report directly to the governor and
shall exercise his or her powers and duties independently of the
secretary of the department of social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Subject to confirmation by the senate,
the governor shall appoint an ombudsman who shall be a person of
recognized judgment, independence, objectivity, and integrity, and
shall be qualified by training or experience, or both, in developmental
disability services law and policy. Prior to the appointment, the
governor shall consult with, and may receive recommendations from the
appropriate committees of the legislature, regarding the selection of
the ombudsman.
(2) The person appointed ombudsman shall hold office for a term of
three years and shall continue to hold office until reappointed or
until his or her successor is appointed. The governor may remove the
ombudsman only for neglect of duty, misconduct, or inability to perform
duties. Any vacancy shall be filled by similar appointment for the
remainder of the unexpired term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The ombudsman shall perform the following
duties:
(1) Provide information as appropriate on the rights and
responsibilities of individuals with developmental disabilities
receiving services, and on the procedures for providing these services;
(2) Investigate, upon his or her own initiative, or upon receipt of
a complaint, an administrative act alleged to be contrary to law, rule,
or policy, imposed without an adequate statement of reason, or based on
irrelevant, immaterial, or erroneous grounds; however, the ombudsman
may decline to investigate any complaint as provided by rules adopted
under this chapter;
(3) Monitor the procedures as established, implemented, and
practiced by the department of social and health services to carry out
its responsibilities in delivering services to persons with
developmental disabilities;
(4) Review periodically the facilities and procedures of state
institutions serving persons with developmental disabilities, and state
licensed facilities or residences;
(5) Recommend changes in the procedures for addressing the needs of
persons with developmental disabilities;
(6) Submit annually to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and to the governor by November 1st a report analyzing the
work of the office including recommendations;
(7) Grant the appropriate committees of the legislature access to
all relevant records in the possession of the ombudsman unless
prohibited by law; and
(8) Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The ombudsman shall treat all matters under
investigation, including the identities of service recipients,
complainants, and individuals from whom information is acquired, as
confidential, except as far as disclosures may be necessary to enable
the ombudsman to perform the duties of the office and to support any
recommendations resulting from an investigation. Upon receipt of
information that by law is confidential or privileged, the ombudsman
shall maintain the confidentiality of the information and shall not
further disclose or disseminate the information, except as provided by
applicable state or federal law. Investigative records of the office
of the ombudsman are confidential and are exempt from public disclosure
under chapter 42.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Neither the ombudsman nor the ombudsman's
staff may be compelled, in any judicial or administrative proceeding,
to testify or to produce evidence regarding the exercise of the
official duties of the ombudsman or of the ombudsman's staff. All
related memoranda, work product, notes, and case files of the
ombudsman's office are confidential, are not subject to discovery,
judicial or administrative subpoena, or other method of legal
compulsion, and are not admissible in evidence in a judicial or
administrative proceeding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Identifying information about
complainants or witnesses shall not be subject to any method of legal
compulsion, nor shall such information be revealed to the governor
except under the following circumstances:
(a) The complainant or witness waives confidentiality;
(b) Under a legislative subpoena when there is a legislative
investigation for neglect of duty or misconduct by the ombudsman or
ombudsman's office when the identifying information is necessary to the
investigation of the ombudsman's acts; or
(c) Under an investigation or inquiry by the governor as to neglect
of duty or misconduct by the ombudsman or ombudsman's office when the
identifying information is necessary to the investigation of the
ombudsman's acts.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "identifying information"
includes the complainant's or witness's name, location, telephone
number, likeness, social security number or other identification
number, or identification of immediate family members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The privilege described in section 5 of this
act does not apply when:
(1) The ombudsman or ombudsman's staff member has direct knowledge
of an alleged crime, and the testimony, evidence, or discovery sought
is relevant to that allegation;
(2) The ombudsman or a member of the ombudsman's staff has received
a threat of, or becomes aware of a risk of, imminent serious harm to
any person, and the testimony, evidence, or discovery sought is
relevant to that threat or risk; or
(3) The ombudsman has been asked to provide general information
regarding the general operation of, or the general processes employed
at, the ombudsman's office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) An employee of the office of the
ombudsman for persons with developmental disabilities is not liable for
good faith performance of responsibilities under this chapter.
(2) No discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be
taken against an employee of the department of social and health
services, an employee of a contracting agency of the department of
social and health services, or a family member or recipient of
developmental disability services for any communication made, or
information given or disclosed, to aid the office of the ombudsman for
persons with developmental disabilities in carrying out its
responsibilities, unless the communication or information is made,
given, or disclosed maliciously or without good faith. This subsection
is not intended to infringe on the rights of the employer to supervise,
discipline, or terminate an employee for other reasons.
(3) All communications by an ombudsman, if reasonably related to
the requirements of that individual's responsibilities under this
chapter and done in good faith, are privileged under RCW 9.58.070 and
that privilege shall serve as a defense in any action in libel or
slander.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 When the ombudsman or ombudsman's staff
member has reasonable cause to believe that any public official,
employee, or other person has acted in a manner warranting criminal or
disciplinary proceedings, the ombudsman or ombudsman's staff member
shall report the matter, or cause a report to be made, to the
appropriate authorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The department of social and health
services shall:
(1) Allow the ombudsman or the ombudsman's designee to communicate
privately with any person with developmental disabilities who is
receiving services through the department for the purposes of carrying
out its duties under this chapter;
(2) Permit the ombudsman or the ombudsman's designee physical
access to state institutions serving persons with developmental
disabilities, and state-licensed facilities or residences for the
purpose of carrying out its duties under this chapter; and
(3) Upon the ombudsman's request, grant the ombudsman or the
ombudsman's designee the right to access, inspect, and copy all
relevant information, records, or documents in the possession or
control of the department that the ombudsman considers necessary in an
investigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---