BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that one in four
families is asset poor meaning they lack the financial resources to
sustain their family for a period of three months at the federal
poverty level. The legislature finds that there is a need to empower
low-income wage earners by providing tools that allow them to better
control, manage, and increase their financial resources. Momentum is
growing within the state to enhance a community-wide response to
poverty that combines efforts of community-based, faith-based,
governmental, job training, health care, and social service agencies.
The legislature is committed to supporting the collaboration efforts of
local communities to help lower-income families achieve greater
prosperity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2006, the department of community, trade, and
economic development must establish a pilot program to assist low-income families accumulate assets. The pilot program will use the
existing community action agencies established under RCW 43.63A.115.
The community action agencies must facilitate bringing together
community partners to determine the asset building programs to initiate
within the community.
(2) The department must select the pilot sites through a request
for proposals process which must begin by July 31, 2006. The pilot
program must consist of four sites with at least one of the pilot sites
located in eastern Washington.
(3) Any county, or group of counties, in which a community action
agency as established in RCW 43.63A.115 is located may submit a
proposal to be selected as a pilot site. To be considered for a pilot
site, the proposal must demonstrate how the site will meet the
following criteria. The proposal must:
(a) Identify the local agency that will be the lead agency for the
pilot program;
(b) Describe how the lead agency will work with community partners
to implement the pilot program activities described in this section.
The proposal must specifically identify the community partners with
whom the community action agency will be collaborating and the role of
the partners;
(c) Identify the areas of potential need based upon input from the
community partners. Areas of potential need may include financial
literacy, assistance with federal income tax preparation and the use of
tax credits, the use of individual development accounts, and other
asset-building strategies; and
(d) Identify the resources within the community that might support
training for the implementation of the selected best practices chosen
to address the needs identified by the community.
(4) The department must report to the legislature by December 1,
2007, on the progress of the implementation of the pilot program
including the request for proposals process, the response from the
counties to the request for proposal, the status of the program, and
any implementation issues that arose in initiating the pilot program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW
to read as follows:
To the extent funding is appropriated, the department of community,
trade, and economic development must establish a program to create an
outreach campaign to increase the number of eligible families who claim
the federal earned income tax credit. The department may work
collaboratively with other state agencies, private and nonprofit
agencies, local communities, and others with expertise that might
assist the department in implementing the program.

--- END ---