BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall encourage recipients of temporary assistance
for needy families to learn about asset building and participate in
programs to assist low-income persons in developing personal assets.
The department shall provide its regional offices, recipients of
temporary assistance for needy families, and any contractors providing
job search, training, or placement services notification of programs
available in the state for financial literacy, individual development
accounts, assistance with federal income tax information and the
availability of tax credits, and other resources to assist with asset
building.

--- END ---