BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW
to read as follows:
All persons who provide services under this chapter and who will
have regularly scheduled unsupervised access to persons with
developmental disabilities are required to submit to a record check
through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system
under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050, and
through the federal bureau of investigation. The record check shall
include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal
identification fingerprint card. The requesting entity shall provide
a copy of the record report to the applicant. When necessary, persons
may be employed on a conditional basis pending completion of the
investigation. If the applicant has had a record check within the
previous two years, the agency may waive the requirement.

--- END ---