BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.63A.510 and 1993 c 461 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall work with the departments of natural
resources, transportation, social and health services, corrections, and
general administration, the state parks and recreation commission, and
cities, towns, and counties, to identify and catalog under-utilized,
((state-)) publicly owned land and property suitable for the
development of affordable housing for very low-income, low-income or
moderate-income households. The department, and the departments of
natural resources, transportation, social and health services,
corrections, and general administration, the state parks and recreation
commission, and cities, towns, and counties, shall ((provide)) each
produce an inventory of real property that is owned or administered by
each agency or local government and is available for lease or sale.
The inventories shall be provided to the department by November 1,
1993, with updated inventory revisions provided ((each November 1
thereafter)) as surplus property becomes available, but no less often
than each calendar quarter, beginning in June 2006.
(2) ((Upon written request,)) The department shall ((provide a copy
of)) publicly advertise on its web site the inventory of ((state-owned
and publicly owned)) all lands and buildings ((to parties interested in
developing the sites for affordable housing)) suitable for the
development of affordable housing and owned by the state, cities,
towns, and counties that are available for lease or sale, including
contact information. A list of available federal surplus property
shall also be included on the web site. Printed copies of the list
shall be provided upon request.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Affordable housing" means ((residential housing that is rented
or owned by a person who qualifies as a very low-income, low-income, or
moderate-income household or who is from a special needs population,
and whose monthly housing costs, including utilities other than
telephone, do not exceed thirty percent of the household's monthly
income)) housing that has a sales price or rental amount that is within
the means of a household that may occupy moderate-income or low-income
housing. The department shall adopt policies for residential rental
and homeownership housing, occupied by low-income households, that
specify the percentage of household income that may be spent on monthly
housing costs, including all utilities other than telephone costs, to
qualify as affordable housing.
(b) "Very low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is at or below fifty
percent of the median income, adjusted for household size, for the
county where the affordable housing is located.
(c) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is more than fifty
percent but is at or below eighty percent of the median income where
the affordable housing is located.
(d) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is more than eighty
percent but is at or below one hundred fifteen percent of the median
income where the affordable housing is located.
(e) "Nonprofit housing organization" means any public or private
nonprofit organization that: (i) Is organized under federal, state, or
local laws; (ii) has no part of its net earnings inuring to the benefit
of any member, founder, contributor, or individual; and (iii) has among
its purposes, significant activities related to the provision of decent
housing that is affordable to very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households and special needs populations.
(f) "Authority" or "housing authority" means any of the public
corporations created by RCW 35.82.030.
(4) Surplus property for sale by the departments of natural
resources, social and health services, corrections, and general
administration, the state parks and recreation commission, and by
cities, towns, and counties, which is included in the inventory as
required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section, shall be offered,
for the first ninety days after its availability, exclusively to public
and private nonprofit housing organizations and housing authorities,
for the purpose of developing affordable housing for very low-income
and low-income households. Nonprofit housing organizations and
authorities may purchase such property at fair market value under
reasonable option and purchase conditions, subject to the following:
(a) Each purchase offer must include a proposed affordable housing
project description, including an estimated number of affordable
housing units to be created, the income level population for which the
housing will be available, the number of years the nonprofit intends to
retain the housing as affordable housing for that income level
population, and a proposed development schedule. The department, or
individual local governments and state agencies, may establish
additional requirements for purchase offers by nonprofit housing
organizations and housing authorities.
(b) Each selling entity must establish criteria to use if more than
one purchase offer is received from nonprofit housing organizations and
housing authorities for a single piece of property during the ninety-day period. Such criteria may include giving preference to nonprofit
housing organizations and housing authorities that propose affordable
housing developments which:
(i) Serve the lowest income populations or special needs
populations;
(ii) Create the greatest number of units;
(iii) Preserve the affordability of those units for the longest
periods of time; and
(iv) Integrate other supportive services.
(c) After ninety days, if no purchase offers are made on behalf of
a nonprofit housing organization or housing authority which meet the
requirements of (a) of this subsection, offers from the general public
may be considered.
(5) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall produce a single statewide report to be provided to the
appropriate committees of the legislature each year by December 31st.
The report must consolidate all municipal, county, and state agency
reports and include information on all state, locally, or federally
owned surplus property that was purchased by a nonprofit housing
organization or housing authority in the most recently completed fiscal
year. The report shall include the following:
(a) A list of all properties purchased and the identity of all
corresponding nonprofit or housing authority purchasers;
(b) For each property, the number of affordable housing units
created, under development, and planned, including anticipated dates of
completion if applicable;
(c) For each property, a notation of the income level populations
for which the housing units will be available.
(6) The following property is exempt from this chapter:
(a) Real property which is designated or which was acquired as
state forest lands;
(b) Federally granted school lands and other trust lands; and
(c) Lands acquired under restrictive conveyances.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.21.687 and 1995 c 399 s 37 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every city and town, including every code city operating under
Title 35A RCW, shall identify and catalog real property owned by the
city or town that is no longer required for its purposes and is
suitable for the development of affordable housing for very low-income,
low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW
43.63A.510. The inventory shall include the location, approximate
size, and current zoning classification of the property. Every city
and town shall provide a copy of the inventory to the department of
community, trade, and economic development by November 1, 1993, with
inventory revisions ((each November 1 thereafter)) provided as surplus
property becomes available, but no less often than each calendar
quarter, beginning in June 2006.
(2) ((By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994,)) Property for
sale, which is included in the inventory as required by subsection (1)
of this section, shall be offered, for the first ninety days after its
availability, exclusively to nonprofit housing organizations, as
defined in RCW 43.63A.510, and housing authorities, as required in RCW
43.63A.510(4).
(3) Every city and town, including every code city operating under
Title 35A RCW, shall regularly purge the inventory of real property of
sites that are no longer available for the development of affordable
housing. The inventory revision shall also contain a list of real
property that has become available since the last update.
(4) An annual report must be submitted to the department of
community, trade, and economic development, which shall include a list
of all properties that were purchased by a nonprofit housing
organization or housing authority in the most recently completed fiscal
year. The report must also include all information required in RCW
43.63A.510(5).
(5) As used in this section, "real property" means buildings, land,
or buildings and land.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.34.137 and 1993 c 461 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every county shall identify and catalog real property owned by
the county that is no longer required for its purposes and is suitable
for the development of affordable housing for very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
The inventory shall include the location, approximate size, and current
zoning classification of the property. Every county shall provide a
copy of the inventory to the department of community, trade, and
economic development ((by November 1, 1993)), with inventory revisions
((each November 1 thereafter)) provided as surplus property becomes
available, but no less often than each calendar quarter, beginning in
June 2006.
(2) ((By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994,)) Property for
sale, which is included in the inventory as required by subsection (1)
of this section, shall be offered, for the first ninety days after its
availability, exclusively to nonprofit housing organizations, as
defined in RCW 43.63A.510, and housing authorities, as required in RCW
43.63A.510(4).
(3) Every county shall regularly purge the inventory of real
property of sites that are no longer available for the development of
affordable housing. The inventory revision shall include an updated
listing of real property that has become available since the last
update.
(4) An annual report must be submitted to the department of
community, trade, and economic development which shall include a list
of all properties that were purchased by a nonprofit housing
organization or housing authority in the most recently completed fiscal
year. The report must also include all information required in RCW
43.63A.510(5).
(5) As used in this section, "real property" means buildings, land,
or buildings and land.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.20A.037 and 1995 c 399 s 65 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall identify and catalog real property that is
no longer required for department purposes and is suitable for the
development of affordable housing for very low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory shall
include the location, approximate size, and current zoning
classification of the property. The department shall provide a copy of
the inventory to the department of community, trade, and economic
development ((by November 1, 1993, and every November 1 thereafter)),
with inventory revisions provided as surplus property becomes
available, but no less often than each calendar quarter, beginning in
June 2006.
(2) ((By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994,)) Property for
sale, which is included in the inventory as required by subsection (1)
of this section, shall be offered, for the first ninety days after its
availability, exclusively to nonprofit housing organizations, as
defined in RCW 43.63A.510, and housing authorities, as required in RCW
43.63A.510(4).
(3) The department shall regularly purge the inventory of real
property of sites that are no longer available for the development of
affordable housing. The department shall include an updated listing of
real property that has become available since the last update.
(4) An annual report must be submitted to the department of
community, trade, and economic development which shall include a list
of all properties that were purchased by a nonprofit housing
organization or housing authority in the most recently completed fiscal
year. The report must also include all information required in RCW
43.63A.510(5).
(5) As used in this section, "real property" means buildings, land,
or buildings and land.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.12.063 and 2002 c 255 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to continue the
department's policy giving priority consideration to abutting property
owners in agricultural areas when disposing of property through its
surplus property program under this section.
(2) Whenever the department determines that any real property owned
by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of the department
is no longer required for transportation purposes and that it is in the
public interest to do so, the department may sell the property or
exchange it in full or part consideration for land or improvements or
for construction of improvements at fair market value to any of the
following governmental entities or persons:
(a) In the case of property suitable for residential use, any
housing authority as defined in RCW 43.63A.510, or any nonprofit
organization that is (i) dedicated to providing affordable housing to
very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined
in RCW 43.63A.510 and (ii) eligible to receive assistance through the
Washington housing trust fund created in chapter 43.185 RCW;
(b) Any other state agency;
(((b))) (c) The city or county in which the property is situated;
(((c))) (d) Any other municipal corporation;
(((d))) (e) Regional transit authorities created under chapter
81.112 RCW;
(((e))) (f) The former owner of the property from whom the state
acquired title;
(((f))) (g) In the case of residentially improved property, a
tenant of the department who has resided thereon for not less than six
months and who is not delinquent in paying rent to the state;
(((g))) (h) Any abutting private owner but only after each other
abutting private owner (if any), as shown in the records of the county
assessor, is notified in writing of the proposed sale. If more than
one abutting private owner requests in writing the right to purchase
the property within fifteen days after receiving notice of the proposed
sale, the property shall be sold at public auction in the manner
provided in RCW 47.12.283;
(((h))) (i) To any person through the solicitation of written bids
through public advertising in the manner prescribed by RCW 47.28.050;
(((i))) (j) To any other owner of real property required for
transportation purposes;
(((j) In the case of property suitable for residential use, any
nonprofit organization dedicated to providing affordable housing to
very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined
in RCW 43.63A.510 and is eligible to receive assistance through the
Washington housing trust fund created in chapter 43.185 RCW;)) or
(k) A federally recognized Indian tribe within whose reservation
boundary the property is located.
(3) Sales to purchasers may at the department's option be for cash,
by real estate contract, or exchange of land or improvements.
Transactions involving the construction of improvements must be
conducted pursuant to chapter 47.28 RCW or Title 39 RCW, as applicable,
and must comply with all other applicable laws and rules.
(4) Conveyances made pursuant to this section shall be by deed
executed by the secretary of transportation and shall be duly
acknowledged.
(5) All moneys received pursuant to the provisions of this section
less any real estate broker commissions paid pursuant to RCW 47.12.320
shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.
(6) An annual report must be submitted to the department of
community, trade, and economic development which shall include a list
of all properties that were purchased for the purpose of affordable
housing development by a nonprofit housing organization or housing
authority in the most recently completed fiscal year. The report must
also include all information required in RCW 43.63A.510(5).

Sec. 6 RCW 47.12.064 and 1995 c 399 s 121 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall identify and catalog real property that is
no longer required for department purposes and is suitable for the
development of affordable housing for very low-income, low-income, and
moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory
shall include the location, approximate size, and current zoning
classification of the property. The department shall provide a copy of
the inventory to the department of community, trade, and economic
development ((by November 1, 1993, and every November 1 thereafter)),
with inventory revisions provided as surplus property becomes
available, but no less often than each calendar quarter, beginning in
June 2006.
(2) ((By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994,)) The
department shall regularly purge the inventory of real property of
sites that are no longer available for the development of affordable
housing. The department shall include an updated listing of real
property that has become available since the last update. ((As used in
this section, "real property" means buildings, land, or buildings and
land.))
(3) An annual report must be submitted to the department of
community, trade, and economic development which shall include a list
of all properties that were purchased in the most recently completed
fiscal year by a nonprofit housing organization, as defined in RCW
43.63A.510, housing authority, or any other entity for the purpose of
affordable housing development. The report must also include all
information required in RCW 43.63A.510(5).
(4) As used in this section, "real property" means buildings, land,
or buildings and land.

Sec. 7 RCW 72.09.055 and 1995 c 399 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall identify and catalog real property that is
no longer required for department purposes and is suitable for the
development of affordable housing for very low-income, low-income, and
moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory
shall include the location, approximate size, and current zoning
classification of the property. The department shall provide a copy of
the inventory to the department of community, trade, and economic
development ((by November 1, 1993, and every November 1 thereafter)),
with inventory revisions provided as surplus property becomes
available, but no less often than each calendar quarter, beginning in
June 2006.
(2) ((By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994,)) Property for
sale, which is included in the inventory as required by subsection (1)
of this section, shall be offered, for the first ninety days after its
availability, exclusively to nonprofit housing organizations, as
defined in RCW 43.63A.510, and housing authorities, as required in RCW
43.63A.510(4).
(3) The department shall regularly purge the inventory of real
property of sites that are no longer available for the development of
affordable housing. The department shall include an updated listing of
real property that has become available since the last update.
(4) An annual report must be submitted to the department of
community, trade, and economic development which shall include a list
of all properties that were purchased by a nonprofit housing
organization or housing authority in the most recently completed fiscal
year. The report must also include all information required in RCW
43.63A.510(5).
(5) As used in this section, "real property" means buildings, land,
or buildings and land.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.19.19201 and 1995 c 399 s 64 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of general administration shall identify and
catalog real property that is no longer required for department
purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable housing for
very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined
in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory shall include the location,
approximate size, and current zoning classification of the property.
The department of general administration shall provide a copy of the
inventory to the department of community, trade, and economic
development ((by November 1, 1993, and every November 1 thereafter)),
with inventory revisions provided as surplus property becomes
available, but no less often than each calendar quarter, beginning in
June 2006.
(2) ((By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994,)) Property for
sale, which is included in the inventory as required by subsection (1)
of this section, shall be offered, for the first ninety days after its
availability, exclusively to nonprofit housing organizations, as
defined in RCW 43.63A.510, and housing authorities, as required in RCW
43.63A.510(4).
(3) The department of general administration shall regularly purge
the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer available
for the development of affordable housing. The department shall
include an updated listing of real property that has become available
since the last update.
(4) An annual report must be submitted to the department of
community, trade, and economic development which shall include a list
of all properties that were purchased by a nonprofit housing
organization or housing authority in the most recently completed fiscal
year. The report must also include all information required in RCW
43.63A.510(5).
(5) As used in this section, "real property" means buildings, land,
or buildings and land.

Sec. 9 RCW 79A.05.170 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 23 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Any lands owned by the state parks and recreation commission,
which are determined to be surplus to the needs of the state for
development for state park purposes and which the commission proposes
to deed to a local government or other entity for outdoor recreation
purposes, shall be accompanied by a clause requiring that if the land
is not used for outdoor recreation purposes, ownership of the land
shall revert to the state parks and recreation commission.
(2) The state parks and recreation commission, in cases where land
subject to such a reversionary clause is proposed for use or disposal
for purposes other than recreation, shall require that, if the land is
surplus to the needs of the commission for park purposes at the time
the commission becomes aware of its proposed use for nonrecreation
purposes, the ((holder of the land or property shall reimburse the
commission for the release of the reversionary interest in the land.
The reimbursement shall be in the amount of the fair market value of
the reversionary interest as determined by a qualified appraiser
agreeable to the commission. Appraisal costs shall be borne by the
local entity which holds title to the land)) commission shall offer the
property for sale, for the first ninety days after its availability,
exclusively to nonprofit housing organizations, as defined in RCW
43.63A.510, and housing authorities, as required in RCW 43.63A.510.
The commission shall provide each calendar quarter a revised inventory
of real property sites that are available for the development of
affordable housing to the department of community, trade, and economic
development.
(3) ((Any funds generated under a reimbursement under this section
shall be deposited in the parkland acquisition account which is hereby
created in the state treasury. Moneys in this account are to be used
solely for the purchase or acquisition of property for use as state
park property by the commission, as directed by the legislature; all
such funds shall be subject to legislative appropriation.)) An annual
report must be submitted to the department of community, trade, and
economic development which shall include a list of all properties that
were purchased by a nonprofit housing organization or housing authority
in the most recently completed fiscal year. The report must also
include all information required in RCW 43.63A.510(5).

Sec. 10 RCW 79A.05.175 and 1999 c 249 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the commission finds that any land under its control
cannot advantageously be used for park purposes, it is authorized to
dispose of such land by the method provided in this section or by the
method provided in RCW 79A.05.170. If such lands are school or other
grant lands, control thereof shall be relinquished by resolution of the
commission to the proper state officials. If such lands were acquired
under restrictive conveyances by which the state may hold them only so
long as they are used for park purposes, they may be returned to the
donor or grantors by the commission. All other such lands must be sold
by the method provided for in RCW 79A.05.170. After the first ninety
days that the property becomes available, if no purchase offers are
made on behalf of a nonprofit housing organization, as defined in RCW
43.63A.510, or housing authority, which meet the requirements of RCW
43.63A.510(4), offers from the general public may be considered, and
lands may be either sold by the commission to the highest bidder or
exchanged for other lands of equal value by the commission, and all
conveyance documents shall be executed by the governor. All such
exchanges shall be accompanied by a transfer fee, to be set by the
commission and paid by the other party to the transfer; such fee shall
be paid into the parkland acquisition account established under RCW
79A.05.170. Sealed bids on all sales shall be solicited at least
twenty days in advance of the sale date by an advertisement appearing
at least once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county in which the land to be sold is
located. If the commission feels that no bid received adequately
reflects the fair value of the land to be sold, it may reject all bids,
and may call for new bids. All proceeds derived from the sale of such
park property shall be paid into the park land acquisition account.
All land considered for exchange shall be evaluated by the commission
to determine its adaptability to park usage. The equal value of all
lands exchanged shall first be determined by the appraisals to the
satisfaction of the commission. No sale or exchange of state park
lands shall be made without the unanimous consent of the commission.

Sec. 11 RCW 79.11.005 and 2003 c 334 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to sell any real property not
designated or acquired as state forest lands, but acquired by the
state, either in the name of the forest board, the forestry board, or
the division of forestry, for administrative sites, lien foreclosures,
or other purposes whenever it shall determine that the lands are no
longer or not necessary for public use.
(2) Property for sale shall be offered, for the first ninety days
after its availability, exclusively to nonprofit housing organizations,
as defined in RCW 43.63A.510, and housing authorities as required in
RCW 43.63A.510(4).
(3) After ninety days, if no purchase offers are made on behalf of
a nonprofit housing organization or housing authority which meets the
requirements of RCW 43.63A.510(4), offers from the general public may
be considered and sales to the general public may be conducted under
subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The sale of property to the general public may be made after
public notice to the highest bidder for such a price as approved by the
governor, but not less than the fair market value of the real property,
plus the value of improvements thereon. Any instruments necessary to
convey title must be executed by the governor in a form approved by the
attorney general.
(((3))) (5) All amounts received from ((the sale)) all sales must
be credited to the fund of the department of government that is
responsible for the acquisition and maintenance of the property sold.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of natural resources shall identify and catalog
real property that is no longer required for department purposes and is
suitable for the development of affordable housing for very low-income,
low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW
43.63A.510. The inventory shall include the location, approximate
size, and current zoning classification of the property. The
department shall provide a copy of the inventory to the department of
community, trade, and economic development, with inventory revisions
provided as surplus property becomes available, but no less often than
each calendar quarter, beginning in June 2006.
(2) Property for sale, which is included in the inventory as
required by subsection (1) of this section, shall be offered, for the
first ninety days after its availability, exclusively to nonprofit
housing organizations, as defined in RCW 43.63A.510, and housing
authorities, as required in RCW 43.63A.510(4).
(3) The department shall regularly purge the inventory of real
property of sites that are no longer available for the development of
affordable housing. The department shall include an updated listing of
real property that has become available since the last update.
(4) An annual report must be submitted to the department of
community, trade, and economic development which shall include a list
of all properties that were purchased by a nonprofit housing
organization or housing authority in the most recently completed fiscal
year. The report must also include all information required in RCW
43.63A.510(5).
(5) As used in this section, "real property" means buildings, land,
or buildings and land.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---