BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to grant
certificate of approval holders the same distribution rights granted to
domestic wineries under RCW 66.24.170 and to domestic breweries under
RCW 66.24.240.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.206 and 2004 c 160 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A United States winery or manufacturer of wine located
outside the state of Washington must hold a certificate of approval to
allow sales and shipment of the certificate of approval holder's wine
to licensed Washington wine retailers as specified in subsection (3) of
this section and to licensed Washington wine distributors or importers.
(b) Authorized representatives must hold a certificate of approval
to allow sales and shipment of United States produced wine to licensed
Washington wine retailers as specified in subsection (3) of this
section and to licensed Washington wine distributors or importers.
(c) Authorized representatives must also hold a certificate of
approval to allow sales and shipments of foreign produced wine to
licensed Washington wine retailers as specified in subsection (3) of
this section and to licensed Washington wine distributors or importers.
(2) The certificate of approval shall not be granted unless and
until such winery or manufacturer of wine or authorized representative
shall have made a written agreement with the board to furnish to the
board, on or before the twentieth day of each month, a report under
oath, on a form to be prescribed by the board, showing the quantity of
wine sold or delivered to each licensed wine retailer as specified in
subsection (3) of this section and to each licensed wine distributor or
importer, during the preceding month, and shall further have agreed
with the board, that such wineries, manufacturers, or authorized
representatives, and all general sales corporations or agencies
maintained by them, and all of their trade representatives, shall and
will faithfully comply with all laws of the state of Washington
pertaining to the sale of intoxicating liquors and all rules and
regulations of the Washington state liquor control board. A violation
of the terms of this agreement will cause the board to take action to
suspend or revoke such certificate.
(3) Any winery or manufacturer of wine holding a certificate of
approval may also act as a distributor of wine of its own production,
and any authorized representative holding a certificate of approval may
also act as a distributor of wine produced by the winery or
manufacturer it represents. Any certificate of approval holder
operating as a distributor under this subsection: (a) May use a common
carrier to deliver wine of its own production to licensed Washington
wine retailers as specified in this subsection; and (b) shall comply
with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors.
(4) The fee for the certificate of approval, issued pursuant to the
provisions of this title, shall be from time to time established by the
board at a level that is sufficient to defray the costs of
administering the certificate of approval program. The fee shall be
fixed by rule by the board in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.24.210 and 2001 c 124 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby imposed upon all wines except cider sold to
wine retailers by certificate of approval holders as specified in RCW
66.24.206(3) and to wine distributors and the Washington state liquor
control board((,)) within the state a tax at the rate of twenty and
one-fourth cents per liter. There is hereby imposed on all cider sold
to wine distributors and the Washington state liquor control board
within the state a tax at the rate of three and fifty-nine one-hundredths cents per liter((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). However,
wine sold or shipped in bulk from one winery to another winery shall
not be subject to such tax. The tax provided for in this section shall
be collected by direct payments based on wine purchased by wine
retailers from certificate of approval holders as specified in RCW
66.24.206(3) and by wine distributors. Except as otherwise provided in
this subsection, every person purchasing wine under the provisions of
this section shall on or before the twentieth day of each month report
to the board all purchases during the preceding calendar month in such
manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board, and with
such report shall pay the tax due from the purchases covered by such
report unless the same has previously been paid. Any such purchaser of
wine whose applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth
day following the month of purchase will be assessed a penalty at the
rate of two percent a month or fraction thereof. The board may require
that every such person shall execute to and file with the board a bond
to be approved by the board, in such amount as the board may fix,
securing the payment of the tax. If any such person fails to pay the
tax when due, the board may forthwith suspend or cancel the license
until all taxes are paid. Certificate of approval holders acting as
distributors as specified in RCW 66.24.206(3) and domestic wineries
acting as distributors shall pay taxes imposed by this section.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section. All revenues collected during any month from this additional
tax shall be transferred to the state general fund by the twenty-fifth
day of the following month.
(3) An additional tax is imposed on wines subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section, at the rate of one-fourth of one cent
per liter for wine sold after June 30, 1987. After June 30, 1996, such
additional tax does not apply to cider. An additional tax of five one-hundredths of one cent per liter is imposed on cider sold after June
30, 1996. All revenues collected under this subsection (3) shall be
disbursed quarterly to the Washington wine commission for use in
carrying out the purposes of chapter 15.88 RCW.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all wine subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to twenty-three and forty-four one-hundredths cents per liter on fortified wine
as defined in RCW 66.04.010(((38))) (39) when bottled or packaged by
the manufacturer, one cent per liter on all other wine except cider,
and eighteen one-hundredths of one cent per liter on cider. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(5)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all cider subject to tax
under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to
two and four one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June
30, 1996, and before July 1, 1997, and is equal to four and seven one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1997.
(b) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (5) shall be deposited in the health services account
under RCW 43.72.900.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "cider" means table wine that
contains not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and
not more than seven percent of alcohol by volume and is made from the
normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe apples or
pears. "Cider" includes, but is not limited to, flavored, sparkling,
or carbonated cider and cider made from condensed apple or pear must.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.24.270 and 2004 c 160 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person, firm or corporation, holding a license to
manufacture malt liquors or strong beer within the state of Washington,
shall, on or before the twentieth day of each month, furnish to the
Washington state liquor control board, on a form to be prescribed by
the board, a statement showing the quantity of malt liquors and strong
beer sold for resale during the preceding calendar month to each beer
distributor within the state of Washington.
(2)(a) A United States brewery or manufacturer of beer or strong
beer((,)) located outside the state of Washington((,)) must hold a
certificate of approval to allow sales and shipment of the certificate
of approval holder's beer or strong beer to licensed Washington beer
retailers as specified in subsection (4) of this section and to
licensed Washington beer distributors or importers.
(b) Authorized representatives must hold a certificate of approval
to allow sales and shipment of United States produced beer or strong
beer to licensed Washington beer retailers as specified in subsection
(4) of this section and to licensed Washington beer distributors or
importers.
(c) Authorized representatives must also hold a certificate of
approval to allow sales and shipments of foreign produced beer or
strong beer to licensed Washington beer retailers as specified in
subsection (4) of this section and to licensed Washington beer
distributors or importers.
(3) The certificate of approval shall not be granted unless and
until such brewer or manufacturer of beer or strong beer or authorized
representative shall have made a written agreement with the board to
furnish to the board, on or before the twentieth day of each month, a
report under oath, on a form to be prescribed by the board, showing the
quantity of beer and strong beer sold or delivered to each licensed
Washington beer retailer as specified in subsection (4) of this section
and to each licensed beer distributor or importer during the preceding
month, and shall further have agreed with the board, that such brewer
or manufacturer of beer or strong beer or authorized representative and
all general sales corporations or agencies maintained by them, and all
of their trade representatives, corporations, and agencies, shall and
will faithfully comply with all laws of the state of Washington
pertaining to the sale of intoxicating liquors and all rules and
regulations of the Washington state liquor control board. A violation
of the terms of this agreement will cause the board to take action to
suspend or revoke such certificate.
(4) Any brewery or manufacturer of beer or strong beer holding a
certificate of approval, except for a brand owner of malt beverages
under RCW 66.04.010(6), may also act as a distributor of beer of its
own production, and any authorized representative holding a certificate
of approval may also act as a distributor of beer produced by the
brewery or manufacturer it represents. Any certificate of approval
holder operating as a distributor under this subsection: (a) May use
a common carrier to deliver beer of its own production to licensed
Washington beer retailers as specified in this subsection; and (b)
shall comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to
distributors.
(5) The fee for the certificate of approval, issued pursuant to the
provisions of this title, shall be from time to time established by the
board at a level that is sufficient to defray the costs of
administering the certificate of approval program. The fee shall be
fixed by rule by the board in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.24.290 and 2003 c 167 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any microbrewer or domestic brewery or beer distributor
licensed under this title and any certificate of approval holder as
specified in RCW 66.24.270(4) may sell and deliver beer and strong beer
to holders of authorized licenses direct, but to no other person, other
than the board((; and)). Every such brewery or beer distributor and
every such certificate of approval holder shall report all sales to the
board monthly, pursuant to the regulations, and shall pay to the board
as an added tax for the privilege of manufacturing and selling the beer
and strong beer within the state a tax of one dollar and thirty cents
per barrel of thirty-one gallons on sales to licensees within the state
and on sales to licensees within the state of bottled and canned beer,
including strong beer, shall pay a tax computed in gallons at the rate
of one dollar and thirty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons. Any
brewery or beer distributor and any certificate of approval holder
whose applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day
following the month of sale will be assessed a penalty at the rate of
two percent per month or fraction thereof. Beer and strong beer shall
be sold by breweries and distributors or by certificate of approval
holders in sealed barrels or packages. The moneys collected under this
subsection shall be distributed as follows: (a) Three-tenths of a
percent shall be distributed to border areas under RCW 66.08.195; and
(b) of the remaining moneys: (i) Twenty percent shall be distributed
to counties in the same manner as under RCW 66.08.200; and (ii) eighty
percent shall be distributed to incorporated cities and towns in the
same manner as under RCW 66.08.210.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to two dollars per barrel of thirty-one gallons. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(3)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to ninety-six cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons
through June 30, 1995, two dollars and thirty-nine cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
and four dollars and seventy-eight cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons thereafter.
(b) The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply
to the sale of the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by
breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may
be provided by the board by rule consistent with the purposes of this
exemption.
(c) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (3) shall be deposited in the health services account
under RCW 43.72.900.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer that
is subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section that is in the
first sixty thousand barrels of beer and strong beer by breweries that
are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as
existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by
the board by rule consistent with the purposes of the exemption under
subsection (3)(b) of this section. The additional tax is equal to one
dollar and forty-eight and two-tenths cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons. By the twenty-fifth day of the following month, three percent
of the revenues collected from this additional tax shall be distributed
to border areas under RCW 66.08.195 and the remaining moneys shall be
transferred to the state general fund.
(5) The board may make refunds for all taxes paid on beer and
strong beer exported from the state for use outside the state.
(6) The board may require filing with the board of a bond to be
approved by it, in such amount as the board may fix, securing the
payment of the tax. If any licensee fails to pay the tax when due, the
board may forthwith suspend or cancel his or her license until all
taxes are paid.

Sec. 6 RCW 66.28.070 and 1994 c 201 s 5 and 1994 c 63 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it shall
be unlawful for any retail beer or wine licensee to purchase beer or
wine, except from a certificate of approval holder as specified in RCW
66.24.206(3) or 66.24.270(4), a duly licensed wholesaler, or the board,
and it shall be unlawful for any brewer, winery, or beer or wine
wholesaler to purchase beer or wine, except from a duly licensed beer
or wine wholesaler or importer.
(2) A beer or wine retailer licensee may purchase beer or wine from
a government agency which has lawfully seized beer or wine from a
licensed beer or wine retailer, or from a board-authorized retailer, or
from a licensed retailer which has discontinued business if the
wholesaler has refused to accept beer or wine from that retailer for
return and refund. Beer and wine purchased under this subsection shall
meet the quality standards set by its manufacturer.
(3) Special occasion licensees ((holding either a class G or J
license)) may only purchase beer or wine from a beer or wine retailer
duly licensed to sell beer or wine for off-premises consumption, the
board, or from a duly licensed beer or wine wholesaler.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---