BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that citizens and
businesses are experiencing extensive damage from winter floods. The
legislature further finds that federal disaster assistance programs and
other forms of disaster relief are not always available to assist those
in need. Therefore, the legislature finds that a state program for
flood damage assistance and relief must be created to help Washington
citizens and communities to protect their homes, businesses, and
communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall
establish a flood damage relief program to provide financial assistance
to individuals, businesses, and local governments that have experienced
flood damage. The department shall establish criteria for awarding
grants for emergency repair and cleanup activities as a result of flood
damage. The criteria must include, but is not limited to:
(1) The availability of other sources of financial assistance
including other state or federal disaster assistance;
(2) The extent of the damage;
(3) Matching funds that may be available; and
(4) The financial need of the applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of five million dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the department of community,
trade, and economic development for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---