BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.17 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that hydrogen, a noncarbon energy carrier
that can be made from renewable energy, is ideally suited to address
global, regional, and local energy and environmental challenges.
Hydrogen-powered vehicles and infrastructure can lead to energy
independence, a significant reduction in smog-forming emissions and a
commensurate reduction in health problems due to air pollution,
decreased water pollution from oil and gasoline leaks, and quieter and
smoother vehicle operation. Alternative fuel vehicles powered by
compressed natural gas, propane, biodiesel, and ethanol can also
provide many of these same benefits.
As part of its preparation for the 2010 Winter Olympic Games,
Vancouver is developing a so-called hydrogen highway to accelerate the
commercialization of hydrogen and fuel cell technologies. In order to
further encourage the adoption and commercialization of hydrogen and
fuel cell technologies and alternative fuel vehicles, the legislature
finds that a portion of the Washington highway system that connects the
United States to the highway system of the Vancouver metropolitan area
should be designated as Washington Hydrogen Highway.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.17.020 and 1970 ex.s. c 51 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 5, hereby
designated the Washington Hydrogen Highway, is established as follows:
Beginning at the Washington-Oregon boundary line on the interstate
bridge over the Columbia river at Vancouver, thence northerly by way of
Kelso, Chehalis, Centralia, Olympia, Tacoma, Seattle, Everett and Mt.
Vernon, thence northwesterly to the east of Lake Samish, thence
northeasterly and northerly by way of Bellingham to the international
boundary line in the vicinity of Blaine in Whatcom county.

--- END ---