BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A commission on psychoactive substance
control is created to investigate and make recommendations for
alternative regulatory approaches to the production, distribution, and
control of psychoactive substances with the objective of reducing
crime, enhancing public health, protecting children, and promoting
efficient use of scarce public resources.
(2) The governor shall appoint one member with expertise from each
of the following fields after consultation with individuals and
representative groups thereof: (a) Education, (b) mental health and
substance abuse, (c) law enforcement, (d) medicine, (e) law, (f)
judiciary, (g) local government, (h) public health, (i) labor, (j)
business, (k) pharmacology, and (l) the public at large. The
commission shall select a chairperson.
(3) Four members of the legislature shall be members of the
commission, including two members of the senate appointed by the
president of the senate, one from the majority and one from the
minority party, and two members of the house of representatives
appointed by the speaker of the house, one from the majority and one
from the minority party.
(4) The department of health shall staff the commission.
(5) Legislative members of the commission shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses as provided in RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.
(6) The commission shall report its recommendations to the
legislature by December 1, 2007.

--- END ---