BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.36.540 and 1990 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "telefacsimile message" means the
transmittal of electronic signals over telephone lines for conversion
into written text.
(2) No person, corporation, partnership, or association shall
initiate the unsolicited transmission of telefacsimile messages
promoting goods or services for purchase by the recipient.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this section
shall not apply to telefacsimile messages sent to a recipient with whom
the initiator has had a prior contractual or business relationship.
(b) A person shall not initiate an unsolicited telefacsimile
message under the provisions of (a) of this subsection if the person
knew or reasonably should have known that the recipient is a
governmental entity.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, it is unlawful
to initiate any telefacsimile message to a recipient who has previously
sent a written or telefacsimile message to the initiator clearly
indicating that the recipient does not want to receive telefacsimile
messages from the initiator.
(5) The unsolicited transmission of telefacsimile messages
promoting goods or services for purchase by the recipient is a matter
affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. The transmission of unsolicited
telefacsimile messages is not reasonable in relation to the development
and preservation of business. A violation of this section is an unfair
or deceptive act in trade or commerce for the purpose of applying the
consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. ((Damages to the recipient
of telefacsimile messages in violation of this section are five hundred
dollars or actual damages, whichever is greater.))
(6) A person who violates this section is subject to: (a) A cease
and desist order; and (b) an administrative fine of not less than five
hundred dollars or more than one thousand dollars for each separate
violation. For purposes of this section, each page of an unsolicited
facsimile message may constitute a separate violation.
(7) A person who intentionally violates this section is guilty of
a misdemeanor punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW and by a
mandatory fine of up to one thousand dollars per violation. For
purposes of this section, a person has intentionally violated this
section if the attorney general has previously notified the person by
certified mail that he or she is in violation of this section.
(8) The commission may initiate proceedings relative to a violation
of this section, including issuing investigative demands, issuing
subpoenas, administering oaths, and conducting hearings. Hearings must
be conducted in accordance with the administrative procedure act.
(9) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the
Washington utilities and transportation commission from adopting
additional rules regulating transmissions of telefacsimile messages.

--- END ---