BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.350.030 and 2005 c 424 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to other powers and duties prescribed in this
chapter, the authority is empowered to:
(((1))) (a) Use public moneys in the life sciences discovery fund,
leveraging those moneys with amounts received from other public and
private sources in accordance with contribution agreements, to promote
life sciences research;
(((2))) (b) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, and bequests, and
enter into contribution agreements with private entities and public
entities other than the state to receive moneys in consideration of the
authority's promise to leverage those moneys with amounts received
through appropriations from the legislature and contributions from
other public entities and private entities, in order to use those
moneys to promote life sciences research. Nonstate moneys received by
the authority for this purpose shall be deposited in the life sciences
discovery fund created in RCW 43.350.070;
(((3))) (c) Hold funds received by the authority in trust for their
use pursuant to this chapter to promote life sciences research;
(((4))) (d) Manage its funds, obligations, and investments as
necessary and as consistent with its purpose including the segregation
of revenues into separate funds and accounts;
(((5))) (e) Make grants to entities pursuant to contract for the
promotion of life sciences research to be conducted in the state.
Grant agreements shall specify deliverables to be provided by the
recipient pursuant to the grant. The authority shall solicit requests
for funding and evaluate the requests by reference to factors such as:
(((a))) (i) The quality of the proposed research; (((b))) (ii) its
potential to improve health outcomes, with particular attention to the
likelihood that it will also lower health care costs, substitute for a
more costly diagnostic or treatment modality, or offer a breakthrough
treatment for a particular disease or condition; (((c))) (iii) its
potential for leveraging additional funding; (((d))) (iv) its potential
to provide health care benefits or benefit human learning and
development; (((e))) (v) its potential to stimulate the health care
delivery, biomedical manufacturing, and life sciences related
employment in the state; (((f))) (vi) the geographic diversity of the
grantees within Washington; (((g))) (vii) evidence of potential royalty
income and contractual means to recapture such income for purposes of
this chapter; and (((h))) (viii) evidence of public and private
collaboration;
(((6))) (f) Create one or more advisory boards composed of
scientists, industrialists, and others familiar with life sciences
research; and
(((7))) (g) Adopt policies and procedures to facilitate the orderly
process of grant application, review, and reward.
(2)(a) The authority is prohibited from awarding any grant for
which the grant funding would be used for (i) any research or activity
involving human cloning; (ii) induced abortion in humans performed
after the effective date of this section or the use of cells or tissues
derived therefrom; (iii) knowingly conducting destructive research on
a human embryo or transferring a human embryo with the knowledge that
such an embryo will be subjected to destructive research or
transferring gametes with the knowledge that a human embryo will be
produced from the gametes to be used in destructive research; (iv)
human-animal hybrids; or (v) any research or activity the federal
funding of which would be contrary to federal laws that are in effect
on the effective date of this section.
(b) No recipient of grant funds awarded by the authority may
knowingly use such funds for such research or activity prohibited under
(a) of this subsection.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Destructive research" means medical procedures, scientific or
laboratory research, or other kinds of investigation that kills or
injures the subject of such research. Destructive research does not
include in vitro fertilization and accompanying embryo transfer to a
woman's body, or any diagnostic procedure that may benefit the human
embryo subject to such tests.
(ii) "Human cloning" means human asexual reproduction, accomplished
by introducing nuclear material from one or more human somatic cells
into a fertilized or unfertilized oocyte whose nuclear material has
been removed or inactivated so as to produce a living organism at any
stage of development that is genetically virtually identical to an
existing or previously existing human organism.
(iii) "Human embryo" means a genetically complete living organism
of the species homo sapiens, from the single cell stage up to eight
weeks development.

--- END ---