BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.64.011 and 1983 c 15 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the
definitions in this section shall apply.
(1) (("Arbitration" means the procedure whereby the parties
involved in an impasse submit their differences to a third party for a
final and binding decision or as provided in this chapter.
(2) "Arbitrator" means either a single arbitrator or a panel of
three arbitrators as provided in RCW 47.64.240.
(3))) "Collective bargaining representative" means the persons
designated by the ((secretary of transportation)) governor and employee
organizations to be the exclusive representatives during collective
bargaining negotiations.
(((4))) (2) "Commission" means the marine employees' commission
created in RCW 47.64.280.
(3) "Department of transportation" means the department as defined
in RCW 47.01.021.
(4) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(5) "Ferry employee" means any employee of the marine
transportation division of the department of transportation who is a
member of a collective bargaining unit represented by a ferry employee
organization and does not include an exempt employee pursuant to RCW
41.06.079.
(6) "Ferry employee organization" means any labor organization
recognized to represent a collective bargaining unit of ferry
employees.
(7) (("Ferry system management" means those management personnel of
the marine transportation division of the department of transportation
who have been vested with the day-to-day management responsibilities of
the Washington state ferry system by the transportation commission and
who are not members of a collective bargaining unit represented by a
ferry employee organization.
(8))) "Lockout" means the refusal of ((ferry system management))
the employer to furnish work to ferry employees in an effort to get
ferry employee organizations to make concessions during collective
bargaining, grievance, or other labor relation negotiations.
Curtailment of employment of ferry employees due to lack of work
resulting from a strike or work stoppage((, as defined in subsection
(11) of this section,)) shall not be considered a lockout.
(((9) "Marine employees' commission" means the commission created
in RCW 47.64.280.
(10))) (8) "Office of financial management" means the office as
created in RCW 43.41.050.
(((11))) (9) "Strike or work stoppage" means a ferry employee's
refusal, in concerted action with others, to report to duty, or his or
her willful absence from his or her position, or his or her stoppage or
slowdown of work, or his or her abstinence in whole or in part from the
full, faithful, and proper performance of the duties of employment, for
the purpose of inducing, influencing, or coercing a change in
conditions, compensation, rights, privileges, or obligations of his,
her, or any other ferry employee's employment. A refusal, in good
faith, to work under conditions which pose an endangerment to the
health and safety of ferry employees or the public, as determined by
the master of the vessel, shall not be considered a strike for the
purposes of this chapter.
(((12))) (10) "Transportation commission" means the commission as
defined in RCW 47.01.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of negotiating collective bargaining agreements
under this chapter, the employer shall be represented by the governor
or governor's designee.
(2) Two or more ferry employee organizations may, upon agreement of
the parties, negotiate, as a coalition with the employer representative
as designated in subsection (1) of this section, a multiunion
collective bargaining agreement on behalf of all the employees in ferry
employee organization bargaining units that the exclusive bargaining
representatives represent. The coalition shall bargain for a
multiunion collective bargaining agreement covering all of the
employees represented by the coalition. The governor's designee and
the exclusive bargaining representative or representatives are
authorized to enter into supplemental bargaining of bargaining unit-specific issues for inclusion in or as an addendum to the multiunion
collective bargaining agreement, subject to the parties' agreement
regarding the issues and procedures for supplemental bargaining.
Nothing in this section impairs the right of each ferry employee
organization to negotiate a collective bargaining agreement exclusive
to the bargaining unit it represents.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.64.120 and 1997 c 436 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Ferry system management)) The employer and ferry system
employee organizations, through their collective bargaining
representatives, shall meet at reasonable times, to negotiate in good
faith with respect to wages, hours, working conditions, insurance, and
health care benefits as limited by RCW 47.64.270, and other matters
mutually agreed upon. Employer funded retirement benefits shall be
provided under the public employees retirement system under chapter
41.40 RCW and shall not be included in the scope of collective
bargaining.
(2) Upon ratification of bargaining agreements, ferry employees are
entitled to an amount equivalent to the interest earned on retroactive
compensation increases. For purposes of this section, the interest
earned on retroactive compensation increases is the same monthly rate
of interest that was earned on the amount of the compensation increases
while held in the state treasury. The interest will be computed for
each employee until the date the retroactive compensation is paid, and
must be allocated in accordance with appropriation authority. The
interest earned on retroactive compensation is not considered part of
the ongoing compensation obligation of the state and is not
compensation earnable for the purposes of chapter 41.40 RCW.
Negotiations shall also include grievance procedures for resolving any
questions arising under the agreement, which shall be embodied in a
written agreement and signed by the parties.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a conflict
exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or agency
policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment
and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter,
the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a
collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a
statute is invalid and unenforceable.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.64.130 and 1983 c 15 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is an unfair labor practice for ((ferry system management))
the employer or its representatives:
(a) To interfere with, restrain, or coerce employees in the
exercise of the rights guaranteed by this chapter;
(b) To dominate or interfere with the formation or administration
of any employee organization or contribute financial or other support
to it((: PROVIDED, That)). However, subject to rules made by the
commission pursuant to RCW 47.64.280, an employer shall not be
prohibited from permitting employees to confer with it or its
representatives or agents during working hours without loss of time or
pay;
(c) To encourage or discourage membership in any employee
organization by discrimination in regard to hiring, tenure of
employment, or any term or condition of employment, but nothing
contained in this subsection prevents an employer from requiring, as a
condition of continued employment, payment of periodic dues and fees
uniformly required to an exclusive bargaining representative pursuant
to RCW 47.64.160((: PROVIDED, That)). However, nothing prohibits
((ferry system management)) the employer from agreeing to obtain
employees by referral from a lawful hiring hall operated by or
participated in by a labor organization;
(d) To discharge or otherwise discriminate against an employee
because he has filed charges or given testimony under this chapter;
(e) To refuse to bargain collectively with the representatives of
its employees.
(2) It is an unfair labor practice for an employee organization:
(a) To restrain or coerce (i) employees in the exercise of the
rights guaranteed by this chapter((: PROVIDED, That this paragraph)).
However, this subsection does not impair the right of an employee
organization to prescribe its own rules with respect to the acquisition
or retention of membership therein, or (ii) an employer in the
selection of his representatives for the purposes of collective
bargaining or the adjustment of grievances;
(b) To cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate
against an employee in violation of subsection (1)(c) of this section;
(c) To refuse to bargain collectively with an employer((, when it
is the representative of its employees subject to RCW 47.64.170)).
(3) The expression of any view, argument, or opinion, or the
dissemination thereof to the public, whether in written, printed,
graphic, or visual form, shall not constitute or be evidence of an
unfair labor practice under any of the provisions of this chapter, if
the expression contains no threat of reprisal or force or promise of
benefit.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.64.140 and 1989 c 373 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any ferry system employee or any employee
organization, directly or indirectly, to induce, instigate, encourage,
authorize, ratify, or participate in a strike or work stoppage against
the ferry system.
(2) It is unlawful for ((ferry system management)) the employer to
authorize, consent to, or condone a strike or work stoppage; or to
conduct a lockout; or to pay or agree to pay any ferry system employee
for any day in which the employee participates in a strike or work
stoppage; or to pay or agree to pay any increase in compensation or
benefits to any ferry system employee in response to or as a result of
any strike or work stoppage or any act that violates subsection (1) of
this section. It is unlawful for any official, director, or
representative of the ferry system to authorize, ratify, or participate
in any violation of this subsection. Nothing in this subsection
prevents new or renewed bargaining and agreement within the scope of
negotiations as defined by this chapter, at any time. No collective
bargaining agreement provision regarding suspension or modification of
any court-ordered penalty provided in this section is binding on the
courts.
(3) In the event of any violation or imminently threatened
violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this section, any citizen
domiciled within the jurisdictional boundaries of the state may
petition the superior court for Thurston county for an injunction
restraining the violation or imminently threatened violation. Rules of
civil procedure regarding injunctions apply to the action. However,
the court shall grant a temporary injunction if it appears to the court
that a violation has occurred or is imminently threatened; the
plaintiff need not show that the violation or threatened violation
would greatly or irreparably injure him or her; and no bond may be
required of the plaintiff unless the court determines that a bond is
necessary in the public interest. Failure to comply with any temporary
or permanent injunction granted under this section is a contempt of
court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW. The court may impose a penalty
of up to ten thousand dollars for an employee organization or the ferry
system, for each day during which the failure to comply continues. The
sanctions for a ferry employee found to be in contempt shall be as
provided in chapter 7.21 RCW. An individual or an employee
organization which makes an active good faith effort to comply fully
with the injunction shall not be deemed to be in contempt.
(4) The right of ferry system employees to engage in strike or work
slowdown or stoppage is not granted and nothing in this chapter may be
construed to grant such a right.
(5) Each of the remedies and penalties provided by this section is
separate and several, and is in addition to any other legal or
equitable remedy or penalty.
(6) In addition to the remedies and penalties provided by this
section the successful litigant is entitled to recover reasonable
attorney fees and costs incurred in the litigation.
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 88.04 RCW and chapter
88.08 RCW, the department of transportation shall ((promulgate)) adopt
rules ((and regulations)) allowing vessels, as defined in RCW
((88.04.300)) 88.04.015, as well as other watercraft, to engage in
emergency passenger service on the waters of Puget Sound in the event
ferry employees engage in a work slowdown or stoppage. Such emergency
rules ((and regulations)) shall allow emergency passenger service on
the waters of Puget Sound within seventy-two hours following a work
slowdown or stoppage. Such rules ((and regulations)) that are
((promulgated)) adopted shall give due consideration to the needs and
the health, safety, and welfare of the people of the state of
Washington.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.64.170 and 1983 c 15 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any ferry employee organization certified as the bargaining
representative shall be the exclusive representative of all ferry
employees in the bargaining unit and shall represent all such employees
fairly.
(2) A ferry employee organization or organizations and the
((secretary of transportation)) governor may each designate any
individual as its representative to engage in collective bargaining
negotiations.
(3) Negotiating sessions, including strategy meetings of ((ferry
system management)) the employer or employee organizations, mediation,
and the deliberative process of arbitrators are exempt from the
provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW. Hearings conducted by arbitrators may
be open to the public by mutual consent of the parties. ((Any meeting
of the transportation commission, during which a collective bargaining
agreement is subject to ratification, shall be open to the public.))
(4) Terms of any collective bargaining agreement may be enforced by
civil action in Thurston county superior court upon the initiative of
either party.
(5) Ferry system employees or any employee organization shall not
negotiate or attempt to negotiate directly with ((a member of the
transportation commission if the commission has)) anyone other than the
person who has been appointed or authorized a bargaining representative
for the purpose of bargaining with the ferry employees or their
representative((, unless the member of the commission is the designated
bargaining representative of the ferry system)).
(6)(a) The negotiation of a proposed collective bargaining
agreement by representatives of ((ferry system management)) the
employer and a ferry employee organization shall commence ((in each
odd-numbered year immediately following adoption by the legislature and
approval by the governor of the biennial budget)) on or about September
1st of every odd-numbered year. However, negotiations for the 2007-2009 biennial agreements may commence at any time after the effective
date of this section. Negotiations for agreements pertaining to the
2009-2011 biennium and all subsequent negotiations must conclude on or
about April 1st of the year following the year in which the
negotiations commence. If negotiations are not concluded by April 1st,
the parties shall be deemed to be at impasse and shall proceed to
mediation under RCW 47.64.230 and sections 12 through 14 of this act.
(b) For negotiations covering the 2009-2011 biennium and subsequent
biennia, the time periods specified in this section, and in RCW
47.64.210 and sections 12 through 14 of this act, must ensure
conclusion of all agreements on or before September 1st of the even-numbered year next preceding the biennial budget period during which
the agreement should take effect. These time periods may only be
altered by mutual agreement of the parties in writing. Any such
agreement and any impasse procedures agreed to by the parties under RCW
47.64.200 must include an agreement regarding the new time periods that
will allow final resolution by negotiations or arbitration by September
1st of each even-numbered year.
(7) Until a new collective bargaining agreement is ((negotiated, or
until an award is made by the arbitrator)) in effect, the terms and
conditions of the previous collective bargaining agreement shall remain
in force. ((The wage and benefit provisions of any collective
bargaining agreement, or arbitrator's award in lieu thereof, that is
concluded after July 1st of an odd-numbered year shall be retroactive
to July 1st.)) It is the intent of this section that the collective
bargaining agreement or arbitrator's award shall commence on July 1st
of each odd-numbered year and shall terminate on June 30th of the next
odd-numbered year to coincide with the ensuing biennial budget year, as
defined by RCW 43.88.020(7), to the extent practical. It is further
the intent of this section that all collective bargaining agreements be
concluded by September 1st of the even-numbered year before the
commencement of the biennial budget year during which the agreements
are to be in effect.
(8) ((Any ferry union contract terminating before July 1, 1983,
shall, with the agreement of the parties, remain in effect until a
contract can be concluded under RCW 47.64.006, 47.64.011, and 47.64.120
through 47.64.280. The contract may be retroactive to the expiration
date of the prior contract, and the cost to the department of three
months retroactive compensation and benefits for this 1983 contract
negotiation only shall not be included in calculating the limitation
imposed by RCW 47.64.180. If the parties cannot agree to contract
extension, any increase agreed to for the three-month period shall be
included in calculating the limit imposed by RCW 47.64.180.
(9) Any ferry union contract which would terminate after July 1,
1983, may, by agreement of the parties, be terminated as of July 1,
1983, and a new contract concluded pursuant to RCW 47.64.006,
47.64.011, and 47.64.120 through 47.64.280. Any contract terminating
after July 1, 1983, is subject to this chapter only upon its expiration
and shall not be renewed for a period beyond July 1, 1985.)) (a) The
governor shall submit a request either for funds necessary to implement
the collective bargaining agreements including, but not limited to, the
compensation and fringe benefit provisions or for legislation necessary
to implement the agreement, or both. Requests for funds necessary to
implement the collective bargaining agreements shall not be submitted
to the legislature by the governor unless such requests:
(i) Have been submitted to the director of the office of financial
management by October 1st before the legislative session at which the
requests are to be considered; and
(ii) Have been certified by the director of the office of financial
management as being feasible financially for the state.
(b) The governor shall submit a request either for funds necessary
to implement the arbitration awards or for legislation necessary to
implement the arbitration awards, or both. Requests for funds
necessary to implement the arbitration awards shall not be submitted to
the legislature by the governor unless such requests have been
submitted to the director of the office of financial management by
October 1st before the legislative session at which the requests are to
be considered.
(c) The legislature shall approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds necessary to implement the collective bargaining
agreements or arbitration awards as a whole for each agreement or
award. The legislature shall not consider a request for funds to
implement a collective bargaining agreement or arbitration award unless
the request is transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's
budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060. If the
legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, either party may
reopen all or part of the agreement and award or the exclusive
bargaining representative may seek to implement the procedures provided
for in RCW 47.64.210 and section 12 of this act.
(9) If, after the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of an
agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both
parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a
mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.64.200 and 1983 c 15 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
As the first step in the performance of their duty to bargain,
((ferry system management)) the employer and the employee organization
shall endeavor to agree upon impasse procedures. ((The agreement shall
provide for implementation of these impasse procedures not later than
July 1st in each odd-numbered year following enactment of the biennial
budget.)) Unless otherwise agreed to by the employee organization and
the employer in their impasse procedures, the arbitrator or panel is
limited to selecting the most reasonable offer, in its judgment, of the
final offers on each impasse item submitted by the parties. The
employee organization and the employer may mutually agree to the
impasse procedure under which the arbitrator or panel may issue a
decision it deems just and appropriate with respect to each impasse
item. If the parties fail to agree upon impasse procedures under this
section, the impasse procedures provided in RCW 47.64.210 ((through))
and 47.64.230 and sections 12 through 14 of this act apply. It is
unlawful for either party to refuse to participate in the impasse
procedures provided in RCW 47.64.210 ((through)) and 47.64.230 and
sections 12 through 14 of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.64.210 and 1983 c 15 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the absence of an impasse agreement between the parties or the
failure of either party to utilize its procedures by ((August)) April
1st in ((each odd-numbered year, the marine employees' commission
shall, upon the request of either party,)) the even-numbered year
preceding the biennium, either party may request the commission to
appoint an impartial and disinterested person to act as mediator
((pursuant to RCW 47.64.280)). It is the function of the mediator to
bring the parties together to effectuate a settlement of the dispute,
but the mediator shall not compel the parties to agree.

Sec. 9 RCW 47.64.220 and 1999 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to collective bargaining and for purposes of collective
bargaining and arbitration, the ((marine employees')) commission shall
conduct a salary survey. The results of the survey shall be published
in a report which shall be a public document comparing wages, hours,
employee benefits, and conditions of employment of involved ferry
employees with those of public and private sector employees in states
along the west coast of the United States, including Alaska, and in
British Columbia doing directly comparable but not necessarily
identical work, giving consideration to factors peculiar to the area
and the classifications involved. Such survey report shall be for the
purpose of disclosing generally prevailing levels of compensation,
benefits, and conditions of employment. It shall be used to guide
generally but not to define or limit collective bargaining between the
parties. ((The commission shall make such other findings of fact as
the parties may request during bargaining or impasse.))
(2) ((Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,))
Salary and employee benefit information collected from private
employers that identifies a specific employer with the salary and
employee benefit rates which that employer pays to its employees is not
subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.
(((3) A person or entity, having reason to believe that the salary
survey results are inaccurate, may submit a petition to the state
auditor requesting an audit of the data upon which the salary survey
results are based. The state auditor shall review and analyze all data
collected for the salary survey, including proprietary information, but
is prohibited from disclosing the salary survey data to any other
person or entity, except by court order.))

Sec. 10 RCW 47.64.220 and 2005 c 274 s 308 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Prior to collective bargaining and for purposes of collective
bargaining and arbitration, the ((marine employees')) commission shall
conduct a salary survey. The results of the survey shall be published
in a report which shall be a public document comparing wages, hours,
employee benefits, and conditions of employment of involved ferry
employees with those of public and private sector employees in states
along the west coast of the United States, including Alaska, and in
British Columbia doing directly comparable but not necessarily
identical work, giving consideration to factors peculiar to the area
and the classifications involved. Such survey report shall be for the
purpose of disclosing generally prevailing levels of compensation,
benefits, and conditions of employment. It shall be used to guide
generally but not to define or limit collective bargaining between the
parties. ((The commission shall make such other findings of fact as
the parties may request during bargaining or impasse.))
(2) ((Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,))
Salary and employee benefit information collected from private
employers that identifies a specific employer with the salary and
employee benefit rates which that employer pays to its employees is not
subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.
(((3) A person or entity, having reason to believe that the salary
survey results are inaccurate, may submit a petition to the state
auditor requesting an audit of the data upon which the salary survey
results are based. The state auditor shall review and analyze all data
collected for the salary survey, including proprietary information, but
is prohibited from disclosing the salary survey data to any other
person or entity, except by court order.))

Sec. 11 RCW 47.64.230 and 1983 c 15 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
By mutual agreement, the parties may waive mediation ((and fact-finding, as provided for in RCW 47.64.210 and 47.64.220,)) and proceed
with binding arbitration as provided for in ((RCW 47.64.240)) the
impasse procedures agreed to under RCW 47.64.200 or in sections 12
through 14 of this act, as applicable. The waiver shall be in writing
and be signed by the representatives of the parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If an agreement has not been reached following a reasonable
period of negotiations and, when applicable, mediation, but in either
event by April 15th, upon the recommendation of the assigned mediator
that the parties remain at impasse, all impasse items shall be
submitted to arbitration under this section. The issues for
arbitration shall be limited to the issues certified by the commission.
(2) The parties may agree to submit the dispute to a single
arbitrator, whose authority and duties shall be the same as those of an
arbitration panel. If the parties cannot agree on the arbitrator
within five working days, the selection shall be made under subsection
(3) of this section. The full costs of arbitration under this section
shall be shared equally by the parties to the dispute.
(3) Within seven days following the issuance of the determination
of the commission, each party shall name one person to serve as its
arbitrator on the arbitration panel. The two members so appointed
shall meet within seven days following the appointment of the later
appointed member to attempt to choose a third member to act as the
neutral chair of the arbitration panel. Upon the failure of the
arbitrators to select a neutral chair within seven days, either party
may apply to the federal mediation and conciliation service, or the
American arbitration association to provide a list of five qualified
arbitrators from which the neutral chair shall be chosen. Each party
shall pay the fees and expenses of its arbitrator, and the fees and
expenses of the neutral chair shall be shared equally between the
parties.
(4) In consultation with the parties, the arbitrator or arbitration
panel shall promptly establish a date, time, and place for a hearing
and shall provide reasonable notice thereof to the parties to the
dispute. The parties shall exchange final positions in writing, with
copies to the arbitrator or arbitration panel, with respect to every
issue to be arbitrated, on a date mutually agreed upon, but in no event
later than ten working days before the date set for hearing. A
hearing, which shall be informal, shall be held, and each party shall
have the opportunity to present evidence and make argument. No member
of the arbitration panel may present the case for a party to the
proceedings. The rules of evidence prevailing in judicial proceedings
may be considered, but are not binding, and any oral testimony or
documentary evidence or other data deemed relevant by the chair of the
arbitration panel may be received in evidence. A recording of the
proceedings shall be taken. The arbitration panel has the power to
administer oaths, require the attendance of witnesses, and require the
production of such books, papers, contracts, agreements, and documents
as may be deemed by the panel to be material to a just determination of
the issues in dispute. If any person refuses to obey a subpoena issued
by the arbitration panel, or refuses to be sworn or to make an
affirmation to testify, or any witness, party, or attorney for a party
is guilty of any contempt while in attendance at any hearing held
hereunder, the arbitration panel may invoke the jurisdiction of the
superior court in the county where the labor dispute exists, and the
court has jurisdiction to issue an appropriate order. Any failure to
obey the order may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.
(5) The neutral chair shall consult with the other members of the
arbitration panel, if a panel has been created. Within thirty days
following the conclusion of the hearing, the neutral chair shall make
written findings of fact and a written determination of the issues in
dispute, based on the evidence presented. A copy thereof shall be
served on each of the other members of the arbitration panel, and on
each of the parties to the dispute. That determination is final and
binding upon both parties, subject to review by the superior court upon
the application of either party solely upon the question of whether the
decision of the panel was arbitrary or capricious.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW
to read as follows:
An interest arbitration proceeding under section 12 of this act
exercises a state function and is, for the purposes of this chapter,
functioning as a state agency. Chapter 34.05 RCW does not apply to an
interest arbitration proceeding under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The mediator, arbitrator, or arbitration panel may consider
only matters that are subject to bargaining under this chapter.
(2) The decision of an arbitrator or arbitration panel is not
binding on the legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the
funds necessary to implement provisions pertaining to compensation and
fringe benefit provisions of an arbitrated collective bargaining
agreement, is not binding on the state, the department of
transportation, or the ferry employee organization.
(3) In making its determination, the arbitrator or arbitration
panel shall be mindful of the legislative purpose under RCW 47.64.005
and 47.64.006 and, as additional standards or guidelines to aid it in
reaching a decision, shall take into consideration the following
factors:
(a) Past collective bargaining contracts between the parties
including the bargaining that led up to the contracts;
(b) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(c) Stipulations of the parties;
(d) The results of the salary survey as required in RCW 47.64.220;
(e) Comparison of wages, hours, employee benefits, and conditions
of employment of the involved ferry employees with those of public and
private sector employees in states along the west coast of the United
States, including Alaska, and in British Columbia doing directly
comparable but not necessarily identical work, giving consideration to
factors peculiar to the area and the classifications involved;
(f) Changes in any of the foregoing circumstances during the
pendency of the proceedings;
(g) The limitations on ferry toll increases and operating subsidies
as may be imposed by the legislature; and
(h) Other factors that are normally or traditionally taken into
consideration in the determination of matters that are subject to
bargaining under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW
to read as follows:
The transportation commission may increase tolls by no more than
the amount of the Seattle consumer price index for the purpose of
providing revenue to fund collective bargaining agreements and
arbitration awards under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW
to read as follows:
Collective bargaining under this act may not be for the purposes of
making a collective bargaining agreement take effect before July 1,
2007. No party may engage in collective bargaining under this act to
amend a collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date
of this section. A collective bargaining agreement or amendment
thereto entered into under this act shall not be effective before July
1, 2007, and may not have any retroactive effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This act applies prospectively only and not retroactively. It
applies to collective bargaining agreements, the negotiations of
collective bargaining agreements, mediations, arbitrations, and other
actions under this act that arise or are commenced on or after the
effective date of this section.
(2) This act does not apply to collective bargaining agreements,
either in effect or for which the negotiations have begun, or
mediations and arbitrations that arose or commenced under this chapter
before the effective date of this section. Such collective bargaining
agreements and related proceedings are to be administered in accordance
with the authorities, rules, and procedures that were established under
this chapter as it existed before the effective date of this section.
The repealers in section 20 of this act do not affect any existing
right acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the statutes
repealed or under any rule or order adopted under those statutes, nor
do they affect any proceeding instituted under them.

Sec. 18 RCW 47.64.270 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
Absent a collective bargaining agreement to the contrary, the
department of transportation shall provide contributions to insurance
and health care plans for ferry system employees and dependents, as
determined by the state health care authority, under chapter 41.05 RCW;
and the ((ferry system management)) employer and employee organizations
may collectively bargain for other insurance and health care plans, and
employer contributions may exceed that of other state agencies as
provided in RCW 41.05.050((, subject to RCW 47.64.180)). To the extent
that ferry employees by bargaining unit have absorbed the required
offset of wage increases by the amount that the employer's contribution
for employees' and dependents' insurance and health care plans exceeds
that of other state general government employees in the 1985-87 fiscal
biennium, employees shall not be required to absorb a further offset
except to the extent the differential between employer contributions
for those employees and all other state general government employees
increases during any subsequent fiscal biennium. If such differential
increases in the 1987-89 fiscal biennium or the 1985-87 offset by
bargaining unit is insufficient to meet the required deduction, the
amount available for compensation shall be reduced by bargaining unit
by the amount of such increase or the 1985-87 shortage in the required
offset. Compensation shall include all wages and employee benefits.

Sec. 19 RCW 47.64.280 and 1984 c 287 s 95 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created the marine employees' commission. The
governor shall appoint the commission with the consent of the senate.
The commission shall consist of three members: One member to be
appointed from labor, one member from industry, and one member from the
public who has significant knowledge of maritime affairs. The public
member shall be ((chairman)) chair of the commission. One of the
original members shall be appointed for a term of three years, one for
a term of four years, and one for a term of five years. Their
successors shall be appointed for terms of five years each, except that
any person chosen to fill a vacancy shall be appointed only for the
unexpired term of the member whom he or she succeeds. Commission
members are eligible for reappointment. Any member of the commission
may be removed by the governor, upon notice and hearing, for neglect of
duty or malfeasance in office, but for no other cause. Commission
members are not eligible for state retirement under chapter 41.40 RCW
by virtue of their service on the commission. Members of the
commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and
shall receive reimbursement for official travel and other expenses at
the same rate and on the same terms as provided for the transportation
commission by RCW 47.01.061. The payments shall be made from the Puget
Sound ferry operations account.
(2) The ((marine employees')) commission shall: (a) Adjust all
complaints, grievances, and disputes between labor and management
arising out of the operation of the ferry system as provided in RCW
47.64.150; (b) provide for impasse mediation as required in RCW
47.64.210; (c) ((conduct fact-finding and)) provide salary surveys as
required in RCW 47.64.220; ((and (d) provide for the selection of an
impartial arbitrator as)) (d) conduct fact-finding as requested by the
parties; and (e) perform those duties required in ((RCW 47.64.240(5)))
section 12 of this act.
(3)(a) In adjudicating all complaints, grievances, and disputes,
the party claiming labor disputes shall, in writing, notify the
((marine employees')) commission, which shall make careful inquiry into
the cause thereof and issue an order advising the ferry employee, or
the ferry employee organization representing him or her, and the
department of transportation, as to the decision of the commission.
(b) The parties are entitled to offer evidence relating to disputes
at all hearings conducted by the commission. The orders and awards of
the commission are final and binding upon any ferry employee or
employees or their representative affected thereby and upon the
department.
(c) The commission shall adopt rules of procedure under chapter
34.05 RCW.
(d) The commission has the authority to subpoena any ferry employee
or employees, or their representatives, and any member or
representative of the department, and any witnesses. The commission
may require attendance of witnesses and the production of all pertinent
records at any hearings held by the commission. The subpoenas of the
commission are enforceable by order of any superior court in the state
of Washington for the county within which the proceeding may be
pending.
(4) The commission may hire staff as necessary, appoint
consultants, enter into contracts, and conduct studies as reasonably
necessary to carry out this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 47.64.180 (Agreements and awards limited by appropriation)
and 1983 c 15 s 9;
(2) RCW 47.64.190 (Marine employees' commission review for
compliance with fiscal limitations -- Effective date of agreements and
arbitration orders) and 1983 c 15 s 10; and
(3) RCW 47.64.240 (Binding arbitration) and 1989 c 327 s 3 & 1983
c 15 s 15.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Section 9 of this act expires July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 Except for section 10 of this act which
takes effect July 1, 2006, this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---