BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.40.020 and 1999 c 361 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall
have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Auditor" means the office of the state auditor.
(2) "Employee" means any individual employed or holding office in
any department or agency of state government or an individual employed
by a contractor who holds a contract with the state.
(3) "Good faith" means a reasonable basis in fact for the
communication. "Good faith" is lacking when the employee knows or
reasonably ought to know that the report is malicious, false, or
frivolous.
(4) "Gross waste of funds" means to spend or use funds or to allow
funds to be used without valuable result in a manner grossly deviating
from the standard of care or competence that a reasonable person would
observe in the same situation.
(5)(a) "Improper governmental action" means any action by an
employee undertaken in the performance of the employee's official
duties:
(i) Which is (([a])) a gross waste of public funds or resources as
defined in this section;
(ii) Which is in violation of federal or state law or rule, if the
violation is not merely technical or of a minimum nature; or
(iii) Which is of substantial and specific danger to the public
health or safety.
(b) "Improper governmental action" does not include personnel
actions, for which other remedies exist, including but not limited to
employee grievances, complaints, appointments, promotions, transfers,
assignments, reassignments, reinstatements, restorations,
reemployments, performance evaluations, reductions in pay, dismissals,
suspensions, demotions, violations of the state civil service law,
alleged labor agreement violations, reprimands, claims of
discriminatory treatment, or any action which may be taken under
chapter 41.06 RCW, or other disciplinary action except as provided in
RCW 42.40.030.
(6) "Substantial and specific danger" means a risk of serious
injury, illness, peril, or loss, to which the exposure of the public is
a gross deviation from the standard of care or competence which a
reasonable person would observe in the same situation.
(7) "Use of official authority or influence" includes taking,
directing others to take, recommending, processing, or approving any
personnel action such as an appointment, promotion, transfer,
assignment, reassignment, reinstatement, restoration, reemployment,
performance evaluation, or any adverse action under chapter 41.06 RCW,
or other disciplinary action.
(8) "Whistleblower" means an employee who in good faith reports
alleged improper governmental action to the auditor, initiating an
investigation under RCW 42.40.040. For purposes of the provisions of
this chapter and chapter 49.60 RCW relating to reprisals and
retaliatory action, the term "whistleblower" also means: (a) An
employee who in good faith provides information to the auditor in
connection with an investigation under RCW 42.40.040 and an employee
who is believed to have reported asserted improper governmental action
to the auditor or to have provided information to the auditor in
connection with an investigation under RCW 42.40.040 but who, in fact,
has not reported such action or provided such information; or (b) an
employee who in good faith identifies rules warranting review or
provides information to the rules review committee, and an employee who
is believed to have identified rules warranting review or provided
information to the rules review committee but who, in fact, has not
done so.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.60.210 and 1992 c 118 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is an unfair practice for any employer, employment agency,
labor union, or other person to discharge, expel, or otherwise
discriminate against any person because he or she has opposed any
practices forbidden by this chapter, or because he or she has filed a
charge, testified, or assisted in any proceeding under this chapter.
(2) It is an unfair practice for a government agency or government
manager or supervisor or a contractor who holds a contract with the
state, to retaliate against a whistleblower as defined in chapter 42.40
RCW.

--- END ---