BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) An insurer authorized to write automobile liability
insurance policies may offer an automobile liability insurance policy
that includes cost-savings claims settlement features if the insurer
allows the insured the choice of:
(i) A policy that includes cost-savings claims settlement features;
and
(ii) A policy that offers comprehensive settlement features.
(b) Examples of cost-savings features include but are not limited
to:
(i) Replacement parts that are of like kind and quality as the
original equipment manufacturer parts; and
(ii) Insurer designation of the repair shop for the insured's
automobile.
(c) A policy that includes comprehensive settlement benefits must
include:
(i) Replacement parts that are original equipment manufacturer
parts; and
(ii) The insured's choice of repair shops.
(2) If an insurer offers the policy that includes the cost-savings
claims settlement features, the premium must be reduced to reflect the
reduction in possible settlement expenses.
(3) An insurer that offers a policy that includes cost-savings
claims settlement features and a policy that includes comprehensive
settlement features must clearly disclose the difference in claims
settlement practices. An insured must proactively select the policy
that includes cost-savings claims settlement features.
(4) For the purposes of this section, parts are of like kind and
quality as the original equipment manufacturer parts if they are
certified as equal or better quality in terms of safety, fit, and
performance as the original equipment manufacturer parts by an
independent, third-party organization that certifies the quality of
automotive parts.

--- END ---