BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the "cell
phone restriction act of 2006."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that the rate of
collisions increase when drivers talk on their cellular devices while
in the flow of traffic.
The purpose of this act is to lower the rate of accidents caused by
cellular devices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Cellular devices shall not be used by a
driver who has possessed an intermediate license for six months or less
while the car is in the flow of traffic.
(2) After the six-month period, cellular devices shall not be used
by a driver without hands-free devices while the car is in the flow of
traffic.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cellular devices" means devices that act as telephones using
a wireless cellular network. This includes, but is not limited to,
wireless phones, blackberries, and other cell phone and/or electronic
organizer devices.
(2) "Intermediate licenses" means licenses issued by the state of
Washington to drivers between the ages of sixteen and eighteen years of
age.
(3) "Hands-free devices" means devices used for the purpose of
using a cellular device without the need of holding the device. This
includes, but it not limited to, headsets which may be wired or
unwired, speaker phones, and services such as OnStar.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 46 RCW.

--- END ---