BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this section and sections 2 through 5 of this
act:
(1) "Citation" means a written determination by the department that
a wage payment requirement has been violated.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Determination of compliance" means a written determination by
the department that wage payment requirements have not been violated.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries, or the director's authorized representative.
(5) "Employee" has the meaning provided in: (a) RCW 49.46.010 for
purposes of a wage payment requirement set forth in RCW 49.46.020 or
49.46.130; and (b) RCW 49.12.005 for purposes of a wage payment
requirement set forth in RCW 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or 49.52.060.
(6) "Employer" has the meaning provided in RCW 49.46.010 for
purposes of a wage payment requirement set forth in RCW 49.46.020,
49.46.130, 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or 49.52.060.
(7) "Notice of assessment" means a written notice by the department
that, based on a citation, the employer shall pay the amounts assessed
under section 2 of this act.
(8) "Wage" has the meaning provided in RCW 49.46.010.
(9) "Wage complaint" means a complaint from an employee to the
department that asserts that an employer has violated one or more wage
payment requirements and that is reduced to writing.
(10) "Wage payment requirement" means a wage payment requirement
set forth in RCW 49.46.020, 49.46.130, 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or
49.52.060, and any related rules adopted by the department.
(11) "Willful" means a knowing and intentional action that is
neither accidental nor the result of a bona fide dispute, as evaluated
under the standards applicable to wage payment violations under RCW
49.52.050(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 CITATIONS AND NOTICES OF ASSESSMENT--CIVIL
PENALTIES. (1) If an employee files a wage complaint with the
department, the department shall investigate the wage complaint.
Unless otherwise resolved, the department shall issue either a citation
and notice of assessment or a determination of compliance: (a) No
later than sixty days after the date on which the department received
the wage complaint, unless the department extends this time period for
good cause; and (b) no later than three years after the date on which
the cause of action accrued, unless a longer period of time applies
under law. Such cause of action for wage claims accrues from the date
when the wages are due. The department shall send the citation and
notice of assessment or the determination of compliance to both the
employer and the employee by service of process or certified mail to
their last known addresses.
(2) If the department determines that an employer has violated a
wage payment requirement and issues to the employer a citation and
notice of assessment, the department may order the employer to pay
employees all wages owed, including interest of one percent per month
on all wages owed, to the employee.
(3) If the department determines that the violation of the wage
payment requirement was a willful violation, the department also may
order the employer to pay the department a civil penalty as specified
in (a) of this subsection.
(a) A civil penalty for a willful violation of a wage payment
requirement shall be not less than five hundred dollars or an amount
equal to ten percent of the total amount of unpaid wages, whichever is
greater. The maximum civil penalty for a willful violation of a wage
payment requirement shall be twenty thousand dollars.
(b) The department may not assess a civil penalty if the employer
reasonably relied on: (i) A rule related to any wage payment
requirement; (ii) a written order, ruling, approval, opinion, advice,
determination, or interpretation of the director; or (iii) an
interpretive or administrative policy issued by the department and
filed with the office of the code reviser. In accordance with the
department's retention schedule obligations under chapter 40.14 RCW,
the department shall maintain a complete and accurate record of all
written orders, rulings, approvals, opinions, advice, determinations,
and interpretations for purposes of determining whether an employer is
immune from civil penalties under (b)(ii) of this subsection.
(c) The department shall waive any civil penalty assessed against
an employer under this section if the director determines that the
employer has provided payment to the employee of all wages that the
department determined that the employer owed to the employee, including
interest, within ten business days of the employer's receipt of the
citation and notice of assessment from the department.
(d) The department may waive at any time a civil penalty assessed
under this section, in whole or in part, if the director determines
that the employer paid all wages owed to an employee.
(e) The department shall deposit civil penalties paid under this
section in the supplemental pension fund established under RCW
51.44.033.
(4) Upon payment by an employer, and acceptance by an employee, of
all wages and interest assessed by the department in a citation and
notice of assessment issued to the employer, the fact of such payment
by the employer, and of such acceptance by the employee, shall: (a)
Constitute a full and complete satisfaction by the employer of all
specific wage payment requirements addressed in the citation and notice
of assessment; and (b) bar the employee from initiating or pursuing any
court action or other judicial or administrative proceeding based on
the specific wage payment requirements addressed in the citation and
notice of assessment. The citation and notice of assessment shall
include a notification and summary of the specific requirements of this
subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 ADMINISTRATIVE APPEALS. (1) A person, firm,
or corporation aggrieved by a citation and notice of assessment or a
determination of compliance issued by the department under section 2 of
this act may appeal the citation and notice of assessment or the
determination of compliance to the director by filing a notice of
appeal with the director within thirty days of the department's
issuance of the citation and notice of assessment or the determination
of compliance. A citation and notice of assessment or a determination
of compliance not appealed within thirty days is final and binding, and
not subject to further appeal.
(2) A notice of appeal filed with the director under this section
shall stay the effectiveness of the citation and notice of assessment
or the determination of compliance pending final review of the appeal
by the director as provided for in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) Upon receipt of a notice of appeal, the director shall assign
the hearing to an administrative law judge of the office of
administrative hearings to conduct the hearing and issue an initial
order. The hearing and review procedures shall be conducted in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, and the standard of review by the
administrative law judge of an appealed citation and notice of
assessment or an appealed determination of compliance shall be de novo.
Any party who seeks to challenge an initial order shall file a petition
for administrative review with the director within thirty days after
service of the initial order. The director shall conduct
administrative review in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) The director shall issue all final orders after appeal of the
initial order. The final order of the director is subject to judicial
review in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(5) Orders that are not appealed within the time period specified
in this section and chapter 34.05 RCW are final and binding, and not
subject to further appeal.
(6) An employer who fails to allow adequate inspection of records
in an investigation by the department under this chapter within a
reasonable time period may not use such records in any appeal under
this section to challenge the correctness of any determination by the
department of wages owed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 ELECTION OF REMEDY. (1) An employee who has
filed a wage complaint with the department may elect to terminate the
department's administrative action, thereby preserving any private
right of action, by providing written notice to the department within
ten business days after the employee's receipt of the department's
citation and notice of assessment.
(2) If the employee elects to terminate the department's
administrative action: (a) The department shall immediately
discontinue its action against the employer; (b) the department shall
vacate a citation and notice of assessment already issued by the
department to the employer; and (c) the citation and notice of
assessment, and any related findings of fact or conclusions of law by
the department, and any payment or offer of payment by the employer of
the wages, including interest, assessed by the department in the
citation and notice of assessment, shall not be admissible in any court
action or other judicial or administrative proceeding.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or affect:
(a) The right of any employee to pursue any judicial, administrative,
or other action available with respect to an employer; (b) the right of
the department to pursue any judicial, administrative, or other action
available with respect to an employee that is identified as a result of
a wage complaint; or (c) the right of the department to pursue any
judicial, administrative, or other action available with respect to an
employer in the absence of a wage complaint. For purposes of this
subsection, "employee" means an employee other than an employee who has
filed a wage complaint with the department and who thereafter has
elected to terminate the department's administrative action as provided
in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 COLLECTION PROCEDURES. (1) After a final
order is issued under section 3 of this act, if an employer defaults in
the payment of: (a) Any wages determined by the department to be owed
to an employee, including interest; or (b) any civil penalty ordered by
the department under section 2 of this act, the director may file with
the clerk of any county within the state a warrant in the amount of the
payment plus any filing fees. The clerk of the county in which the
warrant is filed shall immediately designate a superior court cause
number for the warrant, and the clerk shall cause to be entered in the
judgment docket under the superior court cause number assigned to the
warrant, the name of the employer mentioned in the warrant, the amount
of payment due on it plus any filing fees, and the date when the
warrant was filed. The aggregate amount of the warrant as docketed
becomes a lien upon the title to, and interest in, all real and
personal property of the employer against whom the warrant is issued,
the same as a judgment in a civil case docketed in the office of the
clerk. The sheriff shall proceed upon the warrant in all respects and
with like effect as prescribed by law with respect to execution or
other process issued against rights or property upon judgment in a
court of competent jurisdiction. The warrant so docketed is sufficient
to support the issuance of writs of garnishment in favor of the state
in a manner provided by law in case of judgment, wholly or partially
unsatisfied. The clerk of the court is entitled to a filing fee which
will be added to the amount of the warrant. A copy of the warrant
shall be mailed to the employer within three days of filing with the
clerk.
(2)(a) The director may issue to any person, firm, corporation,
other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the
state, a public corporation, or any agency of the state, a notice and
order to withhold and deliver property of any kind when he or she has
reason to believe that there is in the possession of the person, firm,
corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision
of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state, property that
is or will become due, owing, or belonging to an employer upon whom a
notice of assessment has been served by the department for payments or
civil penalties due to the department. The effect of a notice and
order is continuous from the date the notice and order is first made
until the liability out of which the notice and order arose is
satisfied or becomes unenforceable because of lapse of time. The
department shall release the notice and order when the liability out of
which the notice and order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable
by reason of lapse of time and shall notify the person against whom the
notice and order was made that the notice and order has been released.
(b) The notice and order to withhold and deliver must be served by
the sheriff of the county or by the sheriff's deputy, by certified
mail, return receipt requested, or by the director. A person, firm,
corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision
of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state upon whom
service has been made shall answer the notice within twenty days
exclusive of the day of service, under oath and in writing, and shall
make true answers to the matters inquired of in the notice and order.
Upon service of the notice and order, if the party served possesses any
property that may be subject to the claim of the department, the party
shall promptly deliver the property to the director. The director
shall hold the property in trust for application on the employer's
indebtedness to the department, or for return without interest, in
accordance with a final determination of a petition for review. In the
alternative, the party shall furnish a good and sufficient surety bond
satisfactory to the director conditioned upon final determination of
liability. If a party served and named in the notice fails to answer
the notice within the time prescribed in this section, the court may
render judgment by default against the party for the full amount
claimed by the director in the notice, together with costs. If a
notice is served upon an employer and the property subject to it is
wages, the employer may assert in the answer all exemptions provided
for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which the wage earner is entitled.
(3) In addition to the procedure for collection of wages owed,
including interest, and civil penalties as set forth in this section,
the department may recover wages owed, including interest, and civil
penalties assessed under section 2 of this act in a civil action
brought in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county where the
violation is alleged to have occurred.
(4) This section does not affect other collection remedies that are
otherwise provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RULE-MAKING AUTHORITY. The director may
adopt rules to carry out the purposes of sections 1 through 5 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 CODIFICATION. Sections 1 through 6 of this
act are each added to chapter 49.48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are not
any part of the law.

--- END ---