BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Information" has its ordinary meaning and includes, but is not
limited to, any written, oral, pictorial, or electronically recorded
news or other data.
(2) "Medium of communication" includes any newspaper, magazine or
other periodical, book, news service, wire service, news or feature
syndicate, broadcast station or network, cable television system, or
internet news organization.
(3) "Processing" has its ordinary meaning and includes, but is not
limited to, the compiling, storing, and editing of information.
(4) "Published information" means any information disseminated to
the public.
(5) "Unpublished information" means any information not
disseminated to the public, whether or not related information has been
disseminated. "Unpublished information" includes, but is not limited
to, all notes, outtakes, photographs, tapes, or other data of whatever
sort not disseminated to the public through a medium of communication,
whether or not published information based upon or related to such
material has been disseminated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A person who, for the purpose of
gathering, receiving, or processing information, is connected with,
employed by, or engaged in a medium of communication that disseminates
information to the public, shall not be required by a legislative,
executive, or judicial officer or body, or any other authority having
power to compel testimony or the production of evidence, to disclose,
by subpoena or otherwise:
(a) The source of any published or unpublished information obtained
by the person in the course of gathering, receiving, or processing
information for a medium of communication that disseminates information
to the public; or
(b) Any unpublished information obtained or prepared by the person
in the course of gathering, receiving, or processing information for a
medium of communication that disseminates information to the public.
(2)(a)(i) The papers, effects, or work premises of a person
connected with, employed by, or engaged in any medium of communication
that disseminates information to the public shall not be subject to a
search by a legislative, executive, or judicial officer or body, or any
other authority having power to compel the production of evidence, by
search warrant or otherwise.
(ii) Third-party records that could be used to obtain the materials
in subsection (1) of this section or determine the identity of a
confidential source, such as credit card records, telephone billing
records, and airline records, of a person connected with, employed by,
or engaged in any medium of communication that disseminates information
to the public, shall not be subject to a search by a legislative,
executive, or judicial officer or body, or any other authority having
power to compel the production of evidence, by search warrant or
otherwise.
(b) The provisions of this subsection do not apply where probable
cause exists to believe that the person has committed, is committing,
or is about to commit a crime.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Section 2 of this act applies regardless
of whether a person has disclosed elsewhere any of the information
protected under section 2 of this act, or the source of any information
protected under section 2 of this act, or any related information.
(2) Section 2 of this act continues to apply in relation to any of
the information protected under section 2 of this act, or the source of
any information protected under section 2 of this act, or any related
information, even in the event of subsequent termination of a person's
connection with, employment by, or engagement in any medium of
communication that disseminates information to the public.
(3) The provisions of section 2(1) of this act do not apply to:
(a) The content or source of allegedly defamatory information in a
civil action for defamation where the defendant asserts a defense based
on the content or source of such information; and
(b) Physical evidence of a crime.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act does not apply to a governmental
entity or to an official or employee of a governmental entity while
engaged in official duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 5 RCW.

--- END ---