BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.240 and 1987 c 330 s 704 and 1987 c 142 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The vehicle license number plates shall be attached conspicuously
at the front and rear of each vehicle for which the same are issued and
in such a manner that they can be plainly seen and read at all times:
PROVIDED, That if only one license number plate is legally issued for
any vehicle such plate shall be conspicuously attached to the rear of
such vehicle. The operator of a vehicle is exempt from attaching a
vehicle license number plate at the front of the vehicle if the
operator agrees to pay a fee of seventy-five dollars to the department.
Each vehicle license number plate shall be placed or hung in a
horizontal position at a distance of not less than one foot nor more
than four feet from the ground and shall be kept clean so as to be
plainly seen and read at all times: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That in cases
where the body construction of the vehicle is such that compliance with
this section is impossible, permission to deviate therefrom may be
granted by the state patrol. It shall be unlawful to display upon the
front or rear of any vehicle, vehicle license number plate or plates
other than those furnished by the director for such vehicle or to
display upon any vehicle any vehicle license number plate or plates
which have been in any manner changed, altered, disfigured or have
become illegible. License plate frames may be used on vehicle license
number plates only if the frames do not obscure license tabs or
identifying letters or numbers on the plates and the plates can be
plainly seen and read at all times. It is unlawful to use any holders,
frames, or any materials that in any manner change, alter, or make the
vehicle license number plates illegible. It shall be unlawful for any
person to operate any vehicle unless there shall be displayed thereon
valid vehicle license number plates attached, with the exception of the
front license plate exemption, as herein provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The law enforcement vehicle theft account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from the front license plate exemption fee
under RCW 46.16.240, minus reasonable administrative costs, must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only
for fighting vehicle theft.

--- END ---