BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.72.020 and 1983 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the contract may provide for the partial reimbursement to the owner or
the owner's assigns for a period not to exceed fifteen years of a
portion of the costs of the project by other property owners who:
(((1))) (a) Are determined to be within the assessment
reimbursement area pursuant to RCW 35.72.040;
(((2))) (b) Are determined to have a reimbursement share based upon
a benefit to the property owner pursuant to RCW 35.72.030;
(((3))) (c) Did not contribute to the original cost of the street
project; and
(((4))) (d) Subsequently develop their property within the
((fifteen-year)) period of time that the contract is effective and at
the time of development were not required to install similar street
projects because they were already provided for by the contract.
Street projects subject to reimbursement may include design,
grading, paving, installation of curbs, gutters, storm drainage,
sidewalks, street lighting, traffic controls, and other similar
improvements, as required by the street standards of the city, town, or
county.
(2)(a) The contract may provide for an extension of the
fifteen-year reimbursement period for a time not to exceed the duration
of any moratorium, phasing ordinance, concurrency designation, or other
governmental action that prevents making applications for, or the
approval of, any new development within the benefit area for a period
of six months or more.
(b) Upon the extension of the reimbursement period pursuant to (a)
of this subsection, the contract must specify the duration of the
contract extension and must be filed and recorded with the county
auditor. Property owners who are subject to the reimbursement
obligations under subsection (1) of this section shall be notified by
the appropriate county, city, or town of the extension filed under this
subsection.
(3) Each contract shall include a provision requiring that every
two years from the date the contract is executed a property owner
entitled to reimbursement under this section provide the appropriate
county, city, or town with information regarding the current contract
name, address, and telephone number of the person, company, or
partnership that originally entered into the contract. If the property
owner fails to comply with the notification requirements of this
subsection within sixty days of the specified time, then the
contracting county, city, or town may collect any reimbursement funds
owed to the property owner under the contract. Such funds must be
deposited in the capital fund of the county, city, or town.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.91.020 and 1999 c 153 s 38 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, the
governing body of any city, town, county, water-sewer district, or
drainage district, hereinafter referred to as a "municipality" may
contract with owners of real estate for the construction of storm,
sanitary, or combination sewers, pumping stations, and disposal plants,
water mains, hydrants, reservoirs, or appurtenances, hereinafter called
"water or sewer facilities," within their boundaries or (except for
counties) within ten miles from their corporate limits connecting with
the public water or sewerage system to serve the area in which the real
estate of such owners is located, and to provide for a period of not to
exceed fifteen years for the reimbursement of such owners and their
assigns by any owner of real estate who did not contribute to the
original cost of such water or sewer facilities and who subsequently
tap onto or use the same of a fair pro rata share of the cost of the
construction of said water or sewer facilities, including not only
those directly connected thereto, but also users connected to laterals
or branches connecting thereto, subject to such reasonable rules and
regulations as the governing body of such municipality may provide or
contract, and notwithstanding the provisions of any other law.
(2)(a) The contract may provide for an extension of the
fifteen-year reimbursement period for a time not to exceed the duration
of any moratorium, phasing ordinance, concurrency designation, or other
governmental action that prevents making applications for, or the
approval of, any new development within the benefit area for a period
of six months or more.
(b) Upon the extension of the reimbursement period pursuant to (a)
of this subsection, the contract must specify the duration of the
contract extension and must be filed and recorded with the county
auditor. Property owners who are subject to the reimbursement
obligations under subsection (1) of this section shall be notified by
the contracting municipality of the extension filed under this
subsection.
(3) Each contract shall include a provision requiring that every
two years from the date the contract is executed a property owner
entitled to reimbursement under this section provide the contracting
municipality with information regarding the current contract name,
address, and telephone number of the person, company, or partnership
that originally entered into the contract. If the property owner fails
to comply with the notification requirements of this subsection within
sixty days of the specified time, then the contracting municipality may
collect any reimbursement funds owed to the property owner under the
contract. Such funds must be deposited in the capital fund of the
municipality.
(4) To the extent it may require in the performance of such
contract, such municipality may install said water or sewer facilities
in and along the county streets in the area to be served as hereinabove
provided, subject to such reasonable requirements as to the manner of
occupancy of such streets as the county may by resolution provide. The
provisions of such contract shall not be effective as to any owner of
real estate not a party thereto unless such contract has been recorded
in the office of the county auditor of the county in which the real
estate of such owner is located prior to the time such owner taps into
or connects to said water or sewer facilities.

Sec. 3 RCW 57.22.020 and 1996 c 230 s 802 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the contract shall also provide, subject to the terms and conditions in
this section, for the reimbursement to the owner or the owner's assigns
for a period not to exceed fifteen years of a portion of the costs of
the facilities constructed pursuant to such contract from connection
charges received by the district from other property owners who
subsequently connect to or use the facilities within the ((fifteen-year)) period of time that the contract is effective and who did not
contribute to the original cost of such facilities.
(2)(a) The contract may provide for an extension of the
fifteen-year reimbursement period for a time not to exceed the duration
of any moratorium, phasing ordinance, concurrency designation, or other
governmental action that prevents making applications for, or the
approval of, any new development for a period of six months or more
within the benefit area of the system extensions authorized under this
chapter.
(b) Upon the extension of the reimbursement period pursuant to (a)
of this subsection, the contract must specify the duration of the
contract extension and must be filed and recorded with the county
auditor. Property owners who are subject to the reimbursement
obligations under subsection (1) of this section shall be notified by
the water-sewer district of the extension filed under this subsection.
(3) Each contract shall include a provision requiring that every
two years from the date the contract is executed a property owner
entitled to reimbursement under this section provide the water-sewer
district with information regarding the current contract name, address,
and telephone number of the person, company, or partnership that
originally entered into the contract. If the property owner fails to
comply with the notification requirements of this subsection within
sixty days of the specified time, then the water-sewer district may
collect any reimbursement funds owed to the property owner under the
contract. Such funds must be deposited in the capital fund of the
water-sewer district.

--- END ---