BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.14.070 and 1955 c 131 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All oil and gas leases issued pursuant to this chapter ((shall
be upon a royalty of not less than twelve and one-half)) are subject to
a royalty. The royalty for each lease entered into under this chapter
must be established by the commissioner of public lands and represent
at least five percent, but no more than thirty percent of the gross
production of all oil, gas, or other hydrocarbons produced and saved
from the lands covered by ((such)) a lease issued under this chapter.
(2) In determining the royalty for leases under this section, the
commissioner must consider the remaining income to the owner after all
costs are considered, including normal risk and a fair rate of return.
The royalty adopted by the commissioner should ensure that the state of
Washington receives a fair share of the revenue from oil and gas
resources, while allowing the owner to maintain a large enough share of
the production to allow the owner to receive a reasonable return on the
investment.
(3)(a) The commissioner may, if deemed to be in the best interest
of the state, establish in leases entered into under this section
different royalty rates for:
(i) The recovery of different gas types;
(ii) The recovery of oil and gas from different fields, based on
the physical and geological characteristics of the field and the energy
content of the gasses in the field; and
(iii) The same well that changes over time, taking into account the
changes in resource quality and production ability over the life of the
well.
(b) The commissioner may determine different points in the recovery
process for measuring the royalty based on different recovery,
delivery, or production processes used by the producer.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.14.010 and 2003 c 334 s 471 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter, "public lands" means lands and areas
belonging to or held in trust by the state, including tide and
submerged lands of the Pacific Ocean or any arm thereof and lands of
every kind and nature including mineral rights reserved to the state.
All other terms used in this chapter have the meaning provided in RCW
78.52.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(2) "Gas" means natural gas and casinghead gas, or other gaseous
hydrocarbons from any lands or waters of this state, regardless of
whether it is produced from a gas well or from a well producing oil or
other liquid hydrocarbons.
(3) "Oil" means crude oil, condensate, distillate, or other oil, or
other liquid hydrocarbons extracted from any lands or waters of this
state, regardless of gravity.
(4) "Operating producer" means a producer who shares in the
production expenses of the severed product, and who conducts,
personally or by lease or contract, the daily operations of the
business of producing the product, including, but not limited to, the
sale of the product, receipt of proceeds of the sale, and the payment
of expenses.
(5) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(6) "Point of production" means:
(a) For oil, the point where it is severed and is first metered or
measured in a manner approved by the department;
(b) For gas recovered from or in association with oil, where it is
severed and is first metered or measured in a manner approved by the
department after separation from the oil; and
(c) For gas not recovered from or in association with oil, where it
is severed and is first metered or measured in a manner approved by the
department.
(7) "Producer" means any person having an economic interest in the
severed product, whether engaged in the business of producing or
extracting oil or gas or not, who has, as a result of the ownership of
such interests, a right to receive a part or all of the oil and gas
produced or has a right to receive all or a part of the proceeds of the
oil or gas severed. Such persons include, but are not limited to,
persons owning a royalty interest, an overriding royalty interest, a
working or operating interest, a net profit interest, or any
combination thereof, but does not include laborers or employees working
on or at the production site.
(8) "Severance" means the taking from the lands or waters of this
state of any oil and gas in any manner.
(9) "Value" means the fair market value of the oil or gas at the
time of severance and at the point of production.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) In addition to any other tax, an excise
tax is imposed upon the severance of oil and gas from any lands or
waters of this state, less the value of any part of the oil or gas, the
ownership or right to which is exempt from taxation under section 6 of
this act.
(2) The rate of the tax imposed shall be five percent.
(3) The measure of the tax is the value of the oil and gas at the
time and point of production.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The taxes imposed by this chapter on the
severance of oil and gas is the liability of the producer or producers.
The operating producer shall file the return with the department, shall
pay the tax due, and shall deduct and withhold the rateable share of
the tax from payments made to other producers in proportion to their
interest.
(2) If oil or gas on which the severance and conservation taxes are
due is not sold at the time of production but is retained by the
producer, the operating producer shall pay to the department the taxes
due with respect to the oil and gas severed but not sold and shall
deduct or withhold the rateable share of the tax from payments made to
other producers in proportion to their interest.
(3) The department may require taxes to be paid upon the basis of
the prevailing price being paid at the time and point of production of
other oil or gas of like kind, character, quality, or comparable source
when the value reported to the department does not represent the market
value of oil or gas sold or retained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following are exempt from the taxes
imposed under this chapter:
(1) The value of any oil or gas reinjected for storage, provided
that any subsequent removal of oil or gas produced in this state from
storage for sale, use, or other retention shall constitute a severance
within the meaning of this chapter; and
(2) The value of any oil or gas owned by a producer or producers
exempt from tax by reason of federal law or a compact negotiated by the
state with a tribal government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 All of chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the tax
imposed by this chapter. The department shall provide for the
effective administration of this chapter by rules which shall include,
but are not limited to, the value at the time and point of production
and a determination of metering methods, and measuring the severance of
oil and gas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department shall deposit amounts
collected by it under section 4 of this act to the energy freedom
account created in chapter . . . (Second Substitute House Bill No.
2393), Laws of 2006, or if chapter . . . (Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2393), Laws of 2006 is not enacted during the 2006 regular session,
the money must be distributed to the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 3 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 3 through 8 of this act take
effect January 1, 2007.

--- END ---