BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The northwest solar center, a program of
Washington State University's energy extension service, shall conduct
a feasibility assessment of the economic and technical viability of
building a large-scale, public-demonstration, solar electric generating
facility.
(2) The assessment should include the facility's economic
viability, costs and benefits to Washington state, including job
creation and environmental impacts, and its impact on the regional
energy. The center's assessment should also include an analysis of the
impact of this energy choice as compared to other energy generation
options.
(3) In conducting this assessment, the center shall make the
following assumptions about the facility:
(a) It will have a minimum capacity in the range of three hundred
megawatts;
(b) It will be constructed through a design-build contract that
requires the recipient to locate a solar thin film manufacturing
facility in Washington state;
(c) It will be developed by a public joint operating agency;
(d) It will be sited in a county with an existing large solar
electric generating facility;
(e) It will provide maximum production and deliver the power during
irrigation and air conditioning peaks;
(f) The construction of it will drive the market and result in
significant cost reductions;
(g) The state will offer incentives to reduce the costs of bonding
the project, such as state loan guarantees; and
(h) It will be expected to recover the cost of investment over the
life of the project.
(4) In conducting this assessment, the center must assemble and
work with a team of representatives from the department of community,
trade, and economic development, the Washington state public utility
district association, the Washington rural electric cooperative
association, the Bonneville power administration, the northwest power
and conservation council, the solar industry, local manufacturers,
national laboratories, the United States department of energy's thin
films program, and other stakeholders as determined essential by the
center.
(5) The assessment must be completed and a report summarizing the
findings prepared and delivered to the energy and fiscal committees of
the legislature by December 15, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---