BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that funding was
inadvertently provided for construction of a loop rail line in Lewis
county that had already been constructed. The legislature also finds
that funding should not be provided to projects that are already
complete and paid for when the funding can be provided to other
projects or activities to meet current needs.

Sec. 2 2005 c 313 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,269,000))
$65,269,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,603,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,027,000))
$68,027,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs
transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of
transportation.
(a) $5,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs
transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers shall be based on need,
including the availability of other providers of service in the area,
efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost
effectiveness of trips provided.
(b) $19,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons
with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit
agency must have a maintenance of effort for special needs
transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of
effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies
shall be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response
service and route deviated service in calendar year 2003 as reported in
the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2003" published by the
department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than
thirty percent of these distributions. The first $450,000 provided to
King county shall be used as follows:
(i) $320,000 shall be used to provide electric buses, instead of
diesel buses, for service on Capital Hill in Seattle, Washington
through June 30, 2007;
(ii) $130,000 shall be used to provide training for blind
individuals traveling through Rainier Valley and the greater Seattle
area. The training is to include destination training and retraining
due to the expected closure of the downtown bus tunnel and training on
how to use the Sound Transit light rail system.
(2) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the Summary of
Public Transportation - 2003 published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served or underserved by transit agencies through a
competitive grant process.
(3) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (a)
Public transit agencies to add vanpools; and (b) incentives for
employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for
public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; no operating
costs for public transit agencies are eligible for funding under this
grant program. No additional employees may be hired from the funds
provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and supplanting
of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed. Additional
criteria for selecting grants must include leveraging funds other than
state funds.
(4) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the city of Seattle for the
Seattle streetcar project on South Lake Union. Should the city receive
any state funds for this purpose during the 2003-05 or 2005-07
biennium, the amount provided in this subsection must be reduced
accordingly.
(5) $1,200,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2124. If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2124 is not enacted by June 30, 2005, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6) Pursuant to the grant program established in Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2124, the department shall issue a call for
projects and/or service proposals. Applications must be received by
the department by November 1, 2005, and November 1, 2006. The
department must submit a prioritized list for funding to the
transportation committees of the legislature that reflects the
department's recommendation, as well as, a list of all project or
service proposals received.
(7) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for new tri-county connection service
for Island, Skagit, and Whatcom transit agencies.
(8) $2,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to King county as a state match to
obtain federal funding for a car sharing program for persons meeting
certain income or employment criteria.
(9) $3,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for projects and activities that
provide safe routes to schools.

Sec. 3 2005 c 313 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL
Essential Rail Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,158,000))
$64,158,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,287,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,966,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,161,000))
$85,161,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The multimodal transportation account -- state appropriation
includes $33,435,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds and $830,000 in
unexpended bond proceeds authorized by RCW 47.10.867. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues
available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.
(2) If federal block grant funding for freight or passenger rail is
received, the department shall consult with the transportation
committees of the legislature prior to spending the funds on additional
projects.
(3)(a) (($67,158,000)) $64,158,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation, $11,966,000 of the multimodal
transportation account-- federal appropriation, $8,287,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--local appropriation, and $250,000 of
the essential rail assistance account are provided solely for the
projects and activities as listed by fund, project and amount in LEAP
Transportation Document ((2005-2)) 2006-2, Rail Capital Program (Y) as
developed ((April 23, 2005)) March 9, 2006. However, limited transfers
of allocations between projects may occur for those amounts listed
subject to the conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act.
(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $6,500,000 of
the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided
solely for the two commuter rail projects listed in the LEAP
Transportation Document 2005-6, Rail Capital Program (Y) as developed
April 24, 2005.
(4) If the department issues a call for projects, applications must
be received by the department by November 1, 2005, and November 1,
2006.
(5) $50,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a study of eastern Skagit county
freight rail. The study shall examine the feasibility of restoring
portions of freight rail line to the towns of Lyman, Hamilton, and
Concrete. The study must also identify existing and potential
industrial sites available for development and redevelopment, and the
freight rail service needs of the identified industrial sites.

--- END ---