BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a public utility district constructs or operates a
hydroelectric project or power generation facility on the Columbia
river, and the facility is located in a distressed county as defined in
RCW 43.160.220 with less than twenty-five percent of its land mass
subject to local property taxes, the public utility district shall
negotiate an agreement with the county in which the project or facility
is located. The purpose of the agreement is for the county and the
public utility district to share in the reasonable benefits derived
from the facility.
(2) Within one hundred twenty days of the effective date of this
section, the county and the public utility district must reach a
reasonable agreement. If an agreement cannot be reached, then the
issue must be submitted to arbitration pursuant to chapter 7.04A RCW.
The county, the public utility district, and the governor shall
participate in the arbitration proceeding. The arbitrator or
arbitrator panel must reach a final decision within sixty days.

--- END ---