BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.86 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A business entity that uses paper bills to charge customers for
services provided must provide a customer with one paper copy of the
customer's regular bill each billing cycle at no additional cost to the
customer.
(2) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this
section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying this chapter. A violation of this section is not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business
and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair
method of competition for the purpose of applying this chapter.

--- END ---