BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 DECLARATION--PURPOSE. (1) It is declared to
be the public policy of the state of Washington to promote and
facilitate community and economic development of its communities.
Community and economic development and renewal is found to be in the
interest of and a benefit to all local taxing districts. In
furtherance of this, local governments need the ability to finance
specific public improvements that encourage community and economic
development in both rural and urban areas characterized by high levels
of unemployment and stagnant employment and income growth. The
construction of necessary public improvements and the redevelopment of
depressed areas in accordance with local economic development and
growth management plans will benefit all local taxing districts,
encourage investment in job-producing private development, and expand
the public tax base for all local taxing districts.
(2) It is the purpose of this chapter:
(a) To encourage local taxing districts to cooperate in and
contribute tax revenues to the financing of public improvements that
will encourage private development and community renewal in selected
areas;
(b) To assist those local governments that have a competitive
disadvantage in attracting business, private investment, or commercial
development due to its location near a state or international border;
and
(c) To prevent or arrest the decay of selected areas due to the
inability of existing financial methods to provide needed public
improvements and community development, and to encourage private
investment designed to promote and facilitate the orderly redevelopment
of selected areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Assessed value" shall have the meaning given in RCW 84.04.030.
(2) "Community improvement district" means a district created
pursuant to this chapter.
(3) "Increment value" means the assessed value of property for the
relevant levy year less the tax allocation base value for that
property.
(4) "Local government" means any city, town, county, or port
district.
(5) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(6) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Publicly owned infrastructure improvements including without
limitation:
(i) Street, road, and other transportation facilities construction
and maintenance;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;
(iii) Sidewalks and streetlights;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Transit facility construction and maintenance, including park
and ride facilities;
(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas;
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems;
(viii) Any housing project as defined in RCW 35.82.020;
(ix) To the extent not already described in this subsection, any
project that is a community renewal project as set forth in RCW
35.81.015; and
(b) Expenditures for any of the following purposes:
(i) Historic preservation activities authorized under RCW
35.21.395;
(ii) Housing for "persons of low income" as defined in RCW
35.82.020; or
(iii) Any costs of carrying out a community renewal plan under
chapter 35.81 RCW.
(7) "Public improvement costs" means the costs of: (a) Design,
planning, acquisition, site preparation, construction, reconstruction,
rehabilitation, improvement, and installation of public improvements;
(b) relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending
construction of public improvements; (c) relocating utilities as a
result of public improvements; (d) financing public improvements,
including interest during construction, legal and other professional
services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs on general
indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any necessary
reserves for general indebtedness; (e) administrative costs incurred in
determining the tax allocation base value and the increment value, to
the extent that such costs are in excess of costs normally incurred by
the assessor in accordance with the revaluation plan under chapter
84.41 RCW, and the administrative costs of allocating taxes and
complying with this chapter and other applicable law; (f)
administrative expenses and feasibility studies reasonably necessary
and related to these costs, including related costs that may have been
incurred before adoption of the ordinance authorizing the public
improvements and the use of community improvement financing to fund the
costs of the public improvements; and (g) expenses of carrying out a
community renewal plan under chapter 35.81 RCW.
(8) "Local regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as
defined in RCW 84.04.140, except regular property taxes levied by the
state for the support of the common schools under RCW 84.52.065.
(9) "Tax allocation base value" means the assessed value of real
property located within a community improvement district as determined
for the calendar year in which the ordinance creating the community
improvement district is adopted.
(10) "Tax allocation revenues" means an amount equal to seventy-five percent of the total revenues derived from the levy of local
regular property taxes on the increment value within a community
improvement district.
(11) "Local taxing district" means any taxing district, as defined
in RCW 84.04.120, that levies or has levied for it, local regular
property taxes upon real property located within a proposed or approved
community improvement district. "Local taxing district" does not
include the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 AUTHORITY--CONDITIONS. A local government
may finance public improvements using community improvement district
financing if the following conditions are met:
(1) The local government must adopt an ordinance that complies with
section 5 of this act, designating a community improvement district
within its boundaries and specifying the public improvements proposed
to be financed in whole or in part with the use of community
improvement financing;
(2) The boundaries of the community improvement district:
(a) Shall include, as near as may be determined in the sole
discretion of the local government, only such properties as are
reasonably expected to increase in assessed value as a result of the
public improvements identified in subsection (3) of this section,
provided that a community improvement district may include all or any
part of a community renewal area created under chapter 35.81 RCW;
(b) Shall consist of contiguous tracts, lots, or parcels of land
which, in the aggregate, comprise no more than twenty-five percent of
the total assessed value of taxable real property within the boundaries
of the local government creating the community improvement district;
and
(c) Shall not be subject to challenge by any local taxing district
or subject to review by a boundary review board;
(3) The local government must find that public improvements
proposed to be financed in whole or in part using community improvement
district financing are expected to encourage private development within
the community improvement district and to increase the assessed value
of real property within the community improvement district;
(4) The local government must obtain assurances, through
development agreements or other permitting processes, that all private
development that is anticipated to occur within the community
improvement district, as a result of the public improvements, will be
consistent with the growth management plan or plans applicable to the
area within the community improvement district and the community
renewal plan adopted under RCW 35.81.060;
(5) At least twenty percent of the public improvements proposed to
be financed must be housing for "persons of low income," as defined in
RCW 35.82.020, and the housing is to be located either within or
without the community improvement district; and
(6) No community improvement district may include territory that is
within any other community improvement district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 ADMINISTRATION--COORDINATION WITH OTHER
PROGRAMS--IMPROVEMENTS BY PRIVATE DEVELOPER MUST MEET APPLICABLE STATE
AND LOCAL LAWS. (1) A local government may use community improvement
district financing in coordination with other programs or efforts
undertaken by the local government alone, or in cooperation with other
local taxing districts, and may be funded in part from revenue sources
other than community improvement financing.
(2) A local government that creates a community improvement
district may itself administer the functions of the community
improvement district or may elect to have such functions administered
by a community renewal agency appointed by the local government, or by
a public development authority created by the local government under
RCW 35.21.730. Appointment of an administrator shall be by ordinance
that includes a finding that the action is in the public interest and
describes the extent of the appointment. In the event the local
governing body elects to appoint an administrator, all subsequent
community improvement plans and community improvement public
improvements must be approved by the local government in such manner as
the local government may specify. In addition, a local government may
provide by interlocal contract that powers relating to a community
improvement district may be exercised jointly under chapter 39.34 RCW
in accordance with the terms of that interlocal contract, including
being exercised by an entity created pursuant to RCW 39.34.030.
(3) Public improvements within a community improvement district
that are constructed, improved, developed, or redeveloped by a private
developer must meet all applicable state and local laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 PROCEDURE FOR CREATING A COMMUNITY
IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT. (1) Before adopting an ordinance creating a
community improvement district, a local government shall:
(a) Obtain written agreement for the use of community improvement
financing that is entered into by local taxing districts whose local
regular property tax levies, in the aggregate, account for at least
seventy-five percent of the local regular property tax revenues
collected within the community improvement district. The agreement
shall constitute concurrence by each local taxing district having
territory within the community improvement district that the specified
public improvements in the proposed community improvement district will
benefit the taxpayers of each such local taxing district.
(b) Hold a public hearing, notice of which must be published at
least once, in a newspaper of general circulation within each local
taxing district having territory within the proposed community
improvement district, at least ten days before the public hearing and
posted in at least three conspicuous public places located in the
proposed community improvement district. The notice must describe the
specified public improvements, estimate the costs of the public
improvements, describe the portion of the costs of the public
improvements to be borne by community improvement financing, describe
any other sources of revenue to finance the public improvements,
describe the boundaries of the proposed community improvement district,
and estimate the period during which community improvement financing is
contemplated to be used. The public hearing may be held either by the
entire governing body of the local government or by a committee of the
governing body. The public hearing shall provide members of the public
and representatives of all local taxing districts the opportunity to
comment on the proposed formation of the community improvement
district.
(2) The ordinance establishing the community improvement district
shall describe the public improvements, describe the boundaries of the
community improvement district, estimate the cost of the public
improvements and the portion of these costs to be financed by community
improvement district financing, estimate the length of time for which
local regular property taxes are to be allocated, and provide the date
when the allocation of the local regular property taxes will commence,
and find that the conditions of section 3 of this act are met.
(3) A community improvement district shall be created upon adoption
of an ordinance described in this section and the publication of notice
required under section 6 of this act in accordance with the following:
(a) For a community improvement district for which the formation
ordinance was adopted on or before September 30th of any given calendar
year, the community improvement district shall be established as of
January 1st of the upcoming calendar year; and
(b) For a community improvement district for which the formation
ordinance was adopted on or after October 1st of any given calendar
year, the community improvement district shall be established as of
January 1st of the year following the upcoming calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 PUBLIC NOTICE--CONCLUSIVE PRESUMPTION OF
VALIDITY. (1) Upon formation of a community improvement district, the
local government shall:
(a) Publish notice in a legal newspaper of general circulation
within the community improvement district that describes the public
improvements, describes the boundaries of the community improvement
district, and identifies the location and times where the ordinance
forming the community improvement district and other public information
concerning the public improvements may be inspected; and
(b) Deliver a certified copy of the formation ordinance to the
county treasurer, the county assessor, and the governing body of each
local taxing district having territory within the community improvement
district.
(2) No direct or collateral attack on a public improvement,
community improvement district formation ordinance, or community
improvement district purported to be authorized or created in
conformance with applicable legal requirements, including this chapter,
may be commenced more than thirty days after publication of notice as
required by subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 ALLOCATION OF TAXES. (1) Commencing in the
calendar year during which a community improvement district is first
established in accordance with section 5(3) of this act, the county
treasurer, or county treasurers, if a community improvement district
extends to more than a single county, shall allocate receipts from
local regular property taxes levied on real property located within the
community improvement district as follows:
(a) Each local taxing district, including the local government that
created the community improvement district, shall receive an amount
equal to: (i) The local taxing district's levy rate multiplied by the
tax allocation base value of the property located within the local
taxing district, plus (ii) twenty-five percent of the local taxing
district's levy rate multiplied by the increment value of the property
located within the local taxing district; and
(b) The local government that created the community improvement
district shall receive the tax allocation revenues for deposit into the
community improvement district funds and accounts. However, if the
local government that created the community improvement district
determines that the full amount of the tax allocation revenues is not
necessary to satisfy any and all pledges, obligations, and covenants of
the district, it may by ordinance direct the county treasurer to
allocate to the district less than the full amount of the tax
allocation revenues. In such case, the balance of tax receipts from
the community improvement district shall be reallocated to the local
taxing districts in accordance with their local regular property tax
levies. The tax receipts deposited into the community improvement
district funds and accounts under this subsection (1)(b) may be
expended solely to finance public improvement costs.
(2) Upon receipt of a formation ordinance for a community
improvement district under section 6 of this act, the county assessor,
or assessors, if the district extends to more than a single county,
shall determine and notify each local taxing district of the tax
allocation base value for all property within that taxing district that
is also within the community improvement district. Thereafter, for as
long as the community improvement district exists, the county assessor,
or assessors, shall annually calculate the increment value for the
property by subtracting the tax allocation base value from the assessed
value. This section does not authorize revaluations of real property
by the assessor for property taxation that are not made in accordance
with the assessor's revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW or under
other authorized revaluation procedures.
(3) The county treasurer and assessor shall continue to perform the
duties described in this section until tax allocation revenues are no
longer necessary or obligated to pay the costs of the public
improvements, as determined by ordinance of the local government in
accordance with section 10 of this act. However, no community
improvement district shall continue to exist, and no allocation of tax
allocation revenues within a community improvement district shall
continue, for a period longer than thirty years after taxes are first
allocated under this chapter.
(4) The allocation to the community improvement district of
portions of the local regular property taxes levied by or for each
local taxing district upon the increment value within that community
improvement district, is declared to be a public purpose of and benefit
to each such local taxing district.
(5) The allocation of tax allocation revenues pursuant to this
section shall not affect or be deemed to affect the rate of taxes
levied by or within any local taxing district or the consistency of any
such levies with the uniformity requirement of Article VII, section 1
of the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 GENERAL INDEBTEDNESS--SECURITY. (1) In
order to finance the public improvements and retire the indebtedness in
whole or in part from tax allocation revenues it receives, a local
government, whether or not it is the local government that created the
community improvement district, may authorize and issue general
obligation bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness not
exceeding an amount, together with any existing indebtedness of the
community improvement district, equal to one and one-half percent of
the value of the taxable property within the boundaries of the local
government.
(2) The obligations issued under subsection (1) of this section may
be payable from tax allocation revenues and from other tax revenues or
the full faith and credit of the local government if the legislative
authority of the local government pledges such tax revenues or its full
faith and credit. The obligations issued under subsection (1) of this
section may also be secured by nontax income, revenues, fees, and rents
from the public improvements, as well as contributions, grants, and
nontax money available to the community improvement district for
payment of costs of the public improvements or associated debt service
on the general obligation indebtedness. A community improvement
district may also accept gifts or grants of money or property of any
kind for the same purposes for which it is authorized to borrow money
in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) In addition to the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, a local government may, in connection with the use of
community improvement financing, require any nonpublic participant to
provide adequate security to protect the public investment in the
public improvement within the community improvement district.
(4) Bonds authorized under this section may be issued and sold in
accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 REVENUE BONDS. (1) A local government,
whether or not it is the local government that created the community
improvement district, a community renewal agency, or a public
development authority may issue revenue bonds to fund public
improvements, or portions of public improvements, that are located
within a community improvement district that it is authorized to
provide or operate. Whenever revenue bonds are to be issued, the
legislative authority of the local government shall create or have
created a special fund or funds from which, along with any reserves,
the principal of and interest on these revenue bonds shall exclusively
be payable. The legislative authority of the local government may
obligate the local government to set aside and pay into the special
fund or funds a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of tax allocation
revenues pledged to be transferred to the local government from the
community improvement district and other revenues available to the
community improvement district. This amount or proportion shall be a
lien and charge against those revenues. The local government may also
provide that revenue bonds payable out of the same source or sources of
revenue may later be issued on a parity with any revenue bonds being
issued and sold. Revenue bonds issued under this section that are
issued by an entity other than a local taxing district may pledge tax
allocation revenues that have been made available to it for community
improvement district purposes.
(2) Revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section shall not be
considered an indebtedness of a local government or other entity
issuing the bonds unless the local government expressly pledges its
full faith, credit, and taxing power to the repayment of the bonds.
The principal of and interest on the bonds shall, unless that full
faith and credit pledge has been expressly provided, be payable solely
from the revenues lawfully pledged to meet the principal and interest
requirements and providing for any required reserves and the owner of
any such revenue bond issued shall not have any claim against the local
government arising from the bond except for payment from the revenues
lawfully pledged to meet the principal and interest requirements and
any required reserves.
(3) The legislative authority of the local government shall by
ordinance determine for each revenue bond issued the amount, date,
form, terms, conditions, denominations, maximum fixed or variable
interest rate or rates, maturity or maturities, redemption rights,
registration privileges, manner of execution, manner of sale, callable
provisions, if any, and covenants including the refunding of existing
revenue bonds. Facsimile signatures may be used on the bonds and any
coupons. Refunding revenue bonds may be issued in the same manner as
revenue bonds are issued. Notwithstanding the forgoing, bonds may be
issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 DISSOLUTION OF COMMUNITY IMPROVEMENT
DISTRICT. A community improvement district may be dissolved by
ordinance of the local government which created that community
improvement district, when all obligations, including all indebtedness
to which community improvement district revenues are pledged, have been
discharged and all other contractual obligations of the community
improvement district have been discharged or assumed by another
governmental entity. Each community improvement district shall be
dissolved on or before December 31st of the year that is thirty years
after the first year in which it received tax allocation revenues.
Any amounts remaining in the funds and accounts of the community
improvement district at the time of its dissolution shall be
transferred to the county treasurer and then allocated to the local
taxing district that imposed local regular property taxes, or had local
regular property taxes imposed for it, in the community improvement
district for collection that year, in proportion to their current levy
rates.

Sec. 11 RCW 84.55.010 and 1997 c 3 s 202 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in this chapter, the levy for a taxing district
in any year shall be set so that the regular property taxes payable in
the following year shall not exceed the limit factor multiplied by the
amount of regular property taxes lawfully levied for such district in
the highest of the three most recent years in which such taxes were
levied for such district plus an additional dollar amount calculated by
multiplying the increase in assessed value in that district resulting
from new construction, improvements to property, any increase in
assessed value of property within a community improvement district
created under chapter 39.-- RCW (sections 1 through 10 and 12 of this
act), and any increase in the assessed value of state-assessed property
by the regular property tax levy rate of that district for the
preceding year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 SUPPLEMENTAL NATURE OF CHAPTER. This
chapter supplements and neither restricts nor limits any powers which
the state or any local government might otherwise have under any laws
of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 10 and 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

--- END ---