BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79.135 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall implement a pilot program to test the
effectiveness of planting geoducks on state aquatic lands located in
the aquatic rehabilitation zone established in RCW 90.88.010(2). The
pilot program may be on appropriate state subtidal and intertidal lands
including lands managed by the department and the state parks and
recreation commission. The program must be developed and implemented
in consultation with the department of fish and wildlife. The program
must be designed to use test plantings and monitoring of geoduck
populations on test sites to determine if harvestable populations may
be achieved in a manner that will maintain healthy geoduck populations,
reestablish geoduck populations in areas affected by low-dissolved
oxygen levels, and increase revenues over that achievable from natural
regeneration. The department shall design the test program to compare
geoduck populations of the test sites with other sites in the aquatic
rehabilitation zone established in RCW 90.88.010(2) providing
comparable growing conditions. The department may contract with
geoduck harvesters licensed in accordance with chapter 77.65 RCW to
plant the seed and to monitor geoduck populations on the test sites.
In conducting the pilot program, the department shall work with school
districts, veterans organizations, and other interested groups to
actively involve and educate citizens regarding the environmental
issues in Hood Canal and the role geoducks play in the ecosystem.
(2) The program must be designed to test geoduck populations and
growth rates for a period of at least five years. No later than
December 31, 2011, the department shall report the results of the
program to the appropriate committees of the legislature and make
recommendations as to whether the program should be expanded, otherwise
modified, or terminated.

--- END ---