BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that citizens and
businesses are experiencing extensive damage from winter floods. The
legislature further finds that federal disaster assistance programs and
other forms of disaster relief are not always available to assist those
in need. The uncertainty of federal assistance and the part-time
nature of the legislature necessitates the immediate creation of a
flood damage relief program. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to create a state program for flood damage assistance and
relief to help Washington citizens protect their homes, businesses, and
communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall
establish a flood damage relief program to provide financial assistance
to individuals, businesses, and local governments that have experienced
flood damage. The department shall establish criteria for awarding
grants for emergency repair and cleanup activities as a result of flood
damage. The criteria includes, but is not limited to:
(1) The availability of other sources of financial assistance
including other state or federal disaster assistance;
(2) The extent of the damage;
(3) Matching funds that may be available; and
(4) The financial need of the applicant.

Sec. 3 2005 c 488 s 324 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
State Drought Preparedness (05-4-009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for
response to the statewide drought that was declared pursuant to chapter
43.83B RCW. The department of ecology may provide funding or
compensation for purchase or lease of water rights and to public bodies
as defined in RCW 43.83B.050 in connection with projects and measures
designed to alleviate drought conditions which may affect: Public
health and safety; drinking water supplies; agricultural activities; or
fish and wildlife survival.
(2) Projects or measures for which funding or compensation will be
provided must be connected with a water system, water source, or water
body which is receiving, or has been projected to receive, less than
seventy-five percent of normal water supply, as the result of natural
drought conditions. This reduction in water supply must be such that
it is causing, or will cause, undue hardship for the entities or fish
or wildlife depending on the water supply. General criteria for
guidelines to be established by the department of ecology for
distribution of funds must include: A balanced and equitable
distribution of the funds among the different sectors affected by
drought; a funding process that ensures funds are available for drought
impacts that arise both early and later during the course of the
drought; and preference for projects that leverage other federal and
local funds.
(3) Up to $1,500,000 of the reappropriation in this section is
provided to the Roza irrigation district for the purchase or lease of
water rights.

Reappropriation:
State Drought Preparedness Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,200,000))
$7,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,200,000))
$7,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of one million six hundred thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2007, from the state drought preparedness
account to the department of community, trade, and economic development
for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---