BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 2 through 6 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Parent" means a parent, guardian, or other person having legal
custody of a child.
(2) "Sex education curriculum" means any audio or visual
presentation, curriculum, handout, illustration, literature, poster,
survey, test, or text to be used in the instruction of human sexuality.
(3) "Instruction" means an assignment, demonstration, depiction,
discussion, dissemination, display, explanation, posting, presentation,
question, survey, or test.
(4) "Human sexuality" means the anatomy and physiology of human
reproduction and the characteristics or qualities that distinguish
between human maleness and femaleness, including the physiological,
psychological, and sociological processes experienced by an individual
with regard to sexual development.
(5) "Separate written notice" means a separate written advisory
that instruction regarding human sexuality will be provided.
(6) "Public school setting" includes any school-sponsored activity
involving an employee, contractor, volunteer, or agent of a school
district, regardless of its location.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A school district shall not provide
instruction relating to human sexuality to students in grades five
through twelve, inclusive, without first providing notice to the
students' parents as required by section 3 of this act.
(2) Instruction relating to human sexuality shall not be provided
to, or in the presence of, students in kindergarten or grades one to
four, inclusive, in a public school setting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) If a school district intends to provide
or permit instruction in a public school setting to, or in the presence
of, a student in grades five to twelve, inclusive, relating to human
sexuality the school district shall provide separate written notice as
described in section 3 of this act to the parent or guardian of the
student no less than thirty days in advance of the instruction, and
shall obtain the prior written approval of the student's parent or
guardian consenting to the instruction.
(2) The notice required by this section shall be titled "Request
for Parental Approval of Sexual Instruction." The title shall be
printed at the top of the page, in boldface and no less than 16-point
type, and shall be immediately followed by the text of sections 2 and
5 of this act in no less than 14-point type. The notice shall include
all of the following information printed in no less than 12-point type:
(a) The date, time, and location of the instruction; (b) the name of
the teacher or administrator in charge of the instruction, and the name
and affiliation of any presenters; (c) the telephone number at which
the teacher or administrator in charge may be reached during regular
school hours; (d) a reminder that parents and guardians may attend the
class or assembly; and (e) a detailed and accurate description of the
instruction to be provided, including, but not limited to, the scope
and content of any activity, counseling, instruction, program, or
testimonial.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The school district shall keep its sex
education curriculum in the following locations:
(a) The school district's office, out-of-sight of students; and
(b) The school district's web site, if the school district
maintains a web site.
(2) The sex education curriculum shall be available for inspection
and copying by any parent, guardian, or agent of the parent or guardian
of a student beginning at least thirty days in advance of, and for at
least thirty days after, the instruction. The school district shall
retain the original written approval required pursuant to section 3 of
this act for at least ninety days and shall allow a parent, guardian,
or agent of the parent or guardian to inspect and copy the written
approval submitted by that parent or guardian upon request. A school
district may charge a reasonable fee to cover costs associated with
copying.
(3) The school district shall submit any sex education curriculum
to the office of the superintendent of public instruction within thirty
days of offering such instruction. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall maintain such materials submitted to it for no
less than two calendar years, and shall make such materials available
for public inspection and copying upon request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If a parent or guardian of a student does
not provide written approval pursuant to section 3 of this act, the
student shall be excused from the instruction, and offered other
activities worth equal credit. No act or procedure may be required of
a parent or guardian to excuse a student from that portion of the
planned curriculum that concerns human sexuality. A student may not be
academically penalized if his or her parent or guardian does not
provide written approval pursuant to section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A school district found to be in violation
of section 2, 3, 4, or 5 of this act by a court of competent
jurisdiction is liable to the student or the parent or guardian of the
student for damages in the amount of one hundred dollars per incident,
for actions filed before December 31, 2008. Beginning January 1, 2008,
the amount of damages shall be adjusted annually by an inflation factor
based on the change in the Seattle-Tacoma-Bremerton consumer price
index for all urban consumers. In any action brought under this
section, the school district has the burden of proving by a
preponderance of the evidence that it complied with the notice and
written approval required by section 3 of this act. A prevailing
plaintiff is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 28A.230 RCW.

--- END ---