BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any taxing district imposing a motor vehicle excise tax must
use the depreciation schedule set forth in this section. The taxable
value equals the product of a percentage based on a vehicle's year of
service as provided in subsection (2) of this section, and the market
value of the vehicle.
(2) For the purpose of determining the tax due under this chapter,
the value of a truck-type power or trailing unit, or motor vehicle,
including a passenger vehicle, motorcycle, motor home, sport-utility
vehicle, or light-duty truck shall be the market value of the vehicle,
excluding applicable federal excise taxes, state and local sales or use
taxes, transportation or shipping costs, or preparatory or delivery
costs, multiplied by the following percentage based on year of service
of the vehicle since its most recent sale. The year in which a
purchase occurs shall be considered the first year of service.

Year of Service Percentage

1 100%

2 75%

3 60%

4 50%

5 40%

6 30%

7 20%

8 10%

9 and over 5%

(3) The reissuance of title and registration for a truck-type power
or trailing unit or motor vehicle, including a passenger vehicle,
motorcycle, sport-utility vehicle, or a light-duty truck shall be
treated as a sale, and the latest purchase price of the truck-type
power or trailing unit or motor vehicle, including a passenger vehicle,
motorcycle, sport-utility vehicle, or a light-duty truck at that time,
as determined by the department from such information as may be
available, shall be considered its base value.
(4) If the purchase price is unavailable or otherwise
unascertainable or the reissuance of title and registration is the
result of a gift or inheritance, the department shall determine a value
equivalent to the latest purchase price, by using any information that
may be available, including any guidebook, report, or compendium of
recognized standing in the automotive industry or the selling price and
year of sale of the vehicle. The department may use an appraisal by
the county assessor. In valuing a vehicle for which the current value
or selling price is not indicative of the value of similar vehicles of
the same year and model, the department shall establish a value that
more closely represents the average value of similar vehicles of the
same year and model.
(5) For purposes of this chapter, "value" does not mean value
attributable to modifications of a motor vehicle and equipment that are
designed to facilitate the use or operation of the motor vehicle by a
disabled person.
(6) For purposes of this section, "market value" means the latest
purchase price.

--- END ---