BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.143.010 and 1997 c 152 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of this chapter is to articulate policies and
establish guidelines for the exercise of state and local management
authority over Washington's coastal waters, seabed, and shorelines.
(2) There shall be no leasing of Washington's tidal or submerged
lands extending from mean high tide seaward three miles along the
Washington coast from Cape Flattery south to Cape Disappointment, nor
in Grays Harbor, Willapa Bay, and the Columbia river downstream from
the Longview bridge, for purposes of oil or gas exploration,
development, or production.
(3) There shall be a ten-year moratorium beginning on the effective
date of this act on the siting, construction, or operation of liquified
natural gas terminals within the coastal areas described in subsection
(2) of this section. For purposes of this section, "liquified natural
gas terminals" includes all natural gas facilities located onshore or
in state waters that are used to receive, unload, load, store,
transport, gasify, liquefy, or process natural gas that is imported to
the United States from a foreign country, exported to a foreign country
from the United States, or transported in interstate commerce by
waterborne vessels, but does not include waterborne vessels used to
deliver natural gas to or from any such facility or any pipeline or
storage facility subject to the jurisdiction of the federal energy
regulatory commission.
(4) When conflicts arise among uses and activities, priority shall
be given to resource uses and activities that will not adversely impact
renewable resources over uses which are likely to have an adverse
impact on renewable resources.
(((4))) (5) It is the policy of the state of Washington to actively
encourage the conservation of liquid fossil fuels, and to explore
available methods of encouraging such conservation.
(((5))) (6) It is not currently the intent of the legislature to
include recreational uses or currently existing commercial uses
involving fishing or other renewable marine or ocean resources within
the uses and activities which must meet the planning and review
criteria set forth in RCW 43.143.030. It is not the intent of the
legislature, however, to permanently exclude these uses from the
requirements of RCW 43.143.030. If information becomes available which
indicates that such uses should reasonably be covered by the
requirements of RCW 43.143.030, the permitting government or agency may
require compliance with those requirements, and appeals of that
decision shall be handled through the established appeals procedure for
that permit or approval.
(((6))) (7) The state shall participate in federal ocean and marine
resource decisions to the fullest extent possible to ensure that the
decisions are consistent with the state's policy concerning the use of
those resources.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.58.160 and 1971 ex.s. c 286 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Surface drilling for oil or gas is prohibited in the waters of
Puget Sound north to the Canadian boundary and the Strait of Juan de
Fuca seaward from the ordinary high water mark and on all lands within
one thousand feet landward from said mark.
(2) There shall be a ten-year moratorium beginning on the effective
date of this act on the siting, construction, or operation of liquified
natural gas terminals within the coastal areas described in subsection
(1) of this section. For purposes of this section, "liquified natural
gas terminals" includes all natural gas facilities located onshore or
in state waters that are used to receive, unload, load, store,
transport, gasify, liquefy, or process natural gas that is imported to
the United States from a foreign country, exported to a foreign country
from the United States, or transported in interstate commerce by
waterborne vessels, but does not include waterborne vessels used to
deliver natural gas to or from any such facility or any pipeline or
storage facility subject to the jurisdiction of the federal energy
regulatory commission.

--- END ---