BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
After December 31, 2006, a health carrier that issues a card
identifying a person as an enrollee must include the amount of any
copayment that can be required of the enrollee upon the card.

--- END ---