BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.09.098 and 2001 c 286 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any service provider submitting reports pursuant to RCW
71.09.096(6), the supervising community corrections officer, the
prosecuting attorney, or the attorney general may petition the court,
or the court on its own motion may schedule an immediate hearing, for
the purpose of revoking or modifying the terms of the person's
conditional release to a less restrictive alternative if the petitioner
or the court believes the released person is not complying with the
terms and conditions of his or her release or is in need of additional
care, monitoring, supervision, or treatment.
(2) If the prosecuting attorney, the supervising community
corrections officer, or the court, based upon information received by
them, reasonably believes that a conditionally released person is not
complying with the terms and conditions of his or her conditional
release to a less restrictive alternative, the court or community
corrections officer may order that the conditionally released person be
apprehended and taken into custody until such time as a hearing can be
scheduled to determine the facts and whether or not the person's
conditional release should be revoked or modified. A law enforcement
officer, who has responded to a request for assistance from a
department employee, may apprehend and take into custody the
conditionally released person if the law enforcement officer reasonably
believes that the conditionally released person is not complying with
the terms and conditions of his or her conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative. The conditionally released person may be
detained in the county jail or returned to the secure community
transition facility. The court shall be notified before the close of
the next judicial day of the person's apprehension. Both the
prosecuting attorney and the conditionally released person shall have
the right to request an immediate mental examination of the
conditionally released person. If the conditionally released person is
indigent, the court shall, upon request, assist him or her in obtaining
a qualified expert or professional person to conduct the examination.
(3) The court, upon receiving notification of the person's
apprehension, shall promptly schedule a hearing. The issue to be
determined is whether the state has proven by a preponderance of the
evidence that the conditionally released person did not comply with the
terms and conditions of his or her release. Hearsay evidence is
admissible if the court finds it otherwise reliable. At the hearing,
the court shall determine whether the person shall continue to be
conditionally released on the same or modified conditions or whether
his or her conditional release shall be revoked and he or she shall be
committed to total confinement, subject to release only in accordance
with provisions of this chapter.

--- END ---