BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the department has made a medical coverage decision denying
the request of a worker entitled to benefits under this title for
coverage of a particular medical or surgical treatment under RCW
51.36.010 and the worker subsequently receives the medical or surgical
treatment at personal expense, by using private insurance, or by using
any other means, the department or self-insurer, as the case may be,
shall reimburse the payor for the cost of the medical or surgical
treatment, shall pay the treating provider any remaining balance unpaid
by the worker, and shall consider the treatment proper and necessary
treatment for the worker under RCW 51.36.010, if the worker has
provided:
(a) Adequate documentation of the medical or surgical treatment
performed for a condition accepted by the department or self-insurer,
as the case may be; and
(b) Medical evidence that shows that his or her condition has
reasonably improved after the medical or surgical treatment is
completed.
(2) In the case of a worker insured by the department, payment
under subsection (1) of this section shall be paid out of the medical
aid fund.
(3) In the case of a worker of a self-insurer, payment under
subsection (1) of this section shall be paid by the self-insurer.
(4) All payments under subsection (1) of this section must be made
within thirty days of receiving adequate documentation from the worker.
(5) Upon successful appeal by the department or self-insurer, the
worker must return all reimbursed medical expenses to the department or
self-insurer.
(6) This section applies prospectively to all claims regardless of
the date of injury.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon request of the treating provider, the department must
authorize coverage for a trial on an individual worker entitled to
benefits under this title of an implantable medical device intended to
treat chronic intractable pain otherwise approved by the United States
food and drug administration and considered standard of care throughout
the interventional pain medical community.
(2) If, after conducting the trial under subsection (1) of this
section, the treating provider finds individual success in curing or
relieving the symptoms of the individual worker entitled to benefits
under this title, the department shall determine that the implantable
medical device intended to treat chronic intractable pain is proper and
necessary treatment for the worker under RCW 51.36.010 and shall
authorize coverage for full implantation and follow-up treatment.
(3) This section applies prospectively to all claims regardless of
the date of injury.

--- END ---