BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.170 and 2003 c 44 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for domestic wineries; fee to be
computed only on the liters manufactured: Less than two hundred fifty
thousand liters per year, one hundred dollars per year; and two hundred
fifty thousand liters or more per year, four hundred dollars per year.
(2) The license allows for the manufacture of wine in Washington
state from grapes or other agricultural products.
(3) Any domestic winery licensed under this section may also act as
a ((distributor and/or)) retailer of wine of its own production. Any
domestic winery licensed under this section may act as a distributor
for five thousand cases or less annually of its own production. A
domestic winery acting as a distributor of its own production may use
a common carrier to deliver to a Washington retailer. Any winery
operating as a distributor and/or retailer under this subsection shall
comply with the applicable laws and rules relating to distributors
and/or retailers.
(4) A domestic winery licensed under this section, at locations
separate from any of its production or manufacturing sites, may serve
samples of its own products, with or without charge, and sell wine of
its own production at retail for off-premise consumption, provided
that: (a) Each additional location has been approved by the board
under RCW 66.24.010; (b) the total number of additional locations does
not exceed two; and (c) a winery may not act as a distributor at any
such additional location. Each additional location is deemed to be
part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. Nothing in
this subsection shall be construed to prevent a domestic winery from
holding multiple domestic winery licenses.
(5)(a) A domestic winery licensed under this section may apply to
the board for an endorsement to sell wine of its own production at
retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market.
The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars. An
endorsement issued pursuant to this subsection does not count toward
the two additional retail locations limit specified in this section.
(b) For each month during which a domestic winery will sell wine at
a qualifying farmers market, the winery must provide the board or its
designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled
wine may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board
before the winery may offer wine for sale at a qualifying farmers
market.
(c) The wine sold at qualifying farmers markets must be made
entirely from grapes grown in a recognized Washington appellation or
from other agricultural products grown in this state.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. The
approved locations under an endorsement granted under this subsection
do not include the tasting or sampling privilege of a winery. The
winery may not store wine at a farmers market beyond the hours that the
winery offers bottled wine for sale. The winery may not act as a
distributor from a farmers market location.
(e) Before a winery may sell bottled wine at a qualifying farmers
market, the farmers market must apply to the board for authorization
for any winery with an endorsement approved under this subsection to
sell bottled wine at retail at the farmers market. This application
shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of the farmers market showing
all booths, stalls, or other designated locations at which an approved
winery may sell bottled wine; and (ii) the name and contact information
for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or
its designee to verify the locations at which bottled wine may be sold.
Before authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved
winery to sell bottled wine at retail at its farmers market location,
the board shall notify the persons or entities of such application for
authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization
granted under this subsection (5)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for
any violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be
necessary to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.
(6) Wine produced in Washington state by a domestic winery licensee
may be shipped out-of-state for the purpose of making it into sparkling
wine and then returned to such licensee for resale. Such wine shall be
deemed wine manufactured in the state of Washington for the purposes of
RCW 66.24.206, and shall not require a special license.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.240 and 2003 c 154 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for domestic breweries; fee to be two
thousand dollars for production of sixty thousand barrels or more of
malt liquor per year.
(2) Any domestic brewery, except for a brand owner of malt
beverages under RCW 66.04.010(((5))) (6), licensed under this section
may also act as a ((distributor and/or)) retailer for beer of its own
production. Any domestic brewery licensed under this section may act
as a distributor for two thousand five hundred barrels or less annually
of beer of its own production. A domestic brewery acting as a
distributor of its own production may use a common carrier to deliver
to a Washington retailer. Any domestic brewery operating as a
distributor and/or retailer under this subsection shall comply with the
applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers.
(3) Any domestic brewery licensed under this section may contract-produce beer for a brand owner of malt beverages defined under RCW
66.04.010(((5))) (6), and this contract-production is not a sale for
the purposes of RCW 66.28.170 and 66.28.180.
(4)(a) A domestic brewery licensed under this section and qualified
for a reduced rate of taxation pursuant to RCW 66.24.290(3)(b) may
apply to the board for an endorsement to sell bottled beer of its own
production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying
farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five
dollars.
(b) For each month during which a domestic brewery will sell beer
at a qualifying farmers market, the domestic brewery must provide the
board or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at
which bottled beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received
by the board before the domestic brewery may offer beer for sale at a
qualifying farmers market.
(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in
Washington.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the domestic brewery license for the purpose of this
title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this
subsection do not include the tasting or sampling privilege of a
domestic brewery. The domestic brewery may not store beer at a farmers
market beyond the hours that the domestic brewery offers bottled beer
for sale. The domestic brewery may not act as a distributor from a
farmers market location.
(e) Before a domestic brewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying
farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for
authorization for any domestic brewery with an endorsement approved
under this subsection to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers
market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of
the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated
locations at which an approved domestic brewery may sell bottled beer;
and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market
managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify
the locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved domestic brewery to sell
bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board shall
notify the persons or entities of such application for authorization
pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under
this subsection (4)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any violation
of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be
necessary to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.24.244 and 2003 c 167 s 1 and 2003 c 154 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for microbreweries; fee to be one
hundred dollars for production of less than sixty thousand barrels of
malt liquor, including strong beer, per year.
(2) Any microbrewery license under this section may also act as a
distributor and/or retailer for beer and strong beer of its own
production. Any microbrewery licensed under this section may act as a
distributor for two thousand five hundred barrels or less annually of
beer of its own production. A microbrewery acting as a distributor of
its own production may use a common carrier to deliver to a Washington
retailer. Strong beer may not be sold at a farmers market or under any
endorsement which may authorize microbreweries to sell beer at farmers
markets. Any microbrewery operating as a distributor and/or retailer
under this subsection shall comply with the applicable laws and rules
relating to distributors and/or retailers.
(3) The board may issue an endorsement to this license allowing for
on-premises consumption of beer, including strong beer, wine, or both
of other manufacture if purchased from a Washington state-licensed
distributor. Each endorsement shall cost two hundred dollars per year,
or four hundred dollars per year allowing the sale and service of both
beer and wine.
(4) The microbrewer obtaining such endorsement must determine, at
the time the endorsement is issued, whether the licensed premises will
be operated either as a tavern with persons under twenty-one years of
age not allowed as provided for in RCW 66.24.330, or as a beer and/or
wine restaurant as described in RCW 66.24.320.
(5)(a) A microbrewery licensed under this section may apply to the
board for an endorsement to sell bottled beer of its own production at
retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying farmers market.
The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five dollars.
(b) For each month during which a microbrewery will sell beer at a
qualifying farmers market, the microbrewery must provide the board or
its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled
beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board
before the microbrewery may offer beer for sale at a qualifying farmers
market.
(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in
Washington.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the microbrewery license for the purpose of this title.
The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this
subsection (5) do not constitute the tasting or sampling privilege of
a microbrewery. The microbrewery may not store beer at a farmers
market beyond the hours that the microbrewery offers bottled beer for
sale. The microbrewery may not act as a distributor from a farmers
market location.
(e) Before a microbrewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying
farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for
authorization for any microbrewery with an endorsement approved under
this subsection (5) to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers
market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of
the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated
locations at which an approved microbrewery may sell bottled beer; and
(ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers
who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify the
locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved microbrewery to sell
bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board shall
notify the persons or entities of the application for authorization
pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under
this subsection (5)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any violation
of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and any additional rules necessary
to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection (5):
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.24.206 and 2004 c 160 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A United States winery ((or manufacturer of wine)) located
outside the state of Washington must hold a certificate of approval to
allow sales and shipment of the certificate of approval holder's wine
to licensed Washington wine distributors ((or)), importers, or
retailers. A certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment
endorsement may act as a distributor of five thousand cases of wine
annually of its own production. A certificate of approval holder
acting as a distributor of its own production may use a common carrier
to deliver to a Washington retailer.
(b) Authorized representatives must hold a certificate of approval
to allow sales and shipment of United States produced wine to licensed
Washington wine distributors or importers.
(c) Authorized representatives must also hold a certificate of
approval to allow sales and shipments of foreign produced wine to
licensed Washington wine distributors or importers.
(2) The certificate of approval shall not be granted unless and
until such winery or manufacturer of wine or authorized representative
shall have made a written agreement with the board to furnish to the
board, on or before the twentieth day of each month, a report under
oath, on a form to be prescribed by the board, showing the quantity of
wine sold or delivered to each licensed wine distributor ((or)),
importer, or retailer, during the preceding month, and shall further
have agreed with the board, that such wineries, manufacturers, or
authorized representatives, and all general sales corporations or
agencies maintained by them, and all of their trade representatives,
shall and will faithfully comply with all laws of the state of
Washington pertaining to the sale of intoxicating liquors and all rules
and regulations of the Washington state liquor control board. A
violation of the terms of this agreement will cause the board to take
action to suspend or revoke such certificate.
(3) The fee for the certificate of approval and related
endorsements, issued pursuant to the provisions of this title, shall be
from time to time established by the board at a level that is
sufficient to defray the costs of administering the certificate of
approval program. The fee shall be fixed by rule by the board in
accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) Certificate of approval holders are deemed to have consented to
the jurisdiction of Washington concerning enforcement of this chapter
and all laws and rules related to the sale and shipment of wine.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.24.210 and 2001 c 124 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby imposed upon all wines except cider sold to
wine distributors and the Washington state liquor control board, within
the state a tax at the rate of twenty and one-fourth cents per liter.
Any domestic winery or certificate of approval holder acting as a
distributor of its own production shall pay taxes imposed by this
section. There is hereby imposed on all cider sold to wine
distributors and the Washington state liquor control board within the
state a tax at the rate of three and fifty-nine one-hundredths cents
per liter: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That wine sold or shipped in bulk from
one winery to another winery shall not be subject to such tax.
(a) The tax provided for in this section shall be collected by
direct payments based on wine purchased by wine distributors.
(b) Every person purchasing wine under the provisions of this
section shall on or before the twentieth day of each month report to
the board all purchases during the preceding calendar month in such
manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board, and with
such report shall pay the tax due from the purchases covered by such
report unless the same has previously been paid. Any such purchaser of
wine whose applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth
day following the month of purchase will be assessed a penalty at the
rate of two percent a month or fraction thereof. The board may require
that every such person shall execute to and file with the board a bond
to be approved by the board, in such amount as the board may fix,
securing the payment of the tax. If any such person fails to pay the
tax when due, the board may forthwith suspend or cancel the license
until all taxes are paid.
(c) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase wine from a
certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement shall
make monthly reports to the liquor control board on wine purchased
during the preceding calendar month in the manner and upon such forms
as may be prescribed by the board.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section. All revenues collected during any month from this additional
tax shall be transferred to the state general fund by the twenty-fifth
day of the following month.
(3) An additional tax is imposed on wines subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section, at the rate of one-fourth of one cent
per liter for wine sold after June 30, 1987. After June 30, 1996, such
additional tax does not apply to cider. An additional tax of five one-hundredths of one cent per liter is imposed on cider sold after June
30, 1996. All revenues collected under this subsection (3) shall be
disbursed quarterly to the Washington wine commission for use in
carrying out the purposes of chapter 15.88 RCW.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all wine subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to twenty-three and forty-four one-hundredths cents per liter on fortified wine
as defined in RCW 66.04.010(((38))) (39) when bottled or packaged by
the manufacturer, one cent per liter on all other wine except cider,
and eighteen one-hundredths of one cent per liter on cider. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(5)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all cider subject to tax
under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to
two and four one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June
30, 1996, and before July 1, 1997, and is equal to four and seven one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1997.
(b) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (5) shall be deposited in the health services account
under RCW 43.72.900.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "cider" means table wine that
contains not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and
not more than seven percent of alcohol by volume and is made from the
normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe apples or
pears. "Cider" includes, but is not limited to, flavored, sparkling,
or carbonated cider and cider made from condensed apple or pear must.

Sec. 6 RCW 66.24.270 and 2004 c 160 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person, firm or corporation, holding a license to
manufacture malt liquors or strong beer within the state of Washington,
shall, on or before the twentieth day of each month, furnish to the
Washington state liquor control board, on a form to be prescribed by
the board, a statement showing the quantity of malt liquors and strong
beer sold for resale during the preceding calendar month to each beer
distributor within the state of Washington.
(2)(a) A United States brewery or manufacturer of beer or strong
beer, located outside the state of Washington, must hold a certificate
of approval to allow sales and shipment of the certificate of approval
holder's beer or strong beer to licensed Washington beer distributors
((or)), importers, or retailers. A certificate of approval holder with
a direct shipment endorsement may act as a distributor for two thousand
five hundred barrels or less annually of beer of its own production.
A certificate of approval holder acting as a distributor of its own
production may use a common carrier to deliver to a Washington
retailer.
(b) Authorized representatives must hold a certificate of approval
to allow sales and shipment of United States produced beer or strong
beer to licensed Washington beer distributors or importers.
(c) Authorized representatives must also hold a certificate of
approval to allow sales and shipments of foreign produced beer or
strong beer to licensed Washington beer distributors or importers.
(3) The certificate of approval shall not be granted unless and
until such brewer or manufacturer of beer or strong beer or authorized
representative shall have made a written agreement with the board to
furnish to the board, on or before the twentieth day of each month, a
report under oath, on a form to be prescribed by the board, showing the
quantity of beer and strong beer sold or delivered to each licensed
beer distributor ((or)), importer, or retailer during the preceding
month, and shall further have agreed with the board, that such brewer
or manufacturer of beer or strong beer or authorized representative and
all general sales corporations or agencies maintained by them, and all
of their trade representatives, corporations, and agencies, shall and
will faithfully comply with all laws of the state of Washington
pertaining to the sale of intoxicating liquors and all rules and
regulations of the Washington state liquor control board. A violation
of the terms of this agreement will cause the board to take action to
suspend or revoke such certificate.
(4) The fee for the certificate of approval and related
endorsements, issued pursuant to the provisions of this title, shall be
from time to time established by the board at a level that is
sufficient to defray the costs of administering the certificate of
approval program. The fee shall be fixed by rule by the board in
accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(5) Certificate of approval holders are deemed to have consented to
the jurisdiction of Washington concerning enforcement of this chapter
and all laws and rules related to the sale and shipment of beer.

Sec. 7 RCW 66.24.290 and 2003 c 167 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any microbrewer or domestic brewery or beer distributor
licensed under this title may sell and deliver beer and strong beer to
holders of authorized licenses direct, but to no other person, other
than the board((; and)). Any certificate of approval holder authorized
to act as a distributor under RCW 66.24.270 shall pay the taxes imposed
by this section.
(a) Every such brewery or beer distributor shall report all sales
to the board monthly, pursuant to the regulations, and shall pay to the
board as an added tax for the privilege of manufacturing and selling
the beer and strong beer within the state a tax of one dollar and
thirty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons on sales to licensees
within the state and on sales to licensees within the state of bottled
and canned beer, including strong beer, shall pay a tax computed in
gallons at the rate of one dollar and thirty cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons.
(b) Any brewery or beer distributor whose applicable tax payment is
not postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of sale will be
assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent per month or fraction
thereof. Beer and strong beer shall be sold by breweries and
distributors in sealed barrels or packages.
(c) The moneys collected under this subsection shall be distributed
as follows: (((a))) (i) Three-tenths of a percent shall be distributed
to border areas under RCW 66.08.195; and (((b))) (ii) of the remaining
moneys: (((i))) (A) Twenty percent shall be distributed to counties in
the same manner as under RCW 66.08.200; and (((ii))) (B) eighty percent
shall be distributed to incorporated cities and towns in the same
manner as under RCW 66.08.210.
(d) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase beer from a
certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement shall
make monthly reports to the liquor control board on beer purchased
during the preceding calendar month in the manner and upon such forms
as may be prescribed by the board.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to two dollars per barrel of thirty-one gallons. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(3)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to ninety-six cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons
through June 30, 1995, two dollars and thirty-nine cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
and four dollars and seventy-eight cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons thereafter.
(b) The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply
to the sale of the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by
breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may
be provided by the board by rule consistent with the purposes of this
exemption.
(c) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (3) shall be deposited in the health services account
under RCW 43.72.900.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer that
is subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section that is in the
first sixty thousand barrels of beer and strong beer by breweries that
are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as
existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by
the board by rule consistent with the purposes of the exemption under
subsection (3)(b) of this section. The additional tax is equal to one
dollar and forty-eight and two-tenths cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons. By the twenty-fifth day of the following month, three percent
of the revenues collected from this additional tax shall be distributed
to border areas under RCW 66.08.195 and the remaining moneys shall be
transferred to the state general fund.
(5) The board may make refunds for all taxes paid on beer and
strong beer exported from the state for use outside the state.
(6) The board may require filing with the board of a bond to be
approved by it, in such amount as the board may fix, securing the
payment of the tax. If any licensee fails to pay the tax when due, the
board may forthwith suspend or cancel his or her license until all
taxes are paid.

Sec. 8 RCW 66.28.070 and 1994 c 201 s 5 and 1994 c 63 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it shall
be unlawful for any retail beer or wine licensee to purchase beer or
wine, except from a duly licensed ((wholesaler)) distributor, domestic
winery, domestic brewer, certificate of approval holder, or the
board((, and)). It shall be unlawful for any brewer, winery, or beer
or wine ((wholesaler)) distributor to purchase beer or wine, except
from a duly licensed beer or wine ((wholesaler)) distributor, or
importer or certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment
endorsement.
(2) A beer or wine retailer licensee may purchase beer or wine from
a government agency which has lawfully seized beer or wine from a
licensed beer or wine retailer, or from a board-authorized retailer, or
from a licensed retailer which has discontinued business if the
((wholesaler)) distributor has refused to accept beer or wine from that
retailer for return and refund. Beer and wine purchased under this
subsection shall meet the quality standards set by its manufacturer.
(3) Special occasion licensees holding either a ((class G or J))
special occasion license may only purchase beer or wine from a beer or
wine retailer duly licensed to sell beer or wine for off-premises
consumption, the board, or from a duly licensed beer or wine
((wholesaler)) distributor.

Sec. 9 RCW 66.28.180 and 2004 c 269 s 1 and 2004 c 160 s 18 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
It is unlawful for a person, firm, or corporation holding a
certificate of approval issued under RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a beer
distributor's license, a domestic brewery license, a microbrewery
license, a beer importer's license, a beer distributor's license, a
domestic winery license, a wine importer's license, or a wine
distributor's license within the state of Washington to modify any
prices without prior notification to and approval of the board.
(1) Intent. This section is enacted, pursuant to the authority of
this state under the twenty-first amendment to the United States
Constitution, to promote the public's interest in fostering the orderly
and responsible distribution of malt beverages and wine towards
effective control of consumption; to promote the fair and efficient
three-tier system of distribution of such beverages; and to confirm
existing board rules as the clear expression of state policy to
regulate the manner of selling and pricing of wine and malt beverages
by licensed suppliers and distributors.
(2) Beer and wine distributor price posting.
(a) Every beer or wine distributor shall file with the board at its
office in Olympia a price posting showing the wholesale prices at which
any and all brands of beer and wine sold by such beer and/or wine
distributor shall be sold to retailers within the state.
(b) Each price posting shall be made on a form prepared and
furnished by the board, or a reasonable facsimile thereof, and shall
set forth:
(i) All brands, types, packages, and containers of beer offered for
sale by such beer and/or wine distributor;
(ii) The wholesale prices thereof to retail licensees, including
allowances, if any, for returned empty containers.
(c) No beer and/or wine distributor may sell or offer to sell any
package or container of beer or wine to any retail licensee at a price
differing from the price for such package or container as shown in the
price posting filed by the beer and/or wine distributor and then in
effect, according to rules adopted by the board.
(d) Quantity discounts are prohibited. No price may be posted that
is below acquisition cost plus ten percent of acquisition cost.
However, the board is empowered to review periodically, as it may deem
appropriate, the amount of the percentage of acquisition cost as a
minimum mark-up over cost and to modify such percentage by rule of the
board, except such percentage shall be not less than ten percent.
(e) Distributor prices on a "close-out" item shall be accepted by
the board if the item to be discontinued has been listed on the state
market for a period of at least six months, and upon the further
condition that the distributor who posts such a close-out price shall
not restock the item for a period of one year following the first
effective date of such close-out price.
(f) The board may reject any price posting that it deems to be in
violation of this section or any rule, or portion thereof, or that
would tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer and
wine. Whenever the board rejects any posting, the licensee submitting
the posting may be heard by the board and shall have the burden of
showing that the posting is not in violation of this section or a rule
or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer
and wine. If the posting is accepted, it shall become effective at the
time fixed by the board. If the posting is rejected, the last
effective posting shall remain in effect until such time as an amended
posting is filed and approved, in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
(g) Prior to the effective date of the posted prices, all price
postings filed as required by this section constitute investigative
information and shall not be subject to disclosure, pursuant to RCW
42.17.310(1)(d).
(h) Any beer and/or wine distributor or employee authorized by the
distributor-employer may sell beer and/or wine at the distributor's
posted prices to any annual or special occasion retail licensee upon
presentation to the distributor or employee at the time of purchase of
a special permit issued by the board to such licensee.
(i) Every annual or special occasion retail licensee, upon
purchasing any beer and/or wine from a distributor, shall immediately
cause such beer or wine to be delivered to the licensed premises, and
the licensee shall not thereafter permit such beer to be disposed of in
any manner except as authorized by the license.
(ii) Beer and wine sold as provided in this section shall be
delivered by the distributor or an authorized employee either to the
retailer's licensed premises or directly to the retailer at the
distributor's licensed premises. A distributor's prices to retail
licensees shall be the same at both such places of delivery. A
licensed retailer with multiple retail locations in Washington that is
receiving shipment from a certificate of approval holder with a direct
shipment endorsement may accept delivery at the retailer's warehouse or
a single retail location upon approval from the liquor control board.
(3) Beer and wine suppliers' price filings, contracts, and
memoranda.
(a) Every domestic brewery, microbrewery, and domestic winery
offering beer and/or wine for sale within the state shall file with the
board at its office in Olympia a copy of every written contract and a
memorandum of every oral agreement which such brewery or winery may
have with any beer or wine distributor, which contracts or memoranda
shall contain a schedule of prices charged to distributors for all
items and all terms of sale, including all regular and special
discounts; all advertising, sales and trade allowances, and incentive
programs; and all commissions, bonuses or gifts, and any and all other
discounts or allowances. Whenever changed or modified, such revised
contracts or memoranda shall forthwith be filed with the board as
provided for by rule. The provisions of this section also apply to
certificate of approval holders, beer and/or wine importers, and beer
and/or wine distributors who sell to other beer and/or wine
distributors.
Each price schedule shall be made on a form prepared and furnished
by the board, or a reasonable facsimile thereof, and shall set forth
all brands, types, packages, and containers of beer or wine offered for
sale by such licensed brewery or winery; all additional information
required may be filed as a supplement to the price schedule forms.
(b) Prices filed by a domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic
winery, or certificate of approval holder shall be uniform prices to
all distributors or retailers on a statewide basis less bona fide
allowances for freight differentials. Quantity discounts are
prohibited. No price shall be filed that is below
acquisition/production cost plus ten percent of that cost, except that
acquisition cost plus ten percent of acquisition cost does not apply to
sales of beer or wine between a beer or wine importer who sells beer or
wine to another beer or wine importer or to a beer or wine distributor,
or to a beer or wine distributor who sells beer or wine to another beer
or wine distributor. However, the board is empowered to review
periodically, as it may deem appropriate, the amount of the percentage
of acquisition/production cost as a minimum mark-up over cost and to
modify such percentage by rule of the board, except such percentage
shall be not less than ten percent.
(c) No domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, certificate
of approval holder, beer or wine importer, or beer or wine distributor
may sell or offer to sell any beer or wine to any persons whatsoever in
this state until copies of such written contracts or memoranda of such
oral agreements are on file with the board.
(d) No domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or
certificate of approval holder may sell or offer to sell any package or
container of beer or wine to any distributor at a price differing from
the price for such package or container as shown in the schedule of
prices filed by the domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or
certificate of approval holder and then in effect, according to rules
adopted by the board.
(e) The board may reject any supplier's price filing, contract, or
memorandum of oral agreement, or portion thereof that it deems to be in
violation of this section or any rule or that would tend to disrupt the
orderly sale and distribution of beer or wine. Whenever the board
rejects any such price filing, contract, or memorandum, the licensee
submitting the price filing, contract, or memorandum may be heard by
the board and shall have the burden of showing that the price filing,
contract, or memorandum is not in violation of this section or a rule
or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer
or wine. If the price filing, contract, or memorandum is accepted, it
shall become effective at a time fixed by the board. If the price
filing, contract, or memorandum, or portion thereof, is rejected, the
last effective price filing, contract, or memorandum shall remain in
effect until such time as an amended price filing, contract, or
memorandum is filed and approved, in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
(f) Prior to the effective date of the posted prices, all prices,
contracts, and memoranda filed as required by this section constitute
investigative information and shall not be subject to disclosure,
pursuant to RCW 42.17.310(1)(d).

Sec. 10 RCW 66.28.180 and 2005 c 274 s 327 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is unlawful for a person, firm, or corporation holding a
certificate of approval issued under RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a beer
distributor's license, a domestic brewery license, a microbrewery
license, a beer importer's license, a beer distributor's license, a
domestic winery license, a wine importer's license, or a wine
distributor's license within the state of Washington to modify any
prices without prior notification to and approval of the board.
(1) Intent. This section is enacted, pursuant to the authority of
this state under the twenty-first amendment to the United States
Constitution, to promote the public's interest in fostering the orderly
and responsible distribution of malt beverages and wine towards
effective control of consumption; to promote the fair and efficient
three-tier system of distribution of such beverages; and to confirm
existing board rules as the clear expression of state policy to
regulate the manner of selling and pricing of wine and malt beverages
by licensed suppliers and distributors.
(2) Beer and wine distributor price posting.
(a) Every beer or wine distributor shall file with the board at its
office in Olympia a price posting showing the wholesale prices at which
any and all brands of beer and wine sold by such beer and/or wine
distributor shall be sold to retailers within the state.
(b) Each price posting shall be made on a form prepared and
furnished by the board, or a reasonable facsimile thereof, and shall
set forth:
(i) All brands, types, packages, and containers of beer offered for
sale by such beer and/or wine distributor;
(ii) The wholesale prices thereof to retail licensees, including
allowances, if any, for returned empty containers.
(c) No beer and/or wine distributor may sell or offer to sell any
package or container of beer or wine to any retail licensee at a price
differing from the price for such package or container as shown in the
price posting filed by the beer and/or wine distributor and then in
effect, according to rules adopted by the board.
(d) Quantity discounts are prohibited. No price may be posted that
is below acquisition cost plus ten percent of acquisition cost.
However, the board is empowered to review periodically, as it may deem
appropriate, the amount of the percentage of acquisition cost as a
minimum mark-up over cost and to modify such percentage by rule of the
board, except such percentage shall be not less than ten percent.
(e) Distributor prices on a "close-out" item shall be accepted by
the board if the item to be discontinued has been listed on the state
market for a period of at least six months, and upon the further
condition that the distributor who posts such a close-out price shall
not restock the item for a period of one year following the first
effective date of such close-out price.
(f) The board may reject any price posting that it deems to be in
violation of this section or any rule, or portion thereof, or that
would tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer and
wine. Whenever the board rejects any posting, the licensee submitting
the posting may be heard by the board and shall have the burden of
showing that the posting is not in violation of this section or a rule
or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer
and wine. If the posting is accepted, it shall become effective at the
time fixed by the board. If the posting is rejected, the last
effective posting shall remain in effect until such time as an amended
posting is filed and approved, in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
(g) Prior to the effective date of the posted prices, all price
postings filed as required by this section constitute investigative
information and shall not be subject to disclosure, pursuant to RCW
42.56.240(1).
(h) Any beer and/or wine distributor or employee authorized by the
distributor-employer may sell beer and/or wine at the distributor's
posted prices to any annual or special occasion retail licensee upon
presentation to the distributor or employee at the time of purchase of
a special permit issued by the board to such licensee.
(i) Every annual or special occasion retail licensee, upon
purchasing any beer and/or wine from a distributor, shall immediately
cause such beer or wine to be delivered to the licensed premises, and
the licensee shall not thereafter permit such beer to be disposed of in
any manner except as authorized by the license.
(ii) Beer and wine sold as provided in this section shall be
delivered by the distributor or an authorized employee either to the
retailer's licensed premises or directly to the retailer at the
distributor's licensed premises. A distributor's prices to retail
licensees shall be the same at both such places of delivery. A
licensed retailer with multiple retail locations in Washington that is
receiving shipment from a certificate of approval holder with a direct
shipment endorsement may accept delivery at the retailer's warehouse or
a single retail location upon approval from the liquor control board.
(3) Beer and wine suppliers' price filings, contracts, and
memoranda.
(a) Every domestic brewery, microbrewery, and domestic winery
offering beer and/or wine for sale within the state shall file with the
board at its office in Olympia a copy of every written contract and a
memorandum of every oral agreement which such brewery or winery may
have with any beer or wine distributor, which contracts or memoranda
shall contain a schedule of prices charged to distributors for all
items and all terms of sale, including all regular and special
discounts; all advertising, sales and trade allowances, and incentive
programs; and all commissions, bonuses or gifts, and any and all other
discounts or allowances. Whenever changed or modified, such revised
contracts or memoranda shall forthwith be filed with the board as
provided for by rule. The provisions of this section also apply to
certificate of approval holders, beer and/or wine importers, and beer
and/or wine distributors who sell to other beer and/or wine
distributors.
Each price schedule shall be made on a form prepared and furnished
by the board, or a reasonable facsimile thereof, and shall set forth
all brands, types, packages, and containers of beer or wine offered for
sale by such licensed brewery or winery; all additional information
required may be filed as a supplement to the price schedule forms.
(b) Prices filed by a domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic
winery, or certificate of approval holder shall be uniform prices to
all distributors or retailers on a statewide basis less bona fide
allowances for freight differentials. Quantity discounts are
prohibited. No price shall be filed that is below
acquisition/production cost plus ten percent of that cost, except that
acquisition cost plus ten percent of acquisition cost does not apply to
sales of beer or wine between a beer or wine importer who sells beer or
wine to another beer or wine importer or to a beer or wine distributor,
or to a beer or wine distributor who sells beer or wine to another beer
or wine distributor. However, the board is empowered to review
periodically, as it may deem appropriate, the amount of the percentage
of acquisition/production cost as a minimum mark-up over cost and to
modify such percentage by rule of the board, except such percentage
shall be not less than ten percent.
(c) No domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, certificate
of approval holder, beer or wine importer, or beer or wine distributor
may sell or offer to sell any beer or wine to any persons whatsoever in
this state until copies of such written contracts or memoranda of such
oral agreements are on file with the board.
(d) No domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or
certificate of approval holder may sell or offer to sell any package or
container of beer or wine to any distributor at a price differing from
the price for such package or container as shown in the schedule of
prices filed by the domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or
certificate of approval holder and then in effect, according to rules
adopted by the board.
(e) The board may reject any supplier's price filing, contract, or
memorandum of oral agreement, or portion thereof that it deems to be in
violation of this section or any rule or that would tend to disrupt the
orderly sale and distribution of beer or wine. Whenever the board
rejects any such price filing, contract, or memorandum, the licensee
submitting the price filing, contract, or memorandum may be heard by
the board and shall have the burden of showing that the price filing,
contract, or memorandum is not in violation of this section or a rule
or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer
or wine. If the price filing, contract, or memorandum is accepted, it
shall become effective at a time fixed by the board. If the price
filing, contract, or memorandum, or portion thereof, is rejected, the
last effective price filing, contract, or memorandum shall remain in
effect until such time as an amended price filing, contract, or
memorandum is filed and approved, in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
(f) Prior to the effective date of the posted prices, all prices,
contracts, and memoranda filed as required by this section constitute
investigative information and shall not be subject to disclosure,
pursuant to RCW 42.56.240(1).

Sec. 11 RCW 42.17.310 and 2005 c 424 s 16, 2005 c 349 s 1, 2005
c 312 s 6, 2005 c 284 s 1, 2005 c 172 s 13, and 2005 c 33 s 4 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The following are exempt from public inspection and copying:
(a) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients.
(b) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy.
(c) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would (i) be prohibited to such persons by
RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, or 84.40.340 or (ii) violate the
taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer.
(d) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy.
(e) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the public disclosure
commission, if disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical
safety, or property. If at the time a complaint is filed the
complainant, victim or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or
nondisclosure, such desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed
with the public disclosure commission about any elected official or
candidate for public office must be made in writing and signed by the
complainant under oath.
(f) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
to administer a license, employment, or academic examination.
(g) Except as provided by chapter 8.26 RCW, the contents of real
estate appraisals, made for or by any agency relative to the
acquisition or sale of property, until the project or prospective sale
is abandoned or until such time as all of the property has been
acquired or the property to which the sale appraisal relates is sold,
but in no event shall disclosure be denied for more than three years
after the appraisal.
(h) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss.
(i) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, and intra-agency
memorandums in which opinions are expressed or policies formulated or
recommended except that a specific record shall not be exempt when
publicly cited by an agency in connection with any agency action.
(j) Records which are relevant to a controversy to which an agency
is a party but which records would not be available to another party
under the rules of pretrial discovery for causes pending in the
superior courts.
(k) Records, maps, or other information identifying the location of
archaeological sites in order to avoid the looting or depredation of
such sites.
(l) Any library record, the primary purpose of which is to maintain
control of library materials, or to gain access to information, which
discloses or could be used to disclose the identity of a library user.
(m) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (i) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (ii) highway
construction or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070.
(n) Railroad company contracts filed prior to July 28, 1991, with
the utilities and transportation commission under RCW 81.34.070, except
that the summaries of the contracts are open to public inspection and
copying as otherwise provided by this chapter.
(o) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided pursuant to
chapter 43.163 RCW and chapter 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to
export projects pursuant to RCW 43.23.035.
(p) Financial disclosures filed by private vocational schools under
chapters 28B.85 and 28C.10 RCW.
(q) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095.
(r) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and 43.168 RCW,
or during application for economic development loans or program
services provided by any local agency.
(s) Membership lists or lists of members or owners of interests of
units in timeshare projects, subdivisions, camping resorts,
condominiums, land developments, or common-interest communities
affiliated with such projects, regulated by the department of
licensing, in the files or possession of the department.
(t) All applications for public employment, including the names of
applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect
to an applicant.
(u) The residential addresses, residential telephone numbers,
personal wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail
addresses, Social Security numbers, and emergency contact information
of employees or volunteers of a public agency, and the names, dates of
birth, residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, personal
wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail addresses, Social
Security numbers, and emergency contact information of dependents of
employees or volunteers of a public agency, which are held by any
public agency in personnel records, public employment related records,
or volunteer rosters, or are included in any mailing list of employees
or volunteers of any public agency. For purposes of this subsection,
"employees" includes independent provider home care workers as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240.
(v) The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of
the customers of a public utility contained in the records or lists
held by the public utility of which they are customers, except that
this information may be released to the division of child support or
the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another
state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order.
(w)(i) The federal social security number of individuals governed
under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in the files of the department of
health, except this exemption does not apply to requests made directly
to the department from federal, state, and local agencies of
government, and national and state licensing, credentialing,
investigatory, disciplinary, and examination organizations; (ii) the
current residential address and current residential telephone number of
a health care provider governed under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in
the files of the department, if the provider requests that this
information be withheld from public inspection and copying, and
provides to the department an accurate alternate or business address
and business telephone number. On or after January 1, 1995, the
current residential address and residential telephone number of a
health care provider governed under RCW 18.130.040 maintained in the
files of the department shall automatically be withheld from public
inspection and copying unless the provider specifically requests the
information be released, and except as provided for under RCW
42.17.260(9).
(x) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090.
(y) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420.
(z) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW.
(aa) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information.
(bb) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120.
(cc) Client records maintained by an agency that is a domestic
violence program as defined in RCW 70.123.020 or 70.123.075 or a rape
crisis center as defined in RCW 70.125.030.
(dd) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency
employee: (i) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by
the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in
connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
against the person; and (ii) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed.
(ee) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency
conducting a current investigation of a possible unfair practice under
chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other federal, state,
or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment.
(ff) Business related information protected from public inspection
and copying under RCW 15.86.110.
(gg) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW.
(hh) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by, a quality improvement committee pursuant
to RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200, by a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250, or by a quality assurance committee pursuant to RCW 74.42.640
or 18.20.390, regardless of which agency is in possession of the
information and documents.
(ii) Personal information in files maintained in a data base
created under RCW 43.07.360.
(jj) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010.
(kk) Names of individuals residing in emergency or transitional
housing that are furnished to the department of revenue or a county
assessor in order to substantiate a claim for property tax exemption
under RCW 84.36.043.
(ll) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service. However, these records may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides.
(mm) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons.
(nn) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes and other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose this information to a person, employer,
educational institution, or other entity that is responsible, in whole
or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit
pass or other fare payment media, or to the news media when reporting
on public transportation or public safety. This information may also
be disclosed at the agency's discretion to governmental agencies or
groups concerned with public transportation or public safety.
(oo) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310. If a request for
such information is received, the submitting entity must be notified of
the request. Within ten business days of receipt of the notice, the
submitting entity shall provide a written statement of the continuing
need for confidentiality, which shall be provided to the requester.
Upon receipt of such notice, the department of health shall continue to
treat information designated under this section as exempt from
disclosure. If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality.
(pp) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance
appeals that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation
claims filed with the board under RCW 7.68.110.
(qq) Financial and commercial information supplied by or on behalf
of a person, firm, corporation, or entity under chapter 28B.95 RCW
relating to the purchase or sale of tuition units and contracts for the
purchase of multiple tuition units.
(rr) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b).
(ss) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law.
(tt) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license.
(uu) Records maintained by the employment security department and
subject to chapter 50.13 RCW if provided to another individual or
organization for operational, research, or evaluation purposes.
(vv) Individually identifiable information received by the work
force training and education coordinating board for research or
evaluation purposes.
(ww) Those portions of records assembled, prepared, or maintained
to prevent, mitigate, or respond to criminal terrorist acts, which are
acts that significantly disrupt the conduct of government or of the
general civilian population of the state or the United States and that
manifest an extreme indifference to human life, the public disclosure
of which would have a substantial likelihood of threatening public
safety, consisting of:
(i) Specific and unique vulnerability assessments or specific and
unique response or deployment plans, including compiled underlying data
collected in preparation of or essential to the assessments, or to the
response or deployment plans; and
(ii) Records not subject to public disclosure under federal law
that are shared by federal or international agencies, and information
prepared from national security briefings provided to state or local
government officials related to domestic preparedness for acts of
terrorism.
(xx) Commercial fishing catch data from logbooks required to be
provided to the department of fish and wildlife under RCW 77.12.047,
when the data identifies specific catch location, timing, or
methodology and the release of which would result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the commercial fisher providing the catch data.
However, this information may be released to government agencies
concerned with the management of fish and wildlife resources.
(yy) Sensitive wildlife data obtained by the department of fish and
wildlife. However, sensitive wildlife data may be released to
government agencies concerned with the management of fish and wildlife
resources. Sensitive wildlife data includes:
(i) The nesting sites or specific locations of endangered species
designated under RCW 77.12.020, or threatened or sensitive species
classified by rule of the department of fish and wildlife;
(ii) Radio frequencies used in, or locational data generated by,
telemetry studies; or
(iii) Other location data that could compromise the viability of a
specific fish or wildlife population, and where at least one of the
following criteria are met:
(A) The species has a known commercial or black market value;
(B) There is a history of malicious take of that species; or
(C) There is a known demand to visit, take, or disturb, and the
species behavior or ecology renders it especially vulnerable or the
species has an extremely limited distribution and concentration.
(zz) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
recreational licenses under RCW 77.32.010 or commercial licenses under
chapter 77.65 or 77.70 RCW, except name, address of contact used by the
department, and type of license, endorsement, or tag. However, the
department of fish and wildlife may disclose personally identifying
information to:
(i) Government agencies concerned with the management of fish and
wildlife resources;
(ii) The department of social and health services, child support
division, and to the department of licensing in order to implement RCW
77.32.014 and 46.20.291; and
(iii) Law enforcement agencies for the purpose of firearm
possession enforcement under RCW 9.41.040.
(aaa)(i) Discharge papers of a veteran of the armed forces of the
United States filed at the office of the county auditor before July 1,
2002, that have not been commingled with other recorded documents.
These records will be available only to the veteran, the veteran's next
of kin, a deceased veteran's properly appointed personal representative
or executor, a person holding that veteran's general power of attorney,
or to anyone else designated in writing by that veteran to receive the
records.
(ii) Discharge papers of a veteran of the armed forces of the
United States filed at the office of the county auditor before July 1,
2002, that have been commingled with other records, if the veteran has
recorded a "request for exemption from public disclosure of discharge
papers" with the county auditor. If such a request has been recorded,
these records may be released only to the veteran filing the papers,
the veteran's next of kin, a deceased veteran's properly appointed
personal representative or executor, a person holding the veteran's
general power of attorney, or anyone else designated in writing by the
veteran to receive the records.
(iii) Discharge papers of a veteran filed at the office of the
county auditor after June 30, 2002, are not public records, but will be
available only to the veteran, the veteran's next of kin, a deceased
veteran's properly appointed personal representative or executor, a
person holding the veteran's general power of attorney, or anyone else
designated in writing by the veteran to receive the records.
(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(aaa), next of kin of
deceased veterans have the same rights to full access to the record.
Next of kin are the veteran's widow or widower who has not remarried,
son, daughter, father, mother, brother, and sister.
(bbb) Those portions of records containing specific and unique
vulnerability assessments or specific and unique emergency and escape
response plans at a city, county, or state adult or juvenile
correctional facility, the public disclosure of which would have a
substantial likelihood of threatening the security of a city, county,
or state adult or juvenile correctional facility or any individual's
safety.
(ccc) Information compiled by school districts or schools in the
development of their comprehensive safe school plans pursuant to RCW
28A.320.125, to the extent that they identify specific vulnerabilities
of school districts and each individual school.
(ddd) Information regarding the infrastructure and security of
computer and telecommunications networks, consisting of security
passwords, security access codes and programs, access codes for secure
software applications, security and service recovery plans, security
risk assessments, and security test results to the extent that they
identify specific system vulnerabilities.
(eee) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW.
(fff) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (i) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (ii)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (iii)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011.
(ggg) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transponders or other technology to facilitate payment of
tolls. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form as long as
the data does not contain any personally identifying information. For
these purposes aggregate data may include the census tract of the
account holder as long as any individual personally identifying
information is not released. Personally identifying information may be
released to law enforcement agencies only for toll enforcement
purposes. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies for other purposes only if the request is
accompanied by a court order.
(hhh) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information.
(iii) Records of mediation communications that are privileged under
chapter 7.07 RCW.
(jjj) Financial or proprietary information, data, trade secrets,
contractual agreements, or other information, including but not limited
to sales data, and acquisition and production costs, supplied to the
liquor control board by a licensee in connection with the licensee's
obligation under RCW 66.28.180, or in connection with a retail
licensee's obligation under RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, for receipt of
shipments of beer or wine from a domestic winery, brewery,
microbrewery, or certificate of approval holder under RCW 66.24.206(1)
or 66.24.270(2)(a), or for purposes of research and evaluation.
(2) Except for information described in subsection (1)(c)(i) of
this section and confidential income data exempted from public
inspection pursuant to RCW 84.40.020, the exemptions of this section
are inapplicable to the extent that information, the disclosure of
which would violate personal privacy or vital governmental interests,
can be deleted from the specific records sought. No exemption may be
construed to permit the nondisclosure of statistical information not
descriptive of any readily identifiable person or persons.
(3) Inspection or copying of any specific records exempt under the
provisions of this section may be permitted if the superior court in
the county in which the record is maintained finds, after a hearing
with notice thereof to every person in interest and the agency, that
the exemption of such records is clearly unnecessary to protect any
individual's right of privacy or any vital governmental function.
(4) Agency responses refusing, in whole or in part, inspection of
any public record shall include a statement of the specific exemption
authorizing the withholding of the record (or part) and a brief
explanation of how the exemption applies to the record withheld.

Sec. 12 RCW 42.56.270 and 2005 c 274 s 407 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and 43.168 RCW,
or during application for economic development loans or program
services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(b) Financial or proprietary information, data, trade secrets,
contractual agreements, or other information, including but not limited
to sales data, and acquisition and production costs, supplied to the
liquor control board by a licensee in connection with the licensee's
obligation under RCW 66.28.180, or in connection with a retail
licensee's obligation under RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, for receipt of
shipments of beer or wine from a domestic winery, brewery,
microbrewery, or certificate of approval holder under RCW 66.24.206(1)
or 66.24.270(2)(a), or for purposes of research and evaluation;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011; and
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
community, trade, and economic development:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development pursuant to RCW 43.330.050(8) and 43.330.080(4); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the office of the governor in connection with the
siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that
person's business and until a siting decision is made, identifying
information of any person supplying information under this subsection
and the locations being considered for siting, relocation, or expansion
of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of community, trade, and
economic development based on information as described in (a)(i) of
this subsection, any work product is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of community, trade, and economic development from a
person connected with siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or
relocation of that person's business, information described in (a)(ii)
of this subsection will be available to the public under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 9 and 11 of this act expire July
1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 10 and 12 of this act take effect
July 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Except for sections 10 and 12 of this act,
this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and takes effect April 14, 2006.

--- END ---