BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the
superintendent of public instruction has recommended evaluation of a
collection of evidence as an objective alternative assessment to the
high school Washington assessment of student learning. The legislature
further finds that, although the superintendent plans to permit work
samples from career and technical courses in the collection, the
legislature finds this permission inadequate to provide career and
technical students an opportunity to demonstrate the full range of
their knowledge and skills in response to the state academic standards.
Therefore, the legislature intends to create a clear objective
alternative assessment process and framework for students who enroll in
rigorous career and technical programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28C.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall develop a list of
approved career and technical education programs that qualify for the
objective alternative assessment developed under section 3 of this act.
Programs on the list must meet the following minimum criteria:
(1) Lead to a certificate or credential that is nationally
recognized by trades, industries, or other professional associations as
necessary for employment or advancement in that field;
(2) Require a vocationally intensive and rigorous course of study
with the equivalent of one thousand eighty hours of study; and
(3) Have a high potential for providing the program completer with
gainful employment or entry into a postsecondary work force training
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For each career and technical education program approved under
section 2 of this act, the superintendent of public instruction shall
identify the specific work samples that a student enrolled in the
program may collect and submit as a collection of evidence for an
objective alternative assessment under RCW 28A.655.061.
(2) The work samples shall be relevant to the career and technical
program and focus on the application of academic knowledge and skills
within the program. Work samples shall include completed activities or
projects where demonstration of academic knowledge is inferred.
(3) The work samples shall be related to the essential academic
learning requirements and state standards that students must meet to
earn a certificate of academic achievement or certificate of individual
achievement, but need not precisely correspond with each component,
strand, or level of knowledge assessed by the Washington assessment of
student learning. The superintendent of public instruction shall give
weight to the knowledge and skills that successful individuals in the
career and technical field of the approved program are expected to
possess, and the ways such knowledge and skills are typically
demonstrated.
(4) The superintendent shall consult with community and technical
colleges, employers, the work force training and education coordinating
board, apprenticeship programs, and other regional and national experts
in career and technical education to create the most appropriate
collection of work samples and other evidence of a career and technical
student's knowledge and skills on the state academic standards.

--- END ---