BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that recent
research by the University of Washington sheds light on teacher
retention, attrition, and mobility in Washington. The research
attempted to identify statewide and district patterns of teacher
behavior based on twenty sample districts. Despite some variation in
the district sample based on geographic region and size, however,
additional analysis and a more complete data set are necessary to make
valid findings for small and rural school districts in the state.
(2) The University of Washington shall continue its research on
teacher retention, attrition, and mobility and complete a study that
examines trends and patterns of teacher behavior in small and rural
school districts as compared to large and urban school districts. The
university shall submit the study findings to the education committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2006.

--- END ---