BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington trade corps fellowship
program is established in the department of community, trade, and
economic development. The purpose of the program is to promote
international trade and enhance the work of Washington's trade offices.
The program will award fellowships to students who have shown
significant interest in pursuing a career in international trade and
place them in trade offices. The fellows will be expected to learn the
practice of trade promotion and fulfill the mission of the offices to
promote overseas trade and commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply to sections 1 through
7 of this act.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Fellow" means the recipient of a Washington trade corps
fellowship award.
(3) "Institution" means an accredited public or private university
or college within the state of Washington.
(4) "Trade office" means an office located outside the United
States operated or contracted by the department of community, trade,
and economic development or the department of agriculture for the
purpose of promoting overseas trade and commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Candidates for the fellowship must be:
(a) A resident student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012;
(b) Enrolled in an institution's program offering a degree or
credential in international trade, international relations,
international business, or a related area;
(c) Proficient in the language common to the area in which they
will be placed.
(2) The department may require that fellowship candidates intern
with the department prior to final selection. The department may
impose additional requirements as necessary to facilitate the efficient
operation of its trade offices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A fellowship shall be available for no more
than five persons per year. Fellows shall serve a minimum of six
months and may serve a maximum of eighteen months. Fellows shall be
compensated with a stipend of no less than ten thousand dollars.
Fellows shall be provided living and travel expenses while overseas,
but the total cost provided by the department per fellow, per year,
shall not exceed sixty percent of the state's average yearly wage, or
twenty-five thousand dollars, whichever is greater.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department shall appoint a committee to
assist it in evaluating and selecting applicants for the fellowships.
At least three of the committee members shall be members of
organizations concerned with international trade; at least one shall be
from a statewide organization; and at least two shall represent
regional organizations from different regions of the state. At least
three of the committee members shall be from institutions and have
expertise in international trade. The decision of the department in
selecting fellows is final.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department shall assign fellows to
trade offices in consultation with each fellow's institution. No more
than two fellows shall be assigned to any trade office at one time.
(2) The department shall establish reporting requirements which the
fellows must meet. The department's reporting requirements may include
research of value to the department's international trade staff or to
trade promotion groups in the state and may be in conjunction with or
in addition to any requirements of the institution.
(3) The department may require that the fellow enter into
postfellowship employment with the department for one year and may
require that some or all of the fellowship costs be repaid if the
postfellowship employment requirement is not met.
(4) The department shall report to the legislature on the
Washington trade corps fellowship program by December 1, 2006, and by
December 1st of every other year thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Neither the department, the institution, nor
any other division of the state is liable for injuries caused by a
change in the security situation of the country in which a fellow is
stationed. Fellows shall follow all travel advisories published by the
United States department of state for the country in which they are
stationed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall make rules necessary to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 7 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.31 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2006, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---