BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.185.010 and 2004 c 186 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(3) "Commission" means the criminal justice training commission.
(4) "Collateral or security" means property of any kind given as
security to obtain a bail bond.
(5) "Bail bond agency" means a business that sells and issues
corporate surety bail bonds or that provides security in the form of
personal or real property to ensure the appearance of a criminal
defendant before the courts of this state or the United States.
(6) "Qualified bail bond agent" means an owner, sole proprietor,
partner, manager, officer, or chief operating officer of a corporation
who meets the requirements set forth in this chapter for obtaining a
bail bond agency license.
(7) "Bail bond agent" means a person who is employed by a bail bond
agency and engages in the sale or issuance of bail bonds, but does not
mean a clerical, secretarial, or other support person who does not
participate in the sale or issuance of bail bonds.
(8) "Licensee" means a bail bond agency, a bail bond agent, a
qualified bail bond agent, or a bail bond recovery agent.
(9) "Branch office" means any office physically separated from the
principal place of business of the licensee from which the licensee or
an employee or agent of the licensee conducts any activity meeting the
criteria of a bail bond agency.
(10) "Bail bond recovery agent" means a person who is under
contract with a bail bond agent to receive compensation, reward, or any
other form of lawful consideration for locating, apprehending, and
surrendering a fugitive criminal defendant for whom a bail bond has
been posted. "Bail bond recovery agent" does not include a general
authority Washington peace officer ((or)), a limited authority
Washington peace officer, or a qualified bail bond agent enforcing his
or her own bail bonds.
(11) "Contract" means a written agreement between a bail bond agent
or qualified bail bond agent and a bail bond recovery agent for the
purpose of locating, apprehending, and surrendering a fugitive criminal
defendant in exchange for lawful consideration.
(12) "Planned forced entry" means a premeditated forcible entry
into a dwelling, building, or other structure without the occupant's
knowledge or consent for the purpose of apprehending a fugitive
criminal defendant subject to a bail bond. "Planned forced entry" does
not include situations where, during an imminent or actual chase or
pursuit of a fleeing fugitive criminal defendant, or during a casual or
unintended encounter with the fugitive, the bail bond recovery agent
forcibly enters into a dwelling, building, or other structure without
advanced planning.

--- END ---