BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to provide tax exemptions to
assist dairy farmers to comply with the dairy nutrient management act,
chapter 90.64 RCW, to encourage owners of nondairy animal feeding
operations to develop and implement approved nutrient management plans,
and to assist public or private entities to establish and operate
anaerobic digesters to treat ((dairy)) livestock nutrients on a
regional or on-farm basis.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.890 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
eligible persons of services rendered in respect to operating,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of ((dairy)) livestock
nutrient management equipment and facilities, or to sales of tangible
personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of the
equipment and facilities.
(2)(a) To be eligible, the equipment and facilities must be used
exclusively for activities necessary to maintain a ((dairy)) livestock
nutrient management plan ((as required under chapter 90.64 RCW.
This)).
(b) The exemption applies to sales made after the ((dairy))
livestock nutrient management plan is: (i) Certified under chapter
90.64 RCW; (ii) approved as part of the permit issued under chapter
90.48 RCW; or (iii) approved as required under subsection (4)(c)(iii)
of this section.
(((2))) (3)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
department of agriculture must provide a list of eligible persons, as
defined in subsection (4)(c)(i) and (ii) of this section, to the
department of revenue. Conservation districts must maintain lists of
eligible persons as defined in subsection (4)(c)(iii) of this section
to allow the department of revenue to verify eligibility. The
application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department
and must contain information regarding the location of the dairy or
animal feeding operation and other information the department may
require.
(b) A person claiming an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(((3))) (4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this
section and RCW 82.12.890 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:
(a) (("Dairy nutrient management equipment and facilities" means
machinery, equipment, and structures used in the handling and treatment
of dairy manure, such as aerators, agitators, alley scrapers, augers,
dams, gutter cleaners, loaders, lagoons, pipes, pumps, separators, and
tanks. The term also includes tangible personal property that becomes
an ingredient or component of the equipment and facilities, including
repair and replacement parts)) "Animal feeding operation" means a lot
or facility, other than an aquatic animal production facility, where
the following conditions are met:
(i) Animals, other than aquatic animals, have been, are, or will be
stabled or confined and fed or maintained for a total of forty-five
days or more in any twelve-month period; and
(ii) Crops, vegetation, forage growth, or postharvest residues are
not sustained in the normal growing season over any portion of the lot
or facility.
(b) "Conservation district" means a subdivision of state government
organized under chapter 89.08 RCW.
(((b))) (c) "Eligible person" means a person (i) licensed to
produce milk under chapter 15.36 RCW who has a certified dairy nutrient
management plan ((by December 31, 2003)), as required by chapter 90.64
RCW; (ii) who owns an animal feeding operation and has a permit issued
under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (iii) who owns an animal feeding operation
and has a nutrient management plan approved by a conservation district
as meeting natural resource conservation service field office technical
guide standards.
(d) "Livestock nutrient management equipment and facilities" means
machinery, equipment, and structures used in the handling and treatment
of livestock manure, such as aerators, agitators, alley scrapers,
augers, dams, gutter cleaners, loaders, lagoons, pipes, pumps,
separators, and tanks. The term also includes tangible personal
property that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment and
facilities, including repair and replacement parts.
(e) "Permit" means either a state waste discharge permit or a
national pollutant discharge elimination system permit, or both.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.890 and 2003 c 5 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use by an eligible person of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of ((dairy)) livestock nutrient management
equipment and facilities, as defined in RCW 82.08.890, or to labor and
services rendered in respect to repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving eligible tangible personal property.
(2)(a) To be eligible, the equipment and facilities must be used
exclusively for activities necessary to maintain a ((dairy)) livestock
nutrient management plan ((as required under chapter 90.64 RCW.
This)).
(b) The exemption applies to the use of tangible personal property
or labor and services made after the ((dairy)) livestock nutrient
management plan is: (i) Certified under chapter 90.64 RCW; (ii)
approved as part of the permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (iii)
approved as required under RCW 82.08.890(4)(c)(iii).
(3) The exemption certificate and recordkeeping requirements of RCW
82.08.890 apply to this section. The definitions in RCW 82.08.890
apply to this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.08.900 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to an
eligible person establishing or operating an anaerobic digester or to
services rendered in respect to installing, constructing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving an anaerobic digester, or to sales of
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of
the anaerobic digester. The anaerobic digester must be used primarily
to treat ((dairy)) livestock manure.
(2)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department
and must contain information regarding the location of the facility and
other information as the department may require.
(b) A person claiming an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
RCW 82.12.900 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Anaerobic digester" means a facility that processes manure
from ((cattle)) livestock into biogas and dried manure using
microorganisms in a decomposition process within a closed, oxygen-free
container.
(b) "Eligible person" means any person establishing or operating an
anaerobic digester to treat primarily ((dairy)) livestock manure.
(c) "Primarily" means more than fifty percent measured by volume or
weight.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.12.900 and 2003 c 5 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of anaerobic digesters, tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of anaerobic digesters, or the use of services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving eligible tangible personal property by an eligible person
establishing or operating an anaerobic digester, as defined in RCW
82.08.900. The anaerobic digester must be used primarily to treat
((dairy)) livestock manure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The conservation commission shall compile
the following information on nutrient management plans written and
approved by conservation districts for animal feeding operations during
the 2005-2007 biennium: (1) The number of requests received to write
or approve plans; (2) the number of plans completed and approved; (3)
the total costs of writing and approving the plans, and the funding
sources used; and (4) the relationship, if any, between the tax
exemptions provided in this act and the number of plans written and
approved. In its report, the commission shall compare the totals under
subsections (1) through (3) of this section to the totals in the
previous biennium. The conservation commission shall report this
information to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---