BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.40.170 and 2005 c 247 s 2 and 2005 c 64 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A member who has served or shall serve ((on active federal
service in the military or naval forces of the United States)) in the
uniformed services, as defined in RCW 73.16.031, and who left or shall
leave an employer to enter such service shall be deemed to be on
military leave of absence ((if he or she has resumed or shall resume
employment as an employee within one year from termination thereof))
and shall receive service credit for such military leave of absence.
This service credit shall be terminated if the member receives a
dishonorable or bad conduct discharge, or is separated under other than
honorable conditions, or is dismissed from the service as permitted
under section 1161(a) of Title 10 U.S.C., or is dropped from the rolls
pursuant to section 1161(b) of Title 10 U.S.C.
(2) If he or she has applied or shall apply for reinstatement of
employment, within one year from termination of the military service,
and is refused employment for reasons beyond his or her control, he or
she shall, upon resumption of service within ten years have such
service credited to him or her.
(3) In any event, after completing twenty-five years of creditable
service, any member may have service in the armed forces credited to
him or her as a member whether or not he or she left the employ of an
employer to enter the armed service: PROVIDED, That in no instance,
described in this section, shall military service in excess of five
years be credited: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance the
member must restore all withdrawn accumulated contributions, which
restoration must be completed within five years of membership service
following the first resumption of employment or complete twenty-five
years of creditable service: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section
will not apply to any individual, not a veteran within the meaning of
RCW 41.04.005.
(4)(a) A member, after completing twenty-five years of creditable
service, who would have otherwise become eligible for a retirement
benefit as defined under this chapter while serving honorably in the
armed forces as referenced in RCW 41.04.005, shall, upon application to
the department, be eligible to receive credit for this service without
returning to covered employment.
(b) Service credit granted under (a) of this subsection applies
only to veterans as defined in RCW 41.40.005.
(5) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member
who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of
the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may,
on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service
credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in
the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased
member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or
children:
(a) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while
serving in the uniformed services; and
(b) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable
service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death.
(6) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the
uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally
incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in
the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit
under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed
services if:
(a) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or
she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions
or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services; and
(b) The member provides to the director proof of honorable
discharge from the uniformed services.

Sec. 2 RCW 38.40.110 and 1991 c 43 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
No club, society, association, corporation, employer, or
organization shall by any constitution, rule, bylaws, resolution, vote
or regulation, or otherwise, discriminate against or refuse to hire,
employ, or reemploy any member of the organized militia of Washington
because of his or her membership in said organized militia. No club,
society, association, corporation, employer, or organization shall
inquire about a person's membership in the organized militia of this or
any other state, territory, or commonwealth, or membership in the
uniformed services, unless such membership or former membership is a
condition of employment, or the employer has a formal written policy of
providing preference in hiring to veterans or current members of the
uniformed services, or unless such membership or former membership is
a requirement for membership in the club, society, association, or
organization. Any person or persons, club, society, association,
employer, corporation, or organization, violating or aiding, abetting,
or assisting in the violation of any provision of this section shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be fined in any
sum not exceeding one hundred dollars and in addition thereto shall
forfeit the right to do business for a period of thirty days. Any
person who has been discriminated against in violation of this section
shall have a civil cause of action for damages.

--- END ---