BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the department determines that the health, safety, or
welfare of residents is immediately jeopardized by a boarding home's
failure or refusal to comply with the requirements of this chapter or
the rules adopted under this chapter, and the department summarily
suspends the boarding home license, the department may appoint a
temporary manager of the boarding home, or the licensee may, subject to
the department's approval, voluntarily participate in the temporary
management program.
The purposes of the temporary management program are as follows:
(a) To mitigate dislocation and transfer trauma of residents while
the department and licensee may pursue dispute resolution or appeal of
a summary suspension of license;
(b) To facilitate the continuity of safe and appropriate resident
care and services;
(c) To protect the health, safety, and welfare of residents, by
providing time for an orderly closure of the boarding home or for the
deficiencies that necessitated temporary management to be corrected;
and
(d) To preserve a residential option that meets a specialized
service need or is in a geographical area that has a lack of available
providers.
(2) The department may recruit, approve, and appoint qualified
individuals, partnerships, corporations, and other entities interested
in serving as temporary managers of boarding homes. These individuals
and entities shall satisfy the criteria established under this chapter
or by the department for approving licensees. The department shall not
approve or appoint any person, including partnerships and other
entities, if that person is affiliated with the boarding home subject
to the temporary management or has owned or operated a boarding home
ordered into temporary management or receivership in any state. When
approving or appointing a temporary manager, the department shall
consider the temporary manager's past experience in long-term care, the
quality of care provided, the temporary manager's availability, and the
person's familiarity with applicable state and federal laws. Subject
to the provisions of this section, the department's authority to
approve or appoint a temporary manager is discretionary and not subject
to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) When the department appoints a temporary manager, the
department shall enter into a contract with the temporary manager and
shall order the licensee to cease operating the boarding home and
immediately turn over to the temporary manager possession and control
of the boarding home, including but not limited to all resident care
records, financial records, and other records necessary for operation
of the facility while temporary management is in effect. If the
department has not appointed a temporary manager and the licensee
elects to participate in the temporary management program, the licensee
shall select the temporary manager, subject to the department's
approval, and enter into a contract with the temporary manager,
consistent with this section. The department shall have the discretion
to approve or revoke any temporary management arrangements made by the
licensee.
(4) When the department appoints a temporary manager, the costs
associated with the temporary management may be paid for through the
civil penalty account established by section 2 of this act, or from
other departmental funds, or a combination thereof. All funds must be
administered according to department procedures. The department may
enter into an agreement with the licensee allowing the licensee to pay
for some of the costs associated with a temporary manager appointed by
the department. If the department has not appointed a temporary
manager and the licensee elects to participate in the temporary
management program, the licensee is responsible for all costs related
to administering the temporary management program at the boarding home
and contracting with the temporary manager.
(5) The temporary manager shall assume full responsibility for the
daily operations of the boarding home and is responsible for correcting
cited deficiencies and ensuring that all minimum licensing requirements
are met. The temporary manager must comply with all state and federal
laws and regulations applicable to boarding homes. The temporary
manager shall protect the health, safety, and welfare of the residents
for the duration of the temporary management and shall perform all acts
reasonably necessary to ensure residents' needs are met. The temporary
management contract shall address the responsibility of the temporary
manager to pay past due debts. The temporary manager's specific
responsibilities may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Receiving and expending in a prudent and business-like manner
all current revenues of the boarding home, provided that priority is
given to debts and expenditures directly related to providing care and
meeting residents' needs;
(b) Hiring and managing all consultants and employees and firing
them for good cause;
(c) Making necessary purchases, repairs, and replacements, provided
that such expenditures in excess of five thousand dollars by a
temporary manager appointed by the department must be approved by the
department;
(d) Entering into contracts necessary for the operation of the
boarding home;
(e) Preserving resident trust funds and resident records; and
(f) Preparing all department-required reports, including a detailed
monthly accounting of all expenditures and liabilities, which shall be
sent to the department and the licensee.
(6) The licensee and department shall provide written notification
immediately to all residents, resident representatives, interested
family members, and the state long-term care ombudsman program of the
temporary management and the reasons for it. This notification shall
include notice that residents may move from the boarding home without
notifying the licensee or temporary manager in advance, and without
incurring any charges, fees, or costs otherwise available for
insufficient advance notice, during the temporary management period.
The notification shall also inform residents and their families or
representatives that the temporary management team will provide
residents help with relocation and appropriate discharge planning and
coordination if desired. The department shall provide assistance with
relocation to residents who are department clients and may provide such
assistance to other residents. The temporary manager shall meet
regularly with staff, residents, residents' representatives, and
families to inform them of the plans for and progress achieved in the
correction of deficiencies, and of the plans for facility closure or
continued operation.
(7) The department shall terminate temporary management:
(a) After sixty days unless good cause is shown to continue the
temporary management. Good cause for continuing the temporary
management exists when returning the boarding home to its former
licensee would subject residents to a threat to health, safety, or
welfare;
(b) When all residents are transferred and the boarding home is
closed;
(c) When deficiencies threatening residents' health, safety, or
welfare are eliminated and the former licensee agrees to department-specified conditions regarding the continued facility operation; or
(d) When a new licensee assumes control of the boarding home.
Nothing in this section precludes the department from revoking its
approval of the temporary management or exercising its licensing
enforcement authority under this chapter. The department's decision
whether to approve or to revoke a temporary management arrangement is
not subject to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(8) The department shall indemnify, defend, and hold harmless any
temporary manager appointed or approved under this section against
claims made against the temporary manager for any actions by the
temporary manager or its agents that do not amount to intentional torts
or criminal behavior.
(9) The department may adopt rules implementing this section. In
the development of rules or policies implementing this section, the
department shall consult with residents and their representatives,
resident advocates, financial professionals, boarding home providers,
and organizations representing boarding homes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The civil penalty account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from civil penalties collected under this
chapter must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for the protection of the health, safety,
welfare, or property of residents of boarding homes found to be
deficient. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures. Uses of the account include, but are not
limited to:
(1) Payment for the costs of relocation of residents to other
facilities;
(2) Payment to maintain operation of a boarding home pending
correction of deficiencies or closure, including payment of costs
associated with temporary management authorized under this chapter; and
(3) Reimbursement of residents for personal funds or property lost
or stolen when the resident's personal funds or property cannot be
recovered from the boarding home or third-party insurer.

--- END ---