BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.20.195 and 2005 c 506 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The licensee or its designee has the right to an informal
dispute resolution process to dispute any violation found or
enforcement remedy imposed by the department during a licensing
inspection or complaint investigation. The purpose of the informal
dispute resolution process is to provide an opportunity for an exchange
of information that may lead to the modification, deletion, or removal
of a violation, or parts of a violation, or enforcement remedy imposed
by the department.
(2) The informal dispute resolution process provided by the
department shall include, but is not necessarily limited to, an
opportunity for review by a department employee who did not participate
in, or oversee, the determination of the violation or enforcement
remedy under dispute. The department shall develop, or further
develop, an informal dispute resolution process consistent with this
section.
(3) A request for an informal dispute resolution shall be made to
the department within ten working days from the receipt of a written
finding of a violation or enforcement remedy. The request shall
identify the violation or violations and enforcement remedy or remedies
being disputed. The department shall convene a meeting, when possible,
within ten working days of receipt of the request for informal dispute
resolution, unless by mutual agreement a later date is agreed upon.
(4) The department shall provide an opportunity during the informal
dispute resolution process for input from interested residents and
resident representatives. This input shall be provided in a meeting,
conducted either by telephone or in person, that is separate from the
department's meeting with the licensee or its designee. "Resident
representatives" means those individuals with authority to act on
behalf of residents with diminished capacity, including guardians,
trustees, agents holding durable power of attorney, and family members
with authority under RCW 7.70.065. Representatives of the long-term
care ombudsman program may also provide input at the request of
residents, their representatives, or the department.
(5) If the department determines that a violation or enforcement
remedy should not be cited or imposed, the department shall delete the
violation or immediately rescind or modify the enforcement remedy. If
the department determines that a violation should have been cited under
a different more appropriate regulation, the department shall revise
the report, statement of deficiencies, or enforcement remedy
accordingly. Upon request, the department shall issue a clean copy of
the revised report, statement of deficiencies, or notice of enforcement
action.
(((5))) (6) The request for informal dispute resolution does not
delay the effective date of any enforcement remedy imposed by the
department, except that civil monetary fines are not payable until the
exhaustion of any formal hearing and appeal rights provided under this
chapter. The licensee shall submit to the department, within the time
period prescribed by the department, a plan of correction to address
any undisputed violations, and including any violations that still
remain following the informal dispute resolution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.51 RCW
to read as follows:
Whenever the department conducts an informal dispute resolution
process with the nursing home provider, following a licensing or
certification survey or a complaint investigation, the department shall
provide an opportunity for input from interested residents and resident
representatives. This input shall be provided in a meeting, conducted
either by telephone or in person, that is separate from the
department's meeting with the nursing home provider. "Resident
representatives" means those individuals with authority to act on
behalf of residents with diminished capacity, including guardians,
trustees, agents holding durable power of attorney, and family members
with authority under RCW 7.70.065. Representatives of the long-term
care ombudsman program may also provide input at the request of
residents, their representatives, or the department.

--- END ---