BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington's agricultural forest products industry is a vital
component of Washington's economy and has a direct relationship to the
economic health and welfare of workers, rural communities, and
businesses.
(2) Central to the viability of the forest products industry is a
stable work force of loggers and log haulers available to harvest and
transport wood from Washington's forests. This stability is
endangered, threatening the viability of rural communities and the
employment of those in the forests products sector.
(3) Based on patterns and configurations of forest landownership,
the harvesting and hauling of forest products are performed by numerous
loggers and truckers who, in many cases, despite being labeled
"independent contractors" are economically dependent and thus
effectively employees of forest landowners. The compensation and
bargaining position of those individuals are adversely affected unless
they are able to join together voluntarily in cooperative associations.
(4) An imbalance of market power exists when one forest landowner
owns, possesses, or acquires economic control over more than one
hundred thousand acres of forest in a labor market area.
(5) The inequity of power in determining compensation and the lack
of opportunity to join together in bargaining over compensation results
in unfair contract rates for the services of loggers and log haulers.
This imbalance prevents the labor market from operating in a manner
suitable for the public interest of Washington citizens.
(6) Membership in such an association is meaningful only if a
landowner contracting for harvesting and hauling of forest products is
required to bargain in good faith with the association as the
representative of its members.
(7) It is in the public interest to ensure a reasonable rate of
compensation for log harvesting and log hauling services and enacts
this chapter to create a process whereby a system of rate setting
through collective bargaining is established between large commercial
landowners and log harvesters and log haulers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cooperative association" includes a cooperative membership-based entity whose purpose is to promote the interests of those engaged
in the agricultural activities of harvesting and hauling of logs
through rate setting and is registered as such with the state of
Washington and represents at least fifty harvesters or haulers or any
combination thereof in a labor market area.
(2) "Economic control" means the legal right, whether through
ownership, contract, or otherwise to make or influence decisions
regarding the harvest of trees and disposition in general of logs on
subject land.
(3) "Forest land" means agricultural forest land used primarily for
the growth of trees to be harvested for commercial use.
(4) "Forest landowner" means:
(a) A person, corporation, limited partnership, government,
municipality, or any form of business organization registered with the
state of Washington that owns directly, or through affiliated persons,
or possesses economic control over, more than one hundred thousand
acres in a labor market area; or
(b) An agent or subsidiary of a person described in (a) of this
subsection if that agent or subsidiary is involved in contracting or
negotiating contracts or other arrangements, written or oral, with
forest products harvesters or forest products haulers.
(5) "Forest products harvester or hauler" means a person having a
place of business in this state who is engaged in the agricultural
activity of harvesting trees or hauling harvested trees from forest
land in the state under a contract or subcontract, directly or
indirectly, for a forest landowner.
(6) "Labor market area" means those counties in one of two forest
excise tax hauling areas set forth by the Washington state department
of revenue for the purposes of applying the forest excise tax as
follows:
(a) Those counties located in hauling areas 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, and 10
are in one labor market; and
(b) Those counties located in hauling areas 6 and 7 are in a second
labor market area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) To establish rates of compensation for
log harvesting and log hauling services, harvesters and haulers may
join together and form cooperative associations to meet, confer, share
information, and take other collective action as may be intended to
support their participation in the processes contemplated by this
chapter leading to the approval of rates by the utilities and
transportation commission.
(2) In approving rates with respect to any given forest landowner,
the utilities and transportation commission must consider the following
criteria. Rates need not be unitary and may take into account
variations in these criteria with respect to different portions of the
subject land or operations thereon:
(a) The harvester's or hauler's costs, including, but not limited
to, wages, overhead, fuel, insurance including health insurance,
pensions or other retirement costs, and the cost of replacing
equipment;
(b) Environmental and highway laws or rules;
(c) The impact of the award on the competitive position of the
landowner in the market area or competing market areas;
(d) A fair return on investment for all parties;
(e) The species of tree, type of machinery, typography of the site
to be harvested, and method of tree harvesting involved;
(f) The amount of hauling conducted on private roads and the amount
of hauling conducted on public roads including travel time from the
hauling site to the delivery site and the conditions of the road; and
(g) Safety considerations.
(3) Rates may be submitted to the utilities and transportation
commission for review and approval in one of the two following ways:
(a) Cooperative associations may meet and negotiate with forest
landowners in order to determine reasonable rates to be paid for
harvesting or hauling services in the state of Washington. If these
negotiations are successful, the rates may be mutually proposed to the
utilities and transportation commission; or
(b) If the negotiations under (a) of this subsection are
unsuccessful, either party can demand binding arbitration. The
arbitrator must use the criteria set out in subsection (2) of this
section. The arbitrator must award one of the two proposals offered by
the parties, and that award will be forwarded to the utilities and
transportation commission.
(4) All submissions to the utilities and transportation commission
for the review and approval of rates shall be accompanied by the
following information:
(a) The identity of the forest landowner who owns or possesses
economic control over the land on which the rates are to apply and the
geographic area in which the rates are to apply;
(b) The rates as negotiated or arbitrated;
(c) A summary of relevant negotiations; and
(d) Other information relevant to the factors needed for the
utilities and transportation commission to make its decision, and as
otherwise requested by the commission.
(5) When the utilities and transportation commission receives the
submission of a negotiated or arbitrated rate, it must notify all
persons who have requested to be notified of submissions. These
persons have thirty days to comment on the submission, and the
commission must review these comments in approving rates. The
commission must reject any submission that resulted from a negotiation
or arbitration that was not conducted at arm's length.
(6) Once rates have been approved by the state of Washington they
remain in effect for that labor market area for one calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A forest landowner violates this chapter if
that forest landowner:
(1) Pays rates for harvesting or hauling services in the state
other than the utilities and transportation commission's approved
rates, if any, for that service in that harvesting and hauling area; or
(2) Discriminates against any person for initiating or
participating in a rate determination proceeding under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This chapter does not prohibit the
negotiation and execution of a contract between a forest landowner and
an individual harvester or hauler that provides for the payment of
compensation rates other than those determined under this chapter, as
long as no utilities and transportation commission's approved rates
applicable to the service or area being provided exist.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This chapter is intended to displace
existing market forces based on a legislative finding that such forces
are insufficient to permit the affected market to function normally.
Activities carried out under this chapter do not constitute a
conspiracy, or a combination in restraint of trade or an illegal
monopoly, nor are they carried out for the purposes of lessening
competition or fixing prices arbitrarily, as long as the activities are
carried out for the purpose of preparing, initiating, or participating
in a rate determination process under this chapter. A contract or
agreement entered into under negotiations between a forest landowner
and a cooperative group of harvesters or haulers is not an unlawful
restraint in trade or part of a conspiracy or combination to accomplish
an improper or illegal purpose or act, as long as the resulting price
is approved by the utilities and transportation commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---