BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In developing a general permit under this chapter, the
department must prepare an economic impact analysis on all draft
general permits that are intended to directly cover small business, as
that term is defined in RCW 19.85.020. The economic impact analysis
must be published with the draft general permit.
(2) The economic impact analysis must be used as a basis to reduce
the economic impact of the general permit on small businesses by
implementing one or more of the following when it is legal and feasible
in meeting the stated objectives of the federal water pollution control
act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.) and this chapter:
(a) Establishing differing compliance or reporting requirements or
timetables for small businesses;
(b) Simplifying, reducing, or eliminating the compliance,
monitoring, recordkeeping, and reporting requirements under the general
permit for small businesses;
(c) Establishing performance standards rather than design
standards; and
(d) Exempting small businesses from parts of the general permit.
(3) The contents of an economic impact analysis of a proposed
general permit must include, at a minimum, the following:
(a) A brief description of the compliance requirements of the
general permit, including:
(i) The minimum technology-based treatment requirements;
(ii) The monitoring requirements contained in the general permit;
(iii) The reporting and recordkeeping requirements; and
(iv) Any plan submittal requirements;
(b) The estimated costs of compliance for facilities intended to be
covered under the general permit. Costs include, consistent with
subsection (2) of this section, the following:
(i) The costs associated with (a) of this subsection;
(ii) The costs of equipment, supplies, labor, and any increased
administrative costs; and
(iii) The costs of professional services likely needed to comply
with the general permit;
(c) A comparison, to the greatest extent possible, of the cost of
compliance for small businesses with the cost of compliance for the
largest ten percent of the facilities intended to be covered under the
general permit. The economic impact analysis must use one or more of
the following as a basis for comparing costs:
(i) Cost per employee;
(ii) Cost per hour of labor; or
(iii) Cost per one hundred dollars of sales.
(4) To obtain information for purposes of this section, an agency
should survey a representative sample of affected businesses or trade
associations to assist in the accurate assessment of the costs of the
proposed general permit, and the means to reduce the costs imposed on
small businesses.

--- END ---