BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
mandatory DNA testing act of 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) On September 9, 2005, Kirk Bloodsworth was freed from death row
based on postconviction DNA testing;
(b) On May 27, 2005, Texas passed a law stating that all felons are
required to submit a DNA sample to the Texas department of criminal
justice;
(c) Since 1993, one hundred twenty-three individuals have been
exonerated through postconviction DNA testing;
(d) The Green river killer, Gary Ridgeway, was identified as being
guilty based on DNA tests; and
(e) In Maryland, on January 1, 2004, a student senate passed a bill
mandating postconviction DNA testing prior to the imposition of the
death penalty.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to:
(a) Provide the court with a one hundred percent guarantee that the
one that is facing possible capital punishment is, in fact, guilty of
the crime committed; and
(b) Ensure that innocent people are not being executed for crimes
they have not committed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 10.95 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and without exception,
the death penalty may not be imposed upon a person convicted of
aggravated first degree murder unless DNA evidence was used in the
person's conviction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
March 1, 2006.

--- END ---