BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington state institute for public
policy is directed to investigate and report to the legislature by
January 1, 2007, on the fiscal and other costs and benefits to the
various governments and people of the state of Washington from the
implementation of current Washington state policies on controlled
substances, excluding alcohol, tobacco, and pharmaceuticals.

--- END ---