BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.185C
RCW to read as follows:
Due to concerns about maintaining freedom of religious expression,
faith communities shall not be restricted from hosting temporary
encampments for the homeless. A temporary encampment may be subject to
reasonable compliance requirements related to public health and safety.
However, no county, city, or town shall set less than ninety days as
the maximum duration for homeless encampments.

--- END ---