BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that preservation of
agricultural land is important to the state's economy and the
environment. The legislature intends to add purchase of development
rights of agricultural land as another option for environmental
mitigation of transportation projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.12 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purpose of environmental mitigation of transportation
projects, any county may require the department of transportation to
participate in the county's purchase of development rights program. If
the county requires the department's participation, the department
shall transfer to the county's purchase of development rights program
environmental mitigation moneys for transportation projects. Rights in
perpetuity to future development of any open space land, farm and
agricultural land, and timber land which are so designated by the
county may be used as environmental mitigation moneys for
transportation projects in lieu of wetlands or other mitigation
required for a specific transportation project.

--- END ---