BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.030 and 2005 c 197 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Air contaminant" means dust, fumes, mist, smoke, other
particulate matter, vapor, gas, odorous substance, or any combination
thereof.
(2) "Air pollution" is presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one or
more air contaminants in sufficient quantities and of such
characteristics and duration as is, or is likely to be, injurious to
human health, plant or animal life, or property, or which unreasonably
interfere with enjoyment of life and property. For the purpose of this
chapter, air pollution shall not include air contaminants emitted in
compliance with chapter 17.21 RCW.
(3) "Air quality standard" means an established concentration,
exposure time, and frequency of occurrence of an air contaminant or
multiple contaminants in the ambient air which shall not be exceeded.
(4) "Ambient air" means the surrounding outside air.
(5) "Authority" means any air pollution control agency whose
jurisdictional boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of one or
more counties.
(6) "Best available control technology" (BACT) means an emission
limitation based on the maximum degree of reduction for each air
pollutant subject to regulation under this chapter emitted from or that
results from any new or modified stationary source, that the permitting
authority, on a case-by-case basis, taking into account energy,
environmental, and economic impacts and other costs, determines is
achievable for such a source or modification through application of
production processes and available methods, systems, and techniques,
including fuel cleaning, clean fuels, or treatment or innovative fuel
combustion techniques for control of each such a pollutant. In no
event shall application of "best available control technology" result
in emissions of any pollutants that will exceed the emissions allowed
by any applicable standard under 40 C.F.R. Part 60 and Part 61, as they
exist on July 25, 1993, or their later enactments as adopted by
reference by the director by rule. Emissions from any source utilizing
clean fuels, or any other means, to comply with this subsection shall
not be allowed to increase above levels that would have been required
under the definition of BACT as it existed prior to enactment of the
federal clean air act amendments of 1990.
(7) "Best available retrofit technology" (BART) means an emission
limitation based on the degree of reduction achievable through the
application of the best system of continuous emission reduction for
each pollutant that is emitted by an existing stationary facility. The
emission limitation must be established, on a case-by-case basis,
taking into consideration the technology available, the costs of
compliance, the energy and nonair quality environmental impacts of
compliance, any pollution control equipment in use or in existence at
the source, the remaining useful life of the source, and the degree of
improvement in visibility that might reasonably be anticipated to
result from the use of the technology.
(8) "Board" means the board of directors of an authority.
(9) "Control officer" means the air pollution control officer of
any authority.
(10) "Department" or "ecology" means the department of ecology.
(11) "Emission" means a release of air contaminants into the
ambient air.
(12) "Emission standard" and "emission limitation" mean a
requirement established under the federal clean air act or this chapter
that limits the quantity, rate, or concentration of emissions of air
contaminants on a continuous basis, including any requirement relating
to the operation or maintenance of a source to assure continuous
emission reduction, and any design, equipment, work practice, or
operational standard adopted under the federal clean air act or this
chapter.
(13) "Fine particulate" means particulates with a diameter of two
and one-half microns and smaller.
(14) "Lowest achievable emission rate" (LAER) means for any source
that rate of emissions that reflects:
(a) The most stringent emission limitation that is contained in the
implementation plan of any state for such class or category of source,
unless the owner or operator of the proposed source demonstrates that
such limitations are not achievable; or
(b) The most stringent emission limitation that is achieved in
practice by such class or category of source, whichever is more
stringent.
In no event shall the application of this term permit a proposed
new or modified source to emit any pollutant in excess of the amount
allowable under applicable new source performance standards.
(15) "Mercury-emitting facility" means any facility that combusts
coal or another fossil fuel, as that term is defined in RCW 80.70.010,
in order to produce electricity that is offered for sale or used
outside of the facility.
(16) "Modification" means any physical change in, or change in the
method of operation of, a stationary source that increases the amount
of any air contaminant emitted by such source or that results in the
emission of any air contaminant not previously emitted. The term
modification shall be construed consistent with the definition of
modification in Section 7411, Title 42, United States Code, and with
rules implementing that section.
(((16))) (17) "Multicounty authority" means an authority which
consists of two or more counties.
(((17))) (18) "New source" means (a) the construction or
modification of a stationary source that increases the amount of any
air contaminant emitted by such source or that results in the emission
of any air contaminant not previously emitted, and (b) any other
project that constitutes a new source under the federal clean air act.
(((18))) (19) "Permit program source" means a source required to
apply for or to maintain an operating permit under RCW 70.94.161.
(((19))) (20) "Person" means an individual, firm, public or private
corporation, association, partnership, political subdivision of the
state, municipality, or governmental agency.
(((20))) (21) "Reasonably available control technology" (RACT)
means the lowest emission limit that a particular source or source
category is capable of meeting by the application of control technology
that is reasonably available considering technological and economic
feasibility. RACT is determined on a case-by-case basis for an
individual source or source category taking into account the impact of
the source upon air quality, the availability of additional controls,
the emission reduction to be achieved by additional controls, the
impact of additional controls on air quality, and the capital and
operating costs of the additional controls. RACT requirements for a
source or source category shall be adopted only after notice and
opportunity for comment are afforded.
(((21))) (22) "Silvicultural burning" means burning of wood fiber
on forest land consistent with the provisions of RCW 70.94.660.
(((22))) (23) "Source" means all of the emissions units including
quantifiable fugitive emissions, that are located on one or more
contiguous or adjacent properties, and are under the control of the
same person, or persons under common control, whose activities are
ancillary to the production of a single product or functionally related
group of products.
(((23))) (24) "Stationary source" means any building, structure,
facility, or installation that emits or may emit any air contaminant.
(((24))) (25) "Trigger level" means the ambient level of fine
particulates, measured in micrograms per cubic meter, that must be
detected prior to initiating a first or second stage of impaired air
quality under RCW 70.94.473.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2010, the owner or operator of a mercury-emitting
facility shall either:
(a) Satisfy an emission standard of equal to or less than 0.6
pounds per trillion British thermal units produced; or
(b) Satisfy an emission standard equal to or greater than a ninety
percent reduction of mercury emissions.
(2) The owner or operator of a mercury-emitting facility that is
operational before the effective date of this act may choose which
emission standard established in subsection (1) of this section will be
satisfied. Mercury-emitting facilities that become operational after
the effective date of this act may only be deemed in compliance with
this section if the facilities satisfy the requirements of subsection
(1)(a) of this section.
(3) The department shall determine a process for obtaining
representative fuel samples and analysis in order to confirm compliance
with this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.94.161 and 1993 c 252 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of ecology, or board of an authority, shall require
renewable permits for the operation of air contaminant sources subject
to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) Permits shall be issued for a term of five years. A permit may
be modified or amended during its term at the request of the permittee,
or for any reason allowed by the federal clean air act. The rules
adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall include rules
for permit amendments and modifications. The terms and conditions of
a permit shall remain in effect after the permit itself expires if the
permittee submits a timely and complete application for permit renewal.
(2)(a) Rules establishing the elements for a statewide operating
permit program and the process for permit application and renewal
consistent with federal requirements shall be established by the
department ((by January 1, 1993)). The rules shall provide that every
proposed permit must be reviewed prior to issuance by a professional
engineer or staff under the direct supervision of a professional
engineer in the employ of the permitting authority. The permit program
established by these rules shall be administered by the department and
delegated local air authorities. Rules developed under this subsection
shall not preclude a delegated local air authority from including in a
permit its own more stringent emission standards and operating
restrictions.
(b) The board of any local air pollution control authority may
apply to the department of ecology for a delegation order authorizing
the local authority to administer the operating permit program for
sources under that authority's jurisdiction. The department shall, by
order, approve such delegation, if the department finds that the local
authority has the technical and financial resources, to discharge the
responsibilities of a permitting authority under the federal clean air
act. A delegation request shall include adequate information about the
local authority's resources to enable the department to make the
findings required by this subsection((; provided,)). Any delegation
order issued under this subsection shall take effect ninety days after
the environmental protection agency authorizes the local authority to
issue operating permits under the federal clean air act.
(c) Except for the authority granted the energy facility site
evaluation council to issue permits for the new construction,
reconstruction, or enlargement or operation of new energy facilities
under chapter 80.50 RCW, the department may exercise the authority, as
delegated by the environmental protection agency, to administer Title
IV of the federal clean air act as amended and to delegate such
administration to local authorities as applicable pursuant to (b) of
this subsection.
(3) In establishing technical standards, defined in RCW 70.94.030,
the permitting authority shall consider and, if found to be
appropriate, give credit for waste reduction within the process.
(4) Operating permits shall apply to all sources (a) where required
by the federal clean air act, and (b) for any source that may cause or
contribute to air pollution in such quantity as to create a threat to
the public health or welfare. Subsection (b) of this subsection is not
intended to apply to small businesses except when both of the following
limitations are satisfied: (i) The source is in an area exceeding or
threatening to exceed federal or state air quality standards; and (ii)
the department provides a reasonable justification that requiring a
source to have a permit is necessary to meet a federal or state air
quality standard, or to prevent exceeding a standard in an area
threatening to exceed the standard. For purposes of this subsection
"areas threatening to exceed air quality standards" shall mean areas
projected by the department to exceed such standards within five years.
Prior to identifying threatened areas the department shall hold a
public hearing or hearings within the proposed areas.
(5) Sources operated by government agencies are not exempt under
this section.
(6) Within one hundred eighty days after the United States
environmental protection agency approves the state operating permit
program, a person required to have a permit shall submit to the
permitting authority a compliance plan and permit application, signed
by a responsible official, certifying the accuracy of the information
submitted. Until permits are issued, existing sources shall be allowed
to operate under presently applicable standards and conditions provided
that such sources submit complete and timely permit applications.
(7) All draft permits shall be subject to public notice and
comment. The rules adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section
shall specify procedures for public notice and comment. Such
procedures shall provide the permitting agency with an opportunity to
respond to comments received from interested parties prior to the time
that the proposed permit is submitted to the environmental protection
agency for review pursuant to section 505(a) of the federal clean air
act. In the event that the environmental protection agency objects to
a proposed permit pursuant to section 505(b) of the federal clean air
act, the permitting authority shall not issue the permit, unless the
permittee consents to the changes required by the environmental
protection agency.
(8) The procedures contained in chapter 43.21B RCW shall apply to
permit appeals. The pollution control hearings board may stay the
effectiveness of any permit issued under this section during the
pendency of an appeal filed by the permittee, if the permittee
demonstrates that compliance with the permit during the pendency of the
appeal would require significant expenditures that would not be
necessary in the event that the permittee prevailed on the merits of
the appeal.
(9) After the effective date of any permit program ((promulgated))
adopted under this section, it shall be unlawful for any person to:
(a) Operate a permitted source in violation of any requirement of a
permit issued under this section; or (b) fail to submit a permit
application at the time required by rules adopted under subsection (2)
of this section.
(10) Each air operating permit shall state the origin of and
specific legal authority for each requirement included therein. Every
requirement in an operating permit shall be based upon the most
stringent of the following requirements:
(a) The federal clean air act and rules implementing that act,
including provision of the approved state implementation plan;
(b) This chapter and rules adopted thereunder;
(c) In permits issued by a local air pollution control authority,
the requirements of any order or regulation adopted by that authority;
(d) Chapter 70.98 RCW and rules adopted thereunder; and
(e) Chapter 80.50 RCW and rules adopted thereunder.
(11) Consistent with the provisions of the federal clean air act,
the permitting authority may issue general permits covering categories
of permitted sources, and temporary permits authorizing emissions from
similar operations at multiple temporary locations.
(12) Permit program sources within the territorial jurisdiction of
an authority delegated the operating permit program shall file their
permit applications with that authority, except that permit
applications for sources regulated on a statewide basis pursuant to RCW
70.94.395 shall be filed with the department. Permit program sources
outside the territorial jurisdiction of a delegated authority shall
file their applications with the department. Permit program sources
subject to chapter 80.50 RCW shall, irrespective of their location,
file their applications with the energy facility site evaluation
council.
(13) When issuing operating permits to coal fired electric
generating plants, the permitting authority shall establish
requirements consistent with Title IV of the federal clean air act.
(14)(((a) The department and the local air authorities are
authorized to assess and to collect, and each source emitting one
hundred tons or more per year of a regulated pollutant shall pay an
interim assessment to fund the development of the operating permit
program during fiscal year 1994.
(b) The department shall conduct a workload analysis and prepare an
operating permit program development budget for fiscal year 1994. The
department shall allocate among all sources emitting one hundred tons
or more per year of a regulated pollutant during calendar year 1992 the
costs identified in its program development budget according to a
three-tiered model, with each of the three tiers being equally
weighted, based upon:
(i) The number of sources;
(ii) The complexity of sources; and
(iii) The size of sources, as measured by the quantity of each
regulated pollutant emitted by the source.
(c) Each local authority and the department shall collect from
sources under their respective jurisdictions the interim fee determined
by the department and shall remit the fee to the department.
(d) Each local authority may, in addition, allocate its fiscal year
1994 operating permit program development costs among the sources under
its jurisdiction emitting one hundred tons or more per year of a
regulated pollutant during calendar year 1992 and may collect an
interim fee from these sources. A fee assessed pursuant to this
subsection (14)(d) shall be collected at the same time as the fee
assessed pursuant to (c) of this subsection.
(e) The fees assessed to a source under this subsection shall be
limited to the first seven thousand five hundred tons for each
regulated pollutant per year.
(15) The department shall determine the persons liable for the fee
imposed by subsection (14) of this section, compute the fee, and
provide by November 1 of 1993 the identity of the fee payer with the
computation of the fee to each local authority and to the department of
revenue for collection. The department of revenue shall collect the
fee computed by the department from the fee payers under the
jurisdiction of the department. The administrative, collection, and
penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW shall apply to the collection
of the fee by the department of revenue. The department shall provide
technical assistance to the department of revenue for decisions made by
the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 82.32.160 and 82.32.170. All
interim fees collected by the department of revenue on behalf of the
department and all interim fees collected by local authorities on
behalf of the department shall be deposited in the air operating permit
account. The interim fees collected by the local air authorities to
cover their permit program development costs under subsection (14)(d)
of this section shall be deposited in the dedicated accounts of their
respective treasuries.
All fees identified in this section shall be due and payable on
March 1 of 1994, except that the local air pollution control
authorities may adopt by rule an earlier date on which fees are to be
due and payable. The section 5, chapter 252, Laws of 1993 amendments
to RCW 70.94.161 do not have the effect of terminating, or in any way
modifying, any liability, civil or criminal, incurred pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 70.94.161 (15) and (17) as they existed prior to July
25, 1993.
(16))) For sources or source categories not required to obtain
permits under subsection (4) of this section, the department or local
authority may establish by rule control technology requirements. If
control technology rule revisions are made by the department or local
authority under this subsection, the department or local authority
shall consider the remaining useful life of control equipment
previously installed on existing sources before requiring technology
changes. The department or any local air authority may issue a general
permit, as authorized under the federal clean air act, for such
sources.
(((17))) (15) RCW 70.94.151 shall not apply to any permit program
source after the effective date of United States environmental
protection agency approval of the state operating permit program.
(16) Permits approved under this section for mercury-emitting
facilities may not be renewed after June 1, 2010, if the mercury-emitting facility is not in compliance with section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.94.422 and 1993 c 252 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of health shall have all the enforcement powers
as provided in RCW 70.94.332, 70.94.425, 70.94.430, 70.94.431 (1)
through (7), and 70.94.435 with respect to emissions of radionuclides.
This section does not preclude the department of ecology from
exercising its authority under this chapter.
(2) Permits for energy facilities subject to chapter 80.50 RCW
shall be issued by the energy facility site evaluation council.
However, the permits become effective only if the governor approves an
application for certification and executes a certification agreement
under chapter 80.50 RCW. The council shall have all powers necessary
to administer an operating permits program pertaining to such
facilities, consistent with applicable air quality standards
established by the department or local air pollution control
authorities, or both, and to obtain the approval of the United States
environmental protection agency. The council's powers include, but are
not limited to, all of the enforcement powers provided in RCW
70.94.332, 70.94.425, 70.94.430, 70.94.431 (1) through (7), and
70.94.435 with respect to permit program sources required to obtain
certification from the council under chapter 80.50 RCW. To the extent
not covered under RCW 80.50.071, the council may collect fees as
granted to delegated local air authorities under RCW 70.94.152,
((70.94.161 (14) and (15),)) 70.94.162, and 70.94.154(7) with respect
to permit program sources required to obtain certification from the
council under chapter 80.50 RCW. The council and the department shall
each establish procedures that provide maximum coordination and avoid
duplication between the two agencies in carrying out the requirements
of this chapter.

--- END ---