BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the aquatic lands
program in the department of natural resources manages over two million
acres of state-owned aquatic lands. The legislature further finds that
the state faces a diverse and complex set of issues in managing state
lands for public access, leasing aquatic lands for commercial purposes,
the harvest of geoduck, providing proper stewardship of near-shore
areas, cleanup of hazardous materials on aquatic lands, and a number of
other issues. The legislature further finds that the funding for these
activities largely comes from the revenues generated from the leasing
of state aquatic lands and the sale of valuable materials, including
geoduck. The legislature further finds that conflicts of interest may
exist between the management of state aquatic lands and the generation
of revenue to manage those aquatic lands. Therefore, the legislature
finds that there should be a thorough review of the funding and
management of state aquatic lands to determine the proper funding
source and levels necessary to properly manage those resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall, consistent with chapter 44.28 RCW:
(a) Conduct a performance audit of the department of natural
resources' aquatic resources program to determine the success of the
department in meeting the objectives established in statute for
managing aquatic lands;
(b) Review management policies to determine if decisions to
generate revenues to support the aquatics program are consistent with
policies established in statute for managing aquatic lands;
(c) Review the percentage of revenues retained by the department of
natural resources from the resource management cost account and the
aquatic lands enhancement account for the aquatics program to determine
if the percentages are appropriate to support the program; and
(d) Make recommendations on whether the use of nonagency generated
revenues, such as the state general fund, would provide a better
funding mechanism for the management of state-owned aquatic lands.
(2) The final performance audit and recommendations required by
this section must be completed by December 15, 2007.

--- END ---