BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that violent sex
predators present a very real threat to our community. Sex offender
community notification bulletins issued by law enforcement are a useful
tool to increase public safety by allowing communities to know where
dangerous sex offenders are living. However, the distribution of false
sex offender community notification bulletins can unduly alarm the
public, especially given the legitimate fear the public feels regarding
the presence of dangerous sex offenders in our communities.
(2) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to protect our
communities both from violent sex offenders and from persons who
frighten our communities by distributing false sex offender community
notification bulletins.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9A.84 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of distributing a false sex offender
community notification bulletin if, with the intent to alarm, harass,
or intimidate any other person, he or she distributes information
designed to resemble a sex offender community notification bulletin
knowing that it is not a sex offender community notification bulletin.
(2) Distributing a false sex offender community notification
bulletin is a class C felony.
(3) For purposes of this section, "sex offender community
notification bulletin" means a bulletin created by law enforcement for
the purpose of notifying the public about a registered sex offender
under RCW 4.24.550.

--- END ---