BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.22.030 and 2004 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Underinsured motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle with respect
to the ownership, maintenance, or use of which either no bodily injury
or property damage liability bond or insurance policy applies at the
time of an accident, or with respect to which the sum of the limits of
liability under all bodily injury or property damage liability bonds
and insurance policies applicable to a covered person after an accident
is less than the applicable damages which the covered person is legally
entitled to recover.
(2) No new policy or renewal of an existing policy insuring against
loss resulting from liability imposed by law for bodily injury, death,
or property damage, suffered by any person arising out of the
ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle shall be issued with
respect to any motor vehicle registered or principally garaged in this
state unless coverage is provided therein or supplemental thereto for
the protection of persons insured thereunder who are legally entitled
to recover damages from owners or operators of underinsured motor
vehicles, hit-and-run motor vehicles, and phantom vehicles because of
bodily injury, death, or property damage, resulting therefrom, except
while operating or occupying a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, and
except while operating or occupying a motor vehicle owned or available
for the regular use by the named insured or any family member, and
which is not insured under the liability coverage of the policy. The
coverage required to be offered under this chapter is not applicable to
general liability policies, commonly known as umbrella policies, or
other policies which apply only as excess to the insurance directly
applicable to the vehicle insured.
(3) Except as to property damage, coverage required under
subsection (2) of this section shall be in the same amount as the
insured's third party liability coverage unless the insured rejects all
or part of the coverage as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
Coverage for property damage need only be issued in conjunction with
coverage for bodily injury or death. Property damage coverage required
under subsection (2) of this section shall mean physical damage to the
insured motor vehicle unless the policy specifically provides coverage
for the contents thereof or other forms of property damage.
(4) A named insured or spouse may reject, in writing, underinsured
coverage for bodily injury or death, or property damage, and the
requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not
apply. If a named insured or spouse has rejected underinsured
coverage, such coverage shall not be included in any supplemental or
renewal policy unless a named insured or spouse subsequently requests
such coverage in writing. The requirement of a written rejection under
this subsection shall apply only to the original issuance of policies
issued after July 24, 1983, and not to any renewal or replacement
policy.
(5) The limit of liability under the policy coverage may be defined
as the maximum limits of liability for all damages resulting from any
one accident regardless of the number of covered persons, claims made,
or vehicles or premiums shown on the policy, or premiums paid, or
vehicles involved in an accident.
(6) The policy may provide that if an injured person has other
similar insurance available to him under other policies, the total
limits of liability of all coverages shall not exceed the higher of the
applicable limits of the respective coverages.
(7)(a) The policy may provide for a deductible of not more than
three hundred dollars for payment for property damage when the damage
is caused by a hit-and-run driver or a phantom vehicle.
(b) In all other cases of underinsured property damage coverage,
the policy may provide for a deductible of not more than one hundred
dollars.
(8) For the purposes of this chapter, a "phantom vehicle" shall
mean a motor vehicle which causes bodily injury, death, or property
damage to an insured and has no physical contact with the insured or
the vehicle which the insured is occupying at the time of the accident
if:
(a) The facts of the accident can be corroborated by competent
evidence other than the testimony of the insured or any person having
an underinsured motorist claim resulting from the accident; and
(b) The accident has been reported to the appropriate law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours of the accident.
(9) An insurer who elects to write motorcycle or motor-driven cycle
insurance in this state must provide information to prospective
insureds about the coverage.
(10) An insurer that does not include in its policy of underinsured
motorist coverage a binding arbitration clause is subject to a civil
suit at the option of the insured in superior court when a dispute
arises regarding whether the insured is entitled to damages or the
amount of those damages.
If prior to the insured filing a civil suit against the insurer
seeking damages under the policy of underinsured motorist coverage,
either the insurer or the insured provides written notice to the other
that binding arbitration of the dispute is requested, the party
receiving such notice shall have twenty days from the receipt of such
notice to either accept or refuse such request. If the request for
binding arbitration is refused, or if no timely response is made, the
insured may then file a civil suit in superior court to recover
damages. In the event that a civil suit is so filed, and the request
for binding arbitration has not been withdrawn, the prevailing party or
parties in such action shall be entitled to recover all litigation
costs, including expert witness fees, and reasonable attorneys' fees,
provided that, prior to filing suit, the prevailing party had submitted
to the other party a written request for binding arbitration of the
claim for damages and the other party refused such request or failed to
respond in a timely manner, as set forth herein.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.22.085 and 2003 c 115 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No new automobile liability insurance policy or renewal of such
an existing policy may be issued unless personal injury protection
coverage is offered as an optional coverage.
(2) A named insured may reject, in writing, personal injury
protection coverage and the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section shall not apply. If a named insured rejects personal injury
protection coverage:
(a) That rejection is valid and binding as to all levels of
coverage and on all persons who might have otherwise been insured under
such coverage; and
(b) The insurer is not required to include personal injury
protection coverage in any supplemental, renewal, or replacement policy
unless a named insured subsequently requests such coverage in writing.
(3) All automobile liability insurance policies sold in this state
that contain personal injury protection coverage benefits shall contain
binding arbitration clauses to resolve disputes between the insured and
the insurer regarding the amount of medical and hospital expenses,
funeral expenses, income continuation, and loss of services sustained
by an insured because of bodily injury caused by an automobile
accident.
When a dispute regarding the amount of personal injury protection
coverage benefits arises, arbitration may be requested by either the
insurer or insured. In any event, a request for arbitration must be
made in writing and the parties shall select an arbitrator to hear the
dispute within thirty days of a written request. The failure to agree
on an arbitrator within the required time is resolved under RCW
7.04.050. When arbitration results in additional benefits to the
insured, the costs of the arbitrator shall be paid by the insurer,
along with the reasonable costs and attorneys' fees incurred in
establishing the insured's claim to additional benefits.

--- END ---