BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.93.230 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When a county and the cities and towns within the county have
adopted a comprehensive plan and consistent development regulations
((pursuant to the provisions of)) under chapter 36.70A RCW, the county
may((, at the discretion of the county legislative authority,)) submit
a ballot measure to the voters of the county proposing the disbanding
of the boundary review board. If two-thirds of the voters voting on
the measure approve the disbanding, the county legislative authority
may disband the boundary review board in that county.
(2) The termination date of a boundary review board disbanded under
subsection (1) of this section is December 31st of the year in which
the ballot measure is approved, or six months after the election in
which the ballot measure is approved, whichever is later.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to any boundary review
board in existence on or after January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---