BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 36.93.230 (Power to disband boundary
review board) and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 22 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to any boundary review
board in existence on or after January 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---