BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.58 RCW
to read as follows:
If only one organization is seeking certification as the
representative of unrepresented employees under a chapter administered
by the commission, and the showing of interest submitted in support of
the petition indicates that the organization has been authorized by
more than seventy percent of the employees to act as their
representative for the purposes of collective bargaining: (1) The
employer and employees shall proceed to negotiate a collective
bargaining agreement without further representational elections; and
(2) the collective bargaining agreement submitted to the bargaining
unit shall include union security provisions.

--- END ---