BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Any city or town that provides health care benefits or services to
its employees may not discriminate among classes of its employees as to
the amount of benefits provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Any code city that provides health care benefits or services to its
employees may not discriminate among classes of its employees as to the
amount of benefits provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Any county that provides health care benefits or services to its
employees may not discriminate among classes of its employees as to the
amount of benefits provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 53.18 RCW
to read as follows:
Any port district that provides health care benefits or services to
its employees may not discriminate among classes of its employees as to
the amount of benefits provided.

--- END ---