BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.360 and 2000 c 103 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose a special stadium sales and use tax upon the
retail sale or use within the county by restaurants, taverns, and bars
of food and beverages that are taxable by the state under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of the tax shall not exceed five-tenths
of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax. Except as provided
in subsection (10) of this section, the tax imposed under this
subsection is in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and
shall not be credited against any other tax imposed upon the same
taxable event. As used in this section, "restaurant" does not include
grocery stores, mini-markets, or convenience stores.
(2) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one
million or more may impose a special stadium sales and use tax upon
retail car rentals within the county that are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of the tax shall not
exceed two percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or
rental value of the vehicle in the case of a use tax. The tax imposed
under this subsection is in addition to any other taxes authorized by
law and shall not be credited against any other tax imposed upon the
same taxable event.
(3) The revenue from the taxes imposed under this section shall be
used for the purpose of principal and interest payments on bonds,
issued by the county, to acquire, construct, own, remodel, maintain,
equip, reequip, repair, and operate a baseball stadium. Revenues from
the taxes authorized in this section may be used for design and other
preconstruction costs of the baseball stadium until bonds are issued
for the baseball stadium. The county shall issue bonds, in an amount
determined to be necessary by the public facilities district, for the
district to acquire, construct, own, and equip the baseball stadium.
The county shall have no obligation to issue bonds in an amount greater
than that which would be supported by the tax revenues under this
section, RCW 82.14.0485, and 36.38.010(4) (a) and (b). If the revenue
from the taxes imposed under this section exceeds the amount needed for
such principal and interest payments in any year, the excess shall be
used solely:
(a) For early retirement of the bonds issued for the baseball
stadium; and
(b) If the revenue from the taxes imposed under this section
exceeds the amount needed for the purposes in (a) of this subsection in
any year, the excess shall be placed in a contingency fund which may
only be used to pay unanticipated capital costs on the baseball
stadium, excluding any cost overruns on initial construction.
(4) The taxes authorized under this section shall not be collected
after June 30, 1997, unless the county executive has certified to the
department of revenue that a professional major league baseball team
has made a binding and legally enforceable contractual commitment to:
(a) Play at least ninety percent of its home games in the stadium
for a period of time not shorter than the term of the bonds issued to
finance the initial construction of the stadium;
(b) Contribute forty-five million dollars toward the reasonably
necessary preconstruction costs including, but not limited to
architectural, engineering, environmental, and legal services, and the
cost of construction of the stadium, or to any associated public
purpose separate from bond-financed property, including without
limitation land acquisition, parking facilities, equipment,
infrastructure, or other similar costs associated with the project,
which contribution shall be made during a term not to exceed the term
of the bonds issued to finance the initial construction of the stadium.
If all or part of the contribution is made after the date of issuance
of the bonds, the team shall contribute an additional amount equal to
the accruing interest on the deferred portion of the contribution,
calculated at the interest rate on the bonds maturing in the year in
which the deferred contribution is made. No part of the contribution
may be made without the consent of the county until a public facilities
district is created under chapter 36.100 RCW to acquire, construct,
own, remodel, maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate a baseball
stadium. To the extent possible, contributions shall be structured in
a manner that would allow for the issuance of bonds to construct the
stadium that are exempt from federal income taxes; and
(c) Share a portion of the profits generated by the baseball team
from the operation of the professional franchise for a period of time
equal to the term of the bonds issued to finance the initial
construction of the stadium, after offsetting any losses incurred by
the baseball team after the effective date of chapter 14, Laws of 1995
1st sp. sess. Such profits and the portion to be shared shall be
defined by agreement between the public facilities district and the
baseball team. The shared profits shall be used to retire the bonds
issued to finance the initial construction of the stadium. If the
bonds are retired before the expiration of their term, the shared
profits shall be paid to the public facilities district.
(5) No tax may be collected under this section before January 1,
1996. Before collecting the taxes under this section or issuing bonds
for a baseball stadium, the county shall create a public facilities
district under chapter 36.100 RCW to acquire, construct, own, remodel,
maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate a baseball stadium.
(6) The county shall assemble such real property as the district
determines to be necessary as a site for the baseball stadium.
Property which is necessary for this purpose that is owned by the
county on October 17, 1995, shall be contributed to the district, and
property which is necessary for this purpose that is acquired by the
county on or after October 17, 1995, shall be conveyed to the district.
(7) The proceeds of any bonds issued for the baseball stadium shall
be provided to the district.
(8) As used in this section, "baseball stadium" means "baseball
stadium" as defined in RCW 82.14.0485.
(9) The taxes imposed under this section shall expire when the
bonds issued for the construction of the baseball stadium are retired,
but not later than twenty years after the taxes are first collected.
(10) For an eligible retail sale, the seller may deduct the amount
of tax imposed under this section from the amount of tax otherwise
required to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. For the purposes of this section,
"eligible retail sale" means a retail sale that occurs within the
boundaries of the chinatown/international district as shown in the
chinatown/international district strategic plan adopted by the city of
Seattle in 1998.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---