BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Any entity providing concession services on a vessel which is the
property of the Washington state ferries may obtain an appropriate
license under this chapter to serve spirits, beer, or wine on the
vessel. The entity's license shall allow the entity to serve spirits,
beer, or wine on any vessel on which the entity is contractually
obligated to provide concession services. The entity need not obtain
a separate license for each vessel for which it provides concession
services.

--- END ---