BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there is a
shortage of hybrid vehicles to meet consumer demand, creating long
vehicle waiting lists and allowing some dealers to gouge consumers.
The legislature also finds that the federal trade commission, the
consumer federation of America, and numerous empirical studies have
concluded that reducing anticompetitive restrictions on the sale of new
motor vehicles could reduce the costs to consumers by as much as nine
to sixteen percent (about two thousand five hundred dollars) on the
average purchase.
The legislature further finds that it is an unlawful practice under
current state law for anyone, except a dealer licensed by the
department of licensing, to sell a new motor vehicle on the internet.
The legislature further finds that internet technology is
increasing competition and revolutionizing the retail sale of thousands
of consumer products.
It is therefore the intent of the legislature to reduce air
pollution and dependence on foreign oil and to combat global warming,
by enacting an innovative project in new car sales competition. This
act removes anticompetitive car dealer restrictions on the sale of new
hybrid and hydrogen vehicles by allowing automobile manufacturers,
internet retailers, and other businesses to engage in the sale of new
hybrid and hydrogen vehicles as long as those entities comply with
relevant state tax, environmental, and consumer protection laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may issue an internet hybrid vehicle sales
license limited to authorizing internet sales or leases of hybrid and
hydrogen vehicles.
(2) Except as expressly provided by law, an applicant applying for
a license described in subsection (1) of this section is subject to all
of the provisions of this chapter that apply to the issuance of a
vehicle dealer license.
(3) Except as expressly provided by law, all provisions of law that
apply to a licensed vehicle dealer apply to a licensee described in
subsection (1) of this section.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding RCW 46.70.023, a licensee described in this
section is only required to maintain an office in this state where the
books and records pertinent to transactions involving the sales of new
vehicles that are delivered to an address in this state are maintained.
(b) The address and telephone number of the office described in (a)
of this subsection shall be kept on file by the department.
(5) A person or business licensed under this section is subject to
all of the consumer protection laws that apply to the sale or lease of
a motor vehicle by a dealer.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.96.185 and 2003 c 21 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise agreement, a
manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative,
or an agent, officer, parent company, wholly or partially owned
subsidiary, affiliated entity, or other person controlled by or under
common control with a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or
factory representative, shall not:
(a) Discriminate between new motor vehicle dealers by selling or
offering to sell a like vehicle to one dealer at a lower actual price
than the actual price offered to another dealer for the same model
similarly equipped;
(b) Discriminate between new motor vehicle dealers by selling or
offering to sell parts or accessories to one dealer at a lower actual
price than the actual price offered to another dealer;
(c) Discriminate between new motor vehicle dealers by using a
promotion plan, marketing plan, or other similar device that results in
a lower actual price on vehicles, parts, or accessories being charged
to one dealer over another dealer;
(d) Discriminate between new motor vehicle dealers by adopting a
method, or changing an existing method, for the allocation, scheduling,
or delivery of new motor vehicles, parts, or accessories to its dealers
that is not fair, reasonable, and equitable. Upon the request of a
dealer, a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative shall disclose in writing to the dealer the method by
which new motor vehicles, parts, and accessories are allocated,
scheduled, or delivered to its dealers handling the same line or make
of vehicles;
(e) Give preferential treatment to some new motor vehicle dealers
over others by refusing or failing to deliver, in reasonable quantities
and within a reasonable time after receipt of an order, to a dealer
holding a franchise for a line or make of motor vehicles sold or
distributed by the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or
factory representative, a new vehicle, parts, or accessories, if the
vehicle, parts, or accessories are being delivered to other dealers, or
require a dealer to purchase unreasonable advertising displays or other
materials, or unreasonably require a dealer to remodel or renovate
existing facilities as a prerequisite to receiving a model or series of
vehicles;
(f) Compete with a new motor vehicle dealer by acting in the
capacity of a new motor vehicle dealer, or by owning, operating, or
controlling, whether directly or indirectly, a motor vehicle dealership
in this state. It is not, however, a violation of this subsection for:
(i) A manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative to own or operate a dealership for a temporary period,
not to exceed two years, during the transition from one owner of the
dealership to another where the dealership was previously owned by a
franchised dealer and is currently for sale to any qualified
independent person at a fair and reasonable price. The temporary
operation may be extended for one twelve-month period on petition of
the temporary operator to the department. The matter will be handled
as an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW. A dealer who is
a franchisee of the petitioning manufacturer or distributor may
intervene and participate in a proceeding under this subsection
(1)(f)(i). The temporary operator has the burden of proof to show
justification for the extension and a good faith effort to sell the
dealership to an independent person at a fair and reasonable price;
(ii) A manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative to own or operate a dealership in conjunction with an
independent person in a bona fide business relationship for the purpose
of broadening the diversity of its dealer body and enhancing
opportunities for qualified persons who are part of a group who have
historically been underrepresented in its dealer body, or other
qualified persons who lack the resources to purchase a dealership
outright, and where the independent person: (A) Has made, or within a
period of two years from the date of commencement of operation will
have made, a significant, bona fide capital investment in the
dealership that is subject to loss; (B) has an ownership interest in
the dealership; and (C) operates the dealership under a bona fide
written agreement with the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch,
or factory representative under which he or she will acquire all of the
ownership interest in the dealership within a reasonable period of time
and under reasonable terms and conditions. The manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative has the burden
of proof of establishing that the acquisition of the dealership by the
independent person was made within a reasonable period of time and
under reasonable terms and conditions. Nothing in this subsection
(1)(f)(ii) relieves a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or
factory representative from complying with RCW 46.96.185(1) (a) through
(e);
(iii) A manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative to own or operate a dealership in conjunction with an
independent person in a bona fide business relationship where the
independent person: (A) Has made, or within a period of two years from
the date of commencement of operation will have made, a significant,
bona fide capital investment in the dealership that is subject to loss;
(B) has an ownership interest in the dealership; and (C) operates the
dealership under a bona fide written agreement with the manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative under which he
or she will acquire all of the ownership interest in the dealership
within a reasonable period of time and under reasonable terms and
conditions. The manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative has the burden of proof of establishing that the
acquisition of the dealership by the independent person was made within
a reasonable period of time and under reasonable terms and conditions.
The number of dealerships operated under this subsection (1)(f)(iii)
may not exceed four percent rounded up to the nearest whole number of
a manufacturer's total of new motor vehicle dealer franchises in this
state. Nothing in this subsection (1)(f)(iii) relieves a manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative from complying
with RCW 46.96.185(1) (a) through (e);
(iv) A manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative, with a valid internet hybrid vehicle sales license, to
sell hybrid or hydrogen vehicles via the internet;
(v) A truck manufacturer to own, operate, or control a new motor
vehicle dealership that sells only trucks of that manufacturer's line
make with a gross vehicle weight rating of 12,500 pounds or more, and
the truck manufacturer has been continuously engaged in the retail sale
of the trucks at least since January 1, 1993; or
(((v))) (vi) A manufacturer to own, operate, or control a new motor
vehicle dealership trading exclusively in a single line make of the
manufacturer if (A) the manufacturer does not own, directly or
indirectly, in the aggregate, in excess of forty-five percent of the
total ownership interest in the dealership, (B) at the time the
manufacturer first acquires ownership or assumes operation or control
of any such dealership, the distance between any dealership thus owned,
operated, or controlled and the nearest new motor vehicle dealership
trading in the same line make of vehicle and in which the manufacturer
has no ownership or control is not less than fifteen miles and complies
with the applicable provisions in the relevant market area sections of
this chapter, (C) all of the manufacturer's franchise agreements confer
rights on the dealer of that line make to develop and operate within a
defined geographic territory or area, as many dealership facilities as
the dealer and the manufacturer agree are appropriate, and (D) as of
January 1, 2000, the manufacturer had no more than four new motor
vehicle dealers of that manufacturer's line make in this state, and at
least half of those dealers owned and operated two or more dealership
facilities in the geographic territory or area covered by their
franchise agreements with the manufacturer;
(g) Compete with a new motor vehicle dealer by owning, operating,
or controlling, whether directly or indirectly, a service facility in
this state for the repair or maintenance of motor vehicles under the
manufacturer's new car warranty and extended warranty. Nothing in this
subsection (1)(g), however, prohibits a manufacturer, distributor,
factory branch, or factory representative from owning or operating a
service facility for the purpose of providing or performing
maintenance, repair, or service work on motor vehicles that are owned
by the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative;
(h) Use confidential or proprietary information obtained from a new
motor vehicle dealer to unfairly compete with the dealer. For purposes
of this subsection (1)(h), "confidential or proprietary information"
means trade secrets as defined in RCW 19.108.010, business plans,
marketing plans or strategies, customer lists, contracts, sales data,
revenues, or other financial information;
(i) Terminate, cancel, or fail to renew a franchise with a new
motor vehicle dealer based upon any of the following events, which do
not constitute good cause for termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal
under RCW 46.96.060: (A) The fact that the new motor vehicle dealer
owns, has an investment in, participates in the management of, or holds
a franchise agreement for the sale or service of another make or line
of new motor vehicles, or (B) the fact that the new motor vehicle
dealer has established another make or line of new motor vehicles or
service in the same dealership facilities as those of the manufacturer
or distributor with the prior written approval of the manufacturer or
distributor, if the approval was required under the terms of the new
motor vehicle dealer's franchise agreement; or
(j) Coerce or attempt to coerce a motor vehicle dealer to refrain
from, or prohibit or attempt to prohibit a new motor vehicle dealer
from acquiring, owning, having an investment in, participating in the
management of, or holding a franchise agreement for the sale or service
of another make or line of new motor vehicles or related products, or
establishing another make or line of new motor vehicles or service in
the same dealership facilities, if the prohibition against acquiring,
owning, investing, managing, or holding a franchise for such additional
make or line of vehicles or products, or establishing another make or
line of new motor vehicles or service in the same dealership
facilities, is not supported by reasonable business considerations.
The burden of proving that reasonable business considerations support
or justify the prohibition against the additional make or line of new
motor vehicles or products or nonexclusive facilities is on the
manufacturer.
(2) Subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section do not apply to
sales to a motor vehicle dealer: (a) For resale to a federal, state,
or local government agency; (b) where the vehicles will be sold or
donated for use in a program of driver's education; (c) where the sale
is made under a manufacturer's bona fide promotional program offering
sales incentives or rebates; (d) where the sale of parts or accessories
is under a manufacturer's bona fide quantity discount program; or (e)
where the sale is made under a manufacturer's bona fide fleet vehicle
discount program. For purposes of this subsection, "fleet" means a
group of fifteen or more new motor vehicles purchased or leased by a
dealer at one time under a single purchase or lease agreement for use
as part of a fleet, and where the dealer has been assigned a fleet
identifier code by the department of licensing.
(3) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Actual price" means the price to be paid by the dealer less
any incentive paid by the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or
factory representative, whether paid to the dealer or the ultimate
purchaser of the vehicle.
(b) "Control" or "controlling" means (i) the possession of, title
to, or control of ten percent or more of the voting equity interest in
a person, whether directly or indirectly through a fiduciary, agent, or
other intermediary, or (ii) the possession, direct or indirect, of the
power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of
a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, through
director control, by contract, or otherwise, except as expressly
provided under the franchise agreement.
(c) "Motor vehicles" does not include trucks that are 14,001 pounds
gross vehicle weight and above or recreational vehicles as defined in
RCW 43.22.335.
(d) "Operate" means to manage a dealership, whether directly or
indirectly.
(e) "Own" or "ownership" means to hold the beneficial ownership of
one percent or more of any class of equity interest in a dealership,
whether the interest is that of a shareholder, partner, limited
liability company member, or otherwise. To hold an ownership interest
means to have possession of, title to, or control of the ownership
interest, whether directly or indirectly through a fiduciary, agent, or
other intermediary.
(4) A violation of this section is deemed to affect the public
interest and constitutes an unlawful and unfair practice under chapter
19.86 RCW. A person aggrieved by an alleged violation of this section
may petition the department to have the matter handled as an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---