BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.125 and 1997 c 215 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the fees required by RCW 46.16.070, operators of
auto stages with seating capacity over six shall pay, at the time they
file gross earning returns with the utilities and transportation
commission, the sum of fifteen cents for each one hundred vehicle miles
operated by each auto stage over the public highways of this state.
((However, in the case of each auto stage propelled by steam,
electricity, natural gas, diesel oil, butane, or propane, the payment
required in this section is twenty cents per one hundred miles of such
operation.)) The commission shall transmit all sums so collected to
the state treasurer, who shall deposit the same in the motor vehicle
fund. Any person failing to make any payment required by this section
is subject to a penalty of one hundred percent of the payment due in
this section, in addition to any penalty provided for failure to submit
a report. Any penalties so collected shall be credited to the public
service revolving fund.

--- END ---