BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21C.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 109 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
The legislature authorizes and directs that, to the fullest extent
possible: (1) The policies, regulations, and laws of the state of
Washington shall be interpreted and administered in accordance with the
policies set forth in this chapter, and (2) all branches of government
of this state, including state agencies, municipal and public
corporations, and counties shall:
(a) Utilize a systematic, interdisciplinary approach which will
insure the integrated use of the natural and social sciences and the
environmental design arts in planning and in decision making which may
have an impact on man's environment;
(b) Identify and develop methods and procedures, in consultation
with the department of ecology and the ecological commission, which
will insure that presently unquantified environmental amenities and
values will be given appropriate consideration in decision making along
with economic and technical considerations;
(c) Include in every recommendation or report on proposals for
legislation and other major actions significantly affecting the quality
of the environment, a detailed statement by the responsible official
on:
(i) the environmental impact of the proposed action;
(ii) any adverse environmental effects which cannot be avoided
should the proposal be implemented;
(iii) subject to section 2 of this act, alternatives to the
proposed action;
(iv) the relationship between local short-term uses of man's
environment and the maintenance and enhancement of long-term
productivity; and
(v) any irreversible and irretrievable commitments of resources
which would be involved in the proposed action should it be
implemented;
(d) Prior to making any detailed statement, the responsible
official shall consult with and obtain the comments of any public
agency which has jurisdiction by law or special expertise with respect
to any environmental impact involved. Copies of such statement and the
comments and views of the appropriate federal, province, state, and
local agencies, which are authorized to develop and enforce
environmental standards, shall be made available to the governor, the
department of ecology, the ecological commission, and the public, and
shall accompany the proposal through the existing agency review
processes;
(e) Study, develop, and describe appropriate alternatives to
recommended courses of action in any proposal which involves unresolved
conflicts concerning alternative uses of available resources;
(f) Recognize the world-wide and long-range character of
environmental problems and, where consistent with state policy, lend
appropriate support to initiatives, resolutions, and programs designed
to maximize international cooperation in anticipating and preventing a
decline in the quality of mankind's world environment;
(g) Make available to the federal government, other states,
provinces of Canada, municipalities, institutions, and individuals,
advice and information useful in restoring, maintaining, and enhancing
the quality of the environment;
(h) Initiate and utilize ecological information in the planning and
development of natural resource-oriented projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If the alternatives to the proposed action are for a
significant transportation project that exceeds fifty million dollars
in total cost, the responsible official shall seek legislative review
and approval of:
(a) The criteria used to analyze alternatives to the project;
(b) Alternatives of the proposed action for consideration; and
(c) The alternative selected.
(2) For purposes of this section, "legislative review and approval"
means approval in the omnibus transportation act.

--- END ---