BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.93.230 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, when a
county and the cities and towns within the county have adopted a
comprehensive plan and consistent development regulations ((pursuant to
the provisions of)) under chapter 36.70A RCW, the county may, at the
discretion of the county legislative authority, disband the boundary
review board in that county.
(2)(a) Counties required to establish boundary review boards
pursuant to RCW 36.93.030(1) may, at the discretion of the county
legislative authority, propose to disband the boundary review board in
that county if the county and the cities and towns within the county
have adopted comprehensive plans and development regulations under
chapter 36.70A RCW.
(b) Prior to disbanding a boundary review board, the county must
hold a public hearing under RCW 36.70A.035. Following the hearing, the
legislative authority of the county may disband the boundary review
board if it receives a written agreement calling for disbanding from at
least sixty percent of the cities and towns of the county representing
at least seventy-five percent of the incorporated population within the
county.
(3) A boundary review board subject to disbandment under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section:
(a) Must complete all pending actions before the board prior to
disbanding; and
(b) May not accept additional requests for new reviews of proposed
actions after the county legislative authority authorizes the
disbanding.

--- END ---