BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.95.003 and 1997 c 350 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall consist of a ((chairman)) chair, a vice-chair, and
((two)) three other members, each of whom shall be appointed by the
governor with the consent of the senate. Each member shall hold office
for a term of five years, and until his or her successor is appointed
and qualified. The terms shall expire on April 15th of the expiration
year. Vacancies in the membership of the board shall be filled by
appointment by the governor with the consent of the senate. In the
event of the inability of any member to act, the governor shall appoint
some competent person to act in his stead during the continuance of
such inability. The members shall not be removable during their
respective terms except for cause determined by the superior court of
Thurston county. The governor in appointing the members shall
designate one of them to serve as chairman at the governor's pleasure.
The members of the board and its officers and employees shall not
engage in any other business or profession or hold any other public
office without the prior approval of the executive ethics board
indicating compliance with RCW 42.52.020, 42.52.030, 42.52.040 and
42.52.120; nor shall they, at the time of appointment or employment or
during their incumbency, serve as the representative of any political
party on an executive committee or other governing body thereof, or as
an executive officer or employee of any political committee or
association. The members of the board shall each severally receive
salaries fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW
43.03.040, and in addition shall receive travel expenses incurred in
the discharge of their official duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.
The board may employ, and fix, with the approval of the governor,
the compensation of and prescribe the duties of a secretary and such
officers, employees, and assistants as may be necessary, and provide
necessary quarters, supplies, and equipment.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.95.420 and 2002 c 174 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, before the
expiration of the minimum term, as part of the end of sentence review
process under RCW 72.09.340, 72.09.345, and where appropriate,
72.09.370, the department shall conduct, and the offender shall
participate in, an examination of the offender, incorporating
methodologies that are recognized by experts in the prediction of
sexual dangerousness, and including a prediction of the probability
that the offender will engage in sex offenses if released.
(b) The board may contract for an additional, independent
examination, subject to the standards in this section.
(c) If at the time the sentence is imposed by the superior court
the offender's minimum term has expired or will expire within one
hundred twenty days of the sentencing hearing, the department shall
conduct, within ninety days of the offender's arrival at a department
of corrections facility, and the offender shall participate in, an
examination of the offender, incorporating methodologies that are
recognized by experts in the prediction of sexual dangerousness, and
including a prediction of the probability that the offender will engage
in sex offenses if released.
(2) The board shall impose the conditions and instructions provided
for in RCW 9.94A.720. The board shall consider the department's
recommendations and may impose conditions in addition to those
recommended by the department. The board may impose or modify
conditions of community custody following notice to the offender.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, no later than
ninety days before expiration of the minimum term, but after the board
receives the results from the end of sentence review process and the
recommendations for additional or modified conditions of community
custody from the department, the board shall conduct a hearing to
determine whether it is more likely than not that the offender will
engage in sex offenses if released on conditions to be set by the
board. The board may consider an offender's failure to participate in
an evaluation under subsection (1) of this section in determining
whether to release the offender. The board shall order the offender
released, under such affirmative and other conditions as the board
determines appropriate, unless the board determines by a preponderance
of the evidence that, despite such conditions, it is more likely than
not that the offender will commit sex offenses if released. If the
board does not order the offender released, the board shall establish
a new minimum term, not to exceed an additional two years.
(b) If at the time the offender's minimum term has expired or will
expire within one hundred twenty days of the offender's arrival at a
department of correction's facility, then no later than one hundred
twenty days after the offender's arrival at a department of corrections
facility, but after the board receives the results from the end of
sentence review process and the recommendations for additional or
modified conditions of community custody from the department, the board
shall conduct a hearing to determine whether it is more likely than not
that the offender will engage in sex offenses if released on conditions
to be set by the board. The board may consider an offender's failure
to participate in an evaluation under subsection (1) of this section in
determining whether to release the offender. The board shall order the
offender released, under such affirmative and other conditions as the
board determines appropriate, unless the board determines by a
preponderance of the evidence that, despite such conditions, it is more
likely than not that the offender will commit sex offenses if released.
If the board does not order the offender released, the board shall
establish a new minimum term, not to exceed an additional two years.
(4) In a hearing conducted under subsection (3) of this section,
the board shall provide opportunities for the victims of any crimes for
which the offender has been convicted to present oral, video, written,
or in-person testimony to the board. The procedures for victim input
shall be developed by rule. To facilitate victim involvement, county
prosecutor's offices shall ensure that any victim impact statements and
known contact information for victims of record are forwarded as part
of the judgment and sentence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---