BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that in
condemnation proceedings individual property owners are often severely
disadvantaged in trying to compete with the resources available to many
of the entities, both governmental and corporate, that possess the
power of eminent domain. The legislature finds that individual
property owners are often effectively coerced into selling their
property because they cannot afford to contest a condemnation
proceeding. The legislature further finds that the current law does
not properly encourage entities with the power of eminent domain to
exercise that power as sparingly as possible. It is the intent of the
legislature, therefore, to provide property owners with the possibility
of more realistic reimbursement of costs they may incur in responding
to a threatened condemnation of their property, and to require the
exploration of alternatives to condemnation before the power of eminent
domain is used.

Sec. 2 RCW 8.25.010 and 1965 ex.s. c 125 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In all actions for the condemnation of property, or any interest
therein, at least thirty days prior to the date set for trial of such
action the condemnor shall serve on each condemnee who has made an
appearance in the action:
(1) A written statement showing the amount of total just
compensation to be paid in the event of settlement ((on each condemnee
who has made an appearance in the action)); and
(2) A written statement documenting the condemnor's consideration
of and reasons for rejecting alternatives to the condemnation sought or
to the nature or extent of the condemnation sought, including but not
limited to any reasonable alternative suggested in writing by a
condemnee at least sixty days prior to the date set for trial.

Sec. 3 RCW 8.25.020 and 1999 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
There shall be paid by the condemnor in respect of each parcel of
real property acquired by eminent domain or by consent under threat
thereof, in addition to the fair market value of the property, a sum
equal to the various expenditures actually and reasonably incurred by
those with an interest or interests in said parcel in the process of
evaluating the condemnor's offer to buy the same, ((but not to exceed
a total of seven hundred fifty dollars)) such expenditures to include,
but not be limited to, reasonable fees of appraisers, attorneys,
architects, engineers, or others reasonably retained by the condemnee.
In the case of multiple interests in a parcel, the division of such sum
shall be determined by the court or by agreement of the parties. To
the extent that payment of any such expenditures is not made under
other provisions of this chapter or under other law, the condemnor
shall pay for expenditures as required by this section regardless of
whether a trial of the condemnation action is held and regardless of
the outcome of any trial that is held.

--- END ---