BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.160.020 and 2006 c 2 s 2 (Initiative Measure No.
901) are each amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(1) "Smoke" or "smoking" means the carrying or smoking of any kind
of lighted pipe, cigar, cigarette, or any other lighted smoking
equipment.
(2) "Public place" means that portion of any building or vehicle
used by and open to the public, regardless of whether the building or
vehicle is owned in whole or in part by private persons or entities,
the state of Washington, or other public entity, and regardless of
whether a fee is charged for admission, and includes a presumptively
reasonable minimum distance, as set forth in RCW 70.160.075, of twenty-five feet from entrances, exits, windows that open, and ventilation
intakes that serve an enclosed area where smoking is prohibited. A
public place does not include a private residence unless the private
residence is used to provide licensed child care, foster care, adult
care, or other similar social service care on the premises.
Public places include, but are not limited to: Schools, elevators,
public conveyances or transportation facilities, museums, concert
halls, theaters, auditoriums, exhibition halls, indoor sports arenas,
hospitals, nursing homes, health care facilities or clinics, enclosed
shopping centers, retail stores, retail service establishments,
financial institutions, educational facilities, ticket areas, public
hearing facilities, state legislative chambers and immediately adjacent
hallways, public restrooms, libraries, restaurants, waiting areas,
lobbies, bars, taverns, bowling alleys, skating rinks, casinos,
reception areas, and no less than seventy-five percent of the sleeping
quarters within a hotel or motel that are rented to guests. A public
place does not include a smoking room or a private residence. This
chapter is not intended to restrict smoking in private facilities which
are occasionally open to the public except upon the occasions when the
facility is open to the public.
(3) "Place of employment" means any area under the control of a
public or private employer which employees are required to pass through
during the course of employment, including, but not limited to:
Entrances and exits to the places of employment, and including a
presumptively reasonable minimum distance, as set forth in RCW
70.160.075, of twenty-five feet from entrances, exits, windows that
open, and ventilation intakes that serve an enclosed area where smoking
is prohibited; work areas; restrooms; conference and classrooms; break
rooms and cafeterias; and other common areas. A private residence or
home-based business, unless used to provide licensed child care, foster
care, adult care, or other similar social service care on the premises,
is not a place of employment.
(4) "Smoking room" means a room in a public place designated as a
smoking room in which persons under the age of eighteen are prohibited
and in which smoking is permitted. Smoking rooms must meet the
ventilation requirements of federal and state laws, rules, and
regulations.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.160.030 and 2006 c 2 s 3 (Initiative Measure No.
901) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no person
may smoke in a public place or in any place of employment.
(2)(a) A person may smoke in a smoking room.
(b) Employees may not be required to enter a smoking room in the
course of their employment.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.160.075 and 2006 c 2 s 6 (Initiative Measure No.
901) are each amended to read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 70.160.030(2), smoking is prohibited
within a presumptively reasonable minimum distance of twenty-five feet
from entrances, exits, windows that open, and ventilation intakes that
serve an enclosed area where smoking is prohibited so as to ensure that
tobacco smoke does not enter the area through entrances, exits, open
windows, or other means. Owners, operators, managers, employers, or
other persons who own or control a public place or place of employment
may seek to rebut the presumption that twenty-five feet is a reasonable
minimum distance by making application to the director of the local
health department or district in which the public place or place of
employment is located. The presumption will be rebutted if the
applicant can show by clear and convincing evidence that, given the
unique circumstances presented by the location of entrances, exits,
windows that open, ventilation intakes, or other factors, smoke will
not infiltrate or reach the entrances, exits, open windows, or
ventilation intakes or enter into such public place or place of
employment and, therefore, the public health and safety will be
adequately protected by a lesser distance.

--- END ---