BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds and declares that there is a compelling need
for passenger-only ferry service on Puget Sound. The Bremerton to
Seattle, Southworth to Seattle, Vashon to Seattle, and Kingston to
Seattle routes are the routes currently in need of funding. As other
routes become viable for passenger-only ferry service, funding may be
provided to those routes as well.
It is the intent of the legislature to provide funding to
passenger-only ferry systems operated by Washington state ferries or
local governments through the sale or disposition of existing
Washington state ferries' passenger-only vessels. Until the funds
provided by the sale or disposition of these vessels become available,
it is the intent of the legislature to fund passenger-only ferry
systems from other available funds.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.60.645 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 558 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is hereby established in the transportation fund the
passenger ferry account. Money in the account shall be used for
((capital improvements for passenger ferry projects including, but not
limited to, pedestrian and transit facilities at ferry terminals and
passenger-only ferry vessels)) grants for passenger-only ferry systems
operated by Washington state ferries and for passenger-only ferry
systems operated or contracted for by local governments. Moneys in the
account shall be expended with legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2007, the department shall sell or otherwise
dispose of the Washington state ferries Snohomish and Chinook for
market value and deposit the proceeds of the sales into the passenger
ferry account established under RCW 47.60.645.
(2) By April 1, 2007, the department shall sell or otherwise
dispose of the Washington state ferries Skagit and Kalama for market
value and deposit the proceeds of the sale into the passenger ferry
account established under RCW 47.60.645.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Passenger-only ferry systems operated or contracted for by
local governments on the Bremerton to Seattle, Southworth to Seattle,
and Kingston to Seattle routes are eligible for the grants provided in
RCW 47.60.645. Passenger-only ferry service provided by Washington
state ferries on the Vashon to Seattle route is also eligible for the
grants provided in RCW 47.60.645.
(2) The grants provided in RCW 47.60.645 shall be sufficient to
provide a reasonable rate of return and cover any costs of operating
the passenger-only ferry system that are not covered by fare or other
revenue.
(3) As a condition of receiving the grants provided in RCW
47.60.645, the passenger-only ferry systems operated or contracted for
by local governments shall coordinate their schedules with the
schedules of any Washington state ferries' auto ferries operating on
the same route so as to complement the auto ferry service rather than
compete against it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state ferries and any passenger-only ferry
systems operated or contracted for by local governments that express
interest shall, in good faith, negotiate a mutually agreeable and
reasonable agreement regarding the shared use of Washington state
ferries' facilities at Southworth and Colman dock by September 1, 2006.
(2) The Washington state ferries and any passenger-only ferry
systems operated or contracted for by local governments that express
interest shall, in good faith, negotiate a mutually agreeable and
reasonable agreement regarding the shared use of Washington state
ferries' maintenance facilities by September 1, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington state ferries and the passenger-only ferry systems
operated or contracted for by local governments shall, in good faith,
negotiate a mutually agreeable and reasonable agreement establishing an
apprenticeship program by January 1, 2007. The apprenticeship program
shall include a system by which employees involved in the operation of
passenger-only ferry systems operated or contracted for by local
governments may become employees of Washington state ferries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 47.66 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the grants provided in RCW 47.60.645, the
department shall establish a passenger-only ferry grant program subject
to availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose.
(2) In providing grants under this section, the department may
enter into multiple-year contracts with a stipulation that allocations
for future years are subject to the availability of funding as provided
by legislative appropriation.
(3) Priority shall be given to grant applications that provide
continuity of existing passenger-only ferry service and the provision
of local or federal matching funds.

--- END ---