BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who is otherwise qualified by law to carry a firearm may
carry or have in his or her possession such a firearm, including a
muzzle loader, while in the field archery hunting during an archery
season specified for a designated area.

--- END ---