BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in 2003, the
United States ranked below at least ten other countries in the
mathematics scores of elementary and middle school students on the
trends in international mathematics and science study (TIMSS)
assessment. Since 1995, there has been little or no change in the
performance of our nation's students in mathematics. Conversely,
students from the nation of Singapore continually score at the very top
of students in other countries on the TIMSS assessment, and their
scores are well above the international average. The legislature
further finds that a key reason for the high level of performance of
Singapore students is a coherent, sequenced mathematics curriculum that
focuses on the core skills of mathematical problem solving. Therefore,
the legislature intends to direct a study of whether to require
statewide adoption of the syllabus and curriculum framework for
mathematics used by Singapore.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state institute for
public policy shall conduct a comparative study of curriculum
frameworks, learning standards, assessment methods, and course
sequencing in mathematics. The purpose of the study is to provide
objective analysis to inform the legislature on whether to require
statewide adoption of the mathematics syllabus and curriculum framework
used by Singapore.
(2) The study shall:
(a) Examine a sample of mathematics instructional models used at
the elementary and secondary level by other states and other countries
including the model used by schools in Singapore;
(b) Compare and contrast the mathematics instructional models to
Washington's essential academic learning requirements, grade level
expectations, and the Washington assessment of student learning for
mathematics. The comparison shall also include a sample of the
curriculum and course sequencing used by primary and secondary schools
in Washington;
(c) Analyze and compare data on student competencies and student
achievement in mathematics under each of the instructional models,
including student achievement in Washington; and
(d) Summarize the research literature on the efficacy of various
mathematics instructional models including the model expected under
Washington's standards and assessment system.
(3) The institute shall issue a report to the education committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2006, in order to assist policymakers
in their consideration of requiring statewide adoption of the
mathematics syllabus and curriculum framework used by Singapore.

--- END ---