BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) It is fundamental to the Washington workers' compensation
system that claims be adjudicated and resolved in a fair, informal, and
cooperative environment that benefits the injured worker, the employer,
and the department of labor and industries;
(2) With an appropriate auditing program and statutory penalty
structure, more flexibility and authority for self-insured employers to
administer their claims should be granted; and
(3) Revisions to the industrial insurance self-insurance program
should be made to grant self-insured employers more authority to
actively participate in workers' compensation claims.

--- END ---