BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The system for determining how, when, and where former felons
have their right to vote restored is contributing to uncertainty about
the validity of the election process, and local county clerks and
auditors find it impossible to access clear information about this
determination;
(b) Washington currently denies the right to vote to all persons
who have been convicted of an infamous crime and who have not fully
completed all conditions of their sentence, including full payment of
their legal financial obligations;
(c) Responsibility for monitoring compliance with the various
conditions of the sentence is placed at various times with the
department of corrections, the county clerk, and the sentencing judge;
and
(d) The current system for determining when the right to vote has
been restored takes away time from the other important duties of the
county clerks, county auditors, and secretary of state's staff.
(2) The legislature intends to study the issue of establishing a
standard for restricting and restoring the voting rights of felons that
will provide clear information about the status of former felon voting
rights to all state and local election officials.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A legislative task force to study
standards for restricting and restoring the voting rights of felons is
established.
(2) The task force members are as provided in this subsection:
(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate;
(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives;
(c) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives jointly shall appoint members from each of the
following groups:
(i) One representative of county auditors;
(ii) One member of the association of superior court judges;
(iii) One defense attorney jointly designated by the Washington
defender association and the Washington association of criminal defense
lawyers;
(iv) One prosecutor designated by the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys;
(v) One representative from a business or organization that
primarily serves multicultural or diversity interests;
(vi) One victims' advocate designated by the Washington coalition
of crime victims' advocates;
(vii) One representative from a business or organization that
represents the interests of low-income citizens;
(viii) One representative of an organization with expertise and an
interest in election reforms or voting rights issues;
(ix) One representative of an organization that represents the
interests of persons concerned with the effect of acquired
immunodeficiency syndrome on multicultural communities; and
(x) One representative of an organization that has expertise in
civil liberties;
(d) The secretary of state, or the secretary's designee; and
(e) A representative of the department of corrections.
(3) The task force shall choose its chair from among its
legislative membership. The member appointed from the largest caucus
of the house of representatives shall convene the initial meeting of
the task force.
(4) The task force must review the following issues:
(a) The current system for determining how, when, and where former
felons have their right to vote restored;
(b) The agencies and entities that are responsible for monitoring
compliance with the various conditions of a felon's sentence; how the
monitoring is performed and communicated to other agencies; how the
data is maintained and updated; and the fiscal impact of such
monitoring; and
(c) The need for establishing any changes and clearer standards as
it relates to the current system of restricting and restoring felon
voting rights and monitoring compliance with the conditions of a
felon's sentence.
(5) Staff support for the task force shall be provided by senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(6) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7) The expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(8) The task force, where appropriate, may consult with individuals
from the public and private sector or ask such individuals to establish
an advisory committee. Members of such an advisory committee are not
entitled to reimbursement of expenses.
(9) The task force must report its findings and recommendations to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 30, 2006.
(10) This section expires January 1, 2007.

--- END ---