BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature hereby recognizes that the
joint legislative task force on unemployment insurance benefit equity
has undertaken a comprehensive review of the unemployment insurance
system, but has not yet reached agreement on its findings and
recommendations. The legislature therefore intends to extend the
deadline by which the task force must report to the legislature.

Sec. 2 2005 c 133 s 9 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) The joint legislative task force on unemployment insurance
benefit equity is established. The joint legislative task force shall
consist of the following members:
(i) The chair and ranking minority member of the senate labor,
commerce, research and development committee;
(ii) The chair and ranking minority member of the house commerce
and labor committee;
(iii) Four members representing business, selected from nominations
submitted by statewide business organizations representing a cross-section of industries and appointed jointly by the president of the
senate and the speaker of the house of representatives; and
(iv) Four members representing labor, selected from nominations
submitted by statewide labor organizations representing a cross-section
of industries and appointed jointly by the president of the senate and
the speaker of the house of representatives.
(b) In addition, the employment security department shall cooperate
with the task force and maintain a liaison representative, who shall be
a nonvoting member. The department shall cooperate with the task force
and provide information as the task force may reasonably request.
(2) The task force shall review the unemployment insurance system,
including, but not limited to, whether the benefit structure provides
for equitable benefits, whether the structure fairly accounts for
changes in the work force and industry work patterns, including
seasonality, and for claimants' annual work patterns, whether the tax
structure provides for an equitable distribution of taxes, and whether
the trust fund is adequate in the long term.
(3)(a) The task force shall use legislative facilities, and staff
support shall be provided by senate committee services and the house of
representatives office of program research. The task force may hire
additional staff with specific technical expertise if such expertise is
necessary to carry out the mandates of this study.
(b) Legislative members of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(c) The expenses of the task force shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives.
(((5))) (4) The task force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the legislature by ((January)) March 1, 2006.
(((6))) (5) This section expires July 1, 2006.

--- END ---