BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.40 RCW
to read as follows:
During the 2003-2005 and 2005-2007 biennia, the legislature
transferred funds from the fund established under RCW 67.40.040 to the
general fund--state. It is the intent of this act to provide
predictable and stable funding for the operation and maintenance of the
state convention and trade center by establishing funding levels in
future biennia based on proven performance and return on state funds
invested in the convention and trade center.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.40.040 and 2005 c 518 s 936 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW
67.40.030, proceeds of the taxes imposed under RCW 67.40.090 and
67.40.130, and all other moneys received by the state convention and
trade center from any public or private source which are intended to
fund the acquisition, design, construction, expansion, exterior cleanup
and repair of the Eagles building, conversion of various retail and
other space to meeting rooms, purchase of the land and building known
as the McKay Parcel, development of low-income housing, or renovation
of the center, and those expenditures authorized under RCW 67.40.170
shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center account
hereby created in the state treasury and in such subaccounts as are
deemed appropriate by the directors of the corporation.
(2) Moneys in the account, including unanticipated revenues under
RCW 43.79.270, shall be used exclusively for the following purposes in
the following priority:
(a) For reimbursement of the state general fund under RCW
67.40.060;
(b) After appropriation by statute:
(i) For payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030;
(ii) For expenditures authorized in RCW 67.40.170;
(iii) For acquisition, design, and construction of the state
convention and trade center; and
(iv) For reimbursement of any expenditures from the state general
fund in support of the state convention and trade center; ((and))
(c) For transfer to the state convention and trade center
operations account; and
(d) For transfer to the state general fund, but only if sufficient
funds will remain in the account to meet the following amounts and
purposes:
(i) Actual capital debt service through the next biennium; and
(ii) An amount equal to fifteen and one-half percent of actual
capital debt service through the next biennium, which is intended to
provide funds for a debt service reserve, capital maintenance of the
convention and trade center, a reserve for catastrophic unanticipated
repairs and replacement, and for a contingency in the event of
unanticipated loss of operating income. The percentage of funds
identified for debt service reserve, capital maintenance of the
convention and trade center, a reserve for catastrophic unanticipated
repairs and replacement, and for a contingency in the event of
unanticipated loss of operating income under this subsection shall be
adjusted biennially for inflation by multiplying the current Seattle
area consumer price index established by the federal bureau of labor
statistics by fifteen and one-half percent.
(3) The corporation shall identify with specificity those
facilities of the state convention and trade center that are to be
financed with proceeds of general obligation bonds, the interest on
which is intended to be excluded from gross income for federal income
tax purposes. The corporation shall not permit the extent or manner of
private business use of those bond-financed facilities to be
inconsistent with treatment of such bonds as governmental bonds under
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) In order to ensure consistent treatment of bonds authorized
under RCW 67.40.030 with applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, and notwithstanding RCW 43.84.092, investment
earnings on bond proceeds deposited in the state convention and trade
center account in the state treasury shall be retained in the account,
and shall be expended by the corporation for the purposes authorized
under chapter 386, Laws of 1995 and in a manner consistent with
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(5) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state convention and trade center account to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2007.

--- END ---