BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that many businesses,
associations, and organizations providing goods and services to the
public or conducting other activity in Washington, or otherwise
affecting residents of Washington now operate nationally or globally
and often maintain their business records in a location outside the
state of Washington. The legislature further finds that bringing
persons or organizations committing crimes in Washington to justice is
a matter of great public interest because these crimes have a
significant effect on businesses, associations, and other organizations
that conduct business in Washington, as well as on Washington citizens,
and result in significant losses to persons, businesses, associations,
and other organizations victimized by those crimes, as well as persons
not directly victimized when businesses or others more directly
affected by these crimes must raise prices to cover crime losses. The
ability of law enforcement and the criminal justice system to
effectively perform their duties to the public often depends upon law
enforcement, prosecutors, and criminal defense attorneys being able to
obtain and use records relevant to crimes that affect Washington's
citizens, businesses, associations, organizations, and others who
provide goods or services, or conduct other activity in Washington. In
the course of fulfilling their duties to the public, law enforcement,
prosecutors and criminal defense attorneys must frequently obtain
records from these entities, and be able to use the records in court.
The ability to obtain and use these records has an impact on Washington
citizens because it affects the ability to enforce Washington's
criminal laws and affects the deterrence value arising from criminal
prosecution. Effectively combating crime requires laws facilitating
and requiring that all those who possess records relevant to a criminal
investigation comply with the legal process issued in connection with
criminal investigations or litigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adverse result" includes one of the following possible
consequences:
(a) Danger to the life or physical safety of an individual;
(b) A flight from prosecution;
(c) The destruction of, potential loss of, or tampering with
evidence;
(d) The intimidation of potential witnesses;
(e) Jeopardizing an investigation or undue delay of a trial.
(2) "Applicant" means a law enforcement officer, prosecuting
attorney, deputy or special deputy prosecuting attorney, or defense
attorney who is seeking criminal process under section 3 of this act.
(3) "Criminal process" means a search warrant or legal process
issued pursuant to RCW 10.79.015; any process issued pursuant to
chapter 10.27, 10.29, or 9.73 RCW; and any other legal process signed
by a judge of the superior court and issued in a criminal matter where
the warrant or legal process allows for search of or commands
production of records that are in the actual or constructive possession
of the recipient, regardless of whether the recipient or the records
are physically located within the state.
(4) "Defense attorney" means an attorney of record for a person
charged with a crime when the attorney is seeking the issuance of
criminal process for the defense of the criminal case.
(5) "Properly served" means delivery by hand or in a manner
reasonably allowing for proof of delivery if delivered by United States
mail, overnight delivery service, or facsimile to the recipient
addressee of criminal process.
(6) "Recipient" means a person as defined in RCW 9A.04.110, or a
business as defined in RCW 5.45.010, upon whom criminal process issued
under this section is properly served.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following apply to any criminal process
allowing for search of or commanding production of records that are in
the actual or constructive possession of the recipient, regardless of
whether the recipient or the records are physically located within the
state:
(1) When properly served with criminal process, the recipient shall
provide the applicant all records sought pursuant to the criminal
process within twenty business days of receipt, including those records
maintained or located outside this state. An applicant may consent to
a recipient's request for additional time to comply with the criminal
process.
(2) Criminal process issued under this chapter must contain the
following language in bold type on the first page of the document:
"This [warrant, subpoena, order] is issued pursuant to RCW [insert
citation to this statute]. A response is due within twenty business
days of receipt, unless a shorter time is stated herein, or the
applicant consents to a recipient's request for additional time to
comply."
(3) If the judge finds that failure to produce records within
twenty business days would cause an adverse result, the criminal
process may require production of records within less than twenty
business days of receipt. A court may reasonably extend the time
required for production of the records upon finding that the recipient
has shown good cause for that extension and that an extension of time
would not cause an adverse result.
(4) When properly served with criminal process, a recipient who
seeks to quash the criminal process must seek relief from the court
where the criminal process was issued, within the time originally
required for production of records. The court shall hear and decide
the motion no later than five court days after the motion is filed. An
applicant's consent, under subsection (1) of this section, to a
recipient's request for additional time to comply with the criminal
process does not extend the date by which a recipient must seek the
relief designated in this section.
(5) Upon written request from the applicant, or if ordered by the
court, the recipient of criminal process shall verify the authenticity
of records that it produces by providing an affidavit, declaration, or
certification that complies with subsection (6) of this section.
Records produced in compliance with this section are admissible in
evidence as set forth in subsections (6) through (9) of this section.
(6) Unless, in the opinion of the court, the source of information
or the method and time of preparation do not justify admission, a
record provided by a recipient of criminal process under this section
shall not be excluded as hearsay evidence if accompanied by an
affidavit, declaration, or certification that attests to the following:
(a) The record was made at or near the time of the occurrence of
the matters set forth by, or from information transmitted by, a person
with knowledge of those matters;
(b) The record was kept in the course of a regularly conducted
business activity;
(c) The affidavit, declaration, or certification was prepared by
and signed by the record custodian or other qualified witness who
states the identity of the record and sets forth the mode of its
preparation; and
(d) If the record is not the original, it is a duplicate of the
original.
(7) An affidavit or certification completed in compliance with
subsection (6) of this section shall authenticate the record or
duplicate.
(8) No evidence in the records in the form of opinion or diagnosis
is admissible under subsection (6) or (7) of this section, unless such
opinion or diagnosis would otherwise be admissible.
(9) As soon after the arraignment as practicable, but no later than
the omnibus hearing, a party intending to offer in evidence under this
section a record of regularly conducted business activity shall provide
written notice of that intention to each other party. A motion
opposing admission in evidence of the record shall be made by the
opposing party and determined by the court before trial. Failure by a
party to timely file such motion shall constitute a waiver of objection
to the record or duplicate, but the court for cause shown may grant
relief from the waiver.
(10) A Washington recipient, when served with a warrant or other
qualifying legal process that was issued by or in another state and
that, if it were issued in Washington, would be criminal process, shall
produce those records as if that warrant or other qualifying legal
process had been issued by a Washington court.
(11) No cause of action shall lie against any foreign or Washington
recipient of criminal process or a search warrant or other qualifying
legal process as provided in subsection (10) of this section, its
officers, employees, agents, or other persons specified in the warrant
or process for providing records, information, facilities, or
assistance in accordance with the terms of the warrant or process.
(12) A judge of the superior court may issue any criminal process
to any recipient at any address, within or without the state, for any
matter over which the court has criminal jurisdiction pursuant to RCW
9A.04.030. This provision does not limit a court's authority to issue
warrants or legal process under other provisions of state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 10 RCW.

--- END ---