BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.88 RCW
to read as follows:
The Hood Canal aquatic rehabilitation account is created in the
state treasury. All gifts, grants, federal moneys, or appropriations
made to the account must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for programs and projects to protect and
restore Hood Canal, including implementing RCW 90.88.020 and 90.88.030.

--- END ---