BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 44.04.010 and 1980 c 87 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
Regular sessions of the legislature shall be held ((annually))
biennially, commencing on the second Monday of January in each odd-numbered year.

Sec. 2 RCW 44.04.200 and 1980 c 87 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
After ((June 12, 1980)) the effective date of this act, all
references in the Revised Code of Washington to a regular session of
the legislature mean a regular session during an ((odd- or even-numbered)) odd-numbered year unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

Sec. 3 RCW 34.05.610 and 1998 c 280 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created a joint administrative rules review
committee which shall be a bipartisan committee consisting of four
senators and four representatives from the state legislature. The
senate members of the committee shall be appointed by the president of
the senate, and the house members of the committee shall be appointed
by the speaker of the house. Not more than two members from each house
may be from the same political party. The appointing authorities shall
also appoint one alternate member from each caucus of each house. All
appointments to the committee are subject to approval by the caucuses
to which the appointed members belong.
(2) Members and alternates shall be appointed as soon as possible
after the legislature convenes in regular session in an odd-numbered
year, and their terms shall extend until their successors are appointed
and qualified at the next regular session of the legislature in an odd-numbered year or until such persons no longer serve in the legislature,
whichever occurs first. Members and alternates may be reappointed to
the committee.
(3) On or about January 1, 1999, the president of the senate shall
appoint the chairperson and the vice chairperson from among the
committee membership. The speaker of the house shall appoint the
chairperson and the vice chairperson in alternating even-numbered years
beginning in the year 2000 from among the committee membership. The
secretary of the senate shall appoint the chairperson and the vice
chairperson in the alternating even-numbered years beginning in the
year 2002 from among the committee membership. Such appointments shall
be made in January of each even-numbered year ((as soon as possible
after a legislative session convenes)).
(4) The chairperson of the committee shall cause all meeting
notices and committee documents to be sent to the members and
alternates. A vacancy shall be filled by appointment of a legislator
from the same political party as the original appointment. The
appropriate appointing authority shall make the appointment within
thirty days of the vacancy occurring.

Sec. 4 RCW 40.04.090 and 1995 c 24 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The house and senate journals shall be distributed and sold by the
chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the
senate as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, sets shall be
distributed as follows: One to each requesting official whose office
is created by the Constitution, and one to each requesting state
department director; two copies to the state library; ten copies to the
state law library; two copies to the University of Washington library;
one to the King county law library; one to the Washington State
University library; one to the library of each of the regional
universities and to The Evergreen State College; one each to the law
library of any accredited law school in this state; and one to each
free public library in the state that requests it.
(2) House and senate journals of the preceding regular session
((during an odd- or even-numbered year)), and of any intervening
special session, shall be provided for use of legislators and
legislative staff in such numbers as directed by the chief clerk of the
house of representatives and secretary of the senate.
(3) Surplus sets of the house and senate journals shall be sold and
delivered by the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the
secretary of the senate at a price set by them after consulting with
the state printer to determine reasonable costs associated with the
production of the journals, and the proceeds therefrom shall be paid to
the state treasurer for the general fund.
(4) The chief clerk of the house of representatives and the
secretary of the senate may exchange copies of the house and senate
journals for similar journals of other states, territories, and
governments, or for other legal materials, and make such other and
further distribution of them as in their judgment seems proper.
(5) Periodically the chief clerk of the house of representatives
and the secretary of the senate may canvas those entitled to receive
copies under this section, and may reduce or eliminate the number of
copies distributed to anyone who so concurs.

Sec. 5 RCW 44.55.020 and 2003 c 404 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A joint legislative oversight committee on trade policy is created,
to consist of four senators and four representatives from the
legislature and three ex officio members. The president of the senate
shall appoint the senate members of the committee, and the speaker of
the house shall appoint the house members of the committee. No more
than two members from each house may be from the same political party.
A list of appointees must be submitted by July 1, 2003, and before
((the close of each regular session during an)) July 1st of each even-numbered year. Vacancies on the committee will be filled by
appointment and must be filled from the same political party and from
the same house as the member whose seat was vacated. The ex officio
members shall be appointed by the speaker of the house and the
president of the senate, and include a representative from the
department of agriculture, the state trade representative, and a
representative from the office of the attorney general.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.01.071 and 2005 c 319 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The transportation commission shall have the following functions,
powers, and duties:
(1) To propose policies to be adopted by the governor and the
legislature designed to assure the development and maintenance of a
comprehensive and balanced statewide transportation system which will
meet the needs of the people of this state for safe and efficient
transportation services. Wherever appropriate the policies shall
provide for the use of integrated, intermodal transportation systems to
implement the social, economic, and environmental policies, goals, and
objectives of the people of the state, and especially to conserve
nonrenewable natural resources including land and energy. To this end
the commission shall:
(a) Develop transportation policies which are based on the
policies, goals, and objectives expressed and inherent in existing
state laws;
(b) Inventory the adopted policies, goals, and objectives of the
local and area-wide governmental bodies of the state and define the
role of the state, regional, and local governments in determining
transportation policies, in transportation planning, and in
implementing the state transportation plan;
(c) Propose a transportation policy for the state;
(d) Establish a procedure for review and revision of the state
transportation policy and for submission of proposed changes to the
governor and the legislature;
(e) To integrate the statewide transportation plan with the needs
of the elderly and handicapped, and to coordinate federal and state
programs directed at assisting local governments to answer such needs;
(2) To provide for the effective coordination of state
transportation planning with national transportation policy, state and
local land use policies, and local and regional transportation plans
and programs;
(3) In conjunction with the provisions under RCW 47.01.075, to
provide for public involvement in transportation designed to elicit the
public's views both with respect to adequate transportation services
and appropriate means of minimizing adverse social, economic,
environmental, and energy impact of transportation programs;
(4) To prepare a comprehensive and balanced statewide
transportation plan which shall be based on the transportation policy
adopted by the governor and the legislature and applicable state and
federal laws. The plan shall be reviewed and revised, and submitted to
the governor and the house of representatives and senate standing
committees on transportation, prior to each regular session of the
legislature ((during an even-numbered year)) thereafter.
The plan shall take into account federal law and regulations
relating to the planning, construction, and operation of transportation
facilities;
(5) To propose to the governor and the legislature prior to the
convening of each regular session ((held in an odd-numbered year)) a
recommended budget for the operations of the commission as required by
RCW 47.01.061;
(6) To approve the issuance and sale of all bonds authorized by the
legislature for capital construction of state highways, toll
facilities, Columbia Basin county roads (for which reimbursement to the
motor vehicle fund has been provided), urban arterial projects, and
aviation facilities;
(7) To adopt such rules, regulations, and policy directives as may
be necessary to carry out reasonably and properly those functions
expressly vested in the commission by statute;
(8) To contract with the office of financial management or other
appropriate state agencies for administrative support, accounting
services, computer services, and other support services necessary to
carry out its other statutory duties;
(9) To exercise such other specific powers and duties as may be
vested in the transportation commission by this or any other provision
of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect if the proposed
amendment to Article II, section 12 of the state Constitution providing
for biennial regular sessions of the legislature is validly submitted
to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next general
election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this
act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---