BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) On December 1st of each year or the preceding Friday when
December 1st falls on a nonschool day, "Rosa Parks day" shall be
observed within each public school.
(2) Annually the state superintendent of public instruction shall
prepare and publish for circulation among public schools a suggested
curriculum for use on Rosa Parks day embodying topics pertinent to the
civil rights movement of the United States and to Ms. Parks's role in
and influence upon the civil rights movement.
(3) The presentation and activities required by this section shall
encompass the entire school day of not less then five hours.
(4) The principal or head teacher of the school building has the
responsibility for ensuring the preparation and presentation of the
instruction and activities required by this section.

--- END ---