BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.110 and 1999 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county, city-county, city, or
town, by local law and ordinance, and in accordance with the provisions
of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter, may provide for
the taxing of any gambling activity authorized by this chapter within
its jurisdiction, the tax receipts to go to the county, city-county,
city, or town so taxing the activity. Any such tax imposed by a county
alone shall not apply to any gambling activity within a city or town
located in the county but the tax rate established by a county, if any,
shall constitute the tax rate throughout the unincorporated areas of
such county.
(2) The operation of punch boards and pull-tabs are subject to the
following conditions:
(a) Chances may only be sold to adults;
(b) The price of a single chance may not exceed one dollar;
(c) No punch board or pull-tab license may award as a prize upon a
winning number or symbol being drawn the opportunity of taking a chance
upon any other punch board or pull-tab;
(d) All prizes available to be won must be described on an
information flare. All merchandise prizes must be on display within
the immediate area of the premises in which any such punch board or
pull-tab is located. Upon a winning number or symbol being drawn, a
merchandise prize must be immediately removed from the display and
awarded to the winner. All references to cash or merchandise prizes,
with a value over twenty dollars, must be removed immediately from the
information flare when won, or such omission shall be deemed a fraud
for the purposes of this chapter; and
(e) When any person wins money or merchandise from any punch board
or pull-tab over an amount determined by the commission, every licensee
shall keep a public record of the award for at least ninety days
containing such information as the commission shall deem necessary.
(3)(a) Taxation of bingo and raffles shall never be in an amount
greater than five percent of the gross receipts from a bingo game or
raffle less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise prizes.
(b) Taxation of amusement games shall only be in an amount
sufficient to pay the actual costs of enforcement of the provisions of
this chapter by the county, city or town law enforcement agency and in
no event shall such taxation exceed two percent of the gross receipts
from the amusement game less the amount awarded as prizes.
(c) No tax shall be imposed under the authority of this chapter on
bingo or amusement games when such activities or any combination
thereof are conducted by any bona fide charitable or nonprofit
organization as defined in this chapter, which organization ((has no
paid operating or management personnel and)) has gross receipts from
bingo or amusement games, or a combination thereof, not exceeding
((five)) two hundred thousand dollars per year, less the amount awarded
as cash or merchandise prizes.
(d) No tax shall be imposed on the first ten thousand dollars of
gross receipts less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise prizes
from raffles conducted by any bona fide charitable or nonprofit
organization as defined in this chapter.
(e) Taxation of punch boards and pull-tabs for bona fide charitable
or nonprofit organizations is based on gross receipts from the
operation of the games less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise
prizes, and shall not exceed a rate of ten percent. At the option of
the county, city-county, city, or town, the taxation of punch boards
and pull-tabs for commercial stimulant operators may be based on gross
receipts from the operation of the games, and may not exceed a rate of
five percent, or may be based on gross receipts from the operation of
the games less the amount awarded as cash or merchandise prizes, and
may not exceed a rate of ten percent.
(f) Taxation of social card games may not exceed twenty percent of
the gross revenue from such games.
(4) Taxes imposed under this chapter become a lien upon personal
and real property used in the gambling activity in the same manner as
provided for under RCW 84.60.010. The lien shall attach on the date
the tax becomes due and shall relate back and have priority against
real and personal property to the same extent as ad valorem taxes.

--- END ---