BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that nitrogen is
an important factor in creating low-dissolved oxygen in Hood Canal.
The legislature further finds that inputs of nitrogen to Hood Canal
from on-site sewage systems are uncertain due to insufficient data and
studies. Therefore, the legislature finds that improved data on the
contribution of nitrogen from on-site sewage systems to Hood Canal
would allow stakeholders to focus and prioritize resources.
(2) The Puget Sound action team and the Hood Canal coordinating
council shall contract for a study in the Hood Canal to:
(a) Improve data and knowledge of the loading of nitrogen from on-site sewage systems to ground water;
(b) Determine the local scale efficiency of nitrogen removal from
on-site sewage systems; and
(c) Improve data and knowledge of the loading of nitrogen from all
ground water sources to Hood Canal.
(3) The study shall:
(a) Locate representative on-site sewage systems distributed within
the Hood Canal drainage basin for use in the study;
(b) Collect water levels and samples from the areas around a number
of on-site sewage systems under a variety of water table, soil, and
geologic conditions;
(c) Test samples for nitrogen, phosphorous, carbon, and other
pertinent chemistry;
(d) Consider water levels and samples from monitoring wells both up
gradient and down gradient from on-site sewage systems;
(e) Collect data from drain fields to test on-site sewage system
efficiency; and
(f) Collect water level, nutrient, and other chemical data from a
number of existing wells in the watershed to test how much nitrogen is
reaching Hood Canal.
(4) The study shall be coordinated with other studies being
conducted in Hood Canal through the Hood Canal dissolved oxygen
program.
(5) The Puget Sound action team and the Hood Canal coordinating
council shall report their findings and recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007.

--- END ---