BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.157.010 and 2004 c 275 s 63 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter and RCW 28A.525.166, 28B.76.210,
28C.18.080, 43.21A.350, 47.06.030, and 90.58.100 ((and)), an industrial
project of statewide significance is a border crossing project that
involves both private and public investments carried out in conjunction
with adjacent states or provinces or a private industrial development
with private capital investment in manufacturing or research and
development. To qualify as an industrial project of statewide
significance: (a) The project must be completed after January 1, 1997;
(b) the applicant must submit an application for designation as an
industrial project of statewide significance to the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)); and (c) the project must
have:
(i) In counties with a population of less than or equal to twenty
thousand, a capital investment of twenty million dollars;
(ii) In counties with a population of greater than twenty thousand
but no more than fifty thousand, a capital investment of fifty million
dollars;
(iii) In counties with a population of greater than fifty thousand
but no more than one hundred thousand, a capital investment of one
hundred million dollars;
(iv) In counties with a population of greater than one hundred
thousand but no more than two hundred thousand, a capital investment of
two hundred million dollars;
(v) In counties with a population of greater than two hundred
thousand but no more than four hundred thousand, a capital investment
of four hundred million dollars;
(vi) In counties with a population of greater than four hundred
thousand but no more than one million, a capital investment of six
hundred million dollars;
(vii) In counties with a population of greater than one million, a
capital investment of one billion dollars;
(viii) In counties with fewer than one hundred persons per square
mile as determined annually by the office of financial management and
published by the department of revenue effective for the period July
1st through June 30th, projected full-time employment positions after
completion of construction of fifty or greater;
(ix) In counties with one hundred or more persons per square mile
as determined annually by the office of financial management and
published by the department of revenue effective for the period July
1st through June 30th, projected full-time employment positions after
completion of construction of one hundred or greater; or
(x) Been designated by the director of community, trade, and
economic development as an industrial project of statewide significance
either: (A) Because the county in which the project is to be located
is a distressed county and the economic circumstances of the county
merit the additional assistance such designation will bring; or (B)
because the impact on a region due to the size and complexity of the
project merits such designation.
(2) ((The term)) The definitions in this subsection apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Forest products operation of statewide significance" is an
industrial operation that processes or mills only timber that has been
harvested from public or private lands within the state of Washington
and has been certified as such under RCW 43.157.030. To qualify for a
designation as a forest products operation of statewide significance,
the operation must be either wholly new, a refurbished existing
facility, or an existing facility that has increased milling capacity.
(b) "Manufacturing" ((shall have the meaning assigned it in RCW
82.61.010)) means all activities of a commercial or industrial nature
wherein labor or skill is applied, by hand or machinery, to materials
so that as a result thereof a new, different, or useful substance or
article of tangible personal property is produced for sale or
commercial or industrial use and includes the production or fabrication
of specially made or custom-made articles.
(((3) The term)) (c) "Research and development" ((shall have the
meaning assigned it in RCW 82.61.010)) means the development,
refinement, testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product,
service, or process before commercial sales have begun.
(((4) The term)) (d) "Applicant" means a person applying to the
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) for
designation of a development project as an industrial project of
statewide significance or as a forest products operation of statewide
significance.
(e) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.157.020 and 2003 c 54 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Counties and cities with projects designated as industrial
projects of statewide significance within their jurisdictions shall
enter into an agreement with the office of permit assistance and the
project managers of industrial projects of statewide significance for
expediting the completion of industrial projects of statewide
significance. The agreement shall require:
(((1))) (a) Expedited permit processing for the design and
construction of the project;
(((2))) (b) Expedited environmental review processing;
(((3))) (c) Expedited processing of requests for street, right of
way, or easement vacations necessary for the construction of the
project; and
(((4))) (d) Such other items as are deemed necessary by the office
of permit assistance for the design and construction of the project.
(2) Counties with projects designated as forest products operations
of statewide significance, along with any pertinent state entities with
permitting authority or requirements, shall enter into an agreement
with the office of permit assistance and the project manager for the
forest products operation of statewide significance for expediting the
completion of the forest products operation of statewide significance.
The agreement shall guarantee that any necessary permit for the
construction or operation of the forest products operation of statewide
significance be granted within ninety days of application. If a permit
is not granted by the end of the ninety-day period, then issuance of a
permit with no conditions or modifications will be automatic and
assumed by the project managers on the ninety-first day following
application.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.157.030 and 2003 c 54 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department ((of community, trade, and economic
development)) shall:
(a) Develop an application for designation of development projects
as industrial projects of statewide significance and for forest
products operations of statewide significance. The application for
industrial projects of statewide significance must be accompanied by a
letter of approval from the legislative authority of any jurisdiction
that will have the proposed industrial project of statewide
significance within its boundaries. No designation of a project as an
industrial project of statewide significance shall be made without such
letter of approval. The letter of approval must state that the
jurisdiction joins in the request for the designation of the project as
one of statewide significance and has or will hire the professional
staff that will be required to expedite the processes necessary to the
completion of an industrial project of statewide significance. The
application shall contain information regarding the location of the
project, the applicant's average employment in the state for the prior
year, estimated new employment related to the project, estimated wages
of employees related to the project, estimated time schedules for
completion and operation, and other information required by the
department; and
(b) Certify that the project meets or will meet the requirements of
RCW 43.157.010 regarding designation as an industrial project of
statewide significance.
(2) The office of permit assistance shall assign a project
facilitator or coordinator to each industrial project of statewide
significance to: (a) Assist in the scoping and coordinating functions
provided for in chapter 43.42 RCW; (b) assemble a team of state and
local government and private officials to help meet the planning,
permitting, and development needs of each project, which team shall
include those responsible for planning, permitting and licensing,
infrastructure development, work force development services including
higher education, transportation services, and the provision of
utilities; and (c) work with each team member to expedite their actions
in furtherance of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a person that
has received designation as a: (1) Forest products operation of
statewide significance under RCW 43.157.030; and (2) certified
participant in a sustainable forestry initiative program that allows
the participant the use of the primary producers label. This exemption
shall only be taken for five consecutive years beginning with the
reporting period in which the exemption is initially claimed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to persons
of tangible goods, labor and services, prewritten computer software,
and extended warranties that will be used in the construction,
operation, or maintenance of a forest products operation of statewide
significance certified by the department of community, trade, and
economic development under RCW 43.157.030. A person taking the
exemption under this section must keep records necessary for the
department to verify eligibility under this section. The exemption is
available only when the buyer provides the seller with an exemption
certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use by persons
of tangible goods, labor and services, prewritten computer software,
and extended warranties that will be used in the construction,
operation, or maintenance of a forest products operation of statewide
significance certified by the department of community, trade, and
economic development under RCW 43.157.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
Forest products operations of statewide significance certified by
the department of community, trade, and economic development under RCW
43.157.030 may be located in limited areas of more intensive rural
development as defined in RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 36.32 RCW
to read as follows:
Any county with which the project managers of a forest products
operation of statewide significance certified by the department of
community, trade, and economic development under RCW 43.157.030 has
applied for a permit or other permission for building or operating a
forest products operation of statewide significance shall comply with
the timelines established in RCW 43.157.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---