BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that as many as twenty-four million
people in the United States suffer from an eating disorder, and ninety-five percent of those individuals are between the ages of twelve and
twenty-five. Even more disturbing is that anorexia is the third most
common chronic illness among adolescents, and more people die of eating
disorders than any other mental illness. Fortunately, eating disorders
are preventable and can be treated. However, early intervention is the
key to successful prevention and treatment. It is essential that
middle and junior high school children are taught the physical dangers
of eating disorders in order to dismiss the glamorization of being too
thin that occurs in the media. Including instruction about eating
disorders in the middle and junior high school classroom also
encourages teachers to become better educated and to recognize the
warning symptoms and appropriate intervention if a student shows early
signs of an eating disorder.
(2) All public middle and junior high schools in the state are
strongly encouraged to ensure that instruction is provided to students
in the health and fitness curriculum regarding identification of the
warning signs, behavioral patterns, and avenues of support for young
people with abnormal eating behaviors or eating disorders.

--- END ---