BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.84.030 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.84.030 are
each amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of disorderly conduct if ((he)) the person:
(a) Uses abusive language and thereby intentionally creates a risk
of assault; ((or))
(b) Intentionally disrupts any lawful assembly or meeting of
persons without lawful authority; ((or))
(c) Intentionally obstructs vehicular or pedestrian traffic without
lawful authority; or
(d)(i) Intentionally engages in fighting or in tumultuous conduct
or makes unreasonable noise, within five hundred feet of:
(A) The location where a funeral or burial is being performed;
(B) A funeral home during the viewing of a deceased person;
(C) A funeral procession, if the person described in this
subsection (1)(d) knows that the funeral procession is taking place; or
(D) A building in which a funeral or memorial service is being
conducted; and
(ii) Knows that the activity adversely affects the funeral, burial,
viewing, funeral procession, or memorial service.
(2) Disorderly conduct is a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---