BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to establish
procedures for the orderly formation of new counties or consolidation
of existing counties and to provide for an equitable apportionment of
the debts, liabilities, and assets of the parent county or counties
between the new county and the remaining portions or portion of each
parent county.
(1) Article XI, section 3 of the state Constitution authorizes the
formation of new counties and establishes certain conditions for and
restrictions on those formations. The constitutional provision
requires the legislature to adopt "a general law applicable to the
whole state." In over one hundred years, the legislature has failed to
provide a general statutory framework for the formation of new counties
that applies to the whole state.
(2) The purpose of this act is to establish procedures for the
orderly formation of new counties, either by the division of an
existing county or counties or through the consolidation of existing
counties, that is consistent with the recent state supreme court
decision in Cedar County Committee v. Munro (134 Wn.2d 377) and to
provide for an equitable apportionment of the debts, liabilities, and
assets of the parent county or counties between the new county and the
remaining portion or portions of each parent county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assets" means all: (a) Real estate and leasehold interests in
real estate owned by the parent county; (b) tangible personal property
owned or leased by the parent county; and (c) intangible personal
property owned by the parent county including cash, securities,
commercial paper, notes, accounts receivable, and contract rights.
Assets are determined as of the first day of the interim period.
(2) "Interim period" means the period during which a new county
government is established, the apportionment of debts, liabilities, and
assets is implemented, and the transfer of all records from the parent
county or counties to the new county is completed. The period begins
on January 1st after the end of the regular session at which the new
county is created by special legislation or the year in which an
election for the formation of a new county is approved, and the period
ends on December 31st of the same year.
(3) "New county" means the county that is created by striking
territory from a parent county or counties under Article XI, section 3
of the state Constitution.
(4) "Parent county or counties" means the existing county or
counties out of which territory is stricken to create a new county
under Article XI, section 3 of the state Constitution.
(5) "Proponents" means up to five individuals who are registered
voters in the proposed new county who initiate the petition process to
create a new county under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The proponent or proponents of a proposed
new county shall, before the circulation of a petition in support of
the formation of that new county, file with the secretary of state a
statement designating the name of the proposed county and containing
the legal description of the proposed county, together with an
affidavit from each proponent that he or she is a registered voter
within the territory of the proposed county. If there are two or more
proponents, one of them must be designated as the principal proponent
for the purpose of receiving notices and communications required by
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Upon receipt of the statement, legal
description, and affidavit of sponsorship for a proposed new county,
the secretary of state shall forward a copy of the legal description to
the office of financial management.
(2) Within thirty days of receipt of this request from the
secretary of state, the director of the office of financial management
shall determine if the legal description is consistent and the
territory described is a single, contiguous area. If the legal
description is defective, the director shall notify the secretary of
state and the principal proponent of the nature and extent of the
defect. With the advice and assistance of the director, the proponents
may amend the legal description and file a new statement under section
3 of this act.
(3) If the legal description is not defective, the director shall
also determine the population of the proposed new county and the
population of the remaining portion or portions of each parent county,
using the most current data available. The director shall certify
these populations to the secretary of state and the principal proponent
of the new county within thirty days of receipt of the request from the
secretary of state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Petitions for the formation of a new county
must be substantially in the following form:

WARNING

Every person who signs this petition with any other than his or her
true name, knowingly signs more than one petition for the same new
county, signs this petition when he or she is not a registered voter,
or makes any false statement on this petition may be punished by fine
or imprisonment or both.

PETITION FOR THE FORMATION OF . . . . . . . . COUNTY

To the Honorable . . . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State
of Washington:

We the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the state of
Washington, respectfully direct that this petition for the formation of
. . . . . . . . county, a full, true, and correct copy of the legal
description of which is printed on the reverse side of this petition,
be transmitted to the legislature of the state of Washington, at its
next ensuing regular session. We respectfully petition the legislature
to create this new county as provided by law. Each of us for himself
or herself declares that: I have personally signed this petition, I am
a legal voter of the state of Washington, my residence address is
correctly stated, and I have not knowingly signed any other petition
for the formation of this county.

Petitioner's
signature Print name
for positive
identification Residence address,
street, and number,
if any City
or
Town County

1

2

3

4

5

6

7

8

9

10

11

12

13

14

15

16

17

18

19

20

A complete legal description of the proposed county must be printed
on the reverse side of the petition sheet. A proposed county seat may
be included on the front or the back of the petition. A map of the
proposed new county may be printed on the front or the back of the
petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Petitions for the formation of a new county,
signed by the requisite number of registered voters in the proposed
county, may be submitted to the secretary of state at any time up to
three years after the certification of the legal description and
populations under section 4 of this act. The standards for acceptance
or rejection of signature petitions for the formation of a new county
are the same as for acts under RCW 29A.72.170, and any appeal of a
refusal by the secretary of state to file signature petitions will
proceed in the same manner as provided for acts under RCW 29A.72.180
and 29A.72.190.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A petition for the creation of a new county
circulated before the effective date of this act, filed under section
6 of this act with the secretary of state within two years of the
effective date of this act, and differing in form from the information
required by section 5 of this act is acceptable as to the requirements
for form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A petition proposing the creation of a new
county must be signed by at least fifty percent of the registered
voters residing in the combined portions of each parent county from
which territory is proposed to be stricken and included in the new
county at the time the petition is filed under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Every person who signs a petition
requesting the creation of a new county with any other than his or her
true name is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20
RCW.
(2) Every person who: (a) Knowingly signs more than one petition
for the same effort to create a new county; (b) signs a petition
requesting the creation of a new county knowing that he or she is not
a legal voter; or (c) makes a false statement as to his or her
residence on any petition requesting the creation of a new county, is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Within sixty days of the receipt of the
petition under section 6 of this act, the secretary of state shall
examine the signatures on the petition, compare them to the records in
the statewide data base of registered voters provided under chapter
29A.08 RCW and any additional information provided by the parent county
or counties that is necessary to determine whether a registered voter
is within the boundaries of the proposed new county, and determine if
the number of valid signatures of registered voters on the petition
exceeds the number required under section 8 of this act. A variation
between the signature on the petition and that on the registration
record due to the substitution of initials or the use of common
nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and handwriting are
clearly the same.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The secretary of state shall certify to
the proponents and to the legislature whether the proposed new county
and the remaining parent county or counties will have the minimum
populations required by the state Constitution and whether the petition
has been signed by at least fifty percent of the registered voters in
the combined portions of each parent county that is to be stricken to
form the new county.
(2) The secretary of state shall also notify the presiding judge of
the division of the state court of appeals that contains the greatest
portion of the population of the new county that a petition for the
formation of a new county has been transmitted to the legislature and
shall transmit with the notice a copy of the legal description of the
proposed county.
(3) The secretary of state shall also notify the director of the
department of revenue that a petition for the formation of a new county
has been transmitted to the legislature and shall transmit with the
notice a copy of the legal description of the proposed county.
(4) Any proponent or opponent of the new county, dissatisfied with
the determination of the secretary of state under this section, may
appeal that determination to the superior court of Thurston county.
The review by the superior court will proceed in the same manner as for
acts under RCW 29A.72.240.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) When the presiding judge of the
applicable division of the state court of appeals is notified of the
petition transmission under section 11(2) of this act, the presiding
judge shall appoint a special master to gather facts, conduct hearings,
review evidence, and make recommendations to the court regarding the
division of assets and liabilities between the new county and the
parent county or counties in accordance with sections 13 through 18 of
this act, including any critical factors that would affect the
projected long-term revenues of the proposed new county compared to
counties of similar population and physical area. The principal
proponent of the new county and the legislative authority of any parent
county or counties from which territory is to be stricken are proper
parties to this proceeding and may recommend individuals to serve as
the special master.
(2) If the petition for a new county proposes the consolidation of
two or more existing counties where there is no remaining territory in
any parent county or counties, the presiding judge may enter an order
under section 17(1) of this act without appointing a special master.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The special master may employ
appraisers, accountants, actuaries, engineers, attorneys, or other
experts, and consult with state and local agencies including boundary
review boards established under chapter 36.93 RCW, to assemble and
evaluate evidence and exercise all other powers granted to the court
that are necessary for the efficient and just resolution of any issues.
(2) The court of appeals may award payment of reasonable fees and
costs to any special master and any experts that the special master is
authorized to retain and may assess such fees and costs against the
parent county and the new county in such proportions as it deems just.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Whenever a new county is created out of
territory that was stricken from another county or counties, the new
county is liable for an equitable proportion of the debts and
liabilities of the parent county or counties and must receive an
equitable proportion of the assets of the parent county or counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) In apportioning the debts and
liabilities under section 14 of this act, the court shall not charge
either county with any share of debts or liabilities then existing
incurred in the purchase of county property, or in the purchase or
construction of public buildings then in use or under construction, or
roads or bridges then in use or under construction, that are located
within the other county except where the repayment of the debt or
liability is being made or is to be made from bonds originally
authorized by a vote of the qualified electors in the other county.
(2) The remaining debts and liabilities of the parent county must
be apportioned so that the new county is assigned an amount of these
debts and liabilities that is in the same proportion as the assessed
valuation of the new county, that was part of that parent county, is to
the total assessed valuation in the parent county before the creation
of the new county. The assessed valuations must be those used for
taxes imposed in the year before the election was held authorizing the
creation of the new county. The debts and liabilities mentioned in
this section may not include new tax obligations created by the parent
county government after the submission of petitions for creation of the
new county to the secretary of state.
(3) This section may not be construed to affect the rights of
creditors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) In apportioning the assets of the
parent county or counties, each parent county retains ownership of real
property it owns that remains in its boundaries after the creation of
the new county. At the effective date of the creation of the new
county, the new county acquires ownership of real property that was
owned by the parent county or counties that is located in the new
county. No valuation of or compensation for real property is required.
(2) All equipment owned by each parent county that is used in the
construction or maintenance of roads or bridges must be apportioned
based on total appraised value of the equipment between the new county
and the parent county so that the new county receives a portion of this
equipment that is in the same proportion as the number of miles of
county roads in the new county, that were part of that parent county,
is to the total number of miles of county roads in the parent county
before the creation of the new county.
(3) All other assets of each parent county, the apportionment of
which is not otherwise provided for, must be apportioned between the
parent county and the new county based on total appraised value of the
assets so that the new county receives a portion of these assets that
is in the same proportion as the assessed valuation of the new county,
that was part of the parent county, is to the total assessed valuation
of the parent county before the creation of the new county. The
assessed valuations must be those used for taxes imposed in the year of
the election authorizing creation of the new county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) Within six months after receiving
notice under section 11(2) of this act, the court of appeals shall
enter an order apportioning all debts, liabilities, and assets of the
parent county or counties between the parent counties and new county
and providing for the method of transfer or payment, subject to the
creation of the new county under section 19 of this act. The order of
the court of appeals is final.
(2) RCW 2.06.040 applies to a proceeding under this section, except
that a decision rendered under this section does not have precedential
value and need not be published as an opinion of the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Within six months of the receipt of a
notice under section 11 of this act, the director of the department of
revenue, in conjunction with the department of community, trade, and
economic development and the office of financial management, shall
analyze and prepare a report on the impact of the creation of the new
county on the revenues and expenditures of the parent county or
counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) If all the requirements of Article XI,
section 3 of the state Constitution for the creation of a new county
have been met, the legislature may, during the first regular session
after certification under section 11(1) of this act, enact special
legislation creating that county.
(2) If the legislature does not enact special legislation creating
the county under subsection (1) of this section, the question of the
creation of that county must be referred to a vote of the registered
voters residing in the proposed new county at the next general election
more than one hundred twenty days after the adjournment of the session
at which the special legislation could have been enacted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 (1) If the legislature provides for the
creation of a new county under section 19 of this act by special
legislation, that special legislation must include:
(a) A legal description of the proposed new county;
(b) The initial annual salaries of the elected officers of the new
county;
(c) An initial county seat for the new county, if not specified in
the county petition;
(d) Provision for the initial election of officers of the new
county if those are different from sections 21 through 23 of this act;
(e) Provision for a superior court and district court for the new
county;
(f) Boundaries for three commissioner districts in the proposed new
county subject to the criteria in RCW 29A.76.010; and
(g) Provision for any necessary financial resources for the new
county during the interim period and until the receipt of regular taxes
and other revenues. Such measures may be revised by the new county
commission once in operation.
(2) All counties must consist of a single contiguous area of land
and water. If the legislature determines that the boundaries of the
proposed new county have become defective since the collection of
petitions, it may modify the proposed boundaries only so far to resolve
these issues. It shall consider the boundaries of existing and new
communities and governmental units, but may not make substantive
changes of greater than ten percent of the total area of the new
county. The legislature may not make changes in the boundaries that
would result in the creation of a new county that does not satisfy the
requirements of Article XI, section 3 of the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 (1) If special legislation enacted under
section 19(1) of this act does not provide otherwise or if the question
of the formation of a new county is referred under section 19(2) of
this act and if the new county includes part of the territory from one
or more parent counties that question must be submitted to the voters
of the new county in substantially the following form:

"Shall the new county of (insert name of new county) be created and
the assets and liabilities of (insert the name of the parent county or
counties) be divided with this new county as provided in (cite the
order of the court of appeals)? - yes or no?"

(2) If the new county consolidates all of the territory of two or
more parent counties, the question must be submitted to the voters of
the new county in substantially the following form:

"Shall the new county of (insert name of new county) be created and
shall it assume all of the assets and liabilities of (insert the name
of the parent counties) as provided in (cite the order of the court of
appeals)? - yes or no?"

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 (1) If special legislation enacted under
section 19(1) of this act does not provide otherwise or if the question
of the formation of a new county is referred under section 19(2) of
this act, a primary must be held under RCW 29A.04.311 for the
nomination of candidates for the various county elected offices, and
elections for those offices must be held in conjunction with the state
general election in that year. Except as provided in this section,
nominations and elections must be held as provided by the general
election laws for partisan county offices.
(2) Declarations of candidacy for the initial terms of office for
the elected county offices in the new county must be filed with the
county auditor of the parent county if the new county is to be created
out of territory from only one county and with the secretary of state
if the new county is to be formed out of territory from more than one
parent county.
(3) Candidates for the office of county commissioner shall file for
one of three separate county commissioner positions. If county
commissioner districts were created by the special legislation, the
filing officer shall designate one position for each district, and the
voters in each district shall nominate the candidates for county
commissioner for that district.
(4) If any parent county does not provide a local voters' pamphlet
for the primary or the general election under RCW 29A.32.210 through
29A.32.280, the secretary of state shall provide a pamphlet for the
jurisdiction of the proposed new county only.
(5) If the local voters' pamphlet is produced by the secretary of
state, the committees to draft statements for and against the measures
will be appointed as provided for state measures under RCW 29A.32.060.
The local voters' pamphlet must include the legal description and map
of the proposed new county, a summary of the allocation of assets,
debts, and liabilities adopted by the court of appeals, and the report
by the department of revenue about the revenue and expenditure impact
of the formation of the new county on the parent county or counties.
(6) The county auditor or auditors shall conduct and canvass the
election and certify the results to the secretary of state, who shall
canvass and certify the results of the primary and the election.
(7) The newly elected county officials shall assume office
immediately upon the certification of the election with limited powers
during the interim period as provided in this chapter and full powers
after the expiration of the interim period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 If the legislature creates a new county
under section 19(1) of this act or if a majority of the registered
voters who reside within the boundaries of the proposed new county
voting on the question vote in favor of creation of a new county under
section 19(2) of this act, the new county is established, with an
interim organization period commencing on January 1st of the year after
the session at which the special legislation was enacted or the
election at which the voters approved the formation of the new county.
The interim period expires on December 31st of the year in which it
started.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, the terms of office for all of the initial county
officials are from the date of the certification of their election
until their successors are elected and qualified at the next general
election that is two years before the year in which the governor is
elected.
(2) The commissioner or commissioners who receive the greatest
number of votes for their respective positions at the general election
provided for under section 22 of this act will receive the longer
unexpired term or terms.
(3) No regular or unexpired term elections may be held during the
interim period. Vacancies in elected county offices will be filled by
appointment.
(4) After the expiration of the first set of unexpired terms, the
terms of all officers will be four years and until their successors are
elected and qualified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 If the new county is created, the new
county shall reimburse the parent county or counties for its share of
the primary and election costs under RCW 29A.04.410. If the new county
is not created, the parent county or counties shall pay the cost of
conducting the primary and the election to create a new county and
elect county officers. For the purposes of this section, the
proportionate share of the costs of producing and distributing the
local voters' pamphlet under section 22 of this act are included in the
cost of conducting the primary and election on the formation of the new
county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 Except as provided in this section, the
boundaries of any new county are independent from and do not affect the
boundaries of any city, town, or special district of any kind.
(1) Unless the initial board of county commissioners provides
otherwise, a single road district must exist in the new county composed
of all the unincorporated area within the new county. Territory that
is stricken from a parent county to create a new county must also be
stricken from the road district or districts of the parent county
effective as of the final day of the interim period.
(2) An area in a new county that was included in a county rural
library district must remain part of that county rural library
district. The trustees of such a library district must be appointed by
joint action of the members of the county legislative authorities of
the parent county or counties and the new county, with the vote on each
appointment distributed among the members of the county legislative
authorities so that the combined total vote of all the members of a
single county legislative authority is in direct proportion to the
percentage of population within the library district residing in that
county and each member of that county legislative authority receiving
an equal portion of that vote.
(3) Effective on the first day after the interim period for the
creation of a new county, a public transportation benefit area that
includes territory located in both the remaining parent county and new
county will have its boundaries reduced to eliminate any territory
located in the new county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 The superior court and district court for
the new county shall obtain jurisdiction over all new matters filed on
or after the interim period expires, over which those courts otherwise
have jurisdiction under the state Constitution and state law. The
superior court and district court of the parent county or counties
shall retain jurisdiction of any matters pending before them or on
appeal from them on December 31st at the close of the interim period
unless all parties to the matter stipulate to a change of venue to the
superior or district court of the new county.
All pleadings, process, documents, and files in the office of the
county clerk and in the offices of officers of the superior or district
court of a parent county pertaining to actions and proceedings
transferred to the superior or district court of the new county must be
certified and transferred to the county clerk or to officers of the
superior or district court of the new county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 Within ten months of the beginning of the
interim period for a new county, all records, documents, and papers in
the offices of county auditor, county assessor, county treasurer, and
other county officers of a parent county, affecting the title or
possession of real property in the new county, assessed valuation of
property located in the new county, registration of voters residing in
the new county, or other appropriate matters, must be certified by the
appropriate parent county official and must be transferred to the
appropriate county officials and officers of the new county. If
original records, documents, or papers are not transferred, certified
copies must be provided. The appropriate county officials of the
parent county and the new county may agree to these transfers through
electronic, mechanical, or other methods that adequately ensure the
accuracy of the transferred information. The new county shall pay all
reasonable costs incurred with regard to the transfer of records,
documents, and papers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 During the interim period for a new county,
the initial county officials have the following powers:
(1) The initial board of county commissioners may adopt ordinances
and adopt resolutions necessary to implement the general powers
provided by this section. The initial board of county commissioners
may also adopt ordinances on any matter within the authority of a
noncharter county. The ordinances become effective on the expiration
of the interim period.
(2) The initial county officials, subject to state law governing
counties in general, may purchase or lease land, buildings, equipment,
and supplies; contract for services; and employ staff as necessary to
implement the powers provided by this section and to assure the
establishment of the necessary infrastructure and staffing for the full
operation of county government on the expiration of the interim period.
(3) The initial county officials may enter interlocal agreements
with the parent county or counties to facilitate the establishment of
the new county government and for services to be rendered following the
interim period.
(4) The initial board of county commissioners may:
(a) Cause tax anticipation or revenue anticipation notes or
warrants or other short-term obligations to be issued as provided in
chapter 39.50 RCW;
(b) Authorize the borrowing of money from state or federal agencies
to the same extent as is authorized for a nonhome-rule county;
(c) Submit ballot propositions to the voters of the new county
authorizing a single-year excess levy to be imposed, as provided by RCW
84.52.052;
(d) Submit ballot propositions to the voters of the new county
authorizing both voter-approved general indebtedness and bond
retirement excess levies, as provided by RCW 84.52.056 and 39.36.050;
(e) Impose property taxes as authorized for counties, to be
collected after the interim period; and
(f) Impose excise taxes as authorized for counties effective on
January 1st after the interim period, including, but not limited to,
sales and use taxes authorized in chapter 82.14 RCW and real estate
excise taxes authorized in chapter 82.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 The initial county officers of a new county
during the interim period are subject to all state laws limiting the
authority of or imposing obligations on such offices as if the new
county were fully established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 All ordinances, rules, and regulations of
a parent county that are in effect at the beginning of the interim
period for a new county and that are adopted by the parent county
during the interim period of a new county have their full force and
effect within the portion of the parent county that is stricken to form
the new county until the end of the interim period, unless repealed by
the parent county before that date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 During the interim period for a new county,
the parent county or counties remain responsible for providing all
county services previously provided by that parent county in the
portion of the parent county that is stricken to form a new county at
the current level of service, unless otherwise agreed to between the
parent county and the initial officers of the new county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 (1) The budget for the interim period for
a new county must be adopted as provided in this section. The budget
for the first budget cycle of the new county after the interim period
must be adopted as provided in chapter 36.40 RCW.
(2) The initial board of county commissioners shall adopt a budget
for the interim period and make any subsequent amendments in
consultation with the state auditor and the department of revenue. The
department of revenue shall provide to the initial officers of the new
county, at the earliest date feasible after the election authorizing
formation of the new county, a report detailing the potential revenues
and expenses of the new county. The interim period budget may
initially authorize expenditure of moneys by general category without
specific detail. The budget may be amended periodically during the
interim period to reflect actual revenues or expenditure requirements
as they become known.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 During the interim period for a new county,
the initial board of county commissioners may borrow money from the
state treasurer in amounts and on terms deemed prudent and reasonable
by the state treasurer.
Any loan obtained under this section must be repaid within three
years of the initial disbursement. The state treasurer may withhold
moneys from the funds otherwise payable to the new county to assure
repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 Each parent county shall continue imposing
sales and use taxes throughout its entire boundaries until the end of
the interim period. Before the end of the interim period, each parent
county will continue receiving federal and state moneys allocated to it
as if the new county did not exist. State moneys must be allocated to
the new county on whatever basis these moneys are distributed
commencing on the first day after the interim period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 The rule of strict construction does not
apply to this chapter. The authority granted to the initial county
commissioners of a new county must be liberally interpreted to provide
for a transition to a new county during the interim period so that, to
the greatest extent possible, a new county will be able to fully
function as a complete county government at the date the new county is
officially created.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning on January 1st following the interim period for a new
county, the department of transportation shall adjust the allocations
of transportation moneys made to counties to include the new county on
the same bases as apply to previously existing counties.

Sec. 38 RCW 36.32.020 and 1982 c 226 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board of county commissioners of each county shall divide their
county into three commissioner districts so that each district shall
comprise as nearly as possible one-third of the population of the
county((: PROVIDED, That)). The territory comprised in any voting
precincts of such districts shall remain compact, and shall not be
divided by the lines of ((said)) the districts.
However, the commissioners of any county composed entirely of
islands and with a population of less than thirty-five thousand may
divide their county into three commissioner districts without regard to
population, except that if any single island is included in more than
one district, the districts on such island shall comprise, as nearly as
possible, equal populations.
The lines of the districts shall not be changed ((oftener)) more
often than once in four years except for the initial districts in a new
county created under section 19 of this act and only when a full board
of commissioners is present. The districts shall be designated as
districts numbered one, two and three.

Sec. 39 RCW 84.09.030 and 2004 c 129 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as follows, the boundaries of counties, cities and all other
taxing districts, for purposes of property taxation and the levy of
property taxes, shall be the established official boundaries of such
districts existing on the first day of March of the year in which the
property tax levy is made.
The official boundaries of a newly incorporated taxing district
shall be established at a different date in the year in which the
incorporation occurred as follows:
(1) Boundaries for a newly incorporated city shall be established
on the last day of March of the year in which the initial property tax
levy is made, and the boundaries of a road district, library district,
or fire protection district or districts, that include any portion of
the area that was incorporated within its boundaries shall be altered
as of this date to exclude this area, if the budget for the newly
incorporated city is filed pursuant to RCW 84.52.020 and the levy
request of the newly incorporated city is made pursuant to RCW
84.52.070. Whenever a proposed city incorporation is on the March
special election ballot, the county auditor shall submit the legal
description of the proposed city to the department of revenue on or
before the first day of March;
(2) Boundaries for a newly incorporated port district or regional
fire protection service authority shall be established on the first day
of October if the boundaries of the newly incorporated port district or
regional fire protection service authority are coterminous with the
boundaries of another taxing district or districts, as they existed on
the first day of March of that year;
(3) Boundaries of any other newly incorporated taxing district
shall be established on the first day of June of the year in which the
property tax levy is made if the taxing district has boundaries
coterminous with the boundaries of another taxing district, as they
existed on the first day of March of that year;
(4) Boundaries for a newly incorporated water-sewer district shall
be established on the fifteenth of June of the year in which the
proposition under RCW 57.04.050 authorizing a water district excess
levy is approved; and
(5) Boundaries of a new county, the counties from which territory
is stricken to create the new county, any road districts in the
counties from which the territory is stricken, and road districts in
the newly created county will be established on the first day of
January of the interim period after the formation of that new county.
The boundaries of a taxing district shall be established on the
first day of June if territory has been added to, or removed from, the
taxing district after the first day of March of that year with
boundaries coterminous with the boundaries of another taxing district
as they existed on the first day of March of that year. However, the
boundaries of a road district, library district, or fire protection
district or districts, that include any portion of the area that was
annexed to a city or town within its boundaries shall be altered as of
this date to exclude this area. In any case where any instrument
setting forth the official boundaries of any newly established taxing
district, or setting forth any change in such boundaries, is required
by law to be filed in the office of the county auditor or other county
official, said instrument shall be filed in triplicate. The officer
with whom such instrument is filed shall transmit two copies to the
county assessor.
No property tax levy shall be made for any taxing district whose
boundaries are not established as of the dates provided in this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 4.12.070 (Change to newly created county) and 1891 c 33 s
2, Code 1881 s 53, 1877 p 12 s 54, 1869 p 14 s 54, & 1854 p 377 s 2;
(2) RCW 36.09.010 (Debts and property to be apportioned) and 1963
c 4 s 36.09.010;
(3) RCW 36.09.020 (Procedure to settle amount charged new county--Basis of apportionment) and 1963 c 4 s 36.09.020;
(4) RCW 36.09.035 (Procedure to settle amount charged new county--Disagreement between auditors -- Determination by third person) and 1963
c 4 s 36.09.035;
(5) RCW 36.09.040 (Payment of indebtedness -- Transfer of property)
and 1963 c 4 s 36.09.040; and
(6) RCW 36.09.050 (Collection of taxes levied -- Apportionment) and
1963 c 4 s 36.09.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 Sections 2 through 36 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---