BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.19.040 and 2001 c 251 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice of a profession by a person who is either
registered, certified, licensed, or similarly regulated under the laws
of this state and who is performing services within the person's
authorized scope of practice, including any attorney admitted to
practice law in this state when providing counseling incidental to and
in the course of providing legal counsel;
(2) The practice of counseling by an employee or trainee of any
federal agency, or the practice of counseling by a student of a college
or university, if the employee, trainee, or student is practicing
solely under the supervision of and accountable to the agency, college,
or university, through which he or she performs such functions as part
of his or her position for no additional fee other than ordinary
compensation;
(3) The practice of counseling by a person without a mandatory
charge;
(4) The practice of counseling by persons offering services for
public and private nonprofit organizations or charities not primarily
engaged in counseling for a fee when approved by the organizations or
agencies for whom they render their services;
(5) Evaluation, consultation, planning, policy-making, research, or
related services conducted by social scientists for private
corporations or public agencies;
(6) The practice of counseling by a person under the auspices of a
religious denomination, church, or organization, or the practice of
religion itself;
(7) Counselors whose residency is not Washington state from
providing up to ten days per quarter of training or workshops in the
state, as long as they ((don't)) do not hold themselves out to be
registered in Washington state;
(8) The practice of activities generally associated with athletic
or performance coaching or instruction. These activities include
visualization, motivation, peak performance instruction, mental
preparation, and associated methods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.83 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Nothing in this chapter applies to or limits the ability of
individuals to conduct activities generally associated with athletic or
performance coaching or instruction. These activities include
visualization, motivation, peak performance instruction, mental
preparation, and associated methods.
(2) This chapter does not authorize a coach, instructor,
motivational speaker, or other person conducting activities generally
associated with modern coaching techniques to perform clinical
psychology or refer to services provided as "sports psychology" unless
he or she holds a license under this chapter.

--- END ---