BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington's dependence on energy supplied from outside the
state and volatile energy markets makes our economy and citizens
vulnerable to unpredictable and high energy prices;
(2) Washington's dependence on petroleum-based fuels increases
energy costs for citizens and businesses;
(3) Experts tell us that the global oil shortage will only worsen,
making the three dollars per gallon gasoline of summer 2005 seem
affordable;
(4) Each year, citizens and businesses in Washington state spend
nine billion dollars on gasoline and diesel, with those funds drained
from the state economy;
(5) Diesel soot from diesel engines ranks as the highest toxic air
pollutant in Washington, leading to hundreds of premature deaths and
increasing rates of asthma and other lung-related diseases;
(6) The use of biodiesel results in significantly less air
pollution than traditional diesel fuels and can help our citizens and
businesses conserve energy;
(7) Improper disposal and treatment of organic waste from farms and
livestock operations can have a significant negative impact on water
quality;
(8) Washington has abundant supplies of organic wastes from farms
that can be used for energy production and abundant farmland where
crops could be grown to supplement or supplant petroleum-based fuels;
(9) Instead of leaving our economy at the mercy of global events,
and the policies of foreign nations, Washington state should adopt a
policy of energy independence;
(10) The energy freedom program is meant to lead Washington state
towards energy independence;
(11) Producing more energy here means cleaner, renewable energy
that includes, but is not limited to, biofuels, solar power, and wind
power;
(12) The biofuels industry is a new and developing industry now
limited by the availability of capital for construction of facilities
for converting farm and forest products into energy and fuels; and
(13) For biofuels to be economically viable in Washington, it will
be necessary to grow dedicated crops, construct crushers near farms,
and build refineries to create fuel.
Therefore, the legislature finds it is in the public interest to
reduce Washington's dependence on imported oil, expand renewable fuel
production and use in Washington, conserve energy, improve use of
renewable energy and energy efficiency measures, and promote
sustainable rural economic development by creating new jobs and
stimulating business and economic activity in local communities across
Washington.
To accomplish this, the energy freedom program is established to
stimulate strategic investment in facilities, infrastructure,
technologies, and research and development that will advance
Washington's move toward energy independence. It is the intent of the
legislature to appropriate funds for this strategic investment in the
fiscal years ending June 30, 2007, June 30, 2008, June 30, 2009, and
June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the energy freedom board.
(2) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(3) "Political subdivision" means any port district, county, city,
town, special purpose district, and any other municipal corporations or
quasi-municipal corporations in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The energy freedom board is created to
exercise the powers granted under this chapter.
(2) The board consists of thirteen members as follows:
(a) One member shall be the director of the department of
agriculture or the director's designated representative;
(b) One member shall be the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development or the director's designated
representative from the department's energy policy division;
(c) Four of the members shall be appointed by the legislature: Two
members from the house of representatives committee that has
jurisdiction over energy issues, one from each of the two major
caucuses, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; two members from the senate committee that has
jurisdiction over energy issues, one from each of the two major
caucuses, to be appointed by the president of the senate; and
(d) The following members appointed by the governor: One
recognized expert in renewable energy; one representative from
Washington State University; one Washington state grower; one producer
of alternative fuels; one public fleet manager; one public buildings
manager; and one sustainable society advocate.
(3) The members appointed under subsection (2)(c) and (d) of this
section must initially be appointed to terms as follows: Three members
for two-year terms, four members for three-year terms, and four members
for four-year terms which includes the chair. Thereafter, each
succeeding term is four years. Appointees may be reappointed to serve
more than one term.
(4) The governor must select the chair of the board. The members
of the board shall elect one of their members to serve as vice chair.
(5) The department must provide staff support to the board.
(6) Members of the board receive no compensation but shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In addition to other applicable provisions
of law pertaining to conflicts of interest of public officials, no
board member, appointive or otherwise, may participate in any decision
on any board contract in which the board member has any interests,
direct or indirect, with any entity that would be the recipient of any
aid under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The board may:
(1) Accept from any federal agency loans or grants for the planning
or financing of any project and enter into agreements with such an
agency concerning the loans or grants;
(2) Accept any gifts, grants, or loan of funds, property, or
financial or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms
and conditions that are not in conflict with this chapter;
(3) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter; and
(4) Perform all acts and functions as necessary or convenient to
carry out the powers expressly granted or implied under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The board shall:
(1) Establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and
prioritize project applications for potential funding;
(2) Adopt rules governing project eligibility and evaluation
criteria;
(3) Establish a peer review committee to include board members,
renewable energy specialists, energy conservation specialists,
scientists, and individuals with specific recognized expertise. The
peer review committee shall provide to the board an independent peer
review of all proposals submitted that are determined to be competitive
for a low-interest loan or grant award. The board shall review
findings of the peer review committee when making final loan and grant
allocation decisions;
(4) Develop the prioritized list through open and public meetings;
(5) Establish performance measures against which the program will
be evaluated;
(6) Aggressively seek federal and other grant moneys;
(7) Report annually to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature on the implementation of this chapter. The report must
include, but is not limited to: Information on the number of
applications for financial assistance; the grant or loan amount awarded
each project; a description of each project; the status of each funded
project, including the agricultural and environmental benefits of each
project, as well as the progress made by each project in creating jobs
and moving towards energy independence; the documentation of nonstate
funds to be used for each project; and progress against performance
measures developed under this chapter. The first report must be
submitted by December 31, 2006, to committees in the house of
representatives and senate with jurisdiction over energy and fiscal
issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The board is authorized to make low-interest loans and grants to political subdivisions of the state for
the purposes of assisting political subdivisions in financing the cost
of new and renewable energy and biofuel development projects and
activities. Political subdivisions applying for loans and grants shall
identify nonstate matching funds available for the project, and shall
specify deliverables to be achieved by proposed projects and
activities.
(2) Applications for loans and grants must be made in the form and
manner as the board may prescribe.
(3) The board may provide financial assistance for the following
types of projects and activities including, but not limited to:
(a) Renewable energy and biofuel development infrastructure,
facilities, and capital equipment including oilseed crushers; and
(b) Research and development of: (i) New and renewable energy and
biofuel sources including but not limited to biomass and associated
biofuel gases; and (ii) markets for alternative fuel byproducts.
(4) Applications must be prioritized based on the following
criteria:
(a) The extent to which the project will contribute to the
establishment of a viable bioenergy production capacity in Washington;
(b) The benefits to Washington's agricultural producers;
(c) The extent to which the project will help conserve energy and
reduce dependence on petroleum fuels and imported energy, either
directly or indirectly;
(d) The extent to which the project will reduce air and water
pollution, either directly or indirectly;
(e) The number and quality of jobs, as well as the economic
benefits, created by the project;
(f) The extent to which the investment shows a direct link to
commercialization either by indirectly supporting the commercialization
of bioenergy intellectual property into a commercialized project, or by
directly assisting in moving a commercially viable project into the
marketplace for use by Washington state citizens; and
(g) The extent to which private funds have been leveraged.
(5) Financial assistance awarded to political subdivisions is one
time only and may not be used for ongoing operational expenses.
(6) Before any financial assistance application is approved, the
political subdivision must demonstrate to the board that no other
timely source of funding is available to it at costs reasonably similar
to financing available from the board.
(7) A responsible official of the political subdivision must be
present during board deliberations and provide information that the
board requests.
(8) The board may defer loan repayment for up to twenty-four months
or until the projects start to receive revenue from operations,
whichever is sooner.
(9) Upon receiving financial assistance, a political subdivision
must enter into appropriate contracts with any industry partners that
may be involved in the use of the loan or grant funds.
(10) Upon written notice to the political subdivision, the board
may suspend or cancel its loans or grants if any of the following
occur:
(a) The political subdivision fails to make satisfactory and
reasonable progress to complete the project, or the board concludes the
political subdivision will be unable to complete the project or any
portion of it; or
(b) The political subdivision or industry partners have made
misrepresentations in any information furnished to the board in
connection with the project.
(11) In the event that any portion of the loan or grant has been
paid to the political subdivision under this section at the time of
breach, or failure of the political subdivision to satisfactorily
perform, the board may require that the full amount of the loan or
grant, or a portion thereof, be repaid within a period specified by the
board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The energy freedom account is created in the
state treasury. All receipts from appropriations made to the account,
proceeds from other lawful sources, and loan payments of principal and
interest derived from loans made under this chapter must be deposited
into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
loans and grants to political subdivisions for renewable energy and
biofuel development projects and activities authorized under this
chapter. Not more than one percent of the available funds from the
energy freedom account may be used for administrative costs of the
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Beginning July 1, 2006, for four fiscal
years through June 30, 2010, the state treasurer shall transfer the sum
of twenty-five million dollars each fiscal year from the state general
fund to the energy freedom account established in section 8 of this
act, for a total of one hundred million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The sum of twenty-five million dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2007, from the energy freedom account to the department
of community, trade, and economic development for the purposes of this
act.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.135.035 and 2005 c 72 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax
shifts may be taken only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each
house, and then only if state expenditures in any fiscal year,
including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure limits
established under this chapter. However, for legislation enacted
between the effective date of this 2005 act and June 30, 2007, any
action or combination of actions by the legislature that raises state
revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax shifts may be taken with the
approval of a majority of members elected to each house, so long as
state expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will
not exceed the state expenditure limits established under this chapter.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until
approved by a vote of the people at a November general election. The
state expenditure limit committee shall adjust the state expenditure
limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the voters under
this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of revenue
generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be
adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
inflation and population increases?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the nature of the
emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require immediate
government action to alleviate human suffering and provide humanitarian
assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no more
than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund on or after January 1, 1993, to another source
of funding, or if moneys are transferred from the state general fund to
another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee, acting
pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure limit
to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a transfer of
money from the state general fund to another fund or account includes
any state legislative action taken that has the effect of reducing
revenues from a particular source, where such revenues would otherwise
be deposited into the state general fund, while increasing the revenues
from that particular source to another state or local government
account. This subsection does not apply to the dedication or use of
lottery revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW
84.52.068, in support of education or education expenditures. This
subsection does not apply to the transfer of general fund revenues
under section 10 of this act, in support of energy freedom or energy
freedom expenditures under chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 8 and
15 of this act).
(5) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted to the
state general fund on or after January 1, 2000, from another source of
funding, or if moneys are transferred to the state general fund from
another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee, acting
pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall increase the state expenditure
limit to reflect the shift.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.135.035 and 2005 c 72 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax
shifts may be taken only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each
house, and then only if state expenditures in any fiscal year,
including the new revenue, will not exceed the state expenditure limits
established under this chapter.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature shall not take effect until
approved by a vote of the people at a November general election. The
state expenditure limit committee shall adjust the state expenditure
limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the voters under
this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of revenue
generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be
adjusted downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
personal income growth?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law shall set forth the nature of the
emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require immediate
government action to alleviate human suffering and provide humanitarian
assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded for no more
than twenty-four months following the declaration of the emergency and
only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes shall expire upon expiration of the declaration of
emergency. The legislature shall not impose additional taxes for
emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the education
construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not
impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that
statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund or a related fund to another source of funding,
or if moneys are transferred from the state general fund or a related
fund to another fund or account, the state expenditure limit committee,
acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure
limit to reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a
transfer of money from the state general fund or a related fund to
another fund or account includes any state legislative action taken
that has the effect of reducing revenues from a particular source,
where such revenues would otherwise be deposited into the state general
fund or a related fund, while increasing the revenues from that
particular source to another state or local government account. This
subsection does not apply to the dedication or use of lottery revenues
under RCW 67.70.240(3) or property taxes under RCW 84.52.068, in
support of education or education expenditures. This subsection does
not apply to the transfer of general fund revenues under section 10 of
this act, in support of energy freedom or energy freedom expenditures
under chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1 through 8 and 15 of this act).
(5) If the cost of any state program or function and the ongoing
revenue necessary to fund the program or function are shifted to the
state general fund or a related fund on or after January 1, 2007, the
state expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW
43.135.025(5), shall increase the state expenditure limit to reflect
the shift.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) Sections 1 through 11 and 15 of this
act take effect July 1, 2006.
(2) Section 12 of this act takes effect July 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Section 11 of this act expires July 1,
2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 10 and 12 of this act
expire June 30, 2016, unless reauthorized by the legislature. Any
moneys in the energy freedom account on that date and all payments
received after that date must be deposited in the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 8 and 15 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---