BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 83.100.020 and 2005 c 516 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Decedent" means a deceased individual;
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue, the director of
that department, or any employee of the department exercising authority
lawfully delegated to him by the director;
(3) "Federal credit" means (a) for a transfer, the maximum amount
of the credit for state taxes allowed by section 2011 of the Internal
Revenue Code; and (b) for a generation-skipping transfer, the maximum
amount of the credit for state taxes allowed by section 2604 of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(4) "Federal return" means any tax return required by chapter 11 of
the Internal Revenue Code;
(((4))) (5) "Federal tax" means (a) for a transfer, a tax under
chapter 11 of the Internal Revenue Code; and (b) for a generation-skipping transfer, the tax under chapter 13 of the Internal Revenue
Code;
(6) "Generation-skipping transfer" means a "generation-skipping
transfer" as defined and used in section 2611 of the Internal Revenue
Code;
(((5))) (7) "Gross estate" means "gross estate" as defined and used
in section 2031 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(((6))) (8) "Nonresident" means a decedent who was domiciled
outside Washington at his death;
(9) "Person" means any individual, estate, trust, receiver,
cooperative association, club, corporation, company, firm, partnership,
joint venture, syndicate, or other entity and, to the extent permitted
by law, any federal, state, or other governmental unit or subdivision
or agency, department, or instrumentality thereof;
(((7))) (10) "Person required to file the federal return" means any
person required to file a return required by chapter 11 of the Internal
Revenue Code, such as the personal representative of an estate; or a
transferor, trustee, or beneficiary of a generation- skipping transfer;
or a qualified heir with respect to qualified real property, as defined
and used in section 2032A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(((8))) (11) "Property" means (a) for a transfer, property included
in the gross estate; and (b) for a generation-skipping transfer, all
real and personal property subject to the federal tax;
(((9))) (12) "Resident" means a decedent who was domiciled in
Washington at time of death;
(((10) "Taxpayer" means a person upon whom tax is imposed under
this chapter, including an estate or a person liable for tax under RCW
83.100.120;
(11))) (13) "Transfer" means "transfer" as used in section 2001 of
the Internal Revenue Code((. However, "transfer" does not include a
qualified heir disposing of an interest in property qualifying for a
deduction under RCW 83.100.046 or ceasing to use the property for
farming purposes)), or a disposition or cessation of qualified use as
defined and used in section 2032A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(((12))) (14) "Trust" means "trust" under Washington law and any
arrangement described in section 2652 of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(15) "Internal Revenue Code" means, for the purposes of this
chapter and RCW 83.110.010, the United States Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, ((2005)) 2006;
(((13) "Washington taxable estate" means the federal taxable
estate, less: (a) One million five hundred thousand dollars for
decedents dying before January 1, 2006; and (b) two million dollars for
decedents dying on or after January 1, 2006; and (c) the amount of any
deduction allowed under RCW 83.100.046; and
(14) "Federal taxable estate" means the taxable estate as
determined under chapter 11 of the Internal Revenue Code without regard
to: (a) The termination of the federal estate tax under section 2210
of the Internal Revenue Code or any other provision of law, and (b) the
deduction for state estate, inheritance, legacy, or succession taxes
allowable under section 2058 of the Internal Revenue Code.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 83.100 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A tax in an amount equal to the federal credit is imposed on
every transfer of property of a resident.
(2) If the transfer is subject to a similar tax imposed by another
state for which the federal credit is allowed, and if the tax imposed
by the other state is not qualified by a reciprocal provision allowing
the transfer to be taxed only in this state, the amount of the tax due
under this section shall be credited with the lesser of:
(a) The amount of the death tax paid the other state and credited
against the federal tax; or
(b) An amount computed by multiplying the federal credit by a
fraction, the numerator of which is the value of the property subject
to the tax imposed by the other state, and the denominator of which is
the value of the decedent's gross estate.

Sec. 3 RCW 83.100.040 and 2005 c 516 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A tax in an amount computed as provided in this section is
imposed on every transfer of property located in Washington of every
nonresident. ((For the purposes of this section, any intangible
property owned by a resident is located in Washington.))
(2)(((a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the amount
of tax is the amount provided in the following table:

If Washington Taxable

The amount of Tax Equals
Of Washington
Taxable Estate Value
Greater than

Estate is at least But Less Than Initial Tax Amount Plus Tax Rate %

$0 $1,000,000 $0 10.00% $0

$1,000,000 $2,000,000 $100,000 14.00% $1,000,000

$2,000,000 $3,000,000 $240,000 15.00% $2,000,000

$3,000,000 $4,000,000 $390,000 16.00% $3,000,000

$4,000,000 $6,000,000 $550,000 17.00% $4,000,000

$6,000,000 $7,000,000 $890,000 18.00% $6,000,000

$7,000,000 $9,000,000 $1,070,000 18.50% $7,000,000

Above $9,000,000 $1,440,000 19.00% Above $9,000,000

(b) If any property in the decedent's estate is located outside of
Washington, the amount of tax is the amount determined in (a) of this
subsection multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is
the value of the property located in Washington. The denominator of
the fraction is the value of the decedent's gross estate. Property
qualifying for a deduction under RCW 83.100.046 shall be excluded from
the numerator and denominator of the fraction.
(3) The tax imposed under this section is a stand-alone estate tax
that incorporates only those provisions of the Internal Revenue Code as
amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2005, that do not conflict with
the provisions of this chapter. The tax imposed under this chapter is
independent of any federal estate tax obligation and is not affected by
termination of the federal estate tax)) The tax shall be computed by
multiplying the federal credit by a fraction, the numerator of which is
the value of the property located in Washington, and the denominator of
which is the value of the decedent's gross estate.
(3) The transfer of the property of a nonresident is exempt from
the tax imposed by this section to the extent that the property of
residents is exempt from taxation under the laws of the state in which
the nonresident is domiciled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 83.100 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A tax in an amount equal to the federal credit is imposed on
every generation-skipping transfer, if real or tangible personal
property subject to the federal tax is located in this state or if the
trust has its principal place of administration in this state at the
time of the generation-skipping transfer.
(2) If the generation-skipping transfer is subject to a similar tax
imposed by another state for which the federal credit is allowed, the
amount of the tax due under this section shall be credited with the
lesser of:
(a) The amount of the tax paid to the other state and credited
against the federal tax; or
(b) An amount computed by multiplying the federal credit by a
fraction, the numerator of which is the value of the property subject
to the generation-skipping transfer tax imposed by the other state, and
the denominator of which is the value of all property subject to the
federal tax.

Sec. 5 RCW 83.100.050 and 2005 c 516 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((A Washington return must be filed if: (a) A federal return
is required to be filed; or (b) for decedents dying prior to January 1,
2006, the gross estate exceeds one million five hundred thousand
dollars; or (c) for decedents dying on or after January 1, 2006, the
gross estate exceeds two million dollars.
(2)(a) A)) The person required to file a federal return shall file
with the department on or before the date the federal return is
required to be filed, including any extension of time for filing
((under subsection (4) of this section,)) the federal return:
(a) A Washington return for the tax due under this chapter; and
(b) A copy of the federal return.
No Washington return need be filed if no federal return is
required.
(((b) If no federal return is required to be filed, a taxpayer
shall file with the department on or before the date a federal return
would have been required to be filed, including any extension of time
for filing under subsection (5) of this section, a Washington return
for the tax due under this chapter.
(3))) A Washington return delivered to the department by United
States mail shall be considered to have been received by the department
on the date of the United States postmark stamped on the cover in which
the return is mailed, if the postmark date is within the time allowed
for filing the Washington return, including extensions.
(((4) In addition to the Washington return required to be filed in
subsection (2) of this section, a person, if required to file a federal
return, shall file with the department on or before the date the
federal return, is required to be filed a copy of the federal return
along with all supporting documentation.)) (2) If the person required
to file the federal return has obtained an extension of time for filing
the federal return, the person shall file the Washington return within
the same time period and in the same manner as provided for the federal
return. A copy of the federal extension shall be filed with the
department on or before the date the Washington return is due, not
including any extension of time for filing, or within thirty days of
issuance, whichever is later.
(((5) A person who is required to file a Washington return under
subsection (2) of this section, but is not required to file a federal
return, may obtain an extension of time for filing the Washington
return as provided by rule of the department.))

Sec. 6 RCW 83.100.060 and 2005 c 516 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The taxes imposed by this chapter shall be paid by the person
required to file ((a Washington)) the federal return on or before the
date the Washington return is required to be filed under RCW
83.100.050, not including any extension of time for filing. Payment
delivered to the department by United States mail shall be considered
to have been received by the department on the date of the United
States postmark stamped on the cover in which payment is mailed, if the
postmark date is within the time allowed for making the payment,
including any extensions.
(2) If the person required to file the federal return has obtained
an extension of time for payment of the federal tax or has elected to
pay such tax in installments, the person may elect to pay the tax
imposed by this chapter within the same time period and in the same
manner as provided for payment of the federal tax. A copy of the
federal extension shall be filed on or before the date the tax imposed
by this chapter is due, not including any extension of time for
payment, or within thirty days of issuance, whichever is later.
(((3) A person who is required to file a Washington return under
RCW 83.100.050, but is not required to file a federal return, may
obtain an extension of time for payment of the Washington tax or elect
to pay such tax in installments as provided by rule of the department.
(4) The periods of limitation in RCW 83.100.130 and 83.100.095
shall extend an additional three years beyond the due date of the last
scheduled installment payment authorized under this section.))

Sec. 7 RCW 83.100.070 and 2005 c 516 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((For periods before January 2, 1997,)) Any tax due under this
chapter which is not paid by the due date under RCW 83.100.060(1) shall
bear interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum from the date the
tax is due until the date of payment.
(2) Interest imposed under this section for periods after January
1, 1997, shall be computed at the rate as computed under RCW
82.32.050(2). The rate so computed shall be adjusted on the first day
of January of each year.
(3)(a) If the Washington return is not filed when due under RCW
83.100.050 and the person required to file the ((Washington)) federal
return ((under RCW 83.100.050)) voluntarily reports the filing and
files both the ((Washington return)) state and federal estate tax
returns with the department ((before the department notifies the person
in writing that the department has determined that the person has not
filed a Washington return)), no penalty is imposed on the person
required to file the ((Washington)) federal return.
(b) If the Washington return is not filed when due under RCW
83.100.050 and the person required to file the ((Washington)) federal
return ((under RCW 83.100.050)) does not file a return with the
department before the department notifies the person in writing that
the department has determined that the person has not filed a
((Washington)) state estate tax return, the person required to file the
((Washington)) federal return shall pay, in addition to interest, a
penalty equal to five percent of the tax due for each month after the
date the return is due until filed. However, in no instance may the
penalty exceed the lesser of twenty-five percent of the tax due or one
thousand five hundred dollars.
(c) If the department finds that a return due under this chapter
has not been filed by the due date, and the delinquency was the result
of circumstances beyond the control of the responsible person, the
department shall waive or cancel any penalties imposed under this
chapter with respect to the filing of such a tax return. The
department shall adopt rules for the waiver or cancellation of the
penalties imposed by this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 83.100.090 and 2005 c 516 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Notwithstanding the periods of limitation in RCW 83.100.095 and
83.100.130:))
(1) If the person required to file the ((Washington)) federal
return ((under RCW 83.100.050)) files an amended federal return, that
person shall immediately file with the department an amended Washington
return with a copy of the amended federal return. If the amended
Washington return requires payment of an additional tax under this
chapter, the tax shall be paid in accordance with RCW 83.100.060 and
interest shall be paid in accordance with RCW 83.100.070.
(2) Upon any adjustment in, or final determination of, the amount
of federal tax due, the person required to file the ((Washington))
federal return ((under RCW 83.100.050)) shall notify the department in
writing within ((one hundred twenty)) sixty days after the adjustment
or final determination. If the adjustment or final determination
requires payment of an additional tax under this chapter, the tax shall
be paid in accordance with RCW 83.100.060 and interest shall be paid in
accordance with RCW 83.100.070.
(((3) If the department determines the amended Washington return,
adjustment, or final determination requires payment of an additional
tax under this chapter, the department may assess against the taxpayer
an additional amount found to be due within one year of receipt of the
amended Washington return or written notice as required by this
section, or at any time if no amended Washington return is filed or
notice is provided as required by this section. The execution of a
written waiver at the request of the department by the person required
to file the Washington return under RCW 83.100.050 may extend this
limitation. Interest shall be added to the amount of tax assessed by
the department in accordance with RCW 83.100.070. The department shall
notify the taxpayer by mail of the additional amount, and the
additional amount shall become due and shall be paid within thirty days
from the date of the notice, or within such further time as the
department may provide.
(4) If the department determines the amended Washington return,
adjustment, or final determination requires the refund of overpaid tax,
penalties, or interest under this chapter, the department shall refund
the amount of the overpayment with interest in accordance with RCW
83.100.130. The person required to file the Washington return under
RCW 83.100.050 shall provide the department with any additional
information or supporting documents necessary to determine if a refund
is due. The execution of a written waiver to extend the period for
assessment under subsection (3) of this section shall extend the time
for making a refund, if prior to the expiration of the waiver period an
application for refund of the taxes is made by the person required to
file the Washington return under RCW 83.100.050, or the department
discovers a refund is due.))

Sec. 9 RCW 83.100.110 and 2005 c 516 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless any tax due under this chapter is sooner paid in full,
it shall be a lien upon the property subject to the tax for a period of
ten years from the date of the transfer or the generation-skipping
transfer, except that any part of the property which is used for the
payment of claims against the property or expenses of its
administration, allowed by any court having jurisdiction thereof, shall
be divested of the lien. Liens created under this subsection shall be
qualified as follows:
(a) Any part of the property subject to the tax which is sold to a
bona fide purchaser shall be divested of the lien and the lien shall be
transferred to the proceeds of the sale; and
(b) The lien shall be subordinate to any mortgage or deed of trust
on the property pursuant to an order of court for payment of claims
against the property or expenses of administration. The lien shall
attach to any proceeds from the sale of the property in excess of the
obligations secured by the mortgage or deed of trust and the expenses
of sale, including a reasonable charge by the trustee and by his or her
attorney where the property has been sold by a nonjudicial trustee's
sale pursuant to chapter 61.24 RCW, and including court costs and any
attorneys' fees awarded by the superior court of the county in which
the property is sold at sheriff's sale pursuant to a judicial
foreclosure of the mortgage or deed of trust.
(2) If the person required to file the ((Washington)) federal
return ((under RCW 83.100.050)) has obtained an extension of time for
payment of the tax or has elected to pay such tax in installments, the
tax lien under this section shall be extended as necessary to prevent
its expiration prior to twelve months following the expiration of any
such extension or the installment.
(3) The tax lien shall be extended as necessary to prevent its
expiration prior to twelve months following the conclusion of
litigation of any question affecting the determination of the amount of
tax due if a lis pendens has been filed with the auditor of the county
in which the property is located.

Sec. 10 RCW 83.100.130 and 2005 c 516 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((If, upon receipt of an application by a taxpayer for a
refund, or upon examination of the returns or records of any
taxpayer,)) Whenever the department determines that ((within the
statutory period for assessment of taxes, penalties, or interest
prescribed by RCW 83.100.095)) a person required to file the
((Washington)) federal return ((under RCW 83.100.050)) has overpaid the
tax due under this chapter, the department shall refund the amount of
the overpayment, together with interest ((as provided in subsection (2)
of this section)) at the then existing rate under RCW 83.100.070(1).
If the application for refund, with supporting documents, is filed
within one hundred twenty days after an adjustment or final
determination of federal tax liability, the department shall pay
interest until the date the refund is mailed. If the application for
refund, with supporting documents, is filed after one hundred twenty
days after the adjustment or final determination, the department shall
pay interest only until the end of the one hundred twenty-day period.
(2) ((Interest refunded under this section for periods before
January 2, 1997, shall be computed at the rate provided in RCW
83.100.070(1). Interest refunded under this section for periods after
January 1, 1997, through December 31, 1998, shall be computed on a
daily basis at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2) less one
percentage point.)) Interest allowed for periods after December 31,
1998, shall be computed at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2).
((Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section,)) Interest
shall be refunded from the date of overpayment until the date the
refund is mailed. The rate so computed shall be adjusted on the first
day of January of each year.
(((3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this
section and RCW 83.100.090, no refund shall be made for taxes,
penalties, or interest paid more than four years prior to the beginning
of the calendar year in which the refund application is made or an
examination of records is complete.
(4) The execution of a written waiver under RCW 83.100.095 shall
extend the time for making a refund if, prior to the expiration of the
waiver period, an application for refund is made by the taxpayer or the
department discovers a refund is due.
(5) An application for refund shall be on a form prescribed by the
department and shall contain any information and supporting documents
the department requires.))

Sec. 11 RCW 83.100.140 and 2005 c 516 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person required to file the ((Washington)) federal return who
willfully fails to file a Washington return when required by this
chapter or who willfully files a false return commits a gross
misdemeanor as defined in Title 9A RCW and shall be punished as
provided in Title 9A RCW for the perpetration of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 12 RCW 83.100.150 and 2005 c 516 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may collect the estate tax imposed under ((RCW))
section 2 of this act and RCW 83.100.040, including interest and
penalties, and shall represent this state in all matters pertaining to
the same, either before courts or in any other manner. At any time
after the Washington return is due, the department may file its
findings regarding the amount of the tax ((computed as provided in RCW
83.100.040)), the federal credit, the person required to file the
((Washington)) federal return ((under RCW 83.100.050)), and all persons
having an interest in property subject to the tax with the clerk of the
superior court in the matter of the estate of the decedent or, if no
probate or administration proceedings have been commenced in any court
of this state, of the superior court for the county in which the
decedent was a resident, if the resident was a domiciliary, or, if the
decedent was a nondomiciliary, of any superior court which has
jurisdiction over the property. Such a court first acquiring
jurisdiction shall retain jurisdiction to the exclusion of every other
court.
(2) The department may collect the generation-skipping transfer tax
under section 4 of this act, including interest and penalties, and
shall represent this state in all matters pertaining to the same,
either before courts or in any other manner. At any time after the
Washington return is due, the department may file its findings
regarding the amount of the tax, the federal credit, the person
required to file the federal return, and all persons having an interest
in property subject to the tax with the clerk of the superior court in
the matter of the trust or the estate of the decedent, if any, or, if
no trust, probate or administration proceedings have been commenced in
any court of this state, of any superior court which has jurisdiction
over the property. Such a court first acquiring jurisdiction shall
retain jurisdiction to the exclusion of every other court.

Sec. 13 RCW 83.100.210 and 2005 c 516 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) The following provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW have full force
and application with respect to the taxes imposed under this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise: RCW 82.32.110,
82.32.120, 82.32.130, 82.32.320, and 82.32.340. The definitions in
this chapter have full force and application with respect to the
application of chapter 82.32 RCW to this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(2))) The department may enter into closing agreements as provided
in RCW 82.32.350 and 82.32.360.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 83.100.046 (Deduction--Property used for farming--Requirements, conditions) and 2005 c 514 s 1201 & 2005 c 516 s 4;
(2) RCW 83.100.047 (Marital deduction, qualified domestic trust--Election--Other deductions taken for income tax purposes disallowed)
and 2005 c 516 s 13;
(3) RCW 83.100.095 (Examination by department of returns, other
information--Assessment of additional tax, interest) and 2005 c 516 s
14; and
(4) 2005 c 516 s 1 (uncodified).

Sec. 15 RCW 84.52.068 and 2005 c 514 s 1104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A portion of the proceeds of the state property tax levy shall
be deposited into the student achievement fund as provided in this
section.
(2)(a) The amount of the deposit shall be based upon the average
number of full-time equivalent students in the school districts during
the previous school year as reported to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by August 31st of the previous
school year.
(b) ((For the 2004-2005 through 2007-2008 school years, an annual
amount equal to two hundred fifty-four dollars per full-time equivalent
student in all school districts shall be deposited in the student
achievement fund.
(c) For the 2008-2009 school year, an annual amount equal to two
hundred sixty-five dollars per full-time equivalent student in all
school districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(d) For the 2009-2010 school year, an annual amount equal to two
hundred seventy-seven dollars per full-time equivalent student in all
school districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(e) For the 2010-2011 school year and each year thereafter, an
annual amount equal to two hundred seventy-eight dollars per full-time
equivalent student in all school districts shall be deposited in the
student achievement fund)) For the 2005-06 school year, an amount equal
to three hundred dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school
districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(c) For the 2006-07 school year, an amount equal to three hundred
seventy-five dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school
districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(d) For the 2007-08 school year, an amount equal to four hundred
fifty dollars per full-time equivalent student in all school districts
shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(e) For each subsequent school year, the amount deposited per full-time equivalent student shall be adjusted for inflation.
(f) The school district annual amounts shall be deposited based on
the monthly apportionment schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall notify the
department of the monthly amounts to be deposited into the student
achievement fund to meet the apportionment schedule.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "inflation" means the
percentage change in the implicit price deflator for the United States
for each fiscal year as published by the federal bureau of labor
statistics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act applies to the estates of
decedents dying on or after the effective date of this act. This act
does not affect any existing right acquired or liability or obligation
incurred under the sections amended or repealed in this act or under
any rule or order adopted under those sections, nor does it affect any
proceeding instituted under those sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---