BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that
there has been an ongoing controversy over the costs and benefits of
existing health care coverage statutory requirements and their effect
on health care insurance costs. It is for this reason that an
unbiased, independent analysis of existing health care coverage
statutory requirements needs to be conducted. It is not the intent of
the legislature to take any actions in relation to the findings of the
study until they can be reviewed and analyzed by the legislature, in
consultation with the office of the insurance commissioner, health care
providers, health carriers, health care purchasers, and health care
consumers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The office of the insurance commissioner
shall contract for an analysis of existing health care coverage
statutory requirements. The office of the insurance commissioner
shall:
(1)(a) Contract with a qualified independent and impartial entity
that has not taken a public position in the past on the merits or
consequences of the adoption of health care coverage statutory
requirements; and
(b) Conduct the analysis in two phases:
(i) The first phase of the analysis shall review statutes that
mandate that health carriers provide benefits for certain conditions or
services, and that require health carriers to offer certain services as
an option for individuals or groups purchasing a health benefit plan.
For each mandate or requirement, the analysis must address:
(A) The cost of including the mandate or requirement in health
benefit plans, and the impact that covering the mandate or requirement
has on the utilization of other health services, expressed as a net
premium cost or savings per member per month;
(B) A review of available evidence related to the clinical and
cost-effectiveness of the mandate or requirement; and
(C) An assessment of whether market demand has already resulted in
inclusion of the mandate or requirement in a significant number of
health benefit plans in states that do not have such a mandate or
requirement; and
(ii) The second phase of the analysis must analyze a sample of at
least ten health conditions or chronic illnesses that are prevalent
among residents of Washington state. For each health condition or
chronic illness, the analysis must include an assessment of the
comparative cost and treatment outcomes of treatment provided by health
care providers for whom primary treatment of the condition or illness
is within their scope of practice.
(2) Submit an interim report on the first phase of the analysis to
the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December
1, 2006, and a final report by December 1, 2007. The report may
include recommendations related to additional issues that should be
addressed in the second phase of the analysis.
(3) Submit an interim report on the second phase of the analysis to
the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December
1, 2007, and a final report by December 1, 2008.

--- END ---