BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
INTENT TO REQUIRE FAIRNESS WHEN GOVERNMENT REGULATES PRIVATE PROPERTY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act is intended to protect the use and
value of private property while providing for a healthy environment and
ensuring that government agencies do not damage the use or value of
private property except if necessary to prevent threats to human health
and safety. The legislature also intends to recognize and promote
unique interests, knowledge, and abilities private property owners have
to protect the environment and land. To this end, government agencies
must consider whether voluntary cooperation of property owners will
meet the legitimate interests of the government instead of inflexible
regulation of private property.
The legislature finds that over the last decade, governmental
restrictions on the use of property have increased substantially,
creating hardships for many, and destroying reasonable expectations of
being able to make reasonable beneficial use of property. Article I,
section 16 of the Washington state Constitution requires that
government not take or damage property without first paying just
compensation to the property owner. The legislature finds that
government entities should provide compensation for damage to property
as provided in this act, but should also first evaluate whether the
government's decision that causes damage is necessary and in the public
interest.
The legislature finds that eminent domain is an extraordinary power
in the hands of government and potentially subject to misuse. When
government threatens to take or takes private property under eminent
domain, it should not take property which is unnecessary for public use
or is primarily for private use, nor should it take property for a
longer period of time than is necessary.
Responsible fiscal management and fundamental principles of good
government require that government decision makers evaluate carefully
the effect of their administrative, regulatory, and legislative actions
on constitutionally protected rights in property. Agencies should
review their actions carefully to prevent unnecessary taking or
damaging of private property. Agencies should review their actions to
assist governmental agencies in undertaking reviews and in proposing,
planning, and implementing actions with due regard for the
constitutional protections of property and to reduce the risk of
inadvertent burdens on the public in creating liability for the
government or undue burdens on private properties.

FAIRNESS WHEN GOVERNMENT REGULATES PRIVATE PROPERTY BY REQUIRING
CONSIDERATION OF IMPACTS BEFORE TAKING ACTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 64.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To avoid damaging the use or value of private property, prior
to enacting or adopting any ordinance, regulation, or rule which may
damage the use or value of private property, an agency must consider
and document:
(a) The private property that will be affected by the action;
(b) The existence and extent of any legitimate governmental purpose
for the action;
(c) The existence and extent of any nexus or link between any
legitimate government interest and the action;
(d) The extent to which the regulation's restrictions are
proportional to any impact of a particular property on any legitimate
government interest, in light of the impact of other properties on the
same governmental interests;
(e) The extent to which the action deprives property owners of
economically viable use of property;
(f) The extent to which the action derogates or takes away a
fundamental attribute of property ownership, including, but not limited
to, the right to exclude others, to possess, to beneficial use,
enjoyment, or to dispose of property;
(g) The extent to which the action enhances or creates a publicly
owned right in property;
(h) Estimated compensation that may need to be paid under this act;
and
(i) Alternative means which are less restrictive on private
property and which may accomplish the legitimate governmental purpose
for the regulation, including, but not limited to, voluntary
conservation or cooperative programs with willing property owners, or
other nonregulatory actions.
(2) For purposes of this section and section 3 of this act, the
following definitions apply:
(a) "Private property" means all real and personal property
interests protected by the fifth amendment to the United States
Constitution or Article I, section 16 of the Washington state
Constitution owned by a nongovernmental entity, including, but not
limited to, any interest in land, buildings, crops, livestock, and
mineral and water rights.
(b) "Damaging the use or value" means to prohibit or restrict the
use of private property to obtain benefit to the public the cost of
which in all fairness and justice should be borne by the public as a
whole, and includes, but is not limited to:
(i) Prohibiting or restricting any use or size, scope or intensity
of any use legally existing or permitted as of January 1, 1996;
(ii) Prohibiting the continued operation, maintenance, replacement,
or repair of existing tidegates, bulkheads, revetments, or other
infrastructure reasonably necessary for the protection of the use or
value of private property;
(iii) Prohibiting or restricting operations and maintenance of
structures necessary for the operation of irrigation facilities,
including, but not limited to, diversions, operation structures,
canals, drainage districts, flumes, or delivery systems;
(iv) Prohibiting actions by a private property owner reasonably
necessary to prevent or mitigate harm from fire, flooding, erosion, or
other natural disasters or conditions that would impair the use or
value of private property;
(v) Requiring a portion of property to be left in its natural state
or without beneficial use to its owner, unless necessary to prevent
immediate harm to human health and safety; or
(vi) Prohibiting maintenance or removal of trees or vegetation.
(c) "Damaging the use or value" does not include restrictions that
apply equally to all property subject to the agency's jurisdiction,
including:
(i) Restricting the use of property when necessary to prevent an
immediate threat to human health and safety;
(ii) Requiring compliance with structural standards for buildings
in building or fire codes to prevent harm from earthquakes, flooding,
fire, or other natural disasters;
(iii) Limiting the location or operation of sex offender housing or
adult entertainment;
(iv) Requiring adherence to chemical use restrictions that have
been adopted by the United States environmental protection agency;
(v) Requiring compliance with worker health and safety laws or
regulations;
(vi) Requiring compliance with wage and hour laws;
(vii) Requiring compliance with dairy nutrient management
restrictions in chapter 90.64 RCW;
(viii) Requiring compliance with local ordinances establishing
setbacks from property lines, provided the setbacks were required prior
to January 1, 1996.
The exemptions in this subsection shall be construed narrowly to
effectuate the purposes of this act.
(d) "Compensation" means remuneration equal to the amount the fair
market value of the affected property has been decreased by the
application or enforcement of the ordinance, regulation, or rule. To
the extent any action requires any portion of property to be left in
its natural state or without beneficial use by its owner,
"compensation" means the fair market value of that portion of property
required to be left in its natural state without beneficial use.
"Compensation" also includes any costs and attorneys' fees reasonably
incurred by the property owner in seeking to enforce this act.

FAIRNESS WHEN GOVERNMENT DIRECTLY REGULATES PRIVATE PROPERTY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 64.40 RCW
to read as follows:
An agency that decides to enforce or apply any ordinance,
regulation, or rule to private property that would result in damaging
the use or value of private property shall first pay the property owner
compensation, as defined in section 2 of this act. This section shall
not be construed to limit agencies' ability to wave, or issue variances
from other legal requirements. An agency that chooses not to take
action which will damage the use or value of private property is not
liable for paying remuneration under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 64.40 RCW
to read as follows:
An agency may not charge a fee for considering whether to waive or
grant a variance from an ordinance, regulation, or rule in order to
avoid responsibility for paying compensation as provided in section 3
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
Development regulations adopted under this chapter shall not
prohibit uses legally existing on any parcel prior to their adoption.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize an interference
with the duties in chapter 64.40 RCW.

MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The provisions of this act are to be
liberally construed to effectuate the intent, policies, and purpose of
this act to protect private property owners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Nothing in this act shall diminish any other
remedy provided under the United States or Washington state
Constitutions, or federal or state law, and this act is not intended to
modify or replace any such remedy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Subheadings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act shall be known and cited as the
property fairness act.

--- END ---