BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts received by health care providers as reimbursements for
immunizing agents, not to exceed the then current federal rate.
Amounts received by health care providers for the administration of
immunizing agents are not deductible under this section.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Federal rate" means the rate at or below which the federal
government or its agents reimburse providers for vaccines and other
immunologic drugs as provided for in the medicare, part B, drugs
average sales price information resource as published by the United
States department of health and human services, or any successor index
thereto.
(b) "Health care provider" has the meaning provided in RCW
70.02.010.
(c) "Immunizing agent" means any vaccine or other immunologic drug
licensed and approved by the United States food and drug
administration, or meeting World Health Organization requirements, for
immunization of persons against vaccine-preventable diseases.

--- END ---