BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In order to provide funds necessary for the
design, right of way, and construction of selected state highway
improvements, there shall be issued and sold upon the request of the
Washington state department of transportation, a total of one hundred
fifty million dollars of general obligation bonds of the state of
Washington for the following purposes and sums:
(1) Not to exceed one hundred million dollars for the repair of
unstable slopes that threaten state highways;
(2) Not to exceed fifty million dollars for construction,
reconstruction, or repair of any state highway made necessary by
slides, storm damage, or repair of any other unexpected or unusual
causes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Upon the request of the department of
transportation, the state finance committee shall supervise and provide
for the issuance, sale, and retirement of the bonds authorized by
sections 1 through 6 of this act in accordance with chapter 39.42 RCW.
Bonds authorized by sections 1 through 6 of this act shall be sold in
such manner, at such time or times, in such amounts, and at such price
as the state finance committee shall determine. No such bonds may be
offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net
proceeds of the sale of the bonds.
The state finance committee shall consider the issuance of short-term obligations in lieu of long-term obligations for the purposes of
more favorable interest rates, lower total interest costs, and
increased marketability for the purpose of retiring the bonds during
the life of the project for which they were issued.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by sections 1 through 6 of this act shall be deposited in
the motor vehicle fund. The proceeds shall be available only for the
purposes enumerated in section 1 of this act, for the payment of bond
anticipation notes, if any, and for the payment of bond issuance costs,
including the costs of underwriting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Bonds issued under the authority of sections
1 through 6 of this act shall distinctly state that they are a general
obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and
credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof and the
interest thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to pay
such principal and interest as the same shall become due. The
principal and interest on the bonds shall be first payable in the
manner provided in sections 1 through 6 of this act from the proceeds
of the state excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels imposed by
chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW. Proceeds of such excise taxes are hereby
pledged to the payment of any bonds and the interest thereon issued
under the authority of sections 1 through 6 of this act, and the
legislature agrees to continue to impose these excise taxes on motor
vehicle and special fuels in amounts sufficient to pay, when due, the
principal and interest on all bonds issued under the authority of
sections 1 through 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Both principal and interest on the bonds
issued for the purposes of sections 1 through 6 of this act shall be
payable from the highway bond retirement fund. The state finance
committee may provide that a special account be created in the fund to
facilitate payment of the principal and interest. The state finance
committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify to the
state treasurer the amount required for principal and interest on the
bonds in accordance with the bond proceedings. The state treasurer
shall withdraw revenues from the motor vehicle fund and deposit in the
highway bond retirement fund, or a special account in the fund, such
amounts, and at such times, as are required by the bond proceedings.
Any funds required for bond retirement or interest on the bonds
authorized by sections 1 through 6 of this act shall be taken from that
portion of the motor vehicle fund that results from the imposition of
excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is, or may
be, appropriated to the department of transportation for state highway
purposes. Funds required shall never constitute a charge against any
other allocations of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel tax revenues
to the state, counties, cities, and towns unless the amount arising
from excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels distributed to the
state in the motor vehicle fund proves insufficient to meet the
requirements for bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.
Any payments for bond retirement or interest on the bonds taken
from other revenues from the motor vehicle fuel or special fuel taxes
that are distributable to the state, counties, cities, and towns shall
be repaid from the first revenues from the motor vehicle fuel or
special fuel taxes distributed to the motor vehicle fund not required
for bond retirement or interest on the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Bonds issued under the authority of sections
1 through 5 of this act and this section and any other general
obligation bonds of the state of Washington that have been or that may
be authorized and that pledge motor vehicle and special fuels excise
taxes for the payment of principal and interest thereon shall be an
equal charge against the revenues from such motor vehicle and special
fuels excise taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 47.10 RCW.

--- END ---