BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it is in the best
interest of unemployed workers, businesses, and the state to maintain
a stable and solvent unemployment insurance system. The legislature
intends to make adjustments to benefit and tax equity that ensure both
the stability and solvency of the system.

--- END ---