BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
improve the state's ability to identify and stop diversion of
prescription drugs in an efficient and cost-effective manner that will
not impede the appropriate medical utilization of licit controlled
substances or other licit drugs of abuse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Controlled substance" has the meaning provided in RCW
69.50.101.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Patient" means the person or animal who is the ultimate user
of a drug for whom a prescription is issued or for whom a drug is
dispensed.
(4) "Dispenser" means a person who delivers a Schedule II, III, IV,
or V controlled substance to the ultimate user, but does not include:
(a) A person who distributes controlled substances for the purpose
of inpatient hospital care;
(b) A practitioner or other authorized person who administers, as
defined in RCW 69.41.010, a controlled substance; or
(c) A licensed wholesale distributor or manufacturer, as defined in
chapter 18.64 RCW, of a controlled substance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department shall establish and
maintain an electronic system to monitor the prescribing and dispensing
of all Schedules II, III, IV, and V controlled substances and any
additional drugs identified by the board of pharmacy as demonstrating
a potential for abuse by all professionals licensed to prescribe or
dispense such substances in this state.
(2) Each dispenser shall submit to the department by electronic
means information regarding each prescription dispensed for a drug
included under subsection (1) of this section. The information
submitted for each prescription shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Patient identifier;
(b) Drug dispensed;
(c) Date of dispensing;
(d) Quantity dispensed;
(e) Prescriber; and
(f) Dispenser.
(3) Each dispenser shall submit the information in accordance with
transmission methods and frequency established by the department, but
shall report at least every thirty days, between the 1st and the 15th
of the month following the month the prescription was dispensed.
(4) The department may issue a waiver to a dispenser that is unable
to submit prescription information by electronic means; however, all
dispensers shall be required to submit prescription information by
electronic means within one year from the effective date of this act.
The waiver may permit the dispenser to submit prescription information
by paper form or other means, provided all information required in
subsection (2) of this section is submitted in this alternative format.
(5) The department shall seek federal funding and state funding to
cover the costs of operating the prescription monitoring program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Prescription information submitted to
the department shall be confidential, in compliance with HIPPA, and not
subject to disclosure, except as provided in subsections (3), (4), and
(5) of this section.
(2) The department shall maintain procedures to ensure that the
privacy and confidentiality of patients and patient information
collected, recorded, transmitted, and maintained is not disclosed to
persons except as in subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section.
(3) The department shall review the prescription information. If
there is reasonable cause to believe a violation of law or breach of
professional standards may have occurred, the department shall notify
the appropriate law enforcement or professional licensing,
certification, or regulatory agency or entity, and provide prescription
information required for an investigation.
(4) The department may provide data in the prescription monitoring
program to the following persons:
(a) Persons authorized to prescribe or dispense controlled
substances, for the purpose of providing medical or pharmaceutical care
for their patients;
(b) An individual who requests the individual's own prescription
monitoring information;
(c) Health professional licensing, certification, or regulatory
agency or entity;
(d) Appropriate local, state, and federal law enforcement or
prosecutorial officials;
(e) The department of social and health services regarding medicaid
program recipients;
(f) Other entities under grand jury subpoena or court order; and
(g) Personnel of the department for purposes of administration and
enforcement of this chapter or chapter 69.50 RCW.
(5) The department may provide data to public or private entities
for statistical, research, or educational purposes after removing
information that could be used to identify individual patients,
dispensers, prescribers, and persons who received prescriptions from
dispensers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department may contract with another
agency of this state or with a private vendor, as necessary, to ensure
the effective operation of the prescription monitoring program. Any
contractor is bound to comply with the provisions regarding
confidentiality of prescription information in section 4 of this act
and is subject to the penalties specified in section 7 of this act for
unlawful acts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department shall adopt rules to
implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A dispenser who knowingly fails to
submit prescription monitoring information to the department as
required by this chapter or knowingly submits incorrect prescription
information is subject to disciplinary action under chapter 18.130 RCW.
(2) A person authorized to have prescription monitoring information
under this chapter who knowingly discloses such information in
violation of this chapter is subject to civil penalty.
(3) A person authorized to have prescription monitoring information
under this chapter who uses such information in a manner or for a
purpose in violation of this chapter is subject to civil penalty.
(4) In accordance with HIPPA, any physician or pharmacist
authorized to access a patient's prescription monitoring may discuss or
release that information to other health care providers involved with
the patient in order to provide safe and appropriate care coordination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

Sec. 9 RCW 42.56.360 and 2005 c 274 s 416 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following health care information is exempt from disclosure
under this chapter:
(a) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090;
(b) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420;
(c) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee under RCW
43.70.510 or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee under RCW
4.24.250, regardless of which agency is in possession of the
information and documents;
(d)(i) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310;
(ii) If a request for such information is received, the submitting
entity must be notified of the request. Within ten business days of
receipt of the notice, the submitting entity shall provide a written
statement of the continuing need for confidentiality, which shall be
provided to the requester. Upon receipt of such notice, the department
of health shall continue to treat information designated under this
subsection (1)(d) as exempt from disclosure;
(iii) If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality;
(e) Records of the entity obtained in an action under RCW 18.71.300
through 18.71.340;
(f) Except for published statistical compilations and reports
relating to the infant mortality review studies that do not identify
individual cases and sources of information, any records or documents
obtained, prepared, or maintained by the local health department for
the purposes of an infant mortality review conducted by the department
of health under RCW 70.05.170; ((and))
(g) Complaints filed under chapter 18.130 RCW after July 27, 1997,
to the extent provided in RCW 18.130.095(1); and
(h) Information obtained by the department of health under chapter
69.-- RCW (sections 1 through 8 and 11 of this act).
(2) Chapter 70.02 RCW applies to public inspection and copying of
health care information of patients.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 8 and 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 69 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

--- END ---