BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The small business development center is a
cooperative effort of Washington State University, Western Washington
University, Washington community colleges, economic development
organizations, and the United States small business administration.
The one-on-one confidential assistance for management and technical
business affairs has assisted almost four thousand local businesses and
helped create or retain over two thousand jobs. The legislature finds
that by assisting our small, local businesses, we create a bow wave of
economic and social benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sum of one million six hundred thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2007, from the general fund to the
Washington State University for the small business development center.

--- END ---