BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 14.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any temporary or permanent guyed tower fifty feet or more in
height that is located outside the boundaries of an incorporated city
or town on land that is primarily rural or undeveloped or used for
agricultural purposes, or that is primarily desert, and where such
guyed tower's appearance is not otherwise governed by state or federal
law, rule, or regulation, must be lighted, marked, and painted or
otherwise constructed to be visible in clear air during daylight hours
from a distance of not less than two thousand feet. Guyed towers are
required to be in accordance with the following:
(a) Guyed towers must be painted in seven equal alternating bands
of aviation orange and white. The alternating bands must begin with
orange at the top of the tower and end with orange at the base.
(b) Guyed towers must have a flashing light at the top of the
tower. The light must be visible in clear air, with the naked eye,
from a distance of two thousand feet when flashing. Such a light must
also be visible with night vision goggles.
(c) The surface area under the footprint of the tower and six feet
beyond the outer tower anchors must have a contrasting appearance with
any surrounding vegetation.
(d) Two marker balls must be attached to and evenly spaced on each
of the outside guy wires.
(e) Guyed towers must have a seven foot long safety sleeve at each
anchor point and must extend from the anchor point along each guy wire
attached to the anchor point.
(2) Any guyed tower that was erected prior to the effective date of
this section must be marked as required by the provisions of this
section within one year of the effective date of this section. Any
guyed tower that is erected on or after the effective date of this
section must be marked as required by the provisions of this section at
the time it is erected.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Guyed tower" means a tower that is supported in whole or in
part by guy wires and ground anchors or other means of support besides
the superstructure of the tower itself, towers used for military
purposes excepted.
(b) "Height" means the distance measured from the original grade at
the base of the tower to the highest point of the tower.
(c) "Temporary or permanent guyed tower" means a guyed tower
erected and standing for any period of time whatsoever.
(4) This section does not apply to power poles or structures owned
and operated by an electric utility as defined in RCW 80.80.010 or any
structure the primary purpose of which is to support telecommunications
equipment.
(5) A person who violates a provision of this section is guilty of
a misdemeanor.

--- END ---