BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.250 and 2010 c 211 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A growth management hearings board for the state of Washington
is created. The board shall consist of seven members qualified by
experience or training in matters pertaining to land use law or land
use planning and who have experience in the practical application of
those matters. All seven board members shall be appointed by the
governor with the advice and consent of the senate, two each residing
respectively in the central Puget Sound, eastern Washington, and
western Washington regions, plus one board member residing within the
state of Washington. At least three members of the board shall be
admitted to practice law in this state, one each residing respectively
in the central Puget Sound, eastern Washington, and western Washington
regions. At least three members of the board shall have been a city or
county elected official, one each residing respectively in the central
Puget Sound, eastern Washington, and western Washington regions. After
expiration of the terms of board members on the previously existing
three growth management hearings boards, no more than four members of
the seven-member board may be members of the same major political
party. No more than two members at the time of their appointment or
during their term may reside in the same county.
(2) Each member of the board shall be appointed for a term of six
years. A vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the governor for
the unexpired portion of the term in which the vacancy occurs. Members
of the previously existing three growth management hearings boards
appointed before July 1, 2010, shall complete their staggered, six-year
terms as members of the growth management hearings board created under
subsection (1) of this section. The reduction from nine board members
on the previously existing three growth management hearings boards to
seven total members on the growth management hearings board shall be
made through attrition, voluntary resignation, or retirement.

--- END ---