BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 17.28.160 and 1981 c 156 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A mosquito control district organized under this chapter may:
(1) Take all necessary or proper steps for the extermination of
mosquitoes.
(2) Subject to the paramount control of the county or city in which
they exist, abate as nuisances all stagnant pools of water and other
breeding places for mosquitoes.
(3) If necessary or proper, in the furtherance of the objects of
this chapter, build, construct, repair, and maintain necessary dikes,
levees, cuts, canals, or ditches upon any land, and acquire by
purchase, condemnation, or by other lawful means, in the name of the
district, any lands, rights-of-way, easements, property, or material
necessary for any of those purposes.
(4) Make contracts to indemnify or compensate any owner of land or
other property for any injury or damage necessarily caused by the use
or taking of property for dikes, levees, cuts, canals, or ditches.
(5) Enter upon without hindrance any lands within the district and
adjacent thereto for the purpose of inspection to ascertain whether
breeding places of mosquitoes exist upon such lands; or to abate public
nuisances in accordance with this chapter; or to ascertain if notices
to abate the breeding of mosquitoes upon such lands have been complied
with; or to treat ((with oil or other larvicidal material any breeding
places of mosquitoes)) using integrated pest management, as defined in
RCW 17.15.010, methods in places where mosquitoes are found or are
likely to exist upon such lands.
(6) Sell or lease any land, rights-of-way, easements, property or
material acquired by the district.
(7) Issue warrants payable at the time stated therein to evidence
the obligation to repay money borrowed or any other obligation incurred
by the district, warrants so issued to draw interest at a rate fixed by
the board payable annually or semiannually as the board may prescribe.
(8) Make contracts with the United States, or any state,
municipality, or any department of those entities for carrying out the
general purpose for which the district is formed.
(9) Acquire by gift, devise, bequest, lease, or purchase, real and
personal property necessary or convenient for its purposes.
(10) Make contracts, employ engineers, health officers,
sanitarians, physicians, laboratory personnel, attorneys, and other
technical or professional assistants; and publish information or
literature and do any and all other things necessary or incident to the
powers granted by, and to carry out the projects specified in this
chapter.
(11) Subject to management considerations identified during
consultation with the landowner, cut or remove shrubbery or undergrowth
as necessary or proper in order to carry out this chapter.

--- END ---