BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of goods
and services for the capital construction of a transportation project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of goods and services for the capital construction of a transportation
project.

--- END ---