BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The governor may not, within the period specified in subsection
(2) of this section, appoint a legislator described in subsection (3)
of this section to:
(a) The indeterminate sentence review board, pursuant to RCW
9.95.003;
(b) The growth management hearings board, pursuant to RCW
36.70A.250;
(c) The pollution control hearings board, pursuant to RCW
43.21B.010;
(d) The executive board of directors of a joint operating agency,
pursuant to RCW 43.52.374;
(e) The board of industrial insurance appeals, pursuant to RCW
51.52.010;
(f) The Washington state liquor control board, pursuant to RCW
66.08.012;
(g) The Washington utilities and transportation commission,
pursuant to RCW 80.01.010;
(h) The energy facility site evaluation council, pursuant to RCW
80.50.030; or
(i) The board of tax appeals, pursuant to RCW 82.03.020.
(2) The restriction in subsection (1) of this section commences on
the thirtieth day before the first day for filing declarations of
candidacy under RCW 29A.24.050 and concludes at the end of the Monday
following the last day for candidates to file under RCW 29A.24.050.
(3) The restriction in subsection (1) of this section applies to
appointment of any legislator serving in the final year of the
legislator's term of office, including a legislator who resigns from
office during the period specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.06.010 and 1994 c 223 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to those prescribed by the Constitution, the governor
may exercise the powers and perform the duties prescribed in this and
the following sections:
(1) The governor ((shall)) must supervise the conduct of all
executive and ministerial offices;
(2) The governor ((shall see)) must provide that all offices are
filled, including as provided in RCW 42.12.070, and the duties thereof
performed, or in default thereof, apply such remedy as the law allows;
and if the remedy is imperfect, acquaint the legislature therewith at
its next session;
(3) The governor ((shall)) must make the appointments and supply
the vacancies mentioned in this title, subject to the restriction
specified in section 1 of this act;
(4) The governor is the sole official organ of communication
between the government of this state and the government of any other
state or territory, or of the United States;
(5) Whenever any suit or legal proceeding is pending against this
state, or which may affect the title of this state to any property, or
which may result in any claim against the state, the governor may
direct the attorney general to appear on behalf of the state, and
report the same to the governor, or to any grand jury designated by the
governor, or to the legislature when next in session;
(6) The governor may require the attorney general or any
prosecuting attorney to inquire into the affairs or management of any
corporation existing under the laws of this state, or doing business in
this state, and report the same to the governor, or to any grand jury
designated by the governor, or to the legislature when next in session;
(7) The governor may require the attorney general to aid any
prosecuting attorney in the discharge of the prosecutor's duties;
(8) The governor may offer rewards, not exceeding one thousand
dollars in each case, payable out of the state treasury, for
information leading to the apprehension of any person convicted of a
felony who has escaped from a state correctional institution or for
information leading to the arrest of any person who has committed or is
charged with the commission of a felony;
(9) The governor ((shall)) must perform such duties respecting
fugitives from justice as are prescribed by law;
(10) The governor ((shall)) must issue and transmit election
proclamations as prescribed by law;
(11) The governor may require any officer or board to make, upon
demand, special reports to the governor, in writing;
(12) The governor may, after finding that a public disorder,
disaster, energy emergency, or riot exists within this state or any
part thereof which affects life, health, property, or the public peace,
proclaim a state of emergency in the area affected, and the powers
granted the governor during a state of emergency ((shall be)) are
effective only within the area described in the proclamation;
(13) The governor may, after finding that there exists within this
state an imminent danger of infestation of plant pests as defined in
RCW 17.24.007 or plant diseases which seriously endangers the
agricultural or horticultural industries of the state of Washington, or
which seriously threatens life, health, or economic well-being, order
emergency measures to prevent or abate the infestation or disease
situation, which measures, after thorough evaluation of all other
alternatives, may include the aerial application of pesticides;
(14) On all compacts forwarded to the governor pursuant to RCW
9.46.360(6), the governor is authorized and empowered to execute on
behalf of the state compacts with federally recognized Indian tribes in
the state of Washington pursuant to the federal Indian Gaming
Regulatory Act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq., for conducting class III
gaming, as defined in the Act, on Indian lands.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.95.003 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 15 and 2011 c 336
s 336 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The board is created within the department. The board
((shall)) must consist of a chair and four other members, each of whom
((shall)) must be appointed by the governor with the consent of the
senate. Any appointment of a legislator is subject to the restriction
specified in section 1 of this act. Each member ((shall)) holds office
for a term of five years, and until his or her successor is appointed
and qualified. The terms ((shall)) expire on April 15th of the
expiration year. Vacancies in the membership of the board ((shall))
must be filled by appointment by the governor with the consent of the
senate. In the event of the inability of any member to act, the
governor ((shall)) must appoint some competent person to act in his or
her stead during the continuance of such inability. The members
((shall)) are not ((be)) removable during their respective terms except
for cause determined by the superior court of Thurston county. The
governor in appointing the members ((shall)) must designate one of them
to serve as chair at the governor's pleasure. The appointed chair
((shall)) serves as a fully participating board member.
(2) The department ((shall)) must provide administrative and staff
support for the board. The secretary may employ a senior
administrative officer and such other personnel as may be necessary to
assist the board in carrying out its duties.
(3) The members of the board and staff assigned to the board
((shall)) may not engage in any other business or profession or hold
any other public office without the prior approval of the executive
ethics board indicating compliance with RCW 42.52.020, 42.52.030,
42.52.040, and 42.52.120; nor ((shall)) may they, at the time of
appointment or employment or during their incumbency, serve as the
representative of any political party on an executive committee or
other governing body thereof, or as an executive officer or employee of
any political committee or association.
(4) The members of the board ((shall)) must each severally receive
salaries fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW
43.03.040, and in addition ((shall)) must receive travel expenses
incurred in the discharge of their official duties in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.250 and 2010 c 211 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A growth management hearings board for the state of Washington
is created. The board ((shall)) must consist of seven members
qualified by experience or training in matters pertaining to land use
law or land use planning and who have experience in the practical
application of those matters. All seven board members ((shall)) must
be appointed by the governor, two each residing respectively in the
central Puget Sound, eastern Washington, and western Washington
regions, plus one board member residing within the state of Washington.
At least three members of the board ((shall)) must be admitted to
practice law in this state, one each residing respectively in the
central Puget Sound, eastern Washington, and western Washington
regions. At least three members of the board ((shall)) must have been
a city or county elected official, one each residing respectively in
the central Puget Sound, eastern Washington, and western Washington
regions. After expiration of the terms of board members on the
previously existing three growth management hearings boards, no more
than four members of the seven-member board may be members of the same
major political party. No more than two members at the time of their
appointment or during their term may reside in the same county. Any
appointment of a legislator is subject to the restriction specified in
section 1 of this act.
(2) Each member of the board ((shall)) must be appointed for a term
of six years. A vacancy ((shall)) must be filled by appointment by the
governor for the unexpired portion of the term in which the vacancy
occurs. Members of the previously existing three growth management
hearings boards appointed before July 1, 2010, ((shall)) must complete
their staggered, six-year terms as members of the growth management
hearings board created under subsection (1) of this section. The
reduction from nine board members on the previously existing three
growth management hearings boards to seven total members on the growth
management hearings board ((shall)) must be made through attrition,
voluntary resignation, or retirement.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.21B.020 and 2009 c 549 s 5091 are each amended to
read as follows:
The hearings board ((shall)) must consist of three members
qualified by experience or training in pertinent matters pertaining to
the environment, and at least one member of the hearings board
((shall)) must have been admitted to practice law in this state and
engaged in the legal profession at the time of his or her appointment.
The hearings board ((shall)) must be appointed by the governor with the
advice and consent of the senate, and no more than two of whom at the
time of appointment or during their term ((shall)) must be members of
the same political party. Any appointment of a legislator is subject
to the restriction specified in section 1 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.52.374 and 2009 c 549 s 5136 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) With the exception of the powers and duties of the board of
directors described in RCW 43.52.370(2), the management and control of
an operating agency constructing, operating, terminating, or
decommissioning a nuclear power plant under a site certification
agreement under chapter 80.50 RCW is vested in an executive board
established under this subsection and consisting of eleven members.
(a) Five members of the executive board ((shall)) must be elected
to four-year terms by the board of directors from among the members of
the board of directors. The board of directors may provide by rule for
the composition of the five members of the executive board elected from
among the members of the board of directors so as to reflect the member
public utility districts' and cities' participation in the joint
operating agency's projects. Members elected to the executive board
from the board of directors are ineligible for continued membership on
the executive board if they cease to be members of the board of
directors. The board of directors may also provide by rule for the
removal of a member of the executive board, except for the outside
directors. Members of the board of directors may be elected to serve
successive terms on the executive board. Members elected to the
executive board from the board of directors ((shall)) must receive a
salary from the operating agency at a rate set by the board of
directors.
(b) Six members of the executive board ((shall)) must be outside
directors. Three ((shall)) must be selected and appointed by the board
of directors, and three ((shall)) must be selected and appointed by the
governor and confirmed by the senate. Any appointment of a legislator
is subject to the restriction specified in section 1 of this act. All
outside directors ((shall)) must:
(i) Serve four-year terms on the executive board. However, of the
initial members of the executive board, the board of directors and the
governor ((shall)) must each appoint one outside director to serve a
two-year term, one outside director to serve a three-year term, and one
outside director to serve a four-year term. Thereafter, all outside
directors ((shall)) must be appointed for four-year terms. All outside
directors are eligible for reappointment;
(ii) Receive travel expenses on the same basis as the five members
elected from the board of directors. The outside directors ((shall))
must also receive a salary from the operating agency as fixed by the
governor;
(iii) Not be an officer or employee of, or in any way affiliated
with, the Bonneville power administration or any electric utility
conducting business in the states of Washington, Oregon, Idaho, or
Montana;
(iv) Not be involved in the financial affairs of the operating
agency as an underwriter or financial adviser of the operating agency
or any of its members or any of the participants in any of the
operating agency's plants; and
(v) Be representative of policymakers in business, finance, or
science, or have expertise in the construction or management of such
facilities as the operating agency is constructing or operating, or
have expertise in the termination, disposition, or liquidation of
corporate assets.
(c) The governor may remove outside directors from the executive
board for incompetency, misconduct, or malfeasance in office in the
same manner as state appointive officers under chapter 43.06 RCW. For
purposes of this subsection, misconduct ((shall)) includes, but is not
((be)) limited to, nonfeasance and misfeasance.
(2) Nothing in this chapter ((shall)) may be construed to mean that
an operating agency is in any manner an agency of the state. Nothing
in this chapter alters or destroys the status of an operating agency as
a separate municipal corporation or makes the state liable in any way
or to any extent for any preexisting or future debt of the operating
agency or any present or future claim against the agency.
(3) The eleven members of the executive board ((shall)) must be
selected with the objective of establishing an executive board which
has the resources to effectively carry out its responsibilities. All
members of the executive board ((shall)) must conduct their business in
a manner which in their judgment is in the interest of all ratepayers
affected by the joint operating agency and its projects.
(4) The executive board ((shall)) must elect from its members a
chair, vice chair, and secretary, who ((shall)) serve at the pleasure
of the executive board. The executive board ((shall)) must adopt rules
for the conduct of its meetings and the carrying out of its business.
All proceedings ((shall)) must be by motion or resolution and ((shall))
must be recorded in the minute book, which ((shall be)) is a public
record. A majority of the executive board ((shall)) constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business.
(5) With respect to any operating agency existing on April 20,
1982, to which the provisions of this section are applicable:
(a) The board of directors ((shall)) must elect five members to the
executive board no later than sixty days after April 20, 1982; and
(b) The board of directors and the governor ((shall)) must select
and appoint the initial outside directors and the executive board
((shall)) must hold its organizational meeting no later than sixty days
after April 20, 1982, and the powers and duties prescribed in this
chapter ((shall)) devolve upon the executive board at that time.
(6) The executive board ((shall)) must select and employ a managing
director of the operating agency and may delegate to the managing
director such authority for the management and control of the operating
agency as the executive board deems appropriate. The managing
director's employment is terminable at the will of the executive board.
(7)(a) Members of the executive board ((shall be)) are immune from
civil liability for mistakes and errors of judgment in the good faith
performance of acts within the scope of their official duties involving
the exercise of judgment and discretion. This grant of immunity
((shall)) may not be construed as modifying the liability of the
operating agency.
(b) The operating agency ((shall)) must undertake the defense of
and indemnify each executive board member made a party to any civil
proceeding including any threatened, pending, or completed action,
suit, or proceeding, whether civil, administrative, or investigative,
by reason of the fact he or she is or was a member of the executive
board, against judgments, penalties, fines, settlements, and reasonable
expenses, actually incurred by him or her in connection with such
proceeding if he or she had conducted himself or herself in good faith
and reasonably believed his or her conduct to be in the best interest
of the operating agency.
(c) In addition members of the executive board who are utility
employees ((shall)) may not be fired, forced to resign, or demoted from
their utility jobs for decisions they make while carrying out their
duties as members of the executive board involving the exercise of
judgment and discretion.

Sec. 7 RCW 51.52.010 and 2004 c 65 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
((There shall be)) (1) A "board of industrial insurance appeals,"
hereinafter called the "board," is hereby created, consisting of three
members appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the
senate, as ((hereinafter)) provided in this section. ((One shall)) The
first member must be a representative of the public and a lawyer,
appointed from a mutually agreed to list of not less than three active
or judicial members of the Washington state bar association, submitted
to the governor by the two organizations defined below, and ((such))
that member ((shall)) must be the chairperson of ((said)) the board.
The second member ((shall)) must be a representative of the majority of
workers engaged in employment under this title and selected from a list
of not less than three names submitted to the governor by an
organization, statewide in scope, which through its affiliates embraces
a cross section and a majority of the organized labor of the state.
The third member ((shall)) must be a representative of employers under
this title, and appointed from a list of at least three names submitted
to the governor by a recognized statewide organization of employers,
representing a majority of employers. Any appointment of a legislator
is subject to the restriction specified in section 1 of this act.
(2) The initial terms of office of the members of the board
((shall)) must be for six, four, and two years respectively.
Thereafter all terms ((shall)) must be for a period of six years. Each
member of the board ((shall be)) is eligible for reappointment and
((shall)) must hold office until his or her successor is appointed and
qualified. In the event of a vacancy the governor is authorized to
appoint a successor to fill the unexpired term of his or her
predecessor. All appointments to the board ((shall)) must be made in
conformity with the foregoing plan.
(3) In the event a board member becomes incapacitated in excess of
thirty days either due to his or her illness or that of an immediate
family member, as determined by a request for family leave or as
certified by the affected member's treating physician or licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioner, the governor ((shall)) must
appoint an acting member to serve pro tem. Such an appointment
((shall)) must be made in conformity with ((the foregoing plan))
subsection (1) of this section, except that the list of candidates
((shall)) must be submitted to the governor not more than fifteen days
after the affected organizations are notified of the incapacity, and
the governor ((shall)) must make the appointment within fifteen days
after the list is submitted. The temporary member ((shall)) must serve
until such time as the affected member is able to reassume his or her
duties by returning from requested family leave or as determined by the
treating physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner,
or until the affected member's term expires, whichever occurs first.
(4) Whenever the workload of the board and its orderly and
expeditious disposition ((shall)) necessitates, the governor may
appoint two additional pro-tem members in addition to the regular
members. Such appointments ((shall)) must be for a definite period of
time, and ((shall)) must be made from lists submitted respectively by
labor and industry as in the case of regular members. One pro-tem
member ((shall)) must be a representative of labor and one ((shall))
must be a representative of industry.
(5) Members ((shall)) must devote their entire time to the duties
of the board and ((shall)) must receive for their services a salary as
fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW
43.03.040, which ((shall be)) is in addition to travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 ((as now existing or
hereafter amended)).
(6) Headquarters for the board ((shall)) must be located in
Olympia.
(7) The board ((shall)) must adopt a seal ((which shall be)) that
is judicially recognized.

Sec. 8 RCW 66.08.012 and 2012 c 117 s 265 are each amended to
read as follows:
((There shall be a board, known as)) (1) The "Washington state
liquor control board((,))" is hereby created, consisting of three
members, to be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the
senate, who ((shall)) must each be paid an annual salary to be fixed by
the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040. Any
appointment of a legislator is subject to the restriction specified in
section 1 of this act.
(2) The governor may, in his or her discretion, appoint one of the
members as chair of the board((, and)).
(3) A majority of the members ((shall)) constitutes a quorum of the
board.

Sec. 9 RCW 80.01.010 and 2006 c 346 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created and established a state commission to
be known and designated as the Washington utilities and transportation
commission, and in this chapter referred to as the commission.
(2) The commission ((shall be composed)) must consist of three
members appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. Not
more than two members of ((said)) the commission ((shall)) may belong
to the same political party. Any appointment of a legislator is
subject to the restriction specified in section 1 of this act.
(3) Each commissioner ((shall)) must be appointed and hold office
for the term of six years. The governor ((shall)) must designate one
of the commissioners to be chair of the commission during the term of
the governor.
(4) Each commissioner ((shall)) must receive a salary as may be
fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW
43.03.040.
(5) Any member of the commission may be removed for inefficiency,
malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges
filed by the governor, who ((shall)) transmits ((such)) the written
charges to the member accused and to the chief justice of the supreme
court. The chief justice ((shall)) must thereupon designate a special
tribunal composed of three judges of the superior court to hear and
adjudicate the charges. ((Such)) The tribunal ((shall)) must fix the
time, place, and procedure for the hearing, and the hearing ((shall))
must be public. The decision of ((such)) the tribunal ((shall be)) is
final and not subject to review.
(6) If the tribunal specified ((herein)) in this section finds the
charges of the governor to be true, the governor ((shall have)) has the
right to immediately remove the commissioner from office, to declare
the position of the commissioner vacant, and appoint another
commissioner to the position in accordance with the provisions of the
law.
(7) Any vacancy arising in the office of commissioner ((shall))
must be filled by appointment by the governor, and, except for persons
appointed as pro tempore commissioners, an appointee selected to fill
a vacancy ((shall)) must hold office for the balance of the full term
for which his or her predecessor on the commission was appointed. If
a vacancy occurs while the senate is not in session, the governor
((shall)) must make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of
the senate, when he or she ((shall)) must present to the senate his or
her nomination or nominations for the office to be filled.

Sec. 10 RCW 80.50.030 and 2010 c 271 s 601 and 2010 c 152 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There is created and established the energy facility site
evaluation council.
(2)(a) The chair of the council ((shall)) must be appointed by the
governor with the advice and consent of the senate((, shall)). Any
appointment of a legislator is subject to the restriction specified in
section 1 of this act. The chair must have a vote on matters before
the council, ((shall)) must serve for a term coextensive with the term
of the governor, and is removable for cause. The chair may designate
a member of the council to serve as acting chair in the event of the
chair's absence. The salary of the chair ((shall be)) is determined
under RCW 43.03.040. The chair is a "state employee" for the purposes
of chapter 42.52 RCW. As applicable, when attending meetings of the
council, members may receive reimbursement for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and are eligible for
compensation under RCW 43.03.250.
(b) The chair or a designee ((shall)) must execute all official
documents, contracts, and other materials on behalf of the council.
The Washington utilities and transportation commission ((shall)) must
provide all administrative and staff support for the council. The
commission has supervisory authority over the staff of the council and
((shall)) must employ ((such)) personnel as are necessary to implement
this chapter. Not more than three such employees may be exempt from
chapter 41.06 RCW. The council ((shall)) must otherwise retain its
independence in exercising its powers, functions, and duties and its
supervisory control over nonadministrative staff support. Membership,
powers, functions, and duties of the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission and the council ((shall)) must otherwise
remain as provided by law.
(3)(a) The council ((shall)) must consist of the directors,
administrators, or their designees, of the following departments,
agencies, commissions, and committees or their statutory successors:
(i) Department of ecology;
(ii) Department of fish and wildlife;
(iii) Department of commerce;
(iv) Utilities and transportation commission; and
(v) Department of natural resources.
(b) The directors, administrators, or their designees, of the
following departments, agencies, and commissions, or their statutory
successors, may participate as councilmembers at their own discretion
provided they elect to participate no later than sixty days after an
application is filed:
(i) Department of agriculture;
(ii) Department of health;
(iii) Military department; and
(iv) Department of transportation.
(c) Council membership is discretionary for agencies that choose to
participate under (b) of this subsection only for applications that are
filed with the council on or after May 8, 2001. For applications filed
before May 8, 2001, council membership is mandatory for those agencies
listed in (b) of this subsection.
(4) The appropriate county legislative authority of every county
wherein an application for a proposed site is filed ((shall)) must
appoint a member or designee as a voting member to the council. The
member or designee so appointed ((shall)) sits with the council only at
such times as the council considers the proposed site for the county
which he or she represents, and such member or designee ((shall)) must
serve until there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the
proposed site.
(5) The city legislative authority of every city within whose
corporate limits an energy facility is proposed to be located ((shall))
must appoint a member or designee as a voting member to the council.
The member or designee so appointed ((shall)) sits with the council
only at such times as the council considers the proposed site for the
city which he or she represents, and such member or designee ((shall))
must serve until there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the
proposed site.
(6) For any port district wherein an application for a proposed
port facility is filed subject to this chapter, the port district
((shall)) must appoint a member or designee as a nonvoting member to
the council. The member or designee so appointed ((shall)) sits with
the council only at such times as the council considers the proposed
site for the port district which he or she represents, and such member
or designee ((shall)) must serve until there has been a final
acceptance or rejection of the proposed site. The provisions of this
subsection ((shall)) do not apply if the port district is the
applicant, either singly or in partnership or association with any
other person.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.03.020 and 1967 ex.s. c 26 s 31 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The board of tax appeals((, hereinafter in chapter 26, Laws of
1967 ex. sess. referred to as the board, shall)) must consist of three
members qualified by experience and training in the field of state and
local taxation, appointed by the governor with the advice and consent
of the senate, and no more than two of whom at the time of appointment
or during their terms ((shall)) may be members of the same political
party. Any appointment of a legislator is subject to the restriction
specified in section 1 of this act.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter, the "board" means the "board
of tax appeals" created in this section.

--- END ---