BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Until June 30, 2019, and to address the problem of employee
hiring or retention due to competition for qualified employees and the
problem of frequent increases in the costs of electricity and motor
fuel, a water company may file tariff changes adjusting its metered or
flat tariff rates for water usage up to three percent without being
subject to suspension or adjudication under RCW 80.28.060, if:
(a) The water company files with the tariff changes a verified
statement, with supporting documentation, that demonstrates why the
amount of additional revenue from the tariff change is the amount
necessary to hire or retain a qualified employee or employees or to pay
the increased costs of purchasing electricity and motor fuel;
(b) Prior to the first time a company files for a rate increase
under this section, the company has completed a general rate case under
RCW 80.28.060 within the previous three years that resulted in either
an order issued by the commission approving a change in rates or the
rate changes going into effect by operation of law;
(c) The company has not adjusted its rates under this section
within the previous twelve months;
(d) The company is in compliance with RCW 80.24.010;
(e) The company is in compliance with all board of health and
department of health safe drinking water rules. The commission must
determine the system's compliance with drinking water rules as reported
on the department of health's web site;
(f) The company is not subject to a complaint filed under RCW
80.04.110 or other pending actions before the commission; and
(g) The company has not adjusted its rates under this section more
than four times since last completing a general rate case under RCW
80.28.060, resulting in either an order issued by the commission
approving changes in rates or the rate changes going into effect by
operation of law.
(2) A water company must give written notice of the proposed rate
adjustment to the commission and the ratepayers receiving service from
the water company at least sixty days prior to the effective date of
the rate adjustment. The increased rates do not become effective until
at least sixty days after notice and filing with the commission.
(3) A water company must report to the commission how it expended
the funds accruing from the tariff rate increase received pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section. The water company must report this
information within twelve months of the effective date of any increase
under this section and prior to filing any subsequent requests under
this section.
(4) Nothing in this section prevents a water company from filing
for a rate change pursuant to any other statute, rule, or procedure of
the commission. Nothing in this section prevents the commission from
taking any action within the scope of its authority, except the
commission may not suspend or adjudicate a tariff change meeting the
requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
By October 1, 2018, the commission shall report to the legislature,
consistent with RCW 43.01.036, regarding the rate filings made by water
companies under section 1 of this act, how the rate changes occurring
as a result of these filings have affected the financial stability of
water companies, and whether and how the processes in section 1 of this
act resulted in a reduction in the commission's costs of regulating
water companies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire June 30,
2019.

--- END ---