BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, if a
health plan issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2014, provides
coverage for maternity care or services, the health plan must also
provide a covered person with substantially equivalent coverage to
permit the voluntary termination of a pregnancy.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a health plan
subject to subsection (1) of this section may not limit in any way a
woman's access to services related to the voluntary termination of a
pregnancy.
(b)(i) Coverage for the voluntary termination of a pregnancy may be
subject to terms and conditions generally applicable to the health
plan's coverage of maternity care or services, including applicable
cost sharing.
(ii) A health plan is not required to cover abortions that would be
unlawful under RCW 9.02.120.
(3) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to limit in any way
a woman's constitutionally or statutorily protected right to
voluntarily terminate a pregnancy.
(4) This section does not, pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 18054(a)(6),
apply to a multistate plan that does not provide coverage for the
voluntary termination of a pregnancy.
(5) If the application of this section to a health plan results in
noncompliance with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition
to the allocation of federal funds to the state, this section is
inapplicable to the plan to the minimum extent necessary for the state
to be in compliance. The inapplicability of this section to a specific
health plan under this subsection does not affect the operation of this
section in other circumstances.
(6) Nothing in this section affects the right of objection based on
conscience or religion as set out in RCW 48.43.065 or 70.47.160.

--- END ---