BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning August 1, 2013, any person obtaining or renewing his
or her driver's license, driver's instruction permit, agricultural
driving permit, identicard, intermediate license, or commercial
driver's license shall show proof of his or her United States
citizenship or his or her lawful presence within the United States. An
original or renewal application must not be granted to any person who
does not provide verified proof of his or her United States citizenship
or his or her lawful presence within the United States. A person who
is a citizen or national of the United States, or who is a legal
permanent resident alien, must not be required to provide proof under
this subsection, so long as the department has a record of the person's
status in compliance with subsection (4) of this section.
(2) A person may prove his or her citizenship by providing a valid,
unexpired United States passport or passport card, a certified copy of
a birth certificate, a consular report of birth abroad issued by the
United States department of state, a certificate of naturalization
issued by the department of homeland security, or a certificate of
citizenship.
(3) A person may prove his or her lawful presence within the United
States by providing documentation that he or she is an alien:
(a) Lawfully admitted for permanent or temporary residence in the
United States;
(b) With conditional permanent resident status in the United
States;
(c) Who has an approved application for asylum in the United States
or has entered into the United States in refugee status;
(d) Who has a valid nonimmigrant status in the United States;
(e) Who has a pending application for asylum in the United States;
(f) Who has a pending or approved application for temporary
protected status in the United States;
(g) Who has approved deferred action status; or
(h) Who has a pending application for lawful permanent residence or
conditional permanent resident status.
(4) The department shall maintain records of an applicant's status
as a United States citizen or as a noncitizen, including the type of
document provided and the expiration of the applicant's authorization
to lawfully be within the United States. The department shall make
such records available to the secretary of state and state and local
criminal justice agencies.
(5) The department shall verify the status of an applicant through
either the systematic alien verification for entitlements program or
through verification of the applicant's social security number with the
United States social security administration.

--- END ---