BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.38.018 and 2007 c 259 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section and RCW 70.38.015 and
70.38.135, "statewide health resource strategy" or "strategy" means the
statewide health resource strategy developed by the office of financial
management pursuant to chapter 43.370 RCW.
(2) ((Effective January 1, 2010, for those facilities and services
covered by the certificate of need programs,)) Certificate of need
determinations must be consistent with the statewide health resources
strategy developed pursuant to RCW 43.370.030, including any health
planning policies and goals identified in the statewide health
resources strategy in effect at the time of application. The
department may waive specific terms of the strategy if the applicant
demonstrates that consistency with those terms will create an undue
burden on the population that a particular project would serve, or in
emergency circumstances which pose a threat to public health.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.38.025 and 2000 c 175 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
When used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall
have the meanings indicated.
(1) "Board of health" means the state board of health created
pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW.
(2) "Capital expenditure" is an expenditure, including a force
account expenditure (i.e., an expenditure for a construction project
undertaken by a ((nursing home facility)) hospital as its own
contractor) which, under generally accepted accounting principles, is
not properly chargeable as an expense of operation or maintenance.
Where a person makes an acquisition under lease or comparable
arrangement, or through donation, which would have required review if
the acquisition had been made by purchase, such expenditure shall be
deemed a capital expenditure. Capital expenditures include donations
of equipment or facilities to a nursing home facility which if acquired
directly by such facility would be subject to certificate of need
review under the provisions of this chapter and transfer of equipment
or facilities for less than fair market value if a transfer of the
equipment or facilities at fair market value would be subject to such
review. The cost of any studies, surveys, designs, plans, working
drawings, specifications, and other activities essential to the
acquisition, improvement, expansion, or replacement of any plant or
equipment with respect to which such expenditure is made shall be
included in determining the amount of the expenditure.
(3) (("Continuing care retirement community" means an entity which
provides shelter and services under continuing care contracts with its
members and which sponsors or includes a health care facility or a
health service. A "continuing care contract" means a contract to
provide a person, for the duration of that person's life or for a term
in excess of one year, shelter along with nursing, medical, health-related, or personal care services, which is conditioned upon the
transfer of property, the payment of an entrance fee to the provider of
such services, or the payment of periodic charges for the care and
services involved. A continuing care contract is not excluded from
this definition because the contract is mutually terminable or because
shelter and services are not provided at the same location.
(4))) "Department" means the department of health.
(((5))) (4) "Expenditure minimum" means, for the purposes of the
certificate of need program, one million dollars adjusted by the
department by rule to reflect changes in the United States department
of commerce composite construction cost index; or a lesser amount
required by federal law and established by the department by rule.
(((6) "Health care facility" means hospices, hospice care centers,
hospitals, psychiatric hospitals, nursing homes, kidney disease
treatment centers, ambulatory surgical facilities, and home health
agencies, and includes such facilities when owned and operated by a
political subdivision or instrumentality of the state and such other
facilities as required by federal law and implementing regulations, but
does not include any health facility or institution conducted by and
for those who rely exclusively upon treatment by prayer or spiritual
means in accordance with the creed or tenets of any well-recognized
church or religious denomination, or any health facility or institution
operated for the exclusive care of members of a convent as defined in
RCW 84.36.800 or rectory, monastery, or other institution operated for
the care of members of the clergy. In addition, the term does not
include any nonprofit hospital: (a) Which is operated exclusively to
provide health care services for children; (b) which does not charge
fees for such services; and (c) if not contrary to federal law as
necessary to the receipt of federal funds by the state.
(7) "Health maintenance organization" means a public or private
organization, organized under the laws of the state, which:
(a) Is a qualified health maintenance organization under Title
XIII, section 1310(d) of the Public Health Services [Service] Act; or
(b)(i) Provides or otherwise makes available to enrolled
participants health care services, including at least the following
basic health care services: Usual physician services, hospitalization,
laboratory, X-ray, emergency, and preventive services, and out-of-area
coverage; (ii) is compensated (except for copayments) for the provision
of the basic health care services listed in (b)(i) to enrolled
participants by a payment which is paid on a periodic basis without
regard to the date the health care services are provided and which is
fixed without regard to the frequency, extent, or kind of health
service actually provided; and (iii) provides physicians' services
primarily (A) directly through physicians who are either employees or
partners of such organization, or (B) through arrangements with
individual physicians or one or more groups of physicians (organized on
a group practice or individual practice basis).
(8))) (5) "Health services" means clinically related (i.e.,
preventive, diagnostic, curative, rehabilitative, or palliative)
services and includes alcoholism, drug abuse, and mental health
services and as defined in federal law.
(((9))) (6) "Health service area" means a geographic region
appropriate for effective health planning which includes a broad range
of health services.
(((10))) (7) "Person" means an individual, a trust or estate, a
partnership, a corporation (including associations, joint stock
companies, and insurance companies), the state, or a political
subdivision or instrumentality of the state, including a municipal
corporation or a hospital district.
(((11) "Provider" generally means a health care professional or an
organization, institution, or other entity providing health care but
the precise definition for this term shall be established by rule of
the department, consistent with federal law.
(12))) (8) "Public health" means the level of well-being of the
general population; those actions in a community necessary to preserve,
protect, and promote the health of the people for which government is
responsible; and the governmental system developed to guarantee the
preservation of the health of the people.
(((13))) (9) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.
(((14))) (10) "Tertiary health service" means a specialized service
that meets complicated medical needs of people and requires sufficient
patient volume to optimize provider effectiveness, quality of service,
and improved outcomes of care.
(((15))) (11) "Hospital" means any health care institution which is
required to qualify for a license under RCW 70.41.020(((2))) (4); or as
a psychiatric hospital under chapter 71.12 RCW. "Hospital" includes
freestanding emergency rooms that advertise as emergency rooms, yet are
not physically connected or adjacent to a licensed hospital under
chapter 70.41 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.38.105 and 2012 c 10 s 47 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is authorized and directed to implement the
certificate of need program in this state pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter.
(2) There shall be a state certificate of need program which is
administered consistent with the requirements of federal law as
necessary to the receipt of federal funds by the state.
(3) No person shall engage in any undertaking which is subject to
certificate of need review under subsection (4) of this section without
first having received from the department either a certificate of need
or an exception granted in accordance with this chapter.
(4) The following shall be subject to certificate of need review
under this chapter:
(a) The construction, development, or other establishment of a new
((health care facility including, but not limited to, a)) hospital
((constructed, developed, or established by a health maintenance
organization or by a combination of health maintenance organizations
except as provided in subsection (7)(a) of this section));
(b) The sale, purchase, or lease of part or all of any existing
hospital ((as defined in RCW 70.38.025 including, but not limited to,
a hospital sold, purchased, or leased by a health maintenance
organization or by a combination of health maintenance organizations
except as provided in subsection (7)(b) of this section)); and
(c) ((Any capital expenditure for the construction, renovation, or
alteration of a nursing home which substantially changes the services
of the facility after January 1, 1981, provided that the substantial
changes in services are specified by the department in rule;
(d) Any capital expenditure for the construction, renovation, or
alteration of a nursing home which exceeds the expenditure minimum as
defined by RCW 70.38.025. However, a capital expenditure which is not
subject to certificate of need review under (a), (b), (c), or (e) of
this subsection and which is solely for any one or more of the
following is not subject to certificate of need review:
(i) Communications and parking facilities;
(ii) Mechanical, electrical, ventilation, heating, and air
conditioning systems;
(iii) Energy conservation systems;
(iv) Repairs to, or the correction of, deficiencies in existing
physical plant facilities which are necessary to maintain state
licensure, however, other additional repairs, remodeling, or
replacement projects that are not related to one or more deficiency
citations and are not necessary to maintain state licensure are not
exempt from certificate of need review except as otherwise permitted by
(d)(vi) of this subsection or RCW 70.38.115(13);
(v) Acquisition of equipment, including data processing equipment,
which is not or will not be used in the direct provision of health
services;
(vi) Construction or renovation at an existing nursing home which
involves physical plant facilities, including administrative, dining
areas, kitchen, laundry, therapy areas, and support facilities, by an
existing licensee who has operated the beds for at least one year;
(vii) Acquisition of land; and
(viii) Refinancing of existing debt;
(e) A change in bed capacity of a health care facility which
increases the total number of licensed beds or redistributes beds among
acute care, nursing home care, and assisted living facility care if the
bed redistribution is to be effective for a period in excess of six
months, or a change in bed capacity of a rural health care facility
licensed under RCW 70.175.100 that increases the total number of
nursing home beds or redistributes beds from acute care or assisted
living facility care to nursing home care if the bed redistribution is
to be effective for a period in excess of six months. A health care
facility certified as a critical access hospital under 42 U.S.C. 1395i-4 may increase its total number of licensed beds to the total number of
beds permitted under 42 U.S.C. 1395i-4 for acute care and may
redistribute beds permitted under 42 U.S.C. 1395i-4 among acute care
and nursing home care without being subject to certificate of need
review. If there is a nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW
within twenty-seven miles of the critical access hospital, the critical
access hospital is subject to certificate of need review except for:
(i) Critical access hospitals which had designated beds to provide
nursing home care, in excess of five swing beds, prior to December 31,
2003;
(ii) Up to five swing beds; or
(iii) Up to twenty-five swing beds for critical access hospitals
which do not have a nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW
within the same city or town limits. Up to one-half of the additional
beds designated for swing bed services under this subsection
(4)(e)(iii) may be so designated before July 1, 2010, with the balance
designated on or after July 1, 2010.
Critical access hospital beds not subject to certificate of need
review under this subsection (4)(e) will not be counted as either acute
care or nursing home care for certificate of need review purposes. If
a health care facility ceases to be certified as a critical access
hospital under 42 U.S.C. 1395i-4, the hospital may revert back to the
type and number of licensed hospital beds as it had when it requested
critical access hospital designation;
(f))) Any new tertiary health services which are offered in or
through a ((health care facility or rural health care facility licensed
under RCW 70.175.100)) hospital, and which were not offered on a
regular basis by, in, or through such ((health care facility or rural
health care facility within the twelve-month period prior to the time
such services would be offered;
(g) Any expenditure for the construction, renovation, or alteration
of a nursing home or change in nursing home services in excess of the
expenditure minimum made in preparation for any undertaking under this
subsection (4) of this section and any arrangement or commitment made
for financing such undertaking. Expenditures of preparation shall
include expenditures for architectural designs, plans, working
drawings, and specifications. The department may issue certificates of
need permitting predevelopment expenditures, only, without authorizing
any subsequent undertaking with respect to which such predevelopment
expenditures are made; and
(h) Any increase in the number of dialysis stations in a kidney
disease center)) hospital.
(5) The department is authorized to charge fees for the review of
certificate of need applications and requests for exemptions from
certificate of need review. The fees shall be sufficient to cover the
full cost of review and exemption, which may include the development of
standards, criteria, and policies.
(6) No person may divide a project in order to avoid review
requirements under any of the thresholds specified in this section.
(((7)(a) The requirement that a health maintenance organization
obtain a certificate of need under subsection (4)(a) of this section
for the construction, development, or other establishment of a hospital
does not apply to a health maintenance organization operating a group
practice that has been continuously licensed as a health maintenance
organization since January 1, 2009;
(b) The requirement that a health maintenance organization obtain
a certificate of need under subsection (4)(b) of this section to sell,
purchase, or lease a hospital does not apply to a health maintenance
organization operating a group practice that has been continuously
licensed as a health maintenance organization since January 1, 2009.))

Sec. 4 RCW 70.38.115 and 1996 c 178 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Certificates of need shall be issued, denied, suspended, or
revoked by the designee of the secretary in accord with the provisions
of this chapter and rules of the department which establish review
procedures and criteria for the certificate of need program.
(2) Criteria for the review of certificate of need applications((,
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section for health
maintenance organizations,)) shall include but not be limited to
consideration of the following:
(a) The need that the population served or to be served by such
services has for such services;
(b) The availability of less costly or more effective alternative
methods of providing such services;
(c) The financial feasibility and the probable impact of the
proposal on the cost of and charges for providing health services in
the community to be served;
(d) In the case of health services to be provided, (i) the
availability of alternative uses of project resources for the provision
of other health services, (ii) the extent to which such proposed
services will be accessible to all residents of the area to be served,
and (iii) the need for and the availability in the community of
services and facilities for osteopathic physicians and surgeons and
allopathic physicians and their patients. The department shall
consider the application in terms of its impact on existing and
proposed institutional training programs for doctors of osteopathic
medicine and surgery and medicine at the student, internship, and
residency training levels;
(e) In the case of a construction project, the costs and methods of
the proposed construction, including the cost and methods of energy
provision, and the probable impact of the construction project reviewed
(i) on the cost of providing health services by the person proposing
such construction project and (ii) on the cost and charges to the
public of providing health services by other persons;
(f) The special needs and circumstances of osteopathic hospitals,
nonallopathic services and children's hospitals;
(g) Improvements or innovations in the financing and delivery of
health services which foster cost containment and serve to promote
quality assurance and cost-effectiveness;
(h) In the case of health services proposed to be provided, the
efficiency and appropriateness of the use of existing services and
facilities similar to those proposed;
(i) In the case of existing services or facilities, the quality of
care provided by such services or facilities in the past; and
(j) ((In the case of hospital certificate of need applications,))
Whether the hospital meets or exceeds the regional average level of
charity care, as determined by the secretary((; and
(k) In the case of nursing home applications:
(i) The availability of other nursing home beds in the planning
area to be served; and
(ii) The availability of other services in the community to be
served. Data used to determine the availability of other services will
include but not be limited to data provided by the department of social
and health services)).
(3) ((A certificate of need application of a health maintenance
organization or a health care facility which is controlled, directly or
indirectly, by a health maintenance organization, shall be approved by
the department if the department finds:
(a) Approval of such application is required to meet the needs of
the members of the health maintenance organization and of the new
members which such organization can reasonably be expected to enroll;
and
(b) The health maintenance organization is unable to provide,
through services or facilities which can reasonably be expected to be
available to the organization, its health services in a reasonable and
cost-effective manner which is consistent with the basic method of
operation of the organization and which makes such services available
on a long-term basis through physicians and other health professionals
associated with it.))
A ((health care facility)) hospital, or any part thereof, with
respect to which a certificate of need was issued under this subsection
may not be sold or leased and a controlling interest in such facility
or in a lease of such facility may not be acquired unless the
department issues a certificate of need approving the sale,
acquisition, or lease.
(4) Until the final expiration of the state health plan as provided
under RCW 70.38.919, the decision of the department on a certificate of
need application shall be consistent with the state health plan in
effect, except in emergency circumstances which pose a threat to the
public health. The department in making its final decision may issue
a conditional certificate of need if it finds that the project is
justified only under specific circumstances. The conditions shall
directly relate to the project being reviewed. The conditions may be
released if it can be substantiated that the conditions are no longer
valid and the release of such conditions would be consistent with the
purposes of this chapter.
(5) Criteria adopted for review in accordance with subsection (2)
of this section may vary according to the purpose for which the
particular review is being conducted or the type of health service
reviewed.
(6) The department shall specify information to be required for
certificate of need applications. Within fifteen days of receipt of
the application, the department shall request additional information
considered necessary to the application or start the review process.
Applicants may decline to submit requested information through written
notice to the department, in which case review starts on the date of
receipt of the notice. Applications may be denied or limited because
of failure to submit required and necessary information.
(7) Concurrent review is for the purpose of comparative analysis
and evaluation of competing or similar projects in order to determine
which of the projects may best meet identified needs. Categories of
projects subject to concurrent review include at least new ((health
care facilities)) hospitals, new services, and expansion of existing
((health care facilities)) hospitals. The department shall specify
time periods for the submission of applications for certificates of
need subject to concurrent review, which shall not exceed ninety days.
Review of concurrent applications shall start fifteen days after the
conclusion of the time period for submission of applications subject to
concurrent review. Concurrent review periods shall be limited to one
hundred fifty days, except as provided for in rules adopted by the
department authorizing and limiting amendment during the course of the
review, or for an unresolved pivotal issue declared by the department.
(8) Review periods for certificate of need applications other than
those subject to concurrent review shall be limited to ninety days.
Review periods may be extended up to thirty days if needed by a review
agency, and for unresolved pivotal issues the department may extend up
to an additional thirty days. A review may be extended in any case if
the applicant agrees to the extension.
(9) The department or its designee, shall conduct a public hearing
on a certificate of need application if requested unless the review is
expedited or subject to emergency review. The department by rule shall
specify the period of time within which a public hearing must be
requested and requirements related to public notice of the hearing,
procedures, recordkeeping and related matters.
(10)(a) Any applicant denied a certificate of need or whose
certificate of need has been suspended or revoked has the right to an
adjudicative proceeding. The proceeding is governed by chapter 34.05
RCW, the administrative procedure act.
(b) Any ((health care facility or health maintenance organization))
hospital that: (i) Provides services similar to the services provided
by the applicant and under review pursuant to this subsection; (ii) is
located within the applicant's health service area; and (iii) testified
or submitted evidence at a public hearing held pursuant to subsection
(9) of this section, shall be provided an opportunity to present oral
or written testimony and argument in a proceeding under this
subsection: PROVIDED, That the ((health care facility or health
maintenance organization)) hospital had, in writing, requested to be
informed of the department's decisions.
(c) If the department desires to settle with the applicant prior to
the conclusion of the adjudicative proceeding, the department shall so
inform the ((health care facility or health maintenance organization))
hospital and afford them an opportunity to comment, in advance, on the
proposed settlement.
(11) An amended certificate of need shall be required for the
following modifications of an approved project:
(a) A new service requiring review under this chapter; and
(b) An expansion of a service subject to review beyond that
originally approved((;
(c) An increase in bed capacity;
(d) A significant reduction in the scope of a nursing home project
without a commensurate reduction in the cost of the nursing home
project, or a cost increase (as represented in bids on a nursing home
construction project or final cost estimates acceptable to the person
to whom the certificate of need was issued) if the total of such
increases exceeds twelve percent or fifty thousand dollars, whichever
is greater, over the maximum capital expenditure approved. The review
of reductions or cost increases shall be restricted to the continued
conformance of the nursing home project with the review criteria
pertaining to financial feasibility and cost containment.
(12) An application for a certificate of need for a nursing home
capital expenditure which is determined by the department to be
required to eliminate or prevent imminent safety hazards or correct
violations of applicable licensure and accreditation standards shall be
approved.
(13)(a) Replacement of existing nursing home beds in the same
planning area by an existing licensee who has operated the beds for at
least one year shall not require a certificate of need under this
chapter. The licensee shall give written notice of its intent to
replace the existing nursing home beds to the department and shall
provide the department with information as may be required pursuant to
rule. Replacement of the beds by a party other than the licensee is
subject to certificate of need review under this chapter, except as
otherwise permitted by subsection (14) of this section.
(b) When an entire nursing home ceases operation, the licensee or
any other party who has secured an interest in the beds may reserve his
or her interest in the beds for eight years or until a certificate of
need to replace them is issued, whichever occurs first. However, the
nursing home, licensee, or any other party who has secured an interest
in the beds must give notice of its intent to retain the beds to the
department of health no later than thirty days after the effective date
of the facility's closure. Certificate of need review shall be
required for any party who has reserved the nursing home beds except
that the need criteria shall be deemed met when the applicant is the
licensee who had operated the beds for at least one year, who has
operated the beds for at least one year immediately preceding the
reservation of the beds, and who is replacing the beds in the same
planning area.
(14) In the event that a licensee, who has provided the department
with notice of his or her intent to replace nursing home beds under
subsection (13)(a) of this section, engages in unprofessional conduct
or becomes unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety by
reason of mental or physical condition, pursuant to chapter 18.130 RCW,
or dies, the building owner shall be permitted to complete the nursing
home bed replacement project, provided the building owner has secured
an interest in the beds)).

Sec. 5 RCW 70.38.118 and 2000 c 175 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
All certificate of need applications submitted by hospice agencies
for the construction, development, or other establishment of a facility
to be licensed as ((either)) a hospital under chapter 70.41 RCW ((or as
a nursing home under chapter 18.51 RCW)), for the purpose of operating
the functional equivalent of a hospice care center, shall not require
a separate certificate of need for a hospice care center provided the
certificate of need application was declared complete prior to July 1,
2001, the applicant has been issued a certificate of need, and has
applied for and received an in-home services agency license by July 1,
2002.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.38.125 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 606 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A certificate of need shall be valid for two years. One six-month extension may be made if it can be substantiated that substantial
and continuing progress toward commencement of the project has been
made as defined by regulations to be adopted pursuant to this chapter.
(2) A project for which a certificate of need has been issued shall
be commenced during the validity period for the certificate of need.
(3) The department shall monitor the approved projects to assure
conformance with certificates of need that have been issued. Rules and
regulations adopted shall specify when changes in the project require
reevaluation of the project. The department may require applicants to
submit periodic progress reports on approved projects or other
information as may be necessary to effectuate its monitoring
responsibilities.
(4) The secretary, in the case of a new ((health facility))
hospital, shall not issue any license unless and until a prior
certificate of need shall have been issued by the department for the
offering or development of such new ((health facility)) hospital.
(5) Any person who engages in any undertaking which requires
certificate of need review without first having received from the
department either a certificate of need or an exception granted in
accordance with this chapter shall be liable to the state in an amount
not to exceed one hundred dollars a day for each day of such
unauthorized offering or development. Such amounts of money shall be
recoverable in an action brought by the attorney general on behalf of
the state in the superior court of any county in which the unauthorized
undertaking occurred. Any amounts of money so recovered by the
attorney general shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(6) The department may bring any action to enjoin a violation or
the threatened violation of the provisions of this chapter or any rules
and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, or may bring any
legal proceeding authorized by law, including but not limited to the
special proceedings authorized in Title 7 RCW, in the superior court in
the county in which such violation occurs or is about to occur, or in
the superior court of Thurston county.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.38.135 and 2007 c 259 s 57 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall have authority to:
(1) Provide when needed temporary or intermittent services of
experts or consultants or organizations thereof, by contract, when such
services are to be performed on a part time or fee-for-service basis;
(2) Make or cause to be made such on-site surveys of ((health care
or medical facilities)) hospitals as may be necessary for the
administration of the certificate of need program;
(3) Upon review of recommendations, if any, from the board of
health or the office of financial management as contained in the
Washington health resources strategy:
(a) Promulgate rules under which ((health care facilities
providers)) hospitals doing business within the state shall submit to
the department such data related to health and health care as the
department finds necessary to the performance of its functions under
this chapter;
(b) Promulgate rules pertaining to the maintenance and operation of
((medical facilities)) hospitals which receive federal assistance under
the provisions of Title XVI;
(c) Promulgate rules in implementation of the provisions of this
chapter, including the establishment of procedures for public hearings
for predecisions and post-decisions on applications for certificate of
need;
(d) Promulgate rules providing circumstances and procedures of
expedited certificate of need review if there has not been a
significant change in existing ((health facilities)) hospitals of the
same type or in the need for such ((health facilities)) hospitals and
services;
(4) Grant allocated state funds to qualified entities, as defined
by the department, to fund not more than seventy-five percent of the
costs of regional planning activities, excluding costs related to
review of applications for certificates of need, provided for in this
chapter or approved by the department; and
(5) Contract with and provide reasonable reimbursement for
qualified entities to assist in determinations of certificates of need.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 70.38.111 (Certificates of need--Exemptions) and 2012 c 10 s 48 are each repealed.

--- END ---