BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.17.200 (Allocation of moneys for acquisition of works of
art -- Expenditure by arts commission -- Conditions) and 2005 c 36 s 4,
1983 c 204 s 4, & 1974 ex.s. c 176 s 2;
(2) RCW 43.17.205 (Purchase of works of art -- Interagency
reimbursement for expenditure by visual arts program) and 1990 c 33 s
574 & 1983 c 204 s 3;
(3) RCW 43.17.210 (Purchase of works of art -- Procedure) and 2005 c
36 s 5, 1990 c 33 s 575, & 1983 c 204 s 5;
(4) RCW 43.19.455 (Purchase of works of art -- Procedure) and 2011
1st sp.s. c 43 s 223, 2005 c 36 s 6, 1990 c 33 s 576, 1983 c 204 s 6,
& 1974 ex.s. c 176 s 3;
(5) RCW 28A.335.210 (Purchase of works of art -- Procedure) and 2006
c 263 s 327, 2005 c 36 s 1, 1983 c 204 s 7, 1982 c 191 s 2, & 1974
ex.s. c 176 s 5;
(6) RCW 28B.10.025 (Purchases of works of art -- Procedure) and 2005
c 36 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 557, 1983 c 204 s 8, 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 8, & 1974
ex.s. c 176 s 4; and
(7) RCW 28B.10.027 (Allocation of moneys for acquisition of works
of art -- Expenditure by arts commission -- Conditions) and 2005 c 36 s 3
& 1983 c 204 s 9.

--- END ---