BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.52.180 and 2011 c 60 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee may use or authorize the use
of facilities of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of
assisting a campaign for election of a person to an office or for the
promotion of or opposition to a ballot proposition. Knowing
acquiescence by a person with authority to direct, control, or
influence the actions of the state officer or state employee using
public resources in violation of this section constitutes a violation
of this section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not limited
to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state
employees of the agency during working hours, vehicles, office space,
publications of the agency, and clientele lists of persons served by
the agency.
(2) This section shall not apply to the following activities:
(a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose a ballot proposition as long as (i) required notice of the
meeting includes the title and number of the ballot proposition, and
(ii) members of the legislative body or members of the public are
afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;
(b) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in
response to a specific inquiry. For the purposes of this subsection,
it is not a violation of this section for an elected official to
respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to make
incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official
communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an
actual, measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards
shall adopt by rule a definition of measurable expenditure;
(c) The maintenance of official legislative web sites throughout
the year, regardless of pending elections. The web sites may contain
any discretionary material which was also specifically prepared for the
legislator in the course of his or her duties as a legislator,
including newsletters and press releases. ((The official legislative
web sites of legislators seeking reelection shall not be altered
between June 30th and November 15th of the election year.)) The web
site shall not be used for campaign purposes;
(d) Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of
the office or agency, regardless of whether or not an office holder is
running for election or reelection to office. The timing of pending
elections or campaigns must not operate to prohibit legislators from
producing materials, utilizing staff and other state resources,
attending functions, or engaging in all other legislative activities
properly associated with their office; and
(e) De minimis use of public facilities by statewide elected
officials and legislators incidental to the preparation or delivery of
permissible communications, including written and verbal communications
initiated by them of their views on ballot propositions that
foreseeably may affect a matter that falls within their constitutional
or statutory responsibilities.
(3) Newsletters are a vital means of communication between
legislators and their constituents, and open communication from a
legislator to those he or she serves is imperative to representative
democracy. As a result, members have complete discretionary control,
subject only to budget limitations, as to the content, text, language,
and format of newsletters. In no case may any newsletter content be
considered campaign activity for purposes of this chapter.
(4) As to state officers and employees, this section operates to
the exclusion of RCW 42.17A.555.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.52.185 and 2011 c 60 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) During the twelve-month period beginning on December 1st of the
year before a general election for a state legislator's election to
office and continuing through November 30th immediately after the
general election, the legislator may not mail, either by regular mail
or electronic mail, to a constituent at public expense a letter,
((newsletter,)) brochure, or other piece of literature, except as
follows:
(a) The legislator may mail two mailings of newsletters to
constituents. All newsletters within each mailing of newsletters must
be identical as to their content but not as to the constituent name or
address. ((One such mailing may be mailed no later than thirty days
after the start of a regular legislative session, except that a
legislator appointed during a regular legislative session to fill a
vacant seat may have up to thirty days from the date of appointment to
send out the first mailing. The other mailing may be mailed no later
than sixty days after the end of a regular legislative session.))
(b) The legislator may mail an individual letter to (i) an
individual constituent who has contacted the legislator regarding the
subject matter of the letter during the legislator's current term of
office; (ii) an individual constituent who holds a governmental office
with jurisdiction over the subject matter of the letter; or (iii) an
individual constituent who has received an award or honor of
extraordinary distinction of a type that is sufficiently infrequent to
be noteworthy to a reasonable person, including, but not limited to:
(A) An international or national award such as the Nobel prize or the
Pulitzer prize; (B) a state award such as Washington scholar; (C) an
Eagle Scout award; and (D) a Medal of Honor.
(c) In those cases where constituents have specifically indicated
that they would like to be contacted to receive regular or periodic
updates on legislative matters, legislators may provide such updates by
electronic mail throughout the legislative session and up until thirty
days from the conclusion of a legislative session.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, "legislator"
means a legislator who is a "candidate," as defined by RCW 42.17A.005,
for any public office.
(3) A violation of this section constitutes use of the facilities
of a public office for the purpose of assisting a campaign under RCW
42.52.180.
(4) The house of representatives and senate shall specifically
limit expenditures per member for the total cost of mailings. Those
costs include, but are not limited to, production costs, printing
costs, and postage costs. The limits imposed under this subsection
apply only to the total expenditures on mailings per member and not to
any categorical cost within the total.
(5) For purposes of this section, persons residing outside the
legislative district represented by the legislator are not considered
to be constituents, but students, military personnel, or others
temporarily employed outside of the district who normally reside in the
district are considered to be constituents.

--- END ---