BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that alcohol abuse
on college campuses is a problem of state and national significance
leading to increased risk of death, injury, and sexual assault.
According to a recent study, one thousand eight hundred twenty-five
college students between the ages of eighteen and twenty-four die from
alcohol-related unintentional injuries, including motor vehicle
crashes. Five hundred ninety-nine thousand students between the ages
of eighteen and twenty-four are unintentionally injured under the
influence of alcohol and ninety-seven thousand students between the
ages of eighteen and twenty-four are victims of alcohol-related sexual
assault or date rape. Students who abuse alcohol are more likely to
struggle academically, and over 3.3 million college students drive
under the influence.
(2) While the legislature passed RCW 2.28.175 providing for DUI
courts during the 2012 session, the legislature finds that college
campuses present specialized risk and opportunity to address alcohol
abuse. In order to give colleges, law enforcement, courts, students,
and families more options, the legislature finds that college DUI
courts would be helpful in combating this difficult social problem.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.28.175 and 2012 c 183 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Counties may establish and operate DUI courts. Municipalities
may enter into cooperative agreements with counties that have DUI
courts to provide DUI court services.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "DUI court" means a court
that has special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a reduction
in recidivism of impaired driving among nonviolent, alcohol abusing
offenders, whether adult or juvenile, by increasing their likelihood
for successful rehabilitation through early, continuous, and intense
judicially supervised treatment; mandatory periodic testing for alcohol
use and, if applicable, drug use; and the use of appropriate sanctions
and other rehabilitation services.
(3)(a) Any jurisdiction that seeks a state appropriation to fund a
DUI court program must first:
(i) Exhaust all federal funding that is available to support the
operations of its DUI court and associated services; and
(ii) Match, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, state moneys allocated
for DUI court programs with local cash or in-kind resources. Moneys
allocated by the state must be used to supplement, not supplant, other
federal, state, and local funds for DUI court operations and associated
services. However, until June 30, 2014, no match is required for state
moneys expended for the administrative and overhead costs associated
with the operation of a DUI court established as of January 1, 2011.
(b) Any jurisdiction that establishes a DUI court pursuant to this
section shall establish minimum requirements for the participation of
offenders in the program. The DUI court may adopt local requirements
that are more stringent than the minimum. The minimum requirements
are:
(i) The offender would benefit from alcohol treatment;
(ii) The offender has not previously been convicted of a serious
violent offense or sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, vehicular
homicide under RCW 46.61.520, vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522, or
an equivalent out-of-state offense; and
(iii) Without regard to whether proof of any of these elements is
required to convict, the offender is not currently charged with or
convicted of an offense:
(A) That is a sex offense;
(B) That is a serious violent offense;
(C) That is vehicular homicide or vehicular assault;
(D) During which the defendant used a firearm; or
(E) During which the defendant caused substantial or great bodily
harm or death to another person.
(4) Counties may establish and operate college DUI courts.
Municipalities may enter into cooperative agreements with counties that
have college DUI courts to provide college DUI court services. For the
purposes of this subsection, a college DUI court has the same meaning
and is subject to the same requirements as a DUI court in this section,
with the following additional criteria:
(a) Only students currently admitted to an institution of higher
education or colleges in the state are eligible to participate in a
college DUI court;
(b) College DUI courts may be physically located in appropriate
facilities on college campuses for the convenience of students,
judicial and law enforcement personnel, and college administration or
other participating or administering the college DUI courts; and
(c) In addition to the requirements imposed by an official
overseeing the college DUI courts, the institution of higher education
or college may also impose conditions pursuant to its student conduct
code on the student including, but not limited to, withholding a
diploma from the student until the student has successfully completed
a college DUI court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---