BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.92.080 and 2012 c 229 s 605 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except for opportunity internship graduates whose eligibility is
provided under RCW 28B.92.084, for a student to be eligible for a state
need grant a student must:
(1) Be a "needy student" or "disadvantaged student" as determined
by the office in accordance with RCW 28B.92.030 (((1))) (2) and (((4)))
(5);
(2) Have been domiciled within the state of Washington for at least
one year;
(3) Be enrolled or accepted for enrollment on at least a half-time
basis at an institution of higher education in Washington as defined in
RCW 28B.92.030(((3))) (4);
(4) Until June 30, ((2011, to the extent funds are specifically
appropriated for this purpose, and subject to any terms and conditions
specified in the omnibus appropriations act)) 2015, be enrolled or
accepted for enrollment for at least three quarter credits or the
equivalent semester credits at an institution of higher education in
Washington as defined in RCW 28B.92.030(((3))) (4); and
(5) Have complied with all the rules adopted by the council for the
administration of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The student achievement council shall
report to the legislature by December 1, 2013, regarding the number of
students enrolled in three to five credit-bearing quarter credits, or
the equivalent semester credits, and their academic progress including
degree completion.
(2) This section expires December 31, 2013.

--- END ---