BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature enacts this act to overrule
the Washington supreme court decision in Vern J. Oja and Assoc. v.
Washington Park Towers, Inc., 89 Wn.2d 72, 569 P.2d 1141 (1977), which
held that claims for damage to real property resulting from
construction activities on adjacent property do not accrue until the
construction project on the adjacent property is complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Actions for damage to real property resulting from
construction, alteration, or repair on an adjacent property, whether
alleging negligence, strict liability, trespass, or any other cause of
action, must be commenced within three years after the property owner
first discovered or reasonably should have discovered the damage.
(2) Nothing in this section may be construed as extending the
period for bringing a claim beyond the periods provided in RCW
4.16.300, 4.16.310, and 4.16.320.

--- END ---