BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.0491 and 2008 c 131 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Qualifying project" means a project designed to achieve job
creation or business retention, to add or upgrade nonelectrical
infrastructure, to add or upgrade health and safety facilities, to
accomplish energy and water use efficiency improvements, including
renewable energy development, or to add or upgrade emergency services
in any designated qualifying rural area.
(b) "Qualifying rural area" means:
(i) A rural county as defined in RCW 82.14.370; or
(ii) Any geographic area in the state that receives electricity
from a light and power business with twelve thousand or fewer
customers.
(c) "Electric utility rural economic development revolving fund"
means a fund devoted exclusively to funding qualifying projects in
qualifying rural areas.
(d) "Local board" is (i) a board of directors with at least, but
not limited to, three members representing local businesses and
community groups who have been appointed by the sponsoring electric
utility to oversee and direct the activities of the electric utility
rural economic development revolving fund; or (ii) a board of directors
of an existing associate development organization serving the
qualifying rural area who have been designated by the sponsoring
electrical utility to oversee and direct the activities of the electric
utility rural economic development revolving fund.
(2) A light and power business ((shall be)) is allowed a credit
against taxes due under this chapter in an amount equal to fifty
percent of contributions made in any fiscal year directly to an
electric utility rural economic development revolving fund. The credit
((shall)) must be taken in a form and manner as required by the
department. The credit under this section ((shall)) may not exceed
twenty-five thousand dollars per fiscal year per light and power
business. The credit may not exceed the tax that would otherwise be
due under this chapter. Refunds ((shall)) may not be granted in the
place of credits. Expenditures not used to earn a credit in one fiscal
year may not be used to earn a credit in subsequent years, except that
this limitation does not apply to expenditures made between January 1,
2004, and March 31, 2004, which expenditures may be used to earn a
credit through December 30, 2004.
(3) The right to earn tax credits under this section expires June
30, ((2011)) 2018.
(4) To qualify for the credit in subsection (2) of this section,
the light and power business ((shall)) must establish, or have a local
board establish with the business's contribution, an electric utility
rural economic development revolving fund which is governed by a local
board whose members ((shall)) must reside or work in the qualifying
rural area served by the light and power business. Expenditures from
the electric utility rural economic development revolving fund
((shall)) must be made solely on qualifying projects, and the local
board ((shall have)) has authority to determine all criteria and
conditions for the expenditure of funds from the electric utility rural
economic development revolving fund, and for the terms and conditions
of repayment.
(5) Any funds repaid to the electric utility rural economic
development revolving fund by recipients ((shall)) must be made
available for additional qualifying projects.
(6) If at any time the electric utility rural economic development
revolving fund is dissolved, any moneys claimed as a tax credit under
this section ((shall)) must either be granted to a qualifying project
or refunded to the state within two years of termination.
(7) The total amount of credits that may be used in any fiscal year
((shall)) may not exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars in any
fiscal year. The department ((shall)) must allow the use of earned
credits on a first-come, first-served basis. Unused earned credits may
be carried over to subsequent years.
(8) The following provisions apply to expenditures under subsection
(2) of this section made between January 1, 2004, and March 31, 2004:
(a) Credits earned from such expenditures are not considered in
computing the statewide limitation set forth in subsection (7) of this
section for the period July 1, 2004, through December 31, 2004; and
(b) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, the credit allowed
under this section for light and power businesses making expenditures
is limited to thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars.

--- END ---