BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 101 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,757,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,561,000))
$6,680,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,318,000))
$13,437,000

Sec. 102 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,504,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000
Judicial Information System Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,004,000))
$3,025,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $50,000 of the judicial information system
account--state appropriation is provided solely to evaluate the state
law library and assess its operational structure to determine the most
effective delivery model for providing library services.

Sec. 103 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,275,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,168,000))
$15,246,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,443,000))
$30,521,000

Sec. 104 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,725,000))
$50,726,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,429,000))
$48,644,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,532,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,362,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,954,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($150,392,000))
$150,608,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,399,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for school districts for petitions
to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030
and 28A.225.035. The office of the administrator for the courts shall
develop an interagency agreement with the superintendent of public
instruction to allocate the funding provided in this subsection.
Allocation of this money to school districts shall be based on the
number of petitions filed. This funding includes amounts school
districts may expend on the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW
28A.225.030 by certified mail or by personal service or for the
performance of service of process for any hearing associated with RCW
28A.225.030.
(2)(a) $8,252,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $7,313,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for distribution
to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing
truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions.
The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile
court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution
formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than
average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties
with lower than average per-petition processing costs.
(b) Each fiscal year during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives and senate ways and means committees no
later than 60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are deemed
informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing
funds.
(3) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions
from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to
section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs
for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW
43.135.060.
(4) $265,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the office of public guardianship to
provide guardianship services for low-income incapacitated persons.
(5) $1,178,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for replacing computer equipment at
state courts and state judicial agencies.
(6) No later than September 30, 2011, the judicial information
systems committee shall provide a report to the legislature on the
recommendations of the case management feasibility study, including
plans for a replacement of the superior court management information
system (SCOMIS) and plans for completing the data exchange core system
component consistent with a complete data exchange standard. No later
than December 31, 2011, the judicial information systems committee
shall provide a report to the legislature on the status of the data
exchange, the procurement process for a SCOMIS replacement, and a case
management system that is designed to meet the requirements approved by
the superior courts and county clerks of all thirty-nine counties. The
legislature shall solicit input on both reports from judicial,
legislative, and executive stakeholders.
(7) In order to gather better data on juveniles in the criminal
justice system, the administrative office of the courts shall modify
the judgment and sentence form for juvenile and adult sentences to
include one or more check boxes indicating whether (a) the adult
superior court had original jurisdiction for a defendant who was
younger than eighteen years of age at the time the case was filed; (b)
the case was originally filed in juvenile court but transferred to
adult superior court jurisdiction; or (c) the case was originally filed
in adult superior court or transferred to adult superior court but then
returned to the juvenile court.
(8) $540,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the office of public guardianship
to continue guardianship services for those low-income incapacitated
persons who were receiving services on June 30, 2012.
(9) The Washington association of juvenile court administrators and
the juvenile rehabilitation administration, in consultation with the
community juvenile accountability act advisory committee and the
Washington state institute for public policy, shall analyze and review
data elements available from the administrative office of the courts
for possible integration into the evidence-based program quality
assurance plans and processes. The administrative office of the
courts, the Washington association of juvenile court administrators,
and the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall provide
information necessary to complete the review and analysis. The
Washington association of juvenile court administrators and the
juvenile rehabilitation administration shall report the findings of
their review and analysis, as well as any recommendations, to the
legislature by December 1, 2012.

Sec. 105 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,047,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,612,000))
$9,890,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,326,000
Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,074,000))
$7,185,000
Charitable Organization Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $362,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,516,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,284,000
Washington State Heritage Center Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,028,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,249,000))
$71,638,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,898,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2)(a) $1,847,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $1,926,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2011-2013 biennium. The funding
level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount
provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be
required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions,
in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state
contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or
partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been
satisfactorily documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and
Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to
the funding for the library as a whole.

Sec. 106 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,758,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,690,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,015,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $968,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($197,375,000))
$197,412,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,129,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($222,205,000))
$222,242,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the
legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management,
the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing
the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown
by division of division administration expenses.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on ways and means.
(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements
and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the
nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for
the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed
electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The
report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.
(4) The attorney general shall enter into an interagency agreement
with the department of social and health services for expenditure of
the state's proceeds from the cy pres settlement in State of Washington
v. AstraZeneca (Seroquel) for the purposes set forth in sections 204
and 213 of this act.
(5) $62,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1770
(state purchasing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $5,924,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2123
(workers' compensation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) The office of the attorney general is authorized to expend
$2,100,000 from the Zyprexa and other cy pres awards towards consumer
protection costs in accordance with uses authorized in the court
orders.
(8) $96,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5076
(financial institutions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $99,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5769 (coal-fired generation). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(10) $416,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5801 (industrial insurance system). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $31,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5021 (election campaign disclosure). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(12) The executive ethics board shall: (a) Develop a statewide
plan, with performance measures, to provide overall direction and
accountability in all executive branch agencies and statewide elected
offices; (b) coordinate and work with the commission on judicial
conduct and the legislative ethics board; (c) assess and evaluate each
agency's ethical culture through employee and stakeholder surveys,
review Washington state quality award feedback reports, and publish an
annual report on the results to the public; and (d) solicit outside
evaluations, studies, and recommendations for improvements from
academics, nonprofit organizations, the public disclosure commission,
or other entities with expertise in ethics, integrity, and the public
sector.
(13) $11,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2301
(boxing, martial arts, wrestling). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $56,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2319
(affordable care act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $5,743,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the legal costs associated with the
evaluation, filing, prosecution, response to petitions for release, and
appeal of sexually violent predator civil commitment cases, as provided
in chapter 71.09 RCW. Within the amount provided in this subsection,
the attorney general may enter into an interagency agreement with a
county prosecutor to perform prosecution services pursuant to chapter
71.09 RCW.
(16) $94,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6103
(reflexology and massage therapy). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $57,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6237 (medical assistants). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(18) If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5978 (medicaid fraud)
is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts appropriated in this
section from the medicaid fraud penalty account--state appropriation
shall lapse and an additional $730,000 shall be appropriated from the
general fund--state for fiscal year 2013 for fraud detection and
prevention activities, recovery of improper payments, and for other
medicaid fraud enforcement activities.
(19) $56,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2592
(extended foster care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) $65,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6406 (state natural resources). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 107 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,277,000))
$1,275,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,180,000))
$1,182,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,457,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section include funding for
activities transferred from the sentencing guidelines commission to the
caseload forecast council pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5891 (criminal justice cost savings). Prior to the effective date
of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5891, the appropriations in
this section may be expended for the continued operations and expenses
of the sentencing guidelines commission pursuant to the expenditure
authority schedule produced by the office of financial management in
accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate
Bill No. 5304 (college bound scholarship).

Sec. 108 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,799,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($72,839,000))
$62,889,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $340,184,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,036,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,733,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $437,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,000))
$101,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Home Security Fund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,007,000
Affordable Housing for All Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,899,000
County Research Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $540,000
Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes Investigation
and Prosecution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,166,000))
$969,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,427,000))
$1,186,000
City and Town Research Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,577,000

Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,781,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,444,000
Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $748,000
Washington Community Technology Opportunity Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $713,000
Liquor Revolving Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,802,000))
$3,032,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($541,296,000))
$530,174,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance
program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall
be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account
balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans,
and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed
under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the
terms included in the original loan agreements.
(2) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a grant to resolution
Washington to building statewide capacity for alternative dispute
resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that
citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to
litigation.
(3) $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior
volunteer program.
(4) The department shall administer its growth management act
technical assistance so that smaller cities receive proportionately
more assistance than larger cities or counties.
(5) $1,800,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided for transitional housing assistance or partial payments for
rental assistance under the independent youth housing program.
(6) $5,000,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
for the operation, repair, and staffing of shelters in the homeless
family shelter program.
(7) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans
program.
(8) $2,949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for associate development
organizations.
(9) $127,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1886
(Ruckelshaus center process). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) Up to $200,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation is for a grant to the Washington tourism alliance for the
maintenance of the Washington state tourism web site
www.experiencewa.com and its related sub-sites. The department may
transfer ownership of the web site and other tourism promotion assets
and assign obligations to the Washington tourism alliance for purposes
of tourism promotion throughout the state. The alliance may use the
assets only in a manner consistent with the purposes for which they
were created. Any revenue generated from these assets must be used by
the alliance for the sole purposes of statewide Washington tourism
promotion. The legislature finds that the Washington tourism alliance,
a not-for-profit, 501.c.6 organization established, funded, and
governed by Washington tourism industry stakeholders to sustain
destination tourism marketing across Washington, is an appropriate body
to receive funding and assets from and assume obligations of the
department for the purposes described in this section.
(11) Within the appropriations in this section, specific funding is
provided to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5741 (economic
development commission).
(12) $2,000,000 of the community and economic development fee
account appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce
for services to homeless families through the Washington families fund.
(13) $234,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $233,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington asset building
coalitions.
(14) $1,859,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,859,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for innovative research teams,
also known as entrepreneurial STARS, at higher education research
institutions, and for entrepreneurs-in-residence programs at higher
education research institutions and entrepreneurial assistance
organizations. Of these amounts no more than $50,000 in fiscal year
2012 and no more than $50,000 in fiscal year 2013 may be provided for
the operation of entrepreneurs-in-residence programs at entrepreneurial
assistance organizations external to higher education research
institutions.
(15) Up to $700,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation is for pass-through grants to cities in central Puget
Sound to plan for transfer of development rights receiving areas under
the central Puget Sound regional transfer of development rights
program.
(16) $16,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely to implement section 503 of Substitute
House Bill No. 1277 (licensed settings for vulnerable adults). The
long-term care ombudsman shall convene an adult family home quality
assurance panel to review problems concerning the quality of care for
residents in adult family homes. If Substitute House Bill No. 1277
(licensed settings for vulnerable adults) is not enacted by June 30,
2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $19,605,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $39,527,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for
establishment of the essential needs and housing support program
created in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2082 (essential needs
and assistance program). The department of commerce shall contract for
these services with counties or community-based organizations involved
in providing essential needs and housing supports to low-income persons
who meet eligibility pursuant to Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2082. The department shall limit the funding used for administration
of the program to no more than five percent. Counties and community
providers shall limit the funding used for administration of the
program to no more than seven percent.
(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $4,000,000 is
provided solely for essential needs to clients who meet the eligibility
established in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2082. Counties and
community-based organizations shall distribute basic essential products
in a manner that prevents abuse. To the greatest extent possible, the
counties or community-based organizations shall leverage local or
private funds, and volunteer support to acquire and distribute the
basic essential products.
(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $55,000,000 is
provided solely for housing support services to individuals who are
homeless or who may become homeless, and are eligible for services
under this program pursuant to Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2082.
(18) $4,380,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to provide homeless housing services
in accordance with Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2048 (housing
assistance surcharges). If Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2048
(housing assistance surcharges) is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the developmental disabilities council
to contract for a family-to-family mentor program to provide
information and support to families and guardians of persons who are
transitioning out of residential habilitation centers. To the maximum
extent allowable under federal law, these funds shall be matched under
medicaid through the department of social and health services and
federal funds shall be transferred to the department for the purposes
stated in this subsection.
(20) $2,802,000 of the liquor revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to contract with
the municipal research and services center of Washington.
(21) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for deposit in the shelter to housing
project account, hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer
as a nonappropriated account. The department may expend funds from the
account solely for a two-year pilot project to enable young adults to
move from temporary emergency shelter housing to transitional and
permanent housing throughout King county. The pilot project will be
administered under contract with the YMCA of greater Seattle in
collaboration with the rising out of the shadows young adult shelter.
Funding may be used for case management, housing subsidy,
transportation, shelter services, training and evaluation. The pilot
project and the shelter to housing project account expire December 31,
2014.
(22) $12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5292 (irrigation and port districts). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(23) $100,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the department to provide analysis and an advisory
opinion on whether a proposed electric generation project or
conservation resource qualifies to meet mandatory conservation targets
in accordance with Substitute Senate Bill No. 6414 (review
process/utilities). The department is authorized to require an
applicant to pay an application fee to cover the cost of reviewing the
project and preparing an advisory opinion. If Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6414 (review process/utilities) is not enacted by June 30, 2012,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 109 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,369,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,584,000))
$18,678,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,530,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,370,000
Performance Audits of Government Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $198,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000
Department of Personnel Services--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,551,000
Data Processing Revolving Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,910,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,537,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,429,000))
$86,523,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill
No. 1178 (regulatory assistance office). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the office of financial management to
contract with an independent consultant to evaluate and recommend the
most cost-effective provision of services required to support the
department of social and health services special commitment center on
McNeil Island. The evaluation shall include island operation services
that include, but are not limited to: (a) Marine transport of
passengers and goods; (b) wastewater treatment; (c) fire protection and
suppression; (d) electrical supply; (e) water supply; and (f) road
maintenance.
The office of financial management shall solicit the input of
Pierce county, the department of corrections, and the department of
social and health services in developing the request for proposal,
evaluating applications, and directing the evaluation. The consultant
shall report to the governor and legislature by November 15, 2011.
(3) $100,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the office of financial management
to prepare a report to be used to initiate a comprehensive, long-range
planning process for the future of McNeil Island during the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium.
(a) The report on the initiation of the process must document:
(i) Ownership issues, including consultation with the federal
government about its current legal requirements associated with the
island;
(ii) Federal and state decision-making processes to change use or
ownership;
(iii) Tribal treaty interests;
(iv) Fish and wildlife species and their habitats;
(v) Land use and public safety needs;
(vi) Recreational opportunities for the general public;
(vii) Historic and archaeological resources; and
(viii) Revenue from and necessary to support potential future uses
of the island.
(b) The report shall develop and recommend a comprehensive, long-range planning process for the future of the island and associated
aquatic resources, addressing the items in (a) of this subsection.
(c) The office of financial management may use its own staff and
other public agency and tribal staff or contract for services, and may
create a work group of knowledgeable agencies, organizations, and
individuals to assist in preparing the report.
(d) The office of financial management shall engage in broad
consultation with interested parties, including, but not limited to:
(i) Federal agencies with relevant responsibilities;
(ii) Tribal governments;
(iii) State agencies;
(iv) Local governments and communities in the area, including the
Anderson Island community, Steilacoom, and Pierce county; and
(v) Interested private organizations and individuals.
(e) The report must be submitted to the governor and appropriate
committees of the legislature by October 1, 2012.
(4) The appropriations in this section include funding for
activities transferred from the sentencing guidelines commission to the
office of financial management pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5891 (criminal justice cost savings). Prior to the effective
date of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5891, the appropriations
in this section may be expended for the continued operations and
expenses of the sentencing guidelines commission pursuant to the
expenditure authority schedule produced by the office of financial
management in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.
(((6))) (5) $115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2483 (higher education coordination). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((7))) (6)(a) The office of financial management shall determine
if cost savings can be achieved by the state through contracting for
interpreter services more effectively. The office of financial
management must work with all state agencies that use interpreter
services to determine:
(i) How agencies currently procure interpreter services;
(ii) To what degree brokers or foreign language agencies are used
in the acquisition of interpreter services; and
(iii) The cost of interpreter services as currently provided.
(b) The office of financial management, in consultation with the
department of enterprise services, must also examine approaches to
procuring interpreter services, including using the department of
enterprise services' master contract, limiting overhead costs
associated with interpreter contracts, and direct scheduling of
interpreters. The report must include recommendations for the state to
procure services in a more consistent and cost-effective manner.
(c) The office of financial management, in consultation with the
department of labor and industries, must determine the impact that any
alternative approach to procuring interpreter services will have on
medical providers.
(d) The report must include:
(i) Analysis of the current process for procuring interpreter
services;
(ii) Recommendations regarding options to make obtaining
interpreter services more consistent and cost-effective; and
(iii) Estimates for potential cost savings.
(e) The office of financial management must report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2012.
(((8))) (7) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $225,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementation of House
Bill No. 2824 (education funding). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 110 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 136 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,511,000))
$46,591,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $146,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of House Bill No. 2070 (state and local
government employees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $65,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of House Bill No. 1625 (plan 3 default
investment option). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $133,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1981 as
amended (post-retirement employment). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $15,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative
costs associated with implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2021
(plan 1 annual increase amounts). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2011, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(5) $32,000 of the department of retirement systems -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5159 (state
patrol retirement system service credit). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 111 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,691,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,207,000))
$99,268,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,900,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,000
Waste Tire Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
Master License Fund--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,922,000
Vehicle License Fraud Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Performance Audits of Government Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,188,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($223,150,000))
$223,211,000

Sec. 112 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 139 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,654,000))
$3,754,000

Sec. 113 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 142 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,063,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,838,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $945,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,871,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The legislature intends to facilitate the orderly transition of
liquor services as required by Initiative Measure No. 1183. For liquor
control board employees that remain through June 15, 2012, a temporary
opportunity to cash out sick leave is provided to assist the unique
challenges to the liquor control board and its employees posed by this
transition.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section from the liquor
revolving account--state appropriation, liquor control board employees
who: (a) Occupy positions in the job classifications provided in
subsection (3)(c) of this section that will be eliminated after the
liquor control board ceases to distribute liquor; and (b) remain as
liquor control board employees through June 15, 2012, and who separate
from service due to lay off by October 1, 2012, may elect to receive
remuneration for their entire sick leave balance at a rate equal to one
day's current monetary compensation of the employee for each four full
days of accrued sick leave.
(3) The following conditions apply to sick leave cash out under
this subsection:
(a) The rate of monetary compensation for the purposes of this
subsection shall not be reduced by any temporary salary reduction;
(b) Remuneration or benefits received under this subsection shall
not be included for the purpose of computing a retirement allowance
under any public retirement system in this state;
(c) The following job classifications are eligible:
(i) Liquor store clerk;
(ii) Retail assistant store manager 1;
(iii) Retail assistant store manager 2;
(iv) Retail store manager 3;
(v) Retail store manager 4;
(vi) Retail district manager;
(vii) Retail operations manager;
(viii) Director of retail services;
(ix) Director of distribution center;
(x) Director of purchasing;
(xi) Director of business enterprise;
(xii) Warehouse operator 1;
(xiii) Warehouse operator 2;
(xiv) Warehouse operator 3; and
(xv) Warehouse operator 4; and
(d) Should the legislature revoke any remuneration or benefits
granted under this section, an affected employee shall not be entitled
thereafter to receive such benefits as a matter of contractual right.
(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section from the liquor
revolving account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, up to
$946,000 may be used by the liquor control board to implement
Initiative Measure No. 502.

Sec. 114 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $502,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,166,000
Public Service Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,872,000))
$30,928,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,183,000))
$3,186,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,844,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,567,000))
$48,626,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In accordance with RCW 80.36.610(1), the utilities and
transportation commission is authorized to establish federal
telecommunications act services fees in fiscal year 2012 as necessary
to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation
levels in this section.
(2) $15,000 of the pipeline safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1634 (underground utilities).
(3) $182,000 of the public service revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5769 (coal-fired generation).
(4) $169,000 of the public service revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5034 (private infrastructure).

Sec. 115 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 144 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,116,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,872,000))
$6,938,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($159,075,000))
$159,114,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,620,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,119,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,368,000
Military Department Rent and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $615,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,163,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($338,948,000))
$339,053,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $18,018,000 of the disaster response account -- state
appropriation and $66,266,000 of the disaster response account--federal
appropriation may be spent only on disasters declared by the governor
and with the approval of the office of financial management. The
military department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees on October 1st and
February 1st of each year detailing information on the disaster
response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into
the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting
date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2011-2013
biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.
(2) $75,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee; and
(b) The department shall submit an annual report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; and incremental changes from the
previous estimate.

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 201 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the
department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as
expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications
permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be
used for other than that purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3)(a) The health care authority and the department are authorized
to develop an integrated health care program designed to slow the
progression of illness and disability and better manage medicaid
expenditures for the aged and disabled population. Under the
Washington medicaid integration partnership (WMIP) and the medicare
integrated care project (MICP), the health care authority and the
department may combine and transfer such medicaid funds appropriated
under sections 204, 206, 208, and 213 of this act as may be necessary
to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP and the MICP program
enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 6,000 persons, nor expand beyond one county during the
2011-2013 fiscal biennium. The amount of funding assigned from each
program may not exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act
for individuals covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the
health condition of persons enrolled, times the number of clients
enrolled. In implementing the WMIP and the MICP, the health care
authority and the department may: (i) Withhold from calculations of
"available resources" as set forth in RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the
capitated rate for enrolled individuals; and (ii) employ capitation
financing and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health
care service contractors licensed by the office of the insurance
commissioner and qualified to participate in both the medicaid and
medicare programs. The health care authority and the department shall
conduct an evaluation of the WMIP by October 15, 2012, and of the MICP
measuring changes in participant health outcomes, changes in patterns
of service utilization, participant satisfaction, participant access to
services, and the state fiscal impact.
(b) ((Effective January 1, 2013,)) If Washington has been selected
to participate in ((phase two)) a financial capitation model of the
federal demonstration project for persons dually-eligible for both
medicare and medicaid, the department and the authority may initiate
the MICP. Participation in the project shall be limited to persons who
are eligible for both medicare and medicaid and to counties in which
the county legislative authority has agreed to the terms and conditions
under which it will operate. The purpose of the project shall be to
demonstrate and evaluate ways to improve care while reducing state
expenditures for persons enrolled both in medicare and medicaid. To
that end, prior to initiating the project, the department and the
authority shall assure that state expenditures shall be no greater on
either a per person or total basis than the state would otherwise
incur. Individuals who are solely eligible for medicaid may also
participate if their participation is agreed to by the health care
authority, the department, and the county legislative authority.
(4) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as
calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this
act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by
efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality
services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care
and services are available to the extent that such care and services
are available to the general population in the geographic area. The
legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal
government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input
constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.
(5) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the
same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for
social services appointments as the one established for medical
appointments in section 213 of this act. When contracting directly
with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the
department shall only contract with language access providers who are
working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or
state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available,
the department may use a language access provider who meets other
certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including
interpreters in other states.
(6)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2012)) 2013,
unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year ((2012)) 2013 among
programs after approval by the director of financial management.
However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in
(b) of this subsection.
(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are
insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year
((2012)) 2013 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the
long-term care, foster care, adoptions support, medicaid personal care,
and child support programs, the department may transfer state moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department shall
not transfer funds, and the director of financial management shall not
approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the
objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the
expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall
notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment
modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written
notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of
the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and
appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or
transfers.

Sec. 202 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $287,014,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($285,018,000))
$280,999,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($479,315,000))
$476,350,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,354,000))
$1,804,000
Home Security Fund--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,741,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,240,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $725,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,065,407,000))
$1,058,873,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.
(2) $668,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $668,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to contract for the operation of
one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide
residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive,
or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of
consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children
from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and
adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department
shall not require case management as a condition of the contract. The
department shall collaborate with the pediatric interim care center to
determine if and how the center could be appropriately incorporated
into the performance-based contract model and report its findings to
the legislature by December 1, 2012.
(3)(a) $80,887,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, (($81,067,000)) $80,981,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and (($74,800,000))
$74,733,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for services for children and families. The amounts provided in
this section shall be allotted on a monthly basis and expenditures
shall not exceed allotments based on a three month rolling average
without approval of the office of financial management following
notification to the legislative fiscal committees.
(b) The department shall use these services to safely reduce the
number of children in out-of-home care, safely reduce the time spent in
out-of-home care prior to achieving permanency, and safely reduce the
number of children returning to out-of-home care following permanency.
The department shall provide an initial report to the legislature and
the governor by January 15, 2012, regarding the start-up costs
associated with performance-based contracts under RCW 74.13.360 .
(c) Of the amounts provided in (a) of this subsection, $579,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 and $109,000
of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for a
receiving care center east of the Cascade mountains.
(4) $176,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $177,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, $656,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation,
$253,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, and $725,000 of
the education legacy trust account--state appropriation are provided
solely for children's administration to contract with an educational
advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach.
The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted
education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12
and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during
the transition to performance based contracts. Funding shall be
prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth and/or
regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested
educational outreach services exist. The department shall utilize
private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.
(5) $670,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $670,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for services provided through
children's advocacy centers.
(6) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds
appropriated in this section as required by RCW 74.13A.005 and
74.13A.020, the secretary shall not set the amount of any adoption
assistance payment or payments, made pursuant to RCW 26.33.320 and
74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080, to more than ninety percent of the
foster care maintenance payment for that child had he or she remained
in a foster family home during the same period. This subsection does
not apply to adoption assistance agreements in existence on the
effective date of this section.
(7) $10,741,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract for services pursuant to
RCW 13.32A.030 and 74.15.220. The department shall contract and
collaborate with service providers in a manner that maintains the
availability and geographic representation of secure and semi-secure
crisis residential centers and HOPE centers. To achieve efficiencies
and increase utilization, the department shall allow the co-location of
these centers, except that a youth may not be placed in a secure
facility or the secure portion of a co-located facility except as
specifically authorized by chapter 13.32A RCW. The reductions to
appropriations in this subsection related to semi-secure crisis
residential centers reflect a reduction to the number of beds for semi-secure crisis residential centers and not a reduction in rates. Any
secure crisis residential center or semi-secure crisis residential
center bed reduction shall not be based solely upon bed utilization.
The department is to exercise its discretion in reducing the number of
beds but to do so in a manner that maintains availability and
geographic representation of semi-secure and secure crisis residential
centers.
(8) $47,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $14,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $40,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1697 (dependency
system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $564,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1128 (extended
foster care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $799,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 and $799,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2264 (child welfare/contracting). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(11) $178,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2592 (extended foster care). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 and $616,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6555 (child protective services). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2012, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 and $53,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for staffing costs associated with implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2536 (children
services/delivery). The amounts provided in this subsection must be
used for coordinated evidence-based practice implementation amongst the
department's programs providing mental health, child welfare, and
juvenile justice services to children.

Sec. 203 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,723,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,258,000))
$85,971,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,809,000))
$3,808,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,903,000))
$1,904,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,801,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($179,690,000))
$180,403,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $2,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in
this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and
shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $3,482,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $3,482,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement community juvenile
accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile
code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection may be used solely
for community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the
grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.
(4) $1,130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance
abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive
basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist
counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $3,123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $3,123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile
courts for the following programs identified by the Washington state
institute for public policy (institute) in its October 2006 report:
"Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Functional
family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression replacement training
and interagency coordination programs, or other programs with a
positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. County
juvenile courts shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration for funding for program-specific participation and the
administration shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the
per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.
(6) $1,537,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,537,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for expansion of the following
treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration
programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy
in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to
Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime
Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family integrated
transitions, and aggression replacement training, or other programs
with a positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. The
administration may concentrate delivery of these treatments and
therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in
a cost-effective manner.
(7)(a) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall administer
a block grant, rather than categorical funding, of consolidated
juvenile service funds, community juvenile accountability act grants,
the chemical dependency disposition alternative funds, the mental
health disposition alternative, and the sentencing disposition
alternative for the purpose of serving youth adjudicated in the
juvenile justice system. In making the block grant, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall follow the following formula and
will prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives
and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in
conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years
old; (ii) fifteen percent for moderate and high-risk youth; (iii)
twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv)
seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three
percent for the chemical dependency disposition alternative; and (vi)
two percent for the mental health and sentencing dispositional
alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition
alternative (SSODA) shall not be included in the block grant, but
allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding
for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the
block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when
approved by the juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile
courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee,
based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state
institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.
(b) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall phase the
implementation of the formula provided in subsection (1) of this
section by including a stop-loss formula of five percent in fiscal year
2012 and five percent in fiscal year 2013.
(c) The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile
courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight
committee with equal representation from the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee
is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding
formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current
available information. The committee will be cochaired by the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts, who will also
have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to
achieve its purpose. Initial members will include one juvenile court
representative from the finance committee, the community juvenile
accountability act committee, the risk assessment quality assurance
committee, the executive board of the Washington association of
juvenile court administrators, the Washington state center for court
research, and a representative of the superior court judges
association; two representatives from the juvenile rehabilitation
administration headquarters program oversight staff, two
representatives of the juvenile rehabilitation administration regional
office staff, one representative of the juvenile rehabilitation
administration fiscal staff and a juvenile rehabilitation
administration division director. The committee may make changes to
the formula categories other than the evidence-based program and
disposition alternative categories if it is determined the changes will
increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based
program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost benefit
savings to the state. Long-term cost benefit must be considered.
Percentage changes may occur in the evidence-based program or
disposition alternative categories of the formula should it be
determined the changes will increase evidence-based program or
disposition alternative delivery and increase the cost benefit to the
state. These outcomes will also be considered in determining when
evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition
alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left
separate.
(d) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts
shall be responsible for collecting and distributing information and
providing access to the data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the Washington state institute for public policy
related to program and outcome data. The juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the juvenile courts will work collaboratively to
develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost benefit to
the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and
disposition alternatives.
(8) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts
shall collect and distribute information related to program outcome and
provide access to these data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and Washington state institute for public policy.
Consistent with chapter 13.50 RCW, all confidentiality agreements
necessary to implement this information-sharing shall be approved
within 30 days of the effective date of this section. The agreements
between administrative office of the courts, the juvenile courts, and
the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall be executed to ensure
that the juvenile rehabilitation administration receives the data that
the juvenile rehabilitation administration identifies as needed to
comply with this subsection. This includes, but is not limited to,
information by program at the statewide aggregate level, individual
court level, and individual client level for the purpose of the
juvenile rehabilitation administration providing quality assurance and
oversight for the locally committed youth block grant and associated
funds and at times as specified by the juvenile rehabilitation
administration as necessary to carry out these functions. The data
shall be provided in a manner that reflects the collaborative work the
juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile courts have
developed regarding program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost
benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices
and disposition alternatives.
(9) The Washington association of juvenile court administrators and
the juvenile rehabilitation administration, in consultation with the
community juvenile accountability act advisory committee and the
Washington state institute for public policy, shall analyze and review
data elements available from the administrative office of the courts
for possible integration into the evidence-based program quality
assurance plans and processes. The administrative office of the
courts, the Washington association of juvenile court administrators,
and the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall provide
information necessary to complete the review and analysis. The
Washington association of juvenile court administrators and the
juvenile rehabilitation administration shall report the findings of
their review and analysis, as well as any recommendations, to the
legislature by December 1, 2012.

Sec. 204 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH
PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $317,734,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($324,319,000))
$324,986,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($449,593,000))
$448,911,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,864,000
Hospital Safety Net Assessment Fund--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,251,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,114,761,000))
$1,114,746,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $109,342,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $109,341,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for persons and
services not covered by the medicaid program. This is a reduction of
$4,348,000 each fiscal year from the nonmedicaid funding that was
allocated for expenditure by regional support networks during fiscal
year 2011 prior to supplemental budget reductions. This $4,348,000
reduction shall be distributed among regional support networks
proportional to each network's share of the total state population. To
the extent possible, levels of regional support network spending shall
be maintained in the following priority order: (i) Crisis and
commitment services; (ii) community inpatient services; and (iii)
residential care services, including personal care and emergency
housing assistance.
(b) $6,590,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $6,590,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $7,620,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department and regional
support networks to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In
determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided
to regional support networks with PACT teams, the department shall
consider the differences between regional support networks in the
percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that
are not reimbursable under medicaid. The department may allow regional
support networks which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are
higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section
to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under
section 204(1)(a) of this act. The department and regional support
networks shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the
PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this
section.
(c) $5,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $5,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $1,300,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the western Washington regional
support networks to provide either community- or hospital campus-based
services for persons who require the level of care previously provided
by the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) at western state
hospital.
(d) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The
number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support
networks at western state hospital shall be 557 per day.
(e) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(g) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly,
rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for
children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(h) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to continue performance-based
incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services
for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the
state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative.
These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support
services provided by regional support networks through other state and
federal funding.
(i) $1,125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Spokane regional support
network to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at
eastern state hospital. Such services shall include:
(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high
utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;
(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the
community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient
care or jail services;
(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to
individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating
those individuals; and
(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.
At least annually, the Spokane regional support network shall
assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at
eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally
effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.
(j) $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane
counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the
state psychiatric hospitals.
(k) Regional support networks may use local funds to earn
additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate
does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate
range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide
medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients.
Additionally, regional support networks may use a portion of the state
funds allocated in accordance with (a) of this subsection to earn
additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application
of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of
crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and
outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for
medicaid.
(l) Given the recent approval of federal medicaid matching funds
for the disability lifeline and the alcohol and drug abuse treatment
support act programs, the department shall charge regional support
networks for only the state share rather than the total cost of
community psychiatric hospitalization for persons enrolled in those
programs.
(m) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $1,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to adjust regional support network capitation rates
to account for the per diem rates actually paid for psychiatric care
provided at hospitals participating in the certified public expenditure
program operated pursuant to section 213 of this act.
(n) The appropriations in this section reflect efficiencies to be
achieved through voluntary consolidation of regional support networks
in accordance with Substitute House Bill No. 2139 (regional support
networks). Voluntary consolidation of regional support networks is
expected to result in administrative efficiencies and maximize dollars
available for direct services to individuals with mental illnesses
without corresponding increases in state appropriations.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,017,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($112,603,000))
$118,538,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($153,618,000))
$151,154,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,325,000))
$64,594,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($448,563,000))
$449,303,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a community partnership
between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support
community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding
western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(b)
are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time
community service officer at the city of Lakewood.
(c) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state
hospital and adjacent areas.
(d) $20,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $20,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to maintain staffed capacity to
serve an average daily census in forensic wards at western state
hospital of 270 patients per day.
(e) The appropriations in this section reflect efficiencies to be
achieved through enactment of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6492
(competency to stand trial). These efficiencies are expected to enable
the hospitals to substantially increase the timeliness with which
evaluations of defendant competency to stand trial are completed, and
treatment to restore competency is initiated, without corresponding
increases in state appropriations.
(f) $56,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 and $52,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for staffing costs associated with implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2536 (children
services/delivery). The amounts provided in this subsection must be
used for coordinated evidence-based practice implementation amongst the
department's programs providing mental health, child welfare, and
juvenile justice services to children.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,148,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,276,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,198,000))
$5,198,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,322,000))
$8,322,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $1,161,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,161,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for children's evidence-based
mental health services. Funding is sufficient to continue serving
children at the same levels as fiscal year 2009.
(b) $700,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence-based
practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and
implementation of evidence-based or promising practices for serving
children and youth with mental health disorders. The department shall
enter into an interagency agreement with the office of the attorney
general for expenditure of $700,000 of the state's proceeds of the cy
pres settlement in State of Washington v. AstraZeneca (Seroquel) for
this purpose.
(c) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 and $89,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to contract with the University of
Washington's evidence-based practice institute and the Washington state
institute for public policy to consult with the department and the
health care authority on the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2536 (children services/delivery). The
department's programs responsible for administration of mental health,
child welfare, and juvenile justice programs will coordinate with the
health care authority on the development of contract terms which
facilitate efforts to meet requirements of the bill. If Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 2536 (children services/delivery) is
not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,482,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,247,000))
$4,161,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,210,000))
$7,128,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $446,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,385,000))
$16,217,000

(a) The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: In accordance with RCW
43.20B.110, 43.135.055, and 71.24.035, the department is authorized to
increase license and certification fees in fiscal years 2012 and 2013
to support the costs of the regulatory program. The fee schedule
increases must be developed so that the maximum amount of additional
fees paid by providers statewide in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium is
$446,000. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates
for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the
department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to
those of the department, including but not limited to the joint
commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the
commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the
council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with
regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for
organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower
costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations
which are not accredited.
(b) $19,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $17,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $34,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to support a partnership among the department of social
and health services, the department of health, and agencies that
deliver medical care and behavioral health services in Cowlitz county.
The partnership shall identify and recommend strategies for resolving
regulatory, licensing, data management, reporting, and funding barriers
to more effective integration of primary medical and behavioral health
care services in the county.

Sec. 205 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $405,412,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($420,327,000))
$413,729,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($752,059,000))
$745,186,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $184,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,577,982,000))
$1,564,511,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) Amounts appropriated in this subsection reflect a reduction to
funds appropriated for in-home care. The department shall reduce the
number of in-home hours authorized. The reduction shall be scaled
based on the acuity level of care recipients. The largest hour
reductions shall be to lower acuity patients and the smallest hour
reductions shall be to higher acuity patients.
(c) Amounts appropriated in this subsection are sufficient to
develop and implement the use of a consistent, statewide outcome-based
vendor contract for employment and day services by July 1, 2012. The
rates paid to vendors under this contract shall also be made
consistent. In its description of activities the agency shall include
activity listings and dollars appropriated for: Employment services,
day services, child development services and county administration of
services to the developmentally disabled. The department shall begin
reporting to the office of financial management on these activities
beginning in fiscal year 2010.
(d) $944,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $944,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $1,888,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for state contributions for individual provider
health care benefits. Pursuant to the collective bargaining agreement
negotiated with the exclusive bargaining representative of individual
providers established under RCW 74.39A.270, the state shall contribute
to the multiemployer health benefits trust fund $2.21 per paid hour
worked by individual providers.
(e) $1,329,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $1,622,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $2,947,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to the
training partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, for instructional
costs associated with the training of individual providers.
Contributions are funded at $0.22 per benefit-eligible paid hour worked
by all home care workers. Expenditures for the purposes specified in
this subsection shall not exceed the amounts provided in this
subsection. However, if the governor and the service employees
international union healthcare 775nw can reach agreement on repurposing
funding that is currently provided in the individual provider
collective bargaining agreement for new individual provider wages paid
during training or other training related items, then expenditures for
training trust contributions for individual providers may include the
amounts provided in this subsection and the agreed upon repurposed
funding. Funding in this section for purposes other than the
individual provider collective bargaining agreement cannot be used for
the purposes of this subsection (1)(e). It is the intent of the
legislature that the funding provided in this subsection, including any
repurposed funding, is sufficient to cover the costs of individual
provider training and therefore tuition or other entrance fees are not
necessary.
(f) $104,669,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 and $104,669,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department to provide
personal care services to waiver and nonwaiver in-home clients. The
department shall provide the legislature with a report by December 5,
2012, on the feasibility of converting the medicaid personal care
program for in-home adults to a medicaid program as found in section
1915(i) of the federal social security act that utilizes the option for
self-direction of individualized budgets. The department shall operate
the personal care program within the amounts specifically provided.
(g)(i) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the
department shall revise the current working age adult policy to allow
clients to choose between employment and community access activities.
Clients age 21 and older who are receiving services through a home- and
community-based medicaid waiver shall be offered the choice to
transition to a community access program after nine months of
enrollment in an employment program, and the option to transition from
a community access program to an employment program at any time. The
department shall inform clients and their legal representatives of all
available options for employment and day services. Information
provided to the client and the client's legal representative shall
include the types of activities each service option provides, and the
amount, scope, and duration of service for which the client would be
eligible under each service option. An individual client may be
authorized for only one service option, either employment services or
community access services. Clients may not participate in more than
one of these services at any given time.
(ii) The department shall work with counties and stakeholders to
strengthen and expand the existing community access program. The
program must emphasize support for the client so they are able to
participate in activities that integrate them into their community and
support independent living and skills.
(iii) The appropriation in this subsection includes funding to
provide employment or community access services to 168 medicaid
eligible young adults with developmental disabilities living with their
families who need employment opportunities and assistance after high
school graduation.
(h) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the restoration of direct
support to local organizations that utilize parent-to-parent networks
and communication to promote access and quality of care for individuals
with developmental disabilities and their families.
(i) In accordance with Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1277
(licensed settings for vulnerable adults), adult family home license
fees are increased in fiscal years 2012 and 2013 to support the costs
of conducting licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs.
(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes
shall be increased to $100 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2012 and
$175 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2013. Adult family homes shall
receive a corresponding vendor rate increase per medicaid patient day
of $0.22 in fiscal year 2012 and $0.43 in fiscal year 2013, or the
amount necessary to fully fund the license fee increase for publicly
funded beds, pursuant to the most recent bed estimates maintained by
the department.
(ii) Beginning in fiscal year 2012, a processing fee of $2,750
shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially
licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.
(j) Clients with developmental disabilities have demonstrated a
need and a desire for a day services program as verified by over 900
clients currently accessing day programs through a long-term care
service model. In addition, every individual, to include those with a
developmental disability, should have the opportunity for meaningful
employment which allows them to contribute to their communities and to
become as self-sufficient as possible. Providing choice empowers
recipients of publicly funded services and their families by expanding
their degree of control over the services and supports they need.
The department shall work with legislators and stakeholders to
develop a new approach to employment and day services. The objective
of this plan is to ensure that adults with developmental disabilities
have optimum choices, and that employment and day offerings are
comprehensive enough to meet the needs of all clients currently served
on a home and community based waiver. The proposal shall be submitted
to the 2012 legislature for consideration and shall be constructed such
that a client ultimately receives employment, community access, or the
community day option but not more than one service at a time. The
proposal shall include options for program efficiencies within the
current employment and day structure and shall provide details on the
plan to implement a consistent, statewide outcome-based vendor contract
for employment and day services as specified in (c) of this subsection.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,436,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,356,000))
$78,071,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($153,570,000))
$152,748,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,043,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($331,405,000))
$328,298,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are for the department to fulfill its contracts with
the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide
transportation, building space, and other support services as are
reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students
living in residential habilitation centers.
(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,382,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,366,000))
$2,759,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,319,000))
$2,119,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,067,000))
$6,260,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,634,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,553,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,588,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $998,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,773,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
Amounts appropriated in this subsection are for the purposes of
transitioning clients with developmental disabilities into community
settings. The department is authorized as needed to use these funds to
either pay for clients residing within a residential habilitation
center or for placements in the community. Pursuant to Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5459 (services for people with developmental
disabilities), funding in this subsection must be prioritized for the
purpose of facilitating the consolidation and closure of Frances Haddon
Morgan Center. The department shall use a person-centered approach in
developing the discharge plan to assess each resident's needs and
identify services the resident requires to successfully transition to
the community or another residential habilitation center. The
department is authorized to use any savings from this effort for the
purpose of developing community resources to address the needs of
clients with developmental disabilities who are in crisis or in need of
respite. The department shall track the costs and savings of closing
Frances Haddon Morgan Center and any investments into community
placements and resources. The department shall provide a fiscal
progress report to the legislature by December 5, 2011.

Sec. 206 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $791,493,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($809,338,000))
$808,943,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,690,993,000))
$1,692,753,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,517,000
Traumatic Brain Injury Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,388,000
Nursing Facility Quality Assurance Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,410,729,000))
$3,412,094,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $170.37 for
fiscal year 2012 and shall not exceed $171.43 for fiscal year 2013,
including the rate add-ons described in (a) and (b) of this subsection.
However, if the waiver requested from the federal centers for medicare
and medicaid services in relation to the safety net assessment created
by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581 (nursing home payments) is
for any reason not approved and implemented, the weighted average
nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $159.87 for fiscal year
2012 and shall not exceed $160.93 for fiscal year 2013. There will be
no adjustments for economic trends and conditions in fiscal years 2012
and 2013. The economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined
in the biennial appropriations act shall not be compounded with the
economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any other
biennial appropriations acts before applying it to the component rate
allocations established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW. When no
economic trends and conditions factor for either fiscal year is defined
in a biennial appropriations act, no economic trends and conditions
factor or factors defined in any earlier biennial appropriations act
shall be applied solely or compounded to the component rate allocations
established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW.
(a) Within the funds provided, the department shall continue to
provide an add-on per medicaid resident day per facility not to exceed
$1.57. The add-on shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or
staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or
benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other
category of worker whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was
less than $15 in calendar year 2008, according to cost report data.
The add-on may also be used to address resulting wage compression for
related job classes immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage
workers. The department shall continue reporting requirements and a
settlement process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this
subsection.
(b) The department shall do a comparative analysis of the facility-based payment rates calculated on July 1, 2012, using the payment
methodology defined in chapter 74.46 RCW and as funded in the omnibus
appropriations act, excluding the comparative add-on, acuity add-on,
and safety net reimbursement, to the facility-based payment rates in
effect June 30, 2010. If the facility-based payment rate calculated on
July 1, 2012, is smaller than the facility-based payment rate on June
30, 2010, then the difference shall be provided to the individual
nursing facilities as an add-on payment per medicaid resident day.
(c) During the comparative analysis performed in subsection (b) of
this section, if it is found that the direct care rate for any facility
calculated using the payment methodology defined in chapter 74.46 RCW
and as funded in the omnibus appropriations act, excluding the
comparative add-on, acuity add-on, and safety net reimbursement, is
greater than the direct care rate in effect on June 30, 2010, then the
facility shall receive a ten percent direct care rate add-on to
compensate that facility for taking on more acute clients than they
have in the past.
(d) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to
reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net
assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety
net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual
statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.
(e) If the waiver requested from the federal centers for medicare
and medicaid services in relation to the safety net assessment created
by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581 (nursing home payments) is
for any reason not approved and implemented, (b), (c), and (d) of this
subsection do not apply.
(2) After examining actual nursing facility cost information, the
legislature finds that the medicaid nursing facility rates calculated
pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581 (nursing home
payments) provide sufficient reimbursement to efficiently and
economically operating nursing facilities and bear a reasonable
relationship to costs.
(3) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue no additional certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2012 and no new certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2013 and shall grant no rate add-ons to payment rates for capital
improvements not requiring a certificate of need and a certificate of
capital authorization for fiscal years 2012 and 2013.
(4) The long-term care program may develop and pay enhanced rates
for exceptional care to nursing homes for persons with traumatic brain
injuries who are transitioning from hospital care. The cost per
patient day for caring for these clients in a nursing home setting may
be equal to or less than the cost of caring for these clients in a
hospital setting.
(5) Amounts appropriated in this section reflect a reduction to
funds appropriated for in-home care. The department shall reduce the
number of in-home hours authorized. The reduction shall be scaled
based on the acuity level of care recipients. The largest hour
reductions shall be to lower acuity patients and the smallest hour
reductions shall be to higher acuity patients.
(6) $1,883,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $1,883,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $3,766,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for state contributions for
individual provider health care benefits. Pursuant to the collective
bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive bargaining
representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270, the state shall contribute to the multiemployer health
benefits trust fund $2.21 per paid hour worked by individual providers.
(7) $2,449,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $3,012,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $5,463,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to the
training partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, for instructional
costs associated with the training of individual providers.
Contributions are funded at $0.22 per benefit-eligible paid hour worked
by all home care workers. Expenditures for the purposes specified in
this subsection shall not exceed the amounts provided in this
subsection. However, if the governor and the service employees
international union healthcare 775nw can reach agreement on repurposing
funding that is currently provided in the individual provider
collective bargaining agreement for new individual provider wages paid
during training or other training related items, then expenditures for
training trust contributions for individual providers may include the
amounts provided in this subsection and the agreed upon repurposed
funding. Funding in this section for purposes other than the
individual provider collective bargaining agreement cannot be used for
the purposes of this subsection (7). It is the intent of the
legislature that the funding provided in this subsection, including any
repurposed funding, is sufficient to cover the costs of individual
provider training and therefore tuition or other entrance fees are not
necessary.
(8) $338,550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 and $338,550,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department to provide
personal care services to waiver and nonwaiver in-home clients. The
department shall provide the legislature with a report by December 5,
2012, on the feasibility of converting the medicaid personal care
program for in-home adults to a medicaid program as found in section
1915(i) of the federal social security act that utilizes the option for
self-direction of individualized budgets. The department shall operate
the personal care program within the amounts specifically provided.
(9) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(10) The department shall eliminate the adult day health program
under the state plan 1915(i) option and shall reestablish it under the
long-term care home and community-based waiver.
(11) $4,588,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $4,559,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $9,237,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of
community residential and support services for persons who are older
adults or who have co-occurring medical and behavioral disorders and
who have been discharged or diverted from a state psychiatric hospital.
These funds shall be used to serve individuals whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, who no longer
require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of
care, and who no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment.
(12) $1,840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
services program. Funding shall be prioritized towards serving
populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include
senior citizens and persons with disabilities.
(13) In accordance with Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1277
(licensed settings for vulnerable adults), nursing facility fees are
increased in fiscal year 2012 and adult family home fees are increased
in fiscal year 2012 and fiscal year 2013 to support the costs of
conducting licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs.
(a) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities
shall be increased to $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2012 and
assumes $517,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation.
Nursing facilities shall receive a vendor rate increase of $0.08 per
medicaid patient day to cover the license fee increase for publicly
funded beds.
(b) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes
shall be increased to $100 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2012 and
assumes $1,449,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation;
and $175 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2013 and assumes $2,463,000
of the general fund--private/local appropriation. Adult family homes
shall receive a corresponding vendor rate increase per medicaid patient
day of $0.22 in fiscal year 2012 and $0.43 in fiscal year 2013, or the
amount necessary to fully fund the license fee increase for publicly
funded beds, pursuant to the most recent bed estimates maintained by
the department.
(c) Beginning in fiscal year 2012, a processing fee of $2,750 shall
be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially
licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.
(d) $72,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $708,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation
and $708,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely to implement sections 501 through 503 of Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1277 (licensed settings for vulnerable adults). The
department shall use additional investigative resources to address
complaints about provider practices as well as alleged abuse, neglect,
abandonment, and exploitation of residents in adult family homes. The
department shall develop a statewide internal quality review and
accountability program to improve the accountability of staff and the
consistent application of investigative activities, and shall convene
a quality assurance panel to review problems in the quality of care in
adult family homes.
(14) $3,316,000 of the traumatic brain injury account--state
appropriation is provided solely to continue services for persons with
traumatic brain injury (TBI) as defined in chapter 143, Laws of 2011
(traumatic brain injury strategic partnership).
(15) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients
residing in nursing homes and paid for with state only funds into less
restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the
client's care needs.
(16) The department shall participate in the work group established
by the department of corrections in section 220(2) of this act to
review release options for elderly and infirm offenders.

Sec. 207 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $415,553,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($438,483,000))
$405,458,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,174,416,000))
$1,226,820,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,592,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,059,044,000))
$2,078,423,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $195,410,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, (($235,808,000)) $197,006,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and (($725,586,000))
$759,696,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Under section 2 of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5921 (social services programs),
the amounts in this subsection assume that any participant in the
temporary assistance for needy families where their participation is
suspended and does not volunteer to participate in WorkFirst services
or unsubsidized employment does not receive child care subsidies or
WorkFirst subsidies as a condition of the suspension. Within the
amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide
assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary
assistance for needy families.
(a) Within the amounts provided for WorkFirst in this subsection,
the department shall continue to implement WorkFirst program
improvements that are designed to achieve progress against outcome
measures specified in Engrossed House Bill No. 2262 (WorkFirst and
child care) and RCW 74.08A.410.
(b) The department may establish a career services work transition
program.
(c) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the legislature
expressly mandates that the department exercise its authority, granted
in 1997 under RCW 74.08A.290, to contract for work activities services
pursuant to that statutory authority and RCW 41.06.142(3).
(d) The department shall create a temporary assistance for needy
families budget structure that allows for more transparent tracking of
budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units and
subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units.
The budget structure shall include budget units for the following:
Grants, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the
program.
(2) $23,679,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, in addition to supplemental security income recoveries, is
provided solely for financial assistance and other services to
recipients in the program established in section 4, chapter 8, Laws of
2010 1st sp. sess., until the program terminates on October 31, 2011.
(3)(a) $12,457,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $21,959,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, in addition to supplemental
security income recoveries, are provided solely for the programs
created in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2082 (essential needs
and assistance program) beginning November 1, 2011.
(b) The department shall review clients receiving services through
the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether
they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens,
and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income
benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization
funding through the department.
(c) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with
the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral
of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement
must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in
selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties
to facilitate applications for veterans' services.
(4) $1,657,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,657,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for naturalization services.
(5) $2,366,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for refugee employment services, of which
$1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to
statewide refugee assistance organizations for limited English
proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for refugee
employment services, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the
department to pass through to statewide refugee assistance
organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.
(6) On December 1, 2011, and annually thereafter, the department
must report to the legislature on all sources of funding available for
both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during
the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service
type and funding source. The report must also include the number of
clients served and outcome data for the clients.
(7) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds
appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit
under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to
be fifty percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance
program benefit amount.

Sec. 208 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND
SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,742,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($71,218,000))
$71,019,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($184,401,000))
$187,979,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,486,000))
$16,248,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,748,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,448,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($365,043,000))
$371,184,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
may contract with the University of Washington and community-based
providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program.
For all contractors, indirect charges for administering the program
shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall continue to provide for chemical dependency treatment services
for adult medicaid eligible, pregnant and parenting women, disability
lifeline, and alcoholism and drug addiction treatment and support act,
and medical care services clients.
(3) In accordance with RCW 70.96A.090 and 43.135.055, the
department is authorized to increase fees for the review and approval
of treatment programs in fiscal years 2012 and 2013 as necessary to
support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee
schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of
accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to
have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department,
including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of
health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of
rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To
reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited
programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of
accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these
programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.
(4) $3,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation (from the
substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant) is
provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and
alcohol use prevention programs.
(5) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department is
required to increase federal match available for intensive inpatient
services. During fiscal year 2013, the department shall shift
contracts for a minimum of 32 intensive inpatient beds currently
provided in settings that are considered institutions for mental
diseases to two or more facilities with no more than 16 beds that are
able to claim federal match for services provided to medicaid clients
or individuals covered under the department's section 1115 medicaid
waiver. The department is authorized to conduct a request for proposal
process to fulfill this requirement. By December 1, 2012, the
department shall provide a plan to the office of financial management
and to the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature for
transitioning all remaining intensive inpatient beds currently provided
in settings that are considered institutions for mental diseases into
facilities with no more than 16 beds by June 2017. The plan shall
identify the maximum number of additional beds that can be transitioned
into facilities with no more than 16 beds during the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium and the remaining number that will be transitioned during the
2015-2017 fiscal biennium, a timeline and process for accomplishing
this, and a projection of the related general fund--state savings for
each biennium.
(6) The amounts appropriated in this section include reductions of
$303,000 in the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2012
and $1,815,000 in the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2013. The department must apply this reduction across all levels of
chemical dependency residential treatment services excluding services
contracted through the counties, services provided to pregnant and
parenting women, services provided to juveniles, and services provided
to parents in dependency proceedings.

Sec. 209 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,854,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,401,000))
$10,353,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,060,000))
$104,922,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,766,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($129,081,000))
$128,895,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $480,000 of the telecommunications devices
for the hearing and speech impaired account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the office of deaf and hard of hearing to contract
for services that provide ((employment)) support and help with life
activities for deaf-blind individuals in ((King county)) the Puget
Sound area.

Sec. 210 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- SPECIAL COMMITMENT
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,167,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,128,000))
$38,065,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,295,000))
$86,232,000

Sec. 211 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,069,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,474,000))
$26,301,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,550,000))
$42,090,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,116,000
Performance Audits of State Government--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,812,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($97,021,000))
$101,388,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington state mentors
program to continue its public-private partnerships to provide
technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve
at-risk youth.
(2) $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild
project.
(3) $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the juvenile detention
alternatives initiative.
(4) $4,812,000 of the performance audits of state government--state
appropriation is provided solely for support and expansion of the
division of fraud investigation. The division shall conduct
investigatory and enforcement activities for all department programs,
including the child support and TANF programs.
(5) $1,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the department to distribute as
support to community public health and safety networks that have a
history of providing training and services related to adverse childhood
experiences. Distribution of these funds is contingent upon securing
funding from a private entity or entities to provide one dollar in
matching funds for each dollar in state funds received by a network so
that the funding received by a community public health and safety
network will be equal portions of state and private funding.
(((7))) (6) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for a grant program focused on
criminal street gang prevention and intervention. The Washington state
partnership council on juvenile justice may award grants under this
subsection. The council shall give priority to applicants who have
demonstrated the greatest problems with criminal street gangs.
Applicants composed of, at a minimum, one or more local governmental
entities and one or more nonprofit, nongovernmental organizations that
have a documented history of creating and administering effective
criminal street gang prevention and intervention programs may apply for
funding under this subsection.
(((8) $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 and $105,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for staffing costs associated with implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2536 (children
services/delivery). The amounts provided in this subsection must be
used for coordinated evidence-based practice implementation amongst the
department's programs providing mental health, child welfare, and
juvenile justice services to children. If Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2536 (children services/delivery) is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec. 212 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER
AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,140,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,303,000))
$49,584,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,049,000))
$53,409,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($161,492,000))
$165,133,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
$469,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2011 and $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5921 (social services programs). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 213 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,034,296,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,031,185,000))
$2,028,830,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,307,323,000))
$5,288,197,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,597,000))
$55,299,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,077,000))
$14,032,000
Hospital Safety Net Assessment Fund--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($434,087,000))
$438,841,000
State Health Care Authority Administration Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,040,000
Basic Health Plan Stabilization Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $529,000
Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,972,334,000))
$9,947,264,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) ((The appropriations to the authority in this act shall be
expended for the purposes and in the amounts specified in this act. To
the extent that appropriations in this section are insufficient to fund
actual expenditures in excess of caseload forecasts and utilization
assumptions, the authority, after May 1, 2012, may transfer general
fund--state appropriations for fiscal year 2012 that are provided
solely for a specified purpose. The authority shall not transfer
funds, and the director of financial management shall not approve the
transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of
conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state
funds. The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment
modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written
notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of
the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and
appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or
transfers.
(2))) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205
and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents eligible
to participate in the basic health plan as subsidized enrollees and
home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(((3))) (2) The health care authority shall require organizations
and individuals that are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
that choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(((4))) (3)(a) $1,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 is provided solely to plan the implementation of
a system of consolidated public school employee health benefits
purchasing.
It is the intent of the legislature to improve the administration,
transparency, and equity in delivering a K-12 employees' health
benefits system. In addition, the legislature intends that any cost
savings that result from changes to K-12 health benefits be dedicated
to public schools.
To further this legislative intent, the state health care authority
shall develop a plan to implement a consolidated health benefits'
system for K-12 employees for the 2013-14 school year. The health care
authority shall deliver a report to the legislature by December 15,
2011, that sets forth the implementation plan to the ways and means
committees of the house of representatives and the senate.
(b) The report prepared by the health care authority shall compare
and contrast the costs and benefits, both long and short term, of:
(i) The current K-12 health benefits system;
(ii) A new K-12 employee benefits pool; and
(iii) Enrolling K-12 employees into the health benefits pool for
state employees.
(c) In addition to the implementation plan, the report shall
include the following information:
(i) The costs and benefits of the current K-12 health benefits
system;
(ii) The costs and benefits of providing a new statewide K-12
employees' health benefits pool to school districts and school
employees;
(iii) The costs and benefits of enrolling K-12 employees into the
existing health benefits pool for state employees;
(iv) Recommendations of ways to limit administrative duplication
and costs, improve transparency to employees, the legislature, and the
public and assure equity among beneficiaries of publicly provided
employee health benefits;
(v) Recommendations for standardizing benefit packages and
purchasing efforts in a manner that seeks to maximize funding and
equity for all school employees;
(vi) Recommendations regarding the use of incentives, including how
changes to state health benefit allocations could provide employees
with benefits that would encourage participation;
(vii) Recommendations regarding the implementation of a new K-12
employee benefit plan, with separate options for voluntary
participation and mandatory statewide participation;
(viii) Recommendations regarding methods to reduce inequities
between individual and family coverage;
(ix) Consolidation of the purchasing and budget accountability for
school employee benefits to maximize administrative efficiency and
leverage existing skills and resources; and
(x) Other details the health care authority deems necessary,
including but not limited to recommendations on the following:
(A) Approaches for implementing the transition to a statewide pool,
including administrative and statutory changes necessary to ensure a
successful transition, and whether the pool should be separate from, or
combined with, the public employees' benefits pool;
(B) The structure of a permanent governing group to provide ongoing
oversight to the consolidated pool, in a manner similar to the public
employees benefits board functions for employee health benefits,
including statutory duties and authorities of the board; and
(C) Options for including potential changes to: Eligibility
standardization, the public employees benefits risk pools, the movement
of school employee retirees into the new K-12 pool or pools, and the
movement of educational service district employees into the new K-12
pool or pools.
(d) In determining its costs and benefits of a new statewide K-12
employees' health benefits pool for school districts and school
employees, the health care authority shall assume the following:
(i) School district enrollees must constitute an entire bargaining
unit, or an entire group of nonrepresented employees;
(ii) Staffing and administration for benefits purchasing shall be
provided by the health care authority; and
(iii) The new K-12 pool would operate on a schedule that
coordinates with the financing and enrollment schedule used for school
districts.
(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
office of the insurance commissioner shall provide information and
technical assistance to the health care authority as requested by the
health care authority. The health care authority shall not implement
the new school employee benefits pool until authorized to do so by the
legislature.
(((5))) (4) The administrator shall take at least the following
actions to assure that persons participating in the basic health plan
are eligible for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require
submission of (i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all
applicants, or (ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned
income from those persons not required to file income tax returns; (b)
check employment security payroll records at least once every twelve
months on all enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as
indicated by payroll records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is
based to document their current income as a condition of continued
eligibility; (d) require enrollees for whom employment security payroll
records cannot be obtained to document their current income at least
once every six months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to,
depreciation, amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by
the United States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment
and civil penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies,
as provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(((6))) (5) Enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan shall be
limited to only include persons who qualify as subsidized enrollees as
defined in RCW 70.47.020 and who (a) qualify for services under 1115
medicaid demonstration project number 11-W-00254/10; or (b) are foster
parents licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.
(((7))) (6) $23,700,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
is provided solely for planning and implementation of a health benefit
exchange under the federal patient protection and affordable care act.
Within the amounts provided in this subsection, funds used by the
authority for information technology projects are conditioned on the
authority satisfying the requirements of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5931 (central service agencies).
(((8))) (7) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload
forecasts, if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for
the medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the
health care authority shall take steps including but not limited to
reduction of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce
expenditures so that total program costs do not exceed the annual
appropriation authority.
(((9))) (8) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard
recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other
assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.
(((10))) (9) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's
interest for Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable
component of the state's health care system.
(((11))) (10) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by
reason of residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health
care authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or
she would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to
the extent necessary.
(((12))) (11) $4,261,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012, $4,261,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $8,522,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for low-income
disproportionate share hospital payments under RCW 74.09.730(1)(a).
(((13))) (12) $6,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation
is provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated
by public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be
responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the
supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum
allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the
payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or
reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E
of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that
costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against
payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because
such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from
these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to
retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing
homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the
interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care
authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or
the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from
the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the
medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The
health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the
eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.
(((14))) (13) The health care authority shall continue the
inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals,
including those owned or operated by the state, except those classified
as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The
health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and
legislature by November 1, 2011, and by November 1, 2012, that evaluate
whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the
certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no
longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall
submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing
cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources
as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2012 and fiscal
year 2013, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one
hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost
for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical
assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the
maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal
regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an
allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by
the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each
fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount.
The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the
inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the
fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the
reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with
policies approved in the 2011-13 biennial operating appropriations act
and in effect on July 1, 2011, (b) one half of the indigent assistance
disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by
each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the other
disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by
each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same
disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2011-13 biennium.
If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline
amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the
federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments
for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during
the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be
paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the
fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state
grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in
monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as
the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are
subject to an interim settlement within eleven months after the end of
the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent
that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in
excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection,
the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested.
$8,102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2012, of which $6,570,000 is appropriated in section 204(1) of this
act, and (($3,162,000)) $10,177,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, of which $6,570,000 is appropriated
in section 204(1) of this act, are provided solely for state grants for
the participating hospitals. CPE hospitals will receive the inpatient
and outpatient reimbursement rate restorations in RCW 74.60.080 and
rate increases in RCW 74.60.090 funded through the hospital safety net
assessment fund rather than through the baseline mechanism specified in
this subsection.
(((15))) (14) The health care authority shall seek public-private
partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to
provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under the
federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of
2009.
(((16))) (15) The health care authority shall target funding for
maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that
lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a
preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a
cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe
mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco
use, or African American or Native American race. The health care
authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of
maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care
authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for
maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those
services.
(((17))) (16) For children with family incomes above 200 percent of
the federal poverty level in the state-funded children's health program
for children who are not eligible for coverage under the federally
funded children's health insurance program, premiums shall be set every
two years in an amount equal to the average state-only share of the per
capita cost of coverage in the state-funded children's health program
for children in families with incomes at or less than two hundred
percent of the federal poverty level.
(((18))) (17) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
health care authority shall provide disproportionate share hospital
payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the
children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title
XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship
status.
(((19))) (18) $859,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $979,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $1,841,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase prior authorization
activities for advanced imaging procedures.
(((20))) (19) $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $442,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase prior authorization
activities for surgical procedures, which may include orthopedic
procedures, spinal procedures and interventions, and nerve procedures.
(((21))) (20) $300,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation and $300,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for a prescriptive practices improvement
collaborative focusing upon atypical antipsychotics and other
medications commonly used in the treatment of severe and persistent
mental illnesses among adults. The project shall promote collaboration
among community mental health centers, other major prescribers of
atypical antipsychotic medications to adults enrolled in state medical
assistance programs, and psychiatrists, pharmacists, and other
specialists at the University of Washington department of psychiatry
and/or other research universities. The collaboration shall include
patient-specific prescriber consultations by psychiatrists and
pharmacists specializing in treatment of severe and persistent mental
illnesses among adults; production of profiles to assist prescribers
and clinics in tracking their prescriptive practices and their
patients' medication use and adherence relative to evidence-based
practices guidelines, other prescribers, and patients at other clinics;
and in-service seminars at which participants can share and increase
their knowledge of evidence-based and other effective prescriptive
practices. The health care authority shall enter into an interagency
agreement with the office of the attorney general for expenditure of
$300,000 of the state's proceeds of the cy pres settlement in State of
Washington v. AstraZeneca (Seroquel) for this purpose.
(((22))) (21) $570,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation is provided solely for continued operation of the
partnership access line for child mental health consultations. The
health care authority shall enter into an interagency agreement with
the office of the attorney general for expenditure of $570,000 of the
state's proceeds of the cy pres settlement in State of Washington v.
AstraZeneca (Seroquel) for this purpose.
(((23))) (22) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $160,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to fund the Tacoma-Pierce county
health department for access and outreach activities to reduce infant
mortality.
(((24))) (23) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $150,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to assist with development and
implementation of evidence-based strategies regarding the appropriate,
safe, and effective role of C-section surgeries and early induced labor
in births and neonatal care. The strategies shall be identified and
implemented in consultation with clinical research specialists,
physicians, hospitals, advanced registered nurse practitioners, and
organizations concerned with maternal and child health.
(((25))) (24) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
health care authority shall continue to provide school-based medical
services by means of an intergovernmental transfer arrangement. Under
the arrangement, the state shall provide forty percent and school
districts sixty percent of the nonfederal matching funds required for
receipt of federal medicaid funding for the service.
(((26))) (25) $263,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $88,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $351,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and submission to the
federal government by October 1, 2011, of a demonstration project
proposal as provided in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5596 (medicaid
demonstration waiver).
(((27))) (26) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
health care authority shall provide spoken-language interpreter
services. The authority shall develop and implement a new model for
delivery of such services no later than July 1, 2012. The model shall
include:
(a) Development by the authority in consultation with subject-area
experts of guidelines to assist medical practitioners identify the
circumstances under which it is appropriate to use telephonic or video-remote interpreting;
(b) The requirement that the state contract with delivery
organizations, including foreign language agencies, who employ or
subcontract only with language access providers or interpreters working
in the state who are certified or authorized by the state. When a
state-certified or state-authorized in-state language access provider
or interpreter is not available, the delivery organization, including
foreign language agencies, may use a provider with other certifications
or qualifications deemed to meet state standards, including
interpreters in other states; and
(c) Provision of a secure, web-based tool that medical
practitioners will use to schedule appointments for interpreter
services and to identify the most appropriate, cost-effective method of
service delivery in accordance with the state guidelines.
Nothing in this subsection affects the ability of health care
providers to provide interpretive services through employed staff or
through telephone and video remote technologies when not reimbursed
directly by the department. The amounts in this subsection do not
include federal administrative funds provided to match nonstate
expenditures by local health jurisdictions and governmental hospitals.
(((28))) (27) In its procurement of contractors for delivery of
medical managed care services for nondisabled, nonelderly persons, the
medical assistance program shall (a) place substantial emphasis upon
price competition in the selection of successful bidders; and (b) not
require delivery of any services that would increase the actuarial cost
of service beyond the levels included in current healthy options
contracts.
(((29))) (28) $1,430,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012, $1,430,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $2,860,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to pay
federally-designated rural health clinics their standard encounter rate
for prenatal and well-child visits, whether delivered under a managed
care contract or fee-for-service. In reconciling managed care
enhancement payments for calendar years 2009 and 2010, the department
shall treat well-child and prenatal care visits as encounters subject
to the clinic's encounter rate.
(((30))) (29) $280,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $282,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase utilization management of
drugs and drug classes for which there is evidence of over-utilization,
off-label use, excessive dosing, duplicative therapy, or opportunities
to shift utilization to less expensive, equally effective formulations.
(((31))) (30) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $140,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit
organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn
about and enroll in the apple health for kids program.
(((32))) (31) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for the local outreach, case
management, and coordination with dental providers needed to execute
the access to baby and child dentistry program, which provides dental
care to Medicaid eligible children up to age six.
(((33))) (32) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
health care authority shall continue to provide dental services to
pregnant women. Services shall include preventive, routine, and
emergent dental care.
(((34))) (33) $395,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $395,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $790,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for continued operation of the
dental education in care of persons with disabilities (DECOD) program
at the University of Washington.
(((35))) (34) $159,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $302,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation, and $146,072,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the provider incentive program
and other initiatives related to the health information technology
Medicaid plan. The general fund--private/local appropriation in this
subsection shall be funded with proceeds from settlements in the case
of State of Washington vs. GlaxoSmithKline. The authority and the
office of the attorney general shall enter an interagency agreement
regarding use of these funds.
(((36))) (35) $2,926,000 of the general fund--local appropriation
and $2,928,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely to support medical airlift services.
(((37))) (36) The authority shall collect data on enrollment and
utilization to study whether the expansion of family planning coverage
under Substitute Senate Bill No. 5912 is reducing state medical
expenditures by reducing unwanted pregnancies. The authority shall
report its findings to the legislature by December 1, 2012.
(((38))) (37) $480,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $480,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $824,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for customer services staff. The
authority will attempt to improve the phone answer rate to 40 percent
and reduce the response times to written questions to ten days for
clients and 25 days for providers. The authority will report to the
legislature on its progress toward achieving these goals by January 1,
2012. If the authority has not achieved these goals by July 1, 2012,
then the authority shall reduce expenditures on management staff in
order to increase expenditures on customer service staff until the
goals are achieved.
(((39))) (38) The department shall purchase a brand name drug when
it determines that the cost of the brand name drug after rebates is
less than the cost of generic alternatives and that purchase of the
brand rather than generic version can save at least $250,000. The
department may purchase generic alternatives when changes in market
prices make the price of the brand name drug after rebates more
expensive than the generic alternatives.
(((41))) (39) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $1,964,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2319 (affordable care act).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(((42))) (40) $1,109,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012, $1,471,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $21,890,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement phase two
of the project to create a single provider payment system that
consolidates medicaid medical and social services payments and replaces
the social service payment system.
(((43))) (41) In order to achieve the twelve percent reduction in
emergency room expenditures in the fiscal year 2013 appropriations
provided in this section, the authority, in consultation with the
Washington state hospital association, the Washington state medical
association, and the Washington chapter of the American college of
emergency physicians shall designate best practices and performance
measures to reduce medically unnecessary emergency room visits of
medicaid clients. The Washington state hospital association, the
Washington state medical association, and the Washington chapter of the
American college of emergency physicians will work with the authority
to promote these best practices. The best practices and performance
measures shall consist of the following items:
(a) Adoption of a system to exchange patient information among
emergency room departments on a regional or statewide basis;
(b) Active dissemination of patient educational materials produced
by the Washington state hospital association, Washington state medical
association, and the Washington chapter of the American college of
emergency physicians that instruct patients on appropriate facilities
for nonemergent health care needs;
(c) Designation of hospital personnel and emergency room physician
personnel to receive and appropriately disseminate information on
clients participating in the medicaid patient review and coordination
program and to review monthly utilization reports on those clients
provided by the authority;
(d) A process to assist the authority's patient review and
coordination program clients with their care plans. The process must
include substantial efforts by hospitals to schedule an appointment
with the client's assigned primary care provider within seventy-two
hours of the client's medically unnecessary emergency room visit when
appropriate under the client's care plan;
(e) Implementation of narcotic guidelines that incorporate the
Washington chapter of the American college of emergency physician
guidelines;
(f) Physician enrollment in the state's prescription monitoring
program, as long as the program is funded; and
(g) Designation of a hospital emergency department physician
responsible for reviewing the state's medicaid utilization management
feedback reports, which will include defined performance measures. The
emergency department physician and hospital will have a process to take
appropriate action in response to the information in the feedback
reports if performance measures are not met. The authority must
develop feedback reports that include timely emergency room utilization
data such as visit rates, medically unnecessary visit rates (by
hospital and by client), emergency department imaging utilization
rates, and other measures as needed. The authority may utilize the
Robert Bree collaborative for assistance related to this best practice.
The requirements for best practices for a critical access hospital
should not include adoption of a system to exchange patient information
if doing so would pose a financial burden, and should not include
requirements related to the authority's patient review and coordination
program if the volume of those patients seen at the critical access
hospital are small.
Hospitals participating in this medicaid best practices program
shall submit to the authority a declaration from executive level
leadership indicating hospital adoption of and compliance with the best
practices enumerated above. In the declaration, hospitals will affirm
that they have in place written policies, procedures, or guidelines to
implement these best practices and are willing to share them upon
request. The declaration must also give consent for the authority to
disclose feedback reports and performance measures on its web site.
The authority shall submit a list of declaring hospitals to the
relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by July 15,
2012.
If the authority does not receive by July 1, 2012, declarations
from hospitals representing at least seventy-five percent of emergency
room visits by medicaid clients in fiscal year 2010, the authority may
implement a policy of nonpayment of medically unnecessary emergency
room visits, with appropriate client and clinical safeguards such as
exemptions and expedited prior authorization. The authority shall by
January 15, 2013, perform a preliminary fiscal analysis of trends in
implementing the best practices in this subsection, focusing on outlier
hospitals with high rates of unnecessary visits by medicaid clients,
high emergency room visit rates for patient review and coordination
clients, low rates of completion of treatment plans for patient review
and coordination clients assigned to the hospital, and high rates of
prescribed long-acting opiates. In cooperation with the leadership of
the hospital, medical, and emergency physician associations, additional
efforts shall be focused on assisting those outlier hospitals and
providers to achieve more substantial savings. The authority by
January 15, 2013, will report to the legislature about whether assumed
savings based on preliminary trend and forecasted data are on target
and if additional best practices or other actions need to be
implemented.
If necessary, pursuant to RCW 34.05.350(1)(c), the authority may
employ emergency rulemaking to achieve the reductions assumed in the
appropriations under this section.
Nothing in this subsection shall in any way impact the authority's
ability to adopt and implement policies pertaining to the patient
review and coordination program.
(((46))) (42) The department shall seek a medicaid state plan
amendment to create a graduate medical education supplemental payment
for services delivered to managed care recipients by University of
Washington medicine and other public professional providers. This
program shall be effective as soon as administratively possible and
shall operate concurrently with the existing professional services
supplemental payment program. Providers that participate in the
graduate medical education supplemental payment program are not
eligible to participate in the professional services supplemental
payment program. The department shall apply federal rules for
identifying the difference between current physician encounter and fee-for-service medicaid payments to participating providers and the
applicable federal upper payment limit. Participating providers shall
be solely responsible for providing the local funds required to obtain
federal matching funds. Any incremental costs incurred by the
department in the development, implementation, and maintenance of this
program shall be the responsibility of the participating providers.
Participating providers shall retain the full amount of supplemental
payments provided under this program, net of any costs related to the
program that are disallowed due to audits or litigation against the
state.
(((47))) (43) The authority shall exclude antiretroviral drugs used
to treat HIV/AIDS, anticancer medication that is used to kill or slow
the growth of cancerous cells, antihemophilic drugs, insulin and other
drugs to lower blood glucose, and immunosuppressive drugs from any
formulary limitations implemented to operate within the appropriations
provided in this section.
(((48))) (44) If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5978
(medicaid fraud) is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts
appropriated in this section from the medicaid fraud penalty account--state appropriation shall lapse and an additional $3,608,000 shall be
appropriated from the general fund--state for fiscal year 2013 for
medicaid services, fraud detection and prevention activities, recovery
of improper payments, and for other medicaid fraud enforcement
activities.
(((50))) (45) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
health care authority and the department of social and health services
shall implement the state option to provide health homes for enrollees
with chronic conditions under section 2703 of the federal affordable
care act. The total state match for enrollees who are dually-eligible
for both medicare and medicaid and not enrolled in managed care shall
be no more than the net savings to the state from the enhanced match
rate for its medicaid-only managed care enrollees under section 2703.
(((51))) (46) The health care authority shall not initiate any
services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless
expressly authorized in this act or other law. The health care
authority may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the
federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the
program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the health
care authority receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys,
those moneys shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in
any other legislation providing appropriation authority, and an equal
amount of appropriated state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the
lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial
management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in
this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants
and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on
specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state
funds.
(((52))) (47) $66,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 and $66,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2536 (children services/delivery). The department of social and
health services' programs responsible for administration of mental
health, child welfare, and juvenile justice programs will coordinate
with the health care authority on the development of contract terms
which facilitate efforts to meet requirements of the bill. If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((53))) (48) The health care authority shall participate in the
work group established by the department of corrections in section
220(2) of this act to review release options for elderly and infirm
offenders.
(49) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the state share of a skilled third-party mediator to coordinate negotiations and to assist parties in
resolving issues related to extension of the hospital safety net
assessment.

Sec. 214 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,589,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,147,000))
$14,204,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $456,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,048,000))
$3,940,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,597,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,445,000))
$42,394,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, are provided to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency
of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW
9A.44.130.
(2) $321,000 of the general fund--local appropriation is provided
solely to purchase ammunition for the basic law enforcement academy.
Jurisdictions shall reimburse to the criminal justice training
commission the costs of ammunition, based on the average cost of
ammunition per cadet, for cadets that they enroll in the basic law
enforcement academy.
(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic
law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a school safety program. The
commission, in collaboration with the school safety center advisory
committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school
administrators and school safety personnel hired after the effective
date of this section.
(5) $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the school safety center
within the commission. The safety center shall act as an information
dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school
district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities
relating to school safety, and review and approve manuals and curricula
used for school safety models and training. Through an interagency
agreement, the commission shall provide funding for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to continue to develop and
maintain a school safety information web site. The school safety
center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training
program, using the best practices in school safety, for all school
safety personnel. The commission shall provide research-related
programs in school safety and security issues beneficial to both law
enforcement and schools.
(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for grants to counties enforcing
illegal drug laws and which have been underserved by federally funded
state narcotics task forces. The Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys,
and the Washington association of county officials shall jointly
develop funding allocations for the offices of the county sheriff,
county prosecutor, and county clerk in qualifying counties. The
commission shall not impose an administrative cost on this program.

Sec. 215 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,829,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,801,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,640,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,002,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,964,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,348,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,722,000))
$5,172,000
Veterans Innovations Program Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $810,000
Veteran Estate Management Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,079,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,925,000))
$20,375,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $821,000 of the veterans innovations
program account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
department to continue support for returning combat veterans through
the veterans innovation program, including emergency financial
assistance through the defenders' fund and long-term financial
assistance through the competitive grant program.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,743,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,858,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,437,000))
$58,996,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,506,000))
$30,089,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($92,686,000))
$92,686,000

Sec. 216 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,404,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,114,000))
$77,589,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($553,078,000))
$573,078,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($148,055,000))
$144,055,000
Hospital Data Collection Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $214,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,085,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $604,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,300,000))
$10,523,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,464,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,965,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,528,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Site Closure Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,000
Biotoxin Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,167,000))
$1,231,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,628,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,311,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,512,000))
$1,348,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $298,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,598,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,729,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,013,804,000))
$1,027,402,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the
state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules
pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules
and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and
the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through
the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek,
receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal
moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does
not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of
amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that
provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(2) In accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.135.055, the department
is authorized to establish and raise fees in fiscal year 2012 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the
appropriation levels in this section. This authorization applies to
fees required for: The review of health care facility construction;
review of health facility requests for certificate of need; the
regulation and inspection of farm worker housing, hospital licensing,
in-home health service agencies, and producers of radioactive waste;
the regulation and inspection of shellfish sanitary control, surgical
facility licensing, and; fees associated with the following
professions: Dieticians and nutritionists, occupational therapists,
pharmacy, veterinarian, orthotics and prosthetics, surgical
technicians, nursing home administrators, health care assistants,
hearing and speech, psychology, hypnotherapy, chiropractic, social
workers, physicians, and physician assistants.
(3) Pursuant to RCW 18.130.250, the department is authorized to
establish a lower cost fee category for retired licensed practical
nurses and registered nurses.
(4) In accordance with RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized
to adopt fees set forth in and previously authorized in chapter 92,
Laws of 2010.
(5) $1,969,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement online licensing for
health care providers. The department must submit a detailed
investment plan for this project to the office of financial management.
The office of financial management must review and approve this plan
before funding may be expended. The department of health must
successfully implement online application and renewal for at least one
profession as a pilot project before pursuing additional professions.
The department must report to the office of financial management on the
outcome of the pilot project.
(6) $16,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1181 (board
of naturopathy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $21,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1304 (health care assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $54,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1353
(pharmacy technicians). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $142,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5020 (social workers). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $336,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5480 (physicians and physician assistants). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(11) $46,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5071 (online access for midwives and marriage and family therapists).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $137,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1133 (massage practitioner license). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(13) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the developmental disabilities council
to contract for a family-to-family mentor program to provide
information and support to families and guardians of persons who are
transitioning out of residential habilitation centers. To the maximum
extent allowable under federal law, these funds shall be matched under
medicaid through the department of social and health services and
federal funds shall be transferred to the department for the purposes
stated in this subsection. If Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5459
(people with developmental disabilities) is not enacted by June 30,
2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $58,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and
regulatory program to offset a reduction in revenue from fees. There
shall be no change to the current annual fees for new or renewed
licenses for the midwifery program, except from online access to HEAL-WA. The department shall convene the midwifery advisory committee on
a quarterly basis to address issues related to licensed midwifery.
(15) $118,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $118,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for prevention of youth suicides.
(16) $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the senior falls prevention
program.
(17) $19,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6290 (military
spouses and partners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $102,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6237 (career pathway/medical assistants).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $21,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
6328 (mental health professionals). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) $61,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6103 (reflexologists). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(21) $28,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5620 (dental anesthesia assistants). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(22) Appropriations for fiscal year 2013 include funding for
consolidation of the department of ecology's low-level radioactive
waste site use permit program in the department of health.
(23) During the remainder of the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, each
person subject to RCW 43.70.110(3)(c) is required to pay only one
surcharge of up to twenty-five dollars annually for the purposes of RCW
43.70.112, regardless of how many professional licenses the person
holds.
(24) $15,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2056
(assisted living facilities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(25) $11,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Engrossed House Bill No. 2186 (licensed
midwives). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(26) $11,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2229 (hospital employees). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(27) $48,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2314 (long-term care workers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(28) $280,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2366 (suicide assessment and training). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(29) $11,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2582 (health care services billing). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(30) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No.
6105 (prescription monitoring program). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(31) $30,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2473 (medication assistant endorsement). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(32) General fund--state appropriations for fiscal year 2013
includes funding to subsidize operating license and inspection fees in
the temporary worker housing program. In implementing this subsidy,
the department shall evaluate program regulations including but not
limited to the use of occupancy levels to determine the fee structure
and the frequency of inspections.

Sec. 217 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
The appropriations to the department of corrections in this act
shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified in this
section. However, after May 1, ((2012)) 2013, after approval by the
director of financial management and unless specifically prohibited by
this act, the department may transfer general fund--state
appropriations for fiscal year ((2012)) 2013 between programs. The
department shall not transfer funds, and the director of financial
management shall not approve the transfer, unless the transfer is
consistent with the objective of conserving, to the maximum extent
possible, the expenditure of state funds. The director of financial
management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate
and house of representatives in writing seven days prior to approving
any deviations from appropriation levels. The written notification
shall include a narrative explanation and justification of the changes,
along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and
appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or
transfers.

(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,025,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,981,000))
$53,206,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,006,000))
$105,231,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $35,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the
support of a statewide council on mentally ill offenders that includes
as its members representatives of community-based mental health
treatment programs, current or former judicial officers, and directors
and commanders of city and county jails and state prison facilities.
The council will investigate and promote cost-effective approaches to
meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental
disorders who have a history of offending or who are at-risk of
offending, including their mental health, physiological, housing,
employment, and job training needs.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $598,237,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($575,457,000))
$582,212,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,324,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,079,000
Enhanced 911 Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,193,097,000))
$1,199,852,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) During the 2011-13 biennium, when contracts are established or
renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to
inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.
(b) The Harborview medical center and the University of Washington
medical center shall provide inpatient and outpatient hospital services
to offenders confined in department of corrections facilities at a rate
no greater than the average rate that the department has negotiated
with other community hospitals in Washington state.
(c) $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1290
(health care employee overtime). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(d) $32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $33,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 1718 (offenders with developmental disabilities). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(e) The department of corrections shall contract with local and
tribal governments for the provision of jail capacity to house
offenders. A contract shall not have a cost of incarceration in excess
of $85 per day per offender. A contract shall not have a year-to-year
increase in excess of three percent per year. The contracts may
include rates for the medical care of offenders which exceed the daily
cost of incarceration and the limitation on year-to-year increase,
provided that medical payments conform to the department's offender
health plan, pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are
preapproved by department utilization management staff.
(f) $311,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2346
(correctional officer uniforms). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(g) $41,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $165,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the department to maintain the
facility, property, and assets at the institution formerly known as the
maple lane school in Rochester. The department may not house
incarcerated offenders at the maple lane site until specifically
directed by the legislature. By November 1, 2012, the department shall
report to the appropriate fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and the senate with a plan for the future use of the
facility.
(h) By December 1, 2012, the department shall provide to the
legislative fiscal committees a report that evaluates health care
expenditures in Washington state correctional institutions and makes
recommendations for controlling health care costs. The report shall
evaluate the source of health care costs, including offender health
issues, use of pharmaceuticals, offsite and specialist medical care,
chronic disease costs, and mental health issues. The department may
include information from other states on cost control in offender
health care, trends in offender health care that indicate potential
cost increases, and management of high-cost diagnoses.
(i) The department shall convene a work group to develop health
care cost containment strategies at local jail facilities. The work
group shall identify cost containment strategies in place at the
department and at local jail facilities, identify the costs and
benefits of implementing strategies in jail health-care facilities, and
make recommendations on implementing beneficial strategies. The work
group shall submit a report on its findings and recommendations to the
fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2013. The work
group shall include jail administrators, representatives from health
care facilities at the local jail level and the state prisons level,
and other representatives as deemed necessary.
(j) The department of corrections, with participation of the health
care authority and the department of social and health services, aging
and adult services administration, shall establish a work group to
analyze and review release options for elderly and infirm offenders and
submit recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature with release options for these populations no later
than December 1, 2012. In making its recommendations, the work group
shall identify:
(i) The most expensive medical conditions for which the department
has had to treat its offenders and the offenders receiving the most
costly ongoing medical treatments;
(ii) For identified populations, the age, level of disability, cost
of care while incarcerated, safety issues related to release, ease of
placement, and time served in relation to the offender's sentence;
(iii) Potential cost savings to the state that may be generated by
the early release of elderly and infirm offenders;
(iv) Housing options to expedite the release of aging and infirm
offenders while maintaining the safety of housing providers, other
housing residents, and the general public; and
(v) Optimal procedures for reviewing offenders on a case-by-case
basis to ensure that the interests of justice and public safety are
considered in any early release decision.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $127,121,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($128,494,000))
$129,202,000
Federal Narcotics Forfeiture Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $372,000
Controlled Substances Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($256,019,000))
$256,727,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $875,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 5891 (criminal justice cost savings). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(b) $6,362,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely to implement an evidence-based risk-needs-responsivity model for community supervision of offenders.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,513,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,431,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,944,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $66,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 is provided solely for transfer to
the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts provided
only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and technical
assistance associated with advising cities and counties in developing,
promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient offender
work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,821,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,264,000))
$27,539,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,085,000))
$63,360,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state prison institutions may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to rent uniforms from correctional industries in
accordance with existing legislative mandates.
(b) The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated
in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital or
other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do
so.
(c) The department shall reduce payments to the department of
information services or its successor by $213,000 in fiscal year 2012
and by $1,150,000 in fiscal year 2013. The reduction in payment shall
be related to the elimination of the offender base tracking system,
including moving remaining portions of the offender base tracking
system into the offender management network information system.

Sec. 218 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,159,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,131,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,239,000))
$19,739,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,000))
$105,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,559,000))
$24,134,000

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 301 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,955,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,379,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,905,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,759,000))
$2,034,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $224,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,844,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,363,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,505,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($141,234,000))
$141,509,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $8,876,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $8,300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $4,000,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement
account--state appropriation are provided solely to operate and
maintain state parks as the commission implements a new fee structure.
The goal of this structure is to make the parks system self-supporting.
By August 1, 2012, state parks must submit a report to the office of
financial management detailing its progress toward this goal and
outlining any additional statutory changes needed for successful
implementation.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $79,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $44,528,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5622 (state land recreation access). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) Prior to closing any state park, the commission must notify all
affected local governments and relevant nonprofit organizations of the
intended closure and provide an opportunity for the notified local
governments and nonprofit organizations to elect to acquire, or enter
into, a maintenance and operating contract with the commission that
would allow the park to remain open.
(5) The state parks and recreation commission, in cooperation with
the Fort Worden lifelong learning center public development authority
authorized under RCW 35.21.730 shall provide a report to the governor
and appropriate committees of the legislature no later than October 15,
2012, to create a lifelong learning center at Fort Worden state park.
This plan shall support and be based upon the Fort Worden state park
long-range plan adopted by the state parks and recreation commission in
September 2008. The report shall include a business and governance
plan and supporting materials that provide options and recommendations
on the long-term governance of Fort Worden state park, including
building maintenance and restoration. While the commission may
transfer full or partial operations to the public development authority
the state shall retain title to the property. The state parks and
recreation commission and the public development authority will agree
on the scope and content of the report including the business and
governance plan. In preparing this report the state parks and
recreation commission and the public development authority shall
provide ample opportunity for the public and stakeholders to
participate in the development of the business and governance plan.
The state parks and recreation commission shall review the report and
if it is consistent with the 2008 Fort Worden state park long-range
plan shall take action on a long-term governance and business plan no
later than December 31, 2012.
(6) Within the appropriations contained in this section, the
commission shall review the removal of trees from Brooks memorial state
park that have been killed or damaged by fire in order to determine the
recovery value from the sale of any timber that is surplus to the needs
of the park. The commission shall remove such trees, if the commission
determines that the recovery value from the sale of any timber is at
least cost neutral and the removal is in a manner consistent with RCW
79A.05.035.

Sec. 302 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,098,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,618,000))
$26,091,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,481,000))
$105,725,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,923,000))
$57,107,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $391,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,113,000))
$12,125,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,794,000))
$2,809,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,841,000))
$2,842,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $849,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $848,000
State Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,742,000))
$95,301,000
Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,382,000
Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,415,000
Wildlife Rehabilitation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $259,000
Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery
Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,001,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $883,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $919,000
Recreation Resources Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

Hydraulic Project Approval Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $337,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($357,900,000))
$355,386,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $294,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(2) $355,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $355,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the department to continue a
pilot project with the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation
to develop expanded recreational fishing opportunities on Lake Rufus
Woods and its northern shoreline and to conduct joint enforcement of
lake fisheries on Lake Rufus Woods and adjoining waters, pursuant to
state and tribal intergovernmental agreements developed under the
Columbia River water supply program. For the purposes of the pilot
project:
(a) A fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the Colville
Tribes shall satisfy the license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on the
waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(b) The Colville Tribes have agreed to provide to holders of its
nontribal member fishing permits a means to demonstrate that fish in
their possession were lawfully taken in Lake Rufus Woods;
(c) A Colville tribal member identification card shall satisfy the
license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods;
(d) The department and the Colville Tribes shall jointly designate
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods for the purposes
of enhancing access to the recreational fisheries on the lake; and
(e) The Colville Tribes have agreed to recognize a fishing license
issued under RCW 77.32.470 or RCW 77.32.490 as satisfying the nontribal
member fishing permit requirements of Colville tribal law on the
reservation portion of the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and at designated
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(3) Prior to submitting its 2013-2015 biennial operating and
capital budget request related to state fish hatcheries to the office
of financial management, the department shall contract with the
hatchery scientific review group (HSRG) to review this request. This
review shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent
with HSRG recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the
requests based on their contributions to protecting wild salmonid
stocks and meeting the recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate
whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost effective
manner. The department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the
office of financial management with their agency budget proposal.
(4) $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
army corps of engineers.
(5) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for removal of derelict gear in
Washington waters.
(6) $100,000 of the eastern Washington pheasant enhancement
account -- state appropriation is provided solely for the department to
support efforts to enhance permanent and temporary pheasant habitat on
public and private lands in Grant, Franklin, and Adams counties. The
department may support efforts by entities including conservation
districts, nonprofit organizations, and landowners, and must require
such entities to provide significant nonstate matching resources, which
may be in the form of funds, material, or labor.
(7) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall identify additional opportunities for partnerships in order to
keep fish hatcheries operational. Such partnerships shall aim to
maintain fish production and salmon recovery with less reliance on
state operating funds.
(8) By September 1, 2011, the department shall update its
interagency agreement dated September 30, 2010, with the department of
natural resources concerning land management services on the department
of fish and wildlife's wildlife conservation and recreation lands. The
update shall include rates and terms for services.
(9) Prior to opening game management unit 490 to public hunting,
the department shall complete an environmental impact statement that
includes an assessment of how public hunting activities will impact the
ongoing protection of the public water supply.
(10) $18,514,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5385 (state wildlife account). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) (($9,418,000)) $3,764,000 of the state wildlife account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5622 (state land recreation access). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(12) $50,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for mitigation, claims, and assessment costs for injury
or loss of livestock caused by wolves, black bears, and cougars.
(13) $552,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for increased law enforcement capacity
to reduce the occurrence of geoduck poaching and illegal harvest
activities. With these additional funds, the department shall deploy
two new fish and wildlife officers and one detective within Puget Sound
to address on-the-water and marketplace geoduck harvest compliance.
(14) $337,000 of the hydraulic project approval--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6406 (state natural resources).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 303 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,907,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,791,000))
$69,491,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,873,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,372,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,254,000))
$44,116,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,373,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,118,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,131,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,467,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Forest and Fish Support Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,784,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $838,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $540,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $635,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,761,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,848,000
Forest Practices Application Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $780,000
Marine Resources Stewardship Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($262,782,000))
$298,317,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $710,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $915,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(2) $8,030,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, (($10,037,000)) $43,737,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $5,000,000 of the disaster
response account -- state appropriation are provided solely for emergency
fire suppression. None of the general fund and disaster response
account amounts provided in this subsection may be used to fund agency
indirect and administrative expenses. Agency indirect and
administrative costs shall be allocated among the agency's remaining
accounts and appropriations. The department of natural resources shall
submit a quarterly report to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and
planned expenditures from the disaster response account. This work
shall be done in coordination with the military department.
(3) $4,500,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based, performance
contracts with tribes to participate in the implementation of the
forest practices program. Contracts awarded in fiscal year 2013 may
only contain indirect costs set at or below the rate in the contracting
tribe's indirect cost agreement with the federal government. If
federal funding for this purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $518,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance
contracts with nongovernmental organizations to participate in the
implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded in
fiscal year 2013 may only contain indirect cost set at or below a rate
of eighteen percent.
(5) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, $717,000 of the forest
and fish support account--state appropriation is provided solely to
fund interagency agreements with the department of ecology and the
department of fish and wildlife as part of the adaptive management
process.
(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation and
$1,000,000 of the forest and fish support account--state appropriation
are provided solely for continuing scientific studies already underway
as part of the adaptive management process. Funds may not be used to
initiate new studies unless the department secures new federal funding
for the adaptive management process.
(7) The department is authorized to increase the silviculture
burning permit fee in the 2011-2013 biennium by up to eighty dollars
plus fifty cents per ton for each ton of material burned in excess of
one hundred tons.
(8) $440,000 of the state general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $440,000 of the state general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for forest work
crews that support correctional camps and are contingent upon
continuing operations of Naselle youth camp.
(9) By September 1, 2011, the department shall update its
interagency agreement dated September 30, 2010, with the department of
fish and wildlife concerning land management services on the department
of fish and wildlife's wildlife conservation and recreation lands. The
update shall include rates and terms for services.
(10) In partnership with the department of ecology, the departments
shall deliver a report to the governor, the appropriate committees of
the legislature, and the forest practices board by September 1, 2012,
documenting forest practices adaptive management program reforms
implemented, or recommended, that streamline existing processes to
increase program efficiencies and effectiveness. The departments shall
collaborate with interested adaptive management program participants in
the development of the report.
(11)(a) $2,100,000 of the marine resources stewardship account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 252, Laws of 2012 (marine management planning) and 43.372 RCW.
The department will work with the marine interagency team, tribes, and
the Washington state marine resource committee to develop a spending
plan consistent with the priorities in chapter 252, Laws of 2012, for
conducting ecosystem assessments and mapping activities related to
marine resources use and potential economic development, developing
marine management plans for the state's coastal waters, and otherwise
aiding in the implementation of marine planning in the state. As
appropriate, the team shall develop a competitive process for projects
to be funded by the department in fiscal year 2013.
(b) The department, in consultation with the marine interagency
team, shall submit to the office of financial management and the
appropriate legislative committees by September 1, 2012, a prioritized
list of projects and activities for funding consideration through the
marine resources stewardship account in the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.
(((13))) (12) $780,000 of the forest practices application
account--state appropriation, $18,000 of the forest development
account--state appropriation, $23,000 of the resources management cost
account--state appropriation, and $2,000 of the surface mining
reclamation account--state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6406
(state natural resources). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2012, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 304 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,273,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,253,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,428,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $493,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $658,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,130,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($665,000)) $658,000 of the state toxics control account--state appropriation is provided solely for activities that contribute
to Puget Sound protection and recovery, including provision of
independent advice and assessment of the state's oil spill prevention,
preparedness, and response programs, including review of existing
activities and recommendations for any necessary improvements. The
partnership may carry out this function through an existing committee,
such as the ecosystem coordination board or the leadership council, or
may appoint a special advisory council. Because this is a unique
statewide program, the partnership may invite participation from
outside the Puget Sound region.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the Puget
Sound partnership shall facilitate an ongoing monitoring consortium to
integrate monitoring efforts for storm water, water quality, watershed
health, and other indicators to enhance monitoring efforts in Puget
Sound.

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 401 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,395,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,323,000))
$42,190,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,081,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,021,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,537,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,207,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,286,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,002,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,386,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $505,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,067,000
Vehicle License Fraud Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $437,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($125,432,000))
$135,299,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the fire service training account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the
state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12
construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the
state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide
these services only to those districts that are located in counties
without qualified review capabilities.
(2) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account--state
appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service
resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or
disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 and 43.43.964. The state
patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information
on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall
be done in coordination with the military department.
(3) $400,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship
training program.
(4) In accordance with RCW 43.43.742 the state patrol is authorized
to increase the following fees in fiscal year ((2012)) 2013 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the
appropriation levels in this section: Notary service fee.
(5) $59,000 of the fingerprint identification account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1776 (child care center licensing). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6) $6,000 of the fingerprint identification account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1494 (vulnerable adult referrals). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) $1,000 of the fingerprint identification account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Senate
Bill No. 6296 (background checks). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $9,896,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for fire mobilization costs.

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
Sec. 501 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,322,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,133,000))
$27,543,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,011,000))
$78,011,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($133,466,000))
$134,876,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of $16,056,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and (($14,875,000)) $15,276,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 is for state
agency operations.
(a) $9,692,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and (($8,169,000)) $8,160,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the
operation and expenses of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(i) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), the
superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of
four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the
civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans
civic education award.
(ii) By January 1, 2012, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall issue a report to the legislature with a timeline and
an estimate of costs for implementation of the common core standards.
The report must incorporate feedback from an open public forum for
recommendations to enhance the standards, particularly in math.
(iii) Within the amounts provided, and in consultation with the
public school employees of Washington and the Washington school
counselors' association, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop a model policy that further defines the
recommended roles and responsibilities of graduation coaches and
identifies best practices for how graduation coaches work in
coordination with school counselors and in the context of a
comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
(iv) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall,
no later than August 1, 2011, establish a standard statewide definition
of unexcused absence. The definition shall be reported to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives for
legislative review in the 2012 legislative session. Beginning no later
than January 1, 2012, districts shall report to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, daily student unexcused absence
data by school.
(b) $1,964,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,017,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for activities associated with the
implementation of new school finance systems required by chapter 236,
Laws of 2010 (K-12 education funding) and chapter 548, Laws of 2009
(state's education system), including technical staff, systems
reprogramming, and workgroup deliberations, including the quality
education council and the data governance working group.
(c)(i) $851,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $851,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities.
(ii) $172,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely to the state board of education for
implementation of Initiative Measure No. 1240 (charter schools).
(d) $1,744,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,387,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to the professional educator
standards board for the following:
(i) $1,050,000 in fiscal year 2012 and $1,050,000 in fiscal year
2013 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional
educator standards board; and
(ii) $694,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $312,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are for conditional scholarship loans and mentor
stipends provided through the alternative routes to certification
program administered by the professional educator standards board,
including the pipeline for paraeducators program and the retooling to
teach conditional loan programs. Funding within this subsection
(1)(d)(ii) is also provided for the recruiting Washington teachers
program. Funding reductions in this subsection (1)(d)(ii) in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium are intended to be one-time; and
(iii) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the professional educator standards
board to develop educator interpreter standards and identify
interpreter assessments that are available to school districts.
Interpreter assessments should meet the following criteria: (A)
Include both written assessment and performance assessment; (B) be
offered by a national organization of professional sign language
interpreters and transliterators; and (C) be designed to assess
performance in more than one sign system or sign language. The board
shall establish a performance standard, defining what constitutes a
minimum assessment result, for each educational interpreter assessment
identified. The board shall publicize the standards and assessments
for school district use.
(e) $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil
rights.
(f) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the
education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.
(g) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational
opportunity for military children).
(h) $159,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
185, Laws of 2011 (bullying prevention), which requires the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to convene an ongoing
workgroup on school bullying and harassment prevention. Within the
amounts provided, $140,000 is for youth suicide prevention activities.
(i) $1,227,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,227,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive
data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including
development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and
research system (CEDARS).
(j) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for project citizen, a program
sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the
center for civic education to promote participation in government by
middle school students.
(k) $166,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 192,
Laws of 2011 (school district insolvency). Funding is provided to
develop a clear legal framework and process for dissolution of a school
district.
(l) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2799
(collaborative schools). If such legislation is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(m) $128,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 2254
(foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall report on the implementation of the state's plan of
cross-system collaboration to promote educational stability and improve
education outcomes of foster youth. The first report is due December
1, 2012, and annually thereafter through 2015. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(n) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2337
(open K-12 education resources). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(o) $238,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of Initiative Measure
No. 1240 (charter schools).
(2) $9,267,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $12,267,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are for statewide programs.

(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) $2,541,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,541,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at
educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of
public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to
provide direct care to students, health education, and training for
school staff.
(ii) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a nonviolence and leadership
training program provided by the institute for community leadership.

(b) TECHNOLOGY
$1,221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2012 and $1,221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network
technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and
avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and
video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be
used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the
network.

(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers
scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support community
involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer
mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.
(ii) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for contracting with a college
scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to
students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound
scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007.
(iii) $2,808,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $2,808,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the
dissemination of the navigation 101 curriculum to all districts. The
funding shall support electronic student planning tools and software
for analyzing the impact of navigation 101 on student performance, as
well as grants to a maximum of one hundred school districts each year,
based on progress and need for the implementation of the navigation 101
program. The implementation grants shall be awarded to a cross-section
of school districts reflecting a balance of geographic and demographic
characteristics. Within the amounts provided, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction will create a navigation 101
accountability model to analyze the impact of the program.
(iv) $337,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $337,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementation of the building
bridges statewide program for comprehensive dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement strategies.
(v) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for dropout prevention programs at
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, including the
jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program.
(vi) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
340, Laws of 2011 (assessment of students in state-funded full-day
kindergarten classrooms), including the development and implementation
of the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills (WaKIDS).
Of the amounts in this subsection, $1,000,000 of the fiscal year 2013
appropriation is for the implementation of House Bill No. 2586
(kindergarten inventory). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012,
this amount shall lapse.
(vii) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for an urban school turnaround
initiative as follows:
(A) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
select two schools in the largest urban school district in the state.
The selected schools shall be among the state's lowest-performing
schools; be located within the same community and form a continuum of
education for the students in that community; have significant
educational achievement gaps; and include a mix of elementary, middle,
or high schools.
(B) The office shall allocate the funds under this subsection (vii)
to the school district to be used exclusively in the selected schools.
The district may not charge an overhead or indirect fee for the
allocated funds or supplant other state, federal, or local funds in the
selected schools. The school district shall use the funds for
intensive supplemental instruction, services, and materials in the
selected schools in the 2012-13 school year, including but not limited
to professional development for school staff; updated curriculum,
materials, and technology; extended learning opportunities for
students; reduced class size; summer enrichment activities;
school-based health clinics; and other research-based initiatives to
dramatically turn around the performance and close the achievement gap
in the schools. Priorities for the expenditure of the funds shall be
determined by the leadership and staff of each school.
(C) The office shall monitor the activities in the selected schools
and the expenditure of funds to ensure the intent of this subsection
(vii) is met, and submit a report to the legislature by December 1,
2013, including outcomes resulting from the urban school turnaround
initiative. The report submitted to the legislature must include a
comparison of student learning achievement in the selected schools with
schools of comparable demographics that have not participated in the
grant program.
(D) Funding provided in this subsection (vii) is intended to be
one-time.
(viii) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely to subsidize advanced placement exam fees
and international baccalaureate class fees and exam fees for low-income
students. To be eligible for the subsidy, a student must be either
enrolled or eligible to participate in the federal free or reduced
price lunch program, and the student must have maximized the allowable
federal contribution. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall set the subsidy in an amount so that the advanced
placement exam fee does not exceed $15.00 and the combined class and
exam fee for the international baccalaureate does not exceed $14.50.

Sec. 502 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,241,233,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,170,854,000))
$5,117,984,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,327,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,434,414,000))
$10,381,544,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such
funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal
year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(b) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as
provided in the funding formulas and salary schedules in sections 502
and 503 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.
(c) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as
provided in sections 502 and 504, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as amended
through sections 1402 and 1403 of this act.
(d) The appropriations in this section include federal funds
provided through section 101 of P.L. No. 111-226 (education jobs fund),
which shall be used to support general apportionment program funding.
In distributing general apportionment allocations under this section
for the 2011-12 school year, the superintendent shall include the
additional amount of $3,327,000 allocated by the United States
department of education on September 16, 2011, provided through 101 of
P.L. No. 111-226 (education jobs fund) as part of each district's
general apportionment allocation.
(e) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in
September and on the first school day of each month October through
June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. Any school district concluding its basic education
program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held
in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS
Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the
2011-12 and 2012-13 school years are determined using formula-generated
staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.
(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW
28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size
allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as
provided in RCW 28A.150.260. The superintendent shall make allocations
to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time
equivalent student enrollment in each grade.
(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in
this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW
28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of
prototypical school on the following regular education average class
size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided
in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade RCW 28A.150.260

Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23

Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53

Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for career and technical
education (CTE) and skill center programs average class size as
provided in RCW 28A.150.260.
(ii) For each level of prototypical school at which more than fifty
percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals
in the prior school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding
based on the following average class size of full-time equivalent
students per teacher:

General education class size in high poverty
school:

Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 24.10

Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53

Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(iii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher
planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is
13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and
(iv) Laboratory science, advanced placement, and international
baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as
general education schools in the same grade; and
(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social
workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated
based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and is
considered certificated instructional staff, except as provided in
(d)(ii) of this subsection.
(ii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill
center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to
provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social
workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following
combined rate per 1000 students:

Career and Technical Education
students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.02 per 1000 student FTE's
Skill Center students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.36 per 1000 student FTE's

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS
(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated
administrative staff salaries for the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years
for general education students are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and adjusted based
on a district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment
in each grade.
(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill
center programs generate certificated school building-level
administrator staff units at per student rates that exceed the general
education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following percentages:

Career and Technical Education students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.5 percent
Skill Center students . . . . . . . . . . . . 19.75 percent

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS
Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2011-12 and 2012-13
school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units
provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and adjusted based on each district's
annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS
In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated
in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and
administrative staff units are provided for the 2011-12 and 2012-13
school year for the central office administrative costs of operating a
school district, at the following rates:
(a) The total central office staff units provided in this
subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of
eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and
classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support
services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b), by 5.3 percent.
(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this
subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as
generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.47 percent shall be
allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3)
of this section.
(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of
basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and
staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students,
are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in
(a) of this subsection.
(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center
programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same
staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education
students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office
administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student
rates that exceed the general education rate established for students
in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 3.69 percent for career and
technical education students, and 21.92 percent for skill center
students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS
Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 16.33
percent in the 2011-12 school year and 16.34 percent in the 2012-13
school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 18.73
percent in the 2011-12 school year and 18.73 percent in the 2012-13
school year for classified salary allocations provided under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS
Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504 of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in
subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections
(4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is
intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of
distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified
employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per
year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time
equivalent.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS
Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent
student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC)
incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW
28A.150.260.
(a) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at
the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component 2011-12
SCHOOL YEAR 2012-13
SCHOOL YEAR

Technology $57.42 $58.28

Utilities and Insurance $156.03 $158.37

Curriculum and Textbooks $61.65 $62.58

Other Supplies and Library Materials $130.89 $132.85

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated
and Classified Staff
$9.53
$9.68

Facilities Maintenance $77.30 $78.46

Security and Central Office $53.55 $54.35

TOTAL BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE $546.37 $554.57

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student
FTE MSOC allocations which equal the rate for general education
students calculated in (a) of this subsection, multiplied by a factor
of 2.171.
(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education programs generate a per student MSOC allocation
that is equal to the rate for general education students calculated in
(a) of this subsection, multiplied by a factor of 2.442.
(d) Students in laboratory science courses generate per student FTE
MSOC allocations which equal the per student FTE rate for general
education students established in (a) of this subsection.

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS
For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, funding for substitute
costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute
days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this
section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING
(a) Amounts provided in this section are adjusted to reflect
provisions of House Bill No. 2065 (allocation of funding for funding
for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all
districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative
learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to
provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE
programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not
limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as
accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic
education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident
students.

(11) VOLUNTARY FULL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS
Funding in this section is sufficient to fund voluntary full day
kindergarten programs in qualifying high poverty schools, pursuant to
RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315. Each kindergarten student who enrolls
for the voluntary full-day program in a qualifying school shall count
as one-half of one full-time equivalent student for purpose of making
allocations under this section. Funding in this section provides full-day kindergarten programs for 21 percent of kindergarten enrollment in
the 2011-12 school year, and 22 percent in the 2012-13 school year.
Funding priority shall be given to schools with the highest poverty
levels, as measured by prior year free and reduced price lunch
eligibility rates in each school. Funding in this section is
sufficient to fund voluntary full day kindergarten programs for July
and August of the 2010-11 school year.

(12) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND
NECESSARY PLANTS
For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants
within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary
by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are
provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional
administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to
districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education
staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center
enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of
this section on a per district basis.
(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and
enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent
students in grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full-time equivalent students;
(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall
add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any
grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs
with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this
subsection;
(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit;
(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit;
(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit
allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified
staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit; and
(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support
small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under
subsection (12) of this section shall generate additional MSOC
allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC)
allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided
section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental
budget), adjusted annually for inflation.
(13) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(14) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following
programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2012
and 2013 as follows:
(a) $589,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $598,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for fire protection for school
districts located in a fire protection district as now or hereafter
established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.
(b) $436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for programs providing skills
training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day
school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public
instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500
per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.
(c) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund adjustments to
school districts' allocations resulting from the implementation of the
prototypical school funding formula, pursuant to chapter 236, Laws of
2010 (K-12 education funding). The funding in this section is intended
to hold school districts harmless in total for funding changes
resulting from conversion to the prototypical school formula in the
general apportionment program, the learning assistance program, the
transitional bilingual program, and the highly capable program, after
adjustment for changes in enrollment and other caseload adjustments.
(15) $208,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $211,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for school district emergencies as
certified by the superintendent of public instruction. At the close of
the fiscal year the superintendent of public instruction shall report
to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature on the allocations provided to districts
and the nature of the emergency.
(16) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of
1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463,
Laws of 2007.
(17) Beginning in the 2011-12 school year, students participating
in running start programs may be funded up to a combined maximum
enrollment of 1.2 FTE including school district and institution of
higher education enrollment. In calculating the combined 1.2 FTE, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction may average the
participating student's September through June enrollment to account
for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the
high school and higher education institution. Additionally, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the
state board for community and technical colleges, the higher education
coordinating board, and the education data center, shall annually track
and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined
FTE experience of students participating in the running start program,
including course load analyses at both the high school and community
and technical college system.
(18) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (12) of this section, the following apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (12) of this section shall be
reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.
(19)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved
career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not
exceed 15 percent of the combined basic education and career and
technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds.
Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are
considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting
purposes under this section.
(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent
enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the
enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall
be adjusted for reported career and technical education program
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

Sec. 503 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION
(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the
state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated
administrative, and classified staff units as provided in RCW
28A.150.280 and under section ((503)) 502 of this act:
(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units
are determined for each district by multiplying the district's
certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 2
by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP document
1; and
(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units
and classified staff units for each district are determined based on
the district's certificated administrative and classified salary
allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document 2.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "LEAP Document 1" means the staff mix factors for certificated
instructional staff according to education and years of experience, as
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee on May 23, 2011, at 16:10 hours; and
(b) "LEAP Document 2" means the school year salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff and classified staff and derived and
total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed
by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on
May 23, 2011, at 16:10 hours.
(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary
adjustments at a rate of 15.69 percent for school year 2011-12 and
15.70 percent for school year 2012-13 for certificated instructional
and certificated administrative staff and 15.23 percent for school year
2011-12 and 15.23 percent for the 2012-13 school year for classified
staff.
(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary
allocation schedules for certificated instructional staff are
established for basic education salary allocations:

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff For School Year 2011-12
***Education Experience***

Years MA+90

of OR

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 Ph.D.

0 33,401 34,303 35,238 36,175 39,180 41,116 40,045 43,051 44,989

1 33,851 34,765 35,712 36,690 39,727 41,652 40,490 43,527 45,452

2 34,279 35,202 36,159 37,212 40,241 42,186 40,938 43,966 45,912

3 34,720 35,653 36,620 37,706 40,729 42,722 41,363 44,384 46,377

4 35,153 36,127 37,099 38,224 41,264 43,271 41,808 44,849 46,857

5 35,600 36,578 37,561 38,748 41,777 43,824 42,261 45,291 47,339

6 36,060 37,017 38,032 39,279 42,293 44,352 42,725 45,740 47,797

7 36,868 37,839 38,868 40,182 43,241 45,356 43,594 46,652 48,768

8 38,050 39,074 40,127 41,550 44,651 46,844 44,961 48,063 50,254

9 40,353 41,459 42,933 46,106 48,373 46,343 49,518 51,785

10 42,806 44,387 47,602 49,945 47,798 51,014 53,356

11 45,883 49,169 51,558 49,295 52,581 54,969

12 47,332 50,777 53,238 50,850 54,188 56,650

13 52,425 54,959 52,460 55,836 58,370

14 54,081 56,745 54,117 57,600 60,157

15 55,488 58,221 55,523 59,098 61,721

16 or more 56,597 59,385 56,634 60,279 62,955

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff For School Year 2012-13
***Education Experience***

Years MA+90

of OR

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 Ph.D.

0 33,401 34,303 35,238 36,175 39,180 41,116 40,045 43,051 44,989

1 33,851 34,765 35,712 36,690 39,727 41,652 40,490 43,527 45,452

2 34,279 35,202 36,159 37,212 40,241 42,186 40,938 43,966 45,912

3 34,720 35,653 36,620 37,706 40,729 42,722 41,363 44,384 46,377

4 35,153 36,127 37,099 38,224 41,264 43,271 41,808 44,849 46,857

5 35,600 36,578 37,561 38,748 41,777 43,824 42,261 45,291 47,339

6 36,060 37,017 38,032 39,279 42,293 44,352 42,725 45,740 47,797

7 36,868 37,839 38,868 40,182 43,241 45,356 43,594 46,652 48,768

8 38,050 39,074 40,127 41,550 44,651 46,844 44,961 48,063 50,254

9 40,353 41,459 42,933 46,106 48,373 46,343 49,518 51,785

10 42,806 44,387 47,602 49,945 47,798 51,014 53,356

11 45,883 49,169 51,558 49,295 52,581 54,969

12 47,332 50,777 53,238 50,850 54,188 56,650

13 52,425 54,959 52,460 55,836 58,370

14 54,081 56,745 54,117 57,600 60,157

15 55,488 58,221 55,523 59,098 61,721

16 or more 56,597 59,385 56,634 60,279 62,955

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer
to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate
degree.
(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before
the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be
counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection,
the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:
(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and
(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.
(b) "MA" means a masters degree.
(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.
(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent
in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and
28A.415.023.
(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by
any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine
compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and
LEAP documents referenced in this part V, or any replacement schedules
and documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(7) The salary allocation schedules established in this section are
for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

Sec. 504 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Additional salary adjustments as necessary to fund the base
salaries for certificated instructional staff as listed for each
district in LEAP Document 2, defined in section ((504)) 503(2)(b) of
this act. Allocations for these salary adjustments shall be provided
to all districts that are not grandfathered to receive salary
allocations above the statewide salary allocation schedule, and to
certain grandfathered districts to the extent necessary to ensure that
salary allocations for districts that are currently grandfathered do
not fall below the statewide salary allocation schedule.
(b) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff as listed for each district in LEAP
Document 2, defined in section ((504)) 503(2)(b) of this act.
(c) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for classified
staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2, defined in
section ((504)) 503(2)(b) of this act.
(d) The appropriations in this subsection (1) include associated
incremental fringe benefit allocations at 15.69 percent for the 2011-12
school year and 15.70 percent for the 2012-13 school year for
certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and
15.23 percent for the 2011-12 school year and 15.23 percent for the
2012-13 school year for classified staff.
(e) The appropriations in this section include the increased or
decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all
relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes
for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in sections ((503 and 504)) 502
and 503 of this act. Changes for special education result from changes
in each district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
((503 and 504)) 502 and 503 of this act.
(f) The appropriations in this section include no salary
adjustments for substitute teachers.
(2) The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is
$768.00 per month for the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years. The
appropriations in this section reflect the incremental change in cost
of allocating rates of $768.00 per month for the 2011-12 school year
and $768.00 per month for the 2012-13 school year.
(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

Sec. 505 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $322,243,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($273,642,000))
$273,893,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($595,885,000))
$596,136,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for the
transportation of students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192.
(b) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of
students as provided in section 505, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1404 of this act.
(3) Any amounts appropriated for maintenance level funding for
pupil transportation that exceed actual maintenance level expenditures
as calculated under the funding formula that takes effect September 1,
2011, shall be distributed to districts according to RCW
28A.160.192(2)(b).
(4) A maximum of $892,000 of this fiscal year 2012 appropriation
and a maximum of $892,000 of the fiscal year 2013 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus
purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction
determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process
based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to
those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall base
depreciation payments for school district buses on the pre-sales tax
five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus.
In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation
payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus
category for that school year.
(7) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the
state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW
28A.305.141.
(8) Starting with the 2012-13 school year, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall disburse payments for bus
depreciation in August.

Sec. 506 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE
PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,111,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,111,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($436,400,000))
$456,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($450,622,000))
$470,622,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $7,111,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $7,111,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for state matching money for
federal child nutrition programs, and may support the meals for kids
program through the following allowable uses:
(a) Elimination of breakfast copays for eligible public school
students and lunch copays for eligible public school students in grades
kindergarten through third grade who are eligible for reduced price
lunch;
(b) Assistance to school districts and authorized public and
private nonprofit organizations for supporting summer food service
programs, and initiating new summer food service programs in low-income
areas;
(c) Reimbursements to school districts for school breakfasts served
to students eligible for free and reduced price lunch, pursuant to
chapter 287, Laws of 2005; and
(d) Assistance to school districts in initiating and expanding
school breakfast programs.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report
annually to the fiscal committees of the legislature on annual
expenditures in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection.

Sec. 507 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $648,369,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($679,832,000))
$658,489,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($486,922,000))
$495,922,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $756,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,815,879,000))
$1,803,536,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to
implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed
by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to
section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.
(c) Beginning with the 2010-11 school year award cycle, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award
determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school
year. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety
net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from
the current school year.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for special
education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390.
(b) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school district programs for special education
students as provided in section 507, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1406 of this act.
(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions
for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW
28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund--state funded special
education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual
enrollment percent or 12.7 percent.
(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW
28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate
rather than individual district units. For purposes of this
subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than
individual district units.
(7) $8,914,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, (($34,200,000)) $9,469,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and (($29,574,000)) $32,574,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for safety
net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special education
funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section.
If the federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility
threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in
any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal
discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of
each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds
that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not
subsequently eligible.
(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, safety net funds
shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as
provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (ESHB 2261).
(b) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
operate the safety net oversight committee and shall award safety net
funds as provided in section 507, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as amended
through section 1406 of this act.
(8) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund--state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund--state funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special
education program.
(11) $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for two additional full-time
equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to
provide training and support to districts applying for safety net
awards.
(12) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
shall be expended to support a special education ombudsman program
within the office of superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 508 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE
DISTRICTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,894,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,912,000))
$7,888,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,806,000))
$15,782,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional
professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum
and instructional strategies. Funding shall be distributed among the
educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions
in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use
this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated
instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter
and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials,
and other expenditures related to providing regional professional
development support.
(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.310.340, may
receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct
school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education
rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

Sec. 509 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR LOCAL EFFORT
ASSISTANCE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,768,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($298,166,000))
$299,537,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($603,334,000))
$604,705,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the
increase per full-time equivalent student is 3 percent from the 2010-11
school year to the 2011-12 school year and 5 percent from the 2011-12
school year to the 2012-13 school year.

Sec. 510 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,694,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,867,000))
$14,883,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,561,000))
$31,577,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund--state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $586,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $549,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to maintain at least one
certificated instructional staff and related support services at an
institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support
one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish
the educational program. The following types of institutions are
included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, programs for juveniles
under the juvenile rehabilitation administration, and programs for
juveniles operated by city and county jails.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 511 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,745,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,788,000))
$9,127,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,533,000))
$17,872,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable
students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i)
Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly
capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students
per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900
instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the district's average staff
mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this
act.
(b) From July 1, 2011, to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable
students as provided in section 511, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1409 of this act.
(3) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort
Worden state park.

Sec. 512 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,575,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,666,000))
$83,417,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,001,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($231,242,000))
$233,993,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual
programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages:
(i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional
bilingual program student; (ii) fifteen transitional bilingual program
students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900
instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the district's average staff
mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this
act.
(b) From July 1, 2011, to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual
instruction programs as provided in section 514, chapter 564, Laws of
2009, as amended through section 1411 of this act.
(c) The allocations in this section reflect the implementation of
a new funding formula for the transitional bilingual instructional
program, effective September 1, 2011, as specified in RCW
28A.150.260(10)(b).
(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts
in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of
assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the
following amounts: 2.79 percent for school year 2011-12 and 2.11
percent for school year 2012-13.
(4) The general fund--federal appropriation in this section is for
migrant education under Title I Part C and English language
acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the
elementary and secondary education act.
(5) In preparing its 2013-15 biennial budget request, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall ((prepare for
implementation of)) propose a funding model for the transitional
bilingual program, beginning in school year 2013-14, that is scaled to
provide more support to students requiring most intensive intervention,
(students with beginning levels of English language proficiency) and
less support to students requiring less intervention. The ((funding
model)) proposal shall also provide up to two years of bonus funding
upon successful exit from the bilingual program to facilitate
successful transition to a standard program of education.
$35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2012 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 are provided solely to track current and former transitional
bilingual program students.

Sec. 513 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,619,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($128,779,000))
$127,198,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($492,207,000))
$494,207,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,990,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($747,595,000))
$748,014,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund--state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b)(i) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance
programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages:
(A) Additional instruction of 1.51560 hours per week per funded
learning assistance program student; (B) fifteen learning assistance
program students per teacher; (C) 36 instructional weeks per year; (D)
900 instructional hours per teacher; and (E) the district's average
staff mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of
this act.
(ii) From July 1, 2011, to August 31, 2011, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance
programs as provided in section 515, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1412 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent
enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the
district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12
eligible for free or reduced price lunch in the prior school year.
(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through
the annual income verification process required by the national school
lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the
learning assistance program dated February, 2010.
(3) The general fund--federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund-state or education legacy trust funds
allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be
expended for the learning assistance program.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
research and recommend options for an adjustment factor for middle
school and high school free and reduced price lunch eligibility
reporting rates pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(12)(a), and submit a report
to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 1, 2012. For the
2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the adjustment factor is 1.0.

Sec. 514 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through
part V of this act are for allocations purposes only and do not entitle
a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific
service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of
this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A
RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control
unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement.
Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts
required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the
program of basic education.
(2) To the maximum extent practicable, when adopting new or revised
rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part
V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall attempt to seek legislative
approval through the budget request process.
(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as
expressly provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2012)) 2013,
unless specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the
director of financial management, the superintendent of public
instruction may transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal
year ((2012)) 2013 among the following programs to meet the
apportionment schedule for a specified formula in another of these
programs: General apportionment; employee compensation adjustments;
pupil transportation; special education programs; institutional
education programs; transitional bilingual programs; highly capable;
and learning assistance programs.
(5) The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving
any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
Sec. 601 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $532,841,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($516,861,000))
$554,861,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,793,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($95,256,000))
$57,256,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,157,751,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $28,761,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $28,761,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely as special funds for training and
related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW
28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in fiscal year 2012 and at least 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in fiscal year 2013.
(2) $2,725,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,725,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for administration and customized
training contracts through the job skills program. The state board
shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor
and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature
regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant
awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of
the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these
funds.
(3) $4,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $4,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for worker retraining.
(4) Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $5,000,000 is
provided solely for the student achievement initiative.
(5) When implementing the appropriations in this section, the state
board and the trustees of the individual community and technical
colleges shall minimize impact on academic programs, maximize
reductions in administration, and shall at least maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment opportunities and degree and certificate
production in high employer-demand fields of study at their academic
year 2008-09 levels.
(6) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass
mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community
and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as
mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online
information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.
(7) Bellevue college is authorized to offer applied baccalaureate
degrees in information technology, health care services and management,
biotechnology, and preprofessional preparation for medical fields.
These degrees shall be directed at high school graduates and transfer-oriented degree and professional and technical degree holders. In
fiscal year 2012, Bellevue college will develop a two-year plan for
offering these new degrees. The plan will assume funding for these new
degrees shall come through redistribution of its current per full-time
enrollment funding. The plan shall be delivered to the legislature by
June 30, 2012.
(8) The Seattle community college district is authorized to offer
applied baccalaureate degree programs in business/international
business and technology management, interactive and artistic digital
media, sustainability, building science technology, and allied and
global health. These degrees shall be directed at high school
graduates and professional and technical degree holders. In fiscal
year 2012, Seattle community colleges shall develop a two-year plan for
offering these new degrees. The plan will assume that funding for
these new degrees comes through redistribution of its current per full-time enrollment funding. The plan shall be delivered to the
legislature by June 30, 2012.
(9) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the Jefferson education center.
(10) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for an expansion in enrollments in
science, technology, engineering, and math. Amounts provided in this
subsection may be used only to cover direct costs of instruction
associated with this enrollment expansion. By June 30, 2012, the state
board for community and technical colleges shall provide a report to
the legislature that provides specific detail on how these amounts will
be spent. Each June 30th thereafter, the state board for community and
technical colleges shall provide an updated report that provides
specific detail on how these amounts were spent in the preceding twelve
months.
(11) Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient for the
state board for community and technical colleges to conduct a
comprehensive review of its tuition waiver policies. The resulting
report shall include an overview of tuition waiver uses and costs
(forgone revenue) and outcomes and any recommendations for changes to
tuition waiver policy and shall be provided to the legislature no later
than December 1, 2012.
(12) $131,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2156 (workforce training/aerospace). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(13) The state board for community and technical colleges shall not
use funds appropriated in this section to support intercollegiate
athletics programs.
(14) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,851,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of the
customized training program under RCW 28B.67.020.

Sec. 602 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 602 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $201,226,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $201,612,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,579,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Biotoxin Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($450,000))
$350,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,681,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,488,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($436,536,000))
$436,436,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and regents shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other noninstructional activities.
(2) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the development of integrated
medical curriculum for the Washington/Wyoming/Alaska/Montana/Idaho
(WWAMI) medical education program in Spokane and eastern Washington.
Funding is contingent on appropriations being provided to Washington
State University for WWAMI program expansion in Spokane and eastern
Washington.
(3) $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the center for international
trade in forest products in the college of forest resources.
(4) $88,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5485 (state's natural resources). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $143,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the ongoing management of the
Washington park arboretum.
(6) $3,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for an expansion in engineering
enrollments, including enrollments in the field of computer science.
Amounts provided in this subsection may be used only to cover direct
costs of instruction associated with this enrollment expansion. By
June 30, 2012, the university shall provide a report to the legislature
that provides specific detail on how these amounts will be spent. Each
September 1st thereafter, the university shall provide an updated
report that provides specific detail on how these amounts were spent in
the preceding twelve months.
(7) Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient for the
university to conduct a comprehensive review of its tuition waiver
policies. The resulting report shall include an overview of tuition
waiver uses and costs (forgone revenue) and outcomes and any
recommendations for changes to tuition waiver policy and shall be
provided to the legislature no later than December 1, 2012.
(8) $610,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely to expand health sciences capacity at the
University of Washington for Washington, Wyoming, Alaska, Montana,
Idaho (WWAMI) and $190,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 is provided solely to expand health sciences capacity
at the University of Washington for Regional Initiatives in Dental
Education (RIDE) for the WWAMI-RIDE program expansion to achieve full
ramp-up of first-year medical students and dental students each year of
the four-year programs.
(9) The University of Washington shall not use funds appropriated
in this section to support intercollegiate athletics programs.
(10) Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient to cover
the costs associated with the implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6486 (collective bargaining for post-doctoral
researchers).

Sec. 603 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL--OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $247,034,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,812,000
Washington Opportunity Pathways Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,500,000
Aerospace Training Student Loan Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($326,346,000))
$326,358,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $237,018,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $73,500,000 of the opportunity pathways account--state appropriation are provided solely for student financial aid
payments under the state need grant and the state work study programs
including up to a four percent administrative allowance for the state
work study program.
(2) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility for
the state need grant shall include students with family incomes at or
below 70 percent of the state median family income (MFI), adjusted for
family size, and shall include students enrolled in three to five
credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits.
The higher education coordinating board shall report to the legislature
by December 1, 2013, regarding the number of students enrolled in three
to five credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester
credits, and their academic progress including degree completion.
Awards for all students shall be adjusted by the estimated amount by
which Pell grant increases exceed projected increases in the
noninstructional costs of attendance. Awards for students with incomes
between 51 and 70 percent of the state median shall be prorated at the
following percentages of the award amount granted to those with incomes
below 51 percent of the MFI: 70 percent for students with family
incomes between 51 and 55 percent MFI; 65 percent for students with
family incomes between 56 and 60 percent MFI; 60 percent for students
with family incomes between 61 and 65 percent MFI; and 50 percent for
students with family incomes between 66 and 70 percent MFI.
(3) $1,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of the aerospace
training scholarship and student loan program as specified in Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1846 (aerospace student loans). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(4) For fiscal year 2013, the board shall defer loan or conditional
scholarship repayments to the future teachers conditional scholarship
and loan repayment program for up to one year for each participant if
the participant has shown evidence of efforts to find a teaching job
but has been unable to secure a teaching job per the requirements of
the program.
(5) $1,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the gaining early awareness and
readiness for undergraduate programs project.
(6) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the leadership 1000 program.
(7) $2,436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the passport to college program. The
maximum scholarship award shall be $5,000. The board shall contract
with a nonprofit organization to provide support services to increase
student completion in their postsecondary program and shall, under this
contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal year 2013 for this
purpose.
(8) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 28B.122.010, the
aerospace student loan program may provide loans to students attending
an aerospace training program at Renton technical college.
(9) The office of student financial assistance and the department
of health shall prioritize a portion of any nonfederal balances in the
health professional loan repayment and scholarship fund for conditional
loan repayment contracts with psychiatrists and with advanced
registered nurse practitioners for work at one of the state-operated
psychiatric hospitals. The office and department shall designate the
state hospitals as health professional shortage areas if necessary for
this purpose. The office of student financial assistance shall
coordinate with the department of social and health services to
effectively incorporate these conditional loan repayments into the
department's advanced psychiatric professional recruitment and
retention strategies.
(10) $50,000 of the amount provided in this section shall be used
to convene the higher education loan program work group. The work
group shall develop methods for funding the loan program in the future,
as well as recommendations regarding the best loan program structure
for providing financial aid to underserved populations. The work group
shall seek out technical advice from the housing finance commission.
At a minimum, the recommendations regarding the proposed loan program
must take into account the following: Whether students could benefit
from the creation of a new student loan program; the relationship
between the student loan program and the state need grant program and
the state need grant qualified student population; mechanisms to
achieve interest rates that are below those offered in federally
guaranteed and private bank student loans; sources of initial and
on-going funding for loans and program operation; and default risks,
reserve requirements, and other conditions required for the student
loan program. The work group shall provide a report to the legislature
no later than December 1, 2012.

Sec. 604 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,497,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,190,000))
$27,351,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,619,000
Opportunity Pathways Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,000,000
Home Visiting Services Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Children's Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $142,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($411,606,000))
$411,909,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $16,028,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $18,028,000 of the general fund--state appropriation of
fiscal year 2013, $78,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account
appropriation, and $2,256,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education
assistance program services. Of these amounts, $10,284,000 is a
portion of the biennial amount of state maintenance of effort dollars
required to receive federal child care and development fund grant
dollars.
(2) In accordance to RCW 43.215.255(2) and 43.135.055, the
department is authorized to increase child care center and child care
family home licensure fees in fiscal years 2012 and 2013 for costs to
the department for the licensure activity, including costs of necessary
inspection. These increases are necessary to support expenditures
authorized in this section.
(3) $64,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $638,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $574,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for child care resource and referral network services.
(4) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally
relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers.
(5) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the
federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this
grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives,
agency administration, and other costs associated with child care
subsidies. The department shall transfer a portion of this grant to
the department of social and health services to fund the child care
subsidies paid by the department of social and health services on
behalf of the department of early learning.
(6) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions in the
appropriations for the department's administrative expenses. It is the
intent of the legislature that these reductions shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs
that do not affect direct client services or direct service delivery or
program.
(7) $934,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $934,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $2,400,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for expenditure into the home visiting services
account. This funding is intended to meet federal maintenance of
effort requirements and to secure private matching funds.
(a) All federal funds received by the department for home visiting
activities must be deposited into the home visiting services account.
(b) The department must consult with stakeholders during the
development of the Washington home visiting plan and any future
proposals for federal funding.
(c) No more than $300,000 of the home visiting services account--federal appropriation may be expended for program administration for
fiscal year 2013 pursuant to RCW 43.215.130. No other funds may be
expended for that purpose.
(8)(a) $153,558,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the working connections child care program under
RCW 43.215.135.
(b) In addition to groups that were given prioritized access to the
working connections child care program effective March 1, 2011, the
department shall also give prioritized access into the program to
families in which a parent of a child in care is a minor who is not
living with a parent or guardian and who is a full-time student in a
high school that has a school-sponsored on-site child care center.
(9)(a) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,050,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementation and
administration of an electronic benefit transfer system. The system
shall include electronic time keeping, integrated with an eligibility
information technology system, and an electronic payment system. The
department shall coordinate implementation of this system with the
department of social and health services.
(b) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in this
subsection is provided solely for the department to contract for an
independent consultant to evaluate and recommend the optimum system for
the eligibility determination process. The evaluation must include an
analysis of lean management processes that, if adopted, could improve
the cost effectiveness and delivery of eligibility determination. The
department shall coordinate with the department of social and health
services for this evaluation. The department must report to the office
of financial management and the appropriate fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2012.
(10) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with
the office of financial management and the department of social and
health services shall report quarterly enrollments and active caseload
for the working connections child care program to the legislative
fiscal committees and the legislative-executive WorkFirst oversight
task force. The report shall also identify the number of cases
participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and
working connections child care.
(11) $1,025,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 and $6,712,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the seasonal child care program in fiscal year
2013.
(12) $2,522,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $2,522,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $4,304,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the medicaid treatment child care
(MTCC) program. The department shall contract for MTCC services to
provide therapeutic child care and other specialized treatment services
to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected children. Priority
for services shall be given to children referred from the department of
social and health services children's administration. In addition to
referrals made by children's administration, the department shall
authorize services for children referred to the MTCC program, as long
as the children meet the eligibility requirements as outlined in the
Washington state plan for the MTCC program. Of the amounts
appropriated in this subsection, $60,000 per fiscal year may be used by
the department for administering the MTCC program, if needed.
(13)(a) The department shall establish a birth-to-three
subcommittee of the early learning advisory council. The subcommittee
will be cochaired by the department and nongovernmental private-public
partnership created in RCW 43.215.070. The subcommittee shall include
at least one representative from each of the following:
(i) The early learning advisory council;
(ii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(iii) The department of social and health services;
(iv) The department of early learning;
(v) The nongovernmental private-public partnership created in RCW
43.215.070;
(vi) The early learning action alliance; and
(vii) Additional stakeholders with expertise in birth-to-three
policy and programs and quality child care, as designated by the early
learning advisory council.
(b) The subcommittee may convene advisory subgroups on specific
topics as necessary to assure participation and input from a broad
array of diverse stakeholders.
(c) The subcommittee shall be monitored and overseen by the early
learning advisory council created in RCW 43.215.090.
(d) The subcommittee shall develop a birth-to-three implementation
proposal, which shall include further development of the Washington
state birth-to-three plan.
(e) The subcommittee must include recommendations on the following
in its birth-to-three proposal:
(i) Eligibility criteria for providers and programs;
(ii) The level of funding necessary to implement birth-to-three
programs, including an option which makes available funding equivalent
to thirty percent of the funding provided for the program of early
learning established in RCW 43.215.141;
(iii) Options for funding sources for birth-to-three programs;
(iv) Governance responsibilities for the department of early
learning; and
(v) A timeline for implementation that is concurrent with the
expansion to the early learning program outlined in RCW 43.215.142.
The subcommittee must present its recommendations to the early
learning advisory council and the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2012.
(14) $300,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for a contract with a nonprofit entity experienced in
the provision of promoting early literacy for children through
pediatric office visits.

Sec. 605 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 616 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,776,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,671,000))
$5,691,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,447,000))
$11,467,000

Sec. 606 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 617 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING
LOSS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,439,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,335,000))
$8,431,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,774,000))
$16,870,000

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 701 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT
LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $911,643,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($949,349,000))
$940,324,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,866,000))
$6,002,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($121,000))
$144,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000))
$5,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($90,000))
$71,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,000))
$23,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retire Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,300,000))
$2,299,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,867,386,000))
$1,860,511,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.
The entire general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2012 shall
be expended into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account by
June 30, 2012.

Sec. 702 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO
BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,400,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,572,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($140,128,000))
$137,295,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($198,100,000))
$195,267,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
expenditure into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement
account. The entire general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2012 shall be expended into the nondebt-limit general fund bond
retirement account by June 30, 2012.

Sec. 703 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,357,000))
$287,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($356,000))
$291,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,000))
$19,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,000))
$31,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000))
$3,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,119,000))
$1,989,000

Sec. 704 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 707 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS
The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are
appropriated from the general fund for fiscal year 2012, unless
otherwise indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and
corporations for sundry claims. These appropriations are to be
disbursed on vouchers approved by the director of financial management,
except as otherwise provided, for reimbursement of criminal defendants
acquitted on the basis of self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110, as
follows:

(1) Clint L. Powell, Jr., claim number 99970048 . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,155.10
(2) Chance L. Hawkins, claim number 99970049 . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,838.95
(3) Edgar L. Hawkins, claim number 99970050 . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,507.00
(4) James Abbott, claim number 99970051 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,880.00
(5) Richard Frisk, claim number 99970052 . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,788.50
(6) Brian Barnd-Spjut, claim number 99970053 . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,821.79
(7) Dwijen Buckendorf, claim number 99970059 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100.00
(8) Todd Chism, claim number 99970061 . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,183.26
(9) James Glasco, claim number 99970062 . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,800.00
(10) David Holtzclaw, claim number 99970057 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,154.52
(11) Gary Richey, claim number 99970063 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,020.00
(12) Shelly Porter, claim number 99970054 . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,525.72

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 801 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,289,000))
$7,774,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,078,000))
$49,864,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,281,000))
$5,805,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety
and education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,000))
$66,000
General Fund Appropriation for habitat conservation
program distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly funded
autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,960,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for
harbor improvement revenue distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for
distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,229,000))
$61,175,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,566,000))
$69,531,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,843,000))
$26,829,000
City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for local
government financial assistance distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,159,000))
$13,988,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor
excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,617,000
Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Mitigation Account
Appropriation for distribution to local taxing
jurisdictions to mitigate the unintended revenue
redistribution effect of the sourcing law
changes . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,309,000))
$49,000,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation for
the Confederated Tribes of the Colville
Reservation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,478,000))
$7,481,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation for
the Spokane Tribe of Indians . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,794,000))
$4,795,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor
profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,132,000))
$96,253,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($407,953,000))
$428,298,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 802 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE
ACCOUNT
Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,439,000))
$2,422,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 803 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,626,000))
$1,615,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2011-2013 biennium to all
cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially
decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and
that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in
which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not
limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998
(deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license
suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations);
chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215,
Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 804 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 804 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood control
funds distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($74,000))
$52,000
General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing fees
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,430,000))
$1,747,000
Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal forest
reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,175,000))
$39,776,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,679,000))
$41,575,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 805 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 804 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $16,300,000
for fiscal year 2012 and
(($24,800,000)) $26,600,000 for fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,100,000))
$42,900,000
Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control
Account: For transfer to the state general
fund, $4,847,000 for fiscal year
2012 and $4,847,000 for fiscal year
2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,694,000
Aquatics Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $3,500,000 for fiscal
year 2012 and $3,500,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Savings Incentive Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $44,618,000 for fiscal year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,618,000
Distinguished Professorship Trust Fund: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal year 2012, an amount
not to exceed the actual cash balance of the fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,024,000
Washington Graduate Fellowship Trust Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal year 2012, an
amount not to exceed the actual cash balance of
the fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,028,000
College Faculty Awards Trust Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal year 2012, an amount
not to exceed the actual cash balance of the fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,996,000
Data Processing Revolving Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $5,960,000 for fiscal
year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,960,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer to
the drinking water assistance repayment account . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $2,100,000
for fiscal year 2012 and $2,100,000 for fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000
General Fund: For transfer to the streamlined sales
and use tax account, $24,520,000
for fiscal year 2012 and (($24,789,000)) $24,480,000
for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,309,000))
$49,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
water pollution control revolving account,
$7,750,000 for fiscal year 2012 and $7,750,000 for
fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,500,000
The Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $4,500,000 for fiscal year 2012 and
$4,500,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $4,000,000
for fiscal year 2012 and $4,000,000 for fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
drinking water assistance account, $10,000,000 for
fiscal year 2012 and $5,000,000 for fiscal year
2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account: For transfer to the state general fund,
$500,000 for fiscal year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Education Savings Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, (($54,431,000 for fiscal
year 2012)) an amount not to exceed the actual
cash balance of the fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,431,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account:
For transfer to the state general fund,
$2,330,000 for fiscal year 2012 and
$4,330,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,660,000
Education Construction Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $102,000,000 for fiscal year
2012 and $102,000,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $40,000,000
for fiscal year 2012 and $40,000,000
for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000,000
Foster Care Endowed Scholarship Trust Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund, $200,000 for fiscal year
2012 and $200,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Affordable Housing For All Account: For transfer to
the home security fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal year
2012 and $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, in an amount not to exceed the actual
amount of the annual base payment to the tobacco
settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,205,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the basic
health plan stabilization account from the amounts
deposited in the account that are attributable to the
annual strategic contribution payment received in
fiscal year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the basic
health plan stabilization account from the amounts
deposited in the account that are attributable to the
annual strategic contribution payment received in
fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life
sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to exceed
the actual remaining amount of the annual strategic
contribution payment to the tobacco settlement account
for fiscal year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life
sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to exceed
the actual remaining amount of the annual strategic
contribution payment to the tobacco settlement account
for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

The transfer to the life sciences discovery fund is subject to the
following conditions: All new grants awarded during the 2011-2013
fiscal biennium shall support and accelerate the commercialization of
an identifiable product.
Financial Services Regulation Fund: For transfer to
the state general fund, $4,000,000 for fiscal
year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
State Nursery Revolving Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $250,000 for fiscal year 2012 and
$250,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Washington State Heritage Center Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $2,000,000 for fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the state
toxics control account, $15,000,000 for fiscal
year 2012 and $16,000,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000,000
Coastal Protection Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $500,000 for fiscal year 2012 and
$500,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
((Multimodal Transportation Account--State: For transfer
to the Public Transportation Grant Program Account
for the purposes of distributions of $3,000,000 on
each of the last working days of December, March,
and June in fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000))
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to
the marine resources stewardship trust account,
$2,100,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 2011 c 41 s 3 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 81
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 90
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 98
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 84
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 101
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 95
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 58
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 56
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 83
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 139
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 105
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 96
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 107
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 156
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST: DEBT REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 159
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST: DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT . . . . . . . . . . . . 158
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 159
COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 162
FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 163
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 163
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 161
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 164
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL
OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 149
SUNDRY CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 160
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 109, 143
BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 127
EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 137
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 116
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 138
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 138
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 132
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 130
SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 133
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 134
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 140
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 1
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 147
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 156
--- END ---