BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and,
subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar
amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be
sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2015, out of the several funds specified in this act.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Fiscal year 2014" or "FY 2014" means the period beginning July
1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2014.
(b) "Fiscal year 2015" or "FY 2015" means the period beginning July
1, 2014, and ending June 30, 2015.
(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
(3) Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any
portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is
not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to
fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.
(4) The amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future
Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes only
and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts. "Prior
biennia" typically refers to the immediate prior biennium for
reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia in the case of
specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an estimate of what
may be appropriated for the project or program in the 2015-2017
biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero does not
necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding for
the project or program in the future.
(5) "Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless
the context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant
conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations.
Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances remaining
on June 30, 2013, from the 2011-2013 biennial appropriations for each
project.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND
REVIEW COMMITTEE
Review of Public Lands (92000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitation: The appropriation is provided solely for a
three part study of public recreation and habitat lands. Parts two and
three of the study must be conducted under contract with a qualified
economist at one of Washington's public universities.
(1) Part one of the study is a review of the operating budget
impacts of recreation and habitat land acquisitions by the departments
of fish and wildlife, natural resources, and by the state parks and
recreation commission over the past ten years. The review must
describe the separate acquisitions by each agency, including the
location, number of acres, the acquisition price, a general description
of the land, the intended use of the land at the time of acquisition,
and the source or sources of funding for the acquisition. The report
must also identify the current use of the land and whether the current
use matches the intended use at the time of acquisition. The review
must estimate the current biennial operating budget costs to manage the
land acquired and what the estimated capital and operating budget costs
are to put the land to its intended use if that has not yet occurred.
(2) Part two of the study is a review of estimated economic
benefits and costs from acquisitions of recreation and habitat lands.
The study must review and summarize the available literature describing
and quantifying the economic benefits and costs of public recreation
and habitat lands. The study must evaluate the reliability and
validity of measures used by federal and state agencies to estimate the
economic benefits of recreation and habitat lands.
(3) Part three of the study is an analysis of differences in public
land ownership among Washington's thirty-nine counties. The analysis
must report the number of acres and percentage of total acres in each
county owned by federal, state, tribal and local governmental agencies
by the following categories:
(a) Developed recreation land,
(b) Habitat and passive recreation land,
(c) Timber lands,
(d) Agricultural lands, and
(e) Other public lands.
The analysis must evaluate the hypothesis that higher amounts or
percentages of acres of public lands in the categories above are
detrimental to measures of economic vitality in the county. Measures
of economic vitality should include taxable sales per capita, median
household income, median per capita income, annual employment growth,
and unemployment rate. The study should control for other relevant
location related factors including elevation, population size and
density, urban or rural status, and proximity to major transportation
hubs such as commercial airports and seaports. The study should
include a review and compilation of literature and studies on this
topic.
(4) The report must be submitted to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1, 2014.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Archives Facilities Mechanical Systems Chiller Replacement
(30000003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Office of Financial Management Emergency Funds (30000027)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Rural Washington Loan Fund (19882002)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,260,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,365,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (20064008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions in section
131, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.
(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the reappropriation in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share
of the reappropriation is released for design costs only.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $692,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,210,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,902,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Rural Washington Loan Fund (20064010)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,656,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,471,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,127,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Job and Economic Development Grants (20064950)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 107, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,406,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,051,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,457,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Jobs in Communities (20064951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 140, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,428,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,822,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water Assistance Program (20074004)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,693,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,347,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Public Works Trust Fund (20074005)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $327,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Rural Washington Loan Fund (20074008)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,751,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,027,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(20074009)

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,434,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $195,566,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Job Development Fund Grants (20074010)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1032, chapter 520, Laws of 2007 and section 1005,
chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,061,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,869,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Longview Regional Water Treatment Plant Dredging (20081001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $126,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (20084001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Except as directed otherwise prior to the
effective date of this section, the department shall not expend the
reappropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of
project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both,
in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of
the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by
the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a
share of the reappropriation is released for design costs only.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $124,394,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,144,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Innovation Partnership Zones (20082003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,958,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Development Fund (20084850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,410,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,506,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,916,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Belfair Sewer Improvements (20084852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $506,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,794,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
2008 Local and Community Projects (20084861)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Except as directed otherwise prior to the
effective date of this section, the department shall not expend the
reappropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of
project costs have been either expended, or firmly committed, or both,
in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of
the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by
the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a
share of the reappropriation is released for design costs only.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,535,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,209,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,744,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000005)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,233,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,201,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,434,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,434,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000010)

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,076,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,177,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,253,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Innovation Partnership Zones (30000012)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(30000013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,964,000
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $751,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,715,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $127,285,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (30000019)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the reappropriation in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share
of the reappropriation is released for design costs only.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $556,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,589,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,145,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
2010 Local and Community Projects (30000082)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the reappropriation in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share
of the reappropriation is released for design costs only.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,961,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,169,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Schools (91000002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1013, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Temporary Public Works Grant Program (92000021)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations in this section are
subject to the provisions of section 6001, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st
sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,049,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,118,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,252,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,370,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Jobs Act for K-12 Public Schools and Higher Education Institutions
(91000085)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1016, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,643,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,166,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,809,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Community Economic Revitalization Board - Export Assistance Grants
and Loans (92000069)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1018, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $601,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,399,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000095)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For projects involving repair,
replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or
other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency
audit is obtainable, the public works board must require as a contract
condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade
efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the
audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,000,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $108,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000097)

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, Affordable Housing Trust Fund
(30000098)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1026, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,332,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,668,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (30000100)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1029, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.
(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the reappropriation in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share
of the reappropriation is released for design costs only.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,554,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,699,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,253,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building for the Arts Grants (30000101)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1030, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.
(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the reappropriation in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share
of the reappropriation is released for design costs only.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,137,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,325,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,462,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building Communities Fund Grants (30000102)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1027, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.
(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the reappropriation in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share
of the reappropriation is released for design costs only.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,727,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,676,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,403,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Public Works Assistance Account Program (30000103)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $213,483,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,329,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $221,812,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (30000166)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1002, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.
(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the reappropriation in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share
of the reappropriation is released for design costs only.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,541,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,276,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,817,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Clean Energy Partnership (30000175)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided solely for implementation of
the recommendations of the clean energy leadership council by providing
state matching funds for projects that:

(a) Integrate energy efficiency and renewable energy in buildings;
(b) Integrate renewable energy into the regional electrical grid;
(c) Advance bioenergy in the state.
(2) State funding must not exceed fifty percent of the total
program or project funds.
(3) Eligible projects must:
(a) Involve a majority of companies that are located in Washington
state;
(b) Represent a substantially new solution that is not widely
available today; and
(c) Be designed to generate solutions that are applicable both
inside and outside of the state.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,499,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Financing Energy/Water Efficiency (30000180)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,927,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Public Works Assistance Account Program 2013 Loan List (30000184)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2012-1B, developed
February 18, 2012.

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,781,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Energy Efficiency Grants for Local Governments (91000241)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 301, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,797,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $203,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Energy Efficiency Grants for Higher Education (91000242)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 307, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,910,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Weatherization (91000247)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1015, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,534,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,466,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Connell Klindworth Water Line Distribution (91000318)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $512,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $540,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Public Works Preconstruction Loan Program (91000319)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Families with Children (91000409)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 310, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for People with Developmental Disabilities (91000410)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1009, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Seniors and People with Physical Disabilities
(91000411)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 311, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,666,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,666,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for People with Chronic Mental Illness (91000412)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1010, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for the Homeless (91000413)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1011, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,944,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,944,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Farmworkers (91000414)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1012, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,215,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,215,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for People At Risk of Homelessness (91000415)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 312, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Low-Income Households (91000416)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1013, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,982,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,982,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
2012 Local and Community Projects (91000417)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
302, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.
(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the reappropriation in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share
of the reappropriation is released for design costs only.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,097,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $526,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,623,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1055 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Competitive Pool (91000432)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1014, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,530,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1056 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects 2012 (91000437)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section
1003, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.
(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the reappropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share
of the reappropriation is released for design costs only.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,831,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,004,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,835,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1057 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Innovation Partnership Zones - Facilities and Infrastructure
(92000089)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 309, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,177,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $343,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,520,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1058 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board Administered Economic
Development, Innovation, and Export Grants (92000096)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 304, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,891,000
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,836,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,727,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,871,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,598,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1059 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Main Street Improvement Grants (92000098)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 305, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,771,000
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $793,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,564,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $286,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1060 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Brownfield Redevelopment Grants (92000100)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely for redevelopment of the Bellingham waterfront.

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,492,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1061 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Port and Export Related Infrastructure (92000102)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 306, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,222,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,928,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1062 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (30000185)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.135.
(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been
either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient
to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is
useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature.
This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the
appropriation is released for design costs only.
(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Camp Korey . . . . . . . . . . . . $303,000
Boys and Girls Clubs of Bellevue . . . . . . . . . . . . $388,000
Boys and Girls Clubs of King county . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000
Boys and Girls Clubs of Skagit county . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
YMCA of Greater Seattle . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
Boys and Girls Clubs of Southwest Washington . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
Boys and Girls Clubs of South Puget Sound . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
New Life Community Development Agency . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,131,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,131,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,131,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1063 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building for the Arts Grants (30000186)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.750.
(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been
either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient
to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is
useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature.
This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the
appropriation is released for design costs only.
(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Washington Center for the Performing Arts . . . . . . . . . . . . $816,000
Tacoma Art Museum . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Coyote Central . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,000
Icicle Creek Center for the Arts . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,052,000
Capitol Hill Housing Foundation . . . . . . . . . . . . $565,000
Bellevue Youth Theatre Foundation . . . . . . . . . . . . $199,000
Broadway Center for the Performing Arts . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000
Capitol Theatre Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . $833,000
Bainbridge Island Museum of Art . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000
Tacoma Musical Playhouse . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Spokane Public Radio . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Stageworks Northwest . . . . . . . . . . . . $334,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,204,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,204,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,204,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1064 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Homeless Veterans (91000455)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
Homeless Veterans" in LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A, developed
April 10, 2013. The department shall evaluate projects on the LEAP
list and allocate the funding based on the requirements of RCW
43.185.050 and 43.185.070. Upon review of a completed application, if
the department determines that a project is not eligible or is not
ready to proceed, the department may reallocate the funding to the
highest ranking project on the alternate list in LEAP capital document
No. 2013-1A, developed April 10, 2013. The department shall, at its
discretion, determine the actual amount of funding to be allocated to
each project, provided that the total allocation does not exceed the
appropriation provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,367,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,367,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1065 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Farmworkers (91000457)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
Farmworkers" in LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A, developed April 10,
2013. The department shall evaluate projects on the LEAP list and
allocate the funding based on the requirements of RCW 43.185.050 and
43.185.070. Upon review of a completed application, if the department
determines that a project is not eligible or is not ready to proceed,
the department may reallocate the funding to the highest ranking
project on the alternate list in LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A,
developed April 10, 2013. The department shall, at its discretion,
determine the actual amount of funding to be allocated to each project,
provided that the total allocation does not exceed the appropriation
provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1066 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for People with Developmental Disabilities (91000458)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
People with Developmental Disabilities" in LEAP capital document No.
2013-1A, developed April 10, 2013. The department shall evaluate
projects on the LEAP list and allocate the funding based on the
requirements of RCW 43.185.050 and 43.185.070. Upon review of a
completed application, if the department determines that a project is
not eligible or is not ready to proceed, the department may reallocate
the funding to the highest ranking project on the alternate list in
LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A, developed April 10, 2013. The
department shall, at its discretion, determine the actual amount of
funding to be allocated to each project, provided that the total
allocation does not exceed the appropriation provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,019,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,019,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1067 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for People with Chronic Mental Illness (91000459)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
People with Chronic Mental Illness" in LEAP capital document No. 2013-1A, developed April 10, 2013. The department shall evaluate projects
on the LEAP list and allocate the funding based on the requirements of
RCW 43.185.050 and 43.185.070. Upon review of a completed application,
if the department determines that a project is not eligible or is not
ready to proceed, the department may reallocate the funding to the
highest ranking project on the alternate list in LEAP capital document
No. 2013-1A, developed April 10, 2013. The department shall, at its
discretion, determine the actual amount of funding to be allocated to
each project, provided that the total allocation does not exceed the
appropriation provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,064,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,064,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1068 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Sand Point Building 9 (91000446)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for the renovation of Sand Point Building 9 into affordable
housing units for low-income tenants.
(2) Up to $4,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is for
reimbursement to the University of Washington for its expenditures
associated with Sand Point Building 9 for infrastructure, major
repairs, operations and maintenance, staffing and development
preparation.
(3) The department may not expend the appropriation provided in
this section unless and until the United States department of education
and the United States department of the Navy provide the University of
Washington with title to Sand Point Building 9 that is either free and
clear or that, at a minimum, does not prohibit use of that property for
affordable housing. If the federal government does not provide such
title by January 1, 2015, the appropriation provided in this section
shall lapse.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1069 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Preservation (91000448)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants
to local housing authorities for the purchase of the housing projects
designated in this section. The purpose of providing the grants is to
assure the retention of subsidized housing for low-income tenants.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:
Charter House . . . . . . . . . . . . $777,000
Emerson Manor . . . . . . . . . . . . $829,000
Naches House . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,065,000
Wenatchee House . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,173,000
Harbor Manor . . . . . . . . . . . . $656,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1070 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000190)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the
community economic revitalization board may make loans to
municipalities to finance public facilities projects that will improve
opportunities for revitalizing existing retail, industrial, or
commercial properties located within incorporated areas. These
properties must have either been abandoned, or have more than seventy-five percent of their square footage vacant.
(1) Municipalities include: Cities, towns, counties, port
districts, and housing authorities of this state.
(2) Public facilities projects include: Planning, acquisition,
construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or
improvement of: Bridges; roads; research, testing, training, and
incubation facilities in areas designated as innovation partnership
zones under RCW 43.330.270; buildings or structures; domestic and
industrial water; earth stabilization; sanitary sewer; storm sewer;
railroad; electricity; telecommunications; transportation; natural gas;
and port facilities.
(3) The board may make a revitalization loan only for a public
facilities project approved by a municipality that demonstrates
convincing evidence that a specific private development or expansion is
ready to occur and will occur only if the public facility improvement
is made.
(4) The board may allow de minimis general system improvements to
be funded if they are critically linked to the viability of the
project.
(5) An application for a revitalization loan must be made in the
form and manner prescribed by the board. When evaluating and
prioritizing projects, the board must give consideration, at a minimum,
to the following factors:
(a) The project's value to the community, including evidence of
support from affected local businesses and government;
(b) The project's feasibility, using standard economic principles;
(c) Commitment of local matching resources and local participation;
(d) The project's inclusion in a capital facilities plan,
comprehensive plan, or local economic development plan consistent with
applicable state planning requirements;
(e) Whether the proposed project offers a health insurance plan for
employees that includes an option for dependents of employees; and
(f) The project's readiness to proceed.
(6) In making revitalization loans, the board must conform to the
following requirements:
(a) The board must provide reasonable terms and conditions for
repayment for loans;
(b) The board must not make loans that exceed twenty years in
duration;
(c) A municipality must begin repayment of a loan five years after
receiving it; and
(d) One or a combination of loans made to a municipality for a
specific project must not exceed two million dollars.
(7) The board must not provide financing for any public facilities
project that:
(a) Has the primary purpose of facilitating or promoting a retail
shopping development with a floor exceeding ten thousand square feet;
(b) Will result in a development or expansion that would displace
existing jobs in any other community in the state;
(c) Has the primary purpose of facilitating or promoting gambling;
(d) Is located outside the jurisdiction of the applicant; or
(e) Will result in a development or expansion of a professional
sports arena.

Appropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1071 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Mental Health Beds (91000447)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department of commerce, in collaboration with
the department of social and health services, to issue grants to
hospitals or other entities to establish new community hospital
inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment
facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, or crisis
stabilization facilities with sixteen or fewer beds for the purpose of
providing short term detention services through the publicly funded
mental health system. Funds may be used for construction and equipment
costs associated with establishment of the community hospital inpatient
psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and treatment facilities,
enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, or crisis
stabilization facilities. These funds shall not be used for operating
costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.
The department shall establish criteria for the issuance of grants and
priority shall be given to those proposals to establish new community
hospital inpatient psychiatric beds or free-standing evaluation and
treatment facilities. The criteria shall include:
(1) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration
with one or more regional support networks, as defined in RCW
71.24.025;
(2) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in
geographical access to short term detention services under chapter
71.05 RCW in their region;
(3) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly
funded and persons detained under the involuntary treatment act at
chapter 71.05 RCW;
(4) Evidence of capacity of the applicant to serve individuals with
medical and psychiatric comorbidities;
(5) A commitment by the applicant to maintain the beds or facility
for at least a ten year period;
(6) The date upon which structural modifications or construction
would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;
(7) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the
beds; and
(8) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and
prosecutors to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by
the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary
commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.
To accommodate the emergent need for inpatient psychiatric
services, the department of health and the department of commerce, in
collaboration with the department of social and health services shall
establish a concurrent and expedited process for the purpose of grant
applicants meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to
operate inpatient psychiatric beds, free-standing evaluation and
treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities,
or crisis stabilization facilities.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1072 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building Communities Fund Grants (30000188)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.125.
(2) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been
either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient
to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is
useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature.
This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the
appropriation is released for design costs only.
(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Interfaith community health center . . . . . . . . . . . . $559,000
LaCrosse community pride . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20,000
Gay city health project . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 64,000
YWCA Pierce county . . . . . . . . . . . . $305,000
University Heights center for the community . . . . . . . . . . . . $367,000
Brigit Collins family support center . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 62,000
Safeplace . . . . . . . . . . . . $241,000
Spokane neighborhood action partners . . . . . . . . . . . . $638,000
Associated ministries of Tacoma-Pierce county . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,000
Friends of youth . . . . . . . . . . . . $476,000
Behavioral health resources . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Ryther . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
PROVAIL . . . . . . . . . . . . $268,000
Vadis . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
New Life CDA . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
MLK FAME community center . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,279,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,279,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,279,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1073 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000189)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,400,000 for fiscal year 2014 and $4,400,000 for fiscal year
2015 is provided solely as state match for federal safe drinking water
funds.
(2) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of
a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility
for which an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the
public works board must require as a contract condition that the
project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The
project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its
drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,800,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $680,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $888,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1074 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Clean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (910000582)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) All expenditures from the state taxable building construction
account--state appropriation in this section must be used for projects
that provide a benefit to the public through development,
demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save
energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions or
otherwise increase energy independence for the state. All expenditures
must be used for projects that develop and acquire assets that have a
useful life of at least thirteen years. These requirements must be
specified in funding agreements issued by the department.
(2) For any project funded from the state taxable building
construction account--state appropriation in this section, state funds
must not exceed fifty percent of the estimated cost of a project, and
funding preference must be provided to projects that offer a higher
percentage of nonstate match funds.
(3)(a) $15,000,000 of the state taxable building construction
account--state appropriation in this section is provided solely to
create a revolving loan fund to support the widespread use of proven
building energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies now
inhibited by lack of access to capital.
(b) To create the loan fund, the department shall provide grant
funds to a competitively selected nonprofit lender that will provide
matching private capital and will administer the loan fund. The
department must select the loan fund administrator through a
competitive process, with scoring conducted by a group of qualified
experts, applying criteria specified by the department.
(c) The department must establish guidelines for the lender related
to applicant eligibility, the screening process, and evaluation and
selection criteria. The criteria must include requiring evidence of
support for the proposed project from the impacted community and
consistency with economic growth strategies and plans of the affected
local governments. Applications for loans from the revolving fund must
disclose all sources of public funding to be provided for a project.
The nonprofit lender must use the revolving loan fund to make
affordable loans for projects including, but not limited to:
Residential and commercial energy retrofits, residential and community-scale solar installations, anaerobic digesters to treat dairy and
organic waste, and combined heat and power projects using woody biomass
as a fuel source.
(d) The department must conduct due diligence activities associated
with the use of public funds, including oversight of the project
selection process and project monitoring.
(e) Projects seeking financing of solar installations under this
section must agree in contract to not participate in the cost-recovery
program under RCW 82.16.120.
(4) $15,000,000 of the state taxable building construction
account--state appropriation in this section is provided solely for
grants to advance renewable energy technologies by public and private
electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state. The
department shall work with utilities to offer matching grants for
projects that demonstrate new smart grid technologies. The department
shall develop a grant application process to competitively select
projects for grant awards, to include scoring conducted by a group of
qualified experts with application of criteria specified by the
department. Applications for grants must disclose all sources of
public funding to be provided for a project. The grant funds must be
used to fund projects that demonstrate how to: Integrate intermittent
renewables through energy storage and information technology, dispatch
energy storage resources from utility control rooms, use the thermal
properties and electric load of commercial buildings and district
energy systems to store energy, or otherwise improve the reliability
and reduce the costs of intermittent or distributed renewable energy.
(5) $6,000,000 of the state taxable building construction account--state appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to
match federal funds used to develop and demonstrate clean energy
technologies. The department shall work with the University of
Washington, Washington State University, and the Pacific Northwest
National Laboratory to offer matching funds for projects including, but
not limited to: Advancing energy storage and solar technologies, and
federal manufacturing innovation centers related to use of light-weight
carbon fiber components to advance energy efficiency in the
aeronautical, automotive, and marine sectors.
(6) The department must report on number and results of projects
funded through the clean energy fund, including the number of job hours
created and the number of jobs maintained and created, to the governor
and the legislature, by November 1, 2014.
(7) The energy recovery act account--federal appropriation in this
section is provided solely for loans, loan guarantees, and grants that
encourage the establishment of innovative and sustainable industries
for renewable energy and energy efficiency technology, consistent with
provisions of RCW 43.325.040 (energy freedom account).

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000,000
Energy Recovery Act Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1075 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
2013-2015 Energy Efficiency Grants (30000193)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $18,000,000 for fiscal year 2014 and
$7,000,000 for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for grants to be
awarded in competitive rounds to local agencies, public higher
education institutions, and state agencies for operational cost savings
improvements to facilities and related projects that result in energy
and operational cost savings.
(1) At least ten percent of each competitive grant round must be
awarded to small cities or towns with a population of five thousand or
fewer residents.
(2) In each competitive round, the higher the leverage ratio of
non-state funding sources to state grant and the higher the energy
savings, the higher the project ranking.
(3) The department must develop rating criteria and a scoring
system that provide access to at least five million dollars in energy
efficiency grants for projects that involve the purchase and
installation of Washington-manufactured solar energy systems, including
solar modules and inverters.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $265,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1076 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Weatherization (30000192)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for low-income weatherization through the energy matchmakers
program.
(2) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for continuation of the community energy efficiency program
administered by the Washington State University energy extension.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1077 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Projects for Jobs and Economic Development (92000151)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share
of the appropriations are released for design costs only.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriations are provided solely for the following list
of projects:

Projects for Jobs & Economic Development

City of Bremerton Puget Sound Naval Safety Project $1,300,000

Fairchild Airforce Base $2,700,000

City of Lynnwood Main Street Improvements $250,000

Port of Everett: Roll-On/Roll-Off Cargo Berth $1,500,000

Kittitas County Infrastructure and Facilities $5,000,000

City of Kennewick Industrial Land $1,000,000

Perry Tech Institute Building $1,000,000

City of Buckley Drinking Water Improvements $350,000

Coronado Reservoir Replacement $525,000

Hopelink Cleveland Street Project $1,000,000

Redmond Connector $1,300,000

Washougal Storm Water Decant Facility $1,000,000

Roslyn Renaissance Northwest Improvement Company Building $500,000

Everett/Tulalip Water Pipeline Construction $1,000,000

Renton Aerospace Training Center Construction $5,000,000

Renton Riverview Bridge Replacement $1,100,000

Omak City Sewer, Collection System, and Treatment Plant $2,000,000

Harper Pier Replacement $800,000

University Place Main Street Redevelopment $975,000

Sultan Alder Avenue Water/Sewer Line Replacement $185,000

Quincy Industrial Water Reclamation & Reuse $700,000

NW Medical School $136,000

Ione - 8th St Lift Station Replacement $165,000

Stevens PUD Projects $532,000

Port Orchard Bay St. Pedestrian Path - Phase 2 $336,000

Dekalb Pier - Phase 2 $255,000

Kenmore Village $300,000

South Kirkland TOD/Cross Kirkland Corridor $1,300,000

Washington Agriculture Discovery Center $100,000

Mountlake Terrace Mainstreet Grant $2,000,000

Issaquah - North Roadway Network Improvement $5,000,000

TRIDEC Development of Small Modular Reactor Proposal $500,000

City of Shelton Wastewater $1,500,000

Port of Moses Lake Firefighting System $300,000

Seattle Chinatown/ID Development $500,000

TOTAL $42,109,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,009,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,100,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,109,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1078 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Projects That Strengthen Communities and Quality of Life (92000230)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been
either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient
to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is
useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature.
This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the
appropriation is released for design costs only.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) $1,500,000 of the appropriation in this section from the state
building construction account--state is provided solely for design
development to align ongoing planning for the replacement of the
Seattle multimodal terminal at Colman dock with the creation of a
public park. The scope of work must provide a design plan that
includes an elevated park and corresponding amenities above the
terminal. Design development shall be delivered through the city of
Seattle. The scope of this project does not preclude any current plans
for Colman dock to replace or seismically upgrade the facility, nor
does it reduce the amount of general and commercial traffic, high
occupancy vehicles, transit, bicyclist and pedestrian movement.
(8) $500,000 of the appropriation from the environmental legacy
stewardship account--state is provided solely for an investigation of
possible contaminated soils around the Colman dock.
(9) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects that Strengthen Communities & Quality of Life

Ft. Vancouver - Mother Joseph Academy & Infantry Barracks $1,000,000

LaConner Boardwalk $1,600,000

Kent Interurban Trail Connector $750,000

Town of Concrete Public Safety Building $785,000

Complete Development of Ashford Park Facilities $1,000,000

Jackson Park Renovation $1,000,000

South Whatcom Library Construction $90,000

Guemes Channel Trail Project $700,000

Seabrook Trail $437,000

Vashon Island Allied Arts $2,000,000

Federal Way Performing Arts $2,000,000

Japanese Gulch Land Acquisition $1,000,000

Milton - Triangle Park ADA Upgrades $225,000

Langston Hughes Performing Arts Center - Storage $150,000

Wood Pellet Heat in Schools Pilot $500,000

Snohomish County Sheriff's Office South Precinct $1,000,000

Ravensdale Park $650,000

Worthington Park $210,000

Eastside Tacoma Community Center $400,000

228th Street Trail $500,000

Institute for Community Leadership $275,000

FISH of Vancouver/Nonprofit Community Service Center $1,000,000

Yelm Community Center $1,000,000

Ellensburg Depot $500,000

Roslyn City Hall $400,000

Northwest Carriage Museum $375,000

People's Community Center and Pool $500,000

Town of Concrete Fire and Life Safety Facility $500,000

Chehalis Pool $250,000

Mount Rainier Park Ranger Memorial $60,000

McAllister Air Museum $500,000

Repairs to Stevenson Grange $50,000

Meydenbauer Park Improvements $3,000,000

Sixty Acres Park Enhancements $750,000

Covington Community Park Phase 2 $2,100,000

Johnson Farm Museum - Anderson Island $250,000

Nikolai Project $40,000

Ft. Steilacoom Building Preservation $250,000

Plaza Roberto Maestas - Building the Beloved Community $1,000,000

Seattle Multimodal Terminal at Colman Dock/Public Park $2,000,000

Confluence Project $747,000

Castle Rock Citywide Residential Street Project $504,000

UWAVE $30,000

Transit-Community Center $800,000

Mt. Spokane Lodge $250,000

TOTAL $33,128,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,628,000
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,128,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1079 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Projects That Strengthen Youth and Families (92000227)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been
either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient
to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is
useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature.
This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the
appropriation is released for design costs only.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Projects that Strengthen Youth & Families

Emmanuel Family Life Center $250,000

Lower Falls Community Center $230,000

Jerry Taylor Memorial Plaza for Veterans $65,000

Spokane Valley Foodbank Remodel $225,000

Rainier Beach Urban Farm Youth Program $300,000

Algona Community Center $125,000

Community Center at the Village Green $500,000

Milton - Activities Center $250,000

S Everett Community Resource Center $53,000

Dynamic Aquatic and Autism Center $250,000

Disabled Veterans' Recreation Improvements $500,000

B. F. Day School Playground $157,000

YWCA Facility Improvements $231,000

King County Boys and Girls Club $1,000,000

The Children's Center - Vancouver $1,200,000

Food Lifeline Relocation $3,100,000

Camp Primetime Repairs and Improvements $100,000

Boys & Girls Club Community Center/Clubhouse $300,000

Safe Routes to School - 68th Avenue NW $471,000

Drug Abuse Prevention Center $114,000

SERA Campus Multi-Sports Facility $1,000,000

Adna School District Track $160,000

Safe Harbor $100,000

HUB Center for Seniors $500,000

Small Faces Child Development Center $500,000

Meals on Wheels Services Center $496,000

Cottages at Forest Park $500,000

Pasco Second Harvest Distribution Center Construction Phase 2 $3,000,000

Thurston County Food Bank $1,000,000

Auburn Community Center at Les Grove Park Campus $3,000,000

TOTAL $19,677,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,677,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,677,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1080 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Pacific Medical Center (91000445)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for predesign, design, renovation, and other
development or transition costs necessary for Pacific Tower to be used
for community college health career training programs, offices for the
department of commerce or other appropriate state agencies, and other
nonprofit community uses, including community meeting and training
facilities. Funds may be allotted only after a memorandum of
understanding containing the lease provisions and a plan for
construction management has been executed between the state of
Washington and the Pacific hospital preservation and development
authority.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1081 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Public Works Assistance Account Project Backfill (91000581)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $104,000,000 for fiscal year 2014 and
$54,000,000 for fiscal year 2015 is provided solely for the anticipated
drawdown of funds associated with previously authorized projects under
sections 1010, 1036, 1039, 1040, 1058, and 1059 of this act.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1082 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1083 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Chehalis River Basin Flood Relief Projects (91000398)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,689,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $311,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1084 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Catastrophic Flood Relief (20084850)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $9,200,000 of the appropriation is for design
alternatives for large capital flood damage reduction projects,
including basin-level water retention and Interstate 5 protection
projects.
(2) Up to $15,092,000 of the appropriation is for construction of
priority local flood protection projects, including multipurpose
projects that reduce flood damage and benefit fish habitat.
(3) Up to $1,750,000 of the appropriation is for projects to reduce
damage to residential and other structures in the floodplain, through
flood proofing and buyouts.
(4) Up to $2,160,000 of the appropriation is for state agency
technical assistance, stakeholder project management, project support,
and coordination.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $752,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,202,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,733,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,687,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1085 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Oversight of State Facilities (30000035)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office of financial management in
consultation with the department of enterprise services, shall work
with all appropriate public and private stakeholders that lease and/or
build commercial office space and/or warehouse facilities to the state
of Washington to review and recommend policies relating to lease
renewals, request for proposals, cancellation clauses, backfill policy
of private sector real estate, and other related issues. Members of
the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature must be invited to
participate in stakeholder meetings. The office of financial
management must recommend improvements to these policies to ensure
cancellation clauses are used in a financially advantageous way, and
renewal practices minimize unnecessary relocation costs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,080,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1086 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Aerospace and Manufacturing Training Equipment Pool (91000003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,265,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,265,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1087 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Emergency Repairs (90000008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Emergency repair funding is provided
solely to address unexpected building or grounds failures that will
impact public health and safety and the day-to-day operations of the
facility. To be eligible for funds from the emergency repair pool, an
emergency declaration signed by the affected agency director must be
submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate
legislative fiscal committees. The emergency declaration must include
a description of the health and safety hazard, the possible cause, the
proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost estimate, and
identification of other funding that may be applied to the project.
For emergencies occurring during a legislative session, an agency must
notify the legislative fiscal committees before requesting emergency
funds from the office of financial management. The office of financial
management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee, the house capital budget committee, and senate ways
and means committee as emergency projects are approved for funding.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1088 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Office of Financial Management Capital Staff (30000034)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitation:
(1) Up to $100,000 of the appropriation in this section is for the
office of financial management to review and update the existing cost
estimating process and electronic forms to more accurately reflect
project costs and alternative public works. The scope of the review
must include, at a minimum, construction inflation, project management
fees, the architectural and engineering fee schedule, consultant extra
services, project contingencies, and project cost ranges. The office
of financial management shall confer with legislative staff and other
agencies with public works authority. Inflation must be adjusted
biennially while the governor's budget is being developed using the
construction cost index from global insight.
(2) The department of enterprise services, in consultation with the
office of financial management, shall provide the capital project cost
estimates source data, business logic, and electronic copies to the
legislative evaluation and accountability program. The source data and
electronic copies of the cost estimates shall be provided with the
agency request and governor budget submittals to the legislature. The
business logic used for creation of the cost estimates developed for
the 2013 legislative session must be provided to the legislative
evaluation and accountability program by July 31, 2013. Any changes to
the cost estimate business logic must be shared with the legislative
evaluation and accountability program on an ongoing basis. Projects
may also be adjusted by the legislature with new inflation forecasts
using the cost estimate tool developed by the legislative evaluation
and accountability program.
(3) The office of financial management shall report to the senate
ways and means committee and the house capital budget committee by
November 30, 2013, on these efforts.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1089 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Emergency Repair Pool for K-12 Public Schools (91000399)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Emergency repair funding is provided
solely to address unexpected and imminent health and safety hazards at
K-12 public schools, including skill centers, that will impact the day-to-day operations of the school facility. To be eligible for funds
from the emergency repair pool, an emergency declaration must be signed
by the school district board of directors and the superintendent of
public instruction, and submitted to the office of financial management
for consideration. The emergency declaration must include a
description of the imminent health and safety hazard, the possible
cause, the proposed scope of emergency repair work and related cost
estimate, and identification of local funding to be applied to the
project. Grants of emergency repair moneys must be conditioned upon
the written commitment and plan of the school district board of
directors to repay the grant with any insurance payments or other
judgments that may be awarded, if applicable. The office of financial
management must notify the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee, the house capital budget committee, and the senate
ways and means committee as emergency projects are approved for
funding.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1090 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Higher Education Preservation Information (91000427)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely to
refresh preservation information that resides in the state's comparable
framework for higher education buildings including any necessary
revisions or adjustments that will enable more direct translation of
information, updates for last renewal or replacement of major systems,
and quality assurance field sampling. In executing this continued
capital study, the office of financial management shall consult the
legislative fiscal committees about its workplan to ensure field
sampling of facilities prioritized for renovation or replacement, and
timely delivery of assembled facilities information and related capital
models in an easy to understand format. As a general condition, upon
appropriations provided to higher education agencies in this act, the
state board for community and technical colleges and each state
baccalaureate institution shall provide requested facilities
information in a timely manner to enable the office of financial
management to complete the tasks and oversight assigned in this
section.

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,000
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1091 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Construction Contingency Pool (91000428)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for construction projects that confront emergent and
unavoidable costs in excess of the construction contingency and
management reserves included in the project appropriation. For
requests occurring during a legislative session, an agency must notify
the legislative fiscal committees before requesting contingency funds
from the office of financial management. Eligible agencies that may
apply to the pool include higher education institutions, the state
parks and recreation commission, the department of corrections, the
department of enterprise services, and the department of health.
Eligible construction projects are only projects that had project cost
reductions. The office of financial management must notify the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, the house
capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee as
projects are approved for funding.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1092 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Culverts in Three State Agencies (92000004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1093 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Natural Resource Building Roof Replacement/Exterior Foam Insulation
Repairs (30000546)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $510,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,972,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,482,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1094 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
East Plaza - Water Infiltration and Elevator Repairs (30000548)

Appropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $793,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,310,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,103,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,444,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,547,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1095 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation (30000550)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,698,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $636,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,334,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1096 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Capitol Lake Dredging (30000571)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Within the reappropriation, the department
must prepare a long term financing plan for maintenance dredging
activities that may be required to either maintain Capitol Lake or
support estuary restoration efforts. In consultation with the involved
local governments, the department must recommend an equitable cost
sharing formula for the cost of maintenance dredging based on the
relative benefits received by the state and the various local
governments.

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $181,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1097 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Legislative Building Critical Exterior Repairs (30000577)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $892,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $956,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1098 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (30000580)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Within the appropriations the department
must determine the rough feasibility and economic benefits of
recovering heat energy from wastewater at one of the state's large
facilities. If likely to be feasible and economically beneficial, the
department must recommend an institution for a pilot project.

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,550,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1099 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Legislative Building Critical Hydronic Loop Repairs (30000584)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,075,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $851,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,030,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1100 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Reuse General Administration Building for Heritage Center, State
Library, and State Patrol (92000003)

Reappropriation:
Washington State Heritage Center Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Legislative Building Critical Exterior Repairs (92000004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $557,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $843,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1102 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Natural Resources Building Garage Fire Suppression System Repairs
(30000578)

Appropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $738,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,238,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,238,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1103 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation (30000635)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,218,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $810,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,028,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,028,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1104 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Capitol Campus Underground Utility Repairs (30000687)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,983,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,827,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,810,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1105 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Natural Resource Building Repairs Phase 1 (91000009)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The natural resource building repairs
phase 1 project must include at a minimum the multipurpose room water
infiltration project and the roof project. After this work is
completed, the department may include work that was in the department's
2013-2015 capital budget request for other repairs to the building.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,161,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $940,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,101,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,101,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1106 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Campus Steam System and Chiller Upgrades (91000014)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The campus steam system repairs and
powerhouse chiller projects must be done as one project, with energy
savings from heat recovery paying for as much of the project as
practical. Energy savings must also be used to upgrade the HVAC system
in the governor's residence, and provide hot water boilers in as many
buildings as needed to shut down the powerhouse in the summer months.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,497,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,997,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,997,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1107 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Archives Building and Capitol Court HVAC Upgrades (91000015)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The archives building HVAC upgrade and
capitol court HVAC upgrade projects must be done as one project, with
energy savings from heat recovery paying for as much of the project as
practical.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1108 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Legislative Building Exterior Repairs (30000604)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1109 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
1063 Block Replacement (91000016)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for predesign and bridging documents, design,
competition honoraria, project management, demolition, and other
planning activities including permits. The predesign must specify the
tenants of the building as directed by the office of financial
management. The predesign must indicate the estimated annual cost
increase for state agency tenants compared to the cost of their
existing leases. The estimated cost increase may take into account
estimated cost savings in staff costs and other costs that may result
in more efficient building design and layout of office space. The
director of the office of financial management must review these cost
estimates and submit a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature indicating the budget increase that would be required sixty
days prior to executing any construction contracts for the building.
The lease for any prospective tenant may not be extended beyond the
anticipated occupancy date of the building. The building will be
alternatively financed as authorized in section 7014 of this act.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1110 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Security Improvements Division 3 Court of Appeals (92000006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1111 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Preservation (30000560)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,840,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $417,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,257,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,542,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,799,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1112 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Program (30000561)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,728,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,230,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,958,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1113 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Information Operations Readiness Center-Joint Base Lewis McChord
(30000589)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1114 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Pierce County Readiness Center (30000593)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,942,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,659,000
Military Department Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,601,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,601,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1115 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Thurston County Readiness Center (30000594)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,249,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,049,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1116 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Preservation - 2013-2015 Biennium (30000602)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,726,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,226,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,121,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,347,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1117 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Program - 2013-2015 Biennium (30000605)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,397,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,322,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1118 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Yakima Training Center Barracks (30000696)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1119 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Thurston County Readiness Center (91000005)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1120 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Heritage Barn Preservation Program (30000005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1121 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Courthouse Preservation (30000006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $673,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1122 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Historic Courthouse Preservation Grants (92000001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1123 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Heritage Barn Preservation Program (92000002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital: Westlake Building Renovation (30000852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,575,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements
(30001264)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (30001290)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Facilities Preservation (30001291)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,760,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,075,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Hazards Abatement and Demolition (30002221)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,244,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,244,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Capacity to Replace Maple Lane School (92000005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,410,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,460,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Rainier School: Cottages Remodel and Renovation (91000017)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Naselle Youth Camp-Three Cottages: Renovation (20081222)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital and Western State Hospital - All Wards:
Patient Safety Improvements (91000019)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation Projects: Statewide (30002235)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,755,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,155,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,155,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Medical Lake Infrastructure Modernization Study (92000007)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000013)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,670,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,840,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $127,510,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Safe Reliable Drinking Water Grants (92000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,628,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,010,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,638,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
HVAC Systems Upgrade Continuation (30000298)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,809,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,809,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000300)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $958,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,758,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000323)

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works Facilities Preservation (30000094)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,313,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,313,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Walla Walla Nursing Facility (20082008)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,200,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,978,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,178,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $947,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Housing Units, Kitchen, and Site
Work (30000482)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,130,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,442,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,572,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
SW: Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (30000539)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,026,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,474,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
SW: Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000540)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,506,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $994,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Complex: Close Sewer Lagoon (20082022)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $294,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,097,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,891,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
SW: Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code (30000541)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $860,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: WSR Living Units Roofs (30000542)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,785,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,785,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Replace Intensive Management Unit
Roof (30000723)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,071,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,071,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: WSR Replace Fire Alarm System
(30000724)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,616,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Airway Heights Corrections Center: Replace Fire Alarm System
(30000725)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,399,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,399,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women: Replace Fire Alarm System
(30000727)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,569,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,569,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
SW: Minor Works - Preservation Projects (30000734)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,618,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,718,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Airway Heights Corrections Center: Security Electronics
Renovations (30000726)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,047,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,047,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Security Video System (30000791)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,972,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,972,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: TRU Security Video System (30000801)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,876,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,876,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women: Security Video System
(30000802)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,421,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,421,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: SOU IMU Security Video (30000803)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,640,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: WSR Security Video System (30000795)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,233,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,233,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: TRU Support Building Repair Fire
Detection System (30000733)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,058,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,058,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Department of Corrections Centralized Pharmacy (92000034)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
OFM Emergency Funds (90000027)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,050,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (19742006)

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $552,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,998,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

Reappropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,885,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,548,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,433,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (20042951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $559,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (20044006)

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,467,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,518,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Conveyance Infrastructure Projects (20052850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions in section 322, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,569,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,143,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,712,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (20052852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $421,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,179,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20062003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions in section 136, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $364,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,436,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (20062950)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 3008, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,705,000
Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply
Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,404,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,109,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,391,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (20064002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,223,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,453,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,676,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,940,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (20064007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $317,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $349,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,151,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (20064008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,066,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,834,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Transfer of Water Rights for Cabin Owners (20081951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $305,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grants (20084008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,108,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,767,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (20084010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $771,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $401,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $997,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,169,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,314,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,483,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Loan Program (20084011)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,581,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,068,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,649,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,351,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Yakima River Basin Water Storage Feasibility Study (20084026)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
completion of the United States bureau of reclamation's Yakima basin
storage feasibility study, including the associated joint national
environmental policy act, the state environmental policy act, and the
environmental impact statement. The reappropriated funds are to be
used by the bureau of reclamation and the department of ecology to
evaluate potential in basin storage facilities such as the proposed
Bumping Lake and Wymer reservoirs and other reasonable alternatives
that will enhance water supplies and streamflows in the Yakima Basin.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,167,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20084029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions in section 3054, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,897,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,103,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000007)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,325,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,825,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal
Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,720,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,870,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $142,830,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (30000008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,075,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Upper Columbia River Black Sand Beach Cleanup (30000016)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $383,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000028)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,612,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,388,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Kittitas Groundwater Study (30000029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funds may be provided to develop and implement water banking
and transfer methods and agreements that are fully protective of senior
water rights and that protect domestic groundwater users and improve
the profitability of farming operations. The legislature finds such
activities to be in the public interest because they can help sustain
the viability of the agricultural economy and enhance the certainty of
water supplies for domestic groundwater users.
(2) Funds may be provided to lease or purchase water rights to
create a reserve water supply for domestic groundwater users that have
a groundwater right with a priority date later than May 10, 1905, as
well as for all out-of-priority groundwater users. In securing water
for such domestic groundwater users, strong preference must be given to
the use of water banking and transfer methods that provide alternatives
to permanent purchase and dry-up of agricultural water rights in the
basin, including dry-year options, water banking, long-term water
supply lease agreements, long-term agricultural land fallowing
agreements, and reduced consumptive use through efficiency or
alternative cropping arrangements while maintaining historic return
flows.
(3) A portion of the reappropriation may be used for administrative
costs, not to exceed four percent, and other costs associated with
leasing or acquiring and transferring the water rights. All costs must
be fully recovered from participating domestic water users for their
prorated portion of the cost, including, but not limited to, the costs
of securing a water right or rights for this purpose, costs associated
with the development and implementation of alternative agricultural
water transfer methods, associated annual operational costs, and
federal water service contract costs owed to the United States bureau
of reclamation. Funds recovered in this manner must be deposited in
the state and local improvements revolving account and may be used for
any purpose provided in this section.

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $263,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $437,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 3006, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,019,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,062,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,081,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,830,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,911,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm Water Retrofit and Low-Impact Development Grant Program
(30000097)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 3005, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,151,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving
Account--Waste Facilities 1980--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,812,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,564,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,784,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,609,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reducing Diesel Particle Emissions in Tacoma (30000139)

Reappropriation:
Air Pollution Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000142)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,793,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,742,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,535,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,465,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 3021, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,402,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,670,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,072,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,126,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,198,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Settlement Funding To Clean Up Toxic Sites (30000145)

Reappropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $299,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,201,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,338,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,062,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Protect Communities from Flood and Drought (92000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,984,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,991,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,975,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Wastewater Treatment and Water Reclamation (92000041)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3016, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,641,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,789,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (30000208)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3024, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,904,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,196,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000209)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For projects involving repair,
replacement, or improvement of a wastewater treatment plant or other
public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is
obtainable, the department of ecology must require as a contract
condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade
efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the
audit as part of its water pollution control revolving fund program
loan.

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,594,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $97,068,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,662,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,482,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,144,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Waste Tire Pile Prevention and Cleanup (30000210)

Reappropriation:
Waste Tire Removal Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $263,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $737,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Wood Stove Pollution Reduction (30000211)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,111,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $889,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Diesel Emissions Reduction (30000212)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,419,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,581,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000213)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3030, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,219,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,781,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Hood Canal Regional Septic Repair Loan Program (30000215)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $395,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,855,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grant Program (30000216)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,463,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,371,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,834,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000217)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,146,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,854,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Burlington Northern Santa Fe Skykomish Restoration (30000218)

Reappropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $284,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Program - Central Washington (30000263)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,693,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,018,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,711,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000265)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,410,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $990,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Yakima Basin Integrated Water Management Plan Implementation
(30000278)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,780,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
ASARCO - Tacoma Smelter Plume and Mines (30000280)

Reappropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,963,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,684,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,647,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Padilla Bay Boat Launch (30000281)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (30000282)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds Administration (30000283)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,413,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,787,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (30000285)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $549,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $451,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Statewide Storm Water Projects (30000294)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
construction projects or design/construction projects statewide that
result in the greatest improvements necessary to meet national
pollution discharge elimination system requirements for communities
least able to pay for those projects or for jurisdictions that are
early adopters of new regulations and effective new technology. The
department must develop specific evaluative criteria to award grants on
a competitive basis to projects that meet the policy objectives in this
section, demonstrate readiness to proceed, and have a minimum cash
match of twenty-five percent.

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,334,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $666,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Green River Flood Levee Improvements (30000295)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Mount Vernon Flood Protection (30000297)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (91000032)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
the following list of projects:

Project Authorized Amount

Port Gamble Bay - Open up 90 acres of geoduck tracts $2,000,000

Port Gamble Bay - Source control, habitat preservation
and clean-up sustainability $7,000,000

Administration $180,000

TOTAL $9,180,000

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (91000033)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3003, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,543,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,545,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Fiscal Year 2012 Statewide Storm Water Grant Program (91000053)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3004, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,161,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $912,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,073,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm Water Retrofit and Local Improvement District Competitive
Grants (91000054)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3005, chapter 2, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,459,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,463,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Water Management Projects (91000179)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 502, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Skagit Mitigation (91000181)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department to develop mitigation options and
alternative water sources or tools to make water available for stream
flows and for rural domestic permit-exempt uses within the
Carpenter/Fisher, East Nookachamps, and Upper Nookachamps subbasins.
Up to $500,000 of the amount specified shall be used to develop a rural
domestic demonstration project to determine if surface or groundwater
infiltration can mitigate for ground water use during low flow periods
to meet the mitigation requirements of chapter 173-503 WAC.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Flood Levee Improvements (92000057)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section from the state building
construction account is provided solely for the Mt. Vernon flood
protection project.
(2) The reappropriation in this section from the local toxics
control account is provided solely for the King county flood district
for the Briscoe-Desimone levee improvement project.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Ground Water Management Yakima Basin (92000061)

Reappropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Coordinated Prevention Grants (30000321)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall allocate the appropriation in this section
through a distribution formula to eligible jurisdictions.
(2) The department must grant the entire appropriation according to
the distribution formula and match requirements in chapter 70.95 RCW.
(3) The state grant funding must not be used to supplant local
funds.
(4) If eligible jurisdictions are unable to use their entire
allocation, the department may offer competitive grants for solid waste
enforcement and implementation.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,240,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,520,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (30000322)

Appropriation:
Waste Tire Removal Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Mercury Switch Removal (30000323)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reducing Toxic Diesel Emissions (30000324)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reducing Toxic Wood Stove Emissions (30000325)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (30000326)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of
a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which
an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the department of
ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor
undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor
may finance the costs of the audit as part of its centennial clean
water program grant.
(2) $3,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for the Port of Walla Walla/Burbank school district septic
system replacement project.

Appropriation:
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $290,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Program (30000327)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $7,750,000 for fiscal year 2014 and $7,750,000 for fiscal year
2015 of the state building construction account--state is provided
solely as state match for federal clean water funds.
(2) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of
a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which
an investment grade efficiency audit is obtainable, the department of
ecology must require as a contract condition that the project sponsor
undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor
may finance the costs of the audit as part of its water pollution
control program loan.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,500,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $184,500,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $510,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds (30000328)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Floodplain Management and Control Grants (92000078)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $11,250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for making grants for flood hazard reduction projects on a
competitive basis to the following eligible entities: Counties;
cities; federally recognized Indian tribes; port districts; flood
control zone districts; flood control districts; and diking and
drainage districts. Preference may be given to entities with approved
comprehensive flood hazard management plans. Applicants must provide
a twenty percent match with nonstate dollars. The department must
evaluate, score, and rank applications according to the following
criteria:
(a) Projects that provide cost-effective hazard reduction to
people, property, critical facilities, and transportation corridors.
(b) Projects that achieve multiple benefits, including, but not
limited to, salmon recovery, water quality improvements, habitat
restoration, and channel migration zone protection.
(c) Projects that minimize or eliminate future costs for
maintenance, operation, or emergency response.
(d) Projects that have been examined through a planning process
that includes public comment, such as a comprehensive flood hazard
management plan, a hazard mitigation plan, a comprehensive plan, a
watershed plan, or other applicable plans.
(e) Projects that are ready to proceed with the scope of work, and
whose sponsors have the capacity to complete the project successfully.
(2) $33,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for floodplain restoration grants for the following specific
projects and amounts:
(a) Calistoga Reach Setback Levee and Side-Channel
Construction . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,708,000
(b) Canyon Creek Integrated Flood-Fish . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,086,000
(c) Lower Cedar River Integrated Floodplain
Restoration . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,103,000
(d) Lower Dungeness Floodplain Recovery . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,828,000
(e) Lower Stillaguamish Fish, Farm, and Flood
Management . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,272,000
(f) Neadham Road Setback Levee . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,394,000
(g) Skokomish River Floodplain Restoration and Sediment
Management . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,387,000
(h) Lower Snohomish River Restoration and Infrastructure
Assessment . . . . . . . . . . . . $894,000
(i) Snoqualmie River Fall City Corridor . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,328,000
(3) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for the Mt. Vernon protection project.
(4) $750,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
Prairie Creek Drainage Improvements.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000331)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (30000332)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,055,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,900,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,955,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
ASARCO Cleanup (30000334)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $400,000 of the appropriation in this
section is provided solely for the department to contract for the
cleanup and remediation of the former Ruston Way tunnel.

Appropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,660,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,660,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,660,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects - Programmatic (30000335)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects - Preservation (30000336)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Cleanup Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000337)

Appropriation:
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,517,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,017,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000351)

Appropriation:
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,047,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,347,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Yakima River Basin Water Supply (30000373)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (30000372)

Appropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,955,000
Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply
Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,545,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grants (30000374)

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,537,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $322,537,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies Program (30000389)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for technical assistance
and grants to conservation districts for the purpose of implementing
water conservation measures and irrigation efficiencies. The
department and the state conservation commission shall give preference
in order of priority to projects located in the 16 fish critical
basins, other water short basins, and basins with significant water
resource and instream flow issues. Projects that are not within basins
as described in this subsection are also eligible to receive funding.
(2) Conservation districts statewide are eligible for grants listed
in subsection (1) of this section. A conservation district receiving
funds shall manage each grant to ensure that a portion of the water
saved by the water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency will
be placed as a purchase or a lease in the trust water rights program to
enhance instream flows. The proportion of saved water placed in the
trust water rights program must be equal to the percentage of the
public investment in the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency.
The percentage of the public investment may not exceed eighty-five
percent of the total cost of the conservation measure or irrigation
efficiency.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm Water Improvements (92000076)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $81,081,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for grants to cities and counties to perform project-specific
planning, design, and construction of projects that reduce storm water
impacts from existing infrastructure and development. The grants are
intended to build on and expand a city's or county's storm water
program.
(a) In consultation with storm water stakeholders, the department
shall develop and implement a competitive grant program by July 1,
2014, that is designed to fund storm water projects and activities that
have been proven effective at reducing environmental degradation from
storm water.
(b) In order to receive funding, projects must have a high water
quality or ecological benefit and address pollution from existing
development.
(c) A project that relies on low-impact development retrofit
techniques to reduce storm water impacts that is otherwise rated
equally to a project that does not rely on low-impact development
retrofit techniques must be given priority for grant funding.
(d) Projects required by court or administrative order or for
mitigation purposes are not eligible for funding.
(e) Up to $15,000,000 of the appropriation provided in this
subsection may be allocated to cities or counties covered by a phase I
or II national pollutant discharge elimination system permit for
project-specific planning and design activities that prepare projects
for application to the competitive grant program to be implemented
under subsection (1)(a) of this section. As a condition for funding,
cities or counties shall prepare low-impact development retrofit
projects for the competitive grant program. Cities or counties may
also use project-specific planning and design funds for other projects
that have high water quality and ecological benefits that address
pollution from existing development. The department must provide
notice to all cities and counties that are eligible for planning and
design grants. The notice of eligibility must also include information
on grant requirements so that those who elect to participate understand
the requirements for funding.
(2)(a) $150,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely to the department to develop an ongoing comprehensive, statewide
storm water financial assistance program to be implemented beginning no
later than July 1, 2015. The program will provide grants to local
governments for the protection and improvement of statewide water
quality and to improve watershed functionality by reducing the
transport of toxics and other pollutants through storm water runoff,
and by reducing uncontrolled runoff flows.
(b) The department must collaborate with storm water stakeholders
to develop the funding criteria for the storm water financial
assistance program, and include the new statewide storm water financial
assistance program into the department's integrated water quality
funding cycle process.
(c) The storm water financial assistance program may include, but
not be limited to: Funding for retrofit capital improvement projects;
low-impact development; research and development components and
investments in learning; pass-through funding for local government
storm water permit implementation, education, and outreach; prioritized
watershed basin retrofit strategies; purchase of pooled equipment for
local government use; and preconstruction awards solely for the
planning and design of either new storm water facilities or a retrofit
of existing storm water facilities.
(3) $18,769,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for the following list of projects.

Storm Water Improvements

Bellingham Shipping Terminal Storm Water Project $1,500,000

Camas Storm Water Projects $2,000,000

Centralia Station Storm Water Project $750,000

Clark County Storm Water Projects $1,531,000

Kennewick Storm Water Projects $1,780,000

Tacoma Regional Stormwater Facility $3,000,000

Port of Bellingham Marine Trades Storm Water Project $1,000,000

15th Street Water Quality Infrastructure Project $2,184,000

Richland Storm Water Projects $900,000

Spanaway Lake Management Plan $400,000

Spokane Storm Water Projects $2,000,000

Sunnyside Storm Water Project $455,000

Union Gap Storm Water Project $495,000

West Richland Yakima River Outfall Elimination $124,000

Zillah Storm Water Project $650,000

TOTAL $18,769,000

Appropriation:
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Dungeness Water Supply and Mitigation (30000333)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department to develop projects and acquire
water rights to enhance flows and to mitigate for rural development
within the basin. The department will work with the Dungeness local
leaders workgroup to coordinate water supply and mitigation projects
for implementation that have been developed in cooperation with local
stakeholders.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Lower Yakima GWMA Program Development (92000085)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,614,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,614,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Veterans' Conservation Corps (91000237)

Appropriation:
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Bay View Park: Wide Wastewater Treatment System (20082041)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,817,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,187,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3086 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Ike Kinswa State Park: Improvement (20082950)

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fish Barrier Removal (30000540)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $538,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,238,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Iron Horse Tunnel Hazard Repair (30000552)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,296,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,896,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works - Health and Safety (30000667)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works - Facilities and Infrastructure Preservation (30000766)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Facility and Infrastructure Backlog Reduction (30000770)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Picnic Shelters (91000018)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Rocky Reach Trail (91000035)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Comfort Stations (91000036)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $254,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,754,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deferred Maintenance (91000030)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $670,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Energy Conservation (91000040)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $156,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Culverts (91000046)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Wallace Falls: Footbridge (91000047)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $470,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $486,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Spencer Spit: Water System Replacement (30000140)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $983,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $983,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Peace Arch: Waterline Replacement and Upgrade (30000375)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $972,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $972,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Dosewallips: Wastewater Treatment System (30000523)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,079,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,079,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Lewis and Clark: Replace Wastewater System (30000544)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,077,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,077,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Potholes: Replace Failed Recreational Vehicle Campsites Electrical
Hookups (30000549)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $997,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $997,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Lake Sammamish State Park: Sunset Beach Bathhouse Replacement
(30000653)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The state parks and recreation commission
shall enter into an interagency agreement with the office of financial
management to provide funding for a budget evaluation study. The
office of financial management shall use a budget evaluation study team
approach using value engineering techniques and life cycle cost
analysis in conducting the study. The office of financial management
shall select the budget evaluation team members, contract for the
study, and report the results to the legislature and agencies in a
timely manner following the study. Funds must not be allotted until
the scope of work is approved by the office of financial management as
recommended by the study.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,984,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,984,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Flaming Geyser State Park: Infrastructure (30000810)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,325,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Flaming Geyser State Park: Day Use Renovation (30000832)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,002,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,002,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Parkland Acquisition Account (91000056)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
acquisition of property adjacent to existing state park property and
shall not be used to purchase property to establish new parks.
(2) The appropriation of state building construction account--state
is provided solely for the development of a report that identifies
parks and recreation commission lands that are poorly used and/or not
well positioned for future directions of the commission. The
commission must identify estimated sale price, potential lease revenue,
or other income that may be derived from disposal or alternative use of
these lands. The legislature intends to use these under used
commission assets for development of undeveloped park lands that have
significant potential as destination state parks.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Parkland Acquisition Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works - Facility and Infrastructure Preservation (30000845)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fish Barrier Removal (30000854)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,048,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,368,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,416,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Rocky Reach - Chelan County Public Utility District Grant
(30000855)

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Clean Vessel Boating Pump-out Grants (30000856)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Local Grant Authority (30000857)

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Federal Grant Authority (30000858)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Prior to opening the Fudge Point state
park area for public use, the commission shall work with the Mason
County Board of Commissioners and local stakeholders to identify and
appropriately mitigate environmental and public service impacts of park
development and use.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3114 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Backlog Repairs and Enhanced Amenities (92000007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely to reduce the backlog of
deferred maintenance projects and for purchase, installation, and
construction of park amenities that will produce additional park
revenue. The state parks commission must limit charges against these
capital appropriations for state parks throughout this act for project
management and indirect and overhead costs to no more than fifteen
percent of total project costs. The state parks commission must
provide an annual progress report each December 1st on achieving these
savings and the progress in reducing the backlog of deferred
maintenance.
(2) The state parks and recreation commission shall report to the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees by November 30, 2014, on how
many cabins and yurts have been installed, their locations, and the
number of cabins and yurts contracted for completion by June 30, 2015.
Cabins or yurts may not have a total cost of more than $52,000 each.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,404,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,404,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3115 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cape Disappointment Trail Development (30000419)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $517,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,379,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,896,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3116 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cape Disappointment North Head Parking (30000522)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,365,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,290,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3117 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Kopachuck Day Use Development Design and Permit (30000820)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $319,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,974,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,293,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3118 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Twanoh State Park Storm Water Improvements Construction Phase 1
(30000851)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $354,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,578,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,932,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3119 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Camano Island Day Use Access and Facility Renovation (30000782)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $301,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,549,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3120 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION

Millersylvania Replace Environmental Learning Center Cabins
(30000821)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,089,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,089,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3121 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works - Revenue Generation (30000847)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $437,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,592,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,029,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3122 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Rocky Reach State Park Trail Development (30000853)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,755,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,755,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3123 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deception Pass - Kukutali Access and Interpretation (30000774)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $525,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3124 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Ice Age Floods Interpretive Panels (30000827)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $154,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $154,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3125 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Lyons Ferry State Park (91000055)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
capital expenses associated with re-establishing Lyons Ferry State
Park. The operating costs for re-establishing the park will be offset
by reduced services on Columbia Plateau Trail State Park. Other than
taking actions, both in operating expenditures and use of limited staff
time, to minimize state liabilities, such as maintaining culverts,
noxious weed controls, oversight to access and easements, and other
legal obligations as landowner, the agency shall not spend any
additional operating funds on improvements to the following 85.5 mile
undeveloped portion of Columbia Plateau Trail State Park: From Mile
Post 256.5 to Mile Post 342, the Martin Road Trailhead.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3126 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20044001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $161,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,661,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,714,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,375,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3127 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (20044002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Any amount of the reappropriations that
are not obligated to a specific project may be used to fund alternate
projects approved by the legislature from the same account in biennia
succeeding that in which the moneys were originally appropriated.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $415,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $615,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,915,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3128 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Youth Athletic Fields (20062952)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 172, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,437,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3129 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20064001)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 403, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3130 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (20064002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 404, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $928,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,228,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,772,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3131 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (20064004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 170, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $437,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,142,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,579,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3132 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest and Fish Passage Program (20082001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3138, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,761,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3133 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (20084001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $469,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,552,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,021,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3134 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (20084003)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $424,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $472,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3135 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Restoration and Acquisition (20084004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $783,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,967,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3136 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (20084005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $264,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,761,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3137 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (20084008)

Reappropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,611,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,036,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3138 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (20084011)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 3146, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,174,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,217,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,391,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,101,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,492,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3139 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20084851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,929,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,071,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3140 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000002)

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $619,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,721,000
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,040,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,980,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,465,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3141 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000003)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $213,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,513,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,487,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3142 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Land and Water Conservation Fund (30000005)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,840,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3143 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000007)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are provided solely
for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2009-3, developed
March 9, 2009.

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $324,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $714,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,311,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3144 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000009)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $210,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $285,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3145 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000080)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,369,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,631,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3146 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000081)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,101,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,899,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3147 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (30000138)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3148 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000139)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are provided solely
for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3A,
developed May 24, 2011.

Reappropriation:
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $314,000
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,330,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,567,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,861,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,139,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3149 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000140)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,350,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,712,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,062,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3150 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (30000141)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 3067, chapter 48, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,347,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,153,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3151 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Land and Water Conservation Fund (30000142)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3152 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000143)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3B, revised
April 10, 2013.

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,601,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,205,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,806,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3153 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000144)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $365,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3154 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Improvement Grants (30000145)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $359,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,741,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3155 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Recreational Trails Program (30000146)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,960,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,040,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3156 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000148)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation shall not be expended
on the acquisition of lands by state agencies.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,455,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,545,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3157 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (91000001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $188,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,812,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3158 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Restoration (30000147)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation shall not be expended
on the acquisition of lands by state agencies.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,684,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,316,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3159 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000203)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $367,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,633,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3160 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (91000097)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,981,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,019,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3161 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000205)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the
list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2013-6A, developed June
29, 2013.
(2) Amounts allocated to the Okanogan Similkameen 2012 project must
not be disbursed until the recreation conservation office has
reevaluated the level of local support for the project, including
consultation with the Okanogan county board of commissioners, reported
to the appropriate committees of the legislature the results of the
reevaluation, and the legislature has amended this appropriation to
allow the project to move forward.

Appropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,500,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,500,000
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $360,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3162 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000206)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $100,000 of the state building
construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
recreation and conservation office, in consultation with the department
of transportation and using only existing state licensed technologies,
to identify transportation mitigation projects that minimize permit
delays and optimize salmon habitat restoration.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3163 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (30000207)

Appropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,363,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,363,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3164 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (30000208)

Appropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3165 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000210)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the list of projects in LEAP capital document No.
2013-2B, developed April 10, 2013.

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3166 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000211)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $210,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3167 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000212)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3168 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000213)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $35,000 of the appropriation is provided
solely for a grant for improvements at Klickitat Co. law
enforcement/public shooting range.

Appropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3169 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Recreational Trails Program (30000214)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3170 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Infrastructure Grants (30000215)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3171 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Land and Water Conservation (30000216)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3172 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000218)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,540,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,540,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3173 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Youth Recreation Grants (92000055)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
grants to the following list of projects:

Bellingham Sports Fields . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Northshore Athletic Fields . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Playfields at Woodway High School . . . . . . . . . . . . $680,000
Redmond Ridge Athletic Fields . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,630,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,630,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3174 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Public Lands Inventory (91000445)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The recreation and conservation office, in
collaboration with the joint legislative audit and review committee,
shall:
(1) Provide an updated, centralized inventory of lands in
Washington owned by federal, state, and local governments, and by
Native American tribes.
(a) The inventory must be in a web-accessible format, including a
GIS-based interactive map that allows users to find out information
about specific areas. The data must be standardized to allow summary
information to be accessible.
(b) The inventory must include the following information:
(i) Ownership (federal; state, by state agency; local government;
and tribal);
(ii) Ownership type (fee simple or easements);
(iii) Location;
(iv) Acreage;
(v) Principal use of these lands (intended use at the time of
acquisition and current use) including, but not limited to, developed
recreation land, habitat and passive recreation land, and
revenue-generation uses; and
(vi) Acquisition costs if acquired by state agencies over the last
ten years, including acquisition funding sources.
(2) Develop recommendations for standardization of acquisition and
disposal recordkeeping on a biennial basis, including identifying a
preferred process for centralizing acquisition data.
(3) Submit a status report on the inventory to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by January 1, 2014, and a final report by
July 1, 2014.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3175 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (91000007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $427,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,277,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3176 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Farms and Water Quality (91000004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3177 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
CREP Riparian Cost Share - State Match (30000009)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,590,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3178 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Natural Resources Investment for the Economy and Environment
(30000010)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,500,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation and $500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for grants to complete natural resource enhancement
projects necessary to improve water quality in shellfish growing areas.
(2) $4,500,000 of the state building construction account--state
appropriation and $500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for grants to complete natural resource enhancement
projects necessary to improve water quality in non-shellfish growing
areas.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3179 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
CREP PIP Loan Program (30000011)

Appropriation:
Conservation Assistance Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $720,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3180 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program Riparian Contract Funding
(30000012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,231,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,924,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,155,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3181 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Voights Creek Hatchery (20081003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,997,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,297,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3182 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Stemilt Basin Acquisition (20082029)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $153,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3183 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000300)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,207,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,557,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3184 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (30000295)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,505,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $321,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,826,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3185 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Access Areas Preservation (30000296)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $336,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $691,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,027,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3186 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Dam and Dike (30000297)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $293,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,043,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3187 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Migratory Waterfowl Habitat (30000653)

Appropriation:
State Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3188 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Lab Equipment (30000656)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the department to purchase lab equipment for the Manchester and
Mukilteo research stations as specified by the national oceanic and
atmospheric administration to support the Washington state shellfish
initiative.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3189 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Leque Island Highway 532 Road Protection (92000019)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $394,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $286,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3190 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Mitchell Act Federal Grant (91000021)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,328,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $672,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3191 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

The appropriations are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The department must prepare an inventory of their
agricultural land holdings. Agricultural land holdings are department
owned lands that support agricultural activities, including raising
nonnative crops for sale or use by wildlife, or grazing of domestic
animals. The inventory must be submitted to the appropriate committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2013. The inventory must also be
submitted to the recreation conservation office for inclusion in the
office's computer system for lands the department acquired through
grants from recreation conservation office programs. The inventory
must describe:
(1) The size, location, and amount of any water right of each
parcel used for agricultural activities;
(2) The date of acquisition of the parcel, the amount and source of
funds for the acquisition, and the intended purpose of the land at the
time of acquisition;
(3) The nature of the agricultural activities over the past five
years;
(4) Whether the activities are conducted by department employees or
through a contract or lease to a private agricultural operator, and the
terms of any lease;
(5) The amount of the harvest and revenue received from the
agricultural activities; and
(6) A description of current leasing policies and procedures for
leasing department lands for agricultural uses.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,778,000
Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Special Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $203,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,281,000

Appropriation:
Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
Special Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
State Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,515,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,750,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $221,546,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3192 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Health Safety and Code Requirements (30000284)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $693,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $548,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,241,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3193 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (30000298)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,930,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3194 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Fish Passage Barrier Corrections (30000372)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $841,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $439,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,280,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3195 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Beebe Springs Development (92000026)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $960,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $931,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,891,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3196 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fishway Improvements/Diversions (91000033)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3197 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Hatchery Improvements (91000036)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,525,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3198 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Dry Forest Restoration (91000039)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $496,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $796,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3199 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Dam and Dike (91000042)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $197,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3200 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Access Sites (91000044)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,281,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3201 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Fish Passage Barriers (Culverts) (91000045)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $195,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3202 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (91000046)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $516,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Acquire Dryden Gravel Pit from Washington DOT (92000028)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3204 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works Programmatic (300000644)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $150,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for expansion
of the incubation room at the Hurd Creek Hatchery.
(2) $350,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for net pens
infrastructure and equipment at Mayfield Lake.
(3) $25,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
department to construct a primitive road, of a minimum of one mile,
with no adverse impacts on streams or riparian areas, in the Naneum
road planning area within Kittitas county. This is to replace the lost
general public access as a result of the Stray-Tekison road
abandonment. The department shall collaborate in the placement of the
road with the Kittitas county field and stream club. Further, as part
of the Naneum to Columbia river recreational planning process, the
department is instructed to adopt a plan that results in a net increase
of green dot access roads in Kittitas county.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3205 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Deschutes Watershed Center (20062008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $6,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to renovate
the existing Tumwater Falls facility.
(2) $680,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for site work
at the Pioneer Park site, including walking trails, educational or
interpretive displays, a public feature, access, construction staging,
parking and contouring.
(3) $620,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
constructing the water delivery system for the future hatchery facility
including development of existing well, constructing an aeration tower,
and installing pumps and piping.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $219,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,976,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,234,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,729,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3206 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works Preservation (30000479)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,975,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,900,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3207 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Wooten Wildlife Area Improve Flood Plain (30000481)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The state building construction account--state appropriation is provided solely to relocate an existing
campground out of the floodplain. The general fund--federal
appropriation is provided solely as authority to expend anticipated
funding by the Bonneville power administration for habitat enhancement
in the Wooten wildlife area.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,197,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,297,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3208 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Replace Fire Damaged Fencing (30000655)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for repair and replacement of deer and elk fencing
damaged in recent fires. Up to $422,000 of this amount is provided for
repair or replacement of fencing along state highway 97A destroyed in
the 2012 Byrd complex fire. The department must work with the
department of natural resources to pursue possible insurance claims for
the damaged fencing. Any insurance payments received must be deposited
in the state wildlife account.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,612,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,612,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Cooperative Fencing (91000147)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a
cooperative fencing program between the department and landowners who
experience chronic crop damage caused by deer and elk. Cooperative
agreements shall be negotiated with landowners and materials provided,
facilities constructed, or easements purchased to abate property
damage.
(2) $210,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for the Stemilt wildlife fence.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Derelict Net Removal (91000148)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely to the department of fish and wildlife to work
cooperatively with the northwest straits foundation for the removal of
shallow water legacy nets from high priority areas of Puget Sound. The
high priority areas are those where high historical fishing pressure
coincides with sea bed characteristics likely to snag nets. Legacy
nets are those nets lost in previous years of fishing, rather than
newly lost nets.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Beebe Springs (92000034)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3212 FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
Community Partnership Restoration Grants (30000007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,155,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $445,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Land Acquisition Grants (20052021)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,714,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,240,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,954,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3214 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Marine Station (20081015)

Reappropriation:
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $318,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $316,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $634,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $866,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3215 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Legacy (30000060)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,519,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,481,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3216 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Hazardous Fuels Reduction, Forest Health, and Ecosystem
Improvements (91000001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
National Coastal Wetland Conservation Program Lands Acquisition
(91000007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $593,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $407,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Replacing State Forest Lands with Productive Forests (91000029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The total reappropriation is provided solely to the department
to transfer from state forest land status to natural resources
conservation area status certain state forest lands in counties with a
population of 25,000 or less that are subject to timber harvest
deferrals greater than thirty years due to the presence of wildlife
species listed as endangered or threatened under the federal endangered
species act. The approved list of properties for transfer is
identified in the LEAP capital document No. 2011-5A, revised April 10,
2013.
(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and
transferred at fair market value, without consideration of management
or regulatory encumbrances associated with wildlife species listed
under the federal endangered species act. The value of the timber and
other valuable materials transferred must be distributed as provided in
RCW 79.64.110, in the same manner as valuable material revenues from
other state forest lands in the applicable counties. The value of the
land transferred must be deposited in the park land trust revolving
account and be solely used to buy replacement state forest land within
the same county as the property transferred, consistent with RCW
79.22.060.
(3) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department shall execute and record a real property instrument that
dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in
subsection (1) of this section. Transfer agreements for properties
identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that
restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.
(4) The department and applicable counties shall work in good faith
to carry out the intent of this section. However, the department or
applicable counties may remove a property from the transfer list based
on new, substantive information, if it is determined that transfer of
the property is not in the statewide interest of either the state
forest trust or the natural resources conservation area program.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $727,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,273,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Puget SoundCorps (91000046)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,436,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,436,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,564,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Derelict Vessel Removal and Disposal (91000049)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
the expedited removal and disposal of derelict vessels under RCW
79.100.100 and for vessels eligible for the voluntary vessel turn-in
program established in chapter 291, Laws of 2013 (Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1245).
(1) The department must streamline the process for removing and
disposing of derelict vessels in order to expedite the elimination of
the backlog of identified derelict vessels. Department staff resources
must prioritize their time on the legal process of identifying legal
ownership and responsibility and contracting for the removal and
disposal of identified derelict vessels. The department must develop
and execute contracts for removal and disposal of derelict vessels
that:
(a) Ensure proper management of any hazardous wastes;
(b) Expedite the removal of identified derelict vessels; and
(c) Balance costs of removal and disposal after accounting for
salvage value with the need to develop contractor capacity to achieve
the expedited elimination of the backlog of identified derelict
vessels.
(2) The department may expend up to three percent of the
appropriations for administration of the project.
(3) The department must submit a progress report each December 1st
and May 1st of each year of the biennium. The report must include a
list of the vessels removed and disposed of, the costs incurred for
administration, removal, and disposal, and the number of vessels
remaining to be removed and disposed of at the end of the reporting
period.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $589,000
Appropriation:
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,411,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Urban Forest Restoration (Puget Sound Basin) (91000051)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $399,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Large Debris Removal (91000052)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $188,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Secret Harbor Estuary Restoration - Cypress Island (91000053)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $415,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $535,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3224 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Restoration Projects to Improve Natural Resources (91000054)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,360,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3225 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Point Ruston Sediment Capping/Shoreline Restoration Stabilization
(91000065)

Reappropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,584,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $616,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3226 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Hazard Reduction and Safety (91000066)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,941,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,529,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,470,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3227 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Shoreline Restoration Projects (92000011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,944,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,022,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,966,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3228 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Creosote Piling Removal (92000014)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $770,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3229 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (30000208)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
ecological restoration of the upland buffer areas within the Elk River
natural resource conservation area.

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Land Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,845,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3230 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Riparian Easement Program (30000198)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,336,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,336,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3231 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Trust Land Transfer (30000200)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $300,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for a state trust land inventory evaluation. The inventory
evaluation shall determine the acreage of department managed trust
lands, by asset class, that may be eligible for the trust land transfer
program over the next several decades, based on currently available
information. The department shall provide an interim report to the
legislature by January 31, 2014, on project scope, progress to date,
and recommended criteria for the trust land transfer program. The
department shall provide a final report by January 1, 2015.
(2) The remaining appropriation is provided solely to the
department to transfer from trust status, or enter into fifty year
leases for, certain trust lands of statewide significance deemed
appropriate for state park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural area
preserve, natural resources conservation area, open space, or
recreation purposes. The approved list of properties for lease or
transfer is identified in the LEAP capital document No. 2013-3A,
developed April 10, 2013.
(3) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and
transferred at fair market value. By September 30, 2013, the
department must deposit in the common school construction account the
portion of the appropriation in this section that represents the
estimated value of the timber on the transferred properties. This
transfer must be made in the same manner as timber revenues from other
common school trust lands. No deduction may be made for the resource
management cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The portion of the
appropriation in this section that represents the value of the land
transferred must be deposited in the natural resources real property
replacement account.
(4) Property subject to lease agreements under this section must be
appraised at fair market value. Lease terms must be fifty years with
options to renew for an additional fifty years. Lease payments must be
lump sum payments for the entire term of the lease at the beginning of
the lease. The department shall calculate such lump sum payments using
professional appraisal standards. These lease payments may not exceed
the fee simple purchase price based on current fair market value and
must be deposited by the department to the common school construction
account in the same manner as lease revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction may be made for the resource management cost
account under RCW 79.64.040. No later than September 30, 2013, the
department must transfer to the common school construction account the
portion of the appropriation in this section that is attributable to
receipts from lease payments.
(5) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement
this section are authorized to be paid out of the appropriations.
Authorized costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time,
environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar costs and shall not
exceed one and nine-tenths percent of the appropriation.
(6) Intergrant exchanges between common school and other trust
lands of equal value may occur if the exchange is in the interest of
each trust, as determined by the board of natural resources.
(7) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department, with full cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall
execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the
transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of
this section. Transfer and lease agreements for properties identified
in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that restrict the
use of the property to the intended purpose. Transfer and lease
agreements may include provisions for receiving agencies to request
alternative uses of the property, provided the alternative uses are
compatible with the originally intended public purpose and the
department and legislature approves such uses.
(8) The department and receiving agencies shall work in good faith
to carry out the intent of this section. However, the department or
receiving agencies may remove a property from the transfer list based
on new, substantive information, if it is determined that transfer of
the property is not in the statewide interest of either the common
school trust or the receiving agency.
(9) $39,232,000 of the appropriation must be deposited in the
common school construction account by September 30, 2013. The
department shall execute trust land transfers so that after the
deduction of reasonable costs as provided in subsection (4) of this
section on an aggregate basis eighty percent of the total value of
transferred property is timber value or lease payments and is deposited
in the common school construction account. To achieve the eighty
percent requirement, the department may choose to lease properties
originally intended as transfers or transfer properties originally
intended as leases.
(10) By June 30, 2015, the state treasurer shall transfer to the
common school construction account any unexpended balance of the
appropriation in this section.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $296,345,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3232 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Sustainable Recreation (30000207)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3233 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plans (RMAP) (30000211)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3234 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
2013-2015 Minor Works Preservation (30000213)

Appropriation:
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $743,000
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $517,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,260,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,260,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3235 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
2013-2015 Minor Works Programmatic (30000216)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $442,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $961,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,403,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,103,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3236 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Areas Preservation, Access, and Road Maintenance and
Abandonment Plans (RMAP) (30000218)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3237 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Rivers and Habitat Open Space Program (30000221)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3238 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Trust Land Replacement (30000222)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for acquiring replacement trust lands. Regarding the
portion of state trust land that is known as "Pasco 16" that is south
of Interstate 82 and west of Road 68 in undeveloped and/or in
agricultural use, the legislature directs the department of natural
resources to:
(1) Coordinate with the city of Pasco to rezone current agriculture
land in the area to reflect proposed residential and commercial land
use that is consistent with the planning map held by the department and
coordinate with the city in their efforts to finalize the plans for a
frontage road and any other municipality improvements. The costs for
rezoning, road planning, and making municipality improvements shall be
borne by the city and/or passed through to future development;
(2) Sell at auction the areas of Pasco 16 that are designated as
residential or multifamily as per chapter 79.11 RCW by June 30, 2015;
(3) Reinvest the proceeds according to the department's current
authorities; and
(4) Manage the land north of the proposed frontage road designated
as commercial land use through leases negotiated by the department to
be consistent with the planned commercial land use.

Appropriation:
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
Natural Resources Real Property
Replacement--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
Community and Technical College Forest Reserve
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $202,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $252,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3239 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
State Forest Land Replacement (30000223)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely to the
department to transfer from state forest land status to natural
resources conservation area status certain state forest lands in
counties with a population of twenty-five thousand or less which are
subject to timber harvest deferrals greater than thirty years due to
the presence of wildlife species listed as endangered or threatened
under the federal endangered species act. The total appropriation is
to be used equally for the transfer of qualifying state forest lands in
the qualifying counties.
(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and
transferred at fair market value, without consideration of management
or regulatory encumbrances associated with wildlife species listed
under the federal endangered species act. The value of the timber and
other valuable materials transferred must be distributed as provided in
RCW 79.64.110. The value of the land transferred must be deposited in
the park land trust revolving account and be used solely to buy
replacement state forest land, consistent with RCW 79.22.060.
(3) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department shall execute and record a real property instrument that
dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in
subsection (1) of this section. Transfer agreements for properties
identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that
restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.
(4) The department and applicable counties shall work in good faith
to carry out the intent of this section. The department will identify
eligible properties for transfer, consistent with subsection (1) of
this section, in consultation with the applicable counties, and will
not execute any property transfers that are not in the statewide
interest of either the state forest trust or the natural resources
conservation area program.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3240 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Hazard Reduction (30000224)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
forest health hazard reduction treatments on state, federal, and
private lands. The appropriation may be used for mechanical
treatments, project planning, site preparation, permitting, or
prescribed burning. The department, in consultation with the forest
health technical advisory group, shall provide a report to the governor
and the legislature by October 1, 2014, on its work to reduce forest
health hazards from fiscal year 2010 through fiscal year 2014. This
report must include an estimate of work needed through fiscal year 2020
on state, federal, and private lands and recommended mechanisms to fund
this work.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3241 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (RMAP) (91000040)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,710,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,124,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,834,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3242 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Barbeque Flats Road Access (91000081)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3243 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Quinault Coastal Forest and Watershed Restoration Grant (92000019)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3244 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Patterson Pipeline (92000020)

Appropriation:
Resource Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3245 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Yakima Basin Integrated Plan Land Purchase (92000018)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations are provided solely for acquisition of the
approximately 50,272 acres in the upper Kittitas county known as the
Teanaway Property, owned by American Forest Holdings, LLC at the agreed
upon purchase price of $97 million plus $2,344,000 closing, and
transaction costs, based on prior appraisals of the property. The
department must expedite the review and execution of the transaction by
September 15, 2013. The land must be held in the community forest
trusts under chapter 79.155 RCW to serve the purposes of the community
forest trust including the protection of Yakima river basin functioning
as authorized in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5367. If Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5367 is not enacted by June 30, 2013, this
section is null and void.
(2) The legislature recognizes and declares that the appropriation
in this section from the natural resource real property replacement
account constitutes a loan from the irreducible principal of the common
school trust. The legislature finds that the provisions in Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5367 regarding purchase review and approval,
transitional management plans, and eventual loan repayment or land
disposition requirements ensure that the interest of the common school
trust beneficiaries are protected.
(3) The department must propose to the board of natural resources
a schedule for transfer of trust land inholdings within the land
purchase by this appropriation through the trust land transfer program.

Appropriation:
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,344,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,344,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,344,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3246 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Health and Safety Improvements at Fairs (91000003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3247 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Animal Disease Traceability (91000004)

Appropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $881,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $881,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Emergency Repairs (30000031)

Appropriation:
Fire Service Training Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Burn Building Repair (30000032)

Appropriation:
Fire Service Training Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4003 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Fire Training Academy Burn Building Replacement (30000071)

Appropriation:
Fire Service Training Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,500,000

(End of part)

PART 5
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2007-2009 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (20084200)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For school construction projects funded
through the school construction assistance grant program, the
superintendent of public instruction shall require mapping the design
of new facilities and remapping the design of facilities to be
remodeled.

Reappropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $791,109,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $791,759,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Northeast King County Skills Center (20084855)

Reappropriation:
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,561,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,602,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Pierce County Skills Center (20084856)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,198,000
School Construction and Skills Center Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,248,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,609,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,688,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,545,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2009-2011 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (30000031)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $14,000,000 of the state building
construction account--state reappropriation in this section is for the
Grand Coulee Dam school district school project, contingent on the
availability of sufficient contributions from federal, local, private,
or other sources to make up the remainder of the total cost of the
project. The Grand Coulee Dam school district is faced with a unique
set of local funding barriers and federal or other funds may substitute
as the usual requirement for school district participation. In the
event sufficient matching contributions are not secured by the Grand
Coulee Dam school district, these funds shall lapse.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $490,595,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $516,595,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Energy Efficiency and Small Repair Grants (91000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 5007, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,424,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,465,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,889,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2011-2013 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,566,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $281,191,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $333,757,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $223,435,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $557,192,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center (30000076)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,962,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,481,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,443,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
SEA-Tech Branch Campus of Tri-Tech Skills Center (30000078)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,570,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $949,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,519,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION

Grant County Branch Campus of Wenatchee Valley Skills Center
(30000091)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,861,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $547,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,408,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Clark County Skills Center (30000093)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,151,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,901,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Energy Operational Savings Project Grants (30000097)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 5011, chapter 49, Laws of 2011 1st sp.s.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,351,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,649,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Energy Efficiency Grants for K-12 Schools (91000017)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,238,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,762,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Wenatchee Valley Skills Center (92000004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,386,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Spokane Area Professional - Technical Skills Center (92000005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,887,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,687,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
WA-NIC (Washington Network for Innovative Careers) Skills Center -
Snoqualmie Valley School District/Bellevue Community College (92000006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,715,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,715,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Puget Sound Skills Center (92000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office of the superintendent of public
instruction and the Puget Sound skills center shall enter into an
interagency agreement with the office of financial management to
provide funding for a budget evaluation study. The office of financial
management shall use a budget evaluation study team approach using
value engineering techniques and life cycle cost analysis in conducting
the study. The office of financial management shall select the budget
evaluation team members, contract for the study, and report the results
to the legislature, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, and the Puget Sound skills center in a timely manner
following completion of the study. The study must also include a
review of land acquisitions for the project site, including whether
there was adequate disclosure of fill materials that contained toxic
substances or substandard soils that would require disposal prior to
construction, and whether those disclosed conditions were accounted for
in setting the purchase price and other considerations for the land
acquisition.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Distressed Schools (92000009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,415,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,985,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION

Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center Sunnyside Satellite
(92000013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,938,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $287,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Capital Program Administration (30000128)

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,854,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,246,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2013-2015 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance
(30000145)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,340,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for
completing inventory and building condition assessments for all public
school districts once every six years.
(2) $933,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for mapping the design of new
facilities and remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled, for
school construction projects funded through the school construction
assistance program.
(3) $250,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the superintendent of public
instruction to create interagency agreements for the following
purposes:
(a) An interagency agreement with The Evergreen State College for
a study by the Washington state institute for public policy on the
relationship between school design and student performance. The
institute must review available research on the relationship between
school design and quality of school facilities and student performance.
The institute must develop recommendations on how the school
construction assistance program can better support state policy
objectives to reform and improve public education if the review finds
credible research that supports those recommendations. The institute
must prepare a report describing the recommendations and their
projected costs and benefits. The report must be submitted to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by September 1, 2014. The
institute must convene an advisory group to assist in the development
of these recommendations. The advisory group must include
representation from general classroom teachers at various grade levels,
teachers of subjects that require specialized facilities such as
science laboratories and vocational facilities, school facility
managers, school facility designers, and other experts on the
relationship between the quality and design of educational facilities,
the efficacy of teaching and instruction, and student academic
performance. The advisory group must review and consider findings and
recommendations in the 2009 joint legislative task force on school
construction funding. The recommendations must consider ways to
provide financial assistance to develop and improve educational
facilities to support at least the following policy objectives:
(i) Greater access and more effective instruction in science,
technology, engineering, and math;
(ii) Improved instruction;
(iii) Class size reduction in grades K-3;
(iv) Expanded college and career readiness programs that require
specialized facilities like skill centers.
(b) An interagency agreement with the office of financial
management to coordinate a review and make recommendations regarding
the financing of specialized school facilities such as skill centers.
A report to the appropriate committees of the legislature must be
submitted by September 1, 2014. The review and recommendations must
include:
(i) Brief overview of current funding mechanisms;
(ii) Options for improving consistency, predictability, and cost-sharing;
(iii) Options for revising the school construction assistance
program and/or local levy authority to accommodate skill centers,
facilities shared among districts, or other specialized educational
program needs;
(iv) A review of siting decision factors; financial incentives;
education demands; and recommendations for maximizing the appropriate
statewide siting of specialized facilities;
(v) An evaluation of the benefit-cost of skill center expansion to
satellite and branch campuses as implemented under RCW 28A.245.030;
(vi) Options for increasing efficiency in the use of high-cost
specialized school facilities, such as the shared use of specialized
facilities at skill centers and community colleges, and ways to share
funding responsibilities between multiple school districts and the
state.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
improve web-based access by taxpayers to school capacity and actual
enrollment in order to understand possible opportunities to increase
efficiency through consolidation. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction must post this capacity and enrollment information
on its web site.
(5) Funds from this appropriation may be used to match federal
dollars provided by the office of economic adjustment for school
replacement facilities located on military bases.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
expedite allocation and distribution of any eligible funds under the
school construction assistance grant program to the Evergreen (Clark
County) School District to address the school construction emergency
resulting from the fire that destroyed the Crestline School.
(7) The space allocations for state funding assistance purposes for
districts with senior or four-year high schools with fewer than four
hundred students, as outlined in WAC 392-343-035, must be computed in
accordance with the following formula:

Number of Headcount
Student-Grades 9-12 Maximum Space
Allocation Per Facility

0-200 42,000 square feet

201-300 48,000 square feet

301-or more 52,000 square feet

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $285,355,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,232,000
Common School Construction Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,087,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,099,310,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,594,397,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Distressed Schools (91000024)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for renovation of Cedar Park elementary school and to
accelerate the replacement of Arbor Heights elementary school.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Tahoma School District (91000023)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $4,000,000 of the appropriation in
this section is for the purchase of property from King county for the
siting of a school within the Tahoma school district.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Energy Efficiency Grants for K-12 Schools (91000025)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Spokane Valley Tech (91000026)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
School Security Improvement Grants (92000015)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
nonrecurring costs associated with school facility safety projects
consistent with chapter 233, Laws of 2013 (Second Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5197).

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Delta High School (92000017)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
San Juan School District STEM Vocational Building Renovation
(91000027)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Campus Preservation (30000018)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $149,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $401,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Campus Preservation (30000033)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,215,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,715,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR
CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS
Minor Public Works (30000023)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Bothell (20082006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,963,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,663,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,337,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
House of Knowledge Longhouse (30000021)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Odegaard Undergraduate Learning Center (30000370)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,675,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
High Voltage Infrastructure Improvement Project (30000371)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,165,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,365,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Minor Capital Repairs (30000372)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,487,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,987,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Tacoma Campus Development and Soil
Remediation (92000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,300,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Denny Hall Renovation (20081002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In conjunction with the appropriation in
this section, the University of Washington is authorized to issue a
bond or bonds in an amount not to exceed $20,000,000 in value for the
renovation of Denny hall identified in this section. The bond shall be
financed from building fee and trust land revenues deposited into the
university's bond retirement account, in accordance with RCW 28B.20.700
through 28B.20.740.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,302,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,892,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Lewis Hall Renovation (20081003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,587,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,478,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,095,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,160,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Burke Museum Renovation (20082850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Tacoma - Soils Remediation (20082852)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Magnuson Health Sciences Center Roofing
Replacement Project (30000483)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,794,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $735,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,529,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,529,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Capital Repairs - Preservation (30000494)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,539,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,215,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,754,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $254,754,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(91000013)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Tacoma Urban/Science Education Facility
(91000014)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Spokane - Riverpoint Biomedical and
Health Sciences (20162953)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,230,000
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,770,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,140,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Preservation (30000525)

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,015,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,315,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Preventive Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000024)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Pullman - Troy Hall Renovation
(20061030)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,527,000
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $494,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,021,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,550,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,571,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Clean Technology Laboratory (30000069)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In conjunction with the appropriation in
this section, the Washington State University is authorized to issue a
bond or bonds in an amount not to exceed $20,000,000 in value for
construction of the clean technology laboratory identified in this
section. The bond shall be financed from building fee and trust land
revenues deposited into the university's bond retirement account, in
accordance with RCW 28B.30.700 through 28B.30.780.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,335,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,835,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Prosser - Viticulture and Enology
Facility (30000500)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,792,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,792,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Prosser - Agriculture Technology
Building Addition (30000518)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,114,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,114,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Pullman - Plant Sciences Building
(REC#5) (30000519)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Plant Growth (Greenhouse) Facilities, Phase 1 (30000835)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,775,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5054 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
2013-2015 Minor Works - Preservation, Safety, and Infrastructure
(30000849)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,214,000
Washington State University Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,350,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,564,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,564,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5055 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Pullman Pedestrian Bridge (91000028)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5056 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Everett University Center (91000026)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The building must be delivered using design build, as defined
by chapter 39.10 RCW, with a guarantee for energy, operations, and
maintenance performance.
(2) To ensure that the total cost of the project is accounted for
and the most reasonable and cost efficient design is used, Washington
State University shall develop life cycle costs for this project. The
life cycle costs shall represent the present value sum of capital
costs, installation costs, operating costs, and maintenance costs over
the life expectancy of the project. The legislature further finds the
most effective approach to the life cycle cost analysis is to integrate
it into the early part of the design process.
(3) Washington State University shall develop a minimum of three
project alternatives for use in the life cycle cost analysis. These
alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to
the issue being addressed. The chosen alternative must be the most
reasonable and cost-effective solution. A brief description of each
project alternative and why it was chosen must be included in the life
cycle cost analysis.
(4) The office of financial management shall: (a) Make available
a life cycle cost model to be used for analysis; and (b) in
consultation with the department of enterprise services, provide
assistance in using the life cycle cost model.
(5) The Washington State University shall consider architectural
and engineering firms' and general contractors' experience using life
cycle costs, operating costs, and energy efficiency measures when
selecting an architectural and engineering firm, or when selecting a
contractor using alternative contracting methods.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5057 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Benefit-Cost Analyses of the Yakima River Basin Integrated Plan
Projects (91000027)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
state of Washington water research center to prepare separate
benefit-cost analyses for each of the projects proposed in the 2012
Yakima river basin integrated water resources management plan (Yakima
integrated plan), as listed in subsection (7) of this section.
(2) To the greatest extent possible, the center must use
information from existing studies, supplemented by primary research, to
measure and evaluate each project's benefits and costs.
(3) The center must measure and report the economic benefits of
each project on a disaggregated basis, so that it is clear the extent
to which an individual project is expected to result in increases in
fish populations, increases in the reliability of irrigation water
during severe drought years, and improvements in municipal and domestic
water supply.
(4) The center may enter into agreements with other state
universities and with private consultants as needed to accomplish the
scope of work.
(5) The center may consult, as necessary, with the department of
ecology and the Yakima river basin water enhancement project workgroup.
(6) No more than twelve percent of the total appropriation may be
retained for administrative overhead expenses.
(7) The center must submit the benefit-cost analyses, findings and
any recommendations on the following projects by December 15, 2014, to
appropriate legislative fiscal committees:
(a) Tributary/mainstem enhancement
(b) Box canyon creek
(c) Subordination of power generation (Roza and Chandler)
(d) Aquifer storage and recovery projects
(e) Agricultural conservation
(f) Municipal conservation
(g) Water bank exchange programs
(h) Cle Elum reservoir
(i) Keechelus, Kachess, Tieton reservoir
(j) Keechelus to Kachess pipeline
(k) Wymer reservoir
(l) Bumping reservoir enlargement

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5058 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Patterson Hall Remodel (20062002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,885,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,958,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,843,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5059 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Upgrade/Repair Campus Water System (30000422)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,508,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,770,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,278,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,278,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Preservation (30000427)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,320,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,654,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,974,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,666,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5061 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
University Science Center - Science II (30000466)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,970,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5062 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Eastern Washington University Minor Works Preservation (30000468)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,434,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,066,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5063 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000500)

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,217,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5064 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Science Building (30000045)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,193,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,678,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,771,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5065 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works Preservation (30000444)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,930,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5066 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Combined Utilities (30000448)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,730,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $480,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,210,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,810,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5067 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Samuelson Communication and Technology Center (SCTC) (30000451)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,481,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,481,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5068 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works Preservation (30000615)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5069 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000677)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5070 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Communications Laboratory Building Preservation and Renovation
(30000002)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,631,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,981,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5071 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Facilities Preservation (30000051)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,560,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,935,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5072 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Facility Preservation (30000084)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,580,000
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,120,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $212,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,912,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5073 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Science Center - Lab I, 2nd Floor Renovation (30000116)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,575,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5074 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Science Center - Lab II, 2nd Floor Renovation (30000117)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,544,000
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,694,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,694,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5075 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Science Center - Lab I Basement Renovation (30000118)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,805,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,805,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5076 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Lecture Hall Remodel (30000493)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,308,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,457,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,065,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5077 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repair
(30000503)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5078 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Carver Academic Renovation (20081060)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,374,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,531,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,905,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5079 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Classroom and Lab Upgrades (30000425)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $489,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $539,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,260,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,799,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5080 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Fraser Hall Renovation (30000427)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,440,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,940,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5081 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Preservation (30000431)

Reappropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,286,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,794,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5082 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(91000006)

Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,614,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,614,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5083 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
North Campus Utility Upgrade (30000426)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,462,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,582,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,582,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5084 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Classroom and Lab Upgrades Phase 2 (30000518)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,830,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $916,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,746,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,746,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5085 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Preservation (30000524)

Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5086 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Performing Arts Exterior Renewal (30000428)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,947,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,947,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5087 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Pacific-Lewis and Clark Station Camp Park Project (2002S001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $226,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,261,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,487,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5088 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Grants (20074004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of RCW 27.34.330.
(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the project
list in section 5137, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.
(3) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of section 5044, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $626,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,279,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,905,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5089 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Project Capital Grants (30000011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of section 5120, chapter 497, Laws of 2009.
(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of section 5045, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,152,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,273,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5090 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Building Preservation (30000111)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $414,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $386,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5091 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Grants (30000117)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of RCW 27.34.330.
(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the
provisions of section 622, chapter 1, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,729,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,353,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,082,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5092 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Facilities Preservation - Minor Works Projects (30000164)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,483,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,483,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5093 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Heritage Capital Grants (30000170)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
27.34.330.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Authorized Amount

Tacoma Chinese Reconciliation Park $400,000

Mabton High School Historic Restoration $800,000

1912 Metaline Falls School $34,000

Restoration of Duwamish Hill Preserve $515,000

Coastal Salish Institute at Northwest Indian College $1,000,000

Washington Hall Restoration $290,000

Maritime Heritage Education Center at Lake Union $990,000

Public Access to the Mary Olsen Farm $286,000

Paramount Theatre $146,000

Chambers Prairie Schoolhouse $39,000

Vancouver National Historic Reserve Trust $283,000

Archives Building at the Island Heritage Museum $52,000

Western Forest Industries Museum $385,000

Jacob & Emma Reard House $40,000

Chinook School Rehabilitation $115,000

Shoreline Historical Museum $219,000

Eddon Boat Restoration $128,000

Yamasaki Courtyard Renewal $654,000

Railway History Center $789,000

Covenant Beach Bible Camp Historic Dining Hall $850,000

Virginia V Hull Restoration $221,000

Coastal Heritage Alliance $82,000

Historical Dash Point School $25,000

Nordic Heritage Museum $1,000,000

Washington State Holocaust Museum $150,000

Highline Heritage Museum $338,000

Total $9,831,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,831,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,831,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5094 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Minor Works - Campbell House Preservation (30000021)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $124,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $364,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5095 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Minor Works - Northwest Museum of Arts and Culture (30000026)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $193,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $248,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5096 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: Humanities and Student Services (20061204)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,305,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,388,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5097 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College: Campus Classrooms (20062696)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,629,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,987,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5098 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Learning Resource Center
(20062698)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,185,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,476,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,661,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5099 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clover Park Technical College: Allied Health Care Facility
(20062699)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,883,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,333,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5100 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Wood Construction Center
(20081216)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $942,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,367,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,309,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5101 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College: Technical Education Building (20081220)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,804,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,626,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5102 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Index Hall Replacement (20081221)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,652,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,662,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,314,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5103 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Trades and Industry Building
(20081222)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $573,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,774,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,272,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,619,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5104 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Science and Math Building (20081226)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,576,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,568,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,144,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5105 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Core (20081321)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $568,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $219,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $787,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,054,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,841,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5106 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Health Careers Center (20082701)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,971,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,202,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,173,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5107 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: Health Science Building (20082702)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,672,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,884,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,726,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5108 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bates Technical College: Mohler Communications Technology Center
(20082703)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $219,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,808,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,709,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,736,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5109 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College: Social Science Center (20082704)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $965,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $109,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,758,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,832,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5110 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Health and Advanced Technologies Building
(20082705)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,335,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,784,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,239,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,358,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5111 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Fort Worden Building 202 (30000114)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,191,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $186,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,377,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5112 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Fisheries Program (30000117)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $410,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5113 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College: Myklebust Gymnasium (30000118)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,712,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5114 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Seattle Maritime Academy
(30000120)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,491,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,117,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,828,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5115 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Palmer Martin Building (30000121)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,243,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $994,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5116 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: College Instruction Center (30000122)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Olympic community college shall enter into
an interagency agreement with the office of financial management to
provide funding for a budget evaluation study. The office of financial
management shall use a budget evaluation study team approach using
value engineering techniques and life cycle cost analysis in conducting
the study. The office of financial management shall select the budget
evaluation team members, contract for the study, and report the results
to the legislature and agencies in a timely manner following the study.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,212,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $412,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,624,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5117 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Centralia Community College: Student Services (30000123)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,517,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,075,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,592,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5118 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Allied Health and Early Childhood Development
Center (30000126)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,810,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,756,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,566,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5119 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College: Technology Building Renewal
(30000129)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,159,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,260,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5120 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Science, Math, and Technology
Building (30000130)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,271,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,606,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5121 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Renton Technical College: Automotive Complex Renovation (30000134)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,583,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,716,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,299,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5122 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College: Science Engineering Technology Building
(30000137)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,820,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,820,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5123 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Whatcom Community College: Learning Commons (30000138)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,822,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,802,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,624,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5124 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (30000504)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,620,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,379,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,999,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,046,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,045,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5125 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs "A" (30000505)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,676,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,153,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,829,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5126 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College: Cascade Court (30000128)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,087,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,684,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,771,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5127 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "A" (30000434)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,708,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,417,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5128 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Preservation (30000461)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,544,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,457,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,001,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5129 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (30000674)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,730,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5130 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Preventive Maintenance and Building System Repairs (91000043)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5131 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (30000723)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $354,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,236,000
State Higher Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $620,000
Community and Technical College Forest Reserve
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $582,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,792,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,792,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5132 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Preservation (30000779)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5133 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs (30000844)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,785,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,785,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5134 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs (30000897)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,852,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,282,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,134,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,134,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5135 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs (30000941)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,574,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,574,000

(End of part)

PART 6
2013 SUPPLEMENTAL CAPITAL BUDGET
Sec. 6001 2012 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 1022 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (91000005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
Up to $75,000 is for the department of enterprise services to
conduct a review of the state's current public works procurement
processes and provide a report by December 15, 2012, to the appropriate
committees of the legislature and the governor with procurement reform
recommendations. For recommendations that require a statutory change,
the report should include draft legislation needed to accomplish the
report's recommendations. The director may contract with a private
entity for assistance to conduct the study. The capital projects
advisory review board will provide advice and assistance as required by
the director. The report will include historical data on (1) the use
of change orders; (2) the use of job order contracting; (3) how are
competitive public works contracts advertised; and (4) contract
closeout procedures. State agencies that will participate include one
research university, one natural resource agency, and one general
government agency.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,751,000))
$8,541,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,250,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,001,000))
$42,791,000

Sec. 6002 2012 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 1024 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES

Natural Resource Building Roof Replacement and Exterior Foam
Insulation System Repairs (30000546)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($982,000))
$4,482,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($982,000))
$4,482,000

Sec. 6003 2012 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 1025 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Natural Resource Building Roof Replacement and Exterior Foam
Insulation System Repairs (30000546)

Appropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,500,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,500,000))
$0

Sec. 6004 2011 1st sp. s. c 48 s 1022 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((GENERAL ADMINISTRATION)) ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (91000005)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $928,000
((Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $790,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,718,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,718,000))
$928,000

Sec. 6005 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 1023 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((GENERAL ADMINISTRATION)) ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Legislative Building Critical Hydronic Loop Repairs (30000584)

Appropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,179,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,179,000))
$0

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Legislative Building Critical Hydronic Loop Repairs (30000584)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,179,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,179,000

Sec. 6007 2012 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 3002 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (91000032)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the following ranked list of projects. ((If a
specified project has not met the requirements for executing a contract
with the department by April 30, 2013, the department may allocate the
amount specified to additional projects awarded on a competitive basis
provided that the awardee is ready to proceed with the project.))

Project Authorized
Amount

Port Gamble Bay - Open up 90
acres of geoduck ((tracks)) tracts $2,000,000

Port Gamble Bay - Source
control, habitat preservation, and
cleanup sustainability $7,000,000

Administration $270,000

Total $9,270,000

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,270,000

Sec. 6008 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 3052 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Fort Worden State Park: Building 202 Rehabilitation (30000027)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,377,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,377,000))
$0

Sec. 6009 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 3070 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000143)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2011-3B, ((developed
April 6, 2011)) revised April 10, 2013.

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,806,000))
$6,461,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,806,000))
$6,461,000

Sec. 6010 2011 1st sp s. c 49 s 3112 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Replacing State Forest Lands with Productive Forests (91000029)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The total appropriation is provided solely to the department to
transfer from state forest land status to natural resources
conservation area status certain state forest lands in counties with a
population of 25,000 or less which are subject to timber harvest
deferrals greater than thirty years due to the presence of wildlife
species listed as endangered or threatened under the federal endangered
species act. The approved list of properties for transfer is
identified in the LEAP capital document No. 2011-5A, ((developed March
24, 2011)) revised April 10, 2013.
(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and
transferred at fair market value, without consideration of management
or regulatory encumbrances associated with wildlife species listed
under the federal endangered species act. The value of the timber and
other valuable materials transferred must be distributed as provided in
RCW 79.64.110, in the same manner as valuable material revenues from
other state forest lands in the applicable counties. The value of the
land transferred must be deposited in the park land trust revolving
account and be solely used to buy replacement state forest land within
the same county as the property transferred, consistent with RCW
79.22.060.
(3) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department shall execute and record a real property instrument that
dedicates the transferred properties to the purposes identified in
subsection (1) of this section. Transfer agreements for properties
identified in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that
restrict the use of the property to the intended purpose.
(4) The department and applicable counties shall work in good faith
to carry out the intent of this section. However, the department or
applicable counties may remove a property from the transfer list based
on new, substantive information, if it is determined that transfer of
the property is not in the statewide interest of either the state
forest trust or the natural resources conservation area program.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (30000208)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
ecological restoration of the upland buffer areas within the Elk River
natural resource conservation area.

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000

Sec. 6012 2012 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 5005 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2011-13 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,337,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for
completing inventory and building condition assessments for all public
school districts once every six years.
(2) In calculating square foot eligibility for state assistance
grants, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced by fifty
percent.
(3) $952,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for mapping the design of new
facilities and remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled, for
school construction projects funded through the school construction
assistance program.

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $307,558,000
Common School Construction Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,600,000))
$2,230,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($309,158,000))
$309,788,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,351,139,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,660,297,000))
$1,660,927,000

Sec. 6013 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5101 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Fort Worden Building 202 (30000114)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$4,377,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$4,377,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6014 COLUMBIA RIVER BASIN NONTAXABLE AND
TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.
Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from
the Columbia river basin water supply development account may be
transferred to the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply
development account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee
to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and
regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. The
state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of
financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation
authority between the Columbia river basin water supply development
account and the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply
development account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation
authority from the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply
development account to the Columbia river basin water supply
development account may be made.

(End of part)

PART 7
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 7001 RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of
the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond
appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the
appropriations contained in this act are twenty-eight million dollars
for the 2013-2015 biennium, one hundred ninety million dollars for the
2015-2017 biennium, and two hundred seventy-eight million dollars for
the 2017-2019 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7002 (1) Allotments for appropriations in this
act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review
requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in
compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing
alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10
RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and
RCW 43.88.110.
(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget
notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7003 (1) The legislature finds that use of
life cycle cost analysis will aid public entities, architects,
engineers, and contractors in making design and construction decisions
that positively impact both the initial construction cost and the
ongoing operating and maintenance cost of a project. To ensure that
the total cost of a project is accounted for and the most reasonable
and cost efficient design is used, agencies shall develop life cycle
costs for any construction project over $5,000,000. The life cycle
costs shall represent the present value sum of capital costs,
installation costs, operating costs, and maintenance costs over the
life expectancy of the project. The legislature further finds the most
effective approach to the life cycle cost analysis is to integrate it
into the early part of the design process.
(2) Agencies shall develop a minimum of three project alternatives
for use in the life cycle cost analysis. These alternatives must be
both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being
addressed. The chosen alternative must be the most reasonable and
cost-effective solution. A brief description of each project
alternative and why it was chosen must be included in the life cycle
cost analysis section of the predesign.
(3) The office of financial management shall: (a) Make available
a life cycle cost model to be used for analysis; (b) in consultation
with the department of enterprise services, provide assistance in using
the life cycle cost model; and (c) update the life cycle cost model
annually including assumptions for inflation rates, discount rates, and
energy rates.
(4) Agencies shall consider architectural and engineering firms'
and general contractors' experience using life cycle costs, operating
costs, and energy efficiency measures when selecting an architectural
and engineering firm, or when selecting contractors using alternative
contracting methods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7004 To ensure that major construction
projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive
intent, appropriations in this act in excess of $5,000,000 shall not be
expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has
reviewed and approved the agency's predesign. The predesign document
must include, but not be limited to, program, site, and cost analysis,
including life-cycle cost, in accordance with the predesign manual
adopted by the office of financial management. The results of life-cycle cost analysis shall be a primary consideration in the selection
of a building design. Construction shall proceed only upon providing
to the office of financial management the life-cycle costs. To improve
monitoring of major construction projects, progress reports must be
submitted by the agency administering the project to the office of
financial management and to the fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and senate. Reports must be submitted on July 1st and
December 31st each year in a format to be developed by the office of
financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7005 (1) To ensure minor works appropriations
are carried out in accordance with legislative intent, funds
appropriated in this act shall not be allotted until project lists are
on file at the office of financial management, the house of
representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means
committee. All projects must meet the criteria included in subsection
(2)(a) of this section. Revisions to the lists must be filed with the
office of financial management, the house of representatives capital
budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee and include
an explanation of variances from the prior lists before funds may be
expended on the revisions.
(2)(a) Minor works projects are single line appropriations that
include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued
between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher
education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000.
These projects can generally be completed within two years of the
appropriation with the funding provided. Agencies are prohibited from
including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a
larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time,
would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works
projects. Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the
Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the above
minor works categories.
(b) Minor works appropriations shall not be used for, among other
things: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or
designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor
works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works
list; moveable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment
not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office
of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a
specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition;
rolling stock, computers or to supplement funding for projects with
funding shortfalls unless expressly authorized elsewhere in this act.
The office of financial management may make an exception to the
limitations described in this subsection (2)(b) for exigent
circumstances after notifying the legislative fiscal committees and
waiting ten days for comments by the legislature regarding the proposed
exception.
(c) Minor works preservation projects may include program
improvements of no more than twenty-five percent of the individual
minor works preservation project cost.
(3) Minor works projects are intended to be one-time expenditures
that do not require future state resources to complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7006 (1) The office of financial management
may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a
capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the
completion of such project to another capital project for which the
appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand
the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the
appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital
appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or
institution of higher education and only between capital projects that
are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur
between projects to local government agencies except where the grants
are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such
transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that
govern the grants.
(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is
in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only
if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is
substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have
been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that
the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be
completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in
this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each
project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's
budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history
that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a
different way.
(4) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except
emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with
the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty
days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial
management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within
thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7007 (1) It is expected that projects be ready
to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the
project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this
act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two
biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large
infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often
take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does
not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for
smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.
(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and
appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate
infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation
and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural
environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition
and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional
employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.
(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate
expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and
shall use contracted design and construction services wherever
necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7008 The office of financial management, in
accordance with RCW 28B.77.070 and 43.88D.010, shall include the
following in the scoring process: (1) The office of financial
management shall develop a single prioritized list that includes all
projects requesting funding, with the exception of minor works and
predesign requests. Predesigns shall be on a separate prioritized
list; (2) the office of financial management shall increase the
weighting of the reasonableness of cost criteria; (3) projects shall be
scored only once unless the office of financial management, or the
requesting school, find that the project scope or budget has
significantly changed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7009 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
State Toxic Control and Environmental Legacy Stewardship Accounts
Budgeting
The office of financial management, working with the department of
ecology and legislative fiscal committee staff, shall develop a process
and procedures for the budgeting of the state toxics control account
and the environmental legacy stewardship account to ensure adequate
funding for the base operating programs as specified in RCW 70.105D.070
(3) is maintained. This includes recommendations on how the base
operating budget work will be assigned to the two accounts, and, if
future shifts between the two accounts are necessary to maintain
existing funding levels, procedures that describe when they are to be
addressed through maintenance level or policy level decision packages.
These procedures shall be submitted to the legislative fiscal and
environmental committees by October 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7010 State agencies, including institutions of
higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for
capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for
operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7011 Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological
and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005.
Agencies and higher education institutions shall comply with the
requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7012 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account: For transfer to the
Capitol Building Construction Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7013 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS
State Toxic Control Account: For transfer to the
Radioactive Mixed Waste Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
State Toxic Control Account: For transfer to the
Local Toxic Control Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account: For
transfer to the Local Toxic Control Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7014 ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES
THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter into
financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or
nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the
principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under
this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract
option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase
agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or
financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures
made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue
date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of
participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of
the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to
the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the
state finance committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
enterprise services and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Peninsula College
for up to $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate or replace the Forks
satellite building.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound
Community College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the
downtown Lacey campus.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase up to forty
acres of land.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a
replacement facility for the student life center.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom Community
College for up to $11,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a student
recreation center.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Community
College for up to $3,100,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an addition to the
student services building.
(g) Enter into a long-term lease on behalf of Spokane Community
College at Felts Field suitable for the aerospace training center
program, subject to the approval of the office of financial management
as required by chapter 43.82 RCW.
(2) Department of enterprise services:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $1,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the modifications to the Yakima office building in preparation for
the department of social and health services use of the building.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $69,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct a new office building at 1063 Capitol Way South, Olympia.
The building will be delivered using design build, as defined by
chapter 39.10 RCW, with a guarantee for energy, operations and
maintenance performance. The term for performance validation must not
be less than five years. The state may use state employees for
services not related to building performance. Criteria for selecting
a contractor must include life cycle costs, energy costs or energy use
index. The scope of the building shall be between two hundred thousand
and two hundred twenty-five thousand square feet of office space based
on the office of financial management's direction for square feet and
tenants identified in the programming phase including the Washington
State Patrol. Tenant lease costs for the building may not exceed $26
per gross square foot including debt services and operating expenses.
Proposals must be received by January 31, 2014. This is phase one of
a two-phase process that includes future demolition of the current
general administration building and construction of a similar facility
which may include the state library as a tenant.

Sec. 7015 RCW 43.34.080 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 34 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The capitol campus design advisory committee is established as
an advisory group to the capitol committee and the director of
((general administration)) enterprise services to review programs,
planning, design, and landscaping of state capitol facilities and
grounds and to make recommendations that will contribute to the
attainment of architectural, aesthetic, functional, and environmental
excellence in design and maintenance of capitol facilities on campus
and located in neighboring communities.
(2) The advisory committee shall consist of the following persons
who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the director of
((general administration)) enterprise services:
(a) Two architects;
(b) A landscape architect; and
(c) An urban planner.
The director of ((general administration)) enterprise services
shall appoint the chair and vice chair and shall provide the staff and
resources necessary for implementing this section. The advisory
committee shall meet at least once every ninety days and at the call of
the chair.
The members of the committee shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW
43.03.220 and 44.04.120.
(3) The advisory committee shall also consist of the secretary of
state and two members of the house of representatives, one from each
caucus, who shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives, and two members of the senate, one from each caucus,
who shall be appointed by the president of the senate.
(4) The advisory committee shall review plans and designs affecting
state capitol facilities as they are developed. The advisory
committee's review shall include:
(a) The process of solicitation and selection of appropriate
professional design services including design-build proposals;
(b) Compliance with the capitol campus master plan and design
concepts as adopted by the capitol committee;
(c) The design, siting, and grouping of state capitol facilities
relative to the service needs of state government and the impact upon
the local community's economy, environment, traffic patterns, and other
factors;
(d) The relationship of overall state capitol facility planning to
the respective comprehensive plans for long-range urban development of
the cities of Olympia, Lacey, and Tumwater, and Thurston county; and
(e) Landscaping plans and designs, including planting proposals,
street furniture, sculpture, monuments, and access to the capitol
campus and buildings.
(5) For development of the property known as the 1063 block, the
committee may review the proposal selected by the department of
enterprise services but must not propose changes that will affect the
scope, budget, or schedule of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7016 PUGET SOUND PROTECTION AND RESTORATION.
Consistent with RCW 90.71.340, when expending appropriations under this
act that contribute to Puget Sound protection and recovery, agencies
shall consult with the Puget Sound partnership to ensure that projects
and expenditures are either in, or consistent with the 2020 action
agenda. These consultations shall include the exchange of information
on specific actions, projects, associated funding, performance
measures, and other information necessary to track project
implementation and ensure alignment with the action agenda. In
situations where the Puget Sound partnership finds that a project is
not in, or is not consistent with the action agenda Puget Sound
partnership shall document this finding and report back to the governor
and legislative fiscal committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7017 FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION--ART WORK
ALLOWANCE POOLING. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated
in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is
provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210. The Washington
state arts commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects
in order to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and
representatives of school district boards.
(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding
two hundred thousand dollars by colleges or universities is provided
solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027. The Washington state arts
commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order
to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with
the board of regents or trustees.
(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction of any public building by a state agency as
defined in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW
43.17.200. The Washington state arts commission may combine the
proceeds from individual projects in order to fund larger works of art
or mobile art displays in consultation with the state agency.
(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the
Washington state arts commission during the 2013-2015 biennium for the
purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended
solely for direct acquisition of works of art. The commission may use
up to $100,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces
in the state art collection pursuant to chapter 36, Laws of 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7018 The amounts shown under the headings
"Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for
informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval
of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate
prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia
in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an
estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the
2015-2017 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero
does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide
funding for the project or program in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7019 To carry out the provisions of this act,
the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design,
construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7020 If any federal moneys appropriated by
this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the
department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace
the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources.
No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval
of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate
ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital
budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7021 (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all
appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or
in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW
43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so
that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended
state share of total project costs.
(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not
required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for
phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds
is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7022 NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.
Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the
state building construction account, or any other account receiving
bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building
construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee
to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and
regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds.
Portions of the general obligation bond proceeds authorized by chapter
. . ., Laws of 2013 (Substitute House Bill No. 1088, the general
obligation bond bill) for deposit into the state taxable building
construction account that are in excess of amounts required to comply
with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations shall
be deposited into the state building construction account. The state
treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of
financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation
authority between the state building construction account, or any other
account receiving bond proceeds, and the state taxable building
construction account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation
authority from the state taxable building construction account to the
state building construction account may be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7023 By June 30, 2014, the department of
social and health services shall transfer deed of the property known as
the Stan Hedwall park to the city of Chehalis. The property includes
the park and any land adjacent that may be owned by the department.
The transfer must be at no cost to the city. When the deed is
transferred to the city, the lease expires. The city shall continue to
maintain and operate the land as a park.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7024 The office of financial management, in
consultation with the fiscal committees of the legislature, may select
capital projects that have completed predesign to undergo a budget
evaluation study. The budget evaluation study team approach using
value engineering techniques and life cycle cost analysis must be
utilized by the office of financial management in conducting the
studies. The office of financial management shall select the budget
evaluation team members, contract for the study, and report the results
to the legislature and agencies in a timely manner following the study.
Funds from the project appropriation must be used by the office of
financial management through an interagency agreement with the affected
agencies to cover the cost of the study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7025 COLUMBIA RIVER BASIN NONTAXABLE AND
TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.
Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from
the Columbia river basin water supply development account may be
transferred to the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply
development account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee
to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and
regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds. The
state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of
financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation
authority between the Columbia river basin water supply development
account and the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply
development account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation
authority from the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply
development account to the Columbia river basin water supply
development account may be made.

Sec. 7026 RCW 28B.15.210 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7022 are each
amended to read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all
building fees at the University of Washington, including building fees
to be charged students registering in the schools of medicine and
dentistry, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited as
follows:
One-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a
default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement
fund to the "University of Washington bond retirement fund" and the
remainder thereof to the "University of Washington building account."
The sum so credited to the University of Washington building account
shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting, altering,
maintaining, equipping, or furnishing buildings, and for certificates
of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums
transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(3). The sum so credited to
the University of Washington bond retirement fund shall be used for the
payment of principal of and interest on bonds outstanding as provided
by chapter 28B.20 RCW except for any sums transferred as authorized in
RCW 28B.20.725(5). ((During the 2011-2013 biennium, sums credited to
the University of Washington building account shall also be used for
routine facility maintenance and utility costs.)) During the 2013-2015
biennium, sums credited to the University of Washington building
account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility
costs, and facility condition assessments.

Sec. 7027 RCW 28B.20.725 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7020 are each
amended to read as follows:
The board is hereby empowered:
(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any
bonds being issued;
(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement
fund and any reserve account therein;
(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the University of
Washington building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary
to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such
fund;
(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement
fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any
bonds;
(5) To authorize the transfer to the University of Washington
building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in
excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of
such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund.
((However, during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys that
are in excess of the debt service due within one year of the date of
transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement
fund.)) However, during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys
that are in excess of the debt service due within one year of the date
of transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement
fund. However, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer to the University of Washington building account moneys
that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds
payable out of the bond retirement fund.

Sec. 7028 RCW 28B.15.310 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7023 are each
amended to read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all
building fees shall be paid and credited as follows: To the Washington
State University bond retirement fund, one-half or such larger portion
as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be
made out of such bond retirement fund; and the remainder thereof to the
Washington State University building account.
The sum so credited to the Washington State University building
account shall be expended by the board of regents for buildings,
equipment, or maintenance on the campus of Washington State University
as may be deemed most advisable and for the best interests of the
university, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94
RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized by law. During the
2011-2013 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University
building account shall also be used for routine facility maintenance
and utility costs. During the 2013-2015 biennium, sums credited to the
Washington State University building account shall also be used for
routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition
assessments. Expenditures so made shall be accounted for in accordance
with existing law and shall not be expended until appropriated by the
legislature.
The sum so credited to the Washington State University bond
retirement fund shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the
principal of and interest on building bonds issued by the university,
except for any sums which may be transferred out of such fund as
authorized by law.

Sec. 7029 RCW 28B.30.750 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7021 are each
amended to read as follows:
The board is hereby empowered:
(1) To reserve the right to issue bonds later on a parity with any
bonds being issued;
(2) To authorize the investing of moneys in the bond retirement
fund and any reserve account therein;
(3) To authorize the transfer of money from the Washington State
University building account to the bond retirement fund when necessary
to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such
fund;
(4) To create a reserve account or accounts in the bond retirement
fund to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any
bonds;
(5) To authorize the transfer to the Washington State University
building account of any money on deposit in the bond retirement fund in
excess of debt service for a period of three years from the date of
such transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of such fund.
((However, during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys
that are in excess of the debt service due within one year of the date
of transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement
fund.)) However, during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys
that are in excess of the debt service due within one year of the date
of transfer on all outstanding bonds payable out of the bond retirement
fund. However, during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer to the Washington State University building account moneys
that are in excess of the debt service due within the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium from the date of such transfer on all outstanding bonds
payable out of the bond retirement fund.

Sec. 7030 RCW 28B.35.370 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7024 are each
amended to read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof all
building fees of each regional university and The Evergreen State
College shall be paid into the state treasury and these together with
such normal school fund revenues as provided in RCW 28B.35.751 as are
received by the state treasury shall be credited as follows:
(1) On or before June 30th of each year the board of trustees of
each regional university and The Evergreen State College, if issuing
bonds payable out of its building fees and above described normal
school fund revenues, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts
required in the ensuing twelve months to pay and secure the payment of
the principal of and interest on such bonds. The amounts so certified
by each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be a
prior lien and charge against all building fees and above described
normal school fund revenues of such institution. The state treasurer
shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington
University capital projects account, the Western Washington University
capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital
projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the
state treasury. The amounts deposited in the respective capital
projects accounts shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the
principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by such regional
universities and The Evergreen State College as authorized by law. If
in any twelve month period it shall appear that the amount certified by
any such board of trustees is insufficient to pay and secure the
payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building
and above described normal school fund revenue bonds of its
institution, the state treasurer shall notify the board of trustees and
such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of
moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest
on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.
(2) All normal school fund revenue pursuant to RCW 28B.35.751 shall
be deposited in the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The
Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which
accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited
in the respective capital projects accounts shall be appropriated and
expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest
on bonds payable out of the building fees and normal school revenue and
for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance,
demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets,
and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or
appurtenances in relation thereto except for any sums transferred
therefrom as authorized by law. During the 2011-2013 biennium, sums in
the respective capital accounts shall also be used for routine facility
maintenance and utility costs. During the 2013-2015 biennium, sums in
the respective capital accounts shall also be used for routine facility
maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments.
(3) Funds available in the respective capital projects accounts may
also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 7031 RCW 28B.50.360 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7025 are each
amended to read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of start of each quarter all
collected building fees of each such community and technical college
shall be paid into the state treasury, and shall be credited as
follows:
(1) On or before June 30th of each year the college board if
issuing bonds payable out of building fees shall certify to the state
treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve-month period to
pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such
bonds. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so
certified in the community and technical college capital projects
account. Such amounts of the funds deposited in the community and
technical college capital projects account as are necessary to pay and
secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building
bonds issued by the college board as authorized by this chapter shall
be devoted to that purpose. If in any twelve-month period it shall
appear that the amount certified by the college board is insufficient
to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the
outstanding building bonds, the state treasurer shall notify the
college board and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all
requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal
and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at
all times.
(2) The community and technical college capital projects account is
hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the
capital projects account shall be appropriated and expended to pay and
secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable
out of the building fees and for the construction, reconstruction,
erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of
buildings and other capital assets owned by the state board for
community and technical colleges in the name of the state of
Washington, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements,
improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto, engineering and
architectural services provided by the department of ((general
administration)) enterprise services, and for the payment of principal
of and interest on any bonds issued for such purposes. During the
2011-2013 biennium, sums in the capital projects account shall also be
used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs. During the
2013-2015 biennium, sums in the capital projects account shall also be
used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.
(3) Funds available in the community and technical college capital
projects account may also be used for certificates of participation
under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 7032 RCW 43.155.070 and 2013 c 275 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To qualify for financial assistance under this chapter the
board must determine that a local government meets all of the following
conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan; and
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into
consideration local employment and economic factors.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 may not receive financial assistance under this
chapter unless it has adopted a comprehensive plan, including a capital
facilities plan element, and development regulations as required by RCW
36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any county, city, or town
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a comprehensive plan or
development regulations before requesting or receiving financial
assistance under this chapter if such request is made before the
expiration of the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040. A county,
city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 that has not adopted a
comprehensive plan and development regulations within the time periods
specified in RCW 36.70A.040 may apply for and receive financial
assistance under this chapter if the comprehensive plan and development
regulations are adopted as required by RCW 36.70A.040 before executing
a contractual agreement for financial assistance with the board.
(3) In considering awarding financial assistance for public
facilities to special districts requesting funding for a proposed
facility located in a county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040, the board must consider whether the county, city, or town
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the
proposed facility is located has adopted a comprehensive plan and
development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) The board must develop a priority process for public works
projects as provided in this section. The intent of the priority
process is to maximize the value of public works projects accomplished
with assistance under this chapter. The board must attempt to assure
a geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. The board
must consider at least the following factors in assigning a priority to
a project:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.110, whether the
entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW
90.71.010;
(c) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(d) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(e) Whether the applicant's permitting process has been certified
as streamlined by the office of regulatory assistance;
(f) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007;
(g) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of loan money available;
(h) The number of communities served by or funding the project;
(i) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment,
compared to the average state unemployment;
(j) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement,
or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards, including the cost of
extending existing service to such a system;
(k) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.120, and
effective one calendar year following the development of model
evergreen community management plans and ordinances under RCW
35.105.050, whether the entity receiving assistance has been
recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the
evergreen community recognition program created in RCW 35.105.030;
(l) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth; and
(m) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(5) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, in place of the criteria,
ranking, and submission processes for construction loan lists provided
in subsections (4) and (7) of this section:
(a) The board must develop a process for numerically ranking
applications for construction loans submitted by local governments.
The board must consider, at a minimum and in any order, the following
factors in assigning a numerical ranking to a project:
(i) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of many people;
(ii) The extent to which the project leverages nonstate funds;
(iii) The extent to which the project is ready to proceed to
construction;
(iv) Whether the project is located in an area of high
unemployment, compared to the average state unemployment;
(v) Whether the project promotes the sustainable use of resources
and environmental quality;
(vi) Whether the project consolidates or regionalizes systems;
(vii) Whether the project encourages economic development through
mixed-use and mixed income development consistent with chapter 36.70A
RCW;
(viii) Whether the system is being well-managed in the present and
for long-term sustainability;
(ix) Achieving equitable distribution of funds by geography and
population;
(x) The extent to which the project meets the following state
policy objectives:
(A) Efficient use of state resources;
(B) Preservation and enhancement of health and safety;
(C) Abatement of pollution and protection of the environment;
(D) Creation of new, family wage jobs, and avoidance of shifting
existing jobs from one Washington state community to another;
(E) Fostering economic development consistent with chapter 36.70A
RCW;
(F) Efficiency in delivery of goods and services, public transit,
and transportation;
(G) Avoidance of additional costs to state and local governments
that adversely impact local residents and small businesses; and
(H) Reduction of the overall cost of public infrastructure; and
(xi) Other criteria that the board considers necessary to achieve
the purposes of this chapter.
(b) Before November 1, 2014, the board must develop and submit to
the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives a ranked list of qualified public works projects which
have been evaluated by the board and are recommended for funding by the
legislature. The maximum amount of funding that the board may
recommend for any jurisdiction is ten million dollars per biennium.
For each project on the ranked list, as well as for eligible projects
not recommended for funding, the board must document the numerical
ranking that was assigned.
(6) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments may
not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government applicant
must provide documentation of attempts to secure additional local or
other sources of funding for each public works project for which
financial assistance is sought under this chapter.
(((6))) (7) Before November 1st of each even-numbered year, the
board must develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of
the senate and house of representatives a description of the loans made
under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (((9))) (10) of this
section during the preceding fiscal year and a prioritized list of
projects which are recommended for funding by the legislature,
including one copy to the staff of each of the committees. The list
must include, but not be limited to, a description of each project and
recommended financing, the terms and conditions of the loan or
financial guarantee, the local government jurisdiction and unemployment
rate, demonstration of the jurisdiction's critical need for the project
and documentation of local funds being used to finance the public works
project. The list must also include measures of fiscal capacity for
each jurisdiction recommended for financial assistance, compared to
authorized limits and state averages, including local government sales
taxes; real estate excise taxes; property taxes; and charges for or
taxes on sewerage, water, garbage, and other utilities.
(((7))) (8) The board may not sign contracts or otherwise
financially obligate funds from the public works assistance account
before the legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of
public works projects. The legislature may remove projects from the
list recommended by the board. The legislature may not change the
order of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.
(((8))) (9) Subsection (((7))) (8) of this section does not apply
to loans made under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (((9)))
(10) of this section.
(((9))) (10) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans
are exempted from subsection (((7))) (8) of this section.
(((10))) (11) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or
recycling facilities under this chapter, a city or county must
demonstrate that the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent
with and necessary to implement the comprehensive solid waste
management plan adopted by the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.
(((11))) (12) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to
address the effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may be
funded under this section only if the project is not in conflict with
the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.
(13) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, for projects involving
repair, replacement, or improvement of a wastewater treatment plant or
other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency
audit is obtainable, the public works board must require as a contract
condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade
efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the
audit as part of its public works assistance account program loan.
(14)(a) For public works assistance account application rounds
conducted during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the board must
implement policies and procedures designed to maximize local government
use of federally-funded drinking water and clean water state revolving
funds operated by the state departments of health and ecology. The
board, department of ecology, and department of health must jointly
develop evaluation criteria and application procedures that will
increase access of eligible drinking water and wastewater projects to
the public works assistance account for short-term preconstruction
financing and to the federally funded state revolving funds for
construction financing. The procedures must also strengthen
coordinated funding of preconstruction and construction projects.
(b) For all construction loan projects proposed to the legislature
for funding during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the board must base
interest rates on the average daily market interest rate for tax-exempt
municipal bonds as published in the bond buyer's index for the period
from sixty to thirty days before the start of the application cycle.
For projects with a repayment period between five and twenty years, the
rate must be sixty percent of the market rate. For projects with a
repayment period under five years, the rate must be thirty percent of
the market rate. The board must also provide reduced interest rates,
extended repayment periods, or forgivable principal loans for projects
that meet financial hardship criteria as measured by the affordability
index or similar standard measure of financial hardship.
(c) By December 1, 2013, the board must recommend to the
appropriate committees of the legislature statutory language to make
permanent these new criteria, procedures, and financing policies.

Sec. 7033 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 9 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2)(a) Moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 must be deposited as
follows: Fifty-six percent to the state toxics control account under
subsection (3) of this section and forty-four percent to the local
toxics control account under subsection (4) of this section. When the
cumulative amount of deposits made to the state and local toxics
control accounts under this section reaches the limit during a fiscal
year as established in (b) of this subsection, the remainder of the
moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 during that fiscal year must be
deposited into the environmental legacy stewardship account created in
RCW 70.105D.--- (section 10, chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.).
(b) The limit on distributions of moneys collected under RCW
82.21.030 to the state and local toxics control accounts for the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2013, is one hundred forty million dollars.
(c) In addition to the funds required under (a) of this subsection,
the following moneys must be deposited into the state toxics control
account: (i) The costs of remedial actions recovered under this
chapter or chapter 70.105A RCW; (ii) penalties collected or recovered
under this chapter; and (iii) any other money appropriated or
transferred to the account by the legislature.
(3) Moneys in the state toxics control account must be used only to
carry out the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to
the following activities:
(a) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(b) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(c) The hazardous waste clean-up program required under this
chapter;
(d) State matching funds required under federal cleanup law;
(e) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(f) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or
disposal of paint and hazardous wastes from households, small
businesses, and agriculture;
(g) Oil and hazardous materials spill prevention, preparedness,
training, and response activities;
(h) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(i) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(j) A public participation program;
(k) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards
under RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both: (i) A substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur; and (ii) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship;
(l) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150;
(m) State agriculture and health programs for the safe use,
reduction, recycling, or disposal of pesticides;
(n) Storm water pollution control projects and activities that
protect or preserve existing remedial actions or prevent hazardous
clean-up sites;
(o) Funding requirements to maintain receipt of federal funds under
the federal solid waste disposal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.);
(p) Air quality programs and actions for reducing public exposure
to toxic air pollution;
(q) Public funding to assist prospective purchasers to pay for the
costs of remedial action in compliance with clean-up standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) if:
(i) The facility is located within a redevelopment opportunity zone
designated under RCW 70.105D.--- (section 4, chapter 1, Laws of 2013
2nd sp. sess.);
(ii) The amount and terms of the funding are established under a
settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(5); and
(iii) The director has found the funding meets any additional
criteria established in rule by the department, will achieve a
substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise
occur, and will provide a public benefit in addition to cleanup
commensurate with the scope of the public funding;
(r) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris
cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters; ((and))
(s) Appropriations to the local toxics control account or the
environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.---(section 10, chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.), if the legislature
determines that priorities for spending exceed available funds in those
accounts;
(t) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics
control account may be spent on projects in section 3159 of this act
and for transfer to the local toxics control account; and
(u) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the state toxics
control account may be transferred to the radioactive mixed waste
account.
(4)(a) The department shall use moneys deposited in the local
toxics control account for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority:
(i) Extended grant agreements entered into under (c)(i) of this
subsection;
(ii) Remedial actions, including planning for adaptive reuse of
properties as provided for under (c)(iv) of this subsection. The
department must prioritize funding of remedial actions at:
(A) Facilities on the department's hazardous sites list with a high
hazard ranking for which there is an approved remedial action work plan
or an equivalent document under federal cleanup law;
(B) Brownfield properties within a redevelopment opportunity zone
if the local government is a prospective purchaser of the property and
there is a department-approved remedial action work plan or equivalent
document under the federal cleanup law;
(iii) Storm water pollution source projects that: (A) Work in
conjunction with a remedial action; (B) protect completed remedial
actions against recontamination; or (C) prevent hazardous clean-up
sites;
(iv) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(v) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) Petroleum-based plastic or expanded polystyrene foam debris
cleanup activities in fresh or marine waters; and
(vii) Appropriations to the state toxics control account or the
environmental legacy stewardship account created in RCW 70.105D.---(section 10, chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess.), if the legislature
determines that priorities for spending exceed available funds in those
accounts.
(b) Funds for plans and programs must be allocated consistent with
the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters
70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW.
(c) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department may
use the following strategies when providing grants to local governments
under this subsection:
(i) Enter into an extended grant agreement with a local government
conducting remedial actions at a facility where those actions extend
over multiple biennia and the total eligible cost of those actions
exceeds twenty million dollars. The agreement is subject to the
following limitations:
(A) The initial duration of such an agreement may not exceed ten
years. The department may extend the duration of such an agreement
upon finding substantial progress has been made on remedial actions at
the facility;
(B) Extended grant agreements may not exceed fifty percent of the
total eligible remedial action costs at the facility; and
(C) The department may not allocate future funding to an extended
grant agreement unless the local government has demonstrated to the
department that funds awarded under the agreement during the previous
biennium have been substantially expended or contracts have been
entered into to substantially expend the funds;
(ii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government
conducting a remedial action that provides for periodic reimbursement
of remedial action costs as they are incurred as established in the
agreement;
(iii) Enter into a grant agreement with a local government prior to
it acquiring a property or obtaining necessary access to conduct
remedial actions, provided the agreement is conditioned upon the local
government acquiring the property or obtaining the access in accordance
with a schedule specified in the agreement;
(iv) Provide integrated planning grants to local governments to
fund studies necessary to facilitate remedial actions at brownfield
properties and adaptive reuse of properties following remediation.
Eligible activities include, but are not limited to: Environmental
site assessments; remedial investigations; health assessments;
feasibility studies; site planning; community involvement; land use and
regulatory analyses; building and infrastructure assessments; economic
and fiscal analyses; and any environmental analyses under chapter
43.21C RCW;
(v) Provide grants to local governments for remedial actions
related to areawide groundwater contamination. To receive the funding,
the local government does not need to be a potentially liable person or
be required to seek reimbursement of grant funds from a potentially
liable person;
(vi) The director may alter grant matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational opportunities, or habitat restoration opportunities
that would not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of brownfield property under RCW 70.105D.040(5) that
would not otherwise occur;
(vii) When pending grant applications under (c)(iv) and (v) of this
subsection (4) exceed the amount of funds available, designated
redevelopment opportunity zones must receive priority for distribution
of available funds.
(d) To expedite multiparty clean-up efforts, the department may
purchase remedial action cost-cap insurance. For the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium, moneys in the local toxics control account may be spent on
projects in sections 3024, 3035, 3036, and 3059 of this act.
(5) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for: Natural disasters where there is no
hazardous substance contamination; high performance buildings; solid
waste incinerator facility feasibility studies, construction,
maintenance, or operation; or after January 1, 2010, for projects
designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound, funded in a
competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310. However,
this subsection does not prevent an appropriation from the state toxics
control account to the department of revenue to enforce compliance with
the hazardous substance tax imposed in chapter 82.21 RCW.
(7) Except during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, one percent of the
moneys collected under RCW 82.21.030 shall be allocated only for public
participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations
in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. No grant may exceed sixty
thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated
for public participation that are not expended at the close of any
biennium revert to the state toxics control account.
(8) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance. To accelerate both remedial action and economic recovery,
the department may expedite the adoption of rules necessary to
implement chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. using the expedited
procedures in RCW 34.05.353. The department shall initiate the award
of financial assistance by August 1, 2013. To ensure the adoption of
rules will not delay financial assistance, the department may
administer the award of financial assistance through interpretive
guidance pending the adoption of rules through July 1, 2014.
(9) Except as provided under subsection (3)(k) and (q) of this
section, nothing in chapter 1, Laws of 2013 2nd sp. sess. effects the
ability of a potentially liable person to receive public funding.
(10) During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium the local toxics control
account may also be used for the centennial clean water program and for
storm water grants.

Sec. 7034 RCW 79.17.010 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 6006 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department, with the approval of the board, may exchange
any state land and any timber thereon for any land of equal value in
order to:
(a) Facilitate the marketing of forest products of state lands;
(b) Consolidate and block-up state lands;
(c) Acquire lands having commercial recreational leasing potential;
(d) Acquire county-owned lands;
(e) Acquire urban property which has greater income potential or
which could be more efficiently managed by the department in exchange
for state urban lands as defined in RCW 79.19.100; or
(f) Acquire any other lands when such exchange is determined by the
board to be in the best interest of the trust for which the state land
is held.
(2) Land exchanged under this section shall not be used to reduce
the publicly owned forest land base.
(3) The board shall determine that each land exchange is in the
best interest of the trust for which the land is held prior to
authorizing the land exchange.
(4)(a) During the biennium ending June 30, 2013, for the purposes
of maintaining working farm and forest landscapes or acquiring natural
resource lands at risk of development, the department, with approval of
the board of natural resources, may exchange any state land and any
timber thereon for any land and proceeds of equal value, when it can be
demonstrated that the trust fiduciary obligations can be better
fulfilled after an exchange is completed. Proceeds may be in the form
of cash or services in order to achieve the purposes established in
this section. Any cash received as part of an exchange transaction
shall be deposited in the resource management cost account to pay for
administrative expenses incurred in carrying out an exchange
transaction. These administrative expenses include road maintenance
and abandonment expenses. The amount of proceeds received from the
exchange partner may not exceed five percent of the total value of the
exchange. The receipt of proceeds shall not change the character of
the transaction from an exchange to a sale.
(b) During the biennium ending June 30, 2015, for the purposes of
maintaining working farm and forest landscapes or acquiring natural
resource lands at risk of development, the department, with approval of
the board of natural resources, may exchange any state land and any
timber thereon for any land and proceeds of equal value, when it can be
demonstrated that the trust fiduciary obligations can be better
fulfilled after an exchange is completed. Proceeds may be in the form
of cash or services in order to achieve the purposes established in
this section. Any cash received as part of an exchange transaction
shall be deposited in the resource management cost account to pay for
administrative expenses incurred in carrying out an exchange
transaction. These administrative expenses include road maintenance
and abandonment expenses. The amount of proceeds received from the
exchange partner may not exceed five percent of the total value of the
exchange. The receipt of proceeds shall not change the character of
the transaction from an exchange to a sale.
(5) Prior to executing an exchange under this section, and in
addition to the public notice requirements set forth in RCW 79.17.050,
the department shall consult with legislative members, other state and
federal agencies, local governments, tribes, local stakeholders,
conservation groups, and any other interested parties to identify and
address cultural resource issues and the potential of the state lands
proposed for exchange to be used for open space, park, school, or
critical habitat purposes.

Sec. 7035 RCW 79.17.020 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 2 s 6007 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The board of county commissioners of any county and/or the
mayor and city council or city commission of any city or town and/or
the board shall have authority to exchange, each with the other, or
with the federal forest service, the federal government or any proper
agency thereof and/or with any private landowner, county land of any
character, land owned by municipalities of any character, and state
forest land owned by the state under the jurisdiction of the
department, for real property of equal value for the purpose of
consolidating and blocking up the respective land holdings of any
county, municipality, the federal government, or the state of
Washington or for the purpose of obtaining lands having commercial
recreational leasing potential.
(2)(a) During the biennium ending June 30, 2013, for the purposes
of maintaining working farm and forest landscapes or acquiring natural
resource lands at risk of development, the department, with approval of
the board of natural resources, may exchange any state land and any
timber thereon for any land and proceeds of equal value, when it can be
demonstrated that the trust fiduciary obligations can be better
fulfilled after an exchange is completed. Proceeds may be in the form
of cash or services in order to achieve the purposes established in
this section. Any cash received as part of an exchange transaction
shall be deposited in the forest development account to pay for
administrative expenses incurred in carrying out an exchange
transaction. These administrative expenses include road maintenance
and abandonment expenses. The amount of proceeds received from the
exchange partner may not exceed five percent of the total value of the
exchange. The receipt of proceeds shall not change the character of
the transaction from an exchange to a sale.
(b) During the biennium ending June 30, 2015, for the purposes of
maintaining working farm and forest landscapes or acquiring natural
resource lands at risk of development, the department, with approval of
the board of natural resources, may exchange any state land and any
timber thereon for any land and proceeds of equal value, when it can be
demonstrated that the trust fiduciary obligations can be better
fulfilled after an exchange is completed. Proceeds may be in the form
of cash or services in order to achieve the purposes established in
this section. Any cash received as part of an exchange transaction
shall be deposited in the forest development account to pay for
administrative expenses incurred in carrying out an exchange
transaction. These administrative expenses include road maintenance
and abandonment expenses. The amount of proceeds received from the
exchange partner may not exceed five percent of the total value of the
exchange. The receipt of proceeds shall not change the character of
the transaction from an exchange to a sale.
(3) Prior to executing an exchange under this section, and in
addition to the public notice requirements set forth in RCW 79.17.050,
the department shall consult with legislative members, other state and
federal agencies, local governments, tribes, local stakeholders,
conservation groups, and any other interested parties to identify and
address cultural resource issues, and the potential of the state lands
proposed for exchange to be used for open space, park, school, or
critical habitat purposes.

Sec. 7036 2005 c 8 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the following project loans
recommended by the public works board are authorized to be made with
funds appropriated from the public works assistance account:
(1) Bainbridge Island--storm sewer project--construct a storm sewer
waste management facility including bins for storage of asphalt,
concrete, wood chips, rock, sand and gravel, and miscellaneous woody
debris; and test remaining soil and remove contaminated soils from the
Head of the Bay site . . . . . . . . . . . . $782,000
(2) Bainbridge Island--sanitary sewer project--upgrade wastewater
treatment plant by upgrading the following: Headworks, biosolids,
oxidation ditch aeration basins, sludge holding basins, secondary
clarification, and sludge pumping and effluent outfall . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,618,000
(3) Battle Ground--sanitary sewer project--expand the capacity in
the shared use facilities by performing the design engineering and
construction for a parallel sewer line interceptor, 1 new transmission
pump station, an influent pressure main, and treatment plant
improvements to increase the capacity from 10.3 million gallons per day
to 16 million gallons per day . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(4) Birchbay water and sewer district--sanitary sewer project--extend the existing sanitary sewer system constructing approximately
10,000 feet of gravity sewer mains, including manholes, side sewers to
each lot, and other sewer appurtenances. The project will also include
temporary erosion and sedimentation control measures and other
public/private improvement restoration following sewer installation
. . . . . . . . . . . . $765,000
(5) Blaine--sanitary sewer project--construct a wastewater
pretreatment facility and a 700,000 gallon equalization storage
facilities along and underneath Marine Drive to prevent raw sewage
overflows into Drayton Harbor, construction of control structures
required to operate and maintain facilities, and reconstruction of
existing lift station number one . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,080,000
(6) Brewster--sanitary sewer project--retrofit south lift station
and dry well/wet well system will be converted to a submersible pump
station, headworks structure will be enclosed, including electrical and
ventilation systems, replacement of chlorine gas disinfection system
with UV disinfection, construction of a plant water system, adding new
effluent flow meter and automatic sampler, replacement of activated
sludge pumps, retrofitting primary clarifier, installation of a new
dewatering facility, electrical, and control features and appurtenances
. . . . . . . . . . . . $2,659,600
(7) Carnation--sanitary sewer project--eliminate current septic
tank/drainfield systems and replace them with a centralized sewer
collection system that will connect directly to the treatment facility
being built by King County, including approximately 26,000 feet of
vacuum sewer collector pipes, 3,000 feet of force main, approximately
700 side sewers and the associated abandonment of septic
tank/drainfield systems, relocation of 10,000 feet of water main,
telemetry system for new sewer facilities, and a vacuum/pump station
. . . . . . . . . . . . $4,374,700
(8) Castle Rock--sanitary sewer project--upgrade wastewater
treatment plant by constructing a new treatment process, structures and
equipment, new oxidation ditch, modernized headworks, disinfecting with
ultraviolet, installation of a belt thickener, and press for solids and
secondary clarifiers . . . . . . . . . . . . $655,000
(9) Chinook water district--domestic water project--construct a new
package water filter plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,425,000
(10) College Place--domestic water project--construct a 1.5 million
gallon water storage reservoir, install a booster station,
approximately 7,100 feet of 16 inch water transmission mains, three
pressure reducing valve stations, and a second booster station in the
Regency Park package system, telemetry improvements, and associated
appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,975,000
(11) Douglas county--storm sewer project--construction of a
detention basin of approximately 35 acre feet, construction of an urban
conveyance and water quality project that consists of construction of
about 2,000 feet of closed conduit, 1,000 feet of open channel, and
construction of a water quality treatment facility, and all appropriate
appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,835,600
(12) Dupont--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately 6,600
feet of sanitary sewer line with manholes, 103 side sewers, and
overlaying 4,200 feet of street. The city of DuPont will also purchase
capacity from Pierce County allowing the transfer of flows for
treatment to Pierce County . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,985,600
(13) East Wenatchee water district--domestic water project--increase capacity and remedy leaking mains by replacing approximately
one mile of 12 inch ductile iron transmission main . . . . . . . . . . . . $490,875
(14) Eatonville--domestic water project--construct a membrane
filtration system and use the existing disinfection system, install a
booster pump station, additional well sources, basin modifications, and
approximately 1,200 feet of transmission main to connect to the
existing system . . . . . . . . . . . . $807,500
(15) Edmonds--sanitary sewer project--lift station elimination and
rehabilitation project includes elimination of lift station seven,
demolish the facility and construct approximately 1,550 feet of gravity
sewer line, and install a new line from current location of lift
station seven to lift station eight. Replace lift station eight,
including upsizing of the wet well and replacement of all mechanical
and electrical equipment and replacement and upsizing of approximately
450 feet of force main . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,216,903
(16) Enumclaw--sanitary sewer project--upgrade and expand the
existing wastewater treatment plant by constructing a new headworks,
install new extended aeration activated sludge basins, anaerobic/anoxic
basins, and two additional secondary clarifiers. The city will also
include construction of chemical facilities, enlarging laboratory area,
sludge dewatering, and stabilization facilities and related
appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,750,000
(17) Ephrata--sanitary sewer project--construction of approximately
2,400 feet of sanitary sewer main, 200 feet of side sewer pipe, eight
manholes and appurtenances, and the rehabilitation of approximately one
mile of access roadway in the port of Ephrata . . . . . . . . . . . . $289,000
(18) Everett--sanitary sewer project--construct upgrades to the
wastewater treatment plant that include: A headworks grit system,
construction of two primary clarifiers, a new biofilter, new piping
arrangements, modifications to the trickling filter pump station,
installation of primary sludge grit removal equipment, sludge
dispersion equipment, flow metering, new hypochlorite generation
facilities, new scum collection and dewatering equipment, and minor
upgrade of the north effluent pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(19) Freeland water district--domestic water project--solve the
source and storage needs by constructing a new reservoir, connection of
the new well to the new reservoir, connection of the new reservoir to
the system, rehabilitation of the existing well number one, and all
appropriate appurtenances . . . . . . . . . . . . $308,030
(20) Gig Harbor--sanitary sewer project--upgrade to the wastewater
treatment plant to improve its efficiency and effectiveness. In
addition, an outfall extension into Colvos Passage, including a
diffuser will be constructed. Project will result in a higher quality
effluent being discharged to Puget Sound . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(21) Goldendale--road project--reconstruct approximately 2,700 feet
of East Collins Drive. This will include curb and gutters, storm
drainage facilities, sewer line repair and replacement, water line
replacement, and a 40 foot curb to curb road section consisting of two
eleven foot travel lanes and two nine foot parking areas . . . . . . . . . . . . $827,316
(22) Highland water district--domestic water project--construct a
0.5 million gallon steel water tank and foundation, appurtenances such
as water lines and valves, access road, and other site improvements as
needed . . . . . . . . . . . . $573,750
(23) Ilwaco--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately 2,000
feet of sanitary sewer lines and 2,250 feet of storm sewer lines,
including contributing laterals. In addition, installation of new
manholes, catch basins, and other related improvements would be made as
part of the project . . . . . . . . . . . . $774,000
(24) Jefferson County public utility district 1--domestic water
project--extend water system to service the entire Marrowstone Island.
Replacing individual wells with a public water supply. This will
include installation of approximately 150,000 feet of water mains with
accoutrements, a new 300,000 gallon storage tank, and expansion of
existing treatment facilities. This will ensure a consistent source of
potable water for the residents . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(25) Jefferson County public utility district 1--sanitary sewer
project--replace approximately 80 individual septic systems with a new
community drainfield system, consisting of approximately 12 grinder
pump stations, twin booster pump stations, two dosing tanks, and other
components necessary to enable the system to function properly.
Completion of this project will virtually eliminate the release of any
untreated effluent into the wetland and Discovery Bay . . . . . . . . . . . . $948,924
(26) Kennewick--domestic water project--upgrade the water treatment
plant with installation of a new membrane filtration at the Columbia
River plant and installation of an ultraviolet disinfection system at
the Ranney collector number five. Other related improvements will be
made to the system as part of the project. This project will bring the
city into compliance with the department of health's ground water under
the influence (GWI) requirements . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(27) King county water district No. 111--domestic water project--construct four water treatment facilities. Each facility will include
chlorine generation systems, backwash recycling facilities, SCADA
systems at each plant, and any other related activities necessary to
complete the construction. This will enable the district to be in
compliance with iron and manganese MCLs and eliminate the hazards
associated with chlorine . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,255,428
(28) King county water district No. 125--domestic water project--upgrade pressure zone 2 by installing two secondary source connections,
including pressure-reducing valves, valves, piping, and appurtenances
and approximately 150 feet of water main. The project will also
include replacement of approximately 12,500 feet of undersized water
main, including all valves, fittings, hydrants, and appurtenances and
project area restoration as required . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,088,850
(29) Lake Forest Park--sanitary sewer project--installation of a
series of extensions to the city of Lake Forest Park's sanitary sewer
system to provide service to residential areas currently not serviced.
This will include construction of approximately 3.8 miles of sewer main
extension including gravity sewer, pressure piping, service connections
and side sewers, lift stations, grinder pump assemblies, surface
restoration, temporary erosion and sedimentation control, and related
work . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,656,000
(30) Leavenworth--domestic water project--reconstruct old reservoir
on existing site, including new structural walls, new roof, and related
appurtenances. Project will also include installation of a SCADA
monitoring/radio telemetry control system . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
(31) LOTT wastewater alliance--sanitary sewer project--construct
four secondary clarifier mechanisms, replacement of RAS pumps,
secondary scum pumping improvements, and motorized actuators. Upgrades
to equipment and mechanisms will enable LOTT to meet increasing loads
at the Budd Inlet wastewater treatment plant and improve the effluent
quality . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,278,404
(32) Malaga water district--domestic water project--construct a new
52,000 gallon partially buried concrete reservoir and connecting piping
and install security fencing around tank. This project will enable the
district to ensure a continuous safe water supply to the homes and
businesses in the area . . . . . . . . . . . . $161,500
(33) Manchester water district--domestic water project--upgrade a
wide range of the water system. Project will include installation of
a SCADA system with all hardware, software, and backup equipment.
Installation of a new flow meter at each wellhead and pump station.
Distribution/transmission piping replacements and upgrades to the Mile
Hill Road area, Yukon Harbor Drive and Southworth Drive. Installation
of two interties in the South Street and Garfield Road area.
Construction of two pressure-reducing stations located in the Beach
Drive and Harper Hill areas . . . . . . . . . . . . $970,870
(34) Mason county public utility district 1--domestic water
project--source improvements and system rehabilitation to the newly
acquired Arcadia Estates system. Project will include pump and
controls for well number two, 24,000 gallon storage reservoir with
draft fire hydrant, three booster pumps, two pressure tanks,
pressure-reducing station, service meters, and three blow off
assemblies. This will remove the red operating permit and ensure a
safe and reliable source of potable water for the community . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $95,950
(35) Mason county public utility district 1--domestic water
project--rehabilitate the source of supply at the newly acquired Twanoh
Heights water system. This project will include rehabilitation of well
number one, installation of two pumps, abandonment of well number two
per department of ecology rules, service meters and air release valves.
This project will allow the community to have a continuous, safe and
reliable water source . . . . . . . . . . . . $172,900
(36) Mason county public utility district 1--domestic water
project--address system needs for the Madrona Beach water system by
constructing a 11,500 gallon reservoir, booster station, site
work/plumbing, service meters, and a source meter. This will enable
the public utility district to comply with department of health
requirements and remove a blue operating permit . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,000
(37) Mason county public utility district 1--domestic water
project--make improvements to the newly acquired Canal Beach water
system. The improvements include drilling and testing a new well
source, constructing a 20,000 gallon storage tank, piped system
intertie, fire service line and hydrant, water services with new
meters, and abandonment of existing well sources per department of
ecology rules . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,712
(38) Mason county public utility district 1--domestic water
project--make improvements to the Minerva Terrace water system that
will include drill and test well, integrate well into system, booster
station with all appurtenances, 35,200 gallon reservoir, and a draft
fire hydrant. This will enable the system to have the red operating
permit to be lifted and comply with department of health rules . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $217,550
(39) Northeast Sammamish sewer/water district--domestic water
project--construct a new water treatment plant, new 0.5 million gallon
reservoir and pump station, new transmission water main, and new
distribution main and associated minor improvements. The district will
then be able to meet the federal arsenic level regulations and ensure
a safe source of potable water for the community . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,154,970
(40) Northshore utility district--sanitary sewer project--install
approximately 2,445 feet of gravity sewer main, manholes, connection to
the sanitary sewer system, and related restoration and appurtenances.
In addition, the district will replace approximately 2,400 feet of
asbestos concrete water mains. This will resolve the negative
environmental and health impacts of the failing septic systems in the
area . . . . . . . . . . . . $814,634
(41) Northshore utility district--sanitary sewer project--install
approximately 300 feet of gravity sewer main, manholes, connection to
the sanitary sewer system, and related restoration and appurtenances.
In addition, the district will replace approximately 300 feet of
asbestos concrete water mains. This will resolve the negative
environmental and health impacts of the failing septic systems in the
area . . . . . . . . . . . . $113,334
(42) Oak Harbor--domestic water project--replace existing water
transmission mains being destroyed due to a highway project. The
project includes construction of approximately 4,000 feet of
transmission mains along Highway 20 just south of Deception Pass state
park. Project will meet the city's foreseeable water requirements and
provide sufficient capacity for the Naval Air Station--Whidbey . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $834,700
(43) Orchard Avenue irrigation district number 6--domestic water
project--install approximately 19,100 feet of PVC pipe. Approximately
210 buried meter boxes, reconnect approximately 400 existing services,
and all required valves and other fittings. Project will eliminate
public health concern over potential lead contamination from lead joint
pipe . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,066,800
(44) Pierce County--road project--widen, reconstruct, and overlay
the intersection of Canyon Road E and 176th Street E, which includes
additional travel lanes in each direction and left and right turn lanes
at the intersection, a new traffic signal system, traffic signal
interconnect system, street lights, median, curb and gutter, concrete
sidewalks, landscaping, undergrounding of utilities, storm drainage
conveyance, storage, and treatment facilities. Project will increase
carrying capacity and allow for economic development . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,942,000
(45) Pullman--sanitary sewer project--construct a new variable
volume digester at the wastewater treatment plant, with an approximate
capacity of 350,000 gallons. The work includes site preparation and
construction of the digester, necessary piping modifications, and
modifications to the existing plant control system. Project will
enable the city to meet the environmental protection agency's SRT
requirements . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,912,000
(46) Pullman--domestic water project--construct a well to replace
well number 3. Included in the project will be the drilling of the
replacement well, well pump, motor, controls, disinfection equipment,
fluoride injection equipment, a swell and chemical storage house,
connection of transmission lines, and other related miscellaneous items
and site work . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
(47) Ridgefield--sanitary sewer project--construct a new pump
station, install approximately 3,000 feet of force main, which will
discharge directly into the treatment plant, and construct
approximately 3,000 feet of gravity interceptor sewer. This project
will enable the city to open up service to an area that is currently
not served and allow for economic development . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,718,000
(48) Ritzville--domestic water project--increase the city's water
capacity from 1,200 to 2,000 gallons per minute by drilling a new well.
This will also include installing the necessary pump and connections to
the storage tank and construct a well house to protect the equipment
. . . . . . . . . . . . $845,000
(49) Ronald wastewater district--sanitary sewer project--sewer
extension to unsewered areas includes installation of approximately
2,700 feet PVC sewer main and approximately 2,000 feet PVC sewers in
three separate areas of the district. All associated appurtenances
will also be instilled, such as manholes and side sewer stubs.
Approximately 1,100 sewer trunk main will be repaired. The streets and
other public improvements that are disturbed during construction will
be restored to city of Shoreline's standards . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,021,700
(50) Samish water district--sanitary sewer project--upgrade its
system by replacing pumps and controls at six sewage pump stations,
replace controls at one sewage pump station, upgrade SCADA, and replace
inline valves on existing sewer force main. This will ensure that the
system operates within regulations . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,083,000
(51) Seattle--storm sewer project--increase capacity of the
drainage system by installing approximately 1,760 feet of storm drain
along South Trenton Street, 3rd Avenue South, and 4th Avenue South.
Install 2,380 feet of storm drain along South Director Street and 7th
Avenue South. The last part of the project will construct a new storm
drain system on 8th Avenue South. These new drainage pipes will reduce
flows to the combined sewer system and reduce the number of overflows
. . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000
(52) Seattle--storm sewer project--upgrade two culverts in the
lower reaches of Taylor Creek to remove fish barriers and construct a
fish ladder to improve fish passage and control sediment
transportation. Other related improvements will be made to the area as
part of the project . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,500
(53) Seattle--storm sewer project--construct two ponds that will
include a 4 acre feet sediment collection pond, 2 acre feet decant
pond, 750 feet of access road, 750 of decant piping, a gravel pump and
its housing and controls, and 4,000 feet of landscaping around the new
ponds. Additional related upgrades will be done to complete the
project . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,832,600
(54) Skyway water/sewer district--domestic water project--replace
and upsize the supply meter from the city of Seattle system and replace
approximately 6,350 feet of asbestos water supply line. In addition,
four new pressure zones interties will be installed to improve flow
between pressure zones within the water/sewer district . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,130,526
(55) Spokane--domestic water project--replace about 3,500 feet of
riveted steel water transmission mains with ductile iron pipe. In
addition, project will include all valves, connections, blowoffs, air
valves, railroad crossing, and pavement restoration and traffic control
. . . . . . . . . . . . $3,453,975
(56) Spokane--domestic water project--construct a 2 million gallon
elevated steel tank with an accompanying booster station. This will
include all piping, valves, telemetry, instrumentation, excavation and
site preparation including landscaping, paving, and fencing . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $2,232,950
(57) Spokane county--road project--((construct a total of 8.3 miles
of roadway from Havana Street to Forker Road and from Forker Road from
Bigelow Gulch Road to Wellesley Road. The construction will provide
for expanding the road to four traveled lanes plus eight foot shoulders
to improve safety and traffic capacity. A center turn lane will be
added at locations where vehicles routinely make left turns. Eight
foot shoulders will be added to provide for safety of pedestrians and
bicycles . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000))
expand and realign the Bigelow Gulch/Forker Road Corridor to a four
lane roadway with eight foot shoulders to improve traffic capacity and
increase the overall safety of the corridor. This project will include
engineering and design environmental and cultural review, acquisition
of right-of-way and construction of 1.78 miles of roadway improvement.
In addition, design and right-of-way will be prepared and acquired for
the next continuous phase of the project . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
(58) Stanwood--domestic water project--construct a 1 million gallon
elevated water tank, water main, appurtenances, and equipment necessary
to connect the new water tank to the existing system. Project will
also install telemetry and control systems compatible with existing
system, construction of a Cedarhome booster pump station for filling
the Cedarhome reservoir, and improvements to the sites such as grading,
fencing, and landscaping . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,481,620
(59) Stevens County--solid waste project--expand municipal solid
waste site by construction of an 11 acre lateral expansion,
environmentally protective landfill lining and leachate collection
system and construction of ancillary facilities such as perimeter
roads. Leachate facilities will consist of piping, collection and
conveyance facilities . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
(60) Union Gap--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
3,400 feet of sewer interceptor and 1,800 feet of sewer laterals in
conjunction with new roadways in the Valley Mall Boulevard area . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . $676,429
(61) Washougal--sanitary sewer project--construct a redundant
secondary clarifier adjacent to existing secondary clarifier, including
piping connections to the existing clarifier distribution structure,
scum pump station, and RAS/WAS pump room. Additional work will include
RAS/WAS pump room modifications for installation of dedicated return
and waste-activated sludge pumps, sidewalks, and site grading and all
necessary electrical hardware and SCADA control modifications. Project
will enable the city to meet their national pollution discharge
elimination system permit requirements . . . . . . . . . . . . $794,000
(62) West Richland--sanitary sewer project--increase capacity by
constructing a one million gallons per day biolac wastewater treatment
facility, approximately 2,700 feet of sanitary sewer pipe, lift
station, miscellaneous roadway patching, and site restoration. If
additional funds are available, improvements to the facilities outfall
structure will be designed along with facilities for sludge handling
from the sewer maintenance program. Project will enable the city to
meet their national pollution discharge elimination system permit
requirements . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
(63) Witworth water district 2--domestic water project--The
district will solve the area problems by installing approximately
27,090 of water lines together with valves and appurtenances,
connection to the existing system, 15 hydrants, pavement repair, and
other surface restoration. In addition, installation of a two million
gallon steel reservoir and a 1,700 gallons per minute booster pump
station and various piping, appurtenances, pumps, controls, security,
electrical, and connection to existing system . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,502,300
(64) Yakima--sanitary sewer project--The project will be done in
two phases. Phase I will install approximately 6,640 feet of sewer
main trunk line in River Road from North 16th Avenue to North 40th
Avenue. Phase II will install 5,500 feet of sewer main trunk line in
River Road from North 6th Avenue to North 16th Avenue if public works
trust fund loan funds remain and private development proceeds. The
project will help prevent further loss of major employers by providing
the transportation and utility infrastructure necessary to maintain
competitive operations . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,307,000

Sec. 7037 2007 c 4 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the following project loans
recommended by the public works board are authorized to be made with
funds appropriated from the public works assistance account:
(1) Airway Heights--sanitary sewer project--collection system
improvements and an approximately 1 million gallon per day annual
average flow wastewater treatment, reclamation, and groundwater
recharge facility . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(2) Annapolis water district--domestic water project--interior and
exterior of surface water reservoir will be sandblasted and painted to
preserve structural integrity of the tank and eliminate breaches in the
paint coating systems. Structural repairs will also be made to the
tank and foundation . . . . . . . . . . . . $595,000
(3) Blaine--sanitary sewer project--construct a new wastewater
treatment plant to serve the projected demand for the next twenty
years, using the latest membrane filtering technology to produce
reuse-quality water effluent to minimize impacts to local shell fishing
. . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(4) Bremerton--sanitary sewer project--upgrade a sewage pump
station to increase capacity from 1,900 gallons per minute to 3,500
gallons per minute, eliminating combined sewer overflows into the Puget
Sound and meet a court order . . . . . . . . . . . . $675,000
(5) Bremerton--sanitary sewer project--design and construct a
treatment plant upgrade to address the vital needs of the plant, create
redundancy for essential treatment processes, and replace twenty year
old components and meet a court order . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
(6) Bremerton--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
1,300 feet new sewer interceptor and collector pipe to replace old,
failing shallow sewer and meet a court order . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
(7) Chelan county public utility district no. 1--domestic water
project--design and construct: Two pump stations to increase capacity
from approximately 4,000 gallons per minute to approximately 6,000
gallons per minute; a two million gallon reservoir; and approximately
5,000 feet of twelve and sixteen-inch water transmission mains to
provide a reliable water source for approximately 4,500 customers
. . . . . . . . . . . . $5,267,000
(8) Cowlitz county--domestic water project--recoat the interior and
exterior of four reservoirs to address areas of failure with the
original coatings and protect the structural integrity of the
reservoirs . . . . . . . . . . . . $340,000
(9) Cross Valley water district--domestic water project--relocation
and replacement of a failing water supply line that is located in an
extremely wet cow pasture. Approximately 3,500 linear feet of asbestos
cement line will be replaced with twelve-inch ductile iron pipe,
including all valves, hydrants, and appurtenances as well as complete
restoration and paving . . . . . . . . . . . . $532,525
(10) East Wenatchee water district--domestic water project--construct approximately 6,000 lineal feet of twelve-inch water main
that will serve as the supply main to the new approximately 1.5 million
gallon reservoir . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,772,700
(11) Friday Harbor--sanitary sewer project--construct a new
offshore marine pipeline approximately 1,900 feet in length; a new pump
station and approximately 3,650 feet of pipeline to the wastewater
treatment plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,378,000
(12) Grays Harbor county water district no. 1--domestic water
project--provide adequate water supply from primary source to the north
end of the system to mitigate low pressure problems and comply with a
bilateral compliance agreement; extend distribution system to provide
service to residences with failing individual supplies; construct
standby power generation facilities for primary source of supply; and
construct additional storage and pumping facilities to provide reliable
service and fire flow . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,717,575
(13) Lake Stevens sewer district--sanitary sewer project--construction of a state of the art membrane bioreactor wastewater
treatment facility outside the flood plain and an interceptor line and
pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(14) Mattawa--sanitary sewer project--complete public bidding and
construction of the improvements consisting of an approximately 622,000
cubic foot HDPE lined long-term biosolids digestion basin, associated
piping, rehabilitation of the existing biosolids drying beds, and
fencing . . . . . . . . . . . . $465,585
(15) Port Angeles--sanitary sewer project--design and construction
of approximately 4,500 feet of thirty-inch sewer main to the headworks
of the wastewater treatment plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,875,000
(16) Snohomish--sanitary sewer project--((construct a fifteen and
ten-inch sewer to reach an existing pump station; extend the above
sewer using an eight-inch pipe to another pump station; and replace an
existing sewer with a ten-inch pipe to provide additional capacity for
future service and to meet the conditions of a stipulated court order
. . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000))
Segment 2: Add approximately 3,400 feet of sewer trunk to connect to
the Segment 1, thereby allowing two pump stations to be abandoned.
Segment 3: Replace approximately 1,200 feet of existing undersized
sewer to provide additional capacity and to accommodate future service
north and east of Blackmans Lake . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
(17) Toppenish--sanitary sewer project--construct a single
activated sludge process to replace the existing wastewater treatment
facility, including the installation of ultraviolet disinfection
channels to replace chlorine gas. The solids handling system will also
be improved . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(18) Walla Walla--sanitary sewer project--the third and final
upgrade at the wastewater treatment plant to meet class A water reuse
standards and to comply with an agreed order from the department of
ecology . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,856,875
(19) Yakima--sanitary sewer project--replacement of chlorine gas
with ultraviolet disinfection at the Yakima regional wastewater
treatment plant to complete the first phase of the facility
improvements . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000

Sec. 7038 2008 c 5 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the following project loans
recommended by the public works board are authorized to be made with
funds appropriated from the public works assistance account, and no
loan authorized in this act shall bear an interest rate greater than
one-half of one percent:
(1) Arlington--sanitary sewer project--expand and upgrade the
wastewater treatment plant and biosolids composting facility to meet
new discharge limitations, produce a higher quality effluent, and
accommodate future growth . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(2) Auburn--street project--reconstruct approximately 0.3 miles of
roadway with four travel lanes to bring up to current arterial and
truck route standards and modify intersection to optimize efficiency
and level of service . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
(3) Blaine--sanitary sewer project--construct a new wastewater
treatment plant and section of outfall pipe to increase treatment
capacity, produce reuse quality water, and improve Puget Sound water
quality for shellfish . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(4) Bonney Lake--domestic water project--replace approximately
71,000 linear feet of leaky water mains to reduce current water loss by
ten percent . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,352,000
(5) Bonney Lake--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately
12,000 linear feet of failing interceptor sewer pipes . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,648,000
(6) Buckley--sanitary sewer project--rebuild the wastewater
treatment plant to provide nutrient removal and meet state and federal
discharge regulations and the construction of an interceptor . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(7) Camas--sanitary sewer project--construct improvements to the
wastewater treatment facilities to provide class A biosolids at the
main sewage pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(8) Clark county--road project--construct new road segments, widen
roadways, improve and redesign intersections, and install and modify
traffic signals necessary to improve a major interchange with two
freeways . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(9) Clark regional wastewater district--sanitary sewer project--modify existing and construct new wastewater facilities to process
approximately 4.65 million gallons more of wastewater per day and
ensure treatment processes continue to be in compliance with current
regulations . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
(10) Coal creek utility district--sanitary sewer project--construct
sewer lift station, approximately 1,250 lineal feet of gravity sewer
main, and 500 feet of force main to provide public sewer to
approximately 25 properties on a lake that have private septic systems
that have failed or are in prefailure status . . . . . . . . . . . . $898,875
(11) College Place--domestic water project--construct two steel
tanks, a booster station, approximately 6,000 feet of transmission
line, 3,400 feet of water mains, three pressure reducing valves, and
associated telemetry to rectify a deficiency in fire flow and standby
water storage protection . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,710,051
(12) Cowlitz county public utility district No. 1--domestic water
project--construction of approximately six new groundwater supply
wells, 2,100 feet of raw water piping a new water treatment plant
producing approximately 20 million gallons per day of potable water,
and approximately 4,350 feet of transmission main to connect to the
system to replace current water supply that is being impacted by
increasing water sediment . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,213,000
(13) Ephrata--domestic water project--replace approximately 68,000
feet of failing water mains, 50,000 feet of failing water service
pipes, and the resurfacing of 20 miles of overlaying roadway, including
approximately 100 fire hydrants, 400 catch basins, 15 storm sewer
drywells, 22,000 feet of curb and gutter, and 16,000 feet of storm
sewer pipe . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,605,727
(14) Freeland water district--domestic water project--connect a new
well and new reservoir to the existing system, rehabilitate the
existing well, and install new equipment to increase system
reliability, redundancy, and capacity. Install new chlorination
equipment to improve water quality . . . . . . . . . . . . $347,516
(15) Gig Harbor--sanitary sewer project--improvements to the
wastewater treatment plant including new equipment and electrical work,
add a third clarifier, install ultraviolet disinfection, and extend and
upsize the outfall . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(16) Highline water district--domestic water project--construction
of 11,350 feet of transmission main and looping of pipes to eliminate
low pressures and fire flows and improve water quality, and create a
new pressure zone to correct high pressures . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,390,418
(17) Karcher creek sewer district--sanitary sewer project--install
a new sewer system, including a lift station and approximately 3,600
lineal feet of sewer main, in conjunction with a road project to
service approximately 17 homes that will lose their septic systems due
to the road project . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,358,130
(18) Kennewick--sanitary sewer project--construct improvements to
critical wastewater treatment plant processes to enhance reliability,
improve energy efficiency and redundancy, as well as increase the
capacity of the sludge pumping station . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000
(19) Kent--street project--construct ((two)) one bridge((s)), ((one
for the roadway over a set of railroad tracks, and one for railroad
tracks over a lowered roadway. This will grade separate the tracks
from the roadway to provide safe and reliable operations twenty-four
hours a day . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000))
and all preliminary activities, such as utility relocation, to prepare
for the future bridge to be constructed . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(20) King county--sanitary sewer project--construct 13,100 lineal
feet of pipe to convey approximately 9 million gallons per day of
reclaimed water to reduce withdrawals of 250-acre feet per year from
the Sammamish river . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(21) La Center--sanitary sewer project--upgrade wastewater
treatment plant to reduce the levels of nitrogen discharged in the
effluent and approximately doubling the operation of the plant and
producing class A reuse water . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(22) Lake Forest Park water district--domestic water project--replace approximately 6,915 lineal feet of undersized and corroded
water pipes to improve safety and reliability of the system by reducing
pipe failures and increasing fire flow . . . . . . . . . . . . $917,935
(23) Lake Stevens--sanitary sewer project--construct a new
wastewater treatment plant, 9,500 feet of interceptor line, a pump
station, and an outfall pipe in partnership with Lake Stevens sewer
district . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(24) Lake Stevens sewer district--sanitary sewer project--construct
a new wastewater treatment plant, 9,500 feet of interceptor line, a
pump station, and an outfall pipe in partnership with the city of Lake
Stevens . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(25) Lakewood--sanitary sewer project--construct 3 pump stations,
approximately 17,200 linear feet of force mains, 13,500 linear feet of
gravity collector pipe line, and 320 side sewer stubs to service two
neighborhoods currently served exclusively by septic
systems . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,840,000
(26) LOTT alliance--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
7,400 feet of force main and replace existing pump station with new
1,000 gallon per minute pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,003,807
(27) Mansfield--sanitary sewer project--expand and rehabilitate
wastewater treatment lagoons and effluent spray irrigation system as
well as remove the discharge of groundwater from basement sump pumps to
the collection system . . . . . . . . . . . . $235,600
(28) Midway sewer district--sanitary sewer project--replace
approximately 16,500 lineal feet of sewer mains and 50 manholes to
reduce infiltration and inflow . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,782,500
(29) Mount Vernon--sanitary sewer project--upgrade existing
wastewater treatment plant, including a new pretreatment facility, 4
additional clarifiers, upgrade aeration basins, installation of an
ultraviolet disinfection system, and odor control system . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(30) Newcastle--road project--reconstruct, widen, and signalize
approximately 5,200 linear feet of road to 2 lanes in each direction,
add left turn lanes, sidewalks, bicycle lanes, install lighting
systems, replace two-lane bridge with a four-lane bridge, and install
new traffic signals . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(31) Olympia--sanitary sewer project--install approximately 6,500
linear feet of sewer mains and construct a lift station to serve 63
homes with failing on-site sewage systems . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,808,375
(32) Olympus Terrace sewer district--sanitary sewer project--rehabilitate approximately 9,350 linear feet of sewer trunkline,
construct approximately 9,800 linear feet of high-flow storm water
bypass piping for excess flow, construct approximately 4,150 linear
feet of road access, and restore creek habitat . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
(33) Omak--sanitary sewer project--add 2 compost containers,
convert storage tank to sludge holding tank, and install a second
headworks screen to increase the wastewater treatment plant capacity by
35 percent . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
(34) Port Angeles--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
11,500 feet of sewer main, modify a storage tank, and modify the
wastewater treatment plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(35) Regional board of mayors--solid waste project--close landfill
site by capping and sealing with a soil cap . . . . . . . . . . . . $859,500
(36) Regional board of mayors--solid waste project--construct a new
solid waste transfer station, including structures and
equipment . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,541,000
(37) Ronald wastewater district--sanitary sewer project--rehabilitate 2 lift stations by replacing pumps, valves, fittings,
piping, odor control systems, and electrical equipment . . . . . . . . . . . . $955,400
(38) Seattle--domestic water project--replace floating pumps with
land-based pump station with a maximum capacity of approximately 250
million gallons per day, including 8 pumps, concrete structure, a
tunnel, approximately 4,000 feet of pipeline, and a standby
generator. . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(39) Sedro-Woolley--sanitary sewer project--rehabilitate or replace
4 interceptor segments totaling approximately 29,700 linear feet((,))
and install 2 pump stations((, and upgrade the secondary clarifier)) in
order to lift a building moratorium . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,023,491))
$3,803,289
(40) Shelton--sanitary sewer project--construct a satellite
reclamation plant with a capacity of approximately 0.4 million gallons
per day to produce class A reclaimed water, approximately 22,000 linear
feet of sewer pipelines, and approximately 25,000 linear feet of
reclaimed water force main . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,079,360
(41) Shelton--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately 38,480
linear feet of mainline sewers to reduce inflow and
infiltration . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,737,500
(42) Skagit county sewer district No. 2--sanitary sewer project--upgrade wastewater treatment plant to a water reclamation facility to
provide class A reclaimed water with a capacity of approximately 0.35
million gallons per day . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(43) Snohomish--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
1,900 feet of sewer pipe, a new pump station with a capacity of
approximately 8,000 gallons per minute, and approximately 4,300 feet of
force main to reduce overflows . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(44) Snohomish--sanitary sewer project--upgrade existing wastewater
treatment plant including a new influent flow structure, screens,
aerators, effluent filtration, ultraviolet disinfection, effluent pump
station, improvements to the existing lagoons, and electrical
improvements . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
(45) Snohomish county--road project--construct a new, approximately
two-mile, two-lane truck route around the city of Granite Falls,
including 3 roundabouts to improve safety and air quality in the
downtown area . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(46) Southwest Suburban sewer district--sanitary sewer project--replace and/or slipline approximately 5,470 feet of trunk/interceptor
sewer main and construct a new lift station to reduce
overflows . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,268,250
(47) Tacoma--domestic water project--replace 3 open-topped concrete
reservoirs with 2 enclosed concrete reservoirs of approximately 33
million gallons each and related piping to comply with the safe
drinking water act and a bilateral compliance agreement . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(48) Tekoa--sanitary sewer system--reconstruct approximately 1,000
feet of failing sewer line and manholes to reduce significant
groundwater infiltration . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,115
(49) Three rivers regional wastewater authority--sanitary sewer
project--construct 2 clarifiers and associated piping to replace 2
failed clarifiers at the wastewater plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,630,750
(50) Washougal--sanitary sewer project--construct a new wastewater
treatment plant headworks, including a fine screen, grit removal, and
replace approximately 150 linear feet of gravity sewer, and make
improvements to the lagoons, including 450 linear feet of piping,
modify overflow structures, and a new pump . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
(51) Yakima--domestic water project--develop a new, approximately
3,000 gallon per minute, domestic water well, including drilling,
placement of casing, a new pump house, and connection to the existing
water distribution system in order to augment the water supply during
drought conditions . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,257,200
(52) Yakima--street project--construct 2 underpasses and
reconstruct 3 lanes on each roadway under a railroad mainline to
accommodate additional rail and reduce traffic and emergency response
delays and air pollution . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7039 (1) The legislature finds that use of
life cycle cost analysis will aid public entities, architects,
engineers, and contractors in making design and construction decisions
that positively impact both the initial construction cost and the
ongoing operating and maintenance cost of a project. To ensure that
the total cost of a project is accounted for and the most reasonable
and cost efficient design is used, agencies shall develop life cycle
costs for any construction project over $5,000,000. The life cycle
costs shall represent the present value sum of capital costs,
installation costs, operating costs, and maintenance costs over the
life expectancy of the project. The legislature further finds the most
effective approach to the life cycle cost analysis is to integrate it
into the early part of the design process. The office of financial
management shall select six major construction projects that are
estimated to be over five million dollars and have not procured the
architectural firm for design, to have a life cycle cost analysis to be
conducted early in the design process.
(2) Agencies shall develop a minimum of three project alternatives
for use in the life cycle cost analysis. These alternatives must be
both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being
addressed. The chosen alternative must be the most reasonable and
cost-effective solution. A brief description of each project
alternative and why it was chosen must be included in the life cycle
cost analysis section of the predesign.
(3) The Office of financial management shall: (a) Make available
a life cycle cost model to be used for analysis; (b) in consultation
with the department of enterprise services, provide assistance in using
the life cycle cost model; and (d) update the life cycle cost model
annually including assumptions for inflation rates, discount rates and
energy rates.
(4) Agencies shall consider architectural and engineering firms'
and general contractors' experience using life cycle costs, operating
costs, and energy efficiency measures when selecting an architectural
and engineering firm, or when selecting contractors using alternative
contracting methods.

Sec. 7040 RCW 46.68.350 and 2010 c 161 s 823 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The snowmobile account is created within the state treasury.
Snowmobile registration fees, monetary civil penalties from snowmobile
dealers, and snowmobile fuel tax moneys collected under this chapter
and chapter 46.17 RCW and in excess of the amounts fixed for the
administration of the registration and fuel tax provisions of this
chapter must be deposited into the account and must be appropriated
only to the state parks and recreation commission for the
administration and coordination of this chapter.
(2) The moneys collected by the department as snowmobile
registration fees, monetary civil penalties from snowmobile dealers,
and fuel tax moneys placed into the account must be distributed in the
following manner:
(a) Actual expenses not to exceed three percent for each year must
be retained by the department to cover expenses incurred in the
administration of the registration and fuel tax provisions of this
chapter; and
(b) The remainder of funds each year must be remitted to the state
treasurer to be deposited into the snowmobile account of the general
fund and must be appropriated only to the commission to be expended for
snowmobile purposes. Purposes may include, but not necessarily be
limited to, the administration, acquisition, development, operation,
and maintenance of snowmobile facilities and development and
implementation of snowmobile safety, enforcement, and education
programs. During the 2013-2015 biennium the legislature may
appropriate funds from the account to the department of natural
resources for purpose of planning and supporting snowmobile activities
on lands purchased by the department in the Yakima river basin.
(3) This section is not intended to discourage any public agency in
this state from developing and implementing snowmobile programs. The
commission may award grants to public agencies and contract with any
public or private agency or person for the purpose of developing and
implementing snowmobile programs, as long as the programs are not
inconsistent with the rules adopted by the commission.

Sec. 7041 RCW 79.17.210 and 2011 c 216 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the department has a need to
maintain the real property asset base it manages and needs an
accounting mechanism to complete transactions without reducing the real
property asset base.
(2) The natural resources real property replacement account is
created in the state treasury. This account shall consist of funds
transferred or paid for the disposal or transfer of real property by
the department under RCW 79.17.200 and the transfer of state lands or
state forest lands into community forest trust lands under RCW
79.155.040. The funds in this account shall be used solely for the
acquisition of replacement real property and may be spent only when,
and as, authorized by legislative appropriation. During the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium, funds in the account may also be appropriated for the
land purchase in section . . . of this act under the provisions of
section . . . and Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5367.

Sec. 7042 RCW 70.105D.--- and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The environmental legacy stewardship account is created in the
state treasury. Beginning July 1, 2013, and every fiscal year
thereafter, the annual amount received from the tax imposed by RCW
82.21.030 that exceeds one hundred forty million dollars must be
deposited into the environmental legacy stewardship account. The state
treasurer may make periodic deposits into the environmental legacy
stewardship account based on forecasted revenue. Moneys in the account
may only be spent after appropriation.
(2) Moneys in the environmental legacy stewardship account may be
spent on performance and outcome based projects, model remedies,
demonstrated technologies, procedures, contracts, and project
management and oversight that result in significant reductions in the
time to complete compared to baseline averages for:
(a) Purposes authorized under RCW 70.105D.070 (3) and (4);
(b) Storm water low-impact retrofit projects and other projects
with significant environmental benefits that reduce storm water
pollution from existing infrastructure and development;
(c) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment; and
(d) Appropriations to the state and local toxics control accounts
created in RCW 70.105D.070 if the legislature determines that
priorities for spending exceed available funds in those accounts.
(3) Except as provided under RCW 70.105D.070(3) (k) and (q),
nothing in this act expands the ability of a potentially liable person
to receive public funding.
(4) For the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, moneys in the environmental
legacy stewardship account may be transferred to the local toxics
control account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7043 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS
State Toxic Control Account: For transfer to
the Local Toxic Control Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Environmental Legacy Stewardship Account: For transfer to
the Local Toxic Control Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7044 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 182
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 192
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 158
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 62
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 133
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 67
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 143
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 64
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 192
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 181
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 143
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 115
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 132
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 171
STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 269
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 160
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 184
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 172
WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 172
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 188
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 159
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 186
--- END ---