BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4281 and 2007 c 54 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax:
(a) Amounts derived from investments;
(b) Amounts derived as dividends or distributions from the capital
account by a parent from its subsidiary entities; and
(c) Amounts derived from interest on loans between subsidiary
entities and a parent entity or between subsidiaries of a common parent
entity, but only if the total investment and loan income is less than
five percent of gross receipts of the business annually.
(2) The following are not deductible under subsection (1)(a) of
this section:
(a) Amounts received from loans, except as provided in subsection
(1)(c) of this section, or the extension of credit to another,
revolving credit arrangements, installment sales, the acceptance of
payment over time for goods or services, or any of the foregoing that
have been transferred by the originator of the same to an affiliate of
the transferor; or
(b) Amounts received by a banking, lending, or security business.
(3) Beginning with calendar year 2013, a taxpayer may not claim a
total deduction under this section of more than one million dollars in
any calendar year.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply only to this section.
(a) "Banking business" means a person engaging in business as a
national or state-chartered bank, a mutual savings bank, a savings and
loan association, a trust company, an alien bank, a foreign bank, a
credit union, a stock savings bank, or a similar entity that is
chartered under Title 30, 31, 32, or 33 RCW, or organized under Title
12 U.S.C.
(b) "Lending business" means a person engaged in the business of
making secured or unsecured loans of money, or extending credit, and
(i) more than one-half of the person's gross income is earned from such
activities and (ii) more than one-half of the person's total
expenditures are incurred in support of such activities.
(c) The terms "loan" and "extension of credit" do not include
ownership of or trading in publicly traded debt instruments, or
substantially equivalent instruments offered in a private placement.
(d) "Security business" means a person, other than an issuer, who
is engaged in the business of effecting transactions in securities as
a broker, dealer, or broker-dealer, as those terms are defined in the
securities act of Washington, chapter 21.20 RCW, or the federal
securities act of 1933. "Security business" does not include any
company excluded from the definition of broker or dealer under the
federal investment company act of 1940 or any entity that is not an
investment company by reason of sections 3(c)(1) and 3(c)(3) through
3(c)(14) thereof.

--- END ---