BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that education is the
single most important investment a state can make to ensure that it
remains globally competitive. The legislature, Washington citizens,
education leaders and practitioners, and students must take collective
responsibility to ensure that all qualified citizens have the
opportunity to succeed in a world-class, learner-focused, seamless
education. The legislature further finds that lifelong learning is a
fundamental value of a civil society, the state of Washington, and the
primary family of its students.
The legislature also finds that early investment in a student can
make the difference in the student's aspiration and commitment.
Research indicates that students form attitudes about going to college
as early as elementary school. If policymakers want to increase
participation in the state's apprenticeship programs, colleges, and
universities, outreach efforts must begin early and occur often.
Saving for college is one way a student's family and extended
community can ensure that financial obstacles will not prevent a child
from realizing the dream of going to college. A modest financial
investment by the state of Washington to initiate a college savings
plan will contribute to the success of students in achieving their
educational aspirations and will benefit the state's goal of educating
more students to higher levels of education.
Therefore, the legislature intends to encourage families to begin
saving for college by paying the enrollment fee for a GET account and
one GET unit for each child born in Washington or a child who moves to
Washington, enrolls in a public school, and establishes a domicile in
Washington, and supplementing that account with additional GET units
over the child's educational career. This action plants the seed,
early on, that going to college is possible, regardless of
socioeconomic status. It also plants the seed that saving for college
is important and provides an easy way to begin saving.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The GET ready for college program is established. Subject to
funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the office shall pay for
the fifty dollar enrollment fee and for one GET unit to open a GET
account on behalf of:
(a) Every child born in Washington state after the effective date
of this section; and
(b) Any child born after the effective date of this section, who
subsequently moves to Washington state and enrolls in a public school,
if one or both of the child's parents or legal guardians have
maintained a bona fide domicile in the state of Washington for at least
one year.
(2) In carrying out this duty, the office shall:
(a) Develop and implement a process for establishing the accounts
and account beneficiaries;
(b) Establish rules for implementing the program;
(c) Provide information to hospitals, clinics, physicians and nurse
practitioners, birthing centers, community organizations, school
districts, and institutions of higher education regarding the program,
the state's offer to pay the enrollment fee to open an account, the one
unit minimum purchase requirement, and the program benefits and
limitations; and
(d) Accept grants and donations from private sources to match state
funds appropriated for the GET ready for college program.
(3) Children who have a GET account opened under the GET ready for
college program shall have deposited into that account additional GET
units upon the child reaching educational milestones. The office shall
purchase GET units to be owned and held in trust by the office and
distribute units to individual, personally owned accounts upon the
child achieving the following:
(a) Upon entry into kindergarten, ten units;
(b) Upon completion of the fourth grade statewide academic
assessments for reading, writing, and mathematics, twenty units. The
child does not need to meet the state standard to receive the GET
units;
(c) Upon completion of the fifth grade, thirty units;
(d) Upon completion of the eighth grade, forty units;
(e) Upon completion of the ninth grade, fifteen units;
(f) Upon completion of the tenth grade, fifteen units;
(g) Upon completion of the eleventh grade, twenty units; and
(h) Upon graduation from a Washington state public high school,
fifty units.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
enter into any necessary data-sharing agreements with the office to
facilitate implementation of this section.
(5) The office shall develop necessary forms, policies, and
procedures to provide parents or guardians the ability to voluntarily
waive any privacy rights to facilitate the exchange of personal
information between the common schools and the office for
implementation of this section.
(6) The GET ready for college account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. The office shall deposit into the account all
moneys received for the GET ready for college program from
appropriations and private sources. Only the director of the office or
the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
Expenditures from the account, not to exceed five percent, may be used
by the office to carry out the provisions of this section. The account
is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

--- END ---