BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a permit known as a day spa permit to allow the
holder to offer or supply without charge, wine or beer by the
individual glass to a customer for consumption on the premises. The
customer must be at least twenty-one years of age and may only be
offered wine or beer if the services he or she will be receiving will
last more than one hour. Wine or beer served or consumed shall be
purchased from a Washington state licensed retailer. A customer may
consume no more than one six ounce glass of wine or one twelve ounce
glass of beer per day under this permit. Day spas with a day spa
permit may not advertise the service of complimentary wine or beer and
may not sell wine or beer in any manner. Any employee involved in the
service of wine or beer must complete a board-approved limited alcohol
server training program.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "day spa" means a business
that offers at least three of the following four service categories:
(a) Hair care;
(b) Skin care;
(c) Nail care; and
(d) Body care, such as massages, wraps, and waxing.
Day spas must provide separate service areas of the day spa for at
least three of the service categories offered.
(3) The annual fee for this permit is one hundred twenty-five
dollars.

--- END ---