BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.52.010 and 2011 c 336 s 369 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The following definitions apply in this chapter:
(1) "Access" means to approach, instruct, communicate with, store
data in, retrieve data from, or otherwise make use of any resources of
a computer, directly or by electronic means.
(2) "Computer program" means an ordered set of data representing
coded instructions or statements that when executed by a computer cause
the computer to process data.
(3) "Data" means a representation of information, knowledge, facts,
concepts, or instructions that are being prepared or have been prepared
in a formalized manner and are intended for use in a computer.
(4) "Enter." The word "enter" when constituting an element or part
of a crime, shall include the entrance of the person, or the insertion
of any part of his or her body, or any instrument or weapon held in his
or her hand and used or intended to be used to threaten or intimidate
a person or to detach or remove property.
(5) "Enters or remains unlawfully." A person "enters or remains
unlawfully" in or upon premises when he or she is not then licensed,
invited, or otherwise privileged to so enter or remain.
A license or privilege to enter or remain in a building which is
only partly open to the public is not a license or privilege to enter
or remain in that part of a building which is not open to the public.
A person who enters or remains upon unimproved and apparently unused
land, which is neither fenced nor otherwise enclosed in a manner
designed to exclude intruders, does so with license and privilege
unless notice against trespass is personally communicated to him or her
by the owner of the land or some other authorized person, or unless
notice is given by posting in a conspicuous manner. Land that is used
for commercial aquaculture or for growing an agricultural crop or
crops, other than timber, is not unimproved and apparently unused land
if a crop or any other sign of cultivation is clearly visible or if
notice is given by posting in a conspicuous manner. Similarly, a field
fenced in any manner is not unimproved and apparently unused land. A
license or privilege to enter or remain on improved and apparently used
land that is open to the public at particular times, which is neither
fenced nor otherwise enclosed in a manner to exclude intruders, is not
a license or privilege to enter or remain on the land at other times if
notice of prohibited times of entry is posted in a conspicuous manner.
(6) "Posting in a conspicuous manner" includes posting a sign or
signs reasonably likely to come to the attention of intruders,
indicating that entry is restricted or the placement of identifying
fluorescent orange paint marks on trees or posts on property.
(a) Identifying fluorescent orange marks must be:
(i) Vertical lines not less than eight inches in length and not
less than one inch in width;
(ii) Placed so that the bottom of the mark is between three and
five feet from the ground; and
(iii) Placed at locations that are readily visible to any person
approaching the property and no more than one hundred feet apart on
forest land, as defined in RCW 76.09.020, or one thousand feet apart on
land other than forest land.
(b) A landowner must use signs for posting in a conspicuous manner
on access roads.
(7) "Premises" includes any building, dwelling, structure used for
commercial aquaculture, or any real property.

--- END ---