BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.28.1815 and 2008 c 264 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 67.28.180, all revenue from taxes imposed
under this chapter shall be credited to a special fund in the treasury
of the municipality imposing such tax and used solely for:
(1) The purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of tourism
promotion, acquisition of tourism-related facilities, or operation of
tourism-related facilities. Municipalities may, under chapter 39.34
RCW, agree to the utilization of revenue from taxes imposed under this
chapter for the purposes of funding a multijurisdictional tourism-related facility; or
(2) The purpose of funding additional law enforcement officers for
the municipality, but may not be used to supplant existing funding for
law enforcement officers.

--- END ---