BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.625 and 1999 c 398 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person or persons shall occupy any trailer while it is being
moved upon a public highway, except a person occupying a proper
position for steering a trailer designed to be steered from a rear-end
position.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no person
or persons may occupy a vehicle while it is being towed by a tow truck
as defined in RCW 46.55.010.
(3) A registered tow truck operator may allow passengers to ride in
a vehicle that is carried on the deck of a flatbed tow truck only when
the number of people that need to be transported exceeds the seating
capacity of the tow truck. Drivers and passengers must still comply
with RCW 46.61.687 and 46.61.688.

--- END ---