BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.82.280 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 19 are each amended
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Behind-the-wheel instruction" means instruction in an approved
driver training school instruction vehicle according to and inclusive
of the minimum required curriculum. Behind-the-wheel instruction is
characterized by driving experience.
(2) "Classroom" means a space dedicated to and used exclusively by
a driver training instructor for the instruction of students. With
prior department approval, a branch office classroom may be located
within alternative facilities, such as a public or private library,
school, community college, college or university, or a business
training facility.
(3) "Classroom instruction" means that portion of a traffic safety
education course that is characterized by classroom-based student
instruction conducted by or under the direct supervision of a licensed
instructor or licensed instructors, which may include course content
delivered electronically using the internet or other computer-based
methods.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing of
the state of Washington.
(5) "Driver training education course" means a course of
instruction in traffic safety education approved and licensed by the
department of licensing that consists of classroom and behind-the-wheel
instruction as documented by the minimum approved curriculum.
(6) "Driver training school" means a commercial driver training
school engaged in the business of giving instruction, for a fee, in the
operation of automobiles.
(7) "Enrollment" means the collecting of a fee or the signing of a
contract for a driver training education course. "Enrollment" does not
include the collecting of names and contact information for enrolling
students once a driver training school is licensed to instruct.
(8) "Fraudulent practices" means any conduct or representation on
the part of a driver training school owner or instructor including:
(a) Inducing anyone to believe, or to give the impression, that a
license to operate a motor vehicle or any other license granted by the
director may be obtained by any means other than those prescribed by
law, or furnishing or obtaining the same by illegal or improper means,
or requesting, accepting, or collecting money for such purposes;
(b) Operating a driver training school without a license, providing
instruction without an instructor's license, verifying enrollment prior
to being licensed, misleading or false statements on applications for
a commercial driver training school license or instructor's license or
on any required records or supporting documentation;
(c) Failing to fully document and maintain all required driver
training school records of instruction, school operation, and
instructor training;
(d) Issuing a driver training course certificate without requiring
completion of the necessary behind-the-wheel and classroom instruction.
(9) "Instructor" means any person employed by or otherwise
associated with a driver training school to instruct persons in the
operation of an automobile.
(10) "Owner" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, or other person or group that holds a substantial interest
in a driver training school.
(11) "Person" means any individual, firm, corporation, partnership,
or association.
(12) "Place of business" means a designated location at which the
business of a driver training school is transacted or its records are
kept.
(13) "Student" means any person enrolled in an approved driver
training course.
(14) "Substantial interest holder" means a person who has actual or
potential influence over the management or operation of any driver
training school. Evidence of substantial interest includes, but is not
limited to, one or more of the following:
(a) Directly or indirectly owning, operating, managing, or
controlling a driver training school or any part of a driver training
school;
(b) Directly or indirectly profiting from or assuming liability for
debts of a driver training school;
(c) Is an officer or director of a driver training school;
(d) Owning ten percent or more of any class of stock in a privately
or closely held corporate driver training school, or five percent or
more of any class of stock in a publicly traded corporate driver
training school;
(e) Furnishing ten percent or more of the capital, whether in cash,
goods, or services, for the operation of a driver training school
during any calendar year; or
(f) Directly or indirectly receiving a salary, commission,
royalties, or other form of compensation from the activity in which a
driver training school is or seeks to be engaged.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.220.020 and 1990 c 33 s 218 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following words and phrases whenever used in chapter 28A.220
RCW shall have the following meaning:
(1) "Superintendent" or "state superintendent" shall mean the
superintendent of public instruction.
(2) "Traffic safety education course" shall mean an accredited
course of instruction in traffic safety education which shall consist
of two phases, classroom instruction, and laboratory experience.
"Laboratory experience" shall include on-street, driving range, or
simulator experience or some combination thereof. "Classroom
instruction" may include course content delivered electronically using
the internet or other computer-based methods. Each phase shall meet
basic course requirements which shall be established by the
superintendent of public instruction and each part of said course shall
be taught by a qualified teacher of traffic safety education. Any
portions of the course may be taught after regular school hours or on
Saturdays as well as on regular school days or as a summer school
course, at the option of the local school districts.
(3) "Qualified teacher of traffic safety education" shall mean an
instructor certificated under the provisions of chapter 28A.410 RCW and
certificated by the superintendent of public instruction to teach
either the classroom phase or the laboratory phase of the traffic
safety education course, or both, under regulations promulgated by the
superintendent: PROVIDED, That the laboratory experience phase of the
traffic safety education course may be taught by instructors
certificated under rules promulgated by the superintendent of public
instruction, exclusive of any requirement that the instructor be
certificated under the provisions of chapter 28A.410 RCW. Professional
instructors certificated under the provisions of chapter 46.82 RCW, and
participating in this program, shall be subject to reasonable
qualification requirements jointly adopted by the superintendent of
public instruction and the director of licensing.
(4) "Realistic level of effort" means the classroom and laboratory
student learning experiences considered acceptable to the
superintendent of public instruction that must be satisfactorily
accomplished by the student in order to successfully complete the
traffic safety education course.

--- END ---