BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.08.063 and 2005 c 95 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
There shall be in the county of Lincoln one judge of the superior
court; in the county of Skagit, four judges of the superior court; in
the county of Walla Walla, two judges of the superior court; in the
county of Whitman, one judge of the superior court; in the county of
Yakima, eight judges of the superior court; in the county of Adams, one
judge of the superior court; in the county of Whatcom, ((three)) four
judges of the superior court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The additional judicial position created by
section 1 of this act in Whatcom county becomes effective only if the
county, through its duly constituted legislative authority, documents
its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will
pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the
expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by statute.

--- END ---