BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to acquire real property for purposes of wildlife
areas, water access sites, or other habitat or recreation purposes, the
department shall:
(a) Submit a request for real property acquisition and the
materials required under subsection (2) of this section to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives and
the office of financial management; and
(b) Receive specific authorization from the legislature to acquire
the real property that is the subject of the request, unless the
department determines under subsection (2) of this section that one-
time and ongoing operations and maintenance costs and any applicable
payments in lieu of real property taxes can be funded within existing
appropriation levels.
(2) A real property acquisition request must include information on
the proposed acquisition including information on the real property,
the purpose of the acquisition, and the intended use of the real
property. In addition, the department shall:
(a) Develop and include a plan for the operation and maintenance of
the property including: (i) Ongoing and one-time actions and projects
associated with the operation and maintenance of that property; (ii)
the anticipated and range of potential operating and capital costs
associated with the operation and maintenance of that property; and
(iii) the anticipated funding source for these operating and capital
costs, including the projected availability of funds from each source;
and
(b)(i) Identify the anticipated and range of potential costs
associated with the payment of amounts in lieu of real property taxes
on that property pursuant to the election and payments authorized under
RCW 77.12.201, 77.12.203, and 79A.15.120, if applicable; and (ii)
identify the anticipated funding source for these costs, including the
projected availability of funds from each source, if applicable.
(3) The department may include multiple requests for real property
acquisition in one submittal, as long as the material for each
individual acquisition request meets the requirements of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.037 and 2000 c 107 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may acquire by gift, easement, purchase, lease,
or condemnation lands, buildings, water rights, rights-of-way, or other
necessary property, and construct and maintain necessary facilities for
purposes consistent with this title. The commission may authorize the
director to acquire property under this section, but the power of
condemnation may only be exercised by the director when an
appropriation has been made by the legislature for the acquisition of
a specific property, except to clear title and acquire access
rights-of-way. Real property acquisitions by the commission or
department are subject to the applicable requirements of section 1 of
this act.
(2) The commission may sell, lease, convey, or grant concessions
upon real or personal property under the control of the department.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.12.220 and 2000 c 107 s 219 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this title, the commission may make agreements
to obtain real or personal property or to transfer or convey property
held by the state to the United States or its agencies or
instrumentalities, units of local government of this state, public
service companies, or other persons, if in the judgment of the
commission and the attorney general the transfer and conveyance is
consistent with public interest. For purposes of this section, "local
government" means any city, town, county, special district, municipal
corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation.
(2) If the commission agrees to a transfer or conveyance under this
section or to a sale or return of real property under RCW 77.12.210,
the director shall certify, with the attorney general, to the governor
that the agreement has been made. The certification shall describe the
real property. The governor then may execute and the secretary of
state attest and deliver to the appropriate entity or person the
instrument necessary to fulfill the agreement.
(3) Real property acquisitions by the commission or department are
subject to the applicable requirements of section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
under the subchapter heading "Part 5 powers and duties--general" to
read as follows:
(1) In order to acquire real property for purposes of a natural
area preserve or natural resources conservation area or other habitat
or riparian protection purposes under chapter 79.70 or 79.71 RCW or RCW
79A.15.120, the department shall:
(a) Submit a request for real property acquisition and the
materials required under subsection (2) of this section to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives and
the office of financial management; and
(b) Receive specific authorization from the legislature to acquire
the real property that is the subject of the request, unless the
department determines under subsection (2) of this section that one-
time and ongoing operations and maintenance costs and any applicable
payments in lieu of real property taxes can be funded within existing
appropriation levels.
(2) A real property acquisition request must include information on
the proposed acquisition including information on the real property,
the purpose of the acquisition, and the intended use of the real
property. In addition, the department shall:
(a) Develop and include a plan for the operation and maintenance of
the property including: (i) Ongoing and one-time actions and projects
associated with the operation and maintenance of that property; (ii)
the anticipated and range of potential operating and capital costs
associated with the operation and maintenance of that property; and
(iii) the anticipated funding source for these operating and capital
costs, including the projected availability of funds from each source;
and
(b)(i) Identify the anticipated and range of potential costs
associated with the payment of amounts in lieu of real property taxes
on that property pursuant to the payments authorized under RCW
79.70.130, 79.71.130, and 79A.15.120, if applicable; and (ii) identify
the anticipated funding source for these costs, including the projected
availability of funds from each source, if applicable.
(3) The department may include multiple requests for real property
acquisition in one submittal, as long as the material for each
individual acquisition request meets the requirements of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 79.70.030 and 2003 c 334 s 549 are each amended to
read as follows:
In order to set aside, preserve, and protect natural areas within
the state, the department is authorized, in addition to any other
powers, to:
(1) Establish the criteria for selection, acquisition, management,
protection, and use of such natural areas, including:
(a) Limiting public access to natural area preserves consistent
with the purposes of this chapter. Where appropriate, and on a case-by-case basis, a buffer zone with an increased low level of public
access may be created around the environmentally sensitive areas;
(b) Developing a management plan for each designated natural area
preserve. The plan must identify the significant resources to be
conserved consistent with the purposes of this chapter and identify the
areas with potential for low-impact public and environmental
educational uses. The plan must specify the types of management
activities and public uses that are permitted, consistent with the
purposes of this chapter. The department must make the plans available
for review and comment by the public, and state, tribal, and local
agencies, prior to final approval;
(2) Cooperate or contract with any federal, state, or local
governmental agency, private organizations, or individuals in carrying
out the purpose of this chapter;
(3) Consistent with the plan and the applicable requirements of
section 4 of this act, acquire by gift, devise, purchase, grant,
dedication, or means other than eminent domain, the fee or any lesser
right or interest in real property which shall be held and managed as
a natural area;
(4) Acquire by gift, devise, grant, or donation any personal
property to be used in the acquisition and/or management of natural
areas;
(5) Inventory existing public, state, and private lands in
cooperation with the council to assess possible natural areas to be
preserved within the state;
(6) Maintain a natural heritage program to provide assistance in
the selection and nomination of areas containing natural heritage
resources for registration or dedication. The program shall maintain
a classification of natural heritage resources, an inventory of their
locations, and a data bank for such information. The department shall
cooperate with the department of fish and wildlife in the selection and
nomination of areas from the data bank that relate to critical wildlife
habitats. Information from the data bank shall be made available to
public and private agencies and individuals for environmental
assessment and proprietary land management purposes. Usage of the
classification, inventory, or data bank of natural heritage resources
for any purpose inconsistent with the natural heritage program is not
authorized;
(7) Prepare a natural heritage plan which shall govern the natural
heritage program in the conduct of activities to create and manage a
system of natural areas that includes natural resources conservation
areas, and may include areas designated under the research natural area
program on federal lands in the state;
(a) The plan shall list the natural heritage resources to be
considered for registration and shall provide criteria for the
selection and approval of natural areas under this chapter;
(b) The department shall provide opportunities for input, comment,
and review to the public, other public agencies, and private groups
with special interests in natural heritage resources during preparation
of the plan;
(c) Upon approval by the council and adoption by the department,
the plan shall be updated and submitted biennially to the appropriate
committees of the legislature for their information and review. The
plan shall take effect ninety days after the adjournment of the
legislative session in which it is submitted unless the reviewing
committees suggest changes or reject the plan; and
(8) Maintain a state register of natural areas containing
significant natural heritage resources to be called the Washington
register of natural area preserves. Selection of natural areas for
registration shall be in accordance with criteria listed in the natural
heritage plan and accomplished through voluntary agreement between the
owner of the natural area and the department. No privately owned lands
may be proposed to the council for registration without prior notice to
the owner or registered without voluntary consent of the owner. No
state or local governmental agency may require such consent as a
condition of any permit or approval of or settlement of any civil or
criminal proceeding or to penalize any landowner in any way for failure
to give, or for withdrawal of, such consent.
(a) The department shall adopt rules as authorized by RCW 43.12.065
and 79.70.030(1) and chapter 34.05 RCW relating to voluntary natural
area registration.
(b) After approval by the council, the department may place sites
onto the register or remove sites from the register.
(c) The responsibility for management of registered natural area
preserves shall be with the preserve owner. A voluntary management
agreement may be developed between the department and the owners of the
sites on the register.
(d) Any public agency may register lands under provisions of this
chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 79.71.040 and 1987 c 472 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to acquire property or less than fee
interests in property, as defined by RCW 64.04.130, by all means,
except eminent domain, for creating natural resources conservation
areas, where the acquisition meets the applicable requirements of
section 4 of this act and is the best way to achieve the purposes of
this chapter. Areas acquired or assembled by the department for
conservation purposes will be designated as "Washington natural
resources conservation areas."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to acquire real property, the commission shall:
(a) Submit a request for real property acquisition and the
materials required under subsection (2) of this section to the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives and
the office of financial management; and
(b) Receive specific authorization from the legislature to acquire
the real property that is the subject of the request, unless the
commission determines under subsection (2) of this section that one-time and ongoing operations and maintenance costs can be funded within
existing appropriation levels.
(2) A real property acquisition request must include information on
the proposed acquisition including information on the real property,
the purpose of the acquisition, and the intended use of the real
property. In addition, the commission shall develop and include a plan
for the operation and maintenance of the property including: (a)
Ongoing and one-time actions and projects associated with the operation
and maintenance of that property; (b) the anticipated and range of
potential operating and capital costs associated with the operation and
maintenance of that property; and (c) the anticipated funding source
for these operating and capital costs, including the projected
availability of funds from each source.
(3) The commission may include multiple requests for real property
acquisition in one submittal, as long as the material for each
individual acquisition request meets the requirements of this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 79A.05.030 and 2005 c 373 s 1 and 2005 c 360 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Have the care, charge, control, and supervision of all parks
and parkways acquired or set aside by the state for park or parkway
purposes.
(2) Adopt policies, and adopt, issue, and enforce rules pertaining
to the use, care, and administration of state parks and parkways. The
commission shall cause a copy of the rules to be kept posted in a
conspicuous place in every state park to which they are applicable, but
failure to post or keep any rule posted shall be no defense to any
prosecution for the violation thereof.
(3) Permit the use of state parks and parkways by the public under
such rules as shall be adopted.
(4) Clear, drain, grade, seed, and otherwise improve or beautify
parks and parkways, and erect structures, buildings, fireplaces, and
comfort stations and build and maintain paths, trails, and roadways
through or on parks and parkways.
(5) Grant concessions or leases in state parks and parkways, upon
such rentals, fees, or percentage of income or profits and for such
terms, in no event longer than fifty years, and upon such conditions as
shall be approved by the commission: PROVIDED, That leases exceeding
a twenty-year term shall require a unanimous vote of the commission:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That if, during the term of any concession or lease,
it is the opinion of the commission that it would be in the best
interest of the state, the commission may, with the consent of the
concessionaire or lessee, alter and amend the terms and conditions of
such concession or lease: PROVIDED FURTHER, That television station
leases shall be subject to the provisions of RCW 79A.05.085, only:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the rates of such concessions or leases shall be
renegotiated at five-year intervals. No concession shall be granted
which will prevent the public from having free access to the scenic
attractions of any park or parkway.
(6) Employ such assistance as it deems necessary. Commission
expenses relating to its use of volunteer assistance shall be limited
to premiums or assessments for the insurance of volunteers by the
department of labor and industries, compensation of staff who assist
volunteers, materials and equipment used in authorized volunteer
projects, training, reimbursement of volunteer travel as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, and other reasonable expenses relating to
volunteer recognition. The commission, at its discretion, may waive
commission fees otherwise applicable to volunteers. The commission
shall not use volunteers to replace or supplant classified positions.
The use of volunteers may not lead to the elimination of any employees
or permanent positions in the bargaining unit.
(7) By majority vote of its authorized membership and consistent
with the applicable requirements of section 7 of this act, select and
purchase or obtain options upon, lease, or otherwise acquire for and in
the name of the state such tracts of land, including shore and tide
lands, for park and parkway purposes as it deems proper. If the
commission cannot acquire any tract at a price it deems reasonable, it
may, by majority vote of its authorized membership, obtain title
thereto, or any part thereof, by condemnation proceedings conducted by
the attorney general as provided for the condemnation of rights-of-way
for state highways. Option agreements executed under authority of this
subsection shall be valid only if:
(a) The cost of the option agreement does not exceed one dollar;
and
(b) Moneys used for the purchase of the option agreement are from
(i) funds appropriated therefor, or (ii) funds appropriated for
undesignated land acquisitions, or (iii) funds deemed by the commission
to be in excess of the amount necessary for the purposes for which they
were appropriated; and
(c) The maximum amount payable for the property upon exercise of
the option does not exceed the appraised value of the property.
(8) Cooperate with the United States, or any county or city of this
state, in any matter pertaining to the acquisition, development,
redevelopment, renovation, care, control, or supervision of any park or
parkway, and enter into contracts in writing to that end. All parks or
parkways, to which the state contributed or in whose care, control, or
supervision the state participated pursuant to the provisions of this
section, shall be governed by the provisions hereof.
(9) Within allowable resources, maintain policies that increase the
number of people who have access to free or low-cost recreational
opportunities for physical activity, including noncompetitive physical
activity.
(10) Adopt rules establishing the requirements for a criminal
history record information search for the following: Job applicants,
volunteers, and independent contractors who have unsupervised access to
children or vulnerable adults, or who will be responsible for
collecting or disbursing cash or processing credit/debit card
transactions. These background checks will be done through the
Washington state patrol criminal identification section and may include
a national check from the federal bureau of investigation, which shall
be through the submission of fingerprints. A permanent employee of the
commission, employed as of July 24, 2005, is exempt from the provisions
of this subsection.

Sec. 9 RCW 79A.05.095 and 1999 c 249 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission may, consistent with the applicable requirements of
section 7 of this act, receive and accept donations of lands for state
park purposes, and shall be responsible for the management and control
of all lands so acquired. It may from time to time recommend to the
legislature the acquisition of lands for park purposes by purchase or
condemnation.

--- END ---