BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.02 RCW
to read as follows:
A person seeking a work permit for the employment of minors under
RCW 49.12.121 is not required to complete an entirely new master
application if there are no changes to any other information submitted
on the most recent master application. The person need only complete
the parts of a new master application that identify the employer
seeking the minor work permit, including address and contact
information, and that indicate the employer plans to employ one or more
minors, the duties to be performed by minors, and the estimated number
of hours to be worked by minors.

--- END ---