BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.36.011 and 1997 c 196 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of assault in the first degree if he or
she((,)):
(a) With intent to inflict great bodily harm:
(((a))) (i) Assaults another with a firearm or any deadly weapon or
by any force or means likely to produce great bodily harm or death; or
(((b))) (ii) Administers, exposes, or transmits to or causes to be
taken by another, poison, the human immunodeficiency virus as defined
in chapter 70.24 RCW, or any other destructive or noxious substance; or
(((c))) (iii) Assaults another and inflicts great bodily harm; or
(b) Assaults, with a deadly weapon, a corrections officer, law
enforcement officer, community corrections officer, or an employee
responsible for the supervision of a sentenced offender in a detention
facility who was performing his or her official duties at the time of
the assault, and the person knew or had reason to know that the victim
was a corrections officer, law enforcement officer, community
corrections officer, or an employee responsible for the supervision of
a sentenced offender in a detention facility.
(2) Assault in the first degree is a class A felony.

--- END ---