BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever an action based upon official misconduct is commenced
against any elected county official the county commissioners may
suspend the elected official from office until such suit is determined,
and may appoint some person to fill the vacancy in accordance with
chapter 42.12 RCW.
(2) For purposes of this section, "action based upon official
misconduct" means any action by a court or quasi-judicial entity that
is based on wrongful conduct that affects, interrupts, or interferes
with the performance of official's duty.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.29.090 and 2001 c 299 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever an action based upon official misconduct as defined in
section 1 of this act is commenced against any county treasurer or the
combined office of treasurer-assessor the county commissioners may
suspend the treasurer or treasurer-assessor from office until such suit
is determined, and may appoint some person to fill the vacancy.

--- END ---