BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that due to the
national economic crisis, home foreclosures have become a significant
problem in our state. During the crisis, thousands of families have
been forced to leave their residences, and due to difficulties in
obtaining buyers and the number of foreclosed properties on the market,
some homes are vacant for months or years awaiting a buyer. While this
condition has improved slightly in recent months, economic forecasts
indicate the foreclosure crisis will continue for months or years.
A related problem is the presence of unauthorized persons in
properties which have been vacated during the foreclosure process.
These persons take advantage of the sometimes ambiguous legal status of
a particular property and the fact that a significant delay may occur
while a particular home is prepared to be placed on the market
following legal action. Because the vacant properties may lack basic
utilities and sanitation, and because there have been instances of
criminal activity including vandalism and drug abuse occurring at these
vacant homes, the legislature finds that squatters on foreclosed
properties pose a threat to the health, safety, and welfare of persons
residing in the neighborhoods and communities in which the distressed
properties they seek to occupy are located as well as to the squatters
themselves. An additional problem exists when neighbors who report the
nuisance caused by unauthorized persons to the authorities may not have
the precise information as to the owner or status of the property,
thereby leading to confusion and difficulty on the part of law
enforcement to address the complaint. The legislature finds that it is
necessary to clarify the law to provide additional tools to courts, law
enforcement, and communities to deal with the threat squatters on
foreclosed property pose.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.52.090 and 2011 c 336 s 374 are each amended to
read as follows:
In any prosecution under RCW 9A.52.070 and 9A.52.080, it is a
defense that:
(1) A building involved in an offense under RCW 9A.52.070 was
abandoned; or
(2) The premises were at the time open to members of the public and
the actor complied with all lawful conditions imposed on access to or
remaining in the premises; or
(3) The actor reasonably believed that the owner of the premises,
or other person empowered to license access thereto, would have
licensed him or her to enter or remain; or
(4) The actor was attempting to serve legal process which includes
any document required or allowed to be served upon persons or property,
by any statute, rule, ordinance, regulation, or court order, excluding
delivery by the mails of the United States. This defense applies only
if the actor did not enter into a private residence or other building
not open to the public and the entry onto the premises was reasonable
and necessary for service of the legal process.
These defenses do not apply to a person trespassing in a dwelling
in which a foreclosure action is currently pending or where the
dwelling has been foreclosed upon and the dwelling is being prepared
for sale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9A.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal trespass of a dwelling in
foreclosure if he or she knowingly enters or remains unlawfully in a
dwelling in which an action is currently pending for foreclosure or has
been recently filed on the dwelling and which has been vacated by the
owner of record. Any person with knowledge of the status of a property
may report the trespass to law enforcement regardless of his or her
status as owner of the property.
(2) Criminal trespass of a dwelling in foreclosure is a gross
misdemeanor.
(3) If a person arrested under this section claims to be a tenant
under a written or oral lease, then the alleged landlord or a neighbor
may proceed directly to an unlawful detainer action. A person may
petition the appropriate district or superior court to have an alleged
tenant arrested under this section and removed from a premise if the:
(a) Alleged tenant is engaging in activity that constitutes a
public nuisance, and the noncompliance substantially affects the safety
of the neighborhood; or
(b) Landlord fails to evict the tenant causing the public nuisance
or to notify the tenant to cease the public nuisance.
(4) A person may not be held liable in any cause of action for
bringing an eviction action against a tenant under this section if the
eviction action was brought in good faith.
(5) At the unlawful detainer action, the court must determine the
following:
(a) Whether the person arrested is actually a tenant at the
dwelling. In making the determination, the court must consider whether
the lease is in writing or oral and must make every possible effort to
provide notice to the owner of record of the property to confirm the
alleged tenant's status;
(b) Whether the person arrested has been engaged in an activity at
the premises that is considered a public nuisance to the neighborhood,
or has allowed anyone else to engage in an activity at the premises
that is considered a public nuisance to the neighborhood.
In determining whether an alleged tenant is engaged in public
nuisance activity, a court must consider the totality of the
circumstances, including factors such as whether there have been a
significant number of complaints to the landlord about the alleged
tenant's activities at the property, damages done by the alleged tenant
to the property, damages done by the alleged tenant to the property of
other tenants or neighbors, harassment or threats made by the alleged
tenant to other tenants or neighbors that have been reported to law
enforcement agencies, any police incident reports involving the alleged
tenant, and the alleged tenant's criminal history.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "public nuisance" has the
same meaning as defined in RCW 9.66.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---