BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.415 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 36 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever local authorities in their respective jurisdictions
determine on the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation that
the maximum speed permitted under RCW 46.61.400 or 46.61.440 is greater
or less than is reasonable and safe under the conditions found to exist
upon a highway or part of a highway, the local authority may determine
and declare a reasonable and safe maximum limit thereon which
(a) Decreases the limit at intersections; or
(b) Increases the limit but not to more than sixty miles per hour;
or
(c) Decreases the limit but not to less than twenty miles per hour.
(2) Local authorities in their respective jurisdictions shall
determine by an engineering and traffic investigation the proper
maximum speed for all arterial streets and shall declare a reasonable
and safe maximum limit thereon which may be greater or less than the
maximum speed permitted under RCW 46.61.400(2) but shall not exceed
sixty miles per hour.
(3)(a) Cities and towns in their respective jurisdictions may
establish a maximum speed limit of twenty miles per hour on a
nonarterial highway, or part of a nonarterial highway, that is within
a residence district or business district.
(b) A speed limit established under this subsection by a city or
town does not need to be determined on the basis of an engineering and
traffic investigation if the city or town has developed procedures
regarding establishing a maximum speed limit under this subsection.
Any speed limit established under this subsection may be canceled
within one year of its establishment, and the previous speed limit
reestablished, without an engineering and traffic investigation. This
subsection does not otherwise affect the requirement that cities and
towns conduct an engineering and traffic investigation to determine
whether to increase speed limits.
(c) When establishing speed limits under this subsection, cities
and towns shall consult the manual on uniform traffic control devices
as adopted by the Washington state department of transportation.
(4) The secretary of transportation is authorized to establish
speed limits on county roads and city and town streets as shall be
necessary to conform with any federal requirements which are a
prescribed condition for the allocation of federal funds to the state.
(((4))) (5) Any altered limit established as hereinbefore
authorized shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice
thereof are erected. Such maximum speed limit may be declared to be
effective at all times or at such times as are indicated upon such
signs; and differing limits may be established for different times of
day, different types of vehicles, varying weather conditions, and other
factors bearing on safe speeds, which shall be effective when posted
upon appropriate fixed or variable signs.
(((5))) (6) Any alteration of maximum limits on state highways
within incorporated cities or towns by local authorities shall not be
effective until such alteration has been approved by the secretary of
transportation.

--- END ---