BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.12.051 and 2008 c 6 s 910 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If, after making a will, the testator's marriage or domestic
partnership is dissolved, invalidated, or terminated, all provisions in
the will in favor of or granting any interest or power to the
testator's former spouse ((or)), former domestic partner, or stepchild
from the former spouse or domestic partner are revoked, unless the will
expressly provides otherwise. Provisions affected by this section must
be interpreted, and property affected passes, as if the former spouse
((or)), former domestic partner, or stepchild from the former spouse or
domestic partner failed to survive the testator, having died at the
time of entry of the decree of dissolution or declaration of
invalidity. Provisions revoked by this section are revived by the
testator's remarriage to the former spouse or reregistration of the
domestic partnership with the former domestic partner. Revocation of
certain nonprobate transfers is provided under RCW 11.07.010.
(2) This section is remedial in nature and applies to decrees of
dissolution and declarations of invalidity entered before, on, or after
January 1, 1995.

--- END ---