BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.41.100 and 2009 c 549 s 5119 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director of financial management shall:
(((1))) (a) Supervise and administer the activities of the office
of financial management.
(((2))) (b) Exercise all the powers and perform all the duties
prescribed by law with respect to the administration of the state
budget and accounting system.
(((3))) (c) Advise the governor and the legislature with respect to
matters affecting program management and planning.
(((4))) (d) Make efficiency surveys of all state departments and
institutions, and the administrative and business methods pursued
therein, examine into the physical needs and industrial activities
thereof, and make confidential reports to the governor, recommending
necessary betterments, repairs, and the installation of improved and
more economical administrative methods, and advising such action as
will result in a greater measure of self-support and remedies for
inefficient functioning.
(2) The director of financial management may enter into contracts
on behalf of the state to carry out the purposes of this chapter; ((he
or she)) the director or the director's designee may file a petition
under RCW 35.13.125 and 35.13.130 to have real property owned by the
state for military purposes annexed to a city or town if that property
constitutes the whole of the property in the annexation petition; the
director may act for the state in the initiation of or participation in
any multi-governmental agency program relative to the purposes of this
chapter; and ((he or she)) the director may accept gifts and grants,
whether such grants be of federal or other funds.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.13.125 and 1990 c 33 s 565 are each amended to read
as follows:
Proceedings for the annexation of territory pursuant to RCW
35.13.130, 35.13.140, 35.13.150, 35.13.160 and 35.13.170 shall be
commenced as provided in this section. Prior to the circulation of a
petition for annexation, the initiating party or parties who, except as
provided in RCW 28A.335.110 and 43.41.100, shall be either not less
than ten percent of the residents of the area to be annexed or the
owners of not less than ten percent in value, according to the assessed
valuation for general taxation of the property for which annexation is
petitioned, shall notify the legislative body of the city or town in
writing of their intention to commence annexation proceedings. The
legislative body shall set a date, not later than sixty days after the
filing of the request, for a meeting with the initiating parties to
determine whether the city or town will accept, reject, or
geographically modify the proposed annexation, whether it shall require
the simultaneous adoption of the comprehensive plan if such plan has
been prepared and filed for the area to be annexed as provided for in
RCW 35.13.177 and 35.13.178, and whether it shall require the
assumption of all or of any portion of existing city or town
indebtedness by the area to be annexed. If the legislative body
requires the assumption of all or of any portion of indebtedness and/or
the adoption of a comprehensive plan, it shall record this action in
its minutes and the petition for annexation shall be so drawn as to
clearly indicate this fact. There shall be no appeal from the decision
of the legislative body.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.13.130 and 2009 c 60 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A petition for annexation of an area contiguous to a city or town
may be made in writing addressed to and filed with the legislative body
of the municipality to which annexation is desired. Except where all
the property sought to be annexed is property of a school district, and
the school directors thereof file the petition for annexation as in RCW
28A.335.110 authorized, or all the property sought to be annexed is
owned by the state for military purposes, and the director of financial
management files a petition for annexation as authorized in RCW
43.41.100, the petition must be signed by the owners of not less than
sixty percent in value according to the assessed valuation for general
taxation of the property for which annexation is petitioned: PROVIDED,
That in cities and towns with populations greater than one hundred
sixty thousand located east of the Cascade mountains, the owner of tax
exempt property may sign an annexation petition and have the tax exempt
property annexed into the city or town, but the value of the tax exempt
property shall not be used in calculating the sufficiency of the
required property owner signatures unless only tax exempt property is
proposed to be annexed into the city or town. The petition shall set
forth a description of the property according to government legal
subdivisions or legal plats which is in compliance with RCW 35.02.170,
and shall be accompanied by a plat which outlines the boundaries of the
property sought to be annexed. If the legislative body has required
the assumption of all or of any portion of city or town indebtedness by
the area annexed, and/or the adoption of a comprehensive plan for the
area to be annexed, these facts, together with a quotation of the
minute entry of such requirement or requirements shall be set forth in
the petition.

Sec. 4 RCW 35A.14.120 and 1989 c 351 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Proceedings for initiating annexation of unincorporated territory
to a charter code city or noncharter code city may be commenced by the
filing of a petition of property owners of the territory proposed to be
annexed, in the following manner. This method of annexation shall be
alternative to other methods provided in this chapter. Prior to the
circulation of a petition for annexation, the initiating party or
parties, except as provided in RCW 43.41.100, who shall be the owners
of not less than ten percent in value, according to the assessed
valuation for general taxation of the property for which annexation is
sought, shall notify the legislative body of the code city in writing
of their intention to commence annexation proceedings. The legislative
body shall set a date, not later than sixty days after the filing of
the request, for a meeting with the initiating parties to determine
whether the code city will accept, reject, or geographically modify the
proposed annexation, whether it shall require the simultaneous adoption
of a proposed zoning regulation, if such a proposal has been prepared
and filed for the area to be annexed as provided for in RCW 35A.14.330
and 35A.14.340, and whether it shall require the assumption of all or
of any portion of existing city indebtedness by the area to be annexed.
If the legislative body requires the assumption of all or of any
portion of indebtedness and/or the adoption of a proposed zoning
regulation, it shall record this action in its minutes and the petition
for annexation shall be so drawn as to clearly indicate these facts.
Approval by the legislative body shall be a condition precedent to
circulation of the petition. There shall be no appeal from the
decision of the legislative body. A petition for annexation of an area
contiguous to a code city may be filed with the legislative body of the
municipality to which annexation is desired. ((It)) Except where the
property sought to be annexed is owned by the state for military
purposes, and the director of financial management or the director's
designee files a petition for annexation as authorized in RCW
43.41.100, the petition must be signed by the owners, as defined by RCW
35A.01.040(9) (a) through (d), of not less than sixty percent in value,
according to the assessed valuation for general taxation of the
property for which annexation is petitioned: PROVIDED, That a petition
for annexation of an area having at least eighty percent of the
boundaries of such area contiguous with a portion of the boundaries of
the code city, not including that portion of the boundary of the area
proposed to be annexed that is coterminous with a portion of the
boundary between two counties in this state, need be signed by only the
owners of not less than fifty percent in value according to the
assessed valuation for general taxation of the property for which the
annexation is petitioned. Such petition shall set forth a description
of the property according to government legal subdivisions or legal
plats and shall be accompanied by a map which outlines the boundaries
of the property sought to be annexed. If the legislative body has
required the assumption of all or any portion of city indebtedness by
the area annexed or the adoption of a proposed zoning regulation, these
facts, together with a quotation of the minute entry of such
requirement, or requirements, shall also be set forth in the petition.

--- END ---