BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.08.064 and 2006 c 20 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
There shall be in the counties of Benton and Franklin jointly,
((six)) seven judges of the superior court; in the county of Clallam,
three judges of the superior court; in the county of Jefferson, one
judge of the superior court; in the county of Snohomish, fifteen judges
of the superior court; in the counties of Asotin, Columbia and Garfield
jointly, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Cowlitz,
five judges of the superior court; in the counties of Klickitat and
Skamania jointly, one judge of the superior court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The additional judicial position created by
section 1 of this act in Benton and Franklin counties jointly becomes
effective only if the counties, through their duly constituted
legislative authority, document their approval of the additional
position and their agreement that they will pay out of county funds,
without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional
judicial position as provided by statute.

--- END ---