BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The people find that:
(1) Polls consistently show that the vast majority of the public,
typically more than ninety percent, wants to know if their food was
produced using genetic engineering. Without disclosure, consumers of
genetically engineered food unknowingly may violate their own dietary
and religious restrictions.
(2) Currently, there is no federal or state law that requires food
producers to identify whether foods were produced using genetic
engineering. At the same time, the United States food and drug
administration does not require safety studies of such foods. Unless
these foods contain a known allergen, the United States food and drug
administration does not require the developers of genetically
engineered crops to consult with the agency. Consultations with the
United States food and drug administration are entirely voluntary and
the developers themselves may decide what information they may wish to
provide.
(3) Mandatory identification of foods produced with genetic
engineering can provide a critical method for tracking the potential
health effects of consuming foods produced through genetic engineering.
(4) Consumers have the right to know whether the foods they
purchase were produced with genetic engineering. The genetic
engineering of plants and animals is an imprecise process and often
causes unintended consequences. Mixing plant, animal, bacterial, and
viral genes in combinations that cannot occur in nature produces
results that are not always predictable or controllable, and can lead
to adverse health or environmental consequences.
(5) United States government scientists have stated that the
artificial insertion of genetic material into plants, a technique
unique to genetic engineering, can cause a variety of significant
problems with plant foods. Such genetic engineering can increase the
levels of known toxicants in foods and introduce new toxicants and
health concerns.
(6) Forty-nine countries, including Japan, South Korea, China,
Australia, New Zealand, Thailand, Russia, the European Union member
states, and other key United States trading partners, have laws
mandating disclosure of genetically engineered foods on food labels.
Many countries have restrictions or bans against foods produced with
genetic engineering.
(7) No international agreements prohibit the mandatory
identification of foods produced through genetic engineering.
(8) Numerous foreign markets with restrictions against foods
produced through genetic engineering have restricted imports of United
States crops due to concerns about genetic engineering. Some foreign
markets are choosing to purchase agricultural products from countries
other than the United States because genetically engineered crops are
not identified in the United States, making it impossible for buyers to
distinguish what does or does not meet their national labeling laws or
restrictions, rendering United States' products less desirable. Trade
losses are estimated at billions of dollars. Mandatory identification
of foods produced with genetic engineering can be a critical method for
preserving the economic value of exports to markets with restrictions
and prohibitions against genetic engineering.
(9) Industry data shows foods identified as produced without
genetic engineering, including conventional foods identified this way,
are the fastest growing label claim. Consumers have a right to an
informed choice at the point of sale.
(10) Farmers from a wheat growing region of the state have gathered
more than two thousand six hundred signatures on a petition demanding
mandatory disclosure for crops produced with genetic engineering. The
farmers are concerned they will lose their wheat export markets if
genetically engineered wheat is approved.
(11) Agriculture is Washington's number one employer and wheat is
Washington's number two export crop, second only to goods and services
produced by the Boeing company, and ahead of Microsoft, which ranks
third.
(12) Preserving the identity, quality, and reliability of
Washington's agricultural products is of prime importance to our
state's fiscal health.
(13) The cultivation of genetically engineered crops can cause
serious impacts to the environment. For example, most genetically
engineered crops are designed to withstand weed killing herbicides. As
a result, genetically engineered crops have caused hundreds of millions
of pounds of additional herbicides to be applied to the nation's
farmland. The massive increase in use of these herbicides has caused
emergence of herbicide-resistant weeds, which have infested farm fields
and roadsides, complicating weed control for farmers and encouraging
use of increasingly toxic and more dangerous herbicides. These toxic
herbicides damage the vitality of the soil, contaminate drinking water
supplies, and pose health risks to consumers and farmworkers. The
public should have the choice to avoid purchasing foods produced in
ways that can lead to such harm.
(14) United States department of agriculture data shows Washington
state ranks second in the nation for organic farm-gate sales at two
hundred eighty-one million dollars per year. While total United States
food sales are virtually stagnant, growing less than one percent
overall, the organic food industry grew at 7.7 percent according to
2010 data. Sales of organic fruits and vegetables increased eleven and
eight-tenths percent, accounting for approximately twelve percent of
all United States' fruit and vegetable sales. Organic dairy, another
key industry in Washington state, grew at nine percent and comprises
nearly six percent of the total United States dairy market. Organic
farmers are prohibited from using genetically engineered seeds or
livestock feed.
(15) Trade industry data shows the organic industry is creating
jobs at four times the national rate.
(16) Published data shows organic farming is more profitable and
economically secure than conventional farming over the long term. This
important element of Washington's economy must be protected.
(17) Conventional farmers have a right to choose what crops they
grow and many conventional farmers want to grow traditional crops
developed without genetic engineering. Identifying seeds and seed
stock produced with genetic engineering would protect farmers' rights
to know what they are purchasing and protect their right to choose what
they grow.
(18) The purpose of this chapter is to ensure people are fully
informed about whether the food they purchase and eat was produced
through genetic engineering so they may choose for themselves whether
to purchase and eat such food. Identifying foods produced through
genetic engineering also will help protect our state's export market.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Enzyme" means a protein that catalyzes chemical reactions of
other substances without itself being destroyed or altered upon
completion of the reactions.
(3)(a) "Genetically engineered" means any food that is produced
from an organism or organisms in which the genetic material has been
changed through the application of: (i) In vitro nucleic acid
techniques including recombinant deoxyribonucleic acid techniques and
the direct injection of nucleic acid into cells or organelles. In
vitro nucleic acid techniques include, but are not limited to,
recombinant deoxyribonucleic acid or ribonucleic acid techniques that
use vector systems and techniques involving the direct introduction
into the organisms of hereditary material prepared outside the
organisms, such as micro-injection, macro-injection, chemoporation,
electroporation, micro-encapsulation, and liposome fusion; or (ii)
fusion of cells, including protoplast fusion, or hybridization
techniques that overcome natural physiological, reproductive, or
recombination barriers, where the donor cells or protoplasts do not
fall within the same taxonomic family, in a way that does not occur by
natural multiplication or natural recombination.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, "organism" means
any biological entity capable of replication, reproduction, or
transferring genetic material.
(4) "Processed food" means any food other than a raw agricultural
commodity and includes any food produced from a raw agricultural
commodity that has been subject to processing such as canning, smoking,
pressing, cooking, freezing, dehydration, fermentation, or milling.
(5) "Processing aid" means:
(a) A substance that is added to a food during the processing of
the food but is removed in some manner from the food before it is
packaged in its finished form;
(b) A substance that is added to a food during processing, is
converted into constituents normally present in the food, and does not
significantly increase the amount of the constituents naturally found
in the food; or
(c) A substance that is added to a food for its technical or
functional effects in the processing but is present in the finished
food at insignificant levels and does not have any technical or
functional effect in that finished food.
(6) "Raw agricultural commodity" has the same meaning as defined by
21 U.S.C. Sec. 321.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Beginning July 1, 2015, any food offered
for retail sale in Washington is misbranded if it is, or may have been,
entirely or partly produced with genetic engineering and that fact is
not disclosed as follows:
(a) In the case of a raw agricultural commodity, on the package
offered for retail sale, with the words "genetically engineered" stated
clearly and conspicuously on the front of the package of such a
commodity, or in the case of such a commodity that is not separately
packaged or labeled, on a label appearing on the retail store shelf or
bin where such a commodity is displayed for sale;
(b) In the case of any processed food, on the front of the package
of such food produced by a manufacturer, with the words "partially
produced with genetic engineering" or "may be partially produced with
genetic engineering" stated clearly and conspicuously; and
(c) In the case of any seed or seed stock, on the seed or seed
stock container, sales receipt or any other reference to
identification, ownership, or possession, with the words "genetically
engineered" or "produced with genetic engineering" stated clearly and
conspicuously.
(2) Subsections (1) and (3) of this section do not require either
the listing or identification of any ingredient or ingredients that
were genetically engineered, nor that the term "genetically engineered"
be placed immediately preceding any common name or primary product
descriptor of a food.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any of the
following:
(a) Food consisting entirely of, or derived entirely from, an
animal that has not itself been genetically engineered, regardless of
whether the animal has been fed or injected with any food produced with
genetic engineering or any drug that has been produced through means of
genetic engineering;
(b) A raw agricultural commodity or food that has been grown,
raised, produced, or derived without the knowing and intentional use of
genetically engineered seed or food. To be included within the
exclusion under this subsection, the person supplying a raw
agricultural commodity or food must provide a sworn statement that the
raw agricultural commodity or food: (i) Has not been knowingly or
intentionally produced through genetic engineering; and (ii) has been
segregated from, and has not been knowingly or intentionally commingled
with, foods that may have been genetically engineered at any time. In
providing such a sworn statement, a person may rely on a sworn
statement from his or her own supplier that contains such an
affirmation;
(c) Any processed food that would be subject to this section solely
because one or more processing aids or enzymes were produced or derived
with genetic engineering;
(d) Any alcoholic beverage that is subject to regulation under
Title 66 RCW;
(e) Until July 1, 2019, any processed food that would be subject to
this section solely because it includes one or more materials produced
by genetic engineering, provided that the engineered materials in the
aggregate do not account for more than nine-tenths of one percent of
the total weight of the processed food;
(f) Food that an independent organization has determined has not
been knowingly and intentionally produced from or commingled with
genetically engineered seed or genetically engineered food, provided
that such a determination has been made pursuant to a sampling and
testing procedure approved for this purpose in rules adopted by the
department. These rules may not approve a sampling and testing
procedure unless it is consistent with sampling and testing principles
recommended by internationally recognized standards organizations, such
as the international standards association and the grain and feed trade
association. No testing procedure may be approved by the department
unless: (i) It does not rely on testing processed foods in which no
deoxyribonucleic acid is detectable; and (ii) it is consistent with the
most recent "Guidelines on Performance Criteria and Validation of
Methods for Detection, Identification and Quantification of Specific
DNA Sequences and Specific Proteins in Foods" (CAC/GL 74, 2010)
published by the codex alimentarius commission;
(g) Food that has been lawfully certified to be labeled, marketed,
and offered for sale as "organic" pursuant to the federal organic foods
production act of 1990 and the regulations promulgated pursuant thereto
by the United States department of agriculture;
(h) Food that is not packaged for retail sale and that either: (i)
Is a processed food prepared and intended for immediate human
consumption; or (ii) is served, sold, or otherwise provided in any
restaurant or other food service establishment that is engaged
primarily in the sale of food prepared and intended for immediate human
consumption; or
(i) Medical food.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department may adopt rules necessary to
implement this chapter, provided that the department is not authorized
to create any exemptions beyond those provided in section 3(3) of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department, acting through the
attorney general, may bring an action in a court of competent
jurisdiction to enjoin any person violating this chapter.
(2) The department may assess a civil penalty against any person
violating this chapter in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars
per day. Each day of violation is considered a separate violation.
(3) An action to enjoin a violation of this chapter may be brought
in any court of competent jurisdiction by any person in the public
interest if the action is commenced more than sixty days after the
person has given notice of the alleged violation to the department, the
attorney general, and to the alleged violator.
(4) The court may award to a prevailing plaintiff reasonable costs
and attorneys' fees incurred in investigating and prosecuting an action
to enforce this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---