BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state's
consumers and real estate industry recognize the benefits of home
energy efficiency. The legislature also finds that home inspections
occur in a majority of residential real estate transactions, and that
the state has recently adopted a comprehensive system of educating and
licensing home inspectors. It is therefore the intent of the
legislature to ensure that residential home inspections provide
consumers with educational information about home energy efficiency and
available energy efficiency programs and services.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.280.030 and 2008 c 119 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person licensed under this chapter is responsible for
performing a visual and noninvasive inspection of the following readily
accessible systems and components of a home and reporting on the
general condition of those systems and components at the time of the
inspection in his or her written report: The roof, foundation,
exterior, heating system, air-conditioning system, structure, plumbing
and electrical systems, and other aspects of the home as may be
identified by the board. The inspection must include looking for
certain fire and safety hazards as defined by the board. The standards
of practice to be developed by the board will be used as the minimum
standards for an inspection. The duties of the home inspector with
regard to wood destroying organisms are provided in RCW 18.280.190.
(2) The written home inspection report under this section must be
accompanied by written materials, developed by the department of
commerce, providing consumers with general educational information
about (a) the systems and components of homes that affect energy
efficiency, and (b) home energy efficiency programs, including rebate
and incentive programs, offered by the federal government, the state,
local governments, electric and natural gas utilities, and energy
service contractors.

--- END ---