BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.48.210 and 1921 c 126 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person before being admitted to practice law in this state
shall take and subscribe the following oath:
I do solemnly swear:
I am a citizen of the United States and owe my allegiance thereto;
I will support the Constitution of the United States and the
Constitution of the state of Washington;
I will maintain the respect due to courts of justice and judicial
officers;
I will not counsel or maintain any suit or proceeding which shall
appear to me to be unjust, nor any defense except such as I believe to
be honestly debatable under the law of the land, unless it be in
defense of a person charged with a public offense; I will employ for
the purpose of maintaining the causes confided to me such means only as
are consistent with truth and honor, and will never seek to mislead the
judge or jury by any artifice or false statement of fact or law;
I will maintain the confidence and preserve inviolate the secrets
of my client, and will accept no compensation in connection with his or
her business except from him or her or with his or her knowledge and
approval;
I will abstain from all offensive personality, and advance no fact
prejudicial to the honor or reputation of a party or witness, unless
required by the justice of the cause with which I am charged;
I will never reject, from any consideration personal to myself, the
cause of the defenseless or oppressed, or delay any ((man's)) person's
cause for lucre or malice. So help me God.

Sec. 2 RCW 6.13.080 and 2008 c 6 s 635 are each amended to read
as follows:
The homestead exemption is not available against an execution or
forced sale in satisfaction of judgments obtained:
(1) On debts secured by mechanic's, laborer's, construction,
maritime, automobile repair, ((materialmen's)) material supplier's, or
vendor's liens arising out of and against the particular property
claimed as a homestead;
(2) On debts secured (a) by security agreements describing as
collateral the property that is claimed as a homestead or (b) by
mortgages or deeds of trust on the premises that have been executed and
acknowledged by both spouses or both domestic partners or by any
claimant not married or in a state registered domestic partnership;
(3) On one spouse's or one domestic partner's or the community's
debts existing at the time of that spouse's or that domestic partner's
bankruptcy filing where (a) bankruptcy is filed by both spouses or both
domestic partners within a six-month period, other than in a joint case
or a case in which their assets are jointly administered, and (b) the
other spouse or other domestic partner exempts property from property
of the estate under the bankruptcy exemption provisions of 11 U.S.C.
Sec. 522(d);
(4) On debts arising from a lawful court order or decree or
administrative order establishing a child support obligation or
obligation to pay maintenance;
(5) On debts owing to the state of Washington for recovery of
medical assistance correctly paid on behalf of an individual consistent
with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396p;
(6) On debts secured by a condominium's or homeowner association's
lien. In order for an association to be exempt under this provision,
the association must have provided a homeowner with notice that
nonpayment of the association's assessment may result in foreclosure of
the association lien and that the homestead protection under this
chapter shall not apply. An association has complied with this notice
requirement by mailing the notice, by first-class mail, to the address
of the owner's lot or unit. The notice required in this subsection
shall be given within thirty days from the date the association learns
of a new owner, but in all cases the notice must be given prior to the
initiation of a foreclosure. The phrase "learns of a new owner" in
this subsection means actual knowledge of the identity of a homeowner
acquiring title after June 9, 1988, and does not require that an
association affirmatively ascertain the identity of a homeowner.
Failure to give the notice specified in this subsection affects an
association's lien only for debts accrued up to the time an association
complies with the notice provisions under this subsection; or
(7) On debts owed for taxes collected under chapters 82.08, 82.12,
and 82.14 RCW but not remitted to the department of revenue.

Sec. 3 RCW 8.16.090 and 1909 p 374 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
When ten of the jurors agree upon a verdict, the verdict so agreed
upon shall be signed by the ((foreman)) jury foreperson, and the
verdict so agreed upon shall be and stand as the verdict of the jury.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.91.020 and 2000 c 239 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person who, being employed upon any railway, as engineer,
((motorman)) motor operator, ((gripman)) grip operator, conductor,
switch tender, ((fireman)) fire tender, bridge tender, flagger, or
((signalman)) signal operator, or having charge of stations, starting,
regulating, or running trains upon a railway, or being employed as
captain, engineer, or other officer of a vessel propelled by steam, or
being the driver of any animal or vehicle upon any public highway,
street, or other public place, is intoxicated while engaged in the
discharge of any such duties, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 5 RCW 13.34.105 and 2011 c 309 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise directed by the court, the duties of the
guardian ad litem for a child subject to a proceeding under this
chapter, including an attorney specifically appointed by the court to
serve as a guardian ad litem, include but are not limited to the
following:
(a) To investigate, collect relevant information about the child's
situation, and report to the court factual information regarding the
best interests of the child;
(b) To meet with, interview, or observe the child, depending on the
child's age and developmental status, and report to the court any views
or positions expressed by the child on issues pending before the court;
(c) To monitor all court orders for compliance and to bring to the
court's attention any change in circumstances that may require a
modification of the court's order;
(d) To report to the court information on the legal status of a
child's membership in any Indian tribe or band;
(e) Court-appointed special advocates and guardians ad litem may
make recommendations based upon an independent investigation regarding
the best interests of the child, which the court may consider and weigh
in conjunction with the recommendations of all of the parties;
(f) To represent and be an advocate for the best interests of the
child;
(g) To inform the child, if the child is twelve years old or older,
of his or her right to request counsel and to ask the child whether he
or she wishes to have counsel, pursuant to RCW 13.34.100(6). The
guardian ad litem shall report to the court that the child was notified
of this right and indicate the child's position regarding appointment
of counsel. The guardian ad litem shall report to the court his or her
independent recommendation as to whether appointment of counsel is in
the best interest of the child; and
(h) In the case of an Indian child as defined in RCW 13.38.040,
know, understand, and advocate the best interests of the Indian child.
(2) A guardian ad litem shall be deemed an officer of the court for
the purpose of immunity from civil liability.
(3) Except for information or records specified in RCW
13.50.100(7), the guardian ad litem shall have access to all
information available to the state or agency on the case. Upon
presentation of the order of appointment by the guardian ad litem, any
agency, hospital, school organization, division or department of the
state, doctor, nurse, or other health care provider, psychologist,
psychiatrist, police department, or mental health clinic shall permit
the guardian ad litem to inspect and copy any records relating to the
child or children involved in the case, without the consent of the
parent or guardian of the child, or of the child if the child is under
the age of thirteen years, unless such access is otherwise specifically
prohibited by law.
(4) A guardian ad litem may release confidential information,
records, and reports to the office of the family and children's
((ombudsman)) ombuds for the purposes of carrying out its duties under
chapter 43.06A RCW.
(5) The guardian ad litem shall release case information in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 13.50.100.

Sec. 6 RCW 13.50.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 30 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter:
(a) "Juvenile justice or care agency" means any of the following:
Police, diversion units, court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney,
detention center, attorney general, the legislative children's
oversight committee, the office of the family and children's
((ombudsman)) ombuds, the department of social and health services and
its contracting agencies, schools; persons or public or private
agencies having children committed to their custody; and any placement
oversight committee created under RCW 72.05.415;
(b) "Official juvenile court file" means the legal file of the
juvenile court containing the petition or information, motions,
memorandums, briefs, findings of the court, and court orders;
(c) "Records" means the official juvenile court file, the social
file, and records of any other juvenile justice or care agency in the
case;
(d) "Social file" means the juvenile court file containing the
records and reports of the probation counselor.
(2) Each petition or information filed with the court may include
only one juvenile and each petition or information shall be filed under
a separate docket number. The social file shall be filed separately
from the official juvenile court file.
(3) It is the duty of any juvenile justice or care agency to
maintain accurate records. To this end:
(a) The agency may never knowingly record inaccurate information.
Any information in records maintained by the department of social and
health services relating to a petition filed pursuant to chapter 13.34
RCW that is found by the court to be false or inaccurate shall be
corrected or expunged from such records by the agency;
(b) An agency shall take reasonable steps to assure the security of
its records and prevent tampering with them; and
(c) An agency shall make reasonable efforts to insure the
completeness of its records, including action taken by other agencies
with respect to matters in its files.
(4) Each juvenile justice or care agency shall implement procedures
consistent with the provisions of this chapter to facilitate inquiries
concerning records.
(5) Any person who has reasonable cause to believe information
concerning that person is included in the records of a juvenile justice
or care agency and who has been denied access to those records by the
agency may make a motion to the court for an order authorizing that
person to inspect the juvenile justice or care agency record concerning
that person. The court shall grant the motion to examine records
unless it finds that in the interests of justice or in the best
interests of the juvenile the records or parts of them should remain
confidential.
(6) A juvenile, or his or her parents, or any person who has
reasonable cause to believe information concerning that person is
included in the records of a juvenile justice or care agency may make
a motion to the court challenging the accuracy of any information
concerning the moving party in the record or challenging the continued
possession of the record by the agency. If the court grants the
motion, it shall order the record or information to be corrected or
destroyed.
(7) The person making a motion under subsection (5) or (6) of this
section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all parties to
the original action and to any agency whose records will be affected by
the motion.
(8) The court may permit inspection of records by, or release of
information to, any clinic, hospital, or agency which has the subject
person under care or treatment. The court may also permit inspection
by or release to individuals or agencies, including juvenile justice
advisory committees of county law and justice councils, engaged in
legitimate research for educational, scientific, or public purposes.
The court shall release to the caseload forecast council records needed
for its research and data-gathering functions. Access to records or
information for research purposes shall be permitted only if the
anonymity of all persons mentioned in the records or information will
be preserved. Each person granted permission to inspect juvenile
justice or care agency records for research purposes shall present a
notarized statement to the court stating that the names of juveniles
and parents will remain confidential.
(9) Juvenile detention facilities shall release records to the
caseload forecast council upon request. The commission shall not
disclose the names of any juveniles or parents mentioned in the records
without the named individual's written permission.
(10) Requirements in this chapter relating to the court's authority
to compel disclosure shall not apply to the legislative children's
oversight committee or the office of the family and children's
((ombudsman)) ombuds.
(11) For the purpose of research only, the administrative office of
the courts shall maintain an electronic research copy of all records in
the judicial information system related to juveniles. Access to the
research copy is restricted to the Washington state center for court
research. The Washington state center for court research shall
maintain the confidentiality of all confidential records and shall
preserve the anonymity of all persons identified in the research copy.
The research copy may not be subject to any records retention schedule
and must include records destroyed or removed from the judicial
information system pursuant to RCW 13.50.050 (17) and (18) and
13.50.100(3).
(12) The court shall release to the Washington state office of
public defense records needed to implement the agency's oversight,
technical assistance, and other functions as required by RCW 2.70.020.
Access to the records used as a basis for oversight, technical
assistance, or other agency functions is restricted to the Washington
state office of public defense. The Washington state office of public
defense shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential
information included in the records.

Sec. 7 RCW 13.50.100 and 2003 c 105 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section governs records not covered by RCW 13.50.050.
(2) Records covered by this section shall be confidential and shall
be released only pursuant to this section and RCW 13.50.010.
(3) Records retained or produced by any juvenile justice or care
agency may be released to other participants in the juvenile justice or
care system only when an investigation or case involving the juvenile
in question is being pursued by the other participant or when that
other participant is assigned the responsibility of supervising the
juvenile. Records covered under this section and maintained by the
juvenile courts which relate to the official actions of the agency may
be entered in the statewide judicial information system. However,
truancy records associated with a juvenile who has no other case
history, and records of a juvenile's parents who have no other case
history, shall be removed from the judicial information system when the
juvenile is no longer subject to the compulsory attendance laws in
chapter 28A.225 RCW. A county clerk is not liable for unauthorized
release of this data by persons or agencies not in his or her employ or
otherwise subject to his or her control, nor is the county clerk liable
for inaccurate or incomplete information collected from litigants or
other persons required to provide identifying data pursuant to this
section.
(4) Subject to (a) of this subsection, the department of social and
health services may release information retained in the course of
conducting child protective services investigations to a family or
juvenile court hearing a petition for custody under chapter 26.10 RCW.
(a) Information that may be released shall be limited to
information regarding investigations in which: (i) The juvenile was an
alleged victim of abandonment or abuse or neglect; or (ii) the
petitioner for custody of the juvenile, or any individual aged sixteen
or older residing in the petitioner's household, is the subject of a
founded or currently pending child protective services investigation
made by the department subsequent to October 1, 1998.
(b) Additional information may only be released with the written
consent of the subject of the investigation and the juvenile alleged to
be the victim of abandonment or abuse and neglect, or the parent,
custodian, guardian, or personal representative of the juvenile, or by
court order obtained with notice to all interested parties.
(5) Any disclosure of records or information by the department of
social and health services pursuant to this section shall not be deemed
a waiver of any confidentiality or privilege attached to the records or
information by operation of any state or federal statute or regulation,
and any recipient of such records or information shall maintain it in
such a manner as to comply with such state and federal statutes and
regulations and to protect against unauthorized disclosure.
(6) A contracting agency or service provider of the department of
social and health services that provides counseling, psychological,
psychiatric, or medical services may release to the office of the
family and children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds information or records
relating to services provided to a juvenile who is dependent under
chapter 13.34 RCW without the consent of the parent or guardian of the
juvenile, or of the juvenile if the juvenile is under the age of
thirteen years, unless such release is otherwise specifically
prohibited by law.
(7) A juvenile, his or her parents, the juvenile's attorney, and
the juvenile's parent's attorney, shall, upon request, be given access
to all records and information collected or retained by a juvenile
justice or care agency which pertain to the juvenile except:
(a) If it is determined by the agency that release of this
information is likely to cause severe psychological or physical harm to
the juvenile or his or her parents the agency may withhold the
information subject to other order of the court: PROVIDED, That if the
court determines that limited release of the information is
appropriate, the court may specify terms and conditions for the release
of the information; or
(b) If the information or record has been obtained by a juvenile
justice or care agency in connection with the provision of counseling,
psychological, psychiatric, or medical services to the juvenile, when
the services have been sought voluntarily by the juvenile, and the
juvenile has a legal right to receive those services without the
consent of any person or agency, then the information or record may not
be disclosed to the juvenile's parents without the informed consent of
the juvenile unless otherwise authorized by law; or
(c) That the department of social and health services may delete
the name and identifying information regarding persons or organizations
who have reported alleged child abuse or neglect.
(8) A juvenile or his or her parent denied access to any records
following an agency determination under subsection (7) of this section
may file a motion in juvenile court requesting access to the records.
The court shall grant the motion unless it finds access may not be
permitted according to the standards found in subsection (7)(a) and (b)
of this section.
(9) The person making a motion under subsection (8) of this section
shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all parties to the
original action and to any agency whose records will be affected by the
motion.
(10) Subject to the rules of discovery in civil cases, any party to
a proceeding seeking a declaration of dependency or a termination of
the parent-child relationship and any party's counsel and the guardian
ad litem of any party, shall have access to the records of any natural
or adoptive child of the parent, subject to the limitations in
subsection (7) of this section. A party denied access to records may
request judicial review of the denial. If the party prevails, he or
she shall be awarded attorneys' fees, costs, and an amount not less
than five dollars and not more than one hundred dollars for each day
the records were wrongfully denied.
(11) No unfounded allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined
in RCW 26.44.020(((12))) (1) may be disclosed to a child-placing
agency, private adoption agency, or any other licensed provider.

Sec. 8 RCW 13.50.140 and 1999 c 390 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any communication or advice privileged under RCW 5.60.060 that is
disclosed by the office of the attorney general or the department of
social and health services to the office of the family and children's
((ombudsman)) ombuds may not be deemed to be a waiver of the privilege
as to others.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.20.185 and 2001 c 193 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and maintain a toll-free
telephone number for receiving complaints regarding a facility that the
department licenses.
(2) All facilities that are licensed under this chapter shall post
in a place and manner clearly visible to residents and visitors the
department's toll-free complaint telephone number and the toll-free
number and program description of the long-term care ((ombudsman))
ombuds as provided by RCW 43.190.050.
(3) The department shall investigate complaints if the subject of
the complaint is within its authority unless the department determines
that: (a) The complaint is intended to willfully harass a licensee or
employee of the licensee; or (b) there is no reasonable basis for
investigation; or (c) corrective action has been taken as determined by
the ((ombudsman)) ombuds or the department.
(4) The department shall refer complaints to appropriate state
agencies, law enforcement agencies, the attorney general, the long-term
care ((ombudsman)) ombuds, or other entities if the department lacks
authority to investigate or if its investigation reveals that a follow-up referral to one or more of these entities is appropriate.
(5) The department shall adopt rules that include the following
complaint investigation protocols:
(a) Upon receipt of a complaint, the department shall make a
preliminary review of the complaint, assess the severity of the
complaint, and assign an appropriate response time. Complaints
involving imminent danger to the health, safety, or well-being of a
resident must be responded to within two days. When appropriate, the
department shall make an on-site investigation within a reasonable time
after receipt of the complaint or otherwise ensure that complaints are
responded to.
(b) The complainant must be: Promptly contacted by the department,
unless anonymous or unavailable despite several attempts by the
department, and informed of the right to discuss alleged violations
with the inspector and to provide other information the complainant
believes will assist the inspector; informed of the department's course
of action; and informed of the right to receive a written copy of the
investigation report.
(c) In conducting the investigation, the department shall interview
the complainant, unless anonymous, and shall use its best efforts to
interview the resident or residents allegedly harmed by the violations,
and, in addition to facility staff, any available independent sources
of relevant information, including if appropriate the family members of
the resident.
(d) Substantiated complaints involving harm to a resident, if an
applicable law or regulation has been violated, shall be subject to one
or more of the actions provided in RCW 18.20.190. Whenever
appropriate, the department shall also give consultation and technical
assistance to the facility.
(e) After a department finding of a violation for which a stop
placement has been imposed, the department shall make an on-site
revisit of the provider within fifteen working days from the request
for revisit, to ensure correction of the violation. For violations
that are serious or recurring or uncorrected following a previous
citation, and create actual or threatened harm to one or more
residents' well-being, including violations of residents' rights, the
department shall make an on-site revisit as soon as appropriate to
ensure correction of the violation. Verification of correction of all
other violations may be made by either a department on-site revisit or
by written or photographic documentation found by the department to be
credible. This subsection does not prevent the department from
enforcing license suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this
subsection shall interfere with or diminish the department's authority
and duty to ensure that the provider adequately cares for residents,
including to make departmental on-site revisits as needed to ensure
that the provider protects residents, and to enforce compliance with
this chapter.
(f) Substantiated complaints of neglect, abuse, exploitation, or
abandonment of residents, or suspected criminal violations, shall also
be referred by the department to the appropriate law enforcement
agencies, the attorney general, and appropriate professional
disciplining authority.
(6) The department may provide the substance of the complaint to
the licensee before the completion of the investigation by the
department unless such disclosure would reveal the identity of a
complainant, witness, or resident who chooses to remain anonymous.
Neither the substance of the complaint provided to the licensee or
contractor nor any copy of the complaint or related report published,
released, or made otherwise available shall disclose, or reasonably
lead to the disclosure of, the name, title, or identity of any
complainant, or other person mentioned in the complaint, except that
the name of the provider and the name or names of any officer,
employee, or agent of the department conducting the investigation shall
be disclosed after the investigation has been closed and the complaint
has been substantiated. The department may disclose the identity of
the complainant if such disclosure is requested in writing by the
complainant. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
interfere with the obligation of the long-term care ((ombudsman))
ombuds program to monitor the department's licensing, contract, and
complaint investigation files for long-term care facilities.
(7) The resident has the right to be free of interference,
coercion, discrimination, and reprisal from a facility in exercising
his or her rights, including the right to voice grievances about
treatment furnished or not furnished. A facility licensed under this
chapter shall not discriminate or retaliate in any manner against a
resident, employee, or any other person on the basis or for the reason
that such resident or any other person made a complaint to the
department, the attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the
long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds, provided information, or otherwise
cooperated with the investigation of such a complaint. Any attempt to
discharge a resident against the resident's wishes, or any type of
retaliatory treatment of a resident by whom or upon whose behalf a
complaint substantiated by the department has been made to the
department, the attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the
long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds, within one year of the filing of
the complaint, raises a rebuttable presumption that such action was in
retaliation for the filing of the complaint. "Retaliatory treatment"
means, but is not limited to, monitoring a resident's phone, mail, or
visits; involuntary seclusion or isolation; transferring a resident to
a different room unless requested or based upon legitimate management
reasons; withholding or threatening to withhold food or treatment
unless authorized by a terminally ill resident or his or her
representative pursuant to law; or persistently delaying responses to
a resident's request for service or assistance. A facility licensed
under this chapter shall not willfully interfere with the performance
of official duties by a long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds. The
department shall sanction and may impose a civil penalty of not more
than three thousand dollars for a violation of this subsection.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.20.305 and 2011 c 366 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((A boarding home)) An assisted living facility must provide
each nonresident a disclosure statement upon admission and at the time
that additional services are requested by a nonresident.
(2) The disclosure statement shall notify the nonresident that:
(a) The resident rights of chapter 70.129 RCW do not apply to
nonresidents;
(b) Licensing requirements for boarding homes under this chapter do
not apply to nonresident units; and
(c) The jurisdiction of the long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds
does not apply to nonresidents and nonresident units.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.20.390 and 2012 c 10 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To ensure the proper delivery of services and the maintenance
and improvement in quality of care through self-review, any assisted
living facility licensed under this chapter may maintain a quality
assurance committee that, at a minimum, includes:
(a) A licensed registered nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW;
(b) The administrator; and
(c) Three other members from the staff of the assisted living
facility.
(2) When established, the quality assurance committee shall meet at
least quarterly to identify issues that may adversely affect quality of
care and services to residents and to develop and implement plans of
action to correct identified quality concerns or deficiencies in the
quality of care provided to residents.
(3) To promote quality of care through self-review without the fear
of reprisal, and to enhance the objectivity of the review process, the
department shall not require, and the long-term care ((ombudsman))
ombuds program shall not request, disclosure of any quality assurance
committee records or reports, unless the disclosure is related to the
committee's compliance with this section, if:
(a) The records or reports are not maintained pursuant to statutory
or regulatory mandate; and
(b) The records or reports are created for and collected and
maintained by the committee.
(4) If the assisted living facility refuses to release records or
reports that would otherwise be protected under this section, the
department may then request only that information that is necessary to
determine whether the assisted living facility has a quality assurance
committee and to determine that it is operating in compliance with this
section. However, if the assisted living facility offers the
department documents generated by, or for, the quality assurance
committee as evidence of compliance with assisted living facility
requirements, the documents are protected as quality assurance
committee documents under subsections (6) and (8) of this section when
in the possession of the department. The department is not liable for
an inadvertent disclosure, a disclosure related to a required federal
or state audit, or disclosure of documents incorrectly marked as
quality assurance committee documents by the facility.
(5) Good faith attempts by the committee to identify and correct
quality deficiencies shall not be used as a basis for sanctions.
(6) Information and documents, including the analysis of complaints
and incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and
maintained by, a quality assurance committee are not subject to
discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no
person who was in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who
participated in the creation, collection, or maintenance of information
or documents specifically for the committee shall be permitted or
required to testify as to the content of such proceedings or the
documents and information prepared specifically for the committee.
This subsection does not preclude:
(a) In any civil action, the discovery of the identity of persons
involved in the care that is the basis of the civil action whose
involvement was independent of any quality improvement committee
activity;
(b) In any civil action, the testimony of any person concerning the
facts which form the basis for the institution of such proceedings of
which the person had personal knowledge acquired independently of their
participation in the quality assurance committee activities.
(7) A quality assurance committee under subsection (1) of this
section, RCW 70.41.200, 74.42.640, 4.24.250, or 43.70.510 may share
information and documents, including the analysis of complaints and
incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and
maintained by, the committee, with one or more other quality assurance
committees created under subsection (1) of this section, RCW 70.41.200,
74.42.640, 4.24.250, or 43.70.510 for the improvement of the quality of
care and services rendered to assisted living facility residents.
Information and documents disclosed by one quality assurance committee
to another quality assurance committee and any information and
documents created or maintained as a result of the sharing of
information and documents shall not be subject to the discovery process
and confidentiality shall be respected as required by subsections (6)
and (8) of this section, RCW 43.70.510(4), 70.41.200(3), 4.24.250(1),
and 74.42.640 (7) and (9). The privacy protections of chapter 70.02
RCW and the federal health insurance portability and accountability act
of 1996 and its implementing regulations apply to the sharing of
individually identifiable patient information held by a coordinated
quality improvement program. Any rules necessary to implement this
section shall meet the requirements of applicable federal and state
privacy laws.
(8) Information and documents, including the analysis of complaints
and incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and
maintained by, a quality assurance committee are exempt from disclosure
under chapter 42.56 RCW.
(9) Notwithstanding any records created for the quality assurance
committee, the facility shall fully set forth in the resident's
records, available to the resident, the department, and others as
permitted by law, the facts concerning any incident of injury or loss
to the resident, the steps taken by the facility to address the
resident's needs, and the resident outcome.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.20.420 and 2012 c 10 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the department determines that the health, safety, or
welfare of residents is immediately jeopardized by an assisted living
facility's failure or refusal to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter, and the department
summarily suspends the assisted living facility license, the department
may appoint a temporary manager of the assisted living facility, or the
licensee may, subject to the department's approval, voluntarily
participate in the temporary management program.
The purposes of the temporary management program are as follows:
(a) To mitigate dislocation and transfer trauma of residents while
the department and licensee may pursue dispute resolution or appeal of
a summary suspension of license;
(b) To facilitate the continuity of safe and appropriate resident
care and services;
(c) To protect the health, safety, and welfare of residents, by
providing time for an orderly closure of the assisted living facility,
or for the deficiencies that necessitated temporary management to be
corrected; and
(d) To preserve a residential option that meets a specialized
service need or is in a geographical area that has a lack of available
providers.
(2) The department may recruit, approve, and appoint qualified
individuals, partnerships, corporations, and other entities interested
in serving as a temporary manager of an assisted living facility.
These individuals and entities shall satisfy the criteria established
under this chapter or by the department for approving licensees. The
department shall not approve or appoint any person, including
partnerships and other entities, if that person is affiliated with the
assisted living facility subject to the temporary management, or has
owned or operated an assisted living facility ordered into temporary
management or receivership in any state. When approving or appointing
a temporary manager, the department shall consider the temporary
manager's past experience in long-term care, the quality of care
provided, the temporary manager's availability, and the person's
familiarity with applicable state and federal laws. Subject to the
provisions of this section and RCW 18.20.430, the department's
authority to approve or appoint a temporary manager is discretionary
and not subject to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) When the department appoints a temporary manager, the
department shall enter into a contract with the temporary manager and
shall order the licensee to cease operating the assisted living
facility and immediately turn over to the temporary manager possession
and control of the assisted living facility, including but not limited
to all resident care records, financial records, and other records
necessary for operation of the facility while temporary management is
in effect. If the department has not appointed a temporary manager and
the licensee elects to participate in the temporary management program,
the licensee shall select the temporary manager, subject to the
department's approval, and enter into a contract with the temporary
manager, consistent with this section. The department has the
discretion to approve or revoke any temporary management arrangements
made by the licensee.
(4) When the department appoints a temporary manager, the costs
associated with the temporary management may be paid for through the
assisted living facility temporary management account established by
RCW 18.20.430, or from other departmental funds, or a combination
thereof. All funds must be administered according to department
procedures. The department may enter into an agreement with the
licensee allowing the licensee to pay for some of the costs associated
with a temporary manager appointed by the department. If the
department has not appointed a temporary manager and the licensee
elects to participate in the temporary management program, the licensee
is responsible for all costs related to administering the temporary
management program at the assisted living facility and contracting with
the temporary manager.
(5) The temporary manager shall assume full responsibility for the
daily operations of the assisted living facility and is responsible for
correcting cited deficiencies and ensuring that all minimum licensing
requirements are met. The temporary manager must comply with all state
and federal laws and regulations applicable to assisted living
facilities. The temporary manager shall protect the health, safety,
and welfare of the residents for the duration of the temporary
management and shall perform all acts reasonably necessary to ensure
residents' needs are met. The temporary management contract shall
address the responsibility of the temporary manager to pay past due
debts. The temporary manager's specific responsibilities may include,
but are not limited to:
(a) Receiving and expending in a prudent and business-like manner
all current revenues of the assisted living facility, provided that
priority is given to debts and expenditures directly related to
providing care and meeting residents' needs;
(b) Hiring and managing all consultants and employees and firing
them for good cause;
(c) Making necessary purchases, repairs, and replacements, provided
that such expenditures in excess of five thousand dollars by a
temporary manager appointed by the department must be approved by the
department;
(d) Entering into contracts necessary for the operation of the
assisted living facility;
(e) Preserving resident trust funds and resident records; and
(f) Preparing all department-required reports, including a detailed
monthly accounting of all expenditures and liabilities, which shall be
sent to the department and the licensee.
(6) The licensee and department shall provide written notification
immediately to all residents, resident representatives, interested
family members, and the state long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds
program of the temporary management and the reasons for it. This
notification shall include notice that residents may move from the
assisted living facility without notifying the licensee or temporary
manager in advance, and without incurring any charges, fees, or costs
otherwise available for insufficient advance notice, during the
temporary management period. The notification shall also inform
residents and their families or representatives that the temporary
management team will provide residents help with relocation and
appropriate discharge planning and coordination if desired. The
department shall provide assistance with relocation to residents who
are department clients and may provide such assistance to other
residents. The temporary manager shall meet regularly with staff,
residents, residents' representatives, and families to inform them of
the plans for and progress achieved in the correction of deficiencies,
and of the plans for facility closure or continued operation.
(7) The department shall terminate temporary management:
(a) After sixty days unless good cause is shown to continue the
temporary management. Good cause for continuing the temporary
management exists when returning the assisted living facility to its
former licensee would subject residents to a threat to health, safety,
or welfare;
(b) When all residents are transferred and the assisted living
facility is closed;
(c) When deficiencies threatening residents' health, safety, or
welfare are eliminated and the former licensee agrees to
department-specified conditions regarding the continued facility
operation; or
(d) When a new licensee assumes control of the assisted living
facility.
Nothing in this section precludes the department from revoking its
approval of the temporary management or exercising its licensing
enforcement authority under this chapter. The department's decision
whether to approve or to revoke a temporary management arrangement is
not subject to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(8) The department shall indemnify, defend, and hold harmless any
temporary manager appointed or approved under this section against
claims made against the temporary manager for any actions by the
temporary manager or its agents that do not amount to intentional torts
or criminal behavior.
(9) The department may adopt rules implementing this section. In
the development of rules or policies implementing this section, the
department shall consult with residents and their representatives,
resident advocates, financial professionals, assisted living facility
providers, and organizations representing assisted living facilities.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.27.090 and 2007 c 436 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The registration provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(1) An authorized representative of the United States government,
the state of Washington, or any incorporated city, town, county,
township, irrigation district, reclamation district, or other municipal
or political corporation or subdivision of this state;
(2) Officers of a court when they are acting within the scope of
their office;
(3) Public utilities operating under the regulations of the
utilities and transportation commission in construction, maintenance,
or development work incidental to their own business;
(4) Any construction, repair, or operation incidental to the
discovering or producing of petroleum or gas, or the drilling, testing,
abandoning, or other operation of any petroleum or gas well or any
surface or underground mine or mineral deposit when performed by an
owner or lessee;
(5) The sale of any finished products, materials, or articles of
merchandise that are not fabricated into and do not become a part of a
structure under the common law of fixtures;
(6) Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair of
personal property performed by the registered or legal owner, or by a
mobile/manufactured home retail dealer or manufacturer licensed under
chapter 46.70 RCW who shall warranty service and repairs under chapter
46.70 RCW;
(7) Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair carried on
within the limits and boundaries of any site or reservation under the
legal jurisdiction of the federal government;
(8) Any person who only furnished materials, supplies, or equipment
without fabricating them into, or consuming them in the performance of,
the work of the contractor;
(9) Any work or operation on one undertaking or project by one or
more contracts, the aggregate contract price of which for labor and
materials and all other items is less than five hundred dollars, such
work or operations being considered as of a casual, minor, or
inconsequential nature. The exemption prescribed in this subsection
does not apply in any instance wherein the work or construction is only
a part of a larger or major operation, whether undertaken by the same
or a different contractor, or in which a division of the operation is
made into contracts of amounts less than five hundred dollars for the
purpose of evasion of this chapter or otherwise. The exemption
prescribed in this subsection does not apply to a person who advertises
or puts out any sign or card or other device which might indicate to
the public that he or she is a contractor, or that he or she is
qualified to engage in the business of contractor;
(10) Any construction or operation incidental to the construction
and repair of irrigation and drainage ditches of regularly constituted
irrigation districts or reclamation districts; or to farming, dairying,
agriculture, viticulture, horticulture, or stock or poultry raising; or
to clearing or other work upon land in rural districts for fire
prevention purposes; except when any of the above work is performed by
a registered contractor;
(11) An owner who contracts for a project with a registered
contractor, except that this exemption shall not deprive the owner of
the protections of this chapter against registered and unregistered
contractors. The exemption prescribed in this subsection does not
apply to a person who performs the activities of a contractor for the
purpose of leasing or selling improved property he or she has owned for
less than twelve months;
(12) Any person working on his or her own property, whether
occupied by him or her or not, and any person working on his or her
personal residence, whether owned by him or her or not but this
exemption shall not apply to any person who performs the activities of
a contractor on his or her own property for the purpose of selling,
demolishing, or leasing the property;
(13) An owner who performs maintenance, repair, and alteration work
in or upon his or her own properties, or who uses his or her own
employees to do such work;
(14) A licensed architect or civil or professional engineer acting
solely in his or her professional capacity, an electrician certified
under the laws of the state of Washington, or a plumber certified under
the laws of the state of Washington or licensed by a political
subdivision of the state of Washington while operating within the
boundaries of such political subdivision. The exemption provided in
this subsection is applicable only when the person certified is
operating within the scope of his or her certification;
(15) Any person who engages in the activities herein regulated as
an employee of a registered contractor with wages as his or her sole
compensation or as an employee with wages as his or her sole
compensation;
(16) Contractors on highway projects who have been prequalified as
required by RCW 47.28.070, with the department of transportation to
perform highway construction, reconstruction, or maintenance work;
(17) A mobile/manufactured home dealer or manufacturer who
subcontracts the installation, set-up, or repair work to actively
registered contractors. This exemption only applies to the
installation, set-up, or repair of the mobile/manufactured homes that
were manufactured or sold by the mobile/manufactured home dealer or
manufacturer;
(18) An entity who holds a valid electrical contractor's license
under chapter 19.28 RCW that employs a certified ((journeyman)) journey
level electrician, a certified residential specialty electrician, or an
electrical trainee meeting the requirements of chapter 19.28 RCW to
perform plumbing work that is incidentally, directly, and immediately
appropriate to the like-in-kind replacement of a household appliance or
other small household utilization equipment that requires limited
electric power and limited waste and/or water connections. An
electrical trainee must be supervised by a certified electrician while
performing plumbing work.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.106.010 and 2006 c 185 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory board" means the state advisory board of plumbers.
(2) "Contractor" means any person, corporate or otherwise, who
engages in, or offers or advertises to engage in, any work covered by
the provisions of this chapter by way of trade or business, or any
person, corporate or otherwise, who employs anyone, or offers or
advertises to employ anyone, to engage in any work covered by the
provisions of this chapter.
(3) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(4) "Director" means the director of department of labor and
industries.
(5) "((Journeyman)) Journey level plumber" means any person who has
been issued a certificate of competency by the department of labor and
industries as provided in this chapter.
(6) "Like-in-kind" means having similar characteristics such as
plumbing size, type, and function, and being in the same location.
(7) "Medical gas piping" means oxygen, nitrous oxide, high pressure
nitrogen, medical compressed air, and medical vacuum systems.
(8) "Medical gas piping installer" means a ((journeyman)) journey
level plumber who has been issued a medical gas piping installer
endorsement.
(9) "Plumbing" means that craft involved in installing, altering,
repairing and renovating potable water systems, liquid waste systems,
and medical gas piping systems within a building. Installation in a
water system of water softening or water treatment equipment is not
within the meaning of plumbing as used in this chapter.
(10) "Specialty plumber" means anyone who has been issued a
specialty certificate of competency limited to:
(a) Installation, maintenance, and repair of the plumbing of
single-family dwellings, duplexes, and apartment buildings that do not
exceed three stories;
(b) Maintenance and repair of backflow prevention assemblies; or
(c) A domestic water pumping system consisting of the installation,
maintenance, and repair of the pressurization, treatment, and
filtration components of a domestic water system consisting of: One or
more pumps; pressure, storage, and other tanks; filtration and
treatment equipment; if appropriate, a pitless adapter; along with
valves, transducers, and other plumbing components that:
(i) Are used to acquire, treat, store, or move water suitable for
either drinking or other domestic purposes, including irrigation, to:
(A) A single-family dwelling, duplex, or other similar place of
residence; (B) a public water system, as defined in RCW 70.119.020 and
as limited under RCW 70.119.040; or (C) a farm owned and operated by a
person whose primary residence is located within thirty miles of any
part of the farm;
(ii) Are located within the interior space, including but not
limited to an attic, basement, crawl space, or garage, of a residential
structure, which space is separated from the living area of the
residence by a lockable entrance and fixed walls, ceiling, or floor;
(iii) If located within the interior space of a residential
structure, are connected to a plumbing distribution system supplied and
installed into the interior space by either: (A) A person who,
pursuant to RCW 18.106.070 or 18.106.090, possesses a valid temporary
permit or certificate of competency as a ((journeyman)) journey level
plumber, specialty plumber, or trainee, as defined in this chapter; or
(B) a person exempt from the requirement to obtain a certified plumber
to do such plumbing work under RCW 18.106.150.

Sec. 15 RCW 18.106.020 and 2009 c 36 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may engage in or offer to engage in the trade of
plumbing without having a ((journeyman)) journey level certificate,
specialty certificate, temporary permit, or trainee certificate and
photo identification in his or her possession. The department may
establish by rule a requirement that the person also wear and visibly
display his or her certificate or permit. A trainee must be supervised
by a person who has a ((journeyman)) journey level certificate,
specialty certificate, or temporary permit, as specified in RCW
18.106.070. No contractor may employ a person to engage in or offer to
engage in the trade of plumbing unless the person employed has a
((journeyman)) journey level certificate, specialty certificate,
temporary permit, or trainee certificate. This section does not apply
to a contractor who is contracting for work on his or her own
residence. Until July 1, 2007, the department shall issue a written
warning to any specialty plumber defined by RCW 18.106.010(10)(c) not
having a valid plumber certification. The warning will state that the
individual must apply for a plumber training certificate or be
qualified for and apply for plumber certification under the
requirements in RCW 18.106.040 within thirty calendar days of the
warning. Only one warning will be issued to any individual. If the
individual fails to comply with this section, the department shall
issue a penalty or penalties as authorized by this chapter.
(2) No person may engage in or offer to engage in medical gas
piping installation without having a certificate of competency as a
((journeyman)) journey level plumber and a medical gas piping installer
endorsement and photo identification in his or her possession. The
department may establish by rule a requirement that the person also
wear and visibly display his or her endorsement. A trainee may engage
in medical gas piping installation if he or she has a training
certificate and is supervised by a person with a medical gas piping
installer endorsement. No contractor may employ a person to engage in
or offer to engage in medical gas piping installation unless the person
employed has a certificate of competency as a ((journeyman)) journey
level plumber and a medical gas piping installer endorsement.
(3) No contractor may advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or
perform any work under this chapter without being registered as a
contractor under chapter 18.27 RCW.
(4) Violation of this section is an infraction. Each day in which
a person engages in the trade of plumbing in violation of this section
or employs a person in violation of this section is a separate
infraction. Each worksite at which a person engages in the trade of
plumbing in violation of this section or at which a person is employed
in violation of this section is a separate infraction.
(5) Notices of infractions for violations of this section may be
issued to:
(a) The person engaging in or offering to engage in the trade of
plumbing in violation of this section;
(b) The contractor in violation of this section; and
(c) The contractor's employee who authorized the work assignment of
the person employed in violation of this section.

Sec. 16 RCW 18.106.030 and 2011 c 336 s 504 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person desiring to be issued a certificate of competency as
provided in this chapter shall deliver evidence in a form prescribed by
the department affirming that said person has had sufficient experience
in as well as demonstrated general competency in the trade of plumbing
or specialty plumbing so as to qualify him or her to make an
application for a certificate of competency as a ((journeyman)) journey
level plumber or specialty plumber. Completion of a course of study in
the plumbing trade in the armed services of the United States or at a
school accredited by the workforce training and education coordinating
board shall constitute sufficient evidence of experience and competency
to enable such person to make application for a certificate of
competency.
Any person desiring to be issued a medical gas piping installer
endorsement shall deliver evidence in a form prescribed by the
department affirming that the person has met the requirements
established by the department for a medical gas piping installer
endorsement.
In addition to supplying the evidence as prescribed in this
section, each applicant for a certificate of competency shall submit an
application for such certificate on such form and in such manner as
shall be prescribed by the director of the department.

Sec. 17 RCW 18.106.040 and 2006 c 185 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the application and evidence set forth in RCW
18.106.030, the director shall review the same and make a determination
as to whether the applicant is eligible to take an examination for the
certificate of competency. To be eligible to take the examination:
(a) Each applicant for a ((journeyman)) journey level plumber's
certificate of competency shall furnish written evidence that he or she
has completed a course of study in the plumbing trade in the armed
services of the United States or at a school licensed by the workforce
training and education coordinating board, or has had four or more
years of experience under the direct supervision of a licensed
((journeyman)) journey level plumber.
(b) Each applicant for a specialty plumber's certificate of
competency under RCW 18.106.010(10)(a) shall furnish written evidence
that he or she has completed a course of study in the plumbing trade in
the armed services of the United States or at a school licensed by the
workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter
28C.10 RCW, or that he or she has had at least three years practical
experience in the specialty.
(c) Each applicant for a specialty plumber's certificate of
competency under RCW 18.106.010(10) (b) or (c) shall furnish written
evidence that he or she is eligible to take the examination. These
eligibility requirements for the specialty plumbers defined by RCW
18.106.010(10)(c) shall be one year of practical experience working on
pumping systems not exceeding one hundred gallons per minute, and two
years of practical experience working on pumping systems exceeding one
hundred gallons per minute, or equivalent as determined by rule by the
department in consultation with the advisory board, and that experience
may be obtained at the same time the individual is meeting the
experience required by RCW 19.28.191. The eligibility requirements for
other specialty plumbers shall be established by rule by the director
pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(2)(a) The director shall establish reasonable rules for the
examinations to be given applicants for certificates of competency. In
establishing the rules, the director shall consult with the state
advisory board of plumbers as established in RCW 18.106.110.
(b) The director shall establish reasonable criteria by rule for
determining an applicant's eligibility to take an examination for the
certificate of competency for specialty plumbers under subsection
(1)(c) of this section. In establishing the criteria, the director
shall consult with the state advisory board of plumbers as established
in RCW 18.106.110. These rules must take effect by December 31, 2006.
(3) Upon determination that the applicant is eligible to take the
examination, the director shall so notify the applicant, indicating the
time and place for taking the same.
(4) No other requirement for eligibility may be imposed.

Sec. 18 RCW 18.106.050 and 2006 c 185 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, with the advice of the advisory board, shall
prepare a written examination to be administered to applicants for
certificates of competency for ((journeyman)) journey level plumber and
specialty plumber. The examination shall be constructed to determine:
(a) Whether the applicant possesses varied general knowledge of the
technical information and practical procedures that are identified with
the trade of ((journeyman)) journey level plumber or specialty plumber;
and
(b) Whether the applicant is familiar with the applicable plumbing
codes and the administrative rules of the department pertaining to
plumbing and plumbers.
(2) The department, with the consent of the advisory board, may
enter into a contract with a nationally recognized testing agency to
develop, administer, and score any examinations required by this
chapter. All applicants shall, before taking an examination, pay the
required examination fee. The department shall set the examination fee
by contract with a nationally recognized testing agency. The fee shall
cover but not exceed the costs of preparing and administering the
examination and the materials necessary to conduct the practical
elements of the examination. The department shall approve training
courses and set the fees for training courses for examinations provided
by this chapter.
(3) An examination to determine the competency of an applicant for
a domestic water pumping system specialty plumbing certificate as
defined by RCW 18.106.010(10)(c) must be established by the department
in consultation with the advisory board by December 31, 2006. The
department may include an examination for appropriate electrical safety
and technical requirements as required by RCW 19.28.191 with the
examination required by this section. The department, in consultation
with the advisory board, may accept the certification by a professional
or trade association or other acceptable entity as meeting the
examination requirement of this section. Individuals who can provide
evidence to the department prior to January 1, 2007, that they have
been employed in the pump and irrigation business as defined by RCW
18.106.010(10)(c) for not less than four thousand hours in the most
recent four calendar years shall be issued the appropriate certificate
by the department upon receiving such documentation and applicable
fees. The department shall establish a single document for those who
have received both the plumbing specialty certification defined by this
subsection and have also met the certification requirements for a pump
and irrigation or domestic pump specialty electrician, showing that the
individual has received both certifications.
(4) The department shall certify the results of the examinations
provided by this chapter, and shall notify the applicant in writing
whether he or she has passed or failed. Any applicant who has failed
the examination may retake the examination, upon the terms and after a
period of time that the director shall set by rule. The director may
not limit the number of times that a person may take the examination.

Sec. 19 RCW 18.106.070 and 2009 c 36 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a certificate of competency to all
applicants who have passed the examination and have paid the fee for
the certificate. The certificate may include a photograph of the
holder. The certificate shall bear the date of issuance, and shall
expire on the birthdate of the holder immediately following the date of
issuance. The certificate shall be renewable every other year, upon
application, on or before the birthdate of the holder, except for
specialty plumbers defined by RCW 18.106.010(10)(c) who also have an
electrical certification issued jointly as provided by RCW
18.106.050(3) in which case their certificate shall be renewable every
three years on or before the birthdate of the holder. The department
shall renew a certificate of competency if the applicant: (a) Pays the
renewal fee assessed by the department; and (b) during the past two
years has completed sixteen hours of continuing education approved by
the department with the advice of the advisory board, including four
hours related to electrical safety. For holders of the specialty
plumber certificate under RCW 18.106.010(10)(c), the continuing
education may comprise both electrical and plumbing education with a
minimum of twelve of the required twenty-four hours of continuing
education in plumbing. If a person fails to renew the certificate by
the renewal date, he or she must pay a doubled fee. If the person does
not renew the certificate within ninety days of the renewal date, he or
she must retake the examination and pay the examination fee.
The ((journeyman)) journey level plumber and specialty plumber
certificates of competency, the medical gas piping installer
endorsement, and the temporary permit provided for in this chapter
grant the holder the right to engage in the work of plumbing as a
((journeyman)) journey level plumber, specialty plumber, or medical gas
piping installer, in accordance with their provisions throughout the
state and within any of its political subdivisions on any job or any
employment without additional proof of competency or any other license
or permit or fee to engage in the work. This section does not preclude
employees from adhering to a union security clause in any employment
where such a requirement exists.
(2) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the plumbing construction trade or
who is learning the plumbing construction trade may work in the
plumbing construction trade if supervised by a certified ((journeyman))
journey level plumber or a certified specialty plumber in that
plumber's specialty. All apprentices and individuals learning the
plumbing construction trade shall obtain a plumbing training
certificate from the department. The certificate shall authorize the
holder to learn the plumbing construction trade while under the direct
supervision of a ((journeyman)) journey level plumber or a specialty
plumber working in his or her specialty. The certificate may include
a photograph of the holder. The holder of the plumbing training
certificate shall renew the certificate annually. At the time of
renewal, the holder shall provide the department with an accurate list
of the holder's employers in the plumbing construction industry for the
previous year and the number of hours worked for each employer. An
annual fee shall be charged for the issuance or renewal of the
certificate. The department shall set the fee by rule. The fee shall
cover but not exceed the cost of administering and enforcing the
trainee certification and supervision requirements of this chapter.
(3) Any person who has been issued a plumbing training certificate
under this chapter may work if that person is under supervision.
Supervision shall consist of a person being on the same job site and
under the control of either a ((journeyman)) journey level plumber or
an appropriate specialty plumber who has an applicable certificate of
competency issued under this chapter. Either a ((journeyman)) journey
level plumber or an appropriate specialty plumber shall be on the same
job site as the noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five
percent of each working day unless otherwise provided in this chapter.
The ratio of noncertified individuals to certified ((journeymen))
journey level or specialty plumbers working on a job site shall be:
(a) Not more than two noncertified plumbers working on any one job site
for every certified specialty plumber or ((journeyman)) journey level
plumber working as a specialty plumber; and (b) not more than one
noncertified plumber working on any one job site for every certified
((journeyman)) journey level plumber working as a ((journeyman))
journey level plumber.
An individual who has a current training certificate and who has
successfully completed or is currently enrolled in an approved
apprenticeship program or in a technical school program in the plumbing
construction trade in a school approved by the workforce training and
education coordinating board, may work without direct on-site
supervision during the last six months of meeting the practical
experience requirements of this chapter.
(4) An individual who has a current training certificate and who
has successfully completed or is currently enrolled in a medical gas
piping installer training course approved by the department may work on
medical gas piping systems if the individual is under the direct
supervision of a certified medical gas piping installer who holds a
medical gas piping installer endorsement one hundred percent of a
working day on a one-to-one ratio.
(5) The training to become a certified plumber must include not
less than sixteen hours of classroom training established by the
director with the advice of the advisory board. The classroom training
must include, but not be limited to, electrical wiring safety,
grounding, bonding, and other related items plumbers need to know to
work under RCW 19.28.091.
(6) All persons who are certified plumbers before January 1, 2003,
are deemed to have received the classroom training required in
subsection (5) of this section.

Sec. 20 RCW 18.106.075 and 1997 c 326 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall adopt requirements that qualify a
((journeyman)) journey level plumber to be issued a medical gas piping
installer endorsement.

Sec. 21 RCW 18.106.080 and 2011 c 336 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
No examination shall be required of any applicant for a certificate
of competency who, on July 16, 1973, was engaged in a bona fide
business or trade of plumbing, or on said date held a valid
((journeyman)) journey level plumber's license issued by a political
subdivision of the state of Washington and whose license is valid at
the time of making his or her application for said certificate.
Applicants qualifying under this section shall be issued a certificate
by the department upon making an application as provided in RCW
18.106.030 and paying the fee required under RCW 18.106.050: PROVIDED,
That no applicant under this section shall be required to furnish such
evidence as required by RCW 18.106.030.

Sec. 22 RCW 18.106.090 and 2009 c 36 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to grant and issue temporary permits
in lieu of certificates of competency whenever a plumber coming into
the state of Washington from another state requests the department for
a temporary permit to engage in the trade of plumbing as a
((journeyman)) journey level plumber or as a specialty plumber during
the period of time between filing of an application for a certificate
as provided in RCW 18.106.030 as now or hereafter amended and taking
the examination provided for in RCW 18.106.050. The temporary permit
may include a photograph of the plumber. No temporary permit shall be
issued to:
(1) Any person who has failed to pass the examination for a
certificate of competency;
(2) Any applicant under this section who has not furnished the
department with such evidence required under RCW 18.106.030;
(3) ((To)) Any (([Any])) apprentice plumber.

Sec. 23 RCW 18.106.100 and 2011 c 301 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may revoke or suspend a certificate of
competency for any of the following reasons:
(a) The certificate was obtained through error or fraud;
(b) The certificate holder is judged to be incompetent to carry on
the trade of plumbing as a ((journeyman)) journey level plumber or
specialty plumber;
(c) The certificate holder has violated any provision of this
chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter.
(2) Before a certificate of competency is revoked or suspended, the
department shall send written notice using a method by which the
mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the
certificate holder's last known address. The notice must list the
allegations against the certificate holder and give him or her the
opportunity to request a hearing before the advisory board. At the
hearing, the department and the certificate holder have opportunity to
produce witnesses and give testimony. The hearing must be conducted in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall render its decision
based upon the testimony and evidence presented and shall notify the
parties immediately upon reaching its decision. A majority of the
board is necessary to render a decision.
(3) The department may deny renewal of a certificate of competency
issued under this chapter if the applicant owes outstanding penalties
for a final judgment under this chapter. The department shall notify
the applicant of the denial using a method by which the mailing can be
tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the address on the
application. The applicant may appeal the denial within twenty days by
filing a notice of appeal with the department accompanied by a
certified check for two hundred dollars which shall be returned to the
applicant if the decision of the department is not upheld by the
hearings officer. The office of administrative hearings shall conduct
the hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW. If the hearings officer sustains
the decision of the department, the two hundred dollars must be applied
to the cost of the hearing.

Sec. 24 RCW 18.106.110 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 21 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is created a state advisory board of plumbers, to be
composed of seven members appointed by the director. Two members shall
be ((journeyman)) journey level plumbers, one member shall be a
specialty plumber, three members shall be persons conducting a plumbing
business, at least one of which shall be primarily engaged in a
specialty plumbing business, and one member from the general public who
is familiar with the business and trade of plumbing.
(2) The term of one ((journeyman)) journey level plumber expires
July 1, 1995; the term of the second ((journeyman)) journey level
plumber expires July 1, 2000; the term of the specialty plumber expires
July 1, 2008; the term of one person conducting a plumbing business
expires July 1, 1996; the term of the second person conducting a
plumbing business expires July 1, 2000; the term of the third person
conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 2007; and the term of
the public member expires July 1, 1997. Thereafter, upon the
expiration of said terms, the director shall appoint a new member to
serve for a period of three years. However, to ensure that the board
can continue to act, a member whose term expires shall continue to
serve until his or her replacement is appointed. In the case of any
vacancy on the board for any reason, the director shall appoint a new
member to serve out the term of the person whose position has become
vacant.
(3) The advisory board shall carry out all the functions and duties
enumerated in this chapter, as well as generally advise the department
on all matters relative to this chapter.
(4) Each member of the advisory board shall receive travel expenses
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now
existing or hereafter amended for each day in which such member is
actually engaged in attendance upon the meetings of the advisory board.

Sec. 25 RCW 18.106.150 and 2003 c 399 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require that a
person obtain a license or a certified plumber in order to do plumbing
work at his or her residence or farm or place of business or on other
property owned by him or her.
(2) A current certificate of competency or apprentice permit is not
required for:
(a) Persons performing plumbing work on a farm; or
(b) Certified ((journeyman)) journey level electricians, certified
residential specialty electricians, or electrical trainees working for
an electrical contractor and performing exempt work under RCW
18.27.090(18).
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be intended to derogate from or
dispense with the requirements of any valid plumbing code enacted by a
political subdivision of the state, except that no code shall require
the holder of a certificate of competency to demonstrate any additional
proof of competency or obtain any other license or pay any fee in order
to engage in the trade of plumbing.
(4) This chapter shall not apply to common carriers subject to Part
I of the Interstate Commerce Act, nor to their officers and employees.
(5) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to any
farm, business, industrial plant, or corporation doing plumbing work on
premises it owns or operates.
(6) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict the
right of any householder to assist or receive assistance from a friend,
neighbor, relative, or other person when none of the individuals doing
such plumbing hold themselves out as engaged in the trade or business
of plumbing.

Sec. 26 RCW 18.106.155 and 1977 ex.s. c 149 s 11 are each amended
to read as follows:
The director may, upon payment of the appropriate fees, grant a
certificate of competency without examination to any applicant who is
a registered ((journeyman)) journey level plumber or specialty plumber
in any other state whose requirements for registration are at least
substantially equivalent to the requirements of this state, and which
extends the same privileges of reciprocity to ((journeymen)) journey
level plumbers or specialty plumbers registered in this state.

Sec. 27 RCW 19.28.006 and 2003 c 399 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter.
(1) "Administrator" means a person designated by an electrical
contractor to supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance
with the rules adopted under this chapter.
(2) "Basic electrical work" means the work classified in (a) and
(b) of this subsection as class A and class B basic electrical work:
(a) "Class A basic electrical work" means the like-in-kind
replacement of a: Contactor, relay, timer, starter, circuit board, or
similar control component; household appliance; circuit breaker; fuse;
residential luminaire; lamp; snap switch; dimmer; receptacle outlet;
thermostat; heating element; luminaire ballast with an exact same
ballast; ten horsepower or smaller motor; or wiring, appliances,
devices, or equipment as specified by rule.
(b) "Class B basic electrical work" means work other than class A
basic electrical work that requires minimal electrical circuit
modifications and has limited exposure hazards. Class B basic
electrical work includes the following:
(i) Extension of not more than one branch electrical circuit
limited to one hundred twenty volts and twenty amps each where:
(A) No cover inspection is necessary; and
(B) The extension does not supply more than two outlets;
(ii) Like-in-kind replacement of a single luminaire not exceeding
two hundred seventy-seven volts and twenty amps;
(iii) Like-in-kind replacement of a motor larger than ten
horsepower;
(iv) The following low voltage systems:
(A) Repair and replacement of devices not exceeding one hundred
volt-amperes in Class 2, Class 3, or power limited low voltage systems
in one and two-family dwellings;
(B) Repair and replacement of the following devices not exceeding
one hundred volt-amperes in Class 2, Class 3, or power limited low
voltage systems in other buildings, provided the equipment is not for
fire alarm or nurse call systems and is not located in an area
classified as hazardous by the national electrical code; or
(v) Wiring, appliances, devices, or equipment as specified by rule.
(3) "Board" means the electrical board under RCW 19.28.311.
(4) "Chapter" or "subchapter" means the subchapter, if no chapter
number is referenced.
(5) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(6) "Director" means the director of the department or the
director's designee.
(7) "Electrical construction trade" includes, but is not limited
to, installing or maintaining electrical wires and equipment that are
used for light, heat, or power and installing and maintaining remote
control, signaling, power limited, or communication circuits or
systems.
(8) "Electrical contractor" means a person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity that offers to undertake, undertakes,
submits a bid for, or does the work of installing or maintaining wires
or equipment that convey electrical current.
(9) "Equipment" means any equipment or apparatus that directly
uses, conducts, insulates, or is operated by electricity but does not
mean: Plug-in appliances; or plug-in equipment as determined by the
department by rule.
(10) "Industrial control panel" means a factory-wired or user-wired
assembly of industrial control equipment such as motor controllers,
switches, relays, power supplies, computers, cathode ray tubes,
transducers, and auxiliary devices. The panel may include disconnect
means and motor branch circuit protective devices.
(11) "((Journeyman)) Journey level electrician" means a person who
has been issued a ((journeyman)) journey level electrician certificate
of competency by the department.
(12) "Like-in-kind" means having similar characteristics such as
voltage requirements, current draw, and function, and being in the same
location.
(13) "Master electrician" means either a master ((journeyman))
journey level electrician or master specialty electrician.
(14) "Master ((journeyman)) journey level electrician" means a
person who has been issued a master ((journeyman)) journey level
electrician certificate of competency by the department and who may be
designated by an electrical contractor to supervise electrical work and
electricians in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.
(15) "Master specialty electrician" means a person who has been
issued a specialty electrician certificate of competency by the
department and who may be designated by an electrical contractor to
supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with rules
adopted under this chapter.
(16) "Specialty electrician" means a person who has been issued a
specialty electrician certificate of competency by the department.

Sec. 28 RCW 19.28.041 and 2006 c 224 s 1 and 2006 c 185 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation,
or other entity to advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, engage
in, conduct, or carry on the business of installing or maintaining
wires or equipment to convey electric current, or installing or
maintaining equipment to be operated by electric current as it pertains
to the electrical industry, without having an unrevoked, unsuspended,
and unexpired electrical contractor license, issued by the department
in accordance with this chapter. All electrical contractor licenses
expire twenty-four calendar months following the day of their issue.
The department may issue an electrical contractor((s)) license for a
period of less than twenty-four months only for the purpose of
equalizing the number of electrical contractor licenses that expire
each month. Application for an electrical contractor license shall be
made in writing to the department, accompanied by the required fee.
The application shall state:
(a) The name and address of the applicant; in case of firms or
partnerships, the names of the individuals composing the firm or
partnership; in case of corporations, the names of the managing
officials thereof;
(b) The location of the place of business of the applicant and the
name under which the business is conducted;
(c) Employer social security number;
(d) Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's
employees working in Washington, as follows:
(i) The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by
the department;
(ii) The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department;
or
(iii) For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada
subject to an agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as
permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of coverage issued by
the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the
applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant
has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or
province's workers' compensation law;
(e) Employment security department number;
(f) State excise tax registration number;
(g) Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be
substituted for the information required by (d) of this subsection if
the applicant will not employ employees in Washington, and by (e) and
(f) of this subsection; and
(h) Whether a general or specialty electrical contractor license is
sought and, if the latter, the type of specialty. Electrical
contractor specialties include, but are not limited to: Residential,
pump and irrigation, limited energy system, signs, nonresidential
maintenance, restricted nonresidential maintenance, appliance repair,
and a combination specialty. A general electrical contractor license
shall grant to the holder the right to engage in, conduct, or carry on
the business of installing or maintaining wires or equipment to carry
electric current, and installing or maintaining equipment, or
installing or maintaining material to fasten or insulate such wires or
equipment to be operated by electric current, in the state of
Washington. A specialty electrical contractor license shall grant to
the holder a limited right to engage in, conduct, or carry on the
business of installing or maintaining wires or equipment to carry
electrical current, and installing or maintaining equipment; or
installing or maintaining material to fasten or insulate such wires or
equipment to be operated by electric current in the state of Washington
as expressly allowed by the license.
(2) The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage
information provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(d) of this
section, including but not limited to information regarding the
coverage of an individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is
provided under the laws of another state, the department may notify the
other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.
(3) The application for an electrical contractor license shall be
accompanied by a bond in the sum of four thousand dollars with the
state of Washington named as obligee in the bond, with good and
sufficient surety, to be approved by the department. The bond shall at
all times be kept in full force and effect, and any cancellation or
revocation thereof, or withdrawal of the surety therefrom, suspends the
license issued to the principal until a new bond has been filed and
approved as provided in this section. Upon approval of a bond, the
department shall on the next business day deposit the fee accompanying
the application in the electrical license fund and shall file the bond
in the office. The department shall upon request furnish to any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity a certified
copy of the bond upon the payment of a fee that the department shall
set by rule. The fee shall cover but not exceed the cost of furnishing
the certified copy. The bond shall be conditioned that in any
installation or maintenance of wires or equipment to convey electrical
current, and equipment to be operated by electrical current, the
principal will comply with the provisions of this chapter and with any
electrical ordinance, building code, or regulation of a city or town
adopted pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3) that is in effect at the time of
entering into a contract. The bond shall be conditioned further that
the principal will pay for all labor, including employee benefits, and
material furnished or used upon the work, taxes and contributions to
the state of Washington, and all damages that may be sustained by any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity due to a
failure of the principal to make the installation or maintenance in
accordance with this chapter or any applicable ordinance, building
code, or regulation of a city or town adopted pursuant to RCW
19.28.010(3). In lieu of the surety bond required by this section, the
license applicant may file with the department a cash deposit or other
negotiable security acceptable to the department. If the license
applicant has filed a cash deposit, the department shall deposit the
funds in a special trust savings account in a commercial bank, mutual
savings bank, or savings and loan association and shall pay annually to
the depositor the interest derived from the account.
(4) The department shall issue general or specialty electrical
contractor licenses to applicants meeting all of the requirements of
this chapter. The provisions of this chapter relating to the licensing
of any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
including the requirement of a bond with the state of Washington named
as obligee therein and the collection of a fee therefor, are exclusive,
and no political subdivision of the state of Washington may require or
issue any licenses or bonds or charge any fee for the same or a similar
purpose. No person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
holding more than one specialty contractor license under this chapter
may be required to pay an annual fee for more than one such license or
to post more than one four thousand dollar bond, equivalent cash
deposit, or other negotiable security.
(5) To obtain a general or specialty electrical contractor license,
the applicant must designate an individual who currently possesses a
valid master ((journeyman)) journey level electrician's certificate of
competency, master specialty electrician's certificate of competency in
the specialty for which application has been made, or administrator's
certificate as a general electrical contractor administrator or as a
specialty electrical contractor administrator in the specialty for
which application has been made.
(6) Administrator certificate specialties include, but are not
limited to: Residential, pump and irrigation or domestic pump, limited
energy system, signs, nonresidential maintenance, restricted
nonresidential maintenance, appliance repair, and combination
specialty. To obtain an administrator's certificate, an individual
must pass an examination as set forth in RCW 19.28.051 unless the
applicant was a licensed electrical contractor at any time during 1974.
Applicants who were electrical contractors licensed by the state of
Washington at any time during 1974 are entitled to receive a general
electrical contractor administrator's certificate without examination
if the applicants apply prior to January 1, 1984. The board of
electrical examiners shall certify to the department the names of all
persons who are entitled to either a general or specialty electrical
contractor administrator's certificate.
(7) For a contractor doing domestic water pumping system work as
defined by RCW 18.106.010(10)(c), the department shall consider the
requirements of subsections (1)(a) through (h), (2), and (3) of this
section to have been met to be a pump and irrigation or domestic pump
licensed electrical contractor if the contractor has met the contractor
registration requirements of chapter 18.27 RCW. The department shall
establish a single registration/licensing document for those who
qualify for both general contractor registration as defined in chapter
18.27 RCW and a pump and irrigation or domestic pump electrical
contractor license as defined by this chapter.

Sec. 29 RCW 19.28.161 and 2010 c 33 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may engage in the electrical construction trade
without having a valid master ((journeyman)) journey level electrician
certificate of competency, ((journeyman)) journey level electrician
certificate of competency, master specialty electrician certificate of
competency, or specialty electrician certificate of competency issued
by the department in accordance with this chapter. Electrician
certificate of competency specialties include, but are not limited to:
Residential, pump and irrigation, limited energy system, signs,
nonresidential maintenance, restricted nonresidential maintenance, and
appliance repair. Until July 1, 2007, the department of labor and
industries shall issue a written warning to any specialty pump and
irrigation or domestic pump electrician not having a valid electrician
certification. The warning will state that the individual must apply
for an electrical training certificate or be qualified for and apply
for electrician certification under the requirements in RCW
19.28.191(1)(g) within thirty calendar days of the warning. Only one
warning will be issued to any individual. If the individual fails to
comply with this section, the department shall issue a penalty as
defined in RCW 19.28.271 to the individual.
(2) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the electrical construction trade
or who is learning the electrical construction trade may work in the
electrical construction trade if supervised by a certified master
((journeyman)) journey level electrician, ((journeyman)) journey level
electrician, master specialty electrician in that electrician's
specialty, or specialty electrician in that electrician's specialty.
All apprentices and individuals learning the electrical construction
trade shall obtain an electrical training certificate from the
department. The certificate shall authorize the holder to learn the
electrical construction trade while under the direct supervision of a
master ((journeyman)) journey level electrician, ((journeyman)) journey
level electrician, master specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty. The certificate may include a photograph of
the holder. The holder of the electrical training certificate shall
renew the certificate biennially. At the time of renewal, the holder
shall provide the department with an accurate list of the holder's
employers in the electrical construction industry for the previous
biennial period and the number of hours worked for each employer. The
holder shall also provide proof of sixteen hours of: Approved
classroom training covering this chapter, the national electrical code,
or electrical theory; or equivalent classroom training taken as part of
an approved apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04 RCW or an
approved electrical training program under RCW 19.28.191(1)(h). The
number of hours of approved classroom training required for certificate
renewal shall increase as follows: (a) Beginning on July 1, 2011, the
holder of an electrical training certificate shall provide the
department with proof of thirty-two hours of approved classroom
training; and (b) beginning on July 1, 2013, the holder of an
electrical training certificate shall provide the department with proof
of forty-eight hours of approved classroom training. At the request of
the chairs of the house of representatives commerce and labor committee
and the senate labor, commerce and consumer protection committee, or
their successor committees, the department of labor and industries
shall provide information on the implementation of the new classroom
training requirements for electrical trainees to both committees by
December 1, 2012. A biennial fee shall be charged for the issuance or
renewal of the certificate. The department shall set the fee by rule.
The fee shall cover but not exceed the cost of administering and
enforcing the trainee certification and supervision requirements of
this chapter. Apprentices and individuals learning the electrical
construction trade shall have their electrical training certificates in
their possession at all times that they are performing electrical work.
They shall show their certificates to an authorized representative of
the department at the representative's request.
(3) Any person who has been issued an electrical training
certificate under this chapter may work if that person is under
supervision. Supervision shall consist of a person being on the same
job site and under the control of either a certified master
((journeyman)) journey level electrician, ((journeyman)) journey level
electrician, master specialty electrician working in that electrician's
specialty, or specialty electrician working in that electrician's
specialty. Either a certified master ((journeyman)) journey level
electrician, ((journeyman)) journey level electrician, master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty shall be on the
same job site as the noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each working day unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(4) The ratio of noncertified individuals to certified master
((journeymen)) journey level electricians, ((journeymen)) journey level
electricians, master specialty electricians, or specialty electricians
on any one job site is as follows:
(a) When working as a specialty electrician, not more than two
noncertified individuals for every certified master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, master
((journeyman)) journey level electrician, or ((journeyman)) journey
level electrician, except that the ratio requirements are one certified
master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty,
specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, master
((journeyman)) journey level electrician, or ((journeyman)) journey
level electrician working as a specialty electrician to no more than
four students enrolled in and working as part of an electrical
construction program at public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally accredited trade or technical schools licensed by
the workforce training and education coordinating board under chapter
28C.10 RCW. In meeting the ratio requirements for students enrolled in
an electrical construction program at a trade school, a trade school
may receive input and advice from the electrical board; and
(b) When working as a ((journeyman)) journey level electrician, not
more than one noncertified individual for every certified master
((journeyman)) journey level electrician or ((journeyman)) journey
level electrician, except that the ratio requirements shall be one
certified master ((journeyman)) journey level electrician or
((journeyman)) journey level electrician to no more than four students
enrolled in and working as part of an electrical construction program
at public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally
accredited trade or technical schools licensed by the workforce
training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW. In
meeting the ratio requirements for students enrolled in an electrical
construction program at a trade school, a trade school may receive
input and advice from the electrical board.
An individual who has a current training certificate and who has
successfully completed or is currently enrolled in an approved
apprenticeship program or in an electrical construction program at
public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally
accredited technical or trade schools licensed by the workforce
training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, may
work without direct on-site supervision during the last six months of
meeting the practical experience requirements of this chapter.
(5) For the residential (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(a)),
pump and irrigation (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(b)), sign (as
specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(d)), limited energy (as specified in
WAC 296-46B-920(2)(e)), nonresidential maintenance (as specified in WAC
296-46B-920(2)(g)), restricted nonresidential maintenance as determined
by the department in rule, or other new nonresidential specialties, not
including appliance repair, as determined by the department in rule,
either a master ((journeyman)) journey level electrician,
((journeyman)) journey level electrician, master specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty must be on the same job site as
the noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of
each working day. Other specialties must meet the requirements
specified in RCW 19.28.191(1)(g)(ii). When the ratio of certified
electricians to noncertified individuals on a job site is one certified
electrician to three or four noncertified individuals, the certified
electrician must:
(a) Directly supervise and instruct the noncertified individuals
and the certified electrician may not directly make or engage in an
electrical installation; and
(b) Be on the same job site as the noncertified individual for a
minimum of one hundred percent of each working day.
(6) The electrical contractor shall accurately verify and attest to
the electrical trainee hours worked by electrical trainees on behalf of
the electrical contractor.

Sec. 30 RCW 19.28.191 and 2006 c 185 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the application, the department shall review
the application and determine whether the applicant is eligible to take
an examination for the master ((journeyman)) journey level electrician,
((journeyman)) journey level electrician, master specialty electrician,
or specialty electrician certificate of competency.
(a) Before July 1, 2005, an applicant who possesses a valid
((journeyman)) journey level electrician certificate of competency in
effect for the previous four years and a valid general administrator's
certificate may apply for a master ((journeyman)) journey level
electrician certificate of competency without examination.
(b) Before July 1, 2005, an applicant who possesses a valid
specialty electrician certificate of competency, in the specialty
applied for, for the previous two years and a valid specialty
administrator's certificate, in the specialty applied for, may apply
for a master specialty electrician certificate of competency without
examination.
(c) Before December 1, 2003, the following persons may obtain an
equipment repair specialty electrician certificate of competency
without examination:
(i) A person who has successfully completed an apprenticeship
program approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the machinist trade; and
(ii) A person who provides evidence in a form prescribed by the
department affirming that: (A) He or she was employed as of April 1,
2003, by a factory-authorized equipment dealer or service company; and
(B) he or she has worked in equipment repair for a minimum of four
thousand hours.
(d) To be eligible to take the examination for a master
((journeyman)) journey level electrician certificate of competency, the
applicant must have possessed a valid ((journeyman)) journey level
electrician certificate of competency for four years.
(e) To be eligible to take the examination for a master specialty
electrician certificate of competency, the applicant must have
possessed a valid specialty electrician certificate of competency, in
the specialty applied for, for two years.
(f) To be eligible to take the examination for a ((journeyman))
journey level certificate of competency, the applicant must have:
(i) Worked in the electrical construction trade for a minimum of
eight thousand hours, of which four thousand hours shall be in
industrial or commercial electrical installation under the supervision
of a master ((journeyman)) journey level electrician or ((journeyman))
journey level electrician and not more than a total of four thousand
hours in all specialties under the supervision of a master
((journeyman)) journey level electrician, ((journeyman)) journey level
electrician, master specialty electrician working in that electrician's
specialty, or specialty electrician working in that electrician's
specialty. Specialty electricians with less than a four thousand hour
work experience requirement cannot credit the time required to obtain
that specialty towards qualifying to become a ((journeyman)) journey
level electrician; or
(ii) Successfully completed an apprenticeship program approved
under chapter 49.04 RCW for the electrical construction trade.
(g) To be eligible to take the examination for a specialty
electrician certificate of competency, the applicant must have:
(i) Worked in the residential (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(a)), pump and irrigation (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(b)), sign (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(d)), limited
energy (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(e)), nonresidential
maintenance (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(g)), or other new
nonresidential specialties as determined by the department in rule
under the supervision of a master ((journeyman)) journey level
electrician, ((journeyman)) journey level electrician, master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty for a minimum of
four thousand hours;
(ii) Worked in the appliance repair specialty as determined by the
department in rule, restricted nonresidential maintenance as determined
by the department in rule, the equipment repair specialty as determined
by the department in rule, the pump and irrigation specialty other than
as defined by (g)(i) of this subsection or domestic pump specialty as
determined by the department in rule, or a specialty other than the
designated specialties in (g)(i) of this subsection for a minimum of
the initial ninety days, or longer if set by rule by the department.
The restricted nonresidential maintenance specialty is limited to a
maximum of 277 volts and 20 amperes for lighting branch circuits and/or
a maximum of 250 volts and 60 amperes for other circuits, but excludes
the replacement or repair of circuit breakers. The initial period must
be spent under one hundred percent supervision of a master
((journeyman)) journey level electrician, ((journeyman)) journey level
electrician, master specialty electrician working in that electrician's
specialty, or specialty electrician working in that electrician's
specialty. After this initial period, a person may take the specialty
examination. If the person passes the examination, the person may work
unsupervised for the balance of the minimum hours required for
certification. A person may not be certified as a specialty
electrician in the appliance repair specialty or in a specialty other
than the designated specialities in (g)(i) of this subsection, however,
until the person has worked a minimum of two thousand hours in that
specialty, or longer if set by rule by the department;
(iii) Successfully completed an approved apprenticeship program
under chapter 49.04 RCW for the applicant's specialty in the electrical
construction trade; or
(iv) In meeting the training requirements for the pump and
irrigation or domestic pump specialties, the individual shall be
allowed to obtain the experience required by this section at the same
time the individual is meeting the experience required by RCW
18.106.040(1)(c). After meeting the training requirements provided in
this section, the individual may take the examination and upon passing
the examination, meeting additional training requirements as may still
be required for those seeking a pump and irrigation, or a domestic pump
specialty certificate as defined by rule, and paying the applicable
fees, the individual must be issued the appropriate certificate. The
department may include an examination for specialty plumbing
certificate defined in RCW 18.106.010(10)(c) with the examination
required by this section. The department, by rule and in consultation
with the electrical board, may establish additional equivalent ways to
gain the experience requirements required by this subsection.
Individuals who are able to provide evidence to the department, prior
to January 1, 2007, that they have been employed as a pump installer in
the pump and irrigation or domestic pump business by an appropriately
licensed electrical contractor, registered general contractor defined
by chapter 18.27 RCW, or appropriate general specialty contractor
defined by chapter 18.27 RCW for not less than eight thousand hours in
the most recent six calendar years shall be issued the appropriate
certificate by the department upon receiving such documentation and
applicable fees. The department shall establish a single document for
those who have received both an electrical specialty certification as
defined by this subsection and have also met the certification
requirements for the specialty plumber as defined by RCW
18.106.010(10)(c), showing that the individual has received both
certifications. No other experience or training requirements may be
imposed.
(h) Any applicant for a ((journeyman)) journey level electrician
certificate of competency who has successfully completed a two-year
program in the electrical construction trade at public community or
technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally accredited technical
or trade schools licensed by the workforce training and education
coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, may substitute up to two
years of the technical or trade school program for two years of work
experience under a master ((journeyman)) journey level electrician or
((journeyman)) journey level electrician. The applicant shall obtain
the additional two years of work experience required in industrial or
commercial electrical installation prior to the beginning, or after the
completion, of the technical school program. Any applicant who has
received training in the electrical construction trade in the armed
service of the United States may be eligible to apply armed service
work experience towards qualification to take the examination for the
((journeyman))journey level electrician certificate of competency.
(i) An applicant for a specialty electrician certificate of
competency who, after January 1, 2000, has successfully completed a
two-year program in the electrical construction trade at a public
community or technical college, or a not-for-profit nationally
accredited technical or trade school licensed by the workforce training
and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, may
substitute up to one year of the technical or trade school program for
one year of work experience under a master ((journeyman)) journey level
electrician, ((journeyman)) journey level electrician, master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty. Any applicant who
has received training in the electrical construction trade in the armed
services of the United States may be eligible to apply armed service
work experience towards qualification to take the examination for an
appropriate specialty electrician certificate of competency.
(j) The department must determine whether hours of training and
experience in the armed services or school program are in the
electrical construction trade and appropriate as a substitute for hours
of work experience. The department must use the following criteria for
evaluating the equivalence of classroom electrical training programs
and work in the electrical construction trade:
(i) A two-year electrical training program must consist of three
thousand or more hours.
(ii) In a two-year electrical training program, a minimum of two
thousand four hundred hours of student/instructor contact time must be
technical electrical instruction directly related to the scope of work
of the electrical specialty. Student/instructor contact time includes
lecture and in-school lab.
(iii) The department may not allow credit for a program that
accepts more than one thousand hours transferred from another school's
program.
(iv) Electrical specialty training school programs of less than two
years will have all of the above student/instructor contact time hours
proportionately reduced. Such programs may not apply to more than
fifty percent of the work experience required to attain certification.
(v) Electrical training programs of less than two years may not be
credited towards qualification for ((journeyman)) journey level
electrician unless the training program is used to gain qualification
for a four thousand hour electrical specialty.
(k) No other requirement for eligibility may be imposed.
(2) The department shall establish reasonable rules for the
examinations to be given applicants for certificates of competency. In
establishing the rules, the department shall consult with the board.
Upon determination that the applicant is eligible to take the
examination, the department shall so notify the applicant, indicating
the time and place for taking the examination.
(3) No noncertified individual may work unsupervised more than one
year beyond the date when the trainee would be eligible to test for a
certificate of competency if working on a full-time basis after
original application for the trainee certificate. For the purposes of
this section, "full-time basis" means two thousand hours.

Sec. 31 RCW 19.28.201 and 2002 c 249 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department, in coordination with the board, shall prepare an
examination to be administered to applicants for master ((journeyman))
journey level electrician, ((journeyman)) journey level electrician,
master specialty electrician, and specialty electrician certificates of
competency.
The department, with the consent of the board, may enter into a
contract with a professional testing agency to develop, administer, and
score electrician certification examinations. The department may set
the examination fee by contract with the professional testing agency.
The department must, at least four times annually, administer the
examination to persons eligible to take it under RCW 19.28.191. The
fee must cover, but not exceed, the costs of preparing and
administering the examination.
The department must certify the results of the examination upon the
terms and after such a period of time as the department, in cooperation
with the board, deems necessary and proper.
(1)(a) The master electrician's certificates of competency
examinations must include questions from the following categories to
ensure proper safety and protection for the general public: (i)
Safety; (ii) the state electrical code; and (iii) electrical theory.
(b) A person may take the master electrician examination as many
times as necessary without limit. All applicants must, before taking
the examination, pay the required examination fee to the agency
administering the examination.
(2) The ((journeyman)) journey level electrician and specialty
electrician examinations shall be constructed to determine:
(a) Whether the applicant possesses varied general knowledge of the
technical information and practical procedures that are identified with
the status of ((journeyman)) journey level electrician or specialty
electrician; and
(b) Whether the applicant is sufficiently familiar with the
applicable electrical codes and the rules of the department pertaining
to electrical installations and electricians.
A person may take the examination as many times as necessary
without limit. All applicants must, before taking the examination, pay
the required examination fee to the agency administering the
examination.

Sec. 32 RCW 19.28.205 and 2012 c 32 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant for a ((journeyman)) journey level certificate of
competency under RCW 19.28.191(1)(f) or a specialty electrician
certificate of competency under RCW 19.28.191(1)(g) must demonstrate to
the satisfaction of the department completion of in-class education as
follows:
(a) Twenty-four hours of in-class education if two thousand hours
or more but less than four thousand hours of work are required for the
certificate;
(b) Forty-eight hours of in-class education if four thousand or
more but less than six thousand hours of work are required for the
certificate;
(c) Seventy-two hours of in-class education if six thousand or more
but less than eight thousand hours of work are required for the
certificate;
(d) Ninety-six hours of in-class education if eight thousand or
more hours of work are required for the certificate.
(2) For purposes of this section, "in-class education" means
approved classroom training covering this chapter, the national
electric code, or electrical theory; or equivalent classroom training
taken as part of an approved apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04
RCW or an approved electrical training program under RCW
19.28.191(1)(h).
(3) Classroom training taken to qualify for trainee certificate
renewal under RCW 19.28.161 qualifies as in-class education under this
section.

Sec. 33 RCW 19.28.211 and 2012 c 32 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a certificate of competency to all
applicants who have passed the examination provided in RCW 19.28.201,
met the in-class education requirements of RCW 19.28.205 if applicable,
and who have complied with RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 and the
rules adopted under this chapter. The certificate may include a
photograph of the holder. The certificate shall bear the date of
issuance, and shall expire on the holder's birthday. The certificate
shall be renewed every three years, upon application, on or before the
holder's birthdate. A fee shall be assessed for each certificate and
for each annual renewal.
(2) If the certificate holder demonstrates to the department that
he or she has satisfactorily completed an annual eight-hour continuing
education course, the certificate may be renewed without examination by
appropriate application unless the certificate has been revoked,
suspended, or not renewed within ninety days after the expiration date.
For pump and irrigation or domestic pump specialty electricians, the
continuing education course may combine both electrical and plumbing
education provided that there is a minimum of four hours of electrical
training in the course.
(a) The contents and requirements for satisfactory completion of
the continuing education course shall be determined by the director and
approved by the board.
(b) The department shall accept proof of a certificate holder's
satisfactory completion of a continuing education course offered in
another state as meeting the requirements for maintaining a current
Washington state certificate of competency if the department is
satisfied the course is comparable in nature to that required in
Washington state for maintaining a current certificate of competency.
(3) If the certificate is not renewed before the expiration date,
the individual shall pay twice the usual fee. The department shall set
the fees by rule for issuance and renewal of a certificate of
competency. The fees shall cover but not exceed the costs of issuing
the certificates and of administering and enforcing the electrician
certification requirements of this chapter.
(4) The certificates of competency and temporary permits provided
for in this chapter grant the holder the right to work in the
electrical construction trade as a master electrician, ((journeyman))
journey level electrician, or specialty electrician in accordance with
their provisions throughout the state and within any of its political
subdivisions without additional proof of competency or any other
license, permit, or fee to engage in such work.

Sec. 34 RCW 19.28.221 and 2001 c 211 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
No examination shall be required of any applicant for a certificate
of competency who, on July 16, 1973, was engaged in a bona fide
business or trade as a ((journeyman)) journey level electrician in the
state of Washington. Applicants qualifying under this section shall be
issued a certificate by the department upon making an application as
provided in RCW 19.28.181 and paying the fee required under RCW
19.28.201: PROVIDED, That no applicant under this section shall be
required to furnish such evidence as required by RCW 19.28.181.

Sec. 35 RCW 19.28.231 and 2009 c 36 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to grant and issue temporary permits
in lieu of certificates of competency whenever an electrician coming
into the state of Washington from another state requests the department
for a temporary permit to engage in the electrical construction trade
as an electrician during the period of time between filing of an
application for a certificate as provided in RCW 19.28.181 and the date
the results of taking the examination provided for in RCW 19.28.201 are
furnished to the applicant. The temporary permit may include a
photograph of the holder. The department is authorized to enter into
reciprocal agreements with other states providing for the acceptance of
such states' ((journeyman)) journey level and specialty electrician
certificate of competency or its equivalent when such states
requirements are equal to the standards set by this chapter. No
temporary permit shall be issued to:
(1) Any person who has failed to pass the examination for a
certificate of competency, except that any person who has failed the
examination for competency under this section shall be entitled to
continue to work under a temporary permit for ninety days if the person
is enrolled in a ((journeyman)) journey level electrician refresher
course and shows evidence to the department that he or she has not
missed any classes. The person, after completing the ((journeyman))
journey level electrician refresher course, shall be eligible to retake
the examination for competency at the next scheduled time.
(2) Any applicant under this section who has not furnished the
department with such evidence required under RCW 19.28.181.
(3) ((To)) Any (([Any])) apprentice electrician.

Sec. 36 RCW 19.28.241 and 2002 c 249 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may revoke any certificate of competency upon
the following grounds:
(a) The certificate was obtained through error or fraud;
(b) The holder thereof is judged to be incompetent to work in the
electrical construction trade as a ((journeyman)) journey level
electrician or specialty electrician;
(c) The holder thereof has violated any of the provisions of RCW
19.28.161 through 19.28.271 or any rule adopted under this chapter; or
(d) The holder thereof has committed a serious violation of this
chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter. A serious violation is
a violation that presents imminent danger to the public.
(2) The department may deny an application for a certificate of
competency for up to two years if the applicant's previous certificate
of competency has been revoked.
(3) Before any certificate of competency shall be revoked, the
holder shall be given written notice of the department's intention to
do so, mailed by registered mail, return receipt requested, to the
holder's last known address. The notice shall enumerate the
allegations against the holder, and shall give the holder the
opportunity to request a hearing before the board. At the hearing, the
department and the holder may produce witnesses and give testimony.
The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
The board shall render its decision based upon the testimony and
evidence presented, and shall notify the parties immediately upon
reaching its decision. A majority of the board shall be necessary to
render a decision.
(4) The department shall immediately suspend the license or
certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW
74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person
who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the
suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic
upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department of
social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance
with the order.

Sec. 37 RCW 19.28.261 and 2007 c 218 s 83 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed
to require that a person obtain a license or a certified electrician in
order to do electrical work at his or her residence or farm or place of
business or on other property owned by him or her unless the electrical
work is on the construction of a new building intended for rent, sale,
or lease. However, if the construction is of a new residential
building with up to four units intended for rent, sale, or lease, the
owner may receive an exemption from the requirement to obtain a license
or use a certified electrician if he or she provides a signed affidavit
to the department stating that he or she will be performing the work
and will occupy one of the units as his or her principal residence.
The owner shall apply to the department for this exemption and may only
receive an exemption once every twenty-four months. It is intended
that the owner receiving this exemption shall occupy the unit as his or
her principal residence for twenty-four months after completion of the
units.
(2) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be intended to
derogate from or dispense with the requirements of any valid electrical
code enacted by a city or town pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3), except
that no code shall require the holder of a certificate of competency to
demonstrate any additional proof of competency or obtain any other
license or pay any fee in order to engage in the electrical
construction trade.
(3) RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply to common
carriers subject to Part I of the Interstate Commerce Act, nor to their
officers and employees.
(4) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be deemed to
apply to the installation or maintenance of telephone, telegraph,
radio, or television wires and equipment; nor to any electrical utility
or its employees in the installation, repair, and maintenance of
electrical wiring, circuits, and equipment by or for the utility, or
comprising a part of its plants, lines, or systems.
(5) The licensing provisions of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271
shall not apply to:
(a) Persons making electrical installations on their own property
or to regularly employed employees working on the premises of their
employer, unless the electrical work is on the construction of a new
building intended for rent, sale, or lease;
(b) Employees of an employer while the employer is performing
utility type work of the nature described in RCW 19.28.091 so long as
such employees have registered in the state of Washington with or
graduated from a state-approved outside lineworker apprenticeship
course that is recognized by the department and that qualifies a person
to perform such work;
(c) Any work exempted under RCW 19.28.091(6); and
(d) Certified plumbers, certified residential plumbers, or plumber
trainees meeting the requirements of chapter 18.106 RCW and performing
exempt work under RCW 19.28.091(8).
(6) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed
to restrict the right of any householder to assist or receive
assistance from a friend, neighbor, relative, or other person when none
of the individuals doing the electrical installation hold themselves
out as engaged in the trade or business of electrical installations.
(7) Nothing precludes any person who is exempt from the licensing
requirements of this chapter under this section from obtaining a
((journeyman)) journey level or specialty certificate of competency if
they otherwise meet the requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 38 RCW 20.01.030 and 2011 c 336 s 570 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to:
(1) Any cooperative marketing associations or federations
incorporated under, or whose articles of incorporation and bylaws are
equivalent to, the requirements of chapter 23.86 RCW, except as to that
portion of the activities of the association or federation that involve
the handling or dealing in the agricultural products of nonmembers of
the organization: PROVIDED, That the associations or federations may
purchase up to fifteen percent of their gross from nonmembers for the
purpose of filling orders: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if the cooperative
or association acts as a processor as defined in RCW 20.01.500(2) and
markets the processed agricultural crops on behalf of the grower or its
own behalf, the association or federation is subject to the provisions
of RCW 20.01.500 through 20.01.560 and the license provision of this
chapter excluding bonding provisions: PROVIDED FURTHER, That none of
the foregoing exemptions in this subsection apply to any such
cooperative or federation dealing in or handling grain in any manner,
and not licensed under the provisions of chapter 22.09 RCW;
(2) Any person who sells exclusively his or her own agricultural
products as the producer thereof;
(3) Any public livestock market operating under a bond required by
law or a bond required by the United States to secure the performance
of the public livestock market's obligation. However, any such market
operating as a livestock dealer or order buyer, or both, is subject to
all provisions of this chapter except for the payment of the license
fee required in RCW 20.01.040;
(4) Any retail merchant having a bona fide fixed or permanent place
of business in this state, but only for the retail merchant's retail
business conducted at such fixed or established place of business;
(5) Any person buying farm products for his or her own use or
consumption;
(6) Any warehouse operator or grain dealer licensed under the state
grain warehouse act, chapter 22.09 RCW, with respect to his or her
handling of any agricultural product as defined under that chapter;
(7) Any ((nurseryman)) nursery dealer who is required to be
licensed under the horticultural laws of the state with respect to his
or her operations as such licensee;
(8) Any person licensed under the now existing dairy laws of the
state with respect to his or her operations as such licensee;
(9) Any producer who purchases less than fifteen percent of his or
her volume to complete orders;
(10) Any person, association, or corporation regulated under
chapter 67.16 RCW and the rules adopted thereunder while performing
acts regulated by that chapter and the rules adopted thereunder;
(11) Any domestic winery, as defined in RCW 66.04.010, licensed
under Title 66 RCW, with respect to its transactions involving
agricultural products used by the domestic winery in making wine.

Sec. 39 RCW 22.09.860 and 2011 c 336 s 649 are each amended to
read as follows:
All railroad companies and warehouse operators operating in the
cities provided for inspection by this chapter shall furnish ample and
sufficient police protection to all their several terminal yards and
terminal tracks to securely protect all cars containing commodities
while the same are in their possession. They shall prohibit and
restrain all unauthorized persons, whether under the guise of sweepers,
or under any other pretext whatever, from entering or loitering in or
about their railroad yards or tracks and from entering any car of
commodities under their control, or removing commodities therefrom, and
shall employ and detail such number of ((watchmen)) security guards as
may be necessary for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this
section.

Sec. 40 RCW 24.34.010 and 2011 c 336 s 674 are each amended to
read as follows:
Persons engaged in the production of agricultural products as
farmers, planters, ((ranchmen)) ranchers, ((dairymen)) dairy farmers,
nut growers, or fruit growers may act together in associations,
corporate or otherwise, with or without capital stock, in collectively
processing, preparing for market, handling, and marketing in intrastate
commerce, such products of persons so engaged. Such associations may
have marketing agencies in common; and such associations and their
members may make the necessary contracts and agreements to effect such
purposes: PROVIDED, That such associations are operated for the mutual
benefit of the members thereof, as such producers, and conform to one
or both of the following requirements:
First. That no member of the association is allowed more than one
vote because of the amount of stock or membership capital he or she may
own therein, or,
Second. That the association does not pay dividends on stock or
membership capital in excess of eight percent per annum.
And in any case to the following:
Third. That the association shall not deal in the products of
nonmembers to an amount greater in value than such as are handled by it
for members.

Sec. 41 RCW 26.12.185 and 2000 c 124 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
A guardian ad litem, court-appointed special advocate, or
investigator under this title appointed under this chapter may release
confidential information, records, and reports to the office of the
family and children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds for the purposes of carrying
out its duties under chapter 43.06A RCW.

Sec. 42 RCW 26.44.030 and 2012 c 55 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner,
law enforcement officer, professional school personnel, registered or
licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist,
employee of the department of early learning, licensed or certified
child care providers or their employees, employee of the department,
juvenile probation officer, placement and liaison specialist,
responsible living skills program staff, HOPE center staff, or state
family and children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds or any volunteer in the
((ombudsman's)) ombuds's office has reasonable cause to believe that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect, he or she shall report such
incident, or cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement
agency or to the department as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(b) When any person, in his or her official supervisory capacity
with a nonprofit or for-profit organization, has reasonable cause to
believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect caused by a person
over whom he or she regularly exercises supervisory authority, he or
she shall report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the
proper law enforcement agency, provided that the person alleged to have
caused the abuse or neglect is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the organization and coaches, trains, educates, or
counsels a child or children or regularly has unsupervised access to a
child or children as part of the employment, contract, or voluntary
service. No one shall be required to report under this section when he
or she obtains the information solely as a result of a privileged
communication as provided in RCW 5.60.060.
Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) shall limit a person's duty to
report under (a) of this subsection.
For the purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Official supervisory capacity" means a position, status, or
role created, recognized, or designated by any nonprofit or for-profit
organization, either for financial gain or without financial gain,
whose scope includes, but is not limited to, overseeing, directing, or
managing another person who is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the nonprofit or for-profit organization.
(ii) "Regularly exercises supervisory authority" means to act in
his or her official supervisory capacity on an ongoing or continuing
basis with regards to a particular person.
(c) The reporting requirement also applies to department of
corrections personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe
offenders or the children with whom the offenders are in contact. If,
as a result of observations or information received in the course of
his or her employment, any department of corrections personnel has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect,
he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.
(d) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has
reasonable cause to believe that a child who resides with them, has
suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of making a report. For
the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the
following: Any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of
sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause death; any
single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than
one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep
bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or
unconsciousness.
(e) The reporting requirement also applies to guardians ad litem,
including court-appointed special advocates, appointed under Titles 11,
13, and 26 RCW, who in the course of their representation of children
in these actions have reasonable cause to believe a child has been
abused or neglected.
(f) The reporting requirement in (a) of this subsection also
applies to administrative and academic or athletic department
employees, including student employees, of institutions of higher
education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and of private institutions of
higher education.
(g) The report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no
case longer than forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to
believe that the child has suffered abuse or neglect. The report must
include the identity of the accused if known.
(2) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred
during childhood if it is discovered after the child has become an
adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe other children
are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the accused, the reporting
requirement of subsection (1) of this section does apply.
(3) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to the
proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and health
services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(4) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(5) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means, or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing as provided
in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for
appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation
reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement
agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and the
law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases,
where the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency
shall notify the department within twenty-four hours. In all other
cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within
seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law enforcement
agency.
(6) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under
subsection (5) of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the
victim requests, and the local office of the department, of the
decision to charge or decline to charge a crime, within five days of
making the decision.
(7) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(8) Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical
opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and
that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if returned home,
the department shall file a dependency petition unless a second
licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such expert
medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a
second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(9) Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7)
of this section shall not further disseminate or release the
information except as authorized by state or federal statute.
Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(10) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the name, address,
and telephone number of each person making a report of abuse or neglect
under this section. The department shall provide assurances of
appropriate confidentiality of the identification of persons reporting
under this section. If the department is unable to learn the
information required under this subsection, the department shall only
investigate cases in which:
(a) The department believes there is a serious threat of
substantial harm to the child;
(b) The report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that
has, or is about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or
(c) The department has a prior founded report of abuse or neglect
with regard to a member of the household that is within three years of
receipt of the referral.
(11)(a) For reports of alleged abuse or neglect that are accepted
for investigation by the department, the investigation shall be
conducted within time frames established by the department in rule. In
no case shall the investigation extend longer than ninety days from the
date the report is received, unless the investigation is being
conducted under a written protocol pursuant to RCW 26.44.180 and a law
enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney has determined that a longer
investigation period is necessary. At the completion of the
investigation, the department shall make a finding that the report of
child abuse or neglect is founded or unfounded.
(b) If a court in a civil or criminal proceeding, considering the
same facts or circumstances as are contained in the report being
investigated by the department, makes a judicial finding by a
preponderance of the evidence or higher that the subject of the pending
investigation has abused or neglected the child, the department shall
adopt the finding in its investigation.
(12) In conducting an investigation of alleged abuse or neglect,
the department or law enforcement agency:
(a) May interview children. The interviews may be conducted on
school premises, at day-care facilities, at the child's home, or at
other suitable locations outside of the presence of parents. Parental
notification of the interview must occur at the earliest possible point
in the investigation that will not jeopardize the safety or protection
of the child or the course of the investigation. Prior to commencing
the interview the department or law enforcement agency shall determine
whether the child wishes a third party to be present for the interview
and, if so, shall make reasonable efforts to accommodate the child's
wishes. Unless the child objects, the department or law enforcement
agency shall make reasonable efforts to include a third party in any
interview so long as the presence of the third party will not
jeopardize the course of the investigation; and
(b) Shall have access to all relevant records of the child in the
possession of mandated reporters and their employees.
(13) If a report of alleged abuse or neglect is founded and
constitutes the third founded report received by the department within
the last twelve months involving the same child or family, the
department shall promptly notify the office of the family and
children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds of the contents of the report. The
department shall also notify the ((ombudsman)) ombuds of the
disposition of the report.
(14) In investigating and responding to allegations of child abuse
and neglect, the department may conduct background checks as authorized
by state and federal law.
(15) The department shall maintain investigation records and
conduct timely and periodic reviews of all founded cases of abuse and
neglect. The department shall maintain a log of screened-out
nonabusive cases.
(16) The department shall use a risk assessment process when
investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor. The department shall, within funds appropriated for this
purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to persons who are
determined not to require further state intervention.
(17) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect the law
enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making the
report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.
(18) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect involving
a child under the court's jurisdiction under chapter 13.34 RCW, the
department shall promptly notify the child's guardian ad litem of the
report's contents. The department shall also notify the guardian ad
litem of the disposition of the report. For purposes of this
subsection, "guardian ad litem" has the meaning provided in RCW
13.34.030.

Sec. 43 RCW 26.44.030 and 2012 c 259 s 3 and 2012 c 55 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner,
law enforcement officer, professional school personnel, registered or
licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist,
employee of the department of early learning, licensed or certified
child care providers or their employees, employee of the department,
juvenile probation officer, placement and liaison specialist,
responsible living skills program staff, HOPE center staff, or state
family and children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds or any volunteer in the
((ombudsman's)) ombuds's office has reasonable cause to believe that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect, he or she shall report such
incident, or cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement
agency or to the department as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(b) When any person, in his or her official supervisory capacity
with a nonprofit or for-profit organization, has reasonable cause to
believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect caused by a person
over whom he or she regularly exercises supervisory authority, he or
she shall report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the
proper law enforcement agency, provided that the person alleged to have
caused the abuse or neglect is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the organization and coaches, trains, educates, or
counsels a child or children or regularly has unsupervised access to a
child or children as part of the employment, contract, or voluntary
service. No one shall be required to report under this section when he
or she obtains the information solely as a result of a privileged
communication as provided in RCW 5.60.060.
Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) shall limit a person's duty to
report under (a) of this subsection.
For the purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Official supervisory capacity" means a position, status, or
role created, recognized, or designated by any nonprofit or for-profit
organization, either for financial gain or without financial gain,
whose scope includes, but is not limited to, overseeing, directing, or
managing another person who is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the nonprofit or for-profit organization.
(ii) "Regularly exercises supervisory authority" means to act in
his or her official supervisory capacity on an ongoing or continuing
basis with regards to a particular person.
(c) The reporting requirement also applies to department of
corrections personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe
offenders or the children with whom the offenders are in contact. If,
as a result of observations or information received in the course of
his or her employment, any department of corrections personnel has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect,
he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.
(d) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has
reasonable cause to believe that a child who resides with them, has
suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of making a report. For
the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the
following: Any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of
sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause death; any
single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than
one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep
bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or
unconsciousness.
(e) The reporting requirement also applies to guardians ad litem,
including court-appointed special advocates, appointed under Titles 11,
13, and 26 RCW, who in the course of their representation of children
in these actions have reasonable cause to believe a child has been
abused or neglected.
(f) The reporting requirement in (a) of this subsection also
applies to administrative and academic or athletic department
employees, including student employees, of institutions of higher
education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and of private institutions of
higher education.
(g) The report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no
case longer than forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to
believe that the child has suffered abuse or neglect. The report must
include the identity of the accused if known.
(2) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred
during childhood if it is discovered after the child has become an
adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe other children
are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the accused, the reporting
requirement of subsection (1) of this section does apply.
(3) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to the
proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and health
services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(4) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(5) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means, or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing as provided
in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for
appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation
reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement
agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and the
law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases,
where the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency
shall notify the department within twenty-four hours. In all other
cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within
seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law enforcement
agency.
(6) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under
subsection (5) of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the
victim requests, and the local office of the department, of the
decision to charge or decline to charge a crime, within five days of
making the decision.
(7) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(8) Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical
opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and
that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if returned home,
the department shall file a dependency petition unless a second
licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such expert
medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a
second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(9) Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7)
of this section shall not further disseminate or release the
information except as authorized by state or federal statute.
Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(10) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the name, address,
and telephone number of each person making a report of abuse or neglect
under this section. The department shall provide assurances of
appropriate confidentiality of the identification of persons reporting
under this section. If the department is unable to learn the
information required under this subsection, the department shall only
investigate cases in which:
(a) The department believes there is a serious threat of
substantial harm to the child;
(b) The report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that
has, or is about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or
(c) The department has a prior founded report of abuse or neglect
with regard to a member of the household that is within three years of
receipt of the referral.
(11)(a) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department shall use one of the following discrete responses to reports
of child abuse or neglect that are screened in and accepted for
departmental response:
(i) Investigation; or
(ii) Family assessment.
(b) In making the response in (a) of this subsection the department
shall:
(i) Use a method by which to assign cases to investigation or
family assessment which are based on an array of factors that may
include the presence of: Imminent danger, level of risk, number of
previous child abuse or neglect reports, or other presenting case
characteristics, such as the type of alleged maltreatment and the age
of the alleged victim. Age of the alleged victim shall not be used as
the sole criterion for determining case assignment;
(ii) Allow for a change in response assignment based on new
information that alters risk or safety level;
(iii) Allow families assigned to family assessment to choose to
receive an investigation rather than a family assessment;
(iv) Provide a full investigation if a family refuses the initial
family assessment;
(v) Provide voluntary services to families based on the results of
the initial family assessment. If a family refuses voluntary services,
and the department cannot identify specific facts related to risk or
safety that warrant assignment to investigation under this chapter, and
there is not a history of reports of child abuse or neglect related to
the family, then the department must close the family assessment
response case. However, if at any time the department identifies risk
or safety factors that warrant an investigation under this chapter,
then the family assessment response case must be reassigned to
investigation;
(vi) Conduct an investigation, and not a family assessment, in
response to an allegation that, the department determines based on the
intake assessment:
(A) Poses a risk of "imminent harm" consistent with the definition
provided in RCW 13.34.050, which includes, but is not limited to,
sexual abuse and sexual exploitation as defined in this chapter;
(B) Poses a serious threat of substantial harm to a child;
(C) Constitutes conduct involving a criminal offense that has, or
is about to occur, in which the child is the victim;
(D) The child is an abandoned child as defined in RCW 13.34.030;
(E) The child is an adjudicated dependent child as defined in RCW
13.34.030, or the child is in a facility that is licensed, operated, or
certified for care of children by the department under chapter 74.15
RCW, or by the department of early learning.
(c) The department may not be held civilly liable for the decision
to respond to an allegation of child abuse or neglect by using the
family assessment response under this section unless the state or its
officers, agents, or employees acted with reckless disregard.
(12)(a) For reports of alleged abuse or neglect that are accepted
for investigation by the department, the investigation shall be
conducted within time frames established by the department in rule. In
no case shall the investigation extend longer than ninety days from the
date the report is received, unless the investigation is being
conducted under a written protocol pursuant to RCW 26.44.180 and a law
enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney has determined that a longer
investigation period is necessary. At the completion of the
investigation, the department shall make a finding that the report of
child abuse or neglect is founded or unfounded.
(b) If a court in a civil or criminal proceeding, considering the
same facts or circumstances as are contained in the report being
investigated by the department, makes a judicial finding by a
preponderance of the evidence or higher that the subject of the pending
investigation has abused or neglected the child, the department shall
adopt the finding in its investigation.
(13) For reports of alleged abuse or neglect that are responded to
through family assessment response, the department shall:
(a) Provide the family with a written explanation of the procedure
for assessment of the child and the family and its purposes;
(b) Collaborate with the family to identify family strengths,
resources, and service needs, and develop a service plan with the goal
of reducing risk of harm to the child and improving or restoring family
well-being;
(c) Complete the family assessment response within forty-five days
of receiving the report; however, upon parental agreement, the family
assessment response period may be extended up to ninety days;
(d) Offer services to the family in a manner that makes it clear
that acceptance of the services is voluntary;
(e) Implement the family assessment response in a consistent and
cooperative manner;
(f) Have the parent or guardian sign an agreement to participate in
services before services are initiated that informs the parents of
their rights under family assessment response, all of their options,
and the options the department has if the parents do not sign the
consent form.
(14) In conducting an investigation or family assessment of alleged
abuse or neglect, the department or law enforcement agency:
(a) May interview children. If the department determines that the
response to the allegation will be family assessment response, the
preferred practice is to request a parent's, guardian's, or custodian's
permission to interview the child before conducting the child interview
unless doing so would compromise the safety of the child or the
integrity of the assessment. The interviews may be conducted on school
premises, at day-care facilities, at the child's home, or at other
suitable locations outside of the presence of parents. If the
allegation is investigated, parental notification of the interview must
occur at the earliest possible point in the investigation that will not
jeopardize the safety or protection of the child or the course of the
investigation. Prior to commencing the interview the department or law
enforcement agency shall determine whether the child wishes a third
party to be present for the interview and, if so, shall make reasonable
efforts to accommodate the child's wishes. Unless the child objects,
the department or law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts
to include a third party in any interview so long as the presence of
the third party will not jeopardize the course of the investigation;
and
(b) Shall have access to all relevant records of the child in the
possession of mandated reporters and their employees.
(15) If a report of alleged abuse or neglect is founded and
constitutes the third founded report received by the department within
the last twelve months involving the same child or family, the
department shall promptly notify the office of the family and
children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds of the contents of the report. The
department shall also notify the ((ombudsman)) ombuds of the
disposition of the report.
(16) In investigating and responding to allegations of child abuse
and neglect, the department may conduct background checks as authorized
by state and federal law.
(17)(a) The department shall maintain investigation records and
conduct timely and periodic reviews of all founded cases of abuse and
neglect. The department shall maintain a log of screened-out
nonabusive cases.
(b) In the family assessment response, the department shall not
make a finding as to whether child abuse or neglect occurred. No one
shall be named as a perpetrator and no investigative finding shall be
entered in the department's child abuse or neglect database.
(18) The department shall use a risk assessment process when
investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor.
(19) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect the law
enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making the
report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.
(20) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect involving
a child under the court's jurisdiction under chapter 13.34 RCW, the
department shall promptly notify the child's guardian ad litem of the
report's contents. The department shall also notify the guardian ad
litem of the disposition of the report. For purposes of this
subsection, "guardian ad litem" has the meaning provided in RCW
13.34.030.

Sec. 44 RCW 26.44.220 and 2005 c 345 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within existing resources, the department shall develop a
curriculum designed to train staff of the department's children's
administration who assess or provide services to adolescents on how to
screen and respond to referrals to child protective services when those
referrals may involve victims of abuse or neglect between the ages of
eleven and eighteen. At a minimum, the curriculum developed pursuant
to this section shall include:
(a) Review of relevant laws and regulations, including the
requirement that the department investigate complaints if a parent's or
caretaker's actions result in serious physical or emotional harm or
present an imminent risk of serious harm to any person under eighteen;
(b) Review of policies of the department's children's
administration that require assessment and screening of abuse and
neglect referrals on the basis of risk and not age;
(c) Explanation of safety assessment and risk assessment models;
(d) Case studies of situations in which the department has received
reports of alleged abuse or neglect of older children and adolescents;
(e) Discussion of best practices in screening and responding to
referrals involving older children and adolescents; and
(f) Discussion of how abuse and neglect referrals related to
adolescents are investigated and when law enforcement must be notified.
(2) As it develops its curriculum pursuant to this section, the
department shall request that the office of the family and children's
((ombudsman)) ombuds review and comment on its proposed training
materials. The department shall consider the comments and
recommendations of the office of the family and children's
((ombudsman)) ombuds as it develops the curriculum required by this
section.
(3) The department shall complete the curriculum materials required
by this section no later than December 31, 2005.
(4) Within existing resources, the department shall incorporate
training on the curriculum developed pursuant to this section into
existing training for child protective services workers who screen
intake calls, children's administration staff responsible for assessing
or providing services to older children and adolescents, and all new
employees of the children's administration responsible for assessing or
providing services to older children and adolescents.

Sec. 45 RCW 27.53.030 and 2011 c 219 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Amateur society" means any organization composed primarily of
persons who are not professional archaeologists, whose primary interest
is in the archaeological resources of the state, and which has been
certified in writing by two professional archaeologists.
(2) "Archaeological object" means an object that comprises the
physical evidence of an indigenous and subsequent culture, including
material remains of past human life, including monuments, symbols,
tools, facilities, and technological by-products.
(3) "Archaeological site" means a geographic locality in
Washington, including but not limited to, submerged and submersible
lands and the bed of the sea within the state's jurisdiction, that
contains archaeological objects.
(4) "Archaeology" means systematic, scientific study of ((man's))
humankind's past through material remains.
(5) "Department" means the department of archaeology and historic
preservation, created in chapter 43.334 RCW.
(6) "Director" means the director of the department of archaeology
and historic preservation, created in chapter 43.334 RCW.
(7) "Field investigation" means an on-site inspection by a
professional archaeologist or by an individual under the direct
supervision of a professional archaeologist employing archaeological
inspection techniques for both the surface and subsurface
identification of archaeological resources and artifacts resulting in
a professional archaeological report detailing the results of such
inspection.
(8) "Historic" means peoples and cultures who are known through
written documents in their own or other languages. As applied to
underwater archaeological resources, the term "historic" shall include
only those properties which are listed in or eligible for listing in
the Washington state register of historic places (RCW 27.34.220) or the
national register of historic places as defined in the national
historic preservation act of 1966 (Title 1, Sec. 101, Public Law 89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C. Sec. 470) as now or hereafter amended.
(9) "Historic archaeological resources" means those properties
which are listed in or eligible for listing in the Washington state
register of historic places (RCW 27.34.220) or the national register of
historic places as defined in the national historic preservation act of
1966 (Title 1, Sec. 101, Public Law 89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 470) as now or hereafter amended.
(10) "Prehistoric" means peoples and cultures who are unknown
through contemporaneous written documents in any language.
(11) "Professional archaeologist" means a person with
qualifications meeting the federal secretary of the interior's
standards for a professional archaeologist. Archaeologists not meeting
this standard may be conditionally employed by working under the
supervision of a professional archaeologist for a period of four years
provided the employee is pursuing qualifications necessary to meet the
federal secretary of the interior's standards for a professional
archaeologist. During this four-year period, the professional
archaeologist is responsible for all findings. The four-year period is
not subject to renewal.

Sec. 46 RCW 28A.175.075 and 2010 c 243 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
establish a state-level building bridges work group that includes K-12
and state agencies that work with youth who have dropped out or are at
risk of dropping out of school. The following agencies shall appoint
representatives to the work group: The office of the superintendent of
public instruction, the workforce training and education coordinating
board, the department of early learning, the employment security
department, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
department of health, the community mobilization office, and the
children's services and behavioral health and recovery divisions of the
department of social and health services. The work group should also
consist of one representative from each of the following agencies and
organizations: A statewide organization representing career and
technical education programs including skill centers; the juvenile
courts or the office of juvenile justice, or both; the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys; the Washington state office of
public defense; accredited institutions of higher education; the
educational service districts; the area workforce development councils;
parent and educator associations; ((achievement)) educational
opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee; office of the
education ((ombudsman)) ombuds; local school districts; agencies or
organizations that provide services to special education students;
community organizations serving youth; federally recognized tribes and
urban tribal centers; each of the major political caucuses of the
senate and house of representatives; and the minority commissions.
(2) To assist and enhance the work of the building bridges programs
established in RCW 28A.175.025, the state-level work group shall:
(a) Identify and make recommendations to the legislature for the
reduction of fiscal, legal, and regulatory barriers that prevent
coordination of program resources across agencies at the state and
local level;
(b) Develop and track performance measures and benchmarks for each
partner agency or organization across the state including performance
measures and benchmarks based on student characteristics and outcomes
specified in RCW 28A.175.035(1)(e); and
(c) Identify research-based and emerging best practices regarding
prevention, intervention, and retrieval programs.
(3)(a) The work group shall report to the quality education
council, appropriate committees of the legislature, and the governor on
an annual basis beginning December 1, 2007, with proposed strategies
for building K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement
systems in local communities throughout the state including, but not
limited to, recommendations for implementing emerging best practices,
needed additional resources, and eliminating barriers.
(b) By September 15, 2010, the work group shall report on:
(i) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the
percentage of students graduating from high school;
(ii) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the
percentage of youth who have dropped out of school who should be
reengaged in education and be college and work ready;
(iii) Recommended funding for supporting career guidance and the
planning and implementation of K-12 dropout prevention, intervention,
and reengagement systems in school districts and a plan for phasing the
funding into the program of basic education, beginning in the 2011-2013
biennium; and
(iv) A plan for phasing in the expansion of the current school
improvement planning program to include state-funded, dropout-focused
school improvement technical assistance for school districts in
significant need of improvement regarding high school graduation rates.
(4) State agencies in the building bridges work group shall work
together, wherever feasible, on the following activities to support
school/family/community partnerships engaged in building K-12 dropout
prevention, intervention, and reengagement systems:
(a) Providing opportunities for coordination and flexibility of
program eligibility and funding criteria;
(b) Providing joint funding;
(c) Developing protocols and templates for model agreements on
sharing records and data;
(d) Providing joint professional development opportunities that
provide knowledge and training on:
(i) Research-based and promising practices;
(ii) The availability of programs and services for vulnerable
youth; and
(iii) Cultural competence.
(5) The building bridges work group shall make recommendations to
the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2010, on a state-level
and regional infrastructure for coordinating services for vulnerable
youth. Recommendations must address the following issues:
(a) Whether to adopt an official conceptual approach or framework
for all entities working with vulnerable youth that can support
coordinated planning and evaluation;
(b) The creation of a performance-based management system,
including outcomes, indicators, and performance measures relating to
vulnerable youth and programs serving them, including accountability
for the dropout issue;
(c) The development of regional and/or county-level multipartner
youth consortia with a specific charge to assist school districts and
local communities in building K-12 comprehensive dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement systems;
(d) The development of integrated or school-based one-stop shopping
for services that would:
(i) Provide individualized attention to the neediest youth and
prioritized access to services for students identified by a dropout
early warning and intervention data system;
(ii) Establish protocols for coordinating data and services,
including getting data release at time of intake and common assessment
and referral processes; and
(iii) Build a system of single case managers across agencies;
(e) Launching a statewide media campaign on increasing the high
school graduation rate; and
(f) Developing a statewide database of available services for
vulnerable youth.

Sec. 47 RCW 28A.175.140 and 2011 c 288 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the state board of education, must:
(a) Calculate the annual extended graduation rate for each high
school, which is the rate at which a class of students enters high
school as ((freshmen)) first-year students and graduates with a high
school diploma, including students who receive a high school diploma
after the year they were expected to graduate. The office may
statistically adjust the rate for student demographics in the high
school, including the number of students eligible for free and reduced-price meals, special education and English language learner students,
students of various racial and ethnic backgrounds, and student
mobility;
(b) Annually calculate the proportion of students at grade level
for each high school, which shall be measured by the number of credits
a student has accumulated at the end of each school year compared to
the total number required for graduation. For the purposes of this
subsection (1)(b), the office shall adopt a standard definition of "at
grade level" for each high school grade;
(c) Annually calculate the proportion of students in each high
school who are suspended or expelled from school, as reported by the
high school. In-school suspensions shall not be included in the
calculation. Improvement on the indicator under this subsection (1)(c)
shall be measured by a reduction in the number of students suspended or
expelled from school; and
(d) Beginning with the 2012-13 school year, annually measure
student attendance in each high school as provided under RCW
28A.300.046.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may add
dropout prevention indicators to the list of indicators under
subsection (1) of this section, such as student grades, state
assessment mastery, or student retention.
(3) To the maximum extent possible, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall rely on data collected
through the comprehensive education data and research system to
calculate the dropout prevention indicators under this section and
shall minimize additional data collection from schools and school
districts unless necessary to meet the requirements of this section.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a metric for measuring the performance of each high school on
the indicators under subsection (1) of this section that assigns points
for each indicator and results in a single numeric dropout prevention
score for each high school. The office shall weight the extended
graduation rate indicator within the metric so that a high school does
not qualify for an award under RCW 28A.175.145 without an increase in
its extended graduation rate. The metric used through the 2012-13
school year shall include the indicators in subsection (1)(a) through
(c) of this section and shall measure improvement against the 2010-11
school year as the baseline year. Beginning in the 2013-14 school
year, the metric shall also include the indicator in subsection (1)(d)
of this section, with improvement in this indicator measured against
the 2012-13 school year as the baseline year. The office may establish
a minimum level of improvement in a high school's dropout prevention
score for the high school to qualify for a PASS program award under RCW
28A.175.145.

Sec. 48 RCW 28A.230.020 and 2006 c 263 s 414 are each amended to
read as follows:
All common schools shall give instruction in reading,
((penmanship)) handwriting, orthography, written and mental arithmetic,
geography, the history of the United States, English grammar,
physiology and hygiene with special reference to the effects of alcohol
and drug abuse on the human system, science with special reference to
the environment, and such other studies as may be prescribed by rule of
the superintendent of public instruction. All teachers shall stress
the importance of the cultivation of manners, the fundamental
principles of honesty, honor, industry and economy, the minimum
requisites for good health including the beneficial effect of physical
exercise and methods to prevent exposure to and transmission of
sexually transmitted diseases, and the worth of kindness to all living
creatures and the land. The prevention of child abuse may be offered
as part of the curriculum in the common schools.

Sec. 49 RCW 28A.300.136 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 33 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) An educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability
committee is created to synthesize the findings and recommendations
from the 2008 achievement gap studies into an implementation plan, and
to recommend policies and strategies to the superintendent of public
instruction, the professional educator standards board, and the state
board of education to close the achievement gap.
(2) The committee shall recommend specific policies and strategies
in at least the following areas:
(a) Supporting and facilitating parent and community involvement
and outreach;
(b) Enhancing the cultural competency of current and future
educators and the cultural relevance of curriculum and instruction;
(c) Expanding pathways and strategies to prepare and recruit
diverse teachers and administrators;
(d) Recommending current programs and resources that should be
redirected to narrow the gap;
(e) Identifying data elements and systems needed to monitor
progress in closing the gap;
(f) Making closing the achievement gap part of the school and
school district improvement process; and
(g) Exploring innovative school models that have shown success in
closing the achievement gap.
(3) Taking a multidisciplinary approach, the committee may seek
input and advice from other state and local agencies and organizations
with expertise in health, social services, gang and violence
prevention, substance abuse prevention, and other issues that
disproportionately affect student achievement and student success.
(4) The educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability
committee shall be composed of the following members:
(a) The chairs and ranking minority members of the house and senate
education committees, or their designees;
(b) One additional member of the house of representatives appointed
by the speaker of the house and one additional member of the senate
appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) A representative of the office of the education ((ombudsman))
ombuds;
(d) A representative of the center for the improvement of student
learning in the office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(e) A representative of federally recognized Indian tribes whose
traditional lands and territories lie within the borders of Washington
state, designated by the federally recognized tribes; and
(f) Four members appointed by the governor in consultation with the
state ethnic commissions, who represent the following populations:
African-Americans, Hispanic Americans, Asian Americans, and Pacific
Islander Americans.
(5) The governor and the tribes are encouraged to designate members
who have experience working in and with schools.
(6) The committee may convene ad hoc working groups to obtain
additional input and participation from community members. Members of
ad hoc working groups shall serve without compensation and shall not be
reimbursed for travel or other expenses.
(7) The chair or cochairs of the committee shall be selected by the
members of the committee. Staff support for the committee shall be
provided by the center for the improvement of student learning.
Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but must be
reimbursed as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislative
members of the committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction, the state board of
education, the professional educator standards board, and the quality
education council shall work collaboratively with the educational
opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee to close the
achievement gap.

Sec. 50 RCW 28A.300.285 and 2010 c 239 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By August 1, 2011, each school district shall adopt or amend if
necessary a policy and procedure that at a minimum incorporates the
revised model policy and procedure provided under subsection (4) of
this section that prohibits the harassment, intimidation, or bullying
of any student. It is the responsibility of each school district to
share this policy with parents or guardians, students, volunteers, and
school employees in accordance with rules adopted by the superintendent
of public instruction. Each school district shall designate one person
in the district as the primary contact regarding the antiharassment,
intimidation, or bullying policy. The primary contact shall receive
copies of all formal and informal complaints, have responsibility for
assuring the implementation of the policy and procedure, and serve as
the primary contact on the policy and procedures between the school
district, the office of the education ((ombudsman)) ombuds, and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(2) "Harassment, intimidation, or bullying" means any intentional
electronic, written, verbal, or physical act, including but not limited
to one shown to be motivated by any characteristic in RCW 9A.36.080(3),
or other distinguishing characteristics, when the intentional
electronic, written, verbal, or physical act:
(a) Physically harms a student or damages the student's property;
or
(b) Has the effect of substantially interfering with a student's
education; or
(c) Is so severe, persistent, or pervasive that it creates an
intimidating or threatening educational environment; or
(d) Has the effect of substantially disrupting the orderly
operation of the school.
Nothing in this section requires the affected student to actually
possess a characteristic that is a basis for the harassment,
intimidation, or bullying.
(3) The policy and procedure should be adopted or amended through
a process that includes representation of parents or guardians, school
employees, volunteers, students, administrators, and community
representatives. It is recommended that each such policy emphasize
positive character traits and values, including the importance of civil
and respectful speech and conduct, and the responsibility of students
to comply with the district's policy prohibiting harassment,
intimidation, or bullying.
(4)(a) By August 1, 2010, the superintendent of public instruction,
in consultation with representatives of parents, school personnel, the
office of the education ((ombudsman)) ombuds, the Washington state
school directors' association, and other interested parties, shall
provide to the education committees of the legislature a revised and
updated model harassment, intimidation, and bullying prevention policy
and procedure. The superintendent of public instruction shall publish
on its web site, with a link to the safety center web page, the revised
and updated model harassment, intimidation, and bullying prevention
policy and procedure, along with training and instructional materials
on the components that shall be included in any district policy and
procedure. The superintendent shall adopt rules regarding school
districts' communication of the policy and procedure to parents,
students, employees, and volunteers.
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction has the
authority to update with new technologies access to this information in
the safety center, to the extent resources are made available.
(c) Each school district shall by August 15, 2011, provide to the
superintendent of public instruction a brief summary of its policies,
procedures, programs, partnerships, vendors, and instructional and
training materials to be posted on the school safety center web site,
and shall also provide the superintendent with a link to the school
district's web site for further information. The district's primary
contact for bullying and harassment issues shall annually by August
15th verify posted information and links and notify the school safety
center of any updates or changes.
(5) The Washington state school directors' association, with the
assistance of the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall convene an advisory committee to develop a model policy
prohibiting acts of harassment, intimidation, or bullying that are
conducted via electronic means by a student while on school grounds and
during the school day. The policy shall include a requirement that
materials meant to educate parents and students about the seriousness
of cyberbullying be disseminated to parents or made available on the
school district's web site. The school directors' association and the
advisory committee shall develop sample materials for school districts
to disseminate, which shall also include information on responsible and
safe internet use as well as what options are available if a student is
being bullied via electronic means((,)) including, but not limited to,
reporting threats to local police and when to involve school officials,
the internet service provider, or phone service provider. The school
directors' association shall submit the model policy and sample
materials, along with a recommendation for local adoption, to the
governor and the legislature and shall post the model policy and sample
materials on its web site by January 1, 2008. Each school district
board of directors shall establish its own policy by August 1, 2008.
(6) As used in this section, "electronic" or "electronic means"
means any communication where there is the transmission of information
by wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other similar means.

Sec. 51 RCW 28A.300.2851 and 2011 c 185 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
office of the education ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall convene a work group
on school bullying and harassment prevention to develop, recommend, and
implement strategies to improve school climate and create respectful
learning environments in all public schools in Washington. The
superintendent of public instruction or a designee shall serve as the
chair of the work group.
(2) The work group shall:
(a) Consider whether additional disaggregated data should be
collected regarding incidents of bullying and harassment or
disciplinary actions and make recommendations to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for collection of such data;
(b) Examine possible procedures for anonymous reporting of
incidents of bullying and harassment;
(c) Identify curriculum and best practices for school districts to
improve school climate, create respectful learning environments, and
train staff and students in de-escalation and intervention techniques;
(d) Identify curriculum and best practices for incorporating
instruction about mental health, youth suicide prevention, and
prevention of bullying and harassment;
(e) Recommend best practices for informing parents about the
harassment, intimidation, and bullying prevention policy and procedure
under RCW 28A.300.285 and involving parents in improving school
climate;
(f) Recommend training for district personnel who are designated as
the primary contact regarding the policy and procedure and for school
resource officers and other school security personnel;
(g) Recommend educator preparation and certification requirements
in harassment, intimidation, and bullying prevention and de-escalation
and intervention techniques for teachers, educational staff associates,
and school administrators;
(h) Examine and recommend policies for discipline of students and
staff who harass, intimidate, or bully; and
(i) In collaboration with the state board for community and
technical colleges, examine and recommend policies to protect K-12
students attending community and technical colleges from harassment,
intimidation, and bullying.
(3) The work group must include representatives from the state
board of education, the Washington state parent teacher association,
the Washington state association of school psychologists, school
directors, school administrators, principals, teachers, school
counselors, classified school staff, youth, community organizations,
and parents.
(4) The work group shall submit a biennial progress and status
report to the governor and the education committees of the legislature,
beginning December 1, 2011, with additional reports by December 1,
2013, and December 1, 2015.
(5) The work group is terminated effective January 1, 2016.

Sec. 52 RCW 28B.10.053 and 2012 c 229 s 510 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2011, and by June of each odd-numbered year
thereafter, the institutions of higher education shall collaboratively
develop a master list of postsecondary courses that can be fulfilled by
taking the advanced placement, international baccalaureate, or other
recognized college-level proficiency examinations, including but not
limited to examinations by a national multidisciplinary science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics program, and meeting the
qualifying examination score or demonstrated competencies for lower
division general education requirements or postsecondary professional
technical requirements. The master list of postsecondary courses
fulfilled by proficiency examinations or demonstrated competencies are
those that fulfill lower division general education requirements or
career and technical education requirements and qualify for
postsecondary credit. From the master list, each institution shall
create and publish a list of its courses that can be satisfied by
successful proficiency examination scores or demonstrated competencies
for lower division general education requirements or postsecondary
professional technical requirements. The qualifying examination scores
and demonstrated competencies shall be included in the published list.
The requirements to develop a master list under this section do not
apply if an institution has a clearly published policy of awarding
credit for the advanced placement, international baccalaureate, or
other recognized college-level placement exams and does not require
those credits to meet specific course requirements but generally
applies those credits towards degree requirements.
(2) To the maximum extent possible, institutions of higher
education shall agree on examination qualifying scores and demonstrated
competencies for the credits or courses under subsection (3) of this
section, with scores equivalent to qualified or well-qualified.
Nothing in this subsection shall prevent an institution of higher
education from adopting policies using higher scores for additional
purposes.
(3) Each institution of higher education, in designing its
certificate, technical degree program, two-year academic transfer
program, or ((freshman)) first-year student and sophomore courses of a
baccalaureate program or baccalaureate degree, must recognize the
equivalencies of at least one year of course credit and maximize the
application of the credits toward lower division general education
requirements that can be earned through successfully demonstrating
proficiency on examinations, including but not limited to advanced
placement and international baccalaureate examinations. The successful
completion of the examination and the award of credit shall be noted on
the student's college transcript.
(4) Each institution of higher education must clearly include in
its admissions materials and on its web site the credits or the
institution's list of postsecondary courses that can be fulfilled by
proficiency examinations or demonstrated competencies and the agreed-upon examination scores and demonstrated competencies that qualify for
postsecondary credit. Each institution must provide the information to
the student achievement council and state board for community and
technical colleges in a form that the superintendent of public
instruction is able to distribute to school districts.

Sec. 53 RCW 28B.15.102 and 2012 c 229 s 526 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year, any four-year
institution of higher education that increases tuition beyond levels
assumed in the omnibus appropriations act is subject to the financial
aid requirements included in this section and shall remain subject to
these requirements through the 2018-19 academic year.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2011, each four-year institution of higher
education that raises tuition beyond levels assumed in the omnibus
appropriations act shall, in a manner consistent with the goal of
enhancing the quality of and access to their institutions, provide
financial aid to offset full-time tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students as follows:
(a) Subtract from the full-time tuition fees an amount that is
equal to the maximum amount of a state need grant award that would be
given to an eligible student with a family income at or below fifty
percent of the state's median family income as determined by the
student achievement council; and
(b) Offset the remainder as follows:
(i) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are at or
below fifty percent of the state's median family income shall receive
financial aid equal to one hundred percent of the remainder if an
institution's full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate
students is five percent or greater of the state's median family income
for a family of four as provided by the student achievement council;
(ii) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are
greater than fifty percent and no more than seventy percent of the
state's median family income shall receive financial aid equal to
seventy-five percent of the remainder if an institution's full-time
tuition fees for resident undergraduate students is ten percent or
greater of the state's median family income for a family of four as
provided by the student achievement council;
(iii) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes exceed
seventy percent and are less than one hundred percent of the state's
median family income shall receive financial aid equal to fifty percent
of the remainder if an institution's full-time tuition fees for
resident undergraduate students is fifteen percent or greater of the
state's median family income for a family of four as provided by the
student achievement council; and
(iv) Students with demonstrated need whose family incomes are at or
exceed one hundred percent and are no more than one hundred twenty-five
percent of the state's median family income shall receive financial aid
equal to twenty-five percent of the remainder if an institution's
full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students is twenty
percent or greater of the state's median family income for a family of
four as provided by the student achievement council.
(3) The financial aid required in subsection (2) of this section
shall:
(a) Be reduced by the amount of other financial aid awards, not
including the state need grant;
(b) Be prorated based on credit load; and
(c) Only be provided to students up to demonstrated need.
(4) Financial aid sources and methods may be:
(a) Tuition revenue or locally held funds;
(b) Tuition waivers created by a four-year institution of higher
education for the specific purpose of serving low and middle-income
students; or
(c) Local financial aid programs.
(5) Use of tuition waivers as specified in subsection (4)(b) of
this section shall not be included in determining total state tuition
waiver authority as defined in RCW 28B.15.910.
(6) By August 15, 2012, and August 15th every year thereafter,
four-year institutions of higher education shall report to the governor
and relevant committees of the legislature on the effectiveness of the
various sources and methods of financial aid in mitigating tuition
increases. A key purpose of these reports is to provide information
regarding the results of the decision to grant tuition-setting
authority to the four-year institutions of higher education and whether
tuition setting authority should continue to be granted to the
institutions or revert back to the legislature after consideration of
the impacts on students, including educational access, affordability,
and quality. These reports shall include:
(a) The amount of additional financial aid provided to middle-income and low-income students with demonstrated need in the aggregate
and per student;
(b) An itemization of the sources and methods of financial aid
provided by the four-year institution of higher education in the
aggregate and per student;
(c) An analysis of the combined impact of federal tuition tax
credits and financial aid provided by the institution of higher
education on the net cost to students and their families resulting from
tuition increases;
(d) In cases where tuition increases are greater than those assumed
in the omnibus appropriations act at any four-year institution of
higher education, the institution must include an explanation in its
report of why this increase was necessary and how the institution will
mitigate the effects of the increase. The institution must include in
this section of its report a plan and specific timelines; and
(e) An analysis of changes in resident student enrollment patterns,
participation rates, graduation rates, and debt load, by race and
ethnicity, gender, state and county of origin, age, and socioeconomic
status, and a plan to mitigate effects of reduced diversity due to
tuition increases. This analysis shall include disaggregated data for
resident students in the following income brackets:
(i) Up to seventy percent of the median family income;
(ii) Between seventy-one percent and one hundred twenty-five
percent of the median family income; and
(iii) Above one hundred twenty-five percent of the median family
income.
(7) Beginning in the 2012-13 academic year, the University of
Washington shall enroll during each academic year at least the same
number of resident ((freshman)) first-year undergraduate students at
the Seattle campus, as defined in RCW 28B.15.012, as enrolled during
the 2009-10 academic year. This requirement shall not apply to
nonresident undergraduate and graduate and professional students.

Sec. 54 RCW 28B.45.020 and 2012 c 229 s 532 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The University of Washington is responsible for ensuring the
expansion of baccalaureate and graduate educational programs in the
central Puget Sound area under rules or guidelines adopted by the
student achievement council and in accordance with proportionality
agreements emphasizing access for transfer students developed with the
state board for community and technical colleges. The University of
Washington shall meet that responsibility through the operation of at
least two branch campuses. One branch campus shall be located in the
Tacoma area. Another branch campus shall be collocated with Cascadia
Community College in the Bothell-Woodinville area.
(2) At the University of Washington Tacoma, a top priority is
expansion of upper division capacity for transfer students and graduate
capacity and programs. Beginning in the fall of 2006, the campus may
offer lower division courses linked to specific majors in fields not
addressed at local community colleges. The campus shall admit lower
division students through coadmission or coenrollment agreements with
a community college, or through direct transfer for students who have
accumulated approximately one year of transferable college credits. In
addition to offering lower division courses linked to specific majors
as addressed above, the campus may also directly admit ((freshmen))
first-year students and sophomores.
(3) At the University of Washington Bothell, a top priority is
expansion of upper division capacity for transfer students and graduate
capacity and programs. The campus shall also seek additional
opportunities to collaborate with and maximize its colocation with
Cascadia Community College. Beginning in the fall of 2006, the campus
may offer lower division courses linked to specific majors in fields
not addressed at local community colleges. The campus may admit lower
division students through coadmission or coenrollment agreements with
a community college, or through direct transfer for students who have
accumulated approximately one year of transferable college credits. In
addition to offering lower division courses linked to specific majors
as addressed above, the campus may also directly admit ((freshmen))
first-year students and sophomores.

Sec. 55 RCW 28B.45.030 and 2012 c 229 s 533 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Washington State University is responsible for providing
baccalaureate and graduate level higher education programs to the
citizens of the Tri-Cities area, under rules or guidelines adopted by
the student achievement council and in accordance with proportionality
agreements emphasizing access for transfer students developed with the
state board for community and technical colleges. Washington State
University shall meet that responsibility through the operation of a
branch campus in the Tri-Cities area. The branch campus shall replace
and supersede the Tri-Cities university center. All land, facilities,
equipment, and personnel of the Tri-Cities university center shall be
transferred from the University of Washington to Washington State
University.
(2) Beginning in the fall of 2007, the Washington State University
Tri-Cities branch campus may directly admit ((freshman)) first-year
students and sophomore students.

Sec. 56 RCW 28B.45.040 and 2012 c 229 s 534 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Washington State University is responsible for providing
baccalaureate and graduate level higher education programs to the
citizens of the southwest Washington area, under rules or guidelines
adopted by the student achievement council and in accordance with
proportionality agreements emphasizing access for transfer students
developed with the state board for community and technical colleges.
Washington State University shall meet that responsibility through the
operation of a branch campus in the southwest Washington area.
(2) Washington State University Vancouver shall expand upper
division capacity for transfer students and graduate capacity and
programs and continue to collaborate with local community colleges on
coadmission and coenrollment programs. In addition, beginning in the
fall of 2006, the campus may admit lower division students directly.
By simultaneously admitting ((freshmen)) first-year students and
sophomores, increasing transfer enrollment, coadmitting transfer
students, and expanding graduate and professional programs, the campus
shall develop into a four-year institution serving the southwest
Washington region.

Sec. 57 RCW 28B.50.278 and 2010 c 40 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An opportunity employment and education center is established
within the Seattle community college district.
(2) The center shall:
(a) House various educational and social service providers and
integrate access to employment, counseling, and public benefit programs
and services as well as education, training, financial aid, and
counseling services offered through community colleges;
(b) Identify and form partnerships with community-based
organizations that enhance the services and supports provided to
individuals using the center; ((and))
(c) Provide services including, but not limited to, employment
security and workforce development council worksource services; job
listing, referral, and placement; job coaching; employment counseling,
testing, and career planning; unemployment insurance claim filing
assistance; cash grant programs run by the department of social and
health services; the basic food program; housing assistance; child
support assistance; child care subsidies; WorkFirst and temporary
assistance ((to [for])) for needy families; general assistance and
supplemental security income facilitation; vocational rehabilitation
services and referrals; medicaid and medical services; alcoholism and
drug addiction treatment and support act referrals; case management and
mental health referrals; community college financial aid; support
services; college counseling services related to career pathways and
basic skills resources for English language learners; high school
completion; and adult basic education; and
(d) In partnership with the state board for community and technical
colleges, jointly develop evaluation criteria and performance
indicators that demonstrate the degree to which the center is
successfully integrating services and improving service delivery.
(3) The chancellor of the Seattle community college district and
technical colleges, or the chancellor's designee, shall convene an
opportunity policy work group charged with governing the opportunity
employment and education center. The work group membership shall
include, but not be limited to, representatives of the King county
workforce development council, north Seattle community college, the
employment security department, and the department of social and health
services. A chair shall be chosen from among the work group's
membership on an annual basis, with the ((chairmanship)) position of
chair rotating among participating agencies. The work group shall:
(a) Determine protocols for service delivery, develop operating
policies and procedures, develop cross-agency training for agency
employees located at the center, and develop a plan for a common
information technology framework that could allow for interagency
access to files and information, including any common application and
screening systems that facilitate access to state, federal, and local
social service and educational programs, within current resources and
to the extent federal privacy laws allow;
(b) Develop a release of information form that may be voluntarily
completed by opportunity center clients to facilitate the information
sharing outlined in ((subsection (3)))(a) of this ((section))
subsection. The form is created to aid agencies housed at the
opportunity center in determining client eligibility for various social
and educational services. The form shall address the types of
information to be shared, the agencies with which personal information
can be shared, the length of time agencies may keep shared information
on file, and any other issue areas identified by the opportunity policy
work group to comply with all applicable federal and state laws;
(c) Review national best practices for program operation and
provide training to program providers both before opening the center
and on an ongoing basis; and
(d) Jointly develop integrated solutions to provide more
cost-efficient and customer friendly service delivery.
(4) Participating agencies shall identify and apply for any federal
waivers necessary to facilitate the intended goals and operation of the
center.
(5) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
report to legislative committees with subject areas of commerce and
labor, human services, and higher education on the following:
(a) By December 1, 2010, the board, in partnership with
participating agencies, shall provide recommendations on a proposed
site for an additional opportunity employment and education center; and
(b) By December 1, 2011, and annually thereafter, the board shall
provide an evaluation of existing centers based on performance criteria
identified by the board and the opportunity policy work group. The
report shall also include data on any federal and state legislative
barriers to integration.
(6) All future opportunity centers shall be governed by the
provisions in this section and are subject to the same reporting
requirements.

Sec. 58 RCW 28B.50.100 and 2012 c 228 s 5 and 2012 c 148 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
There is hereby created a board of trustees for each college
district as set forth in this chapter. Each board of trustees shall be
composed of five trustees, except as provided in RCW 28B.50.102, who
shall be appointed by the governor for terms commencing October 1st of
the year in which appointed. In making such appointments, the governor
shall give consideration to geographical diversity, and representing
labor, business, women, and racial and ethnic minorities, in the
membership of the boards of trustees. The boards of trustees for
districts containing technical colleges shall include at least one
member from business and one member from labor.
The successors of the trustees initially appointed shall be
appointed by the governor to serve for a term of five years except that
any person appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the
expiration of any term shall be appointed only for the remainder of the
term. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed and
qualified.
Every trustee shall be a resident and qualified elector of the
college district. No trustee may be an employee of the community and
technical college system, a member of the board of directors of any
school district, or a member of the governing board of any public or
private educational institution.
Each board of trustees shall organize itself by electing a
((chairman)) chair from its members. The board shall adopt a seal and
may adopt such bylaws, rules, and regulations as it deems necessary for
its own government. Three members of the board shall constitute a
quorum, but a lesser number may adjourn from time to time and may
compel the attendance of absent members in such manner as prescribed in
its bylaws, rules, or regulations. The district president, or if there
be none, the president of the college, shall serve as, or may designate
another person to serve as, the secretary of the board, who shall not
be deemed to be a member of the board.
Each board of trustees shall follow procedures for open public
meetings in chapter 42.30 RCW. Each board shall provide time for
public comment at each meeting.
Members of the boards of trustees may be removed for misconduct or
malfeasance in office in the manner provided by RCW 28B.10.500.

Sec. 59 RCW 28B.76.502 and 2012 c 31 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office must provide a financial aid counseling curriculum
to institutions of higher education with state need grant recipients.
The curriculum must be available via a web site. The curriculum must
include, but not be limited to:
(a) An explanation of the state need grant program rules, including
maintaining satisfactory progress, repayment rules, and usage limits;
(b) Information on campus and private scholarships and work-study
opportunities, including the application processes;
(c) An overview of student loan options with an emphasis on the
repayment obligations a student borrower assumes regardless of program
completion, including the likely consequences of default and sample
monthly repayment amounts based on a range of student levels of
indebtedness;
(d) An overview of financial literacy, including basic money
management skills such as living within a budget and handling credit
and debt;
(e) Average salaries for a wide range of jobs;
(f) Perspectives from a diverse group of students who are or were
recipients of financial aid, including student loans; and
(g) Contact information for local financial aid resources and the
federal student aid ((ombudsman's)) ombuds's office.
(2) By the 2013-14 academic year, the institution of higher
education must take reasonable steps to ensure that each state need
grant recipient receives information outlined in subsection (1)(a)
through (g) of this section by directly referencing or linking to the
web site on the conditions of award statement provided to each
recipient.
(3) By July 1, 2013, the office must disseminate the curriculum to
all institutions of higher education participating in the state need
grant program. The institutions of higher education may require
nonstate need grant recipients to participate in all or portions of the
financial aid counseling.

Sec. 60 RCW 28B.77.090 and 2012 c 229 s 115 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An accountability monitoring and reporting system is
established as part of a continuing effort to make meaningful and
substantial progress towards the achievement of long-term performance
goals in higher education.
(2) To provide consistent, easily understood data among the public
four-year institutions of higher education within Washington and in
other states, the following data must be reported to the education data
center annually by December 1st, and at a minimum include data
recommended by a national organization representing state chief
executives. The education data center in consultation with the council
may change the data requirements to be consistent with best practices
across the country. This data must, to the maximum extent possible, be
disaggregated by race and ethnicity, gender, state and county of
origin, age, and socioeconomic status, and include the following for
the four-year institutions of higher education:
(a) Bachelor's degrees awarded;
(b) Graduate and professional degrees awarded;
(c) Graduation rates: The number and percentage of students who
graduate within four years for bachelor's degrees and within the
extended time, which is six years for bachelor's degrees;
(d) Transfer rates: The annual number and percentage of students
who transfer from a two-year to a four-year institution of higher
education;
(e) Time and credits to degree: The average length of time in
years and average number of credits that graduating students took to
earn a bachelor's degree;
(f) Enrollment in remedial education: The number and percentage of
entering first-time undergraduate students who place into and enroll in
remedial mathematics, English, or both;
(g) Success beyond remedial education: The number and percentage
of entering first-time undergraduate students who complete entry
college-level math and English courses within the first two consecutive
academic years;
(h) Credit accumulation: The number and percentage of first-time
undergraduate students completing two quarters or one semester worth of
credit during their first academic year;
(i) Retention rates: The number and percentage of entering
undergraduate students who enroll consecutively from fall-to-spring and
fall-to-fall at an institution of higher education;
(j) Course completion: The percentage of credit hours completed
out of those attempted during an academic year;
(k) Program participation and degree completion rates in bachelor
and advanced degree programs in the sciences, which includes
agriculture and natural resources, biology and biomedical sciences,
computer and information sciences, engineering and engineering
technologies, health professions and clinical sciences, mathematics and
statistics, and physical sciences and science technologies, including
participation and degree completion rates for students from
traditionally underrepresented populations;
(l) Annual enrollment: Annual unduplicated number of students
enrolled over a twelve-month period at institutions of higher education
including by student level;
(m) Annual first-time enrollment: Total first-time students
enrolled in a four-year institution of higher education;
(n) Completion ratio: Annual ratio of undergraduate and graduate
degrees and certificates, of at least one year in expected length,
awarded per one hundred full-time equivalent undergraduate students at
the state level;
(o) Market penetration: Annual ratio of undergraduate and graduate
degrees and certificates, of at least one year in program length,
awarded relative to the state's population age eighteen to twenty-four
years old with a high school diploma;
(p) Student debt load: Median three-year distribution of debt
load, excluding private loans or debts incurred before coming to the
institution;
(q) Data related to enrollment, completion rates, participation
rates, and debt load shall be disaggregated for students in the
following income brackets to the maximum extent possible:
(i) Up to seventy percent of the median family income;
(ii) Between seventy-one percent and one hundred twenty-five
percent of the median family income; and
(iii) Above one hundred twenty-five percent of the median family
income; and
(r) Yearly percentage increases in the average cost of
undergraduate instruction.
(3) Four-year institutions of higher education must count all
students when collecting data, not only first-time, full-time
((freshmen)) first-year students.
(4) In conjunction with the office of financial management, all
four-year institutions of higher education must display the data
described in subsection (2) of this section in a uniform dashboard
format on the office of financial management's web site no later than
December 1, 2011, and updated thereafter annually by December 1st. To
the maximum extent possible, the information must be viewable by race
and ethnicity, gender, state and county of origin, age, and
socioeconomic status. The information may be tailored to meet the
needs of various target audiences such as students, researchers, and
the general public.
(5) The council shall use performance data from the education data
center for the purposes of strategic planning, to report on progress
toward achieving statewide goals, and to develop priorities proposed in
the ten-year plan for higher education.

Sec. 61 RCW 28B.77.220 and 2012 c 229 s 541 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The council must convene work groups to develop transfer
associate degrees that will satisfy lower division requirements at
public four-year institutions of higher education for specific academic
majors. Work groups must include representatives from the state board
for community and technical colleges and the council of presidents, as
well as faculty from two and four-year institutions. Work groups may
include representatives from independent four-year institutions.
(2) Each transfer associate degree developed under this section
must enable a student to complete the lower-division courses or
competencies for general education requirements and preparation for the
major that a direct-entry student would typically complete in the
((freshman)) first-year student and sophomore years for that academic
major.
(3) Completion of a transfer associate degree does not guarantee a
student admission into an institution of higher education or admission
into a major, minor, or professional program at an institution of
higher education that has competitive admission standards for the
program based on grade point average or other performance criteria.
(4) During the 2004-05 academic year, the work groups must develop
transfer degrees for elementary education, engineering, and nursing.
As necessary based on demand or identified need, the council must
convene additional groups to identify and develop additional transfer
degrees. The council must give priority to majors in high demand by
transfer students and majors that the general direct transfer agreement
associate degree does not adequately prepare students to enter
automatically upon transfer.
(5) The council, in collaboration with the intercollege relations
commission, must collect and maintain lists of courses offered by each
community and technical college and public four-year institution of
higher education that fall within each transfer associate degree.
(6) The council must monitor implementation of transfer associate
degrees by public four-year institutions to ensure compliance with
subsection (2) of this section.
(7) Beginning January 10, 2005, the council must submit a progress
report on the development of transfer associate degrees to the higher
education committees of the house of representatives and the senate.
The first progress report must include measurable benchmark indicators
to monitor the effectiveness of the initiatives in improving transfer
and baseline data for those indicators before the implementation of the
initiatives. Subsequent reports must be submitted by January 10th of
each odd-numbered year and must monitor progress on the indicators,
describe development of additional transfer associate degrees, and
provide other data on improvements in transfer efficiency.

Sec. 62 RCW 35.39.060 and 2009 c 549 s 2076 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any city or town now or hereafter operating an employees' pension
system with the approval of the board otherwise responsible for
management of its respective funds may invest, reinvest, manage,
contract, sell, or exchange investments acquired. Investments shall be
made in accordance with investment policy duly established and
published by the board. In discharging its duties under this section,
the board shall act with the care, skill, prudence, and diligence under
the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent ((man or woman))
person acting in a like capacity and familiar with such matters would
use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like
aims; shall diversify the investments of the employees' pension system
so as to minimize the risk of large losses; and shall act in accordance
with the documents and instruments governing the employees' pension
system, insofar as such documents and instruments are consistent with
the provisions of this title.

Sec. 63 RCW 35.50.260 and 1997 c 393 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In foreclosing local improvement assessments the action shall be
tried to the court without a jury. If the parties interested in any
particular lot, tract, or parcel default, the court may enter judgment
of foreclosure and sale as to such parties and lots, tracts, or parcels
and the action may proceed as to the remaining defendants and lots,
tracts, or parcels. Judgment and order of sale may be entered as to
any one or more separate lots, tracts, or parcels involved in the
action and the court shall retain jurisdiction to others.
The judgment shall specify separately the amount of the
installments with interest, penalty, and all reasonable administrative
costs, including, but not limited to, the title searches, chargeable to
each lot, tract, or parcel. The judgment shall have the effect of a
separate judgment as to each lot, tract, or parcel described in the
judgment, and any appeal shall not invalidate or delay the judgment
except as to the property concerning which the appeal is taken. In the
judgment the court shall order the lots, tracts, or parcels therein
described sold by the city or town treasurer or by the county sheriff
and an order of sale shall issue pursuant thereto for the enforcement
of the judgment.
In all other respects, the trial, judgment, and appeals to the
supreme court or the court of appeals shall be governed by the statutes
governing the foreclosure of mortgages on real property.
Prior to the sale of the property, if the property is shown on the
property tax rolls under unknown owner or if the property contains a
residential structure having an assessed value of two thousand dollars
or more, the treasurer shall order or conduct a title search of the
property to determine the record title holders and all persons claiming
a mortgage, deed of trust, or mechanic's, laborer's, ((materialmen's))
material supplier's, or vendor's lien on the property.
At least thirty days prior to the sale of the property, a copy of
the notice of sale shall be mailed by certified and regular mail to all
defendants in the foreclosure action as to that parcel, lot, or tract
and, if the owner is unknown or the property contains a residential
structure having an assessed value of two thousand dollars or more, a
copy of the notice of sale shall be mailed by regular and certified
mail to any additional record title holders and persons claiming a
mortgage, deed of trust, or mechanic's, laborer's, ((materialmen's))
material supplier's, or vendor's lien on the property.
In all other respects, the procedure for sale shall be conducted in
the same manner as property tax sales described in RCW 84.64.080.

Sec. 64 RCW 35A.37.010 and 1995 c 301 s 60 are each amended to
read as follows:
Code cities shall establish such funds for the segregation,
budgeting, expenditure, and accounting for moneys received for special
purposes as are required by general law applicable to such cities'
activities and the officers thereof shall pay into, expend from, and
account for such moneys in the manner provided therefor including, but
not limited to, the requirements of the following:
(1) Accounting funds as required by RCW 35.37.010;
(2) Annexation and consolidation fund as required by chapters 35.10
and 35.13 RCW;
(3) Assessment fund as required by RCW 8.12.480;
(4) Equipment rental fund as authorized by RCW 35.21.088;
(5) Current expense fund as required by RCW 35.37.010, usually
referred to as the general fund;
(6) Local improvement guaranty fund as required by RCW 35.54.010;
(7) An indebtedness and sinking fund, together with separate funds
for utilities and institutions as required by RCW 35.37.020;
(8) Local improvement district fund and revolving fund as required
by RCW 35.45.130 and 35.48.010;
(9) City street fund as required by chapter 35.76 RCW and RCW
47.24.040;
(10) ((Firemen's)) Firefighters' relief and pension fund as
required by chapters 41.16 and 41.18 RCW;
(11) ((Policemen's)) Police relief and pension fund as required by
RCW 41.20.130 and 63.32.030;
(12) First-class cities' employees retirement and pension system as
authorized by chapter 41.28 RCW;
(13) Applicable rules of the state auditor.

Sec. 65 RCW 35A.42.040 and 1991 c 81 s 39 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any specific enumeration of duties of city clerks in
a code city's charter or ordinances, and without limiting the
generality of RCW 35A.21.030 of this title, the clerks of all code
cities shall perform the following duties in the manner prescribed, to
wit: (1) Certification of city streets as part of the highway system
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 47.24.010; (2) perform the
functions of a member of a ((firemen's)) firefighters' pension board as
provided by RCW 41.16.020; (3) keep a record of ordinances of the city
and provide copies thereof as authorized by RCW 5.44.080; (4) serve as
applicable the trustees of any police relief and pension board as
authorized by RCW 41.20.010; and (5) serve as secretary-treasurer of
volunteer firefighters' relief and pension boards as provided in RCW
41.24.060.

Sec. 66 RCW 35A.84.010 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.84.010 are each
amended to read as follows:
The taxation of property in code cities shall be governed by
general provisions of the law including, but not limited to, the
provisions of: (1) Chapter 84.09 RCW, relating to the time for
establishment of official boundaries of taxing districts on the first
day of March of each year; (2) chapter 84.12 RCW relating to the
assessment and taxation of public utilities; (3) chapter 84.16 RCW,
relating to the apportionment of taxation on private car companies; (4)
chapter 84.20 RCW, relating to the taxation of easements of public
utilities; (5) chapter 84.24 RCW, relating to the reassessment of
property; (6) chapter 84.36 RCW, relating to property subject to
taxation and exemption therefrom; (7) chapter 84.40 RCW relating to the
listing of property for assessment; (8) chapter 84.41 RCW, relating to
reevaluation of property; (9) chapter 84.44 RCW, relating to the
taxable situs of personalty; (10) chapter 84.48 RCW, relating to the
equalization of assessments; (11) chapter 84.52 RCW, relating to the
levy of taxes, both regular and excess; (12) chapter 84.56 RCW,
relating to the collection of taxes; (13) chapter 84.60 RCW, relating
to the lien of taxes and the priority thereof; (14) chapter 84.69 RCW,
relating to refunds and claims therefor against the code city; and (15)
RCW 41.16.060, relating to taxation for ((firemen's)) firefighters'
pension fund.

Sec. 67 RCW 36.39.060 and 1983 c 290 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Counties, cities, and towns are granted the authority, and it
is hereby declared to be a public purpose for counties, cities, and
towns, to establish and administer senior citizens programs either
directly or by creating public corporations or authorities to carry out
the programs and to expend their own funds for such purposes, as well
as to expend federal, state, or private funds that are made available
for such purposes. Such federal funds shall include, but not be
limited to, funds provided under the federal older Americans act, as
amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 et seq.).
(2) Counties, cities, and towns may establish and administer long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds programs for residents, patients, and
clients if such a program is not prohibited by federal or state law.
Such local ((ombudsman)) ombuds programs shall be coordinated with the
efforts of other long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds programs,
including the office of the state long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds
established in RCW 43.190.030, to avoid multiple investigation of
complaints.

Sec. 68 RCW 41.04.130 and 1945 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any city of the first class may, by ordinance, extend, upon
conditions deemed proper, the provisions of retirement and pension
systems for superannuated and disabled officers and employees to
officers and employees with five years of continuous service and acting
in capacities in which they would otherwise not be entitled to
participation in such systems: PROVIDED, That the following shall be
specifically exempted from the provisions of this section.
(1) Members of the police departments who are entitled to the
benefits of the police relief and pension fund as established by state
law.
(2) Members of the fire department who are entitled to the benefits
of the ((firemen's)) firefighters' relief and pension fund as
established by state law.

Sec. 69 RCW 41.26.110 and 2005 c 66 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All claims for disability shall be acted upon and either
approved or disapproved by either type of disability board authorized
to be created in this section.
(a) Each city having a population of twenty thousand or more shall
establish a disability board having jurisdiction over all members
employed by those cities and composed of the following five members:
Two members of the city legislative body to be appointed by the mayor;
one active or retired firefighter employed by or retired from the city
to be elected by the firefighters employed by or retired from the city
who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; one active or retired
law enforcement officer employed by or retired from the city to be
elected by the law enforcement officers employed by or retired from the
city who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; and one member
from the public at large who resides within the city to be appointed by
the other four members designated in this subsection. Only those
active or retired firefighters and law enforcement officers who are
subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the right to elect under
this section. All firefighters and law enforcement officers employed
by or retired from the city are eligible for election. Each of the
elected members shall serve a two year term. The members appointed
pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two year terms: PROVIDED,
That cities of the first class only, shall retain existing
((firemen's)) firefighters' pension boards established pursuant to RCW
41.16.020 and existing boards of trustees of the relief and pension
fund of the police department as established pursuant to RCW 41.20.010
which such boards shall have authority to act upon and approve or
disapprove claims for disability by firefighters or law enforcement
officers as provided under the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system act.
(b) Each county shall establish a disability board having
jurisdiction over all members employed by or retired from an employer
within the county and not employed by a city in which a disability
board is established. The county disability board so created shall be
composed of five members to be chosen as follows: One member of the
legislative body of the county to be appointed by the county
legislative body; one member of a city or town legislative body located
within the county which does not contain a city disability board
established pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section to be chosen
by a majority of the mayors of such cities and towns within the county
which does not contain a city disability board; one active firefighter
or retired firefighter employed by or retired from an employer within
the county to be elected by the firefighters employed or retired from
an employer within the county who are not employed by or retired from
a city in which a disability board is established and who are subject
to the jurisdiction of that board; one law enforcement officer or
retired law enforcement officer employed by or retired from an employer
within the county to be elected by the law enforcement officers
employed in or retired from an employer within the county who are not
employed by or retired from a city in which a disability board is
established and who are subject to the jurisdiction of that board; and
one member from the public at large who resides within the county but
does not reside within a city in which a city disability board is
established, to be appointed by the other four members designated in
this subsection. However, in counties with a population less than
sixty thousand, the member of the disability board appointed by a
majority of the mayors of the cities and towns within the county that
do not contain a city disability board must be a resident of one of the
cities and towns but need not be a member of a city or town legislative
body. Only those active or retired firefighters and law enforcement
officers who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the
right to elect under this section. All firefighters and law
enforcement officers employed by or retired from an employer within the
county who are not employed by or retired from a city in which a
disability board is established are eligible for election. All members
appointed or elected pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two
year terms. If there are no firefighters under the jurisdiction of the
board eligible to vote, a second eligible employee representative shall
be elected by the law enforcement officers eligible to vote. If there
are no law enforcement officers under the jurisdiction of the board
eligible to vote, a second eligible representative shall be elected by
the firefighters eligible to vote.
(2) The members of both the county and city disability boards shall
not receive compensation for their service upon the boards but the
members shall be reimbursed by their respective county or city for all
expenses incidental to such service as to the amount authorized by law.
(3) The disability boards authorized for establishment by this
section shall perform all functions, exercise all powers, and make all
such determinations as specified in this chapter.

Sec. 70 RCW 41.26.150 and 1992 c 22 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any active member, or any member hereafter retired, on
account of service, sickness, or disability, not caused or brought on
by dissipation or abuse, of which the disability board shall be judge,
is confined in any hospital or in home, and whether or not so confined,
requires medical services, the employer shall pay for the active or
retired member the necessary medical services not payable from some
other source as provided for in subsection (2) of this section. In the
case of active or retired firefighters the employer may make the
payments provided for in this section from the ((firemen's))
firefighters' pension fund established pursuant to RCW 41.16.050 where
the fund had been established prior to March 1, 1970. If this pension
fund is depleted, the employer shall have the obligation to pay all
benefits payable under chapters 41.16 and 41.18 RCW.
(a) The disability board in all cases may have the active or
retired member suffering from such sickness or disability examined at
any time by a licensed physician or physicians, to be appointed by the
disability board, for the purpose of ascertaining the nature and extent
of the sickness or disability, the physician or physicians to report to
the disability board the result of the examination within three days
thereafter. Any active or retired member who refuses to submit to such
examination or examinations shall forfeit all rights to benefits under
this section for the period of the refusal.
(b) The disability board shall designate the medical services
available to any sick or disabled member.
(2) The medical services payable under this section will be reduced
by any amount received or eligible to be received by the member under
workers' compensation, social security including the changes
incorporated under Public Law 89-97, insurance provided by another
employer, other pension plan, or any other similar source. Failure to
apply for coverage if otherwise eligible under the provisions of Public
Law 89-97 shall not be deemed a refusal of payment of benefits thereby
enabling collection of charges under the provisions of this chapter.
(3) Upon making the payments provided for in subsection (1) of this
section, the employer shall be subrogated to all rights of the member
against any third party who may be held liable for the member's
injuries or for payment of the cost of medical services in connection
with a member's sickness or disability to the extent necessary to
recover the amount of payments made by the employer.
(4) Any employer under this chapter, either singly, or jointly with
any other such employer or employers through an association thereof as
provided for in chapter 48.21 RCW, may provide for all or part of one
or more plans of group hospitalization and medical aid insurance to
cover any of its employees who are members of the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, and/or
retired former employees who were, before retirement, members of the
retirement system, through contracts with regularly constituted
insurance carriers, with health maintenance organizations as defined in
chapter 48.46 RCW, or with health care service contractors as defined
in chapter 48.44 RCW. Benefits payable under ((any)) the (([under
the])) plan or plans shall be deemed to be amounts received or eligible
to be received by the active or retired member under subsection (2) of
this section.
(5) Any employer under this chapter may, at its discretion, elect
to reimburse a retired former employee under this chapter for premiums
the retired former employee has paid for medical insurance that
supplements medicare, including premiums the retired former employee
has paid for medicare part B coverage.

Sec. 71 RCW 43.06A.010 and 1996 c 131 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created an office of the family and children's
((ombudsman)) ombuds within the office of the governor for the purpose
of promoting public awareness and understanding of family and children
services, identifying system issues and responses for the governor and
the legislature to act upon, and monitoring and ensuring compliance
with administrative acts, relevant statutes, rules, and policies
pertaining to family and children's services and the placement,
supervision, and treatment of children in the state's care or in state-licensed facilities or residences. The ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall
report directly to the governor and shall exercise his or her powers
and duties independently of the secretary.

Sec. 72 RCW 43.06A.020 and 1998 c 288 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to confirmation by the senate, the governor shall
appoint an ((ombudsman)) ombuds who shall be a person of recognized
judgment, independence, objectivity, and integrity, and shall be
qualified by training or experience, or both, in family and children's
services law and policy. Prior to the appointment, the governor shall
consult with, and may receive recommendations from the committee,
regarding the selection of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds.
(2) The person appointed ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall hold office for
a term of three years and shall continue to hold office until
reappointed or until his or her successor is appointed. The governor
may remove the ((ombudsman)) ombuds only for neglect of duty,
misconduct, or inability to perform duties. Any vacancy shall be
filled by similar appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Sec. 73 RCW 43.06A.030 and 1996 c 131 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall perform the following duties:
(1) Provide information as appropriate on the rights and
responsibilities of individuals receiving family and children's
services, and on the procedures for providing these services;
(2) Investigate, upon his or her own initiative or upon receipt of
a complaint, an administrative act alleged to be contrary to law, rule,
or policy, imposed without an adequate statement of reason, or based on
irrelevant, immaterial, or erroneous grounds; however, the
((ombudsman)) ombuds may decline to investigate any complaint as
provided by rules adopted under this chapter;
(3) Monitor the procedures as established, implemented, and
practiced by the department to carry out its responsibilities in
delivering family and children's services with a view toward
appropriate preservation of families and ensuring children's health and
safety;
(4) Review periodically the facilities and procedures of state
institutions serving children, and state-licensed facilities or
residences;
(5) Recommend changes in the procedures for addressing the needs of
families and children;
(6) Submit annually to the committee and to the governor by
November 1st a report analyzing the work of the office, including
recommendations;
(7) Grant the committee access to all relevant records in the
possession of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds unless prohibited by law; and
(8) Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

Sec. 74 RCW 43.06A.050 and 2005 c 274 s 294 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall treat all matters under
investigation, including the identities of service recipients,
complainants, and individuals from whom information is acquired, as
confidential, except as far as disclosures may be necessary to enable
the ((ombudsman)) ombuds to perform the duties of the office and to
support any recommendations resulting from an investigation. Upon
receipt of information that by law is confidential or privileged, the
((ombudsman)) ombuds shall maintain the confidentiality of such
information and shall not further disclose or disseminate the
information except as provided by applicable state or federal law.
Investigative records of the office of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds are
confidential and are exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56
RCW.

Sec. 75 RCW 43.06A.060 and 1998 c 288 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Neither the ((ombudsman)) ombuds nor the ((ombudsman's)) ombuds's
staff may be compelled, in any judicial or administrative proceeding,
to testify or to produce evidence regarding the exercise of the
official duties of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds or of the ((ombudsman's))
ombuds's staff. All related memoranda, work product, notes, and case
files of the ((ombudsman's)) ombuds's office are confidential, are not
subject to discovery, judicial or administrative subpoena, or other
method of legal compulsion, and are not admissible in evidence in a
judicial or administrative proceeding. This section shall not apply to
the legislative children's oversight committee.

Sec. 76 RCW 43.06A.070 and 1998 c 288 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Identifying information about complainants or witnesses shall not
be subject to any method of legal compulsion, nor shall such
information be revealed to the legislative children's oversight
committee or the governor except under the following circumstances:
(1) The complainant or witness waives confidentiality; (2) under a
legislative subpoena when there is a legislative investigation for
neglect of duty or misconduct by the ((ombudsman)) ombuds or
((ombudsman's)) ombuds's office when the identifying information is
necessary to the investigation of the ((ombudsman's)) ombuds's acts; or
(3) under an investigation or inquiry by the governor as to neglect of
duty or misconduct by the ((ombudsman)) ombuds or ((ombudsman's))
ombuds's office when the identifying information is necessary to the
investigation of the ((ombudsman' [ombudsman's])) ombuds's acts.
For the purposes of this section, "identifying information"
includes the complainant's or witness's name, location, telephone
number, likeness, social security number or other identification
number, or identification of immediate family members.

Sec. 77 RCW 43.06A.080 and 1998 c 288 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The privilege described in RCW 43.06A.060 does not apply when:
(1) The ((ombudsman)) ombuds or ((ombudsman's)) ombuds's staff
member has direct knowledge of an alleged crime, and the testimony,
evidence, or discovery sought is relevant to that allegation;
(2) The ((ombudsman)) ombuds or a member of the ((ombudsman's))
ombuds's staff has received a threat of, or becomes aware of a risk of,
imminent serious harm to any person, and the testimony, evidence, or
discovery sought is relevant to that threat or risk;
(3) The ((ombudsman)) ombuds has been asked to provide general
information regarding the general operation of, or the general
processes employed at, the ((ombudsman's)) ombuds's office; or
(4) The ((ombudsman)) ombuds or ((ombudsman's)) ombuds's staff
member has direct knowledge of a failure by any person specified in RCW
26.44.030, including the state family and children's ((ombudsman))
ombuds or any volunteer in the ((ombudsman's)) ombuds's office, to
comply with RCW 26.44.030.

Sec. 78 RCW 43.06A.085 and 2009 c 88 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An employee of the office of the family and children's
((ombudsman)) ombuds is not liable for good faith performance of
responsibilities under this chapter.
(2) No discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be
taken against an employee of the department, an employee of a
contracting agency of the department, a foster parent, or a recipient
of family and children's services for any communication made, or
information given or disclosed, to aid the office of the family and
children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds in carrying out its responsibilities,
unless the communication or information is made, given, or disclosed
maliciously or without good faith. This subsection is not intended to
infringe on the rights of the employer to supervise, discipline, or
terminate an employee for other reasons.
(3) All communications by an ((ombudsman)) ombuds, if reasonably
related to the requirements of that individual's responsibilities under
this chapter and done in good faith, are privileged and that privilege
shall serve as a defense in any action in libel or slander.

Sec. 79 RCW 43.06A.090 and 1998 c 288 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the ((ombudsman)) ombuds or ((ombudsman's)) ombuds's staff
member has reasonable cause to believe that any public official,
employee, or other person has acted in a manner warranting criminal or
disciplinary proceedings, the ((ombudsman)) ombuds or ((ombudsman's))
ombuds's staff member shall report the matter, or cause a report to be
made, to the appropriate authorities.

Sec. 80 RCW 43.06A.100 and 2008 c 211 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of social and health services shall:
(1) Allow the ((ombudsman)) ombuds or the ((ombudsman's)) ombuds's
designee to communicate privately with any child in the custody of the
department for the purposes of carrying out its duties under this
chapter;
(2) Permit the ((ombudsman)) ombuds or the ((ombudsman's)) ombuds
designee physical access to state institutions serving children, and
state licensed facilities or residences for the purpose of carrying out
its duties under this chapter;
(3) Upon the ((ombudsman's)) ombuds's request, grant the
((ombudsman)) ombuds or the ((ombudsman's)) ombuds's designee the right
to access, inspect, and copy all relevant information, records, or
documents in the possession or control of the department that the
((ombudsman)) ombuds considers necessary in an investigation; and
(4) Grant the office of the family and children's ((ombudsman))
ombuds unrestricted online access to the case and management
information system (CAMIS) or any successor information system for the
purpose of carrying out its duties under this chapter.

Sec. 81 RCW 43.06A.110 and 2008 c 211 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The office of the family and children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall
issue an annual report to the legislature on the status of the
implementation of child fatality review recommendations.

Sec. 82 RCW 43.06B.010 and 2006 c 116 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the office of the education
((ombudsman)) ombuds within the office of the governor for the purposes
of providing information to parents, students, and others regarding
their rights and responsibilities with respect to the state's public
elementary and secondary education system, and advocating on behalf of
elementary and secondary students.
(2)(a) The governor shall appoint an ((ombudsman)) ombuds who shall
be a person of recognized judgment, independence, objectivity, and
integrity and shall be qualified by training or experience or both in
the following areas:
(i) Public education law and policy in this state;
(ii) Dispute resolution or problem resolution techniques, including
mediation and negotiation; and
(iii) Community outreach.
(b) The education ((ombudsman)) ombuds may not be an employee of
any school district, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, or the state board of education while serving as an
education ((ombudsman)) ombuds.
(3) Before the appointment of the education ((ombudsman)) ombuds,
the governor shall share information regarding the appointment to a
six-person legislative committee appointed and comprised as follows:
(a) The committee shall consist of three senators and three members
of the house of representatives from the legislature.
(b) The senate members of the committee shall be appointed by the
president of the senate. Two members shall represent the majority
caucus and one member the minority caucus.
(c) The house of representatives members of the committee shall be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. Two members
shall represent the majority caucus and one member the minority caucus.
(4) If sufficient appropriations are provided, the education
((ombudsman)) ombuds shall delegate and certify regional education
((ombudsmen)) ombuds. The education ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall ensure
that the regional ((ombudsmen)) ombuds selected are appropriate to the
community in which they serve and hold the same qualifications as in
subsection (2)(a) of this section. The education ((ombudsman)) ombuds
may not contract with the superintendent of public instruction, or any
school, school district, or current employee of a school, school
district, or the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
the provision of regional ((ombudsman)) ombuds services.

Sec. 83 RCW 43.06B.020 and 2008 c 165 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The education ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall have the following powers
and duties:
(1) To develop parental involvement materials, including
instructional guides developed to inform parents of the essential
academic learning requirements required by the superintendent of public
instruction. The instructional guides also shall contain actions
parents may take to assist their children in meeting the requirements,
and should focus on reaching parents who have not previously been
involved with their children's education;
(2) To provide information to students, parents, and interested
members of the public regarding this state's public elementary and
secondary education system;
(3) To identify obstacles to greater parent and community
involvement in school shared decision-making processes and recommend
strategies for helping parents and community members to participate
effectively in school shared decision-making processes, including
understanding and respecting the roles of school building
administrators and staff;
(4) To identify and recommend strategies for improving the success
rates of ethnic and racial student groups and students with
disabilities, with disproportionate academic achievement;
(5) To refer complainants and others to appropriate resources,
agencies, or departments;
(6) To facilitate the resolution of complaints made by parents and
students with regard to the state's public elementary and secondary
education system;
(7) To perform such other functions consistent with the purpose of
the education ((ombudsman)) ombuds; and
(8) To consult with representatives of the following organizations
and groups regarding the work of the office of the education
((ombudsman)) ombuds, including but not limited to:
(a) The state parent teacher association;
(b) Certificated and classified school employees;
(c) School and school district administrators;
(d) Parents of special education students;
(e) Parents of English language learners;
(f) The Washington state commission on Hispanic affairs;
(g) The Washington state commission on African-American affairs;
(h) The Washington state commission on Asian Pacific American
affairs; and
(i) The governor's office of Indian affairs.

Sec. 84 RCW 43.06B.030 and 2006 c 116 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Neither the education ((ombudsman)) ombuds nor any regional
educational ((ombudsmen)) ombuds are liable for good faith performance
of responsibilities under this chapter.
(2) No discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be
taken against any student or employee of any school district, the
office of the superintendent of public ((education [instruction]))
instruction, or the state board of education, for any communication
made, or information given or disclosed, to aid the education
((ombudsman)) ombuds in carrying out his or her duties and
responsibilities, unless the same was done without good faith or
maliciously. This subsection is not intended to infringe upon the
rights of a school district to supervise, discipline, or terminate an
employee for other reasons or to discipline a student for other
reasons.
(3) All communications by the education ((ombudsman)) ombuds or the
((ombudsman's)) ombuds's staff or designee, if reasonably related to
the education ((ombudsman's)) ombuds's duties and responsibilities and
done in good faith, are privileged and that privilege shall serve as a
defense to any action in libel or slander.

Sec. 85 RCW 43.06B.040 and 2006 c 116 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The education ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall treat all matters,
including the identities of students, complainants, and individuals
from whom information is acquired, as confidential, except as necessary
to enable the education ((ombudsman)) ombuds to perform the duties of
the office. Upon receipt of information that by law is confidential or
privileged, the ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall maintain the confidentiality
of such information and shall not further disclose or disseminate the
information except as provided by applicable state or federal law.

Sec. 86 RCW 43.06B.050 and 2006 c 116 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The education ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall report on the work and
accomplishment of the office and advise and make recommendations to the
governor, the legislature, and the state board of education annually.
The initial report to the governor, the legislature, and the state
board of education shall be made by September 1, 2007, and there shall
be annual reports by September 1st each year thereafter. The annual
reports shall provide at least the following information:
(1) How the education ((ombudsman's)) ombuds's services have been
used and by whom;
(2) Methods for the education ((ombudsman)) ombuds to increase and
enhance family and community involvement in public education;
(3) Recommendations to eliminate barriers and obstacles to
meaningful family and community involvement in public education; and
(4) Strategies to improve the educational opportunities for all
students in the state, including recommendations from organizations and
groups provided in RCW 43.06B.020(8).

Sec. 87 RCW 43.06B.060 and 2010 c 239 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to duties assigned under RCW 43.06B.020, the office of
the education ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall serve as the lead agency to
provide resources and tools to parents and families about public school
antiharassment policies and strategies.

Sec. 88 RCW 43.190.010 and 1983 c 290 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that in order to comply with the federal
older Americans act and to effectively assist residents, patients, and
clients of long-term care facilities in the assertion of their civil
and human rights, a long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds program should
be instituted.

Sec. 89 RCW 43.190.030 and 1997 c 194 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created the office of the state long-term care
((ombudsman)) ombuds. The department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce shall contract with a private nonprofit
organization to provide long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds services as
specified under, and consistent with, the federal older Americans act
as amended, federal mandates, the goals of the state, and the needs of
its citizens. The department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce shall ensure that all program and staff support
necessary to enable the ((ombudsman)) ombuds to effectively protect the
interests of residents, patients, and clients of all long-term care
facilities is provided by the nonprofit organization that contracts to
provide long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds services. The department
of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce shall adopt
rules to carry out this chapter and the long-term care ((ombudsman))
ombuds provisions of the federal older Americans act, as amended, and
applicable federal regulations. The long-term care ((ombudsman))
ombuds program shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To provide services for coordinating the activities of long-term care ((ombudsmen)) ombuds throughout the state;
(2) Carry out such other activities as the department of
((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce deems
appropriate;
(3) Establish procedures consistent with RCW 43.190.110 for
appropriate access by long-term care ((ombudsmen)) ombuds to long-term
care facilities and patients' records, including procedures to protect
the confidentiality of the records and ensure that the identity of any
complainant or resident will not be disclosed without the written
consent of the complainant or resident, or upon court order;
(4) Establish a statewide uniform reporting system to collect and
analyze data relating to complaints and conditions in long-term care
facilities for the purpose of identifying and resolving significant
problems, with provision for submission of such data to the department
of social and health services and to the federal department of health
and human services, or its successor agency, on a regular basis; and
(5) Establish procedures to assure that any files maintained by
((ombudsman)) ombuds programs shall be disclosed only at the discretion
of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds having authority over the disposition of
such files, except that the identity of any complainant or resident of
a long-term care facility shall not be disclosed by such ((ombudsman))
ombuds unless:
(a) Such complainant or resident, or the complainant's or
resident's legal representative, consents in writing to such
disclosure; or
(b) Such disclosure is required by court order.

Sec. 90 RCW 43.190.040 and 2002 c 100 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds authorized by this
chapter or a local governmental authority shall have training or
experience or both in the following areas:
(a) Gerontology, long-term care, or other related social services
programs.
(b) The legal system.
(c) Dispute or problem resolution techniques, including
investigation, mediation, and negotiation.
(2) A long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall not have been
employed by or participated in the management of any long-term care
facility within the past year.
(3) A long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall not have been
employed in a governmental position with direct involvement in the
licensing, certification, or regulation of long-term care facilities
within the past year.
(4) No long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds or any member of his or
her immediate family shall have, or have had within the past year, any
significant ownership or investment interest in one or more long-term
care facilities.
(5) A long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall not be assigned to
a long-term care facility in which a member of that ((ombudsman's))
ombuds's immediate family resides.

Sec. 91 RCW 43.190.050 and 1983 c 290 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every long-term care facility shall post in a conspicuous location
a notice of the nursing home complaint toll-free number and the name,
address, and phone number of the office of the appropriate long-term
care ((ombudsman)) ombuds and a brief description of the services
provided by the office. The form of the notice shall be approved by
the office and the organization responsible for maintaining the nursing
home complaint toll-free number. This information shall also be
distributed to the residents, family members, and legal guardians upon
the resident's admission to the facility.

Sec. 92 RCW 43.190.060 and 1999 c 133 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
A long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall:
(1) Identify, investigate, and resolve complaints made by or on
behalf of residents of long-term care facilities relating to
administrative action, inaction, or decisions which may adversely
affect the health, safety, welfare, and rights of these individuals;
(2) Monitor the development and implementation of federal, state,
and local laws, rules, regulations, and policies with respect to long-term care facilities in this state;
(3) Provide information as appropriate to residents, resident
representatives, and others regarding the rights of residents, and to
public agencies regarding the problems of individuals residing in long-term care facilities; and
(4) Provide for training volunteers and promoting the development
of citizen organizations to participate in the ((ombudsman)) ombuds
program. A trained volunteer long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds, in
accordance with the policies and procedures established by the state
long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds program, shall inform residents,
their representatives, and others about the rights of residents, and
may identify, investigate, and resolve complaints made by or on behalf
of residents of long-term care facilities relating to action, inaction,
or decisions, that may adversely affect the health, safety, welfare,
and rights of these individuals.
Nothing in chapter 133, Laws of 1999 shall be construed to empower
the state long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds or any local long-term
care ((ombudsman)) ombuds with statutory or regulatory licensing or
sanctioning authority.

Sec. 93 RCW 43.190.065 and 1999 c 133 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
A local long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds, including a trained
volunteer long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds, shall have the duties
and authority set forth in the federal older Americans act (42 U.S.C.
Sec. 3058 et seq.) for local ((ombudsmen)) ombuds. The state long-term
care ((ombudsman)) ombuds and representatives of the office of the
state long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds, shall have the duties and
authority set forth in the federal older Americans act for the state
long-term care ((ombudsman))ombuds and representatives of the office of
the state long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds.

Sec. 94 RCW 43.190.070 and 1983 c 290 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the state long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds
shall develop referral procedures for all long-term care ((ombudsman))
ombuds programs to refer any complaint to any appropriate state or
local government agency. The department of social and health services
shall act as quickly as possible on any complaint referred to them by
a long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds.
(2) The department of social and health services shall respond to
any complaint against a long-term care facility which was referred to
it by a long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds and shall forward to that
((ombudsman)) ombuds a summary of the results of the investigation and
action proposed or taken.

Sec. 95 RCW 43.190.080 and 1983 c 290 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the state long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds
shall develop procedures governing the right of entry of all long-term
care ((ombudsmen)) ombuds to long-term care facilities and shall have
access to residents with provisions made for privacy for the purpose of
hearing, investigating, and resolving complaints of, and rendering
advice to, individuals who are patients or residents of the facilities
at any time deemed necessary and reasonable by the state ((ombudsman))
ombuds to effectively carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(2) Nothing in this chapter restricts, limits, or increases any
existing right of any organizations or individuals not described in
subsection (1) of this section to enter or provide assistance to
patients or residents of long-term care facilities.
(3) Nothing in this chapter restricts any right or privilege of any
patient or resident of a long-term care facility to receive visitors of
his or her choice.

Sec. 96 RCW 43.190.090 and 1983 c 290 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds is liable for good faith
performance of responsibilities under this chapter.
(2) No discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be
taken against any employee of a facility or agency, any patient,
resident, or client of a long-term care facility, or any volunteer, for
any communication made, or information given or disclosed, to aid the
long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds in carrying out its duties and
responsibilities, unless the same was done maliciously or without good
faith. This subsection is not intended to infringe on the rights of
the employer to supervise, discipline, or terminate an employee for
other reasons.
(3) All communications by a long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds, if
reasonably related to the requirements of that individual's
responsibilities under this chapter and done in good faith, are
privileged and that privilege shall serve as a defense to any action in
libel or slander.
(4) A representative of the office is exempt from being required to
testify in court as to any confidential matters except as the court may
deem necessary to enforce this chapter.

Sec. 97 RCW 43.190.110 and 1983 c 290 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
All records and files of long-term care ((ombudsmen)) ombuds
relating to any complaint or investigation made pursuant to carrying
out their duties and the identities of complainants, witnesses,
patients, or residents shall remain confidential unless disclosure is
authorized by the patient or resident or his or her guardian or legal
representative. No disclosures may be made outside the office without
the consent of any named witnesses, resident, patient, client, or
complainant unless the disclosure is made without the identity of any
of these individuals being disclosed.

Sec. 98 RCW 43.190.120 and 1983 c 290 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the intent that federal requirements be complied with and the
department annually expend at least one percent of the state's
allotment of social services funds from Title III B of the older
Americans act of 1965, as it exists as of July 24, 1983, or twenty
thousand dollars, whichever is greater to establish the state long-term
care ((ombudsman)) ombuds program established by this chapter if funds
are appropriated by the legislature.

Sec. 99 RCW 43.215.520 and 2006 c 209 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and maintain a toll-free
telephone number, and an interactive web-based system through which
persons may obtain information regarding child day care centers and
family day care providers. This number shall be available twenty-four
hours a day for persons to request information. The department shall
respond to recorded messages left at the number within two business
days. The number shall be published in reasonably available printed
and electronic media. The number shall be easily identifiable as a
number through which persons may obtain information regarding child day
care centers and family day care providers as set forth in this
section.
(2) Through the toll-free telephone line established by this
section, the department shall provide information to callers about:
(a) Whether a day care provider is licensed; (b) whether a day care
provider's license is current; (c) the general nature of any
enforcement against the providers; (d) how to report suspected or
observed noncompliance with licensing requirements; (e) how to report
alleged abuse or neglect in a day care; (f) how to report health,
safety, and welfare concerns in a day care; (g) how to receive follow-up assistance, including information on the office of the family and
children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds; and (h) how to receive referral
information on other agencies or entities that may be of further
assistance to the caller.
(3) Beginning in January 2006, the department shall print the toll-free number established by this section on the face of new licenses
issued to child day care centers and family day care providers.
(4) This section shall not be construed to require the disclosure
of any information that is exempt from public disclosure under chapter
42.56 RCW.

Sec. 100 RCW 44.04.220 and 1996 c 131 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created the legislative children's oversight committee
for the purpose of monitoring and ensuring compliance with
administrative acts, relevant statutes, rules, and policies pertaining
to family and children services and the placement, supervision, and
treatment of children in the state's care or in state-licensed
facilities or residences. The committee shall consist of three
senators and three representatives from the legislature. The senate
members of the committee shall be appointed by the president of the
senate. The house members of the committee shall be appointed by the
speaker of the house. Not more than two members from each chamber
shall be from the same political party. Members shall be appointed
before the close of each regular session of the legislature during an
odd-numbered year.
(2) The committee shall have the following powers:
(a) Selection of its officers and adopt rules for orderly
procedure;
(b) Request investigations by the ((ombudsman)) ombuds of
administrative acts;
(c) Receive reports of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds;
(d)(i) Obtain access to all relevant records in the possession of
the ((ombudsman)) ombuds, except as prohibited by law; and (ii) make
recommendations to all branches of government;
(e) Request legislation;
(f) Conduct hearings into such matters as it deems necessary.
(3) Upon receipt of records from the ((ombudsman)) ombuds, the
committee is subject to the same confidentiality restrictions as the
((ombudsman)) ombuds under RCW 43.06A.050.

Sec. 101 RCW 48.02.093 and 2012 c 150 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is established, within the office of the insurance
commissioner, the volunteer position of health care authority
((ombudsman)) ombuds to assist retirees enrolled in the public
employees' benefits board program. The volunteer position shall be
trained as part of the existing volunteer training provided to the
statewide health insurance benefit advisors. The position shall help
retirees with questions and concerns, assist the public employees'
benefits board program with identification of retiree concerns, and
maintain access to updated program information.

Sec. 102 RCW 48.18A.070 and 1994 c 92 s 503 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner shall
have sole and exclusive authority to regulate the issuance and sale of
variable contracts; except for the examination, issuance or renewal,
suspension or revocation, of a security ((salesman's)) salesperson's
license issued to persons selling variable contracts. To carry out the
purposes and provisions of this chapter, he or she may independently,
and in concert with the director of financial institutions, issue such
reasonable rules and regulations as may be appropriate.

Sec. 103 RCW 50.22.010 and 2011 c 4 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise:
(1) "Extended benefit period" means a period which:
(a) Begins with the third week after a week for which there is an
"on" indicator; and
(b) Ends with the third week after the first week for which there
is an "off" indicator: PROVIDED, That no extended benefit period shall
last for a period of less than thirteen consecutive weeks, and further
that no extended benefit period may begin by reason of an "on"
indicator before the fourteenth week after the close of a prior
extended benefit period which was in effect with respect to this state.
(2)(a) There is an "on" indicator for this state for a week if the
commissioner determines, in accordance with the regulations of the
United States secretary of labor, that for the period consisting of
such week and the immediately preceding twelve weeks:
(((a))) (i) The rate of insured unemployment, not seasonally
adjusted, equaled or exceeded one hundred twenty percent of the average
of such rates for the corresponding thirteen-week period ending in each
of the preceding two calendar years and equaled or exceeded five
percent; or
(((b))) (ii) For benefits for weeks of unemployment beginning after
March 6, 1993:
(((i))) (A) The average rate of total unemployment, seasonally
adjusted, as determined by the United States secretary of labor, for
the period consisting of the most recent three months for which data
for all states are published before the close of the week equals or
exceeds six and one-half percent; and
(((ii))) (B) The average rate of total unemployment in the state,
seasonally adjusted, as determined by the United States secretary of
labor, for the three-month period referred to in (((b)(i))) (a)(ii)(A)
of this subsection, equals or exceeds one hundred ten percent of the
average for either or both of the corresponding three-month periods
ending in the two preceding calendar years.
(((c))) (b) This subsection applies as provided under the tax
relief, unemployment insurance reauthorization, and job creation act of
2010 (P.L. 111-312) as it existed on December 17, 2010, or such
subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule,
consistent with the purposes of this subsection:
(i) The average rate of insured unemployment, not seasonally
adjusted, equaled or exceeded one hundred twenty percent of the average
of such rates for the corresponding thirteen-week period ending in all
of the preceding three calendar years and equaled or exceeded five
percent; or
(ii) The average rate of total unemployment, seasonally adjusted,
as determined by the United States secretary of labor, for the period
consisting of the most recent three months for which data for all
states are published before the close of the week equals or exceeds six
and one-half percent; and
(iii) The average rate of total unemployment in the state,
seasonally adjusted, as determined by the United States secretary of
labor, for the three-month period referred to in (((c))) (b)(ii) of
this subsection, equals or exceeds one hundred ten percent of the
average for any of the corresponding three-month periods ending in the
three preceding calendar years.
(3)(a) "High unemployment period" means any period of unemployment
beginning after March 6, 1993, during which an extended benefit period
would be in effect if:
(((a))) (i) The average rate of total unemployment, seasonally
adjusted, as determined by the United States secretary of labor, for
the period consisting of the most recent three months for which data
for all states are published before the close of the week equals or
exceeds eight percent; and
(((b))) (ii) The average rate of total unemployment in the state,
seasonally adjusted, as determined by the United States secretary of
labor, for the three-month period referred to in (a)(i) of this
subsection, equals or exceeds one hundred ten percent of the average
for either or both of the corresponding three-month periods ending in
the two preceding calendar years.
(((c))) (b) This subsection applies as provided under the tax
relief, unemployment insurance reauthorization, and job creation act of
2010 (P.L. 111-312) as it existed on December 17, 2010, or such
subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule,
consistent with the purposes of this subsection((.)):
(i) The average rate of total unemployment, seasonally adjusted, as
determined by the United States secretary of labor, for the period
consisting of the most recent three months for which data for all
states are published before the close of the week equals or exceeds
eight percent; and
(ii) The average rate of total unemployment in the state,
seasonally adjusted, as determined by the United States secretary of
labor, for the three-month period referred to in (a)(i) of this
subsection, equals or exceeds one hundred ten percent of the average
for any of the corresponding three-month periods ending in the three
preceding calendar years.
(4) There is an "off" indicator for this state for a week only if,
for the period consisting of such week and immediately preceding twelve
weeks, none of the options specified in subsection (2) or (3) of this
section result in an "on" indicator.
(5) "Regular benefits" means benefits payable to an individual
under this title or under any state law (including benefits payable to
federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen or ex-servicewomen
pursuant to 5 U.S.C. chapter 85) other than extended benefits or
additional benefits.
(6) "Extended benefits" means benefits payable for weeks of
unemployment beginning in an extended benefit period to an individual
under this title or under any state law (including benefits payable to
federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen or ex-servicewomen
pursuant to 5 U.S.C. chapter 85) other than regular or additional
benefits.
(7) "Additional benefits" are benefits totally financed by the
state and payable under this title to exhaustees by reason of
conditions of high unemployment or by reason of other special factors.
(8) "Eligibility period" of an individual means:
(a) The period consisting of the weeks in his or her benefit year
which begin in an extended benefit period that is in effect in this
state and, if his or her benefit year ends within such extended benefit
period, any weeks thereafter which begin in such period; or
(b) For an individual who is eligible for emergency unemployment
compensation during the extended benefit period beginning February 15,
2009, the period consisting of the week ending February 28, 2009, and
applies as provided under the tax relief, unemployment insurance
reauthorization, and job creation act of 2010 (P.L. 111-312) as it
existed on December 17, 2010, or such subsequent date as may be
provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of
this subsection.
(9) "Additional benefit eligibility period" of an individual means
the period consisting of the weeks in his or her benefit year which
begin in an additional benefit period that is in effect and, if his or
her benefit year ends within such additional benefit period, any weeks
thereafter which begin in such period.
(10) "Exhaustee" means an individual who, with respect to any week
of unemployment in his or her eligibility period:
(a) Has received, prior to such week, all of the regular benefits
that were payable to him or her under this title or any other state law
(including dependents' allowances and regular benefits payable to
federal civilian employees and ex-servicemen or ex-servicewomen under
5 U.S.C. chapter 85) in his or her current benefit year that includes
such week; or
(b) Has received, prior to such week, all of the regular benefits
that were available to him or her under this title or any other state
law (including dependents' allowances and regular benefits available to
federal civilian employees and ex-servicemen or ex-servicewomen under
5 U.S.C. chapter 85) in his or her current benefit year that includes
such week, after the cancellation of some or all of his or her wage
credits or the total or partial reduction of his or her rights to
regular benefits: PROVIDED, That, for the purposes of (a) and (b)
(([of this subsection])) of this subsection, an individual shall be
deemed to have received in his or her current benefit year all of the
regular benefits that were payable to him or her, or available to him
or her, as the case may be, even though:
(i) As a result of a pending appeal with respect to wages or
employment, or both, that were not included in the original monetary
determination with respect to his or her current benefit year, he or
she may subsequently be determined to be entitled to more regular
benefits; or
(ii) By reason of the seasonal provisions of another state law, he
or she is not entitled to regular benefits with respect to such week of
unemployment (although he or she may be entitled to regular benefits
with respect to future weeks of unemployment in the next season, as the
case may be, in his or her current benefit year), and he or she is
otherwise an exhaustee within the meaning of this section with respect
to his or her right to regular benefits under such state law seasonal
provisions during the season or off season in which that week of
unemployment occurs; or
(iii) Having established a benefit year, no regular benefits are
payable to him or her during such year because his or her wage credits
were canceled or his or her right to regular benefits was totally
reduced as the result of the application of a disqualification; or
(c) His or her benefit year having ended prior to such week, he or
she has insufficient wages or employment, or both, on the basis of
which he or she could establish in any state a new benefit year that
would include such week, or having established a new benefit year that
includes such week, he or she is precluded from receiving regular
benefits by reason of the provision in RCW 50.04.030 which meets the
requirement of section 3304(a)(7) of the federal unemployment tax act,
or the similar provision in any other state law; and
(d)(i) Has no right for such week to unemployment benefits or
allowances, as the case may be, under the railroad unemployment
insurance act, the trade expansion act of 1962, and such other federal
laws as are specified in regulations issued by the United States
secretary of labor; and
(ii) Has not received and is not seeking for such week unemployment
benefits under the unemployment compensation law of Canada, unless the
appropriate agency finally determines that he or she is not entitled to
unemployment benefits under such law for such week.
(11) "State law" means the unemployment insurance law of any state,
approved by the United States secretary of labor under section 3304 of
the internal revenue code of 1954.

Sec. 104 RCW 51.04.063 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 37 s 302 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding RCW 51.04.060 or any other provision of this
title, beginning on January 1, 2012, an injured worker who is at least
fifty-five years of age on or after January 1, 2012, fifty-three years
of age on or after January 1, 2015, or fifty years of age on or after
January 1, 2016, may choose from the following: (a) To continue to
receive all benefits for which they are eligible under this title, (b)
to participate in vocational training if eligible, or (c) to initiate
and agree to a resolution of their claim with a structured settlement.
(2)(a) As provided in this section, the parties to an allowed claim
may initiate and agree to resolve a claim with a structured settlement
for all benefits other than medical. Parties as defined in (b) of this
subsection may only initiate claim resolution structured settlements if
at least one hundred eighty days have passed since the claim was
received by the department or self-insurer and the order allowing the
claim is final and binding. All requirements of this title regarding
entitlement to and payment of benefits will apply during this period.
All claim resolution structured settlement agreements must be approved
by the board of industrial insurance appeals.
(b) For purposes of this section, "parties" means:
(i) For a state fund claim, the worker, the employer, and the
department. The employer will not be a party if the costs of the claim
or claims are no longer included in the calculation of the employer's
experience factor used to determine premiums, if they cannot be
located, are no longer in business, or they fail to respond or decline
to participate after timely notice of the claim resolution settlement
process provided by the board and the department.
(ii) For a self-insured claim, the worker and the employer.
(c) The claim resolution structured settlement agreements shall:
(i) Bind the parties with regard to all aspects of a claim except
medical benefits unless revoked by one of the parties as provided in
subsection (6) of this section;
(ii) Provide a periodic payment schedule to the worker equal to at
least twenty-five percent but not more than one hundred fifty percent
of the average monthly wage in the state pursuant to RCW 51.08.018,
except for the initial payment which may be up to six times the average
monthly wage in the state pursuant to RCW 51.08.018;
(iii) Not set aside or reverse an allowance order;
(iv) Not subject any employer who is not a signatory to the
agreement to any responsibility or burden under any claim; and
(v) Not subject any funds covered under this title to any
responsibility or burden without prior approval from the director or
designee.
(d) For state fund claims, the department shall negotiate the claim
resolution structured settlement agreement with the worker or their
representative and with the employer or employers and their
representative or representatives.
(e) For self-insured claims, the self-insured employer shall
negotiate the agreement with the worker or ((their)) his or her
representative. Workers of self-insured employers who are
unrepresented may request that the office of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds
for self-insured injured workers provide assistance or be present
during negotiations.
(f) Terms of the agreement may include the parties' agreement that
the claim shall remain open for future necessary medical or surgical
treatment related to the injury where there is a reasonable expectation
such treatment is necessary. The parties may also agree that specific
future treatment shall be provided without the application required in
RCW 51.32.160.
(g) Any claim resolution structured settlement agreement entered
into under this section must be in writing and signed by the parties or
their representatives and must clearly state that the parties
understand and agree to the terms of the agreement.
(h) If a worker is not represented by an attorney at the time of
signing a claim resolution structured settlement agreement, the parties
must forward a copy of the signed agreement to the board with a request
for a conference with an industrial appeals judge. The industrial
appeals judge must schedule a conference with all parties within
fourteen days for the purpose of (i) reviewing the terms of the
proposed settlement agreement by the parties; and (ii) ensuring the
worker has an understanding of the benefits generally available under
this title and that a claim resolution structured settlement agreement
may alter the benefits payable on the claim or claims. The judge may
schedule the initial conference for a later date with the consent of
the parties.
(i) Before approving the agreement, the industrial appeals judge
shall ensure the worker has an adequate understanding of the agreement
and its consequences to the worker.
(j) The industrial appeals judge may approve a claim resolution
structured settlement agreement only if the judge finds that the
agreement is in the best interest of the worker. When determining
whether the agreement is in the best interest of the worker, the
industrial appeals judge shall consider the following factors, taken as
a whole, with no individual factor being determinative:
(i) The nature and extent of the injuries and disabilities of the
worker;
(ii) The age and life expectancy of the injured worker;
(iii) Other benefits the injured worker is receiving or is entitled
to receive and the effect a claim resolution structured settlement
agreement might have on those benefits; and
(iv) The marital or domestic partnership status of the injured
worker.
(k) Within seven days after the conference, the industrial appeals
judge shall issue an order allowing or rejecting the claim resolution
structured settlement agreement. There is no appeal from the
industrial appeals judge's decision.
(l) If the industrial appeals judge issues an order allowing the
claim resolution structured settlement agreement, the order must be
submitted to the board.
(3) Upon receiving the agreement, the board shall approve it within
thirty working days of receipt unless it finds that:
(a) The parties have not entered into the agreement knowingly and
willingly;
(b) The agreement does not meet the requirements of a claim
resolution structured settlement agreement;
(c) The agreement is the result of a material misrepresentation of
law or fact;
(d) The agreement is the result of harassment or coercion; or
(e) The agreement is unreasonable as a matter of law.
(4) If a worker is represented by an attorney at the time of
signing a claim resolution structured settlement agreement, the parties
shall submit the agreement directly to the board without the conference
described in this section.
(5) If the board approves the agreement, it shall provide notice to
all parties. The department shall place the agreement in the
applicable claim file or files.
(6) A party may revoke consent to the claim resolution structured
settlement agreement by providing written notice to the other parties
and the board within thirty days after the date the agreement is
approved by the board.
(7) To the extent the worker is entitled to any benefits while a
claim resolution structured settlement agreement is being negotiated or
during the revocation period of an agreement, the benefits must be paid
pursuant to the requirements of this title until the agreement becomes
final.
(8) A claim resolution structured settlement agreement that meets
the conditions in this section and that has become final and binding as
provided in this section is binding on all parties to the agreement as
to its terms and the injuries and occupational diseases to which the
agreement applies. A claim resolution structured settlement agreement
that has become final and binding is not subject to appeal.
(9) All payments made to a worker pursuant to a final claim
resolution structured settlement agreement must be reported to the
department as claims costs pursuant to this title. If a self-insured
employer contracts with a third-party administrator for claim services
and the payment of benefits under this title, the third-party
administrator shall also disburse the structured settlement payments
pursuant to the agreement.
(10) Claims closed pursuant to a claim resolution structured
settlement agreement can be reopened pursuant to RCW 51.32.160 for
medical treatment only. Further temporary total, temporary partial,
permanent partial, or permanent total benefits are not payable under
the same claim or claims for which a claim resolution structured
settlement agreement has been approved by the board and has become
final.
(11) Parties aggrieved by the failure of any other party to comply
with the terms of a claim resolution structured settlement agreement
have one year from the date of failure to comply to petition to the
board. If the board determines that a party has failed to comply with
an agreement, ((they)) it will order compliance and will impose a
penalty payable to the aggrieved party of up to twenty-five percent of
the monetary amount unpaid at the time the petition for noncompliance
was filed. The board will also decide on any disputes as to attorneys'
fees for services related to claim resolution structured settlement
agreements.
(12) Parties and their representatives may not use settlement
offers or the claim resolution structured settlement agreement process
to harass or coerce any party. If the department determines that an
employer has engaged in a pattern of harassment or coercion, the
employer may be subject to penalty or corrective action, and may be
removed from the retrospective rating program or be decertified from
self-insurance under RCW 51.14.030.

Sec. 105 RCW 51.14.300 and 2007 c 281 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The office of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds for workers of industrial
insurance self-insured employers is created. The ((ombudsman)) ombuds
shall be appointed by the governor and report directly to the director
of the department. The office of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds may be
openly and competitively contracted by the governor in accordance with
chapter ((39.29)) 39.26 RCW but shall not be physically housed within
the industrial insurance division.

Sec. 106 RCW 51.14.310 and 2007 c 281 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The person appointed ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall hold office for a
term of six years and shall continue to hold office until reappointed
or until his or her successor is appointed. The governor may remove
the ((ombudsman)) ombuds only for neglect of duty, misconduct, or
inability to perform duties. Any vacancy shall be filled by similar
appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Sec. 107 RCW 51.14.320 and 2007 c 281 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any ((ombudsman)) ombuds appointed under this chapter shall have
training or experience, or both, in the following areas:
(1) Washington state industrial insurance including self-insurance
programs;
(2) The Washington state legal system;
(3) Dispute or problem resolution techniques, including
investigation, mediation, and negotiation.

Sec. 108 RCW 51.14.330 and 2007 c 281 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
During the first two years after the office of the ((ombudsman))
ombuds is created, the staffing level shall be no more than four
persons, including the ((ombudsman)) ombuds and any administrative
staff. Thereafter, the staffing levels shall be determined based upon
the office of the ((ombudsman's)) ombuds's workload and whether any
additional locations are needed.

Sec. 109 RCW 51.14.340 and 2007 c 281 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The office of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall have the following
powers and duties:
(1) To act as an advocate for injured workers of self-insured
employers;
(2) To offer and provide information on industrial insurance as
appropriate to workers of self-insured employers;
(3) To identify, investigate, and facilitate resolution of
industrial insurance complaints from workers of self-insured employers;
(4) To maintain a statewide toll-free telephone number for the
receipt of complaints and inquiries; and
(5) To refer complaints to the department when appropriate.

Sec. 110 RCW 51.14.350 and 2007 c 281 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall develop referral
procedures for complaints by workers of self-insured employers. The
department shall act as quickly as possible on any complaint referred
to them by the office of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds.
(2) The department shall respond to any complaint against a
self-insured employer referred to it by the office of the ((ombudsman))
ombuds and shall forward the office of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds a
summary of the results of the investigation and action proposed or
taken.

Sec. 111 RCW 51.14.360 and 2007 c 281 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No ((ombudsman)) ombuds is liable for good faith performance of
responsibilities under this chapter.
(2) No discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be
taken against any employee of a self-insured employer for any
communication made, or information given or disclosed, to assist the
((ombudsman)) ombuds in carrying out its duties and responsibilities,
unless the same was done maliciously. This subsection is not intended
to infringe on the rights of the employer to supervise, discipline, or
terminate an employee for other reasons.
(3) All communications by the ((ombudsman)) ombuds, if reasonably
related to the requirements of his or her responsibilities under this
chapter and done in good faith, are privileged and confidential, and
this shall serve as a defense to any action in libel or slander.
(4) Representatives of the office of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds are
exempt from being required to testify as to any privileged or
confidential matters except as the court may deem necessary to enforce
this chapter.

Sec. 112 RCW 51.14.370 and 2007 c 281 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
All records and files of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds relating to any
complaint or investigation made pursuant to carrying out its duties and
the identities of complainants, witnesses, or injured workers shall
remain confidential unless disclosure is authorized by the complainant
or injured worker or his or her guardian or legal representative. No
disclosures may be made outside the office of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds
without the consent of any named witness or complainant unless the
disclosure is made without the identity of any of these individuals
being disclosed.

Sec. 113 RCW 51.14.380 and 2007 c 281 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall integrate into existing posters and
brochures information explaining the ((ombudsman)) ombuds program.
Both the posters and the brochures shall contain the ((ombudsman's))
ombuds's toll-free telephone number. Every self-insured employer must
place a poster in an area where all workers have access to it. The
self-insured employer must provide a brochure to all injured workers at
the time the employer is notified of the worker's injury.

Sec. 114 RCW 51.14.390 and 2007 c 281 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To provide start-up funding for the office of the ((ombudsman))
ombuds, the department shall impose a one-time assessment on all
self-insurers. The amount of the assessment shall be determined by the
department and shall not exceed the amount needed to pay the start-up
costs.
(2) Ongoing funding for the office of the ((ombudsman)) ombuds
shall be obtained as part of an annual administrative assessment of
self-insurers under RCW 51.44.150. This assessment shall be
proportionately based on the number of claims for each self-insurer
during the past year.

Sec. 115 RCW 51.14.400 and 2007 c 281 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall provide the governor with an
annual report that includes the following:
(a) A description of the issues addressed during the past year and
a very brief description of case scenarios in a form that does not
compromise confidentiality;
(b) An accounting of the monitoring activities by the ((ombudsman))
ombuds; and
(c) An identification of the deficiencies in the industrial
insurance system related to self-insurers, if any, and recommendations
for remedial action in policy or practice.
(2) The first annual report shall be due on or before October 1,
2008. Subsequent reports shall be due on or before October 1st.

Sec. 116 RCW 51.44.150 and 2007 c 281 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall impose and collect assessments each fiscal year
upon all self-insurers in the amount of the estimated costs of
administering their portion of this title during such fiscal year.
These assessments shall also include the assessments for the
((ombudsman's)) ombuds's office provided for in RCW 51.14.390. The
time and manner of imposing and collecting assessments due the
department shall be set forth in regulations promulgated by the
director in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 117 RCW 59.20.210 and 1999 c 359 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If at any time during the tenancy, the landlord fails to carry
out any of the duties imposed by RCW 59.20.130, and notice of the
defect is given to the landlord pursuant to RCW 59.20.200, the tenant
may submit to the landlord or the landlord's designated agent by
certified mail or in person at least two bids to perform the repairs
necessary to correct the defective condition from licensed or
registered persons, or if no licensing or registration requirement
applies to the type of work to be performed, from responsible persons
capable of performing such repairs. Such bids may be submitted to the
landlord at the same time as notice is given pursuant to RCW 59.20.200.
(2) If the landlord fails to commence repair of the defective
condition within a reasonable time after receipt of notice from the
tenant, the tenant may contract with the person submitting the lowest
bid to make the repair, and upon the completion of the repair and an
opportunity for inspection by the landlord or the landlord's designated
agent, the tenant may deduct the cost of repair from the rent in an
amount not to exceed the sum expressed in dollars representing one
month's rental of the tenant's mobile home space in any calendar year.
When, however, the landlord is required to begin remedying the
defective condition within thirty days under RCW 59.20.200, the tenant
cannot contract for repairs for at least fifteen days following receipt
of bids by the landlord. The total costs of repairs deducted by the
tenant in any calendar year under this subsection shall not exceed the
sum expressed in dollars representing one month's rental of the
tenant's mobile home space.
(3) Two or more tenants shall not collectively initiate remedies
under this section. Remedial action under this section shall not be
initiated for conditions in the design or construction existing in a
mobile home park before June 7, 1984.
(4) The provisions of this section shall not:
(a) Create a relationship of employer and employee between landlord
and tenant; or
(b) Create liability under the worker's compensation act; or
(c) Constitute the tenant as an agent of the landlord for the
purposes of mechanics' and ((materialmen's)) material suppliers' liens
under chapter 60.04 RCW.
(5) Any repair work performed under this section shall comply with
the requirements imposed by any applicable code, statute, ordinance, or
rule. A landlord whose property is damaged because of repairs
performed in a negligent manner may recover the actual damages in an
action against the tenant.
(6) Nothing in this section shall prevent the tenant from agreeing
with the landlord to undertake the repairs in return for cash payment
or a reasonable reduction in rent, the agreement to be between the
parties, and this agreement does not alter the landlord's obligations
under this chapter.

Sec. 118 RCW 60.13.010 and 2012 c 106 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section have the
meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agricultural product" means any unprocessed horticultural,
vermicultural and its by-products, viticultural, berry, poultry,
poultry product, grain, bee, or other agricultural products, and
includes mint or mint oil processed by or for the producer thereof and
hay and straw baled or prepared for market in any manner or form and
livestock. When used in RCW 60.13.020, "agricultural product" means
horticultural, viticultural, aquacultural, or berry products, hay and
straw, milk and milk products, vegetable seed, or turf and forage seed
and applies only when such products are delivered to a processor or
conditioner in an unprocessed form.
(2) "Commercial ((fisherman)) fisher" means a person licensed to
fish commercially for or to take food fish or shellfish or steelhead
legally caught pursuant to executive order, treaty right, or federal
statute.
(3) "Conditioner," "consignor," "person," and "producer" have the
meanings defined in RCW 20.01.010.
(4) "Delivers" means that a producer completes the performance of
all contractual obligations with reference to the transfer of actual or
constructive possession or control of an agricultural product to a
processor or conditioner or preparer, regardless of whether the
processor or conditioner or preparer takes physical possession.
(5) "Fish" means food fish or shellfish or steelhead legally caught
pursuant to executive order, treaty right, or federal statute.
(6) "Preparer" means a person engaged in the business of feeding
livestock or preparing livestock products for market.
(7) "Processor" means any person, firm, company, or other
organization that purchases agricultural products except milk and milk
products from a consignor and that cans, freezes, dries, dehydrates,
cooks, presses, powders, or otherwise processes those crops in any
manner whatsoever for eventual resale, or that purchases or markets
milk from a dairy producer and is obligated to remit payment to such
dairy producer directly.
(8) "Vinifera grapes" means the agricultural product commonly known
as Vitis vinifera and those hybrid of Vitis vinifera that have
predominantly the character of Vitis vinifera.
(9) "Wine producer" means any person or other entity licensed under
Title 66 RCW to produce within the state wine from vinifera grapes.

Sec. 119 RCW 60.13.020 and 1987 c 148 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Starting on the date a producer delivers any agricultural product
to a processor or conditioner, the producer has a first priority
statutory lien, referred to as a "processor lien." A commercial
((fisherman)) fisher who delivers fish to a processor also has a first
priority statutory "processor lien" starting on the date the
((fisherman)) fisher delivers fish to the processor. This processor
lien shall continue until twenty days after payment for the product is
due and remains unpaid, without filing any notice of lien, for the
contract price, if any, or the fair market value of the products
delivered. The processor lien attaches to the agricultural products or
fish delivered, to the processor's or conditioner's inventory, and to
the processor's or conditioner's accounts receivable. However, no
processor lien may attach to agricultural products or fish delivered by
a producer or commercial ((fisherman)) fisher, or on the producer's or
((fisherman's)) fisher's behalf, to a processor which is organized and
operated on a cooperative basis and of which the producer or
((fisherman)) fisher is a member, nor may such lien attach to such
processor's inventory or accounts receivable.

Sec. 120 RCW 60.13.040 and 2012 c 106 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A producer or commercial ((fisherman)) fisher claiming a wine
producer, processor, or preparer lien may file a statement evidencing
the lien with the department of licensing after payment from the wine
producer, processor, conditioner, or preparer to the producer or
((fisherman)) fisher is due and remains unpaid. For purposes of this
subsection and RCW 60.13.050, payment is due on the date specified in
the contract, or if not specified, then within thirty days from time of
delivery.
(2) The statement shall be in a record, authenticated by the
producer or ((fisherman)) fisher, and shall contain in substance the
following information:
(a) A true statement or a reasonable estimate of the amount
demanded after deducting all credits and offsets;
(b) The name of the wine producer, processor, conditioner, or
preparer who received the agricultural product or fish to be charged
with the lien;
(c) A description sufficient to identify the agricultural product
or fish to be charged with the lien;
(d) A statement that the amount claimed is a true and bona fide
existing debt as of the date of the filing of the notice evidencing the
lien;
(e) The date on which payment was due for the agricultural product
or fish to be charged with the lien; and
(f) The department of licensing may by rule prescribe standard
filing forms, fees, and uniform procedures for filing with, and
obtaining information from, filing officers.

Sec. 121 RCW 60.13.050 and 1987 c 148 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) If a statement is filed pursuant to RCW 60.13.040 within
twenty days of the date upon which payment from the processor,
conditioner, or preparer to the producer or commercial ((fisherman))
fisher is due and remains unpaid, the processor or preparer lien
evidenced by the statement continues its priority over all other liens
or security interests upon agricultural products or fish, inventory,
and accounts receivable, except as provided in (b) of this subsection.
Such priority is without regard to whether the other liens or security
interests attached before or after the date on which the processor or
preparer lien attached.
(b) The processor or preparer lien shall be subordinate to liens
for taxes or labor perfected before filing of the processor or preparer
lien.
(2) If the statement provided for in RCW 60.13.040 is not filed
within twenty days of the date payment is due and remains unpaid, the
processor or preparer lien shall thereupon become subordinate to:
(a) A lien that has attached to the agricultural product or fish,
inventory, or accounts receivable before the date on which the
processor or preparer lien attaches; and
(b) A perfected security interest in the agricultural product or
fish, inventory, or accounts receivable.

Sec. 122 RCW 60.13.060 and 2012 c 106 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The wine producer or processor lien shall terminate twelve
months after, and the preparer lien shall terminate fifty days after,
the later of the date of attachment or filing, unless a suit to
foreclose the lien has been filed before that time as provided in RCW
60.13.070.
(2) If a statement has been filed as provided in RCW 60.13.040 and
the producer or commercial ((fisherman)) fisher has received payment
for the obligation secured by the lien, the producer or ((fisherman))
fisher shall promptly file with the department of licensing a statement
declaring that full payment has been received and that the lien is
discharged. If, after payment, the producer or ((fisherman)) fisher
fails to file such statement of discharge within ten days following a
request to do so, the producer or ((fisherman)) fisher shall be liable
to the wine producer, processor, conditioner, or preparer in the sum of
one hundred dollars plus actual damages caused by the failure.

Sec. 123 RCW 60.36.030 and 1901 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
All steamers, vessels, and boats, their tackle, apparel, and
furniture shall be held liable at all ports and places within this
state or within the jurisdiction of the courts of this state or within
the jurisdiction of the courts of the United States in said state for
services rendered by stevedores, ((longshoremen)) longshore workers, or
others engaged in the loading, unloading, stowing, or dunnaging of
cargo in or from any steamer, vessel, or boat in any harbor or at any
other place within said state, or within the jurisdiction of the courts
thereof as above stated, and said steamers, vessels, and boats shall
further be liable as per their contracts for all services performed
upon wharfs or landing places by stevedores, ((longshoremen)) longshore
workers, or others: PROVIDED, That such services must have been so
performed in and about and be connected with the loading, unloading,
dunnaging, or stowing of said cargo.

Sec. 124 RCW 60.36.040 and 1901 c 75 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Demands for wages and all sums due under contracts or otherwise for
the performance of all or any of the services mentioned in RCW
60.36.030 shall constitute liens upon all steamers, vessels, and boats,
their tackle, apparel, and furniture, and shall have priority over all
other demands save and excepting the demands mentioned in RCW 60.36.010
(1), (2), and (3), to which said demands the lien hereby provided shall
be subordinate: PROVIDED, That such liens shall only continue in force
for the period of three years from the date when such work was done or
the last services performed by such stevedores, ((longshoremen))
longshore workers, or others.

Sec. 125 RCW 60.42.040 and 1997 c 315 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
All statutory liens, consensual liens, mortgages, deeds of trust,
assignments of rents, and other encumbrances, including all advances or
charges made or accruing thereunder, whether voluntary or obligatory,
and all modifications, extensions, renewals, and replacements thereof,
recorded prior to the recording of a notice of claim of lien against
proceeds have priority over a lien created under this chapter. A prior
recorded lien includes, without limitation, a valid ((materialmen's))
material supplier's or mechanic's lien claim that is recorded after the
recording of the broker's notice of claim of lien against proceeds but
which relates back to a date prior to the recording date of the
broker's notice of claim of lien against proceeds.

Sec. 126 RCW 62A.2-201 and 1965 ex.s c 157 s 2-201 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a contract for
the sale of goods for the price of five hundred dollars or more is not
enforceable by way of action or defense unless there is some writing
sufficient to indicate that a contract for sale has been made between
the parties and signed by the party against whom enforcement is sought
or by his or her authorized agent or broker. A writing is not
insufficient because it omits or incorrectly states a term agreed upon
but the contract is not enforceable under this paragraph beyond the
quantity of goods shown in such writing.
(2) Between merchants if within a reasonable time a writing in
confirmation of the contract and sufficient against the sender is
received and the party receiving it has reason to know its contents, it
satisfies the requirements of subsection (1) of this section against
such party unless written notice of objection to its contents is given
within ten days after it is received.
(3) A contract which does not satisfy the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section but which is valid in other respects is
enforceable:
(a) If the goods are to be specially manufactured for the buyer and
are not suitable for sale to others in the ordinary course of the
seller's business and the seller, before notice of repudiation is
received and under circumstances which reasonably indicate that the
goods are for the buyer, has made either a substantial beginning of
their manufacture or commitments for their procurement; or
(b) If the party against whom enforcement is sought admits in his
or her pleading, testimony, or otherwise in court that a contract for
sale was made, but the contract is not enforceable under this provision
beyond the quantity of goods admitted; or
(c) With respect to goods for which payment has been made and
accepted or which have been received and accepted (RCW 62A.2-606).

Sec. 127 RCW 62A.2-210 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-804 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A party may perform his or her duty through a delegate unless
otherwise agreed or unless the other party has a substantial interest
in having his or her original promisor perform or control the acts
required by the contract. No delegation of performance relieves the
party delegating of any duty to perform or any liability for breach.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 62A.9A-406, unless
otherwise agreed, all rights of either seller or buyer can be assigned
except where the assignment would materially change the duty of the
other party, or increase materially the burden or risk imposed on him
or her by his or her contract, or impair materially his or her chance
of obtaining return performance. A right to damages for breach of the
whole contract or a right arising out of the assignor's due performance
of his or her entire obligation can be assigned despite agreement
otherwise.
(3) The creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a
security interest in the seller's interest under a contract is not a
transfer that materially changes the duty of or increases materially
the burden or risk imposed on the buyer or impairs materially the
buyer's chance of obtaining return performance within the purview of
subsection (2) of this section unless, and then only to the extent
that, enforcement actually results in a delegation of material
performance of the seller. Even in that event, the creation,
attachment, perfection, and enforcement of the security interest remain
effective, but (((i))) (a) the seller is liable to the buyer for
damages caused by the delegation to the extent that the damages could
not reasonably be prevented by the buyer, and (((ii))) (b) a court
having jurisdiction may grant other appropriate relief, including
cancellation of the contract for sale or an injunction against
enforcement of the security interest or consummation of the
enforcement.
(4) Unless the circumstances indicate the contrary, a prohibition
of assignment of "the contract" is to be construed as barring only the
delegation to the assignee of the assignor's performance.
(5) An assignment of "the contract" or of "all my rights under the
contract" or an assignment in similar general terms is an assignment of
rights and unless the language or the circumstances (as in an
assignment for security) indicate the contrary, it is a delegation of
performance of the duties of the assignor and its acceptance by the
assignee constitutes a promise by him or her to perform those duties.
This promise is enforceable by either the assignor or the other party
to the original contract.
(6) The other party may treat any assignment which delegates
performance as creating reasonable grounds for insecurity and may
without prejudice to his or her rights against the assignor demand
assurances from the assignee (RCW 62A.2-609).
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, an
assignment that would be a breach but for the provisions of RCW
62A.9A-406 may create reasonable grounds for insecurity with respect to
the due performance of the assignor (RCW 62A.2-609).

Sec. 128 RCW 62A.2-304 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-304 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The price can be made payable in money or otherwise. If it is
payable in whole or in part in goods each party is a seller of the
goods which he or she is to transfer.
(2) Even though all or part of the price is payable in an interest
in realty the transfer of the goods and the seller's obligations with
reference to them are subject to this Article, but not the transfer of
the interest in realty or the transferor's obligations in connection
therewith.

Sec. 129 RCW 62A.2-305 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-305 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The parties if they so intend can conclude a contract for sale
even though the price is not settled. In such a case, the price is a
reasonable price at the time for delivery if:
(a) Nothing is said as to price; or
(b) The price is left to be agreed by the parties and they fail to
agree; or
(c) The price is to be fixed in terms of some agreed market or
other standard as set or recorded by a third person or agency and it is
not so set or recorded.
(2) A price to be fixed by the seller or by the buyer means a price
for him or her to fix in good faith.
(3) When a price left to be fixed otherwise than by agreement of
the parties fails to be fixed through fault of one party the other may
at his or her option treat the contract as canceled or himself or
herself fix a reasonable price.
(4) Where, however, the parties intend not to be bound unless the
price be fixed or agreed and it is not fixed or agreed there is no
contract. In such a case, the buyer must return any goods already
received or if unable so to do must pay their reasonable value at the
time of delivery and the seller must return any portion of the price
paid on account.

Sec. 130 RCW 62A.2-308 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-308 are each
amended to read as follows:
Unless otherwise agreed:
(a) The place for delivery of goods is the seller's place of
business or if he or she has none his or her residence; but
(b) In a contract for sale of identified goods which to the
knowledge of the parties at the time of contracting are in some other
place, that place is the place for their delivery; and
(c) Documents of title may be delivered through customary banking
channels.

Sec. 131 RCW 62A.2-311 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-311 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) An agreement for sale which is otherwise sufficiently definite
(((subsection (3) of)) RCW 62A.2-204(3)) to be a contract is not made
invalid by the fact that it leaves particulars of performance to be
specified by one of the parties. Any such specification must be made
in good faith and within limits set by commercial reasonableness.
(2) Unless otherwise agreed, specifications relating to assortment
of the goods are at the buyer's option and except as otherwise provided
in ((subsections (1)(c) and (3) of)) RCW 62A.2-319 (1)(c) and (3)
specifications or arrangements relating to shipment are at the seller's
option.
(3) Where such specification would materially affect the other
party's performance but is not seasonably made or where one party's
cooperation is necessary to the agreed performance of the other but is
not seasonably forthcoming, the other party in addition to all other
remedies:
(a) Is excused for any resulting delay in his or her own
performance; and
(b) May also either proceed to perform in any reasonable manner or
after the time for a material part of his or her own performance treat
the failure to specify or to cooperate as a breach by failure to
deliver or accept the goods.

Sec. 132 RCW 62A.2-312 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-312 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, there is in a
contract for sale a warranty by the seller that:
(a) The title conveyed shall be good, and its transfer rightful;
and
(b) The goods shall be delivered free from any security interest or
other lien or encumbrance of which the buyer at the time of contracting
has no knowledge.
(2) A warranty under subsection (1) of this section will be
excluded or modified only by specific language or by circumstances
which give the buyer reason to know that the person selling does not
claim title in himself or herself or that he or she is purporting to
sell only such right or title as he or she or a third person may have.
(3) Unless otherwise agreed, a seller who is a merchant regularly
dealing in goods of the kind warrants that the goods shall be delivered
free of the rightful claim of any third person by way of infringement
or the like but a buyer who furnishes specifications to the seller must
hold the seller harmless against any such claim which arises out of
compliance with the specifications.

Sec. 133 RCW 62A.2-313 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-313 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Express warranties by the seller are created as follows:
(a) Any affirmation of fact or promise made by the seller to the
buyer which relates to the goods and becomes part of the basis of the
bargain creates an express warranty that the goods shall conform to the
affirmation or promise.
(b) Any description of the goods which is made part of the basis of
the bargain creates an express warranty that the goods shall conform to
the description.
(c) Any sample or model which is made part of the basis of the
bargain creates an express warranty that the whole of the goods shall
conform to the sample or model.
(2) It is not necessary to the creation of an express warranty that
the seller use formal words such as "warrant" or "guarantee" or that he
or she have a specific intention to make a warranty, but an affirmation
merely of the value of the goods or a statement purporting to be merely
the seller's opinion or commendation of the goods does not create a
warranty.

Sec. 134 RCW 62A.2-316 and 1982 c 199 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Words or conduct relevant to the creation of an express
warranty and words or conduct tending to negate or limit warranty shall
be construed wherever reasonable as consistent with each other; but
subject to the provisions of this Article on parol or extrinsic
evidence (RCW 62A.2-202) negation or limitation is inoperative to the
extent that such construction is unreasonable.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, to exclude or modify
the implied warranty of merchantability or any part of it the language
must mention merchantability and in case of a writing must be
conspicuous, and to exclude or modify any implied warranty of fitness
the exclusion must be by a writing and conspicuous. Language to
exclude all implied warranties of fitness is sufficient if it states,
for example, that "There are no warranties which extend beyond the
description on the face hereof."
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Unless the circumstances indicate otherwise, all implied
warranties are excluded by expressions like "as is," "with all faults,"
or other language which in common understanding calls the buyer's
attention to the exclusion of warranties and makes plain that there is
no implied warranty; and
(b) When the buyer before entering into the contract has examined
the goods or the sample or model as fully as he or she desired or has
refused to examine the goods there is no implied warranty with regard
to defects which an examination ought in the circumstances to have
revealed to him or her;
(c) An implied warranty can also be excluded or modified by course
of dealing or course of performance or usage of trade; and
(d) In sales of livestock, including but not limited to, horses,
mules, cattle, sheep, swine, goats, poultry, and rabbits, there are no
implied warranties as defined in this article that the livestock are
free from sickness or disease: PROVIDED, That the seller has complied
with all state and federal laws and regulations that apply to animal
health and disease, and the seller is not guilty of fraud, deceit, or
misrepresentation.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of
this section and the provisions of RCW 62A.2-719, as now or hereafter
amended, in any case where goods are purchased primarily for personal,
family, or household use and not for commercial or business use,
disclaimers of the warranty of merchantability or fitness for
particular purpose shall not be effective to limit the liability of
merchant sellers except insofar as the disclaimer sets forth with
particularity the qualities and characteristics which are not being
warranted. Remedies for breach of warranty can be limited in
accordance with the provisions of this Article on liquidation or
limitation of damages and on contractual modification of remedy (RCW
62A.2-718 and RCW 62A.2-719).

Sec. 135 RCW 62A.2-318 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-318 are each
amended to read as follows:
A seller's warranty whether express or implied extends to any
natural person who is in the family or household of his or her buyer or
who is a guest in his or her home if it is reasonable to expect that
such person may use, consume, or be affected by the goods and who is
injured in person by breach of the warranty. A seller may not exclude
or limit the operation of this section.

Sec. 136 RCW 62A.2-319 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-319 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise agreed, the term F.O.B. (which means "free on
board") at a named place, even though used only in connection with the
stated price, is a delivery term under which:
(a) When the term is F.O.B. the place of shipment, the seller must
at that place ship the goods in the manner provided in this Article
(RCW 62A.2-504) and bear the expense and risk of putting them into the
possession of the carrier; or
(b) When the term is F.O.B. the place of destination, the seller
must at his or her own expense and risk transport the goods to that
place and there tender delivery of them in the manner provided in this
Article (RCW 62A.2-503);
(c) When under either (a) or (b) of this subsection the term is
also F.O.B. vessel, car, or other vehicle, the seller must in addition
at his or her own expense and risk load the goods on board. If the
term is F.O.B. vessel, the buyer must name the vessel and in an
appropriate case the seller must comply with the provisions of this
Article on the form of bill of lading (RCW 62A.2-323).
(2) Unless otherwise agreed the term F.A.S. vessel (which means
"free alongside") at a named port, even though used only in connection
with the stated price, is a delivery term under which the seller must:
(a) At his or her own expense and risk deliver the goods alongside
the vessel in the manner usual in that port or on a dock designated and
provided by the buyer; and
(b) Obtain and tender a receipt for the goods in exchange for which
the carrier is under a duty to issue a bill of lading.
(3) Unless otherwise agreed, in any case falling within subsection
(1)(a) or (c) or ((subsection)) (2) of this section, the buyer must
seasonably give any needed instructions for making delivery, including
when the term is F.A.S. or F.O.B. the loading berth of the vessel and
in an appropriate case its name and sailing date. The seller may treat
the failure of needed instructions as a failure of cooperation under
this Article (RCW 62A.2-311). He or she may also at his or her option
move the goods in any reasonable manner preparatory to delivery or
shipment.
(4) Under the term F.O.B. vessel or F.A.S., unless otherwise
agreed, the buyer must make payment against tender of the required
documents and the seller may not tender nor the buyer demand delivery
of the goods in substitution for the documents.

Sec. 137 RCW 62A.2-320 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-320 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The term C.I.F. means that the price includes in a lump sum the
cost of the goods and the insurance and freight to the named
destination. The term C.&F. or C.F. means that the price so includes
cost and freight to the named destination.
(2) Unless otherwise agreed and even though used only in connection
with the stated price and destination, the term C.I.F. destination or
its equivalent requires the seller at his or her own expense and risk
to:
(a) Put the goods into the possession of a carrier at the port for
shipment and obtain a negotiable bill or bills of lading covering the
entire transportation to the named destination; and
(b) Load the goods and obtain a receipt from the carrier (which may
be contained in the bill of lading) showing that the freight has been
paid or provided for; and
(c) Obtain a policy or certificate of insurance, including any war
risk insurance, of a kind and on terms then current at the port of
shipment in the usual amount, in the currency of the contract, shown to
cover the same goods covered by the bill of lading and providing for
payment of loss to the order of the buyer or for the account of whom it
may concern; but the seller may add to the price the amount of the
premium for any such war risk insurance; and
(d) Prepare an invoice of the goods and procure any other documents
required to effect shipment or to comply with the contract; and
(e) Forward and tender with commercial promptness all the documents
in due form and with any indorsement necessary to perfect the buyer's
rights.
(3) Unless otherwise agreed, the term C.&F. or its equivalent has
the same effect and imposes upon the seller the same obligations and
risks as a C.I.F. term except the obligation as to insurance.
(4) Under the term C.I.F. or C.&F., unless otherwise agreed, the
buyer must make payment against tender of the required documents and
the seller may not tender nor the buyer demand delivery of the goods in
substitution for the documents.

Sec. 138 RCW 62A.2-324 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-324 are each
amended to read as follows:
Under a term "no arrival, no sale" or terms of like meaning, unless
otherwise agreed((,)):
(a) The seller must properly ship conforming goods and if they
arrive by any means he or she must tender them on arrival but he or she
assumes no obligation that the goods will arrive unless he or she has
caused the nonarrival; and
(b) Where without fault of the seller the goods are in part lost or
have so deteriorated as no longer to conform to the contract or arrive
after the contract time, the buyer may proceed as if there had been
casualty to identified goods (RCW 62A.2-613).

Sec. 139 RCW 62A.2-325 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-325 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Failure of the buyer seasonably to furnish an agreed letter of
credit is a breach of the contract for sale.
(2) The delivery to seller of a proper letter of credit suspends
the buyer's obligation to pay. If the letter of credit is dishonored,
the seller may on seasonable notification to the buyer require payment
directly from him or her.
(3) Unless otherwise agreed, the term "letter of credit" or
"banker's credit" in a contract for sale means an irrevocable credit
issued by a financing agency of good repute and, where the shipment is
overseas, of good international repute. The term "confirmed credit"
means that the credit must also carry the direct obligation of such an
agency which does business in the seller's financial market.

Sec. 140 RCW 62A.2-328 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-328 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In a sale by auction if goods are put up in lots each lot is
the subject of a separate sale.
(2) A sale by auction is complete when the auctioneer so announces
by the fall of the hammer or in other customary manner. Where a bid is
made while the hammer is falling in acceptance of a prior bid the
auctioneer may in his or her discretion reopen the bidding or declare
the goods sold under the bid on which the hammer was falling.
(3) Such a sale is with reserve unless the goods are in explicit
terms put up without reserve. In an auction with reserve, the
auctioneer may withdraw the goods at any time until he or she announces
completion of the sale. In an auction without reserve, after the
auctioneer calls for bids on an article or lot, that article or lot
cannot be withdrawn unless no bid is made within a reasonable time. In
either case a bidder may retract his or her bid until the auctioneer's
announcement of completion of the sale, but a bidder's retraction does
not revive any previous bid.
(4) If the auctioneer knowingly receives a bid on the seller's
behalf or the seller makes or procures such a bid, and notice has not
been given that liberty for such bidding is reserved, the buyer may at
his or her option avoid the sale or take the goods at the price of the
last good faith bid prior to the completion of the sale. This
subsection shall not apply to any bid at a forced sale.

Sec. 141 RCW 62A.2-402 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-402 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
rights of unsecured creditors of the seller with respect to goods which
have been identified to a contract for sale are subject to the buyer's
rights to recover the goods under this Article (RCW 62A.2-502 and RCW
62A.2-716).
(2) A creditor of the seller may treat a sale or an identification
of goods to a contract for sale as void if as against him or her a
retention of possession by the seller is fraudulent under any rule of
law of the state where the goods are situated, except that retention of
possession in good faith and current course of trade by a merchant-seller for a commercially reasonable time after a sale or
identification is not fraudulent.
(3) Nothing in this Article shall be deemed to impair the rights of
creditors of the seller:
(a) Under the provisions of the Article on Secured Transactions
(Article 9A); or
(b) Where identification to the contract or delivery is made not in
current course of trade but in satisfaction of or as security for a
preexisting claim for money, security, or the like and is made under
circumstances which under any rule of law of the state where the goods
are situated would apart from this Article constitute the transaction
a fraudulent transfer or voidable preference.

Sec. 142 RCW 62A.2-501 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-501 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The buyer obtains a special property and an insurable interest
in goods by identification of existing goods as goods to which the
contract refers even though the goods so identified are nonconforming
and he or she has an option to return or reject them. Such
identification can be made at any time and in any manner explicitly
agreed to by the parties. In the absence of explicit agreement,
identification occurs:
(a) When the contract is made if it is for the sale of goods
already existing and identified;
(b) If the contract is for the sale of future goods other than
those described in ((paragraph)) (c) of this subsection, when goods are
shipped, marked, or otherwise designated by the seller as goods to
which the contract refers;
(c) When the crops are planted or otherwise become growing crops or
the young are conceived if the contract is for the sale of unborn young
to be born within twelve months after contracting or for the sale of
crops to be harvested within twelve months or the next normal harvest
season after contracting whichever is longer.
(2) The seller retains an insurable interest in goods so long as
title to or any security interest in the goods remains in him or her
and where the identification is by the seller alone he or she may until
default or insolvency or notification to the buyer that the
identification is final substitute other goods for those identified.
(3) Nothing in this section impairs any insurable interest
recognized under any other statute or rule of law.

Sec. 143 RCW 62A.2-502 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-806 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section and even
though the goods have not been shipped, a buyer who has paid a part or
all of the price of goods in which he or she has a special property
under the provisions of the immediately preceding section may on making
and keeping good a tender of any unpaid portion of their price recover
them from the seller if:
(a) In the case of goods bought for personal, family, or household
purposes, the seller repudiates or fails to deliver as required by the
contract; or
(b) In all cases, the seller becomes insolvent within ten days
after receipt of the first installment on their price.
(2) The buyer's right to recover the goods under subsection (1)(a)
of this section vests upon acquisition of a special property, even if
the seller had not then repudiated or failed to deliver.
(3) If the identification creating his or her special property has
been made by the buyer, he or she acquires the right to recover the
goods only if they conform to the contract for sale.

Sec. 144 RCW 62A.2-504 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-504 are each
amended to read as follows:
Where the seller is required or authorized to send the goods to the
buyer and the contract does not require him or her to deliver them at
a particular destination, then unless otherwise agreed he or she must:
(a) Put the goods in the possession of such a carrier and make such
a contract for their transportation as may be reasonable having regard
to the nature of the goods and other circumstances of the case; and
(b) Obtain and promptly deliver or tender in due form any document
necessary to enable the buyer to obtain possession of the goods or
otherwise required by the agreement or by usage of trade; and
(c) Promptly notify the buyer of the shipment. Failure to notify
the buyer under ((paragraph (c))) this subsection or to make a proper
contract under ((paragraph (a))) subsection (a) of this section is a
ground for rejection only if material delay or loss ensues.

Sec. 145 RCW 62A.2-507 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-507 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Tender of delivery is a condition to the buyer's duty to accept
the goods and, unless otherwise agreed, to his or her duty to pay for
them. Tender entitles the seller to acceptance of the goods and to
payment according to the contract.
(2) Where payment is due and demanded on the delivery to the buyer
of goods or documents of title, his or her right as against the seller
to retain or dispose of them is conditional upon his or her making the
payment due.

Sec. 146 RCW 62A.2-508 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-508 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Where any tender or delivery by the seller is rejected because
nonconforming and the time for performance has not yet expired, the
seller may seasonably notify the buyer of his or her intention to cure
and may then within the contract time make a conforming delivery.
(2) Where the buyer rejects a nonconforming tender which the seller
had reasonable grounds to believe would be acceptable with or without
money allowance, the seller may if he or she seasonably notifies the
buyer have a further reasonable time to substitute a conforming tender.

Sec. 147 RCW 62A.2-510 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-510 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Where a tender or delivery of goods so fails to conform to the
contract as to give a right of rejection, the risk of their loss
remains on the seller until cure or acceptance.
(2) Where the buyer rightfully revokes acceptance, he or she may to
the extent of any deficiency in his or her effective insurance coverage
treat the risk of loss as having rested on the seller from the
beginning.
(3) Where the buyer as to conforming goods already identified to
the contract for sale repudiates or is otherwise in breach before risk
of their loss has passed to him or her, the seller may to the extent of
any deficiency in his or her effective insurance coverage treat the
risk of loss as resting on the buyer for a commercially reasonable
time.

Sec. 148 RCW 62A.2-602 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-602 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Rejection of goods must be within a reasonable time after their
delivery or tender. It is ineffective unless the buyer seasonably
notifies the seller.
(2) Subject to the provisions of the two following sections on
rejected goods (RCW 62A.2-603 and RCW 62A.2-604)((,)):
(a) After rejection, any exercise of ownership by the buyer with
respect to any commercial unit is wrongful as against the seller; and
(b) If the buyer has before rejection taken physical possession of
goods in which he or she does not have a security interest under the
provisions of this Article (((subsection (3) of)) RCW 62A.2-711(3)), he
or she is under a duty after rejection to hold them with reasonable
care at the seller's disposition for a time sufficient to permit the
seller to remove them; but
(c) The buyer has no further obligations with regard to goods
rightfully rejected.
(3) The seller's rights with respect to goods wrongfully rejected
are governed by the provisions of this Article on seller's remedies in
general (RCW 62A.2-703).

Sec. 149 RCW 62A.2-603 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-603 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to any security interest in the buyer (((subsection (3)
of)) RCW 62A.2-711(3)), when the seller has no agent or place of
business at the market of rejection a merchant buyer is under a duty
after rejection of goods in his or her possession or control to follow
any reasonable instructions received from the seller with respect to
the goods and in the absence of such instructions to make reasonable
efforts to sell them for the seller's account if they are perishable or
threaten to decline in value speedily. Instructions are not reasonable
if on demand indemnity for expenses is not forthcoming.
(2) When the buyer sells goods under subsection (1) of this
section, he or she is entitled to reimbursement from the seller or out
of the proceeds for reasonable expenses of caring for and selling them,
and if the expenses include no selling commission then to such
commission as is usual in the trade or if there is none to a reasonable
sum not exceeding ten per cent on the gross proceeds.
(3) In complying with this section, the buyer is held only to good
faith and good faith conduct hereunder is neither acceptance nor
conversion nor the basis of an action for damages.

Sec. 150 RCW 62A.2-604 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-604 are each
amended to read as follows:
Subject to the provisions of the immediately preceding section on
perishables, if the seller gives no instructions within a reasonable
time after notification of rejection, the buyer may store the rejected
goods for the seller's account or reship them to him or her or resell
them for the seller's account with reimbursement as provided in the
preceding section. Such action is not acceptance or conversion.

Sec. 151 RCW 62A.2-606 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-606 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Acceptance of goods occurs when the buyer:
(a) After a reasonable opportunity to inspect the goods signifies
to the seller that the goods are conforming or that he or she will take
or retain them in spite of their nonconformity; or
(b) Fails to make an effective rejection (((subsection (1) of)) RCW
62A.2-602(1)), but such acceptance does not occur until the buyer has
had a reasonable opportunity to inspect them; or
(c) Does any act inconsistent with the seller's ownership; but if
such act is wrongful as against the seller it is an acceptance only if
ratified by him or her.
(2) Acceptance of a part of any commercial unit is acceptance of
that entire unit.

Sec. 152 RCW 62A.2-607 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-607 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The buyer must pay at the contract rate for any goods accepted.
(2) Acceptance of goods by the buyer precludes rejection of the
goods accepted and if made with knowledge of a nonconformity cannot be
revoked because of it unless the acceptance was on the reasonable
assumption that the nonconformity would be seasonably cured but
acceptance does not of itself impair any other remedy provided by this
Article for nonconformity.
(3) Where a tender has been accepted:
(a) The buyer must within a reasonable time after he or she
discovers or should have discovered any breach notify the seller of
breach or be barred from any remedy; and
(b) If the claim is one for infringement or the like (((subsection
(3) of)) RCW 62A.2-312(3)) and the buyer is sued as a result of such a
breach, he or she must so notify the seller within a reasonable time
after he or she receives notice of the litigation or be barred from any
remedy over for liability established by the litigation.
(4) The burden is on the buyer to establish any breach with respect
to the goods accepted.
(5) Where the buyer is sued for breach of a warranty or other
obligation for which his or her seller is answerable over:
(a) He or she may give his or her seller written notice of the
litigation. If the notice states that the seller may come in and
defend and that if the seller does not do so he or she will be bound in
any action against him or her by his or her buyer by any determination
of fact common to the two litigations, then unless the seller after
seasonable receipt of the notice does come in and defend he or she is
so bound.
(b) If the claim is one for infringement or the like (((subsection
(3) of)) RCW 62A.2-312(3)), the original seller may demand in writing
that his or her buyer turn over to him or her control of the litigation
including settlement or else be barred from any remedy over and if he
or she also agrees to bear all expense and to satisfy any adverse
judgment, then unless the buyer after seasonable receipt of the demand
does turn over control the buyer is so barred.
(6) The provisions of subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section
apply to any obligation of a buyer to hold the seller harmless against
infringement or the like (((subsection (3) of)) RCW 62A.2-312(3)).

Sec. 153 RCW 62A.2-608 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-608 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The buyer may revoke his or her acceptance of a lot or
commercial unit whose nonconformity substantially impairs its value to
him or her if he or she has accepted it:
(a) On the reasonable assumption that its nonconformity would be
cured and it has not been seasonably cured; or
(b) Without discovery of such nonconformity if his or her
acceptance was reasonably induced either by the difficulty of discovery
before acceptance or by the seller's assurances.
(2) Revocation of acceptance must occur within a reasonable time
after the buyer discovers or should have discovered the ground for it
and before any substantial change in condition of the goods which is
not caused by their own defects. It is not effective until the buyer
notifies the seller of it.
(3) A buyer who so revokes has the same rights and duties with
regard to the goods involved as if he or she had rejected them.

Sec. 154 RCW 62A.2-609 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-609 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A contract for sale imposes an obligation on each party that
the other's expectation of receiving due performance will not be
impaired. When reasonable grounds for insecurity arise with respect to
the performance of either party the other may in writing demand
adequate assurance of due performance and until he or she receives such
assurance may if commercially reasonable suspend any performance for
which he or she has not already received the agreed return.
(2) Between merchants, the reasonableness of grounds for insecurity
and the adequacy of any assurance offered shall be determined according
to commercial standards.
(3) Acceptance of any improper delivery or payment does not
prejudice the aggrieved party's right to demand adequate assurance of
future performance.
(4) After receipt of a justified demand, failure to provide within
a reasonable time not exceeding thirty days such assurance of due
performance as is adequate under the circumstances of the particular
case is a repudiation of the contract.

Sec. 155 RCW 62A.2-610 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-610 are each
amended to read as follows:
When either party repudiates the contract with respect to a
performance not yet due the loss of which will substantially impair the
value of the contract to the other, the aggrieved party may:
(a) For a commercially reasonable time await performance by the
repudiating party; or
(b) Resort to any remedy for breach (RCW 62A.2-703 or ((RCW))
62A.2-711), even though he or she has notified the repudiating party
that he or she would await the latter's performance and has urged
retraction; and
(c) In either case suspend his or her own performance or proceed in
accordance with the provisions of this Article on the seller's right to
identify goods to the contract notwithstanding breach or to salvage
unfinished goods (RCW 62A.2-704).

Sec. 156 RCW 62A.2-611 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-611 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Until the repudiating party's next performance is due, he or
she can retract his or her repudiation unless the aggrieved party has
since the repudiation canceled or materially changed his or her
position or otherwise indicated that he or she considers the
repudiation final.
(2) Retraction may be by any method which clearly indicates to the
aggrieved party that the repudiating party intends to perform, but must
include any assurance justifiably demanded under the provisions of this
Article (RCW 62A.2-609).
(3) Retraction reinstates the repudiating party's rights under the
contract with due excuse and allowance to the aggrieved party for any
delay occasioned by the repudiation.

Sec. 157 RCW 62A.2-612 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-612 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) An "installment contract" is one which requires or authorizes
the delivery of goods in separate lots to be separately accepted, even
though the contract contains a clause "each delivery is a separate
contract" or its equivalent.
(2) The buyer may reject any installment which is nonconforming if
the nonconformity substantially impairs the value of that installment
and cannot be cured or if the nonconformity is a defect in the required
documents; but if the nonconformity does not fall within subsection (3)
of this section and the seller gives adequate assurance of its cure,
the buyer must accept that installment.
(3) Whenever nonconformity or default with respect to one or more
installments substantially impairs the value of the whole contract
there is a breach of the whole. But the aggrieved party reinstates the
contract if he or she accepts a nonconforming installment without
seasonably notifying of cancellation or if he or she brings an action
with respect only to past installments or demands performance as to
future installments.

Sec. 158 RCW 62A.2-613 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-613 are each
amended to read as follows:
Where the contract requires for its performance goods identified
when the contract is made, and the goods suffer casualty without fault
of either party before the risk of loss passes to the buyer, or in a
proper case under a "no arrival, no sale" term (RCW 62A.2-324) then:
(a) If the loss is total, the contract is avoided; and
(b) If the loss is partial or the goods have so deteriorated as no
longer to conform to the contract, the buyer may nevertheless demand
inspection and at his or her option either treat the contract as
avoided or accept the goods with due allowance from the contract price
for the deterioration or the deficiency in quantity but without further
right against the seller.

Sec. 159 RCW 62A.2-615 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-615 are each
amended to read as follows:
Except so far as a seller may have assumed a greater obligation and
subject to the preceding section on substituted performance:
(a) Delay in delivery or nondelivery in whole or in part by a
seller who complies with ((paragraphs (b) and (c))) subsections (b) and
(c) of this section is not a breach of his or her duty under a contract
for sale if performance as agreed has been made impracticable by the
occurrence of a contingency the nonoccurrence of which was a basic
assumption on which the contract was made or by compliance in good
faith with any applicable foreign or domestic governmental regulation
or order whether or not it later proves to be invalid.
(b) Where the causes mentioned in ((paragraph (a))) subsection (a)
of this section affect only a part of the seller's capacity to perform,
he or she must allocate production and deliveries among his or her
customers but may at his or her option include regular customers not
then under contract as well as his or her own requirements for further
manufacture. He or she may so allocate in any manner which is fair and
reasonable.
(c) The seller must notify the buyer seasonably that there will be
delay or nondelivery and, when allocation is required under ((paragraph
(b))) subsection (b) of this section, of the estimated quota thus made
available for the buyer.

Sec. 160 RCW 62A.2-616 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-616 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Where the buyer receives notification of a material or
indefinite delay or an allocation justified under the preceding
section, he or she may by written notification to the seller as to any
delivery concerned, and where the prospective deficiency substantially
impairs the value of the whole contract under the provisions of this
Article relating to breach of installment contracts (RCW 62A.2-612),
then also as to the whole((,)):
(a) Terminate and thereby discharge any unexecuted portion of the
contract; or
(b) Modify the contract by agreeing to take his or her available
quota in substitution.
(2) If after receipt of such notification from the seller the buyer
fails so to modify the contract within a reasonable time not exceeding
thirty days, the contract lapses with respect to any deliveries
affected.

Sec. 161 RCW 62A.2-702 and 1981 c 41 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Where the seller discovers the buyer to be insolvent, he or she
may refuse delivery except for cash including payment for all goods
theretofore delivered under the contract, and stop delivery under this
Article (RCW 62A.2-705).
(2) Where the seller discovers that the buyer has received goods on
credit while insolvent, he or she may reclaim the goods upon demand
made within ten days after the receipt, but if misrepresentation of
solvency has been made to the particular seller in writing within three
months before delivery the ten-day limitation does not apply. Except
as provided in this subsection, the seller may not base a right to
reclaim goods on the buyer's fraudulent or innocent misrepresentation
of solvency or of intent to pay.
(3) The seller's right to reclaim under subsection (2) of this
section is subject to the rights of a buyer in ordinary course or other
good faith purchaser under this Article (RCW 62A.2-403). Successful
reclamation of goods excludes all other remedies with respect to them.

Sec. 162 RCW 62A.2-704 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-704 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) An aggrieved seller under the preceding section may:
(a) Identify to the contract conforming goods not already
identified if at the time he or she learned of the breach they are in
his or her possession or control;
(b) Treat as the subject of resale goods which have demonstrably
been intended for the particular contract even though those goods are
unfinished.
(2) Where the goods are unfinished, an aggrieved seller may in the
exercise of reasonable commercial judgment for the purposes of avoiding
loss and of effective realization either complete the manufacture and
wholly identify the goods to the contract or cease manufacture and
resell for scrap or salvage value or proceed in any other reasonable
manner.

Sec. 163 RCW 62A.2-706 and 1967 c 114 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Under the conditions stated in RCW 62A.2-703 on seller's
remedies, the seller may resell the goods concerned or the undelivered
balance thereof. Where the resale is made in good faith and in a
commercially reasonable manner, the seller may recover the difference
between the resale price and the contract price together with any
incidental damages allowed under the provisions of this Article (RCW
62A.2-710), but less expenses saved in consequence of the buyer's
breach.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section
or unless otherwise agreed, resale may be at public or private sale
including sale by way of one or more contracts to sell or of
identification to an existing contract of the seller. Sale may be as
a unit or in parcels and at any time and place and on any terms but
every aspect of the sale including the method, manner, time, place, and
terms must be commercially reasonable. The resale must be reasonably
identified as referring to the broken contract, but it is not necessary
that the goods be in existence or that any or all of them have been
identified to the contract before the breach.
(3) Where the resale is at private sale, the seller must give the
buyer reasonable notification of his or her intention to resell.
(4) Where the resale is at public sale:
(a) Only identified goods can be sold except where there is a
recognized market for a public sale of futures in goods of the kind;
and
(b) It must be made at a usual place or market for public sale if
one is reasonably available and except in the case of goods which are
perishable or threaten to decline in value speedily the seller must
give the buyer reasonable notice of the time and place of the resale;
and
(c) If the goods are not to be within the view of those attending
the sale the notification of sale must state the place where the goods
are located and provide for their reasonable inspection by prospective
bidders; and
(d) The seller may buy.
(5) A purchaser who buys in good faith at a resale takes the goods
free of any rights of the original buyer even though the seller fails
to comply with one or more of the requirements of this section.
(6) The seller is not accountable to the buyer for any profit made
on any resale. A person in the position of a seller (RCW 62A.2-707) or
a buyer who has rightfully rejected or justifiably revoked acceptance
must account for any excess over the amount of his or her security
interest, as hereinafter defined (((subsection (3) of)) RCW 62A.2-711(3)).

Sec. 164 RCW 62A.2-707 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-707 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A "person in the position of a seller" includes as against a
principal an agent who has paid or become responsible for the price of
goods on behalf of his or her principal or anyone who otherwise holds
a security interest or other right in goods similar to that of a
seller.
(2) A person in the position of a seller may as provided in this
Article withhold or stop delivery (RCW 62A.2-705) and resell (RCW
62A.2-706) and recover incidental damages (RCW 62A.2-710).

Sec. 165 RCW 62A.2-709 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-709 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) When the buyer fails to pay the price as it becomes due, the
seller may recover, together with any incidental damages under the next
section, the price:
(a) Of goods accepted or of conforming goods lost or damaged within
a commercially reasonable time after risk of their loss has passed to
the buyer; and
(b) Of goods identified to the contract if the seller is unable
after reasonable effort to resell them at a reasonable price or the
circumstances reasonably indicate that such effort will be unavailing.
(2) Where the seller sues for the price, he or she must hold for
the buyer any goods which have been identified to the contract and are
still in his or her control except that if resale becomes possible he
or she may resell them at any time prior to the collection of the
judgment. The net proceeds of any such resale must be credited to the
buyer and payment of the judgment entitles him or her to any goods not
resold.
(3) After the buyer has wrongfully rejected or revoked acceptance
of the goods or has failed to make a payment due or has repudiated (RCW
62A.2-610), a seller who is held not entitled to the price under this
section shall nevertheless be awarded damages for nonacceptance under
the preceding section.

Sec. 166 RCW 62A.2-711 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-711 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Where the seller fails to make delivery or repudiates or the
buyer rightfully rejects or justifiably revokes acceptance, then with
respect to any goods involved, and with respect to the whole if the
breach goes to the whole contract (RCW 62A.2-612), the buyer may cancel
and whether or not he or she has done so may in addition to recovering
so much of the price as has been paid:
(a) "Cover" and have damages under the next section as to all the
goods affected whether or not they have been identified to the
contract; or
(b) Recover damages for nondelivery as provided in this Article
(RCW 62A.2-713).
(2) Where the seller fails to deliver or repudiates, the buyer may
also:
(a) If the goods have been identified recover them as provided in
this Article (RCW 62A.2-502); or
(b) In a proper case obtain specific performance or replevy the
goods as provided in this Article (RCW 62A.2-716).
(3) On rightful rejection or justifiable revocation of acceptance,
a buyer has a security interest in goods in his or her possession or
control for any payments made on their price and any expenses
reasonably incurred in their inspection, receipt, transportation, care,
and custody and may hold such goods and resell them in like manner as
an aggrieved seller (RCW 62A.2-706).

Sec. 167 RCW 62A.2-712 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-712 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) After a breach within the preceding section, the buyer may
"cover" by making in good faith and without unreasonable delay any
reasonable purchase of or contract to purchase goods in substitution
for those due from the seller.
(2) The buyer may recover from the seller as damages the difference
between the cost of cover and the contract price together with any
incidental or consequential damages as hereinafter defined (RCW 62A.2-715), but less expenses saved in consequence of the seller's breach.
(3) Failure of the buyer to effect cover within this section does
not bar him or her from any other remedy.

Sec. 168 RCW 62A.2-714 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-714 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Where the buyer has accepted goods and given notification
(((subsection (3) of)) RCW 62A.2-607(3)), he or she may recover as
damages for any nonconformity of tender the loss resulting in the
ordinary course of events from the seller's breach as determined in any
manner which is reasonable.
(2) The measure of damages for breach of warranty is the difference
at the time and place of acceptance between the value of the goods
accepted and the value they would have had if they had been as
warranted, unless special circumstances show proximate damages of a
different amount.
(3) In a proper case, any incidental and consequential damages
under the next section may also be recovered.

Sec. 169 RCW 62A.2-716 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-807 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Specific performance may be decreed where the goods are unique
or in other proper circumstances.
(2) The decree for specific performance may include such terms and
conditions as to payment of the price, damages, or other relief as the
court may deem just.
(3) The buyer has a right of replevin for goods identified to the
contract if after reasonable effort he or she is unable to effect cover
for such goods or the circumstances reasonably indicate that such
effort will be unavailing or if the goods have been shipped under
reservation and satisfaction of the security interest in them has been
made or tendered. In the case of goods bought for personal, family, or
household purposes, the buyer's right of replevin vests upon
acquisition of a special property, even if the seller had not then
repudiated or failed to deliver.

Sec. 170 RCW 62A.2-717 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-717 are each
amended to read as follows:
The buyer on notifying the seller of his or her intention to do so
may deduct all or any part of the damages resulting from any breach of
the contract from any part of the price still due under the same
contract.

Sec. 171 RCW 62A.2-718 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-718 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Damages for breach by either party may be liquidated in the
agreement but only at an amount which is reasonable in the light of the
anticipated or actual harm caused by the breach, the difficulties of
proof of loss, and the inconvenience or nonfeasibility of otherwise
obtaining an adequate remedy. A term fixing unreasonably large
liquidated damages is void as a penalty.
(2) Where the seller justifiably withholds delivery of goods
because of the buyer's breach, the buyer is entitled to restitution of
any amount by which the sum of his or her payments exceeds:
(a) The amount to which the seller is entitled by virtue of terms
liquidating the seller's damages in accordance with subsection (1) of
this section, or
(b) In the absence of such terms, twenty per cent of the value of
the total performance for which the buyer is obligated under the
contract or five hundred dollars, whichever is smaller.
(3) The buyer's right to restitution under subsection (2) of this
section is subject to offset to the extent that the seller establishes:
(a) A right to recover damages under the provisions of this Article
other than subsection (1) of this section, and
(b) The amount or value of any benefits received by the buyer
directly or indirectly by reason of the contract.
(4) Where a seller has received payment in goods, their reasonable
value or the proceeds of their resale shall be treated as payments for
the purposes of subsection (2) of this section; but if the seller has
notice of the buyer's breach before reselling goods received in part
performance, his or her resale is subject to the conditions laid down
in this Article on resale by an aggrieved seller (RCW 62A.2-706).

Sec. 172 RCW 62A.2-722 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-722 are each
amended to read as follows:
Where a third party so deals with goods which have been identified
to a contract for sale as to cause actionable injury to a party to that
contract:
(a) A right of action against the third party is in either party to
the contract for sale who has title to or a security interest or a
special property or an insurable interest in the goods; and if the
goods have been destroyed or converted a right of action is also in the
party who either bore the risk of loss under the contract for sale or
has since the injury assumed that risk as against the other;
(b) If at the time of the injury the party plaintiff did not bear
the risk of loss as against the other party to the contract for sale
and there is no arrangement between them for disposition of the
recovery, his or her suit or settlement is, subject to his or her own
interest, as a fiduciary for the other party to the contract;
(c) Either party may with the consent of the other sue for the
benefit of whom it may concern.

Sec. 173 RCW 62A.2-723 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-723 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) If an action based on anticipatory repudiation comes to trial
before the time for performance with respect to some or all of the
goods, any damages based on market price (RCW 62A.2-708 or ((RCW))
62A.2-713) shall be determined according to the price of such goods
prevailing at the time when the aggrieved party learned of the
repudiation.
(2) If evidence of a price prevailing at the times or places
described in this Article is not readily available, the price
prevailing within any reasonable time before or after the time
described or at any other place which in commercial judgment or under
usage of trade would serve as a reasonable substitute for the one
described may be used, making any proper allowance for the cost of
transporting the goods to or from such other place.
(3) Evidence of a relevant price prevailing at a time or place
other than the one described in this Article offered by one party is
not admissible unless and until he or she has given the other party
such notice as the court finds sufficient to prevent unfair surprise.

Sec. 174 RCW 62A.11-109 and 1981 c 41 s 45 are each amended to
read as follows:
From and after midnight June 30, 1982, upon request of any person,
the county auditor shall issue his or her certificate showing whether
there is on file with the county auditor's office on the date and hour
stated therein, any presently effective financing statement filed with
the county auditor's office before midnight June 30, 1982, naming a
particular debtor and any statement of assignment thereof and if there
is, giving the date and hour of filing of each such statement and the
names and addresses of each secured party therein. The uniform fee for
such a certificate shall be four dollars. Upon request, the county
auditor shall issue his or her certificate and shall furnish a copy of
any filed financing statements or statements of assignment for a
uniform fee of ten dollars for each particular debtor's statements
requested.

Sec. 175 RCW 64.34.364 and 1990 c 166 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The association has a lien on a unit for any unpaid assessments
levied against a unit from the time the assessment is due.
(2) A lien under this section shall be prior to all other liens and
encumbrances on a unit except: (a) Liens and encumbrances recorded
before the recording of the declaration; (b) a mortgage on the unit
recorded before the date on which the assessment sought to be enforced
became delinquent; and (c) liens for real property taxes and other
governmental assessments or charges against the unit. A lien under
this section is not subject to the provisions of chapter 6.13 RCW.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section,
the lien shall also be prior to the mortgages described in subsection
(2)(b) of this section to the extent of assessments for common
expenses, excluding any amounts for capital improvements, based on the
periodic budget adopted by the association pursuant to RCW 64.34.360(1)
which would have become due during the six months immediately preceding
the date of a sheriff's sale in an action for judicial foreclosure by
either the association or a mortgagee, the date of a trustee's sale in
a nonjudicial foreclosure by a mortgagee, or the date of recording of
the declaration of forfeiture in a proceeding by the vendor under a
real estate contract.
(4) The priority of the association's lien against units encumbered
by a mortgage held by an eligible mortgagee or by a mortgagee which has
given the association a written request for a notice of delinquent
assessments shall be reduced by up to three months if and to the extent
that the lien priority under subsection (3) of this section includes
delinquencies which relate to a period after such holder becomes an
eligible mortgagee or has given such notice and before the association
gives the holder a written notice of the delinquency. This subsection
does not affect the priority of mechanics' or ((materialmen's))
material suppliers' liens, or the priority of liens for other
assessments made by the association.
(5) If the association forecloses its lien under this section
nonjudicially pursuant to chapter 61.24 RCW, as provided by subsection
(9) of this section, the association shall not be entitled to the lien
priority provided for under subsection (3) of this section.
(6) Unless the declaration otherwise provides, if two or more
associations have liens for assessments created at any time on the same
real estate, those liens have equal priority.
(7) Recording of the declaration constitutes record notice and
perfection of the lien for assessments. While no further recording of
any claim of lien for assessment under this section shall be required
to perfect the association's lien, the association may record a notice
of claim of lien for assessments under this section in the real
property records of any county in which the condominium is located.
Such recording shall not constitute the written notice of delinquency
to a mortgagee referred to in subsection (2) of this section.
(8) A lien for unpaid assessments and the personal liability for
payment of assessments is extinguished unless proceedings to enforce
the lien or collect the debt are instituted within three years after
the amount of the assessments sought to be recovered becomes due.
(9) The lien arising under this section may be enforced judicially
by the association or its authorized representative in the manner set
forth in chapter 61.12 RCW. The lien arising under this section may be
enforced nonjudicially in the manner set forth in chapter 61.24 RCW for
nonjudicial foreclosure of deeds of trust if the declaration (a)
contains a grant of the condominium in trust to a trustee qualified
under RCW 61.24.010 to secure the obligations of the unit owners to the
association for the payment of assessments, (b) contains a power of
sale, (c) provides in its terms that the units are not used principally
for agricultural or farming purposes, and (d) provides that the power
of sale is operative in the case of a default in the obligation to pay
assessments. The association or its authorized representative shall
have the power, unless prohibited by the declaration, to purchase the
unit at the foreclosure sale and to acquire, hold, lease, mortgage, or
convey the same. Upon an express waiver in the complaint of any right
to a deficiency judgment in a judicial foreclosure action, the period
of redemption shall be eight months. Nothing in this section shall
prohibit an association from taking a deed in lieu of foreclosure.
(10) From the time of commencement of an action by the association
to foreclose a lien for nonpayment of delinquent assessments against a
unit that is not occupied by the owner thereof, the association shall
be entitled to the appointment of a receiver to collect from the lessee
thereof the rent for the unit as and when due. If the rental is not
paid, the receiver may obtain possession of the unit, refurbish it for
rental up to a reasonable standard for rental units in this type of
condominium, rent the unit or permit its rental to others, and apply
the rents first to the cost of the receivership and attorneys' fees
thereof, then to the cost of refurbishing the unit, then to applicable
charges, then to costs, fees, and charges of the foreclosure action,
and then to the payment of the delinquent assessments. Only a receiver
may take possession and collect rents under this subsection, and a
receiver shall not be appointed less than ninety days after the
delinquency. The exercise by the association of the foregoing rights
shall not affect the priority of preexisting liens on the unit.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the
holder of a mortgage or other purchaser of a unit who obtains the right
of possession of the unit through foreclosure shall not be liable for
assessments or installments thereof that became due prior to such right
of possession. Such unpaid assessments shall be deemed to be common
expenses collectible from all the unit owners, including such mortgagee
or other purchaser of the unit. Foreclosure of a mortgage does not
relieve the prior owner of personal liability for assessments accruing
against the unit prior to the date of such sale as provided in this
subsection.
(12) In addition to constituting a lien on the unit, each
assessment shall be the joint and several obligation of the owner or
owners of the unit to which the same are assessed as of the time the
assessment is due. In a voluntary conveyance, the grantee of a unit
shall be jointly and severally liable with the grantor for all unpaid
assessments against the grantor up to the time of the grantor's
conveyance, without prejudice to the grantee's right to recover from
the grantor the amounts paid by the grantee therefor. Suit to recover
a personal judgment for any delinquent assessment shall be maintainable
in any court of competent jurisdiction without foreclosing or waiving
the lien securing such sums.
(13) The association may from time to time establish reasonable
late charges and a rate of interest to be charged on all subsequent
delinquent assessments or installments thereof. In the absence of
another established nonusurious rate, delinquent assessments shall bear
interest from the date of delinquency at the maximum rate permitted
under RCW 19.52.020 on the date on which the assessments became
delinquent.
(14) The association shall be entitled to recover any costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in connection with the collection
of delinquent assessments, whether or not such collection activities
result in suit being commenced or prosecuted to judgment. In addition,
the association shall be entitled to recover costs and reasonable
attorneys' fees if it prevails on appeal and in the enforcement of a
judgment.
(15) The association upon written request shall furnish to a unit
owner or a mortgagee a statement signed by an officer or authorized
agent of the association setting forth the amount of unpaid assessments
against that unit. The statement shall be furnished within fifteen
days after receipt of the request and is binding on the association,
the board of directors, and every unit owner, unless and to the extent
known by the recipient to be false.
(16) To the extent not inconsistent with this section, the
declaration may provide for such additional remedies for collection of
assessments as may be permitted by law.

Sec. 176 RCW 66.20.120 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 22 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any person in charge of an institution regularly conducted as a
hospital or sanatorium for the care of persons in ill health, or as a
home devoted exclusively to the care of aged people, may, if he or she
holds a special permit under this title for that purpose, administer
liquor purchased by him or her under his or her special permit to any
patient or inmate of the institution who is in need of the same, either
by way of external application or otherwise for medicinal purposes, and
may charge for the liquor so administered; but no liquor shall be
administered by any person under this section except to bona fide
patients or inmates of the institution of which he or she is in charge
and in cases of actual need and every person in charge of an
institution who administers liquor in evasion or violation of this
title shall be guilty of a violation of this title.

Sec. 177 RCW 67.08.080 and 1999 c 282 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
A boxing event held in this state may not be for more than ten
rounds and no one round of any bout shall be scheduled for longer than
three minutes and there shall be not less than one minute intermission
between each round. In the event of bouts involving state, regional,
national, or world championships, the department may grant an extension
of no more than two additional rounds to allow total bouts of twelve
rounds. A contestant in any boxing event under this chapter may not be
permitted to wear gloves weighing less than eight ounces. The director
shall adopt rules to assure clean and ((sportsmanlike)) sporting
conduct on the part of all contestants and officials, and the orderly
and proper conduct of the event in all respects, and to otherwise make
rules consistent with this chapter, but such rules shall apply only to
events held under the provisions of this chapter. The director may
adopt rules with respect to round and bout limitations and clean and
((sportsmanlike)) sporting conduct for kickboxing, martial arts, or
wrestling events.

Sec. 178 RCW 67.16.200 and 2007 c 100 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A class 1 racing association licensed by the commission to
conduct a race meet may seek approval from the commission to conduct
parimutuel wagering at a satellite location or locations within the
state of Washington. In order to participate in parimutuel wagering at
a satellite location or locations within the state of Washington, the
holder of a class 1 racing association license must have conducted at
least one full live racing season. All class 1 racing associations
must hold a live race meet within each succeeding twelve-month period
to maintain eligibility to continue to participate in parimutuel
wagering at a satellite location or locations. The sale of parimutuel
pools at satellite locations shall be conducted simultaneous to all
parimutuel wagering activity conducted at the licensee's live racing
facility in the state of Washington. The commission's authority to
approve satellite wagering at a particular location is subject to the
following limitations:
(a) The commission may approve only one satellite location in each
county in the state; however, the commission may grant approval for
more than one licensee to conduct wagering at each satellite location.
A satellite location shall not be operated within twenty driving miles
of any class 1 racing facility. For the purposes of this section,
"driving miles" means miles measured by the most direct route as
determined by the commission; and
(b) A licensee shall not conduct satellite wagering at any
satellite location within sixty driving miles of any other racing
facility conducting a live race meet.
(2) Subject to local zoning and other land use ordinances, the
commission shall be the sole judge of whether approval to conduct
wagering at a satellite location shall be granted.
(3) The licensee shall combine the parimutuel pools of the
satellite location with those of the racing facility for the purpose of
determining odds and computing payoffs. The amount wagered at the
satellite location shall be combined with the amount wagered at the
racing facility for the application of take out formulas and
distribution as provided in RCW 67.16.102, 67.16.105, 67.16.170, and
67.16.175. A satellite extension of the licensee's racing facility
shall be subject to the same application of the rules of racing as the
licensee's racing facility.
(4) Upon written application to the commission, a class 1 racing
association may be authorized to transmit simulcasts of live horse
races conducted at its racetrack to locations outside of the state of
Washington approved by the commission and in accordance with the
interstate horse racing act of 1978 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 to 3007) or
any other applicable laws. The commission may permit parimutuel pools
on the simulcast races to be combined in a common pool. A racing
association that transmits simulcasts of its races to locations outside
this state shall pay at least fifty percent of the fee that it receives
for sale of the simulcast signal to the horsemen's or horsewomen's
purse account for its live races after first deducting the actual cost
of sending the signal out of state.
(5) Upon written application to the commission, a class 1 racing
association may be authorized to transmit simulcasts of live horse
races conducted at its racetrack to licensed racing associations
located within the state of Washington and approved by the commission
for the receipt of the simulcasts. The commission shall permit
parimutuel pools on the simulcast races to be combined in a common
pool. The fee for in-state, track-to-track simulcasts shall be five
and one-half percent of the gross parimutuel receipts generated at the
receiving location and payable to the sending racing association. A
racing association that transmits simulcasts of its races to other
licensed racing associations shall pay at least fifty percent of the
fee that it receives for the simulcast signal to the horsemen's or
horsewomen's purse account for its live race meet after first deducting
the actual cost of sending the simulcast signal. A racing association
that receives races simulcast from class 1 racing associations within
the state shall pay at least fifty percent of its share of the
parimutuel receipts to the horsemen's or horsewomen's purse account for
its live race meet after first deducting the purchase price and the
actual direct costs of importing the race.
(6) A class 1 racing association may be allowed to import
simulcasts of horse races from out-of-state racing facilities. With
the prior approval of the commission, the class 1 racing association
may participate in a multijurisdictional common pool and may change its
commission and breakage rates to achieve a common rate with other
participants in the common pool.
(a) The class 1 racing association shall make written application
with the commission for permission to import simulcast horse races for
the purpose of parimutuel wagering. Subject to the terms of this
section, the commission is the sole authority in determining whether to
grant approval for an imported simulcast race.
(b) When open for parimutuel wagering, a class 1 racing association
which imports simulcast races shall also conduct simulcast parimutuel
wagering within its licensed racing enclosure on all races simulcast
from other class 1 racing associations within the state of Washington.
(c) On any imported simulcast race, the class 1 racing association
shall pay fifty percent of its share of the parimutuel receipts to the
horsemen's or horsewomen's purse account for its live race meet after
first deducting the purchase price of the imported race and the actual
costs of importing and offering the race.
(7) A licensed nonprofit racing association may be approved to
import one simulcast race of regional or national interest on each live
race day.
(8) For purposes of this section, a class 1 racing association is
defined as a licensee approved by the commission to conduct during each
twelve-month period at least forty days of live racing. If a live race
day is canceled due to reasons directly attributable to acts of God,
labor disruptions affecting live race days but not directly involving
the licensee or its employees, or other circumstances that the
commission decides are beyond the control of the class 1 racing
association, then the canceled day counts toward the forty-day
requirement. The commission may by rule increase the number of live
racing days required to maintain class 1 racing association status or
make other rules necessary to implement this section.
(9) This section does not establish a new form of gaming in
Washington or allow expanded gaming within the state beyond what has
been previously authorized. Simulcast wagering has been allowed in
Washington before April 19, 1997. Therefore, this section does not
allow gaming of any nature or scope that was prohibited before April
19, 1997. This section is necessary to protect the Washington equine
breeding and racing industries, and in particular those sectors of
these industries that are dependent upon live horse racing. The
purpose of this section is to protect these industries from adverse
economic impacts and to promote fan attendance at class 1 racing
facilities. Therefore, a licensed class 1 racing association may be
approved to disseminate imported simulcast race card programs to
satellite locations approved under this section, provided that the
class 1 racing association has conducted at least forty live racing
days with an average on-track handle on the live racing product of a
minimum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars per day during the twelve
months immediately preceding the application date. However, to promote
the development of a new class 1 racing association facility and to
meet the best interests of the Washington equine breeding and racing
industries, the commission may by rule reduce the required minimum
average on-track handle on the live racing product from one hundred
fifty thousand dollars per day to thirty thousand dollars per day.
(10) A licensee conducting simulcasting under this section shall
place signs in the licensee's gambling establishment under RCW
9.46.071. The informational signs concerning problem and compulsive
gambling must include a toll-free telephone number for problem and
pathological gamblers and be developed under RCW 9.46.071.
(11) Chapter 10, Laws of 2001 1st sp. sess. does not establish a
new form of gaming in Washington or allow expanded gaming within the
state beyond what has been previously authorized. Simulcast wagering
has been allowed in Washington before August 23, 2001. Therefore, this
section does not allow gaming of any nature or scope that was
prohibited before August 23, 2001. Chapter 10, Laws of 2001 1st sp.
sess. is necessary to protect the Washington equine breeding and racing
industries, and in particular those sectors of these industries that
are dependent upon live horse racing. The purpose of chapter 10, Laws
of 2001 1st sp. sess. is to protect these industries from adverse
economic impacts and to promote fan attendance at class 1 racing
facilities.

Sec. 179 RCW 70.97.040 and 2005 c 504 s 406 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Every person who is a resident of an enhanced services
facility shall be entitled to all the rights set forth in this chapter,
and chapters 71.05 and 70.96A RCW, and shall retain all rights not
denied him or her under these chapters.
(b) No person shall be presumed incompetent as a consequence of
receiving an evaluation or voluntary or involuntary treatment for a
mental disorder, chemical dependency disorder, or both, under this
chapter, or chapter 71.05 or 70.96A RCW, or any prior laws of this
state dealing with mental illness. Competency shall not be determined
or withdrawn except under the provisions of chapter 10.77 or 11.88 RCW.
(c) At the time of his or her treatment planning meeting, every
resident of an enhanced services facility shall be given a written
statement setting forth the substance of this section. The department
shall by rule develop a statement and process for informing residents
of their rights in a manner that is likely to be understood by the
resident.
(2) Every resident of an enhanced services facility shall have the
right to adequate care and individualized treatment.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to deny
to any person treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance
with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination.
(4) Persons receiving evaluation or treatment under this chapter
shall be given a reasonable choice of an available physician or other
professional person qualified to provide such services.
(5) The physician-patient privilege or the psychologist-client
privilege shall be deemed waived in proceedings under this chapter
relating to the administration of antipsychotic medications. As to
other proceedings under chapter 10.77, 70.96A, or 71.05 RCW, the
privileges shall be waived when a court of competent jurisdiction in
its discretion determines that such waiver is necessary to protect
either the detained person or the public.
(6) Insofar as danger to the person or others is not created, each
resident of an enhanced services facility shall have, in addition to
other rights not specifically withheld by law, the following rights, a
list of which shall be prominently posted in all facilities,
institutions, and hospitals providing such services:
(a) To wear his or her own clothes and to keep and use his or her
own personal possessions, except when deprivation of same is essential
to protect the safety of the resident or other persons;
(b) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his or her
own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;
(c) To have access to individual storage space for his or her
private use;
(d) To have visitors at reasonable times;
(e) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and
receive confidential calls, consistent with an effective treatment
program;
(f) To have ready access to letter writing materials, including
stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the
mails;
(g) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic
medications beyond the hearing conducted pursuant to RCW 71.05.215 or
71.05.217, or the performance of electroconvulsant therapy, or surgery,
except emergency life-saving surgery, unless ordered by a court under
RCW 71.05.217;
(h) To discuss and actively participate in treatment plans and
decisions with professional persons;
(i) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any
circumstances;
(j) To dispose of property and sign contracts unless such person
has been adjudicated an incompetent in a court proceeding directed to
that particular issue; and
(k) To complain about rights violations or conditions and request
the assistance of a mental health ((ombudsman)) ombuds or
representative of Washington protection and advocacy. The facility may
not prohibit or interfere with a resident's decision to consult with an
advocate of his or her choice.
(7) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit a resident
from petitioning by writ of habeas corpus for release.
(8) Nothing in this section permits any person to knowingly violate
a no-contact order or a condition of an active judgment and sentence or
active supervision by the department of corrections.
(9) A person has a right to refuse placement, except where subject
to commitment, in an enhanced services facility. No person shall be
denied other department services solely on the grounds that he or she
has made such a refusal.
(10) A person has a right to appeal the decision of the department
that he or she is eligible for placement at an enhanced services
facility, and shall be given notice of the right to appeal in a format
that is accessible to the person with instructions regarding what to do
if the person wants to appeal.

Sec. 180 RCW 70.97.100 and 2005 c 504 s 412 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish licensing rules for enhanced
services facilities to serve the populations defined in this chapter.
(2) No person or public or private agency may operate or maintain
an enhanced services facility without a license, which must be renewed
annually.
(3) A licensee shall have the following readily accessible and
available for review by the department, residents, families of
residents, and the public:
(a) Its license to operate and a copy of the department's most
recent inspection report and any recent complaint investigation reports
issued by the department;
(b) Its written policies and procedures for all treatment, care,
and services provided directly or indirectly by the facility; and
(c) The department's toll-free complaint number, which shall also
be posted in a clearly visible place and manner.
(4) Enhanced services facilities shall maintain a grievance
procedure that meets the requirements of rules established by the
department.
(5) No facility shall discriminate or retaliate in any manner
against a resident or employee because the resident, employee, or any
other person made a complaint or provided information to the
department, the long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds, Washington
protection and advocacy system, or a mental health ((ombudsperson))
ombuds.
(6) Each enhanced services facility will post in a prominent place
in a common area a notice by the Washington protection and advocacy
system providing contact information.

Sec. 181 RCW 70.128.150 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 27 are each
amended to read as follows:
Whenever possible, adult family homes are encouraged to contact and
work with local quality assurance projects such as the volunteer
((ombudsman)) ombuds with the goal of assuring high quality care is
provided in the home.
An adult family home may not willfully interfere with a
representative of the long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds program in
the performance of official duties. The department shall impose a
penalty of not more than one thousand dollars for any such willful
interference.

Sec. 182 RCW 70.128.163 and 2009 c 560 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When the department has summarily suspended a license, the
licensee may, subject to the department's approval, elect to
participate in a temporary management program. All provisions of this
section shall apply.
The purposes of a temporary management program are as follows:
(a) To mitigate dislocation and transfer trauma of residents while
the department and licensee may pursue dispute resolution or appeal of
a summary suspension of license;
(b) To facilitate the continuity of safe and appropriate resident
care and services;
(c) To preserve a residential option that meets a specialized
service need and/or is in a geographical area that has a lack of
available providers; and
(d) To provide residents with the opportunity for orderly
discharge.
(2) Licensee participation in the temporary management program is
voluntary. The department shall have the discretion to approve any
temporary manager and the temporary management arrangements. The
temporary management shall assume the total responsibility for the
daily operations of the home.
(3) The temporary management shall contract with the licensee as an
independent contractor and is responsible for ensuring that all minimum
licensing requirements are met. The temporary management shall protect
the health, safety, and well-being of the residents for the duration of
the temporary management and shall perform all acts reasonably
necessary to ensure that residents' needs are met. The licensee is
responsible for all costs related to administering the temporary
management program and contracting with the temporary management. The
temporary management agreement shall at a minimum address the
following:
(a) Provision of liability insurance to protect residents and their
property;
(b) Preservation of resident trust funds;
(c) The timely payment of past due or current accounts, operating
expenses, including but not limited to staff compensation, and all debt
that comes due during the period of the temporary management;
(d) The responsibilities for addressing all other financial
obligations that would interfere with the ability of the temporary
manager to provide adequate care and services to residents; and
(e) The authority of the temporary manager to manage the home,
including the hiring, managing, and firing of employees for good cause,
and to provide adequate care and services to residents.
(4) The licensee and department shall provide written notification
immediately to all residents, legal representatives, interested family
members, and the state long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds program, of
the temporary management and the reasons for it. This notification
shall include notice that residents may move from the home without
notifying the licensee in advance, and without incurring any charges,
fees, or costs otherwise available for insufficient advance notice,
during the temporary management period.
(5) The temporary management period under this section concludes
twenty-eight days after issuance of the formal notification of
enforcement action or conclusion of administrative proceedings,
whichever date is later. Nothing in this section precludes the
department from revoking its approval of the temporary management
and/or exercising its licensing enforcement authority under this
chapter. The department's decision whether to approve or to revoke a
temporary management arrangement is not subject to the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) The department is authorized to adopt rules implementing this
section. In implementing this section, the department shall consult
with consumers, advocates, and organizations representing adult family
homes. The department may recruit and approve qualified, licensed
providers interested in serving as temporary managers.

Sec. 183 RCW 70.128.200 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 30 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall maintain a toll-free telephone number for
receiving complaints regarding adult family homes.
(2) An adult family home shall post in a place and manner clearly
visible to residents and visitors the department's toll-free complaint
telephone number.
(3) No adult family home shall discriminate or retaliate in any
manner against a resident on the basis or for the reason that such
resident or any other person made a complaint to the department or the
long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds or cooperated with the
investigation of such a complaint.

Sec. 184 RCW 70.129.030 and 1998 c 272 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The facility must inform the resident both orally and in
writing in a language that the resident understands of his or her
rights and all rules and regulations governing resident conduct and
responsibilities during the stay in the facility. The notification
must be made prior to or upon admission. Receipt of the information
must be acknowledged in writing.
(2) The resident or his or her legal representative has the right:
(a) Upon an oral or written request, to access all records
pertaining to himself or herself including clinical records within
twenty-four hours; and
(b) After receipt of his or her records for inspection, to purchase
at a cost not to exceed the community standard photocopies of the
records or portions of them upon request and two working days' advance
notice to the facility.
(3) The facility shall only admit or retain individuals whose needs
it can safely and appropriately serve in the facility with appropriate
available staff and through the provision of reasonable accommodations
required by state or federal law. Except in cases of genuine
emergency, the facility shall not admit an individual before obtaining
a thorough assessment of the resident's needs and preferences. The
assessment shall contain, unless unavailable despite the best efforts
of the facility, the resident applicant, and other interested parties,
the following minimum information: Recent medical history; necessary
and contraindicated medications; a licensed medical or other health
professional's diagnosis, unless the individual objects for religious
reasons; significant known behaviors or symptoms that may cause concern
or require special care; mental illness, except where protected by
confidentiality laws; level of personal care needs; activities and
service preferences; and preferences regarding other issues important
to the resident applicant, such as food and daily routine.
(4) The facility must inform each resident in writing in a language
the resident or his or her representative understands before admission,
and at least once every twenty-four months thereafter of: (a)
Services, items, and activities customarily available in the facility
or arranged for by the facility as permitted by the facility's license;
(b) charges for those services, items, and activities including charges
for services, items, and activities not covered by the facility's per
diem rate or applicable public benefit programs; and (c) the rules of
facility operations required under RCW 70.129.140(2). Each resident
and his or her representative must be informed in writing in advance of
changes in the availability or the charges for services, items, or
activities, or of changes in the facility's rules. Except in
emergencies, thirty days' advance notice must be given prior to the
change. However, for facilities licensed for six or fewer residents,
if there has been a substantial and continuing change in the resident's
condition necessitating substantially greater or lesser services,
items, or activities, then the charges for those services, items, or
activities may be changed upon fourteen days' advance written notice.
(5) The facility must furnish a written description of residents
rights that includes:
(a) A description of the manner of protecting personal funds, under
RCW 70.129.040;
(b) A posting of names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the
state survey and certification agency, the state licensure office, the
state ((ombudsmen)) ombuds program, and the protection and advocacy
systems; and
(c) A statement that the resident may file a complaint with the
appropriate state licensing agency concerning alleged resident abuse,
neglect, and misappropriation of resident property in the facility.
(6) Notification of changes.
(a) A facility must immediately consult with the resident's
physician, and if known, make reasonable efforts to notify the
resident's legal representative or an interested family member when
there is:
(i) An accident involving the resident which requires or has the
potential for requiring physician intervention;
(ii) A significant change in the resident's physical, mental, or
psychosocial status (i.e., a deterioration in health, mental, or
psychosocial status in either life-threatening conditions or clinical
complications).
(b) The facility must promptly notify the resident or the
resident's representative shall make reasonable efforts to notify an
interested family member, if known, when there is:
(i) A change in room or roommate assignment; or
(ii) A decision to transfer or discharge the resident from the
facility.
(c) The facility must record and update the address and phone
number of the resident's representative or interested family member,
upon receipt of notice from them.

Sec. 185 RCW 70.129.090 and 1994 c 214 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The resident has the right and the facility must not interfere
with access to any resident by the following:
(a) Any representative of the state;
(b) The resident's individual physician;
(c) The state long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds as established
under chapter 43.190 RCW;
(d) The agency responsible for the protection and advocacy system
for ((developmentally disabled)) individuals with developmental
disabilities as established under part C of the developmental
disabilities assistance and bill of rights act;
(e) The agency responsible for the protection and advocacy system
for ((mentally ill)) individuals with mental illness as established
under the protection and advocacy for mentally ill individuals act;
(f) Subject to reasonable restrictions to protect the rights of
others and to the resident's right to deny or withdraw consent at any
time, immediate family or other relatives of the resident and others
who are visiting with the consent of the resident;
(g) The agency responsible for the protection and advocacy system
for individuals with disabilities as established under section 509 of
the rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended, who are not served under
the mandates of existing protection and advocacy systems created under
federal law.
(2) The facility must provide reasonable access to a resident by
his or her representative or an entity or individual that provides
health, social, legal, or other services to the resident, subject to
the resident's right to deny or withdraw consent at any time.
(3) The facility must allow representatives of the state
((ombudsman)) ombuds to examine a resident's clinical records with the
permission of the resident or the resident's legal representative, and
consistent with state and federal law.

Sec. 186 RCW 70.129.110 and 1997 c 392 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The facility must permit each resident to remain in the
facility, and not transfer or discharge the resident from the facility
unless:
(a) The transfer or discharge is necessary for the resident's
welfare and the resident's needs cannot be met in the facility;
(b) The safety of individuals in the facility is endangered;
(c) The health of individuals in the facility would otherwise be
endangered;
(d) The resident has failed to make the required payment for his or
her stay; or
(e) The facility ceases to operate.
(2) All long-term care facilities shall fully disclose to potential
residents or their legal representative the service capabilities of the
facility prior to admission to the facility. If the care needs of the
applicant who is medicaid eligible are in excess of the facility's
service capabilities, the department shall identify other care settings
or residential care options consistent with federal law.
(3) Before a long-term care facility transfers or discharges a
resident, the facility must:
(a) First attempt through reasonable accommodations to avoid the
transfer or discharge, unless agreed to by the resident;
(b) Notify the resident and representative and make a reasonable
effort to notify, if known, an interested family member of the transfer
or discharge and the reasons for the move in writing and in a language
and manner they understand;
(c) Record the reasons in the resident's record; and
(d) Include in the notice the items described in subsection (5) of
this section.
(4)(a) Except when specified in this subsection, the notice of
transfer or discharge required under subsection (3) of this section
must be made by the facility at least thirty days before the resident
is transferred or discharged.
(b) Notice may be made as soon as practicable before transfer or
discharge when:
(i) The safety of individuals in the facility would be endangered;
(ii) The health of individuals in the facility would be endangered;
(iii) An immediate transfer or discharge is required by the
resident's urgent medical needs; or
(iv) A resident has not resided in the facility for thirty days.
(5) The written notice specified in subsection (3) of this section
must include the following:
(a) The reason for transfer or discharge;
(b) The effective date of transfer or discharge;
(c) The location to which the resident is transferred or
discharged;
(d) The name, address, and telephone number of the state long-term
care ((ombudsman)) ombuds;
(e) For residents with developmental disabilities, the mailing
address and telephone number of the agency responsible for the
protection and advocacy of ((developmentally disabled)) individuals
with developmental disabilities established under part C of the
developmental disabilities assistance and bill of rights act; and
(f) For residents ((who are mentally ill)) with mental illness, the
mailing address and telephone number of the agency responsible for the
protection and advocacy of ((mentally ill)) individuals with mental
illness established under the protection and advocacy for mentally ill
individuals act.
(6) A facility must provide sufficient preparation and orientation
to residents to ensure safe and orderly transfer or discharge from the
facility.
(7) A resident discharged in violation of this section has the
right to be readmitted immediately upon the first availability of a
gender-appropriate bed in the facility.

Sec. 187 RCW 70.129.160 and 2012 c 10 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
The long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall monitor
implementation of this chapter and determine the degree to which
veterans' homes, nursing facilities, adult family homes, and assisted
living facilities ensure that residents are able to exercise their
rights. The long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall consult with the
departments of health and social and health services, long-term care
facility organizations, resident groups, senior citizen organizations,
and organizations concerning individuals with disabilities.

Sec. 188 RCW 70.129.170 and 1994 c 214 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature intends that long-term care facility or nursing
home residents, their family members or guardians, the long-term care
((ombudsman)) ombuds, protection and advocacy personnel identified in
RCW 70.129.110(((4))) (5) (e) and (f), and others who may seek to
assist long-term care facility or nursing home residents, use the least
formal means available to satisfactorily resolve disputes that may
arise regarding the rights conferred by the provisions of this chapter
((70.129 RCW)) and RCW 18.20.180, 18.51.009, 72.36.037, and 70.128.125.
Wherever feasible, direct discussion with facility personnel or
administrators should be employed. Failing that, and where feasible,
recourse may be sought through state or federal long-term care or
nursing home licensing or other regulatory authorities. However, the
procedures suggested in this section are cumulative and shall not
restrict an agency or person from seeking a remedy provided by law or
from obtaining additional relief based on the same facts, including any
remedy available to an individual at common law. Chapter 214, Laws of
1994 is not intended to, and shall not be construed to, create any
right of action on the part of any individual beyond those in existence
under any common law or statutory doctrine. Chapter 214, Laws of 1994
is not intended to, and shall not be construed to, operate in
derogation of any right of action on the part of any individual in
existence on June 9, 1994.

Sec. 189 RCW 71.24.350 and 2005 c 504 s 803 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall require each regional support network to
provide for a separately funded mental health ((ombudsman)) ombuds
office in each regional support network that is independent of the
regional support network. The ((ombudsman)) ombuds office shall
maximize the use of consumer advocates.

Sec. 190 RCW 73.16.061 and 2001 c 133 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In case any employer, his or her successor or successors fails
or refuses to comply with the provisions of RCW 73.16.031 through
73.16.061 and 73.16.090, the attorney general shall bring action in the
superior court in the county in which the employer is located or does
business to obtain an order to specifically require such employer to
comply with the provisions of this chapter, and, as an incident
thereto, to compensate such person for any loss of wages or benefits
suffered by reason of such employer's unlawful act if:
(a) The service in question was state duty not covered by the
uniformed services employment and reemployment rights act of 1994, P.L.
103-353 (38 U.S.C. Sec. 4301 et seq.); and
(b) The employer support for guard and reserve ((ombudsman))
ombuds, or his or her designee, has inquired in the matter and has been
unable to resolve it.
(2) If the conditions in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section
are met, any such person who does not desire the services of the
attorney general may, by private counsel, bring such action.

Sec. 191 RCW 73.20.010 and 1945 c 271 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the acknowledgment of instruments and the
performance of other notarial acts in the manner and form and as
otherwise authorized by law, instruments may be acknowledged, documents
attested, oaths and affirmations administered, depositions and
affidavits executed, and other notarial acts performed, before or by
any commissioned officer in active service of the armed forces of the
United States with the rank of second lieutenant or higher in the army
or marine corps, or with the rank of ensign or higher in the navy or
coast guard, or with equivalent rank in any other component part of the
armed forces of the United States, by any person who either:
(1) Is a member of the armed forces of the United States((,)); or
(2) Is serving as a merchant seaman or seawoman outside the limits
of the United States included within the forty-eight states and the
District of Columbia; or
(3) Is outside said limits by permission, assignment, or direction
of any department or official of the United States government, in
connection with any activity pertaining to the prosecution of any war
in which the United States is then engaged.
Such acknowledgment of instruments, attestation of documents,
administration of oaths and affirmations, execution of depositions and
affidavits, and performance of other notarial acts, heretofore or
hereafter made or taken, are hereby declared legal, valid, and binding,
and instruments and documents so acknowledged, authenticated, or sworn
to shall be admissible in evidence and eligible to record in this state
under the same circumstances, and with the same force and effect as if
such acknowledgment, attestation, oath, affirmation, deposition,
affidavit, or other notarial act, had been made or taken within this
state before or by a duly qualified officer or official as otherwise
provided by law.
In the taking of acknowledgments and the performing of other
notarial acts requiring certification, a certificate endorsed upon or
attached to the instrument or documents, which shows the date of the
notarial act and which states, in substance, that the person appearing
before the officer acknowledged the instrument as his or her act or
made or signed the instrument or document under oath, shall be
sufficient for all intents and purposes. The instrument or document
shall not be rendered invalid by the failure to state the place of
execution or acknowledgment.
If the signature, rank, and branch of service or subdivision
thereof, of any such commissioned officer appear upon such instrument
or document or certificate, no further proof of the authority of such
officer so to act shall be required and such action by such
commissioned officer shall be prima facie evidence that the person
making such oath or acknowledgment is within the purview of this
section.

Sec. 192 RCW 74.04.011 and 1979 c 141 s 295 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of social and health services shall be the
administrative head and appointing authority of the department of
social and health services and he or she shall have the power to and
shall employ such assistants and personnel as may be necessary for the
general administration of the department: PROVIDED, That such
employment is in accordance with the rules and regulations of the state
merit system. The secretary shall through and by means of his or her
assistants and personnel exercise such powers and perform such duties
as may be prescribed by the public assistance laws of this state.
The authority vested in the secretary as appointing authority may
be delegated by the secretary or his or her designee to any suitable
employee of the department.

Sec. 193 RCW 74.04.014 and 2012 c 253 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the office of
fraud and accountability shall have prompt access to all individuals,
records, electronic data, reports, audits, reviews, documents, and
other materials available to the department of revenue, department of
labor and industries, department of early learning, employment security
department, department of licensing, and any other government entity
that can be used to help facilitate investigations of fraud or abuse as
determined necessary by the director of the office of fraud and
accountability.
(2) The investigator shall have access to all original child care
records maintained by licensed and unlicensed child care providers with
the consent of the provider or with a court order or valid search
warrant.
(3) Information gathered by the department, the office, or the
fraud ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall be safeguarded and remain confidential
as required by applicable state or federal law. Whenever information
or assistance requested under subsection (1) or (2) of this section is,
in the judgment of the director, unreasonably refused or not provided,
the director of the office of fraud and accountability must report the
circumstances to the secretary immediately.

Sec. 194 RCW 74.04.080 and 1979 c 141 s 300 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county administrator shall have the power to, and shall, employ
such personnel as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this
title, which employment shall be in accordance with the rules and
regulations of the state merit system, and in accordance with personnel
and administrative standards established by the department. The county
administrator before qualifying shall furnish a surety bond in such
amount as may be fixed by the secretary, but not less than five
thousand dollars, conditioned that the administrator will faithfully
account for all money and property that may come into his or her
possession or control. The cost of such bond shall be an
administrative expense and shall be paid by the department.

Sec. 195 RCW 74.04.350 and 1959 c 26 s 74.04.350 are each amended
to read as follows:
Federal surplus commodities shall not be deemed or construed to be
public assistance and care or a substitute, in whole or in part,
therefor; and the receipt of such commodities by eligible families and
individuals shall not subject them, their legally responsible
relatives, their property, or their estates to any demand, claim, or
liability on account thereof. A person's need or eligibility for
public assistance or care shall not be affected by his or her receipt
of federal surplus commodities.

Sec. 196 RCW 74.04.385 and 1979 c 141 s 314 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any recipient of federal or other surplus
commodities received under RCW 74.04.380 to sell, transfer, barter, or
otherwise dispose of such commodities to any other person. It shall be
unlawful for any person to receive, possess, or use any surplus
commodities received under RCW 74.04.380 unless he or she has been
certified as eligible to receive, possess, and use such commodities by
the state department of social and health services.
Violation of the provisions of RCW 74.04.380 or this section shall
constitute a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished
by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months or by
a fine of not more than five hundred dollars or both.

Sec. 197 RCW 74.04.480 and 1979 c 141 s 321 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state department of social and health services is hereby
authorized to promulgate rules and regulations governing the granting
to any employee of the department, other than a provisional employee,
a leave of absence for educational purposes to attend an institution of
learning for the purpose of improving his or her skill, knowledge, and
technique in the administration of social welfare programs which will
benefit the department.
Pursuant to the rules and regulations of the department, employees
of the department who are engaged in the administration of public
welfare programs may (1) attend courses of training provided by
institutions of higher learning; (2) attend special courses of study or
seminars of short duration conducted by experts on a temporary basis
for the purpose; (3) accept fellowships or traineeships at institutions
of higher learning with such stipends as are permitted by regulations
of the federal government.
The department of social and health services is hereby authorized
to accept any funds from the federal government or any other public or
private agency made available for training purposes for public
assistance personnel and to conform with such requirements as are
necessary in order to receive such funds.

Sec. 198 RCW 74.08.050 and 1971 ex.s. c 169 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
Application for a grant in any category of public assistance shall
be made to the county office by the applicant or by another on his or
her behalf, and shall be reduced to writing upon standard forms
prescribed by the department, and a written acknowledgment of receipt
of the application by the department shall be given to each applicant
at the time of making application.

Sec. 199 RCW 74.08.280 and 1987 c 406 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
If any person receiving public assistance has demonstrated an
inability to care for oneself or for money, the department may direct
the payment of the installments of public assistance to any responsible
person, social service agency, or corporation or to a legally appointed
guardian for his or her benefit. The state may contract with persons,
social service agencies, or corporations approved by the department to
provide protective payee services for a fixed amount per recipient
receiving protective payee services to cover administrative costs. The
department may by rule specify a fee to cover administrative costs.
Such fee shall not be withheld from a recipient's grant.
If the state requires the appointment of a guardian for this
purpose, the department shall pay all costs and reasonable fees as
fixed by the court.

Sec. 200 RCW 74.08.340 and 1997 c 58 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
All assistance granted under this title shall be deemed to be
granted and to be held subject to the provisions of any amending or
repealing act that may hereafter be enacted, and no recipient shall
have any claim for compensation, or otherwise, by reason of his or her
assistance being affected in any way by such amending or repealing act.
There is no legal entitlement to public assistance.

Sec. 201 RCW 74.08.370 and 1973 c 106 s 33 are each amended to
read as follows:
All old age assistance grants under this title shall be a charge
against and payable out of the general fund of the state. Payment
thereof shall be by warrant drawn upon vouchers duly prepared and
verified by the secretary of the department of social and health
services or his or her official representative.

Sec. 202 RCW 74.09.210 and 2012 c 241 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person, firm, corporation, partnership, association, agency,
institution, or other legal entity, but not including an individual
public assistance recipient of health care, shall, on behalf of himself
or herself or others, obtain or attempt to obtain benefits or payments
under this chapter in a greater amount than that to which entitled by
means of:
(a) A willful false statement;
(b) By willful misrepresentation, or by concealment of any material
facts; or
(c) By other fraudulent scheme or device, including, but not
limited to:
(i) Billing for services, drugs, supplies, or equipment that were
unfurnished, of lower quality, or a substitution or misrepresentation
of items billed; or
(ii) Repeated billing for purportedly covered items, which were not
in fact so covered.
(2) Any person or entity knowingly violating any of the provisions
of subsection (1) of this section shall be liable for repayment of any
excess benefits or payments received, plus interest at the rate and in
the manner provided in RCW 43.20B.695. Such person or other entity
shall further, in addition to any other penalties provided by law, be
subject to civil penalties. The director or the attorney general may
assess civil penalties in an amount not to exceed three times the
amount of such excess benefits or payments: PROVIDED, That these civil
penalties shall not apply to any acts or omissions occurring prior to
September 1, 1979. RCW 43.20A.215 governs notice of a civil fine
assessed by the director and provides the right to an adjudicative
proceeding.
(3) A criminal action need not be brought against a person for that
person to be civilly liable under this section.
(4) In all administrative proceedings under this section, service,
adjudicative proceedings, and judicial review of such determinations
shall be in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act.
(5) Civil penalties shall be deposited upon their receipt into the
medicaid fraud penalty account established in RCW 74.09.215.
(6) The attorney general may contract with private attorneys and
local governments in bringing actions under this section as necessary.

Sec. 203 RCW 74.09.230 and 1979 ex.s. c 152 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any person, including any corporation, that
(1) knowingly makes or causes to be made any false statement or
representation of a material fact in any application for any payment
under any medical care program authorized under this chapter, or
(2) at any time knowingly makes or causes to be made any false
statement or representation of a material fact for use in determining
rights to such payment, or knowingly falsifies, conceals, or covers up
by any trick, scheme, or device a material fact in connection with such
application or payment, or
(3) having knowledge of the occurrence of any event affecting (a)
the initial or continued right to any payment, or (b) the initial or
continued right to any such payment of any other individual in whose
behalf he or she has applied for or is receiving such payment, conceals
or fails to disclose such event with an intent fraudulently to secure
such payment either in a greater amount or quantity than is due or when
no such payment is authorized,
shall be guilty of a class C felony: PROVIDED, That the fine, if
imposed, shall not be in an amount more than twenty-five thousand
dollars, except as authorized by RCW 9A.20.030.

Sec. 204 RCW 74.12.010 and 1999 c 120 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of the administration of temporary assistance for
needy families, the term "dependent child" means any child in need
under the age of eighteen years who is living with a relative as
specified under federal temporary assistance for needy families program
requirements, in a place of residence maintained by one or more of such
relatives as his or her or their homes. The term a "dependent child"
shall, notwithstanding the foregoing, also include a child who would
meet such requirements except for his or her removal from the home of
a relative specified above as a result of a judicial determination that
continuation therein would be contrary to the welfare of such child,
for whose placement and care the state department of social and health
services or the county office is responsible, and who has been placed
in a licensed or approved child care institution or foster home as a
result of such determination and who: (1) Was receiving an aid to
families with dependent children grant for the month in which court
proceedings leading to such determination were initiated; or (2) would
have received aid to families with dependent children for such month if
application had been made therefor; or (3) in the case of a child who
had been living with a specified relative within six months prior to
the month in which such proceedings were initiated, would have received
aid to families with dependent children for such month if in such month
he or she had been living with such a relative and application had been
made therefor, as authorized by the social security act.
"Temporary assistance for needy families" means money payments,
services, and remedial care with respect to a dependent child or
dependent children and the needy parent or relative with whom the child
lives.

Sec. 205 RCW 74.12.250 and 1997 c 58 s 506 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the department, after investigation, finds that any applicant
for assistance under this chapter or any recipient of funds under this
chapter would not use, or is not utilizing, the grant adequately for
the needs of his or her child or children or would dissipate the grant
or is dissipating such grant, or would be or is unable to manage
adequately the funds paid on behalf of said child and that to provide
or continue payments to the applicant or recipient would be contrary to
the welfare of the child, the department may make such payments to
another individual who is interested in or concerned with the welfare
of such child and relative: PROVIDED, That the department shall
provide such counseling and other services as are available and
necessary to develop greater ability on the part of the relative to
manage funds in such manner as to protect the welfare of the family.
Periodic review of each case shall be made by the department to
determine if said relative is able to resume management of the
assistance grant. If after a reasonable period of time the payments to
the relative cannot be resumed, the department may request the attorney
general to file a petition in the superior court for the appointment of
a guardian for the child or children. Such petition shall set forth
the facts warranting such appointment. Notice of the hearing on such
petition shall be served upon the recipient and the department not less
than ten days before the date set for such hearing. Such petition may
be filed with the clerk of superior court and all process issued and
served without payment of costs. If upon the hearing of such petition
the court is satisfied that it is for the best interest of the child or
children, and all parties concerned, that a guardian be appointed, he
or she shall order the appointment, and may require the guardian to
render to the court a detailed itemized account of expenditures of such
assistance payments at such time as the court may deem advisable.
It is the intention of this section that the guardianship herein
provided for shall be a special and limited guardianship solely for the
purpose of safeguarding the assistance grants made to dependent
children. Such guardianship shall terminate upon the termination of
such assistance grant, or sooner on order of the court, upon good cause
shown.

Sec. 206 RCW 74.13.333 and 2009 c 520 s 82 and 2009 c 491 s 11
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A foster parent who believes that a department or supervising
agency employee has retaliated against the foster parent or in any
other manner discriminated against the foster parent because:
(a) The foster parent made a complaint with the office of the
family and children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds, the attorney general, law
enforcement agencies, the department, or the supervising agency,
provided information, or otherwise cooperated with the investigation of
such a complaint;
(b) The foster parent has caused to be instituted any proceedings
under or related to Title 13 RCW;
(c) The foster parent has testified or is about to testify in any
proceedings under or related to Title 13 RCW;
(d) The foster parent has advocated for services on behalf of the
foster child;
(e) The foster parent has sought to adopt a foster child in the
foster parent's care; or
(f) The foster parent has discussed or consulted with anyone
concerning the foster parent's rights under this chapter or chapter
74.15 or 13.34 RCW, may file a complaint with the office of the family
and children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds.
(2) The ((ombudsman)) ombuds may investigate the allegations of
retaliation. The ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall have access to all
relevant information and resources held by or within the department by
which to conduct the investigation. Upon the conclusion of its
investigation, the ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall provide its findings in
written form to the department.
(3) The department shall notify the office of the family and
children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds in writing, within thirty days of
receiving the ((ombudsman's)) ombuds's findings, of any personnel
action taken or to be taken with regard to the department employee.
(4) The office of the family and children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds
shall also include its recommendations regarding complaints filed under
this section in its annual report pursuant to RCW 43.06A.030. The
office of the family and children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall identify
trends which may indicate a need to improve relations between the
department or supervising agency and foster parents.

Sec. 207 RCW 74.13.334 and 2009 c 520 s 83 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department and supervising agency shall develop procedures for
responding to recommendations of the office of the family and
children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds as a result of any and all complaints
filed by foster parents under RCW 74.13.333.

Sec. 208 RCW 74.13.368 and 2012 c 205 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The child welfare transformation design committee is
established, with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The governor or the governor's designee;
(ii) Four private agencies that, as of May 18, 2009, provide child
welfare services to children and families referred to them by the
department. Two agencies must be headquartered in western Washington
and two must be headquartered in eastern Washington. Two agencies must
have an annual budget of at least one million state-contracted dollars
and two must have an annual budget of less than one million state-contracted dollars;
(iii) The assistant secretary of the children's administration in
the department;
(iv) Two regional administrators in the children's administration
selected by the assistant secretary, one from one of the department's
administrative regions one or two, and one from one of the department's
administrative regions three, four, five, or six;
(v) The administrator for the division of licensed resources in the
children's administration;
(vi) Two nationally recognized experts in performance-based
contracts;
(vii) The attorney general or the attorney general's designee;
(viii) A representative of the collective bargaining unit that
represents the largest number of employees in the children's
administration;
(ix) A representative from the office of the family and children's
((ombudsman)) ombuds;
(x) Four representatives from the Indian policy advisory committee
convened by the department's office of Indian policy and support
services;
(xi) Two currently elected or former superior court judges with
significant experience in dependency matters, selected by the superior
court judges' association;
(xii) One representative from partners for our children affiliated
with the University of Washington school of social work;
(xiii) A member of the Washington state racial disproportionality
advisory committee;
(xiv) A foster parent;
(xv) A youth currently in or a recent alumnus of the Washington
state foster care system, to be designated by the cochairs of the
committee; and
(xvi) A parent representative who has had personal experience with
the dependency system.
(b) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives shall jointly appoint the members under (a)(ii), (xiv),
and (xvi) of this subsection.
(c) The representative from partners for our children shall convene
the initial meeting of the committee no later than June 15, 2009.
(d) The cochairs of the committee shall be the assistant secretary
for the children's administration and another member selected by a
majority vote of those members present at the initial meeting.
(2) The committee shall establish a transition plan containing
recommendations to the legislature and the governor consistent with
this section for the provision of child welfare services by supervising
agencies pursuant to RCW 74.13.360.
(3) The plan shall include the following:
(a) A model or framework for performance-based contracts to be used
by the department that clearly defines:
(i) The target population;
(ii) The referral and exit criteria for the services;
(iii) The child welfare services including the use of evidence-based services and practices to be provided by contractors;
(iv) The roles and responsibilities of public and private agency
workers in key case decisions;
(v) Contract performance and outcomes, including those related to
eliminating racial disparities in child outcomes;
(vi) That supervising agencies will provide culturally competent
service;
(vii) How to measure whether each contractor has met the goals
listed in RCW 74.13.360(4); and
(viii) Incentives to meet performance outcomes;
(b) A method or methods by which clients will access community-based services, how private supervising agencies will engage other
services or form local service networks, develop subcontracts, and
share information and supervision of children;
(c) Methods to address the effects of racial disproportionality, as
identified in the 2008 Racial Disproportionality Advisory Committee
Report published by the Washington state institute for public policy in
June 2008;
(d) Methods for inclusion of the principles and requirements of the
centennial accord executed in November 2001, executed between the state
of Washington and federally recognized tribes in Washington state;
(e) Methods for assuring performance-based contracts adhere to the
letter and intent of the federal Indian child welfare act;
(f) Contract monitoring and evaluation procedures that will ensure
that children and families are receiving timely and quality services
and that contract terms are being implemented;
(g) A method or methods by which to ensure that the children's
administration has sufficiently trained and experienced staff to
monitor and manage performance-based contracts;
(h) A process by which to expand the capacity of supervising and
other private agencies to meet the service needs of children and
families in a performance-based contractual arrangement;
(i) A method or methods by which supervising and other private
agencies can expand services in underserved areas of the state;
(j) The appropriate amounts and procedures for the reimbursement of
supervising agencies given the proposed services restructuring;
(k) A method by which to access and enhance existing data systems
to include contract performance information;
(l) A financing arrangement for the contracts that examines:
(i) The use of case rates or performance-based fee-for-service
contracts that include incentive payments or payment schedules that
link reimbursement to outcomes; and
(ii) Ways to reduce a contractor's financial risk that could
jeopardize the solvency of the contractor, including consideration of
the use of a risk-reward corridor that limits risk of loss and
potential profits or the establishment of a statewide risk pool;
(m) A description of how the transition will impact the state's
ability to obtain federal funding and examine options to further
maximize federal funding opportunities and increased flexibility;
(n) A review of whether current administrative staffing levels in
the regions should be continued when the majority of child welfare
services are being provided by supervising agencies;
(o) A description of the costs of the transition, the initial
start-up costs and the mechanisms to periodically assess the overall
adequacy of funds and the fiscal impact of the changes, and the
feasibility of the plan and the impact of the plan on department
employees during the transition; and
(p) Identification of any statutory and regulatory revisions
necessary to accomplish the transition.
(4)(a) The committee, with the assistance of the department, shall
select two demonstration sites within which to implement chapter 520,
Laws of 2009. One site must be located on the eastern side of the
state. The other site must be located on the western side of the
state. Neither site must be wholly located in any of the department's
administrative regions.
(b) The committee shall develop two sets of performance outcomes to
be included in the performance-based contracts the department enters
into with supervising agencies. The first set of outcomes shall be
used for those cases transferred to a supervising agency over time.
The second set of outcomes shall be used for new entrants to the child
welfare system.
(c) The committee shall also identify methods for ensuring that
comparison of performance between supervising agencies and the existing
service delivery system takes into account the variation in the
characteristics of the populations being served as well as historical
trends in outcomes for those populations.
(5) The committee shall determine the appropriate size of the child
and family populations to be provided services under performance-based
contracts with supervising agencies. The committee shall also identify
the time frame within which cases will be transferred to supervising
agencies. The performance-based contracts entered into with
supervising agencies shall encompass the provision of child welfare
services to enough children and families in each demonstration site to
allow for the assessment of whether there are meaningful differences,
to be defined by the committee, between the outcomes achieved in the
demonstration sites and the comparison sites or populations. To ensure
adequate statistical power to assess these differences, the populations
served shall be large enough to provide a probability greater than
seventy percent that meaningful difference will be detected and a
ninety-five percent probability that observed differences are not due
to chance alone.
(6) The committee shall also prepare as part of the plan a
recommendation as to how to implement chapter 520, Laws of 2009 so that
full implementation of chapter 520, Laws of 2009 is achieved no later
than December 30, 2015.
(7) The committee shall prepare the plan to manage the delivery of
child welfare services in a manner that achieves coordination of the
services and programs that deliver primary prevention services.
(8) Beginning June 30, 2009, the committee shall report quarterly
to the governor and the legislative children's oversight committee
established in RCW 44.04.220. From June 30, 2012, until December 30,
2015, the committee need only report twice a year. The committee shall
report on its progress in meeting its duties under subsections (2) and
(3) of this section and on any other matters the committee or the
legislative children's oversight committee or the governor deems
appropriate. The portion of the plan required in subsection (6) of
this section shall be due to the legislative children's oversight
committee on or before June 1, 2010. The reports shall be in written
form.
(9) The committee, by majority vote, may establish advisory
committees as it deems necessary.
(10) All state executive branch agencies and the agencies with whom
the department contracts for child welfare services shall cooperate
with the committee and provide timely information as the chair or
cochairs may request. Cooperation by the children's administration
must include developing and scheduling training for supervising
agencies to access data and information necessary to implement and
monitor the contracts.
(11) It is expected that the administrative costs for the committee
will be supported through private funds.
(12) The committee is subject to chapters 42.30 (open public
meetings act) and 42.52 (ethics in public service) RCW.
(13) This section expires July 1, 2016.

Sec. 209 RCW 74.13.640 and 2011 c 61 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall conduct a child fatality review in the
event of a fatality suspected to be caused by child abuse or neglect of
any minor who is in the care of the department or a supervising agency
or receiving services described in this chapter or who has been in the
care of the department or a supervising agency or received services
described in this chapter within one year preceding the minor's death.
(b) The department shall consult with the office of the family and
children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds to determine if a child fatality review
should be conducted in any case in which it cannot be determined
whether the child's death is the result of suspected child abuse or
neglect.
(c) The department shall ensure that the fatality review team is
made up of individuals who had no previous involvement in the case,
including individuals whose professional expertise is pertinent to the
dynamics of the case.
(d) Upon conclusion of a child fatality review required pursuant to
this section, the department shall within one hundred eighty days
following the fatality issue a report on the results of the review,
unless an extension has been granted by the governor. Reports must be
distributed to the appropriate committees of the legislature, and the
department shall create a public web site where all child fatality
review reports required under this section must be posted and
maintained. A child fatality review report completed pursuant to this
section is subject to public disclosure and must be posted on the
public web site, except that confidential information may be redacted
by the department consistent with the requirements of RCW 13.50.100,
68.50.105, 74.13.500 through 74.13.525, chapter 42.56 RCW, and other
applicable state and federal laws.
(e) The department shall develop and implement procedures to carry
out the requirements of this section.
(2) In the event of a near fatality of a child who is in the care
of or receiving services described in this chapter from the department
or a supervising agency or who has been in the care of or received
services described in this chapter from the department or a supervising
agency within one year preceding the near fatality, the department
shall promptly notify the office of the family and children's
((ombudsman)) ombuds. The department may conduct a review of the near
fatality at its discretion or at the request of the office of the
family and children's ((ombudsman)) ombuds.
(3) In any review of a child fatality or near fatality in which the
child was placed with or received services from a supervising agency
pursuant to a contract with the department, the department and the
fatality review team shall have access to all records and files
regarding the child or otherwise relevant to the review that have been
produced or retained by the supervising agency.
(4)(a) A child fatality or near fatality review completed pursuant
to this section is subject to discovery in a civil or administrative
proceeding, but may not be admitted into evidence or otherwise used in
a civil or administrative proceeding except pursuant to this section.
(b) A department employee responsible for conducting a child
fatality or near fatality review, or member of a child fatality or near
fatality review team, may not be examined in a civil or administrative
proceeding regarding (i) the work of the child fatality or near
fatality review team, (ii) the incident under review, (iii) his or her
statements, deliberations, thoughts, analyses, or impressions relating
to the work of the child fatality or near fatality review team or the
incident under review, or (iv) the statements, deliberations, thoughts,
analyses, or impressions of any other member of the child fatality or
near fatality review team, or any person who provided information to
the child fatality or near fatality review team, relating to the work
of the child fatality or near fatality review team or the incident
under review.
(c) Documents prepared by or for a child fatality or near fatality
review team are inadmissible and may not be used in a civil or
administrative proceeding, except that any document that exists before
its use or consideration in a child fatality or near fatality review,
or that is created independently of such review, does not become
inadmissible merely because it is reviewed or used by a child fatality
or near fatality review team. A person is not unavailable as a witness
merely because the person has been interviewed by or has provided a
statement for a child fatality or near fatality review, but if called
as a witness, a person may not be examined regarding the person's
interactions with the child fatality or near fatality review including,
without limitation, whether the person was interviewed during such
review, the questions that were asked during such review, and the
answers that the person provided during such review. This section may
not be construed as restricting the person from testifying fully in any
proceeding regarding his or her knowledge of the incident under review.
(d) The restrictions set forth in this section do not apply in a
licensing or disciplinary proceeding arising from an agency's effort to
revoke or suspend the license of any licensed professional based in
whole or in part upon allegations of wrongdoing in connection with a
minor's death or near fatality reviewed by a child fatality or near
fatality review team.

Sec. 210 RCW 74.13A.025 and 1996 c 130 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The factors to be considered by the secretary in setting the amount
of any payment or payments to be made pursuant to RCW 26.33.320 and
((74.13.100)) 74.13A.005 through ((74.13.145)) 74.13A.080 and in
adjusting standards hereunder shall include: The size of the family
including the adoptive child, the usual living expenses of the family,
the special needs of any family member including education needs, the
family income, the family resources and plan for savings, the medical
and hospitalization needs of the family, the family's means of
purchasing or otherwise receiving such care, and any other expenses
likely to be needed by the child to be adopted. In setting the amount
of any initial payment made pursuant to RCW 26.33.320 and ((74.13.100))
74.13A.005 through ((74.13.145)) 74.13A.080, the secretary is
authorized to establish maximum payment amounts that are reasonable and
allow permanency planning goals related to adoption of children under
RCW 13.34.145 to be achieved at the earliest possible date.
The amounts paid for the support of a child pursuant to RCW
26.33.320 and ((74.13.100)) 74.13A.005 through ((74.13.145)) 74.13A.080
may vary from family to family and from year to year. Due to changes
in economic circumstances or the needs of the child such payments may
be discontinued and later resumed.
Payments under RCW 26.33.320 and ((74.13.100)) 74.13A.005 through
((74.13.145)) 74.13A.080 may be continued by the secretary subject to
review as provided for herein, if such parent or parents having such
child in their custody establish their residence in another state or a
foreign jurisdiction.
In fixing the standards to govern the amount and character of
payments to be made for the support of adopted children pursuant to RCW
26.33.320 and ((74.13.100)) 74.13A.005 through ((74.13.145)) 74.13A.080
and before issuing rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of
RCW 26.33.320 and ((74.13.100)) 74.13A.005 through ((74.13.145))
74.13A.080, the secretary shall consider the comments and
recommendations of the committee designated by the secretary to advise
him or her with respect to child welfare.

Sec. 211 RCW 74.13A.040 and 2009 c 527 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any parent who is a party to an agreement under RCW
((74.13.100)) 74.13A.005 through ((74.13.145)) 74.13A.080 may at any
time, in writing, request, for reasons set forth in such request, a
review of the amount of any payment or the level of continuing
payments. The review shall begin not later than thirty days from the
receipt of such request. Any adjustment may be made retroactive to the
date such request was received by the secretary. If such request is
not acted on within thirty days after it has been received by the
secretary, such parent may invoke his or her rights under the hearing
provisions set forth in RCW ((74.13.127)) 74.13A.055.
(2) The secretary may make adjustments in payments at the time of
the review, or at other times, if the secretary finds that
circumstances have changed and warrant an adjustment in payments.
Changes in circumstances may include, but are not limited to,
variations in medical opinions, prognosis, and costs. Appropriate
adjustments in payments shall be made based upon changes in the needs
of the child and/or changes in the adoptive parents' income, resources,
and expenses for the care of such child or other members of the family,
including medical and/or hospitalization expense not otherwise covered
by or subject to reimbursement from insurance or other sources of
financial assistance.

Sec. 212 RCW 74.13A.075 and 1985 c 7 s 145 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in RCW 26.33.320 and ((74.13.100)) 74.13A.005 through
((74.13.145)) 74.13A.080 the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services or his or her designee.
(2) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.

Sec. 213 RCW 74.15.140 and 1979 c 141 s 363 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the
secretary may, in the manner provided by law, upon the advice of the
attorney general, who shall represent the department in the proceeding,
maintain an action in the name of the state for injunction or such
other relief as he or she may deem advisable against any agency subject
to licensing under the provisions of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW
74.13.031 or against any such agency not having a license as heretofore
provided in chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031.

Sec. 214 RCW 74.20.260 and 1979 c 141 s 368 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any parent in the state whose absence is the basis upon which an
application is filed for public assistance on behalf of a child shall
be required to complete a statement, under oath, of his or her current
monthly income, his or her total income over the past twelve months,
the number of dependents for whom he or she is providing support, the
amount he or she is contributing regularly toward the support of all
children for whom application for such assistance is made, his or her
current monthly living expenses, and such other information as is
pertinent to determining his or her ability to support his or her
children. Such statement shall be provided upon demand made by the
state department of social and health services or attorney general, and
if assistance based upon such application is granted on behalf of such
child, additional statements shall be filed annually thereafter with
the state department of social and health services until such time as
the child is no longer receiving such assistance. Failure to comply
with this section shall constitute a misdemeanor.

Sec. 215 RCW 74.20A.040 and 1989 c 360 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary may issue a notice of a support debt accrued
and/or accruing based upon RCW 74.20A.030, assignment of a support debt
or a request for support enforcement services under RCW 74.20.040 (2)
or (3), to enforce and collect a support debt created by a superior
court order or administrative order. The payee under the order shall
be informed when a notice of support debt is issued under this section.
(2) The notice may be served upon the debtor in the manner
prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action or be mailed
to the debtor at his or her last known address by certified mail,
return receipt requested, demanding payment within twenty days of the
date of receipt.
(3) The notice of debt shall include:
(a) A statement of the support debt accrued and/or accruing,
computable on the amount required to be paid under any superior court
order to which the department is subrogated or is authorized to enforce
and collect under RCW 74.20A.030, has an assigned interest, or has been
authorized to enforce pursuant to RCW 74.20.040 (2) or (3);
(b) A statement that the property of the debtor is subject to
collection action;
(c) A statement that the property is subject to lien and
foreclosure, distraint, seizure and sale, or order to withhold and
deliver; and
(d) A statement that the net proceeds will be applied to the
satisfaction of the support debt.
(4) Action to collect a support debt by lien and foreclosure, or
distraint, seizure and sale, or order to withhold and deliver shall be
lawful after twenty days from the date of service upon the debtor or
twenty days from the receipt or refusal by the debtor of said notice of
debt.
(5) The secretary shall not be required to issue or serve such
notice of support debt prior to taking collection action under this
chapter when a responsible parent's support order:
(a) Contains language directing the parent to make support payments
to the Washington state support registry; and
(b) Includes a statement that income-withholding action under this
chapter may be taken without further notice to the responsible parent,
as provided in RCW 26.23.050(1).

Sec. 216 RCW 74.20A.130 and 1987 c 435 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever a support lien has been filed pursuant to RCW 74.20A.060,
the secretary may collect the support debt stated in said lien by the
distraint, seizure, and sale of the property subject to said lien. Not
less than ten days prior to the date of sale, the secretary shall cause
a copy of the notice of sale to be transmitted by regular mail and by
any form of mailing requiring a return receipt to the debtor and any
person known to have or claim an interest in the property. Said notice
shall contain a general description of the property to be sold and the
time, date, and place of the sale. The notice of sale shall be posted
in at least two public places in the county wherein the distraint has
been made. The time of sale shall not be less than ten nor more than
twenty days from the date of posting of such notices. Said sale shall
be conducted by the secretary, who shall proceed to sell such property
by parcel or by lot at a public auction, and who may set a minimum
reasonable price to include the expenses of making a levy and of
advertising the sale, and if the amount bid for such property at the
sale is not equal to the price so fixed, the secretary may declare such
property to be purchased by the department for such price, or may
conduct another sale of such property pursuant to the provisions of
this section. In the event of sale, the debtor's account shall be
credited with the amount for which the property has been sold.
Property acquired by the department as herein prescribed may be sold by
the secretary at public or private sale, and the amount realized shall
be placed in the state general fund to the credit of the department of
social and health services. In all cases of sale, as aforesaid, the
secretary shall issue a bill of sale or a deed to the purchaser and
said bill of sale or deed shall be prima facie evidence of the right of
the secretary to make such sale and conclusive evidence of the
regularity of his or her proceeding in making the sale, and shall
transfer to the purchaser all right, title, and interest of the debtor
in said property. The proceeds of any such sale, except in those cases
wherein the property has been acquired by the department, shall be
first applied by the secretary to reimbursement of the costs of
distraint and sale, and thereafter in satisfaction of the delinquent
account. Any excess which shall thereafter remain in the hands of the
secretary shall be refunded to the debtor. Sums so refundable to a
debtor may be subject to seizure or distraint by any taxing authority
of the state or its political subdivisions or by the secretary for new
sums due and owing subsequent to the subject proceeding. Except as
specifically provided in this chapter, there shall be exempt from
distraint, seizure, and sale under this chapter such property as is
exempt therefrom under the laws of this state.

Sec. 217 RCW 74.20A.150 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 183 s 14 are each
amended to read as follows:
Any person owning real property, or any interest in real property,
against which a support lien has been filed and foreclosure instituted,
shall have the right to pay the amount due, together with expenses of
the proceedings and reasonable attorneys' fees to the secretary and
upon such payment the secretary shall restore said property to him or
her and all further proceedings in the said foreclosure action shall
cease. Said person shall also have the right within two hundred forty
days after sale of property foreclosed under RCW 74.20A.140 to redeem
said property by making payment to the purchaser in the amount paid by
the purchaser plus interest thereon at the rate of six percent per
annum.

Sec. 218 RCW 74.34.095 and 2000 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following information is confidential and not subject to
disclosure, except as provided in this section:
(a) A report of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or
neglect made under this chapter;
(b) The identity of the person making the report; and
(c) All files, reports, records, communications, and working papers
used or developed in the investigation or provision of protective
services.
(2) Information considered confidential may be disclosed only for
a purpose consistent with this chapter or as authorized by chapter
18.20, 18.51, or 74.39A RCW, or as authorized by the long-term care
((ombudsman)) ombuds programs under federal law or state law, chapter
43.190 RCW.
(3) A court or presiding officer in an administrative proceeding
may order disclosure of confidential information only if the court, or
presiding officer in an administrative proceeding, determines that
disclosure is essential to the administration of justice and will not
endanger the life or safety of the vulnerable adult or individual who
made the report. The court or presiding officer in an administrative
hearing may place restrictions on such disclosure as the court or
presiding officer deems proper.

Sec. 219 RCW 74.34.200 and 1999 c 176 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to other remedies available under the law, a
vulnerable adult who has been subjected to abandonment, abuse,
financial exploitation, or neglect either while residing in a facility
or in the case of a person residing at home who receives care from a
home health, hospice, or home care agency, or an individual provider,
shall have a cause of action for damages on account of his or her
injuries, pain and suffering, and loss of property sustained thereby.
This action shall be available where the defendant is or was a
corporation, trust, unincorporated association, partnership,
administrator, employee, agent, officer, partner, or director of a
facility, or of a home health, hospice, or home care agency licensed or
required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, as now or
subsequently designated, or an individual provider.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature, however, that where there
is a dispute about the care or treatment of a vulnerable adult, the
parties should use the least formal means available to try to resolve
the dispute. Where feasible, parties are encouraged but not mandated
to employ direct discussion with the health care provider, use of the
long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds or other intermediaries, and, when
necessary, recourse through licensing or other regulatory authorities.
(3) In an action brought under this section, a prevailing plaintiff
shall be awarded his or her actual damages, together with the costs of
the suit, including a reasonable attorneys' fee. The term "costs"
includes, but is not limited to, the reasonable fees for a guardian,
guardian ad litem, and experts, if any, that may be necessary to the
litigation of a claim brought under this section.

Sec. 220 RCW 76.09.100 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 200 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
If the department of ecology determines that a person has failed to
comply with the forest practices regulations relating to water quality
protection, and that the department of natural resources has not issued
a stop work order or notice to comply, the department of ecology shall
inform the department thereof. If the department of natural resources
fails to take authorized enforcement action within twenty-four hours
under RCW 76.09.080, 76.09.090, 76.09.120, or 76.09.130, the department
of ecology may petition to the ((chairman)) chair of the appeals board,
who shall, within forty-eight hours, either deny the petition or direct
the department of natural resources to immediately issue a stop work
order or notice to comply, or to impose a penalty. No civil or
criminal penalties shall be imposed for past actions or omissions if
such actions or omissions were conducted pursuant to an approval or
directive of the department of natural resources.

Sec. 221 RCW 76.36.100 and 1925 ex.s. c 154 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
The owner of any mark or brand registered as herein provided, by
himself or herself or his or her duly authorized agent or
representative, shall have a lawful right, at any time and in any
peaceable manner, to enter into or upon any tidelands, marshes, and
beaches of this state and any mill, mill yard, mill boom, rafting, or
storage grounds and any forest products or raft or boom thereof, for
the purpose of searching for any forest products and booming equipment
having impressed thereupon or cut therein a registered mark or brand
belonging to him or her and to retake any forest products and booming
equipment so found by him or her.

Sec. 222 RCW 74.36.110 and 1971 ex.s. c 169 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
The secretary of the department of social and health services or
his or her designee is authorized to allot for such purposes all or a
portion of whatever state funds the legislature appropriates or are
otherwise made available for the purpose of matching local funds
dedicated to community programs and projects for the aging. The
purpose of RCW 74.36.110 through 74.36.130 is to stimulate and assist
local communities to obtain federal funds made available under the
federal older Americans act of 1965 as amended.

Sec. 223 RCW 74.36.120 and 1971 ex.s. c 169 s 11 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary or his or her designee shall adopt and set forth
standards for determining the eligibility and approval of community
projects and priorities therefor, and shall have final authority to
approve or deny such projects and funding requested under RCW 74.36.110
through 74.36.130.
(2) Only community project proposals submitted by local public
agencies, by private nonprofit agencies or organizations, or by public
or other nonprofit institutions of higher education, shall be eligible
for approval.
(3) Any community project applicant whose application for approval
is denied will be afforded an opportunity for an informal hearing
before the secretary or his or her designee, but the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, shall not apply.

Sec. 224 RCW 74.36.130 and 1971 ex.s. c 169 s 12 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) State funds made available under RCW 74.36.110 through
74.36.130 for any project shall not exceed fifty per centum of the
nonfederal share of the costs. To the extent that federal law permits,
and the secretary or his or her designee deems appropriate, the local
community share and/or the state share may be in the form of cash or
in-kind resources.
(2) Payments made under RCW 74.36.110 through 74.36.130 may be made
in advance or by way of reimbursement, and in such installments and on
such conditions as the secretary or his or her designee may determine,
including provisions for adequate accounting systems, reasonable record
retention periods, and financial audits.

Sec. 225 RCW 74.38.040 and 1983 c 290 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The community based services for low-income eligible persons
provided by the department or the respective area agencies may include:
(1) Access services designed to provide identification of eligible
persons, assessment of individual needs, reference to the appropriate
service, and follow-up service where required. These services shall
include information and referral, outreach, transportation, and
counseling;
(2) Day care offered on a regular, recurrent basis. General
nursing, rehabilitation, personal care, nutritional services, social
casework, mental health as provided pursuant to chapter 71.24 RCW,
and/or limited transportation services may be made available within
this program;
(3) In-home care for persons, including basic health care;
performance of various household tasks and other necessary chores, or,
a combination of these services;
(4) Counseling on death for the terminally ill and care and
attendance at the time of death; except, that this is not to include
reimbursement for the use of life-sustaining mechanisms;
(5) Health services which will identify health needs and which are
designed to avoid institutionalization; assist in securing admission to
medical institutions or other health related facilities when required;
and, assist in obtaining health services from public or private
agencies or providers of health services. These services shall include
health screening and evaluation, in-home services, health education,
and such health appliances which will further the independence and
well-being of the person;
(6) The provision of low-cost, nutritionally sound meals in central
locations or in the person's home in the instance of incapacity. Also,
supportive services may be provided in nutritional education, shopping
assistance, diet counseling, and other services to sustain the
nutritional well-being of these persons;
(7) The provisions of services to maintain a person's home in a
state of adequate repair, insofar as is possible, for their safety and
comfort. These services shall be limited, but may include housing
counseling, minor repair and maintenance, and moving assistance when
such repair will not attain standards of health and safety, as
determined by the department;
(8) Civil legal services, as limited by RCW 2.50.100, for
counseling and representation in the areas of housing, consumer
protection, public entitlements, property, and related fields of law;
(9) Long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds programs for residents of
all long-term care facilities.

Sec. 226 RCW 74.38.050 and 1983 c 290 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The services provided in RCW 74.38.040 may be provided to nonlow-
income eligible persons: PROVIDED, That the department and the area
agencies on aging shall utilize volunteer workers and public assistant
recipients to the maximum extent possible to provide the services
provided in RCW 74.38.040: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the department and
the area agencies shall utilize the bid procedure pursuant to chapter
43.19 RCW for providing such services to low-income and nonlow-income
persons whenever the services to be provided are available through
private agencies at a cost savings to the department. The department
shall establish a fee schedule based on the ability to pay and
graduated to full recovery of the cost of the service provided; except,
that nutritional services, health screening, services under the long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds program under chapter 43.190 RCW, and
access services provided in RCW 74.38.040 shall not be based on need
and no fee shall be charged; except further, notwithstanding any other
provision of this chapter, that well-adult clinic services may be
provided in lieu of health screening services if such clinics use the
fee schedule established by this section.

Sec. 227 RCW 74.39A.060 and 2001 c 193 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The aging and adult services administration of the department
shall establish and maintain a toll-free telephone number for receiving
complaints regarding a facility that the administration licenses or
with which it contracts for long-term care services.
(2) All facilities that are licensed by, or that contract with the
aging and adult services administration to provide chronic long-term
care services shall post in a place and manner clearly visible to
residents and visitors the department's toll-free complaint telephone
number and the toll-free number and program description of the long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds as provided by RCW 43.190.050.
(3) The aging and adult services administration shall investigate
complaints if the subject of the complaint is within its authority
unless the department determines that: (a) The complaint is intended
to willfully harass a licensee or employee of the licensee; or (b)
there is no reasonable basis for investigation; or (c) corrective
action has been taken as determined by the ((ombudsman)) ombuds or the
department.
(4) The aging and adult services administration shall refer
complaints to appropriate state agencies, law enforcement agencies, the
attorney general, the long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds, or other
entities if the department lacks authority to investigate or if its
investigation reveals that a follow-up referral to one or more of these
entities is appropriate.
(5) The department shall adopt rules that include the following
complaint investigation protocols:
(a) Upon receipt of a complaint, the department shall make a
preliminary review of the complaint, assess the severity of the
complaint, and assign an appropriate response time. Complaints
involving imminent danger to the health, safety, or well-being of a
resident must be responded to within two days. When appropriate, the
department shall make an on-site investigation within a reasonable time
after receipt of the complaint or otherwise ensure that complaints are
responded to.
(b) The complainant must be: Promptly contacted by the department,
unless anonymous or unavailable despite several attempts by the
department, and informed of the right to discuss the alleged violations
with the inspector and to provide other information the complainant
believes will assist the inspector; informed of the department's course
of action; and informed of the right to receive a written copy of the
investigation report.
(c) In conducting the investigation, the department shall interview
the complainant, unless anonymous, and shall use its best efforts to
interview the vulnerable adult or adults allegedly harmed, and,
consistent with the protection of the vulnerable adult shall interview
facility staff, any available independent sources of relevant
information, including if appropriate the family members of the
vulnerable adult.
(d) Substantiated complaints involving harm to a resident, if an
applicable law or rule has been violated, shall be subject to one or
more of the actions provided in RCW 74.39A.080 or 70.128.160. Whenever
appropriate, the department shall also give consultation and technical
assistance to the provider.
(e) After a department finding of a violation for which a stop
placement has been imposed, the department shall make an on-site
revisit of the provider within fifteen working days from the request
for revisit, to ensure correction of the violation. For violations
that are serious or recurring or uncorrected following a previous
citation, and create actual or threatened harm to one or more
residents' well-being, including violations of residents' rights, the
department shall make an on-site revisit as soon as appropriate to
ensure correction of the violation. Verification of correction of all
other violations may be made by either a department on-site revisit or
by written or photographic documentation found by the department to be
credible. This subsection does not prevent the department from
enforcing license or contract suspensions or revocations. Nothing in
this subsection shall interfere with or diminish the department's
authority and duty to ensure that the provider adequately cares for
residents, including to make departmental on-site revisits as needed to
ensure that the provider protects residents and to enforce compliance
with this chapter.
(f) Substantiated complaints of neglect, abuse, exploitation, or
abandonment of residents, or suspected criminal violations, shall also
be referred by the department to the appropriate law enforcement
agencies, the attorney general, and appropriate professional
disciplining authority.
(6) The department may provide the substance of the complaint to
the licensee or contractor before the completion of the investigation
by the department unless such disclosure would reveal the identity of
a complainant, witness, or resident who chooses to remain anonymous.
Neither the substance of the complaint provided to the licensee or
contractor nor any copy of the complaint or related report published,
released, or made otherwise available shall disclose, or reasonably
lead to the disclosure of, the name, title, or identity of any
complainant, or other person mentioned in the complaint, except that
the name of the provider and the name or names of any officer,
employee, or agent of the department conducting the investigation shall
be disclosed after the investigation has been closed and the complaint
has been substantiated. The department may disclose the identity of
the complainant if such disclosure is requested in writing by the
complainant. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
interfere with the obligation of the long-term care ((ombudsman))
ombuds program or department staff to monitor the department's
licensing, contract, and complaint investigation files for long-term
care facilities.
(7) The resident has the right to be free of interference,
coercion, discrimination, and reprisal from a facility in exercising
his or her rights, including the right to voice grievances about
treatment furnished or not furnished. A facility that provides long-term care services shall not discriminate or retaliate in any manner
against a resident, employee, or any other person on the basis or for
the reason that such resident or any other person made a complaint to
the department, the attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the
long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds, provided information, or otherwise
cooperated with the investigation of such a complaint. Any attempt to
discharge a resident against the resident's wishes, or any type of
retaliatory treatment of a resident by whom or upon whose behalf a
complaint substantiated by the department has been made to the
department, the attorney general, law enforcement agencies, or the
long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds, within one year of the filing of
the complaint, raises a rebuttable presumption that such action was in
retaliation for the filing of the complaint. "Retaliatory treatment"
means, but is not limited to, monitoring a resident's phone, mail, or
visits; involuntary seclusion or isolation; transferring a resident to
a different room unless requested or based upon legitimate management
reasons; withholding or threatening to withhold food or treatment
unless authorized by a terminally ill resident or his or her
representative pursuant to law; or persistently delaying responses to
a resident's request for service or assistance. A facility that
provides long-term care services shall not willfully interfere with the
performance of official duties by a long-term care ((ombudsman))
ombuds. The department shall sanction and may impose a civil penalty
of not more than three thousand dollars for a violation of this
subsection.

Sec. 228 RCW 74.39A.380 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 3 s 502 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funding provided for this specific purpose, the
department of social and health services shall develop for phased-in
implementation a statewide internal quality review and accountability
program for residential care services. The program must be designed to
enable the department to improve the accountability of staff and the
consistent application of investigative activities across all long-term
care settings, and must allow the systematic monitoring and evaluation
of long-term care licensing and certification. The program must be
designed to improve and standardize investigative outcomes for the
vulnerable individuals at risk of abuse and neglect, and coordinate
outcomes across the department to prevent perpetrators from changing
settings and continuing to work with vulnerable adults.
(2) The department shall convene a quality assurance panel to
review problems in the quality of care in adult family homes and to
reduce incidents of abuse, neglect, abandonment, and financial
exploitation. The state's long-term care ((ombudsman)) ombuds shall
chair the panel and identify appropriate stakeholders to participate.
The panel must consider inspection, investigation, public complaint,
and enforcement issues that relate to adult family homes. The panel
must also focus on oversight issues to address de minimis violations,
processes for handling unresolved citations, and better ways to oversee
new providers. The panel shall meet at least quarterly, and provide a
report with recommendations to the governor's office, the senate health
and long-term care committee, and the house of representatives health
and wellness committee by December 1, 2012.

Sec. 229 RCW 74.42.450 and 1997 c 392 s 216 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The facility shall admit as residents only those individuals
whose needs can be met by:
(a) The facility;
(b) The facility cooperating with community resources; or
(c) The facility cooperating with other providers of care
affiliated or under contract with the facility.
(2) The facility shall transfer a resident to a hospital or other
appropriate facility when a change occurs in the resident's physical or
mental condition that requires care or service that the facility cannot
provide. The resident, the resident's guardian, if any, the resident's
next of kin, the attending physician, and the department shall be
consulted at least fifteen days before a transfer or discharge unless
the resident is transferred under emergency circumstances. The
department shall use casework services or other means to insure that
adequate arrangements are made to meet the resident's needs.
(3) A resident shall be transferred or discharged only for medical
reasons, the resident's welfare or request, the welfare of other
residents, or nonpayment. A resident may not be discharged for
nonpayment if the discharge would be prohibited by the medicaid
program.
(4) If a resident chooses to remain in the nursing facility, the
department shall respect that choice, provided that if the resident is
a medicaid recipient, the resident continues to require a nursing
facility level of care.
(5) If the department determines that a resident no longer requires
a nursing facility level of care, the resident shall not be discharged
from the nursing facility until at least thirty days after written
notice is given to the resident, the resident's surrogate decision
maker and, if appropriate, a family member or the resident's
representative. A form for requesting a hearing to appeal the
discharge decision shall be attached to the written notice. The
written notice shall include at least the following:
(a) The reason for the discharge;
(b) A statement that the resident has the right to appeal the
discharge; and
(c) The name, address, and telephone number of the state long-term
care ((ombudsman)) ombuds.
(6) If the resident appeals a department discharge decision, the
resident shall not be discharged without the resident's consent until
at least thirty days after a final order is entered upholding the
decision to discharge the resident.
(7) Before the facility transfers or discharges a resident, the
facility must first attempt through reasonable accommodations to avoid
the transfer or discharge unless the transfer or discharge is agreed to
by the resident. The facility shall admit or retain only individuals
whose needs it can safely and appropriately serve in the facility with
available staff or through the provision of reasonable accommodations
required by state or federal law. "Reasonable accommodations" has the
meaning given to this term under the federal Americans with
disabilities act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq. and other
applicable federal or state antidiscrimination laws and regulations.

Sec. 230 RCW 74.42.640 and 2006 c 209 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To ensure the proper delivery of services and the maintenance
and improvement in quality of care through self-review, each facility
may maintain a quality assurance committee that, at a minimum,
includes:
(a) The director of nursing services;
(b) A physician designated by the facility; and
(c) Three other members from the staff of the facility.
(2) When established, the quality assurance committee shall meet at
least quarterly to identify issues that may adversely affect quality of
care and services to residents and to develop and implement plans of
action to correct identified quality concerns or deficiencies in the
quality of care provided to residents.
(3) To promote quality of care through self-review without the fear
of reprisal, and to enhance the objectivity of the review process, the
department shall not require, and the long-term care ((ombudsman))
ombuds program shall not request, disclosure of any quality assurance
committee records or reports, unless the disclosure is related to the
committee's compliance with this section, if:
(a) The records or reports are not maintained pursuant to statutory
or regulatory mandate; and
(b) The records or reports are created for and collected and
maintained by the committee.
(4) The department may request only information related to the
quality assurance committee that may be necessary to determine whether
a facility has a quality assurance committee and that it is operating
in compliance with this section.
(5) Good faith attempts by the committee to identify and correct
quality deficiencies shall not be used as a basis for imposing
sanctions.
(6) If the facility offers the department documents generated by,
or for, the quality assurance committee as evidence of compliance with
nursing facility requirements, the documents are protected as quality
assurance committee documents under subsections (7) and (9) of this
section when in the possession of the department. The department is
not liable for an inadvertent disclosure, a disclosure related to a
required federal or state audit, or disclosure of documents incorrectly
marked as quality assurance committee documents by the facility.
(7) Information and documents, including the analysis of complaints
and incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and
maintained by, a quality assurance committee are not subject to
discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no
person who was in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who
participated in the creation, collection, or maintenance of information
or documents specifically for the committee shall be permitted or
required to testify in any civil action as to the content of such
proceedings or the documents and information prepared specifically for
the committee. This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil
action, the discovery of the identity of persons involved in the care
that is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent
of any quality improvement committee activity; and (b) in any civil
action, the testimony of any person concerning the facts which form the
basis for the institution of such proceedings of which the person had
personal knowledge acquired independently of their participation in the
quality assurance committee activities.
(8) A quality assurance committee under subsection (1) of this
section, RCW 18.20.390, 70.41.200, 4.24.250, or 43.70.510 may share
information and documents, including the analysis of complaints and
incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and
maintained by, the committee, with one or more other quality assurance
committees created under subsection (1) of this section, RCW 18.20.390,
70.41.200, 4.24.250, or 43.70.510 for the improvement of the quality of
care and services rendered to nursing facility residents. Information
and documents disclosed by one quality assurance committee to another
quality assurance committee and any information and documents created
or maintained as a result of the sharing of information and documents
shall not be subject to the discovery process and confidentiality shall
be respected as required by subsections (7) and (9) of this section,
RCW 18.20.390 (6) and (8), 43.70.510(4), 70.41.200(3), and 4.24.250(1).
The privacy protections of chapter 70.02 RCW and the federal health
insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 and its
implementing regulations apply to the sharing of individually
identifiable patient information held by a coordinated quality
improvement program. Any rules necessary to implement this section
shall meet the requirements of applicable federal and state privacy
laws.
(9) Information and documents, including the analysis of complaints
and incident reports, created specifically for, and collected and
maintained by, a quality assurance committee are exempt from disclosure
under chapter 42.56 RCW.
(10) Notwithstanding any records created for the quality assurance
committee, the facility shall fully set forth in the resident's
records, available to the resident, the department, and others as
permitted by law, the facts concerning any incident of injury or loss
to the resident, the steps taken by the facility to address the
resident's needs, and the resident outcome.
(11) A facility operated as part of a hospital licensed under
chapter 70.41 RCW may maintain a quality assurance committee in
accordance with this section which shall be subject to the provisions
of subsections (1) through (10) of this section or may conduct quality
improvement activities for the facility through a quality improvement
committee under RCW 70.41.200 which shall be subject to the provisions
of RCW 70.41.200(9).

Sec. 231 RCW 76.09.320 and 1987 c 95 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of appropriated funds, the
department shall pay fifty percent of the cost of implementing the
hazard-reduction program, except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) In the event department funds described in subsection (1) of
this section are not available for all or a portion of a forest
landowner's property, the landowner may request application of the
hazard-reduction program to the owner's lands, provided the landowner
funds one hundred percent of the cost of implementation of the
department's recommended actions on his or her property.
(3) No cost-sharing funds may be made available for sites where the
department determines that the hazardous condition results from a
violation of then-prevailing standards as established by statute or
rule.

Sec. 232 RCW 76.14.080 and 1988 c 128 s 43 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall develop fire protection projects within the
high hazard forest area and shall determine the boundaries thereof in
accordance with the lands benefited thereby and shall assess one-sixth
of the cost of such projects equally upon all forest lands within the
project on an acreage basis. Such assessment shall not, however,
exceed twenty-five cents per acre annually nor more than one dollar and
fifty cents per acre in the aggregate and shall constitute a lien upon
any forest products harvested therefrom. The landowner may by written
notice to the department elect to pay his or her assessment on a
deferred basis at a rate of ten cents per thousand board feet and/or
one cent per Christmas tree when these products are harvested from the
lands for commercial use until the assessment plus two percent interest
from the date of completion of each project has been paid for each
acre. Payments under the deferred plan shall be credited by forty acre
tracts and shall be first applied to payment of the assessment against
the forty acre tract from which the funds were derived and secondly to
other forty acre tracts held and designated by the payor. In the event
total ownership is less than forty acres, then payment shall be applied
on an undivided basis to the entire areas as to which the assessment
remains unpaid. The landowner who elects to pay on deferred basis may
pay any unpaid assessment and interest at any time.

Sec. 233 RCW 76.14.090 and 1988 c 128 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notice of each project, the estimated assessment per acre, and a
description of the boundaries thereof shall be given by publication in
a local newspaper of general circulation thirty days in advance of
commencing work. Any person owning land within the project may within
ten days after publication of notice demand a hearing before the
department in Olympia and present any reasons why he or she feels the
assessment should not be made upon his or her land. Thereafter, the
department may change the boundaries of said project to eliminate land
from the project which it determines in its discretion will not be
benefited by the project.

Sec. 234 RCW 76.14.100 and 1988 c 128 s 45 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except when the owner has notified the department in writing that
he or she will make payment on the deferred plan, the assessment shall
be collected by the department reporting the same to the county
assessor of the county in which the property is situated upon
completion of the work in that project and the assessor shall annually
extend the amounts upon the tax rolls covering the property, and the
amounts shall be collected in the same manner, by the same procedure,
and with the same penalties attached as the next general state and
county taxes on the same property are collected. Errors in assessments
may be corrected at any time by the department by certifying them to
the treasurer of the county in which the land involved is situated.
Upon the collection of such assessments, the county treasurer shall
transmit them to the department. Payment on the deferred plan shall be
made directly to the department. Such payment must be made by January
31st for any timber or Christmas trees harvested during the previous
calendar year and must be accompanied by a statement of the amount of
timber or number of Christmas trees harvested and the legal description
of the property from which they were harvested. Whenever an owner
paying on the deferred plan desires to pay any unpaid balance or
portion thereof, he or she may make direct payment to the department.

Sec. 235 RCW 76.14.110 and 1988 c 128 s 46 are each amended to
read as follows:
Where the department finds that a portion of the work in any
project, except road building, has been done by private expenditures
for fire protection purposes only and that the work was not required by
other forestry laws having general application, then the department
shall appraise the work on the basis of what it would have cost the
state and shall credit the amount of the appraisal toward payment of
any sums assessed against lands contained in the project and owned by
the person or his or her predecessors in title making the expenditure.
Such appraisal shall be added to the cost of the project for purposes
of determining the general assessment.

Sec. 236 RCW 76.42.030 and 1994 c 163 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of natural resources may by contract, license, or
permit, or other arrangements, cause such wood debris to be removed by
private contractors, department of natural resources employees, or by
other public bodies. Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit
any individual from using any nonmerchantable wood debris for his or
her own personal use.

Sec. 237 RCW 76.52.020 and 1979 c 100 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of natural resources may, by agreement, make
available to forest landowners, equipment, materials, and personnel for
the purpose of more intensively managing or protecting the land when
the department determines that such services are not otherwise
available at a cost which would encourage the landowner to so avail
himself or herself, and that the use of department equipment,
materials, or personnel will not jeopardize the management of state
lands or other programs of the department. The department shall enter
into a contractual agreement with the landowner for services rendered
and shall recover the costs thereof.

Sec. 238 RCW 77.04.060 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 63 are each amended
to read as follows:
The commission shall hold at least one regular meeting during the
first two months of each calendar quarter, and special meetings when
called by the chair and by five members. Five members constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business.
The commission at a meeting in each odd-numbered year shall elect
one of its members as ((chairman)) chair and another member as vice
((chairman)) chair, each of whom shall serve for a term of two years or
until a successor is elected and qualified.
Members of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with
RCW 43.03.250. In addition, members are allowed their travel expenses
incurred while absent from their usual places of residence in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 239 RCW 77.12.370 and 1987 c 506 s 43 are each amended to
read as follows:
Prior to the forwarding of a request needing endorsement under RCW
77.12.360, the director shall present the request to the legislative
authority of the county in which the lands are located for its
approval. The legislative authority, before acting on the request, may
call a public hearing. The hearing shall take place within thirty days
after presentation of the request to the legislative authority.
The director shall publish notice of the public hearing called by
the legislative authority in a newspaper of general circulation within
the county at least once a week for two successive weeks prior to the
hearing. The notice shall contain a copy of the request and the time
and place of the hearing.
The ((chairman)) chair of the county legislative authority shall
preside at the public hearing. The proceedings shall be informal and
all persons shall have a reasonable opportunity to be heard.
Within ten days after the hearing, the county legislative authority
shall endorse its decision on the request for withdrawal. The decision
is final and not subject to appeal.

Sec. 240 RCW 77.12.620 and 2000 c 107 s 226 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department is authorized to require hunters and ((fishermen))
fishers occupying a motor vehicle approaching or entering a check
station to stop and produce for inspection: (1) Any wildlife, fish,
shellfish, or seaweed in their possession; (2) licenses, permits, tags,
stamps, or catch record cards, required under Title 77 RCW, or rules
adopted thereunder. For these purposes, the department is authorized
to operate check stations which shall be plainly marked by signs,
operated by at least one uniformed fish and wildlife officer, and
operated in a safe manner.

Sec. 241 RCW 77.12.760 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 78 are each amended
to read as follows:
Steelhead trout shall be managed solely as a recreational fishery
for non-Indian ((fishermen)) fishers under the rule-setting authority
of the fish and wildlife commission.
Commercial non-Indian steelhead fisheries are not authorized.

Sec. 242 RCW 77.15.570 and 2000 c 107 s 251 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, it is
unlawful for a person who is not a treaty Indian ((fisherman)) fisher
to participate in the taking of fish or shellfish in a treaty Indian
fishery, or to be on board a vessel, or associated equipment, operating
in a treaty Indian fishery. A violation of this subsection is a gross
misdemeanor.
(2) A person who violates subsection (1) of this section with the
intent of acting for commercial purposes, including any sale of catch,
control of catch, profit from catch, or payment for fishing assistance,
is guilty of a class C felony. Upon conviction, the department shall
order revocation of any license and a one-year suspension of all
commercial fishing privileges requiring a license under chapter 77.65
or 77.70 RCW.
(3)(a) The spouse, forebears, siblings, children, and grandchildren
of a treaty Indian ((fisherman)) fisher may assist the ((fisherman))
fisher in exercising treaty Indian fishing rights when the treaty
Indian ((fisherman)) fisher is present at the fishing site.
(b) Other treaty Indian ((fishermen)) fishers with off-reservation
treaty fishing rights in the same usual and accustomed places, whether
or not the ((fishermen)) fishers are members of the same tribe or
another treaty tribe, may assist a treaty Indian ((fisherman)) fisher
in exercising treaty Indian fishing rights when the treaty Indian
((fisherman)) fisher is present at the fishing site.
(c) Biologists approved by the department may be on board a vessel
operating in a treaty Indian fishery.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Treaty Indian ((fisherman)) fisher" means a person who may
exercise treaty Indian fishing rights as determined under United States
v. Washington, 384 F. Supp. 312 (W.D. Wash. 1974), or Sohappy v. Smith,
302 F. Supp. 899 (D. Oregon 1969), and post-trial orders of those
courts;
(b) "Treaty Indian fishery" means a fishery open to only treaty
Indian ((fishermen)) fishers by tribal or federal regulation;
(c) "To participate" and its derivatives mean an effort to operate
a vessel or fishing equipment, provide immediate supervision in the
operation of a vessel or fishing equipment, or otherwise assist in the
fishing operation, to claim possession of a share of the catch, or to
represent that the catch was lawfully taken in an Indian fishery.
(5) A violation of this section constitutes illegal fishing and is
subject to the suspensions provided for commercial fishing violations.

Sec. 243 RCW 77.32.155 and 2009 c 269 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) When purchasing any hunting license, persons under the age
of eighteen shall present certification of completion of a course of
instruction of at least ten hours in the safe handling of firearms,
safety, conservation, and ((sportsmanship)) sporting/hunting behavior.
All persons purchasing any hunting license for the first time, if born
after January 1, 1972, shall present such certification.
(b)(i) The director may establish a program for training persons in
the safe handling of firearms, conservation, and ((sportsmanship))
sporting/hunting behavior and shall prescribe the type of instruction
and the qualifications of the instructors. The director shall, as part
of establishing the training program, exempt members of the United
States military from the firearms skills portion of any instruction
course completed over the internet.
(ii) The director may cooperate with the national rifle
association, organized ((sportsmen's)) sports/outdoor enthusiasts'
groups, or other public or private organizations when establishing the
training program.
(c) Upon the successful completion of a course established under
this section, the trainee shall receive a hunter education certificate
signed by an authorized instructor. The certificate is evidence of
compliance with this section.
(d) The director may accept certificates from other states that
persons have successfully completed firearm safety, hunter education,
or similar courses as evidence of compliance with this section.
(2)(a) The director may authorize a once in a lifetime, one license
year deferral of hunter education training for individuals who are
accompanied by a nondeferred Washington-licensed hunter who has held a
Washington hunting license for the prior three years and is over
eighteen years of age. The commission shall adopt rules for the
administration of this subsection to avoid potential fraud and abuse.
(b) The director is authorized to collect an application fee, not
to exceed twenty dollars, for obtaining the once in a lifetime, one
license year deferral of hunter education training from the department.
This fee must be deposited into the fish and wildlife enforcement
reward account and must be used exclusively to administer the deferral
program created in this subsection.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "accompanied" means to go
along with another person while staying within a range of the other
person that permits continual unaided visual and auditory
communication.
(3) To encourage the participation of an adequate number of
instructors for the training program, the commission shall develop
nonmonetary incentives available to individuals who commit to serving
as an instructor. The incentives may include additional hunting
opportunities for instructors.

Sec. 244 RCW 77.65.280 and 2011 c 339 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
A wholesale fish dealer's license is required for:
(1) A business in the state to engage in the commercial processing
of food fish or shellfish, including custom canning or processing of
personal use food fish or shellfish.
(2) A business in the state to engage in the wholesale selling,
buying, or brokering of food fish or shellfish. A wholesale fish
dealer's license is not required of those businesses which buy
exclusively from Washington licensed wholesale dealers and sell solely
at retail.
(3) ((Fishermen)) Fishers who land and sell their catch or harvest
in the state to anyone other than a licensed wholesale dealer within or
outside the state, unless the fisher has a direct retail endorsement.
(4) A business to engage in the commercial manufacture or
preparation of fertilizer, oil, meal, caviar, fish bait, or other by-products from food fish or shellfish.
(5) A business employing a fish buyer as defined under RCW
77.65.340.
The annual license fee for a wholesale dealer is two hundred fifty
dollars. The application fee is one hundred five dollars. A wholesale
fish dealer's license is not required for persons engaged in the
processing, wholesale selling, buying, or brokering of private sector
cultured aquatic products as defined in RCW 15.85.020. However, if a
means of identifying such products is required by rules adopted under
RCW 15.85.060, the exemption from licensing requirements established by
this subsection applies only if the aquatic products are identified in
conformance with those rules.

Sec. 245 RCW 77.65.340 and 2011 c 339 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A fish buyer's license is required of and shall be carried by
each individual engaged by a wholesale fish dealer to purchase food
fish or shellfish from a licensed commercial ((fisherman)) fisher. A
fish buyer may represent only one wholesale fish dealer.
(2) The annual fee for a fish buyer's license is ninety-five
dollars. The application fee is one hundred five dollars.

Sec. 246 RCW 77.95.030 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 35 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall develop a detailed salmon enhancement plan
with proposed enhancement projects. The plan and the regional policy
statements shall be submitted to the secretary of the senate and chief
clerk of the house of representatives for legislative distribution by
June 30, 1986. The enhancement plan and regional policy statements
shall be provided by June 30, 1986, to the natural resources committees
of the house of representatives and the senate. The commission shall
provide a maximum opportunity for the public to participate in the
development of the salmon enhancement plan. To insure full
participation by all interested parties, the commission shall solicit
and consider enhancement project proposals from Indian tribes, sports
((fishermen)) fishers, commercial ((fishermen)) fishers, private
aquaculturists, and other interested groups or individuals for
potential inclusion in the salmon enhancement plan. Joint or
cooperative enhancement projects shall be considered for funding.
(2) The following criteria shall be used by the commission in
formulating the project proposals:
(a) Compatibility with the long-term policy statement;
(b) Benefit/cost analysis;
(c) Needs of all fishing interests;
(d) Compatibility with regional plans, including harvest management
plans;
(e) Likely increase in resource productivity;
(f) Direct applicability of any research;
(g) Salmon advisory council recommendations;
(h) Compatibility with federal court orders;
(i) Coordination with the salmon and steelhead advisory commission
program;
(j) Economic impact to the state;
(k) Technical feasibility; and
(l) Preservation of native salmon runs.
(3) The commission shall not approve projects that serve as
replacement funding for projects that exist prior to May 21, 1985,
unless no other sources of funds are available.
(4) The commission shall prioritize various projects and establish
a recommended implementation time schedule.

Sec. 247 RCW 78.04.030 and Code 1881 s 2446 are each amended to
read as follows:
In incorporations already formed, or which may hereafter be formed
under this chapter, where the amount of the capital stock of such
corporation consists of the aggregate valuation of the whole number of
feet, shares, or interest in any mining claim in this state, for the
working and development of which such corporation shall be or have been
formed, no actual subscription to the capital stock of such corporation
shall be necessary; but each owner in said mining claim shall be deemed
to have subscribed such an amount to the capital stock of such
corporation as under its bylaws will represent the value of so much of
his or her interest in said mining claim, the legal title to which he
or she may by deed, deed of trust, or other instrument vest, or have
vested in such corporation for mining purposes; such subscription to be
deemed to have been made on the execution and delivery to such
corporation of such deed, deed of trust, or other instrument; nor shall
the validity of any assessment levied by the board of trustees of such
corporation be affected by the reason of the fact that the full amount
of the capital stock of such corporation, as mentioned in its
certificate of incorporation, shall not have been subscribed as
provided in this section: PROVIDED, That the greater portion of said
amount of capital stock shall have been so subscribed: AND, PROVIDED
FURTHER, That this section shall not be so construed as to prohibit the
stockholders of any corporation formed, or which may be formed, for
mining purposes as provided in this section, from regulating the mode
of making subscriptions to its capital stock and calling in the same by
bylaws or express contract.

Sec. 248 RCW 78.08.080 and 1983 c 3 s 198 are each amended to
read as follows:
If at any time the locator of any quartz or lode mining claim
heretofore or hereafter located, or his or her assigns, shall learn
that his or her original certificate was defective or that the
requirements of the law had not been complied with before filing, or
shall be desirous of changing his or her surface boundaries or of
taking in any additional ground which is subject to location, or in any
case the original certificate was made prior to the passage of this
law, and he or she shall be desirous of securing the benefits of RCW
78.08.050 through 78.08.115, such locator or his or her assigns may
file an amended certificate of location, subject to the provisions of
RCW 78.08.050 through 78.08.115, regarding the making of new locations.

Sec. 249 RCW 78.08.100 and 1901 c 137 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The discoverer of placers or other forms of deposits subject to
location and appropriation under mining laws applicable to placers
shall locate his or her claim in the following manner:
First. He or she must immediately post in a conspicuous place at
the point of discovery thereon, a notice or certificate of location
thereof, containing (1) the name of the claim; (2) the name of the
locator or locators; (3) the date of discovery and posting of the
notice hereinbefore provided for, which shall be considered as the date
of the location; (4) a description of the claim by reference to legal
subdivisions of sections, if the location is made in conformity with
the public surveys, otherwise, a description with reference to some
natural object or permanent monuments as will identify the claim; and
where such claim is located by legal subdivisions of the public
surveys, such location shall, notwithstanding that fact, be marked by
the locator upon the ground the same as other locations.
Second. Within thirty days from the date of such discovery, he or
she must record such notice or certificate of location in the office of
the auditor of the county in which such discovery is made, and so
distinctly mark his or her location on the ground that its boundaries
may be readily traced.
Third. Within sixty days from the date of discovery, the
discoverer shall perform labor upon such location or claim in
developing the same to an amount which shall be equivalent in the
aggregate to at least ten dollars worth of such labor for each twenty
acres, or fractional part thereof, contained in such location or claim:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing in this subdivision shall be held to
apply to lands located under the laws of the United States as placer
claims for the purpose of the development of petroleum and natural gas
and other natural oil products.
Fourth. Such locator shall, upon the performance of such labor,
file with the auditor of the county an affidavit showing such
performance and generally the nature and kind of work so done.

Sec. 250 RCW 78.12.070 and 1890 p 123 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing contained in this chapter shall be so construed as to
prevent recovery being had in a suit for damages for injuries sustained
by the party so injured, or his or her heirs or administrator or
administratrix, or anyone else now competent to sue in an action of
such character.

Sec. 251 RCW 78.16.030 and 1907 c 38 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon payment of the full purchase price, in cases where an option
to purchase is given, a conveyance shall be executed to the purchaser
by the ((chairman)) chair of the board of county commissioners. Such
conveyance shall refer to the order of the board authorizing such
leasing with the option to purchase, and shall be deemed to convey all
the estate, right, title and interest of the county in and to the
property sold; and such conveyance, when executed, shall be conclusive
evidence of the regularity and validity of all proceedings hereunder.

Sec. 252 RCW 78.16.040 and 1945 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The lessee under any such petroleum lease shall have the option of
surrendering any of the lands included in said lease at any time, and
shall thereby be relieved of all liability with respect to such lands
except the payment of accrued royalties as provided in said lease.
Upon such surrender, the lessee shall have the right for a period of
one hundred twenty days following the date of such surrender, to remove
all improvements placed by him or her on the lands which have been
surrendered.

Sec. 253 RCW 78.52.550 and 1951 c 146 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every person who shall violate or knowingly aid and abet the
violation of this chapter or any valid orders, rules, and regulations
issued thereunder, or who fails to perform any act which is herein made
his or her duty to perform, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 254 RCW 78.60.110 and 1974 ex.s. c 43 s 11 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department may authorize the operator to suspend drilling
operations, shut-in a completed well, or remove equipment from a well
for the period stated in the department's written authorization. The
period of suspension may be extended by the department upon the
operator showing good cause for the granting of such extension.
(2) If drilling operations are not resumed by the operator, or the
well is not put into production, upon expiration of the suspension or
shut-in permit, an intention to unlawfully abandon shall be presumed.
(3) A well shall also be deemed unlawfully abandoned if, without
written approval from the department, drilling equipment is removed.
(4) An unlawful abandonment under this chapter shall be entered in
the department records and written notice thereof shall be mailed by
registered mail both to such operator at his or her last known address
as disclosed by records of the department and to the operator's surety.
The department may thereafter proceed against the operator and his or
her surety.

Sec. 255 RCW 78.60.170 and 1974 ex.s. c 43 s 17 are each amended
to read as follows:
Each owner or operator of a well shall designate a person who
resides in this state as his or her agent upon whom may be served all
legal processes, orders, notices, and directives of the department or
any court.

Sec. 256 RCW 78.60.250 and 1974 ex.s. c 43 s 25 are each amended
to read as follows:
Whenever it appears with probable cause to the department that:
(1) A violation of any provision of this chapter, regulation
adopted pursuant thereto, or condition of a permit issued pursuant to
this chapter has occurred or is about to occur, or
(2) That a modification of a permit is deemed necessary to carry
out the purpose of this chapter,
the department shall issue a written order in person to the operator or
his or her employees or agents, or by certified mail, concerning the
drilling, testing, or other operation conducted with respect to any
well drilled, in the process of being drilled, or in the process of
being abandoned or in the process of reclamation or restoration, and
the operator, owner, or designated agent of either shall comply with
the terms of the order and may appeal from the order in the manner
provided for in RCW ((79.76.280)) 78.60.280. When the department deems
necessary, the order may include a shutdown order to remain in effect
until the deficiency is corrected.

Sec. 257 RCW 79.02.150 and 1927 c 255 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
So long as any grant of lands by the United States to the state of
Washington, for any purpose, or as lieu or indemnity lands therefor,
remains incomplete, the commissioner of public lands shall, from time
to time, cause the records in his or her office and in the United
States land offices, to be examined for the purpose of ascertaining
what of the unappropriated lands of the United States are open to
selection, and whether any thereof may be of sufficient value and so
situated as to warrant their selection as state lands, and in that case
may cause the same to be inspected and appraised by one or more state
land inspectors, and a full report made thereon by the smallest legal
subdivisions of forty acres each, classifying such lands into grazing,
farming, and timbered lands, and estimating the value of each tract
inspected and the quantity and value of all valuable material thereon,
and in the case of timbered lands the amount and value of the standing
timber thereon, and the estimated value of such lands after the timber
is removed, which report shall be made as amply and expeditiously as
possible on blanks to be furnished by the commissioner of public lands
for that purpose, under the oath of the inspector to the effect that he
or she has personally examined the tracts mentioned in each forty acres
thereof, and that said report and appraisement is made from such
personal examination, and is, to the best of affiant's knowledge and
belief, true and correct, and that the lands are not occupied by any
bona fide settler.
The commissioner of public lands shall select such unappropriated
lands as he or she shall deem advisable, and do all things necessary
under the laws of the United States to vest title thereto in the state,
and shall assign lands of equal value, as near as may be, to the
various uncompleted grants.

Sec. 258 RCW 79.14.060 and 1955 c 131 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every lessee shall have the option of surrendering his or her lease
as to all or any portion or portions of the land covered thereby at any
time and shall be relieved of all liability thereunder with respect to
the land so surrendered except for monetary payments theretofore
accrued and except for physical damage to the premises embraced by his
or her lease which have been occasioned by his or her operations.

Sec. 259 RCW 79.22.120 and 1991 c 10 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the board of natural resources determines that any forest lands
deeded to the board or the state pursuant to this chapter, which are
leased to any county for uses which have as one permitted use a
sanitary landfill and/or transfer station, are no longer appropriate
for management by the board, the board may reconvey all of the lands
included within any such lease to that county. Reconveyance shall be
by quitclaim deed executed by the ((chairman)) chair of the board.
Upon execution of such deed, full legal and equitable title to such
lands shall be vested in that county, and any leases on such lands
shall terminate. A county that receives any such reconveyed lands
shall indemnify and hold the state of Washington harmless from any
liability or expense arising out of the reconveyed lands.

Sec. 260 RCW 79.24.030 and 1988 c 128 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of natural resources and the department of natural
resources may employ such cruisers, ((draughtsmen)) drafters,
engineers, architects, or other assistants as may be necessary for the
best interests of the state in carrying out the provisions of RCW
79.24.010 through 79.24.085, and all expenses incurred by the board and
department, and all claims against the capitol building construction
account shall be audited by the department and presented in vouchers to
the state treasurer, who shall draw a warrant therefor against the
capitol building construction account as herein provided or out of any
appropriation made for such purpose.

Sec. 261 RCW 79.24.150 and 1947 c 186 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Bonds authorized by RCW 79.24.100 through 79.24.160 shall be
accepted by the state, counties, cities, towns, school districts, and
other political subdivisions as security for the deposit of any of
their funds in any banking institution. Any officer of this state, or
any county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision
may invest surplus funds, which he or she or it is authorized to invest
in securities, and where such authorization is not limited or
restricted as to the class of securities in which he or she or it may
invest, in bonds issued under RCW 79.24.100 through 79.24.160.

Sec. 262 RCW 79.24.660 and 1969 ex.s. c 272 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
Bonds authorized by RCW 79.24.650 through 79.24.668 shall be
accepted by the state, counties, cities, towns, school districts, and
other political subdivisions as security for the deposit of any of
their funds in any banking institution. Any officer of this state, or
any county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision
may invest surplus funds, which he or she or it is authorized to invest
in securities, and where such authorization is not limited or
restricted as to the class of securities in which he or she or it may
invest, in bonds issued under RCW 79.24.650 through 79.24.668.

Sec. 263 RCW 79.44.050 and 2002 c 260 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the approval and confirmation of the assessment roll ordered
by the proper authorities of any assessing district, the treasurer of
such assessing district shall certify and forward to the chief
administrative officer of the agency of state government occupying,
using, or having jurisdiction over the lands, a statement of all the
lots or parcels of land held or owned by the state and charged on such
assessment roll, separately describing each such lot or parcel of the
state's land, with the amount of the local assessment charged against
it, or the proportionate amount assessed against the fee simple
interest of the state, in case the land has been leased. The chief
administrative officer upon receipt of such statement shall cause a
proper record to be made in his or her office of the cost of such
assessment upon the lands occupied, used, or under the jurisdiction of
his or her agency.
No penalty shall be provided or enforced against the state, and the
interest upon such assessments shall be computed and paid at the rate
paid by other property situated in the same assessing district.

Sec. 264 RCW 79.44.100 and 1963 c 20 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever any such tide, state, school, granted, or other lands
situated within the limits of any assessing district, has been included
within any local improvement district by such assessing district, and
the contract, leasehold, or other interest of any individual has been
sold to satisfy the lien of such assessment for local improvement, the
purchaser of such interest at such sale shall be entitled to receive
from the state of Washington, on demand, an assignment of the contract,
leasehold, or other interest purchased by him or her, and shall assume,
subject to the terms and conditions of the contract or lease, the
payment to the state of the amount of the balance which his or her
predecessor in interest was obligated to pay.

Sec. 265 RCW 79A.05.085 and 1974 ex.s. c 151 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The commission shall determine the fair market value for television
station leases based upon independent appraisals and existing leases
for television stations shall be extended at said fair market rental
for at least one period of not more than twenty years: PROVIDED, That
the rates in said leases shall be renegotiated at five year intervals:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That said stations shall permit the attachment of
antennae of publicly operated broadcast and microwave stations where
electronically practical to combine the towers: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
notwithstanding any term to the contrary in any lease, this section
shall not preclude the commission from prescribing new and reasonable
lease terms relating to the modification, placement, or design of
facilities operated by or for a station, and any extension of a lease
granted under this section shall be subject to this proviso: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That notwithstanding any other provision of law the director
in his or her discretion may waive any requirement that any
environmental impact statement or environmental assessment be submitted
as to any lease negotiated and signed between January 1, 1974, and
December 31, 1974.

Sec. 266 RCW 79A.05.105 and 1965 c 8 s 43.51.100 are each amended
to read as follows:
Inasmuch as the value of land with standing timber is increasing
and will continue to increase from year to year and no loss will be
caused to the common school fund or other fund into which the proceeds
of the sale of any land held by the state would be paid by postponing
the sale thereof, the commissioner of public lands may, upon his or her
own motion, and shall, when directed so to do by the state parks and
recreation commission, withdraw from sale any land held by the state
abutting on any public highway and certify to the commission that such
land is withheld from sale pursuant to the terms of this section.
Such lands shall not be sold until directed by the legislature, and
shall in the meantime be under the care, charge, control, and
supervision of the commission.

Sec. 267 RCW 79A.05.700 and 1969 ex.s. c 162 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The Green River Gorge, between the town of Kanasket and the Kummer
bridge in King county, is a twelve mile spectacularly winding gorge
with steep to overhanging rock walls reaching heights of from one
hundred fifty to three hundred feet. The beauty and natural features
of the gorge are generally confined within the canyon rim. This twelve
mile gorge area contains many examples of unique biological and
geological features for educational and recreational interpretation,
almost two miles of Eocene sediment rocks and fossils are exposed
revealing one of the most complete stratographic sections to be found
in the region. The area, a unique recreational attraction with more
than one million seven hundred thousand people living within an hour's
driving time, is presently used by hikers, geologists, ((fishermen))
fishers, kayakers and canoeists, picnickers and swimmers, and those
seeking the solitude offered by this unique area. Abutting and
adjacent landowners generally have kept the gorge lands in their
natural state; however, economic and urbanization pressures for
development are rapidly increasing. Local and state outdoor recreation
plans show a regional need for resources and facilities which could be
developed in this area. A twelve-mile strip incorporating the visual
basins of the Green river from the Kummer bridge to Palmer needs to be
acquired and developed as a conservation area to preserve this unique
area for the recreational needs of the region.

Sec. 268 RCW 80.01.020 and 1961 c 14 s 80.01.020 are each amended
to read as follows:
Each commissioner shall, before entering upon the duties of his or
her office, take and subscribe the constitutional oath of office, and
furnish bond to the state in the sum of twenty thousand dollars
conditioned for the faithful discharge of the duties of his or her
office and for the proper accounting for all funds that may come into
his or her possession by virtue of his or her office. Each
commissioner shall be a qualified elector of this state and no person
in the employ of or holding any official relation to any corporation or
person, which corporation or person is subject in whole or in part to
regulation by the commission, and no person owning stocks or bonds of
any such corporation or who is in any manner pecuniarily interested
therein shall be appointed or hold the office of commissioner or be
appointed or employed by the commission: PROVIDED, That if any such
person shall become the owner of such stocks or bonds or become
pecuniarily interested in such corporation otherwise than voluntarily,
he or she shall within a reasonable time divest himself or herself of
such ownership or interest, and failing to do so his or her office or
employment shall become vacant.

Sec. 269 RCW 80.01.100 and 1961 c 14 s 80.01.100 are each amended
to read as follows:
It shall be the duty of the attorney general to represent and
appear for the people of the state of Washington and the commission in
all actions and proceedings involving any question under this title or
Title 81 RCW, or under or in reference to any act or order of the
commission; and it shall be the duty of the attorney general generally
to see that all laws affecting any of the persons or corporations
herein enumerated are complied with, and that all laws, the enforcement
of which devolves upon the commission, are enforced, and to that end he
or she is authorized to institute, prosecute, and defend all necessary
actions and proceedings.

Sec. 270 RCW 80.04.020 and 1961 c 14 s 80.04.020 are each amended
to read as follows:
Each commissioner shall have power to administer oaths, certify to
all official acts, and to issue subpoenas for the attendance of
witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and
testimony in any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any
part of the state.
The superior court of the county in which any such inquiry,
investigation, hearing, or proceeding may be had, shall have power to
compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books,
accounts, documents, and testimony as required by such subpoena. The
commission or the commissioner before which the testimony is to be
given or produced, in case of the refusal of any witness to attend or
testify or produce any papers required by the subpoena, shall report to
the superior court in and for the county in which the proceeding is
pending by petition, setting forth that due notice has been given of
the time and place of attendance of said witnesses, or the production
of said papers, and that the witness has been summoned in the manner
prescribed in this chapter, and that the fees and mileage of the
witness have been paid or tendered to the witness for his or her
attendance and testimony, and that the witness has failed and refused
to attend or produce the papers required by the subpoena, before the
commission, in the cause or proceedings named in the notice and
subpoena, or has refused to answer questions propounded to him or her
in the course of such proceeding, and ask an order of said court,
compelling the witness to attend and testify before the commission.
The court, upon the petition of the commission, shall enter an order
directing the witness to appear before said court at a time and place
to be fixed by the court in such order, and then and there show cause
why he or she has not responded to said subpoena. A copy of said order
shall be served upon said witness. If it shall appear to the court
that said subpoena was regularly issued by the commission, the court
shall thereupon enter an order that said witness appear before the
commission at said time and place as fixed in said order, and testify
or produce the required papers, and upon failing to obey said order,
said witness shall be dealt with as for contempt of court.

Sec. 271 RCW 80.04.040 and 1961 c 14 s 80.04.040 are each amended
to read as follows:
Each witness who shall appear under subpoena shall receive for his
or her attendance four dollars per day and ten cents per mile traveled
by the nearest practicable route in going to and returning from the
place of hearing. No witness shall be entitled to fees or mileage from
the state when summoned at the instance of the public service companies
affected.

Sec. 272 RCW 80.04.050 and 1961 c 14 s 80.04.050 are each amended
to read as follows:
The claim by any witness that any testimony sought to be elicited
may tend to incriminate him or her shall not excuse such witness from
testifying, but such evidence or testimony shall not be used against
such person on the trial of any criminal proceeding, excepting in a
prosecution for perjury. The commissioner shall have power to compel
the attendance of witnesses at any place within the state.

Sec. 273 RCW 80.04.070 and 1961 c 14 s 80.04.070 are each amended
to read as follows:
The commission and each commissioner, or any person employed by the
commission, shall have the right, at any and all times, to inspect the
accounts, books, papers, and documents of any public service company,
and the commission, or any commissioner, may examine under oath any
officer, agent, or employee of such public service company in relation
thereto, and with reference to the affairs of such company: PROVIDED,
That any person other than a commissioner who shall make any such
demand shall produce his or her authority from the commission to make
such inspection.

Sec. 274 RCW 80.04.120 and 1961 c 14 s 80.04.120 are each amended
to read as follows:
At the time fixed for the hearing mentioned in RCW 80.04.110, the
complainant and the person or corporation complained of shall be
entitled to be heard and introduce such evidence as he or she or it may
desire. The commission shall issue process to enforce the attendance
of all necessary witnesses. At the conclusion of such hearing, the
commission shall make and render findings concerning the subject matter
and facts inquired into and enter its order based thereon. A copy of
such order, certified under the seal of the commission, shall be served
upon the person or corporation complained of, or his or her or its
attorney, which order shall, of its own force, take effect and become
operative twenty days after the service thereof, except as otherwise
provided. Where an order cannot, in the judgment of the commission, be
complied with within twenty days, the commission may prescribe such
additional time as in its judgment is reasonably necessary to comply
with the order, and may, on application and for good cause shown,
extend the time for compliance fixed in its order. A full and complete
record of all proceedings had before the commission, or any member
thereof, on any formal hearing had, and all testimony shall be taken
down by a stenographer appointed by the commission, and the parties
shall be entitled to be heard in person or by attorney. In case of an
action to review any order of the commission, a transcript of such
testimony, together with all exhibits introduced, and of the record and
proceedings in the cause, shall constitute the record of the
commission.

Sec. 275 RCW 80.04.170 and 1961 c 14 s 80.04.170 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any complainant or any public service company affected by any
findings or order of the commission, and deeming such findings or order
to be contrary to law, may, within thirty days after the service of the
findings or order upon him or her or it, apply to the superior court of
Thurston county for a writ of review, for the purpose of having the
reasonableness and lawfulness of such findings or order inquired into
and determined. Such writ shall be made returnable not later than
thirty days from and after the date of the issuance thereof, unless
upon notice to all parties affected further time be allowed by the
court, and shall direct the commission to certify its record in the
case to the court. Such cause shall be heard by the court without the
intervention of a jury on the evidence and exhibits introduced before
the commission and certified to by it. Upon such hearing, the superior
court shall enter judgment either affirming or setting aside or
remanding for further action the findings or order of the commission
under review. The reasonable cost of preparing the transcript of
testimony taken before the commission shall be assessable as part of
the statutory court costs, and the amount thereof, if collected by the
commission, shall be deposited in the public service revolving fund.
In case such findings or order be set aside, or reversed and remanded,
the court shall make specific findings based upon evidence in the
record indicating clearly all respects in which the commission's
findings or order are erroneous.

Sec. 276 RCW 80.04.280 and 1961 c 14 s 80.04.280 are each amended
to read as follows:
No public service company shall permit any employee to sell, offer
for sale, or solicit the purchase of any security of any other person
or corporation during such hours as such employee is engaged to perform
any duty of such public service company; nor shall any public service
company by any means or device require any employee to purchase or
contract to purchase any of its securities or those of any other person
or corporation; nor shall any public service company require any
employee to permit the deduction from his or her wages or salary of any
sum as a payment or to be applied as a payment of any purchase or
contract to purchase any security of such public service company or of
any other person or corporation.

Sec. 277 RCW 80.04.460 and 1961 c 14 s 80.04.460 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every public service company shall give immediate notice to the
commission of every accident resulting in death or injury to any person
occurring in its plant or system, in such manner as the commission may
prescribe. Such notice shall not be admitted as evidence or used for
any purpose against the company giving it in any action for damages
growing out of any matter mentioned in the notice.
The commission may investigate any accident resulting in death or
injury to any person occurring in connection with the plant or system
of any public service company. Notice of the investigation shall be
given in all cases for a sufficient length of time to enable the
company affected to participate in the hearing and may be given orally
or in writing, in such manner as the commission may prescribe.
Such witnesses may be examined as the commission deems necessary
and proper to thoroughly ascertain the cause of the accident and fix
the responsibility therefor. The examination and investigation may be
conducted by an inspector or deputy inspector, and ((they)) he or she
may administer oaths, issue subpoenas, and compel the attendance of
witnesses, and when the examination is conducted by an inspector or
deputy inspector, he or she shall make a full and complete report
thereof to the commission.

Sec. 278 RCW 80.04.470 and 1961 c 173 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty of the commission to enforce the provisions of
this title and all other acts of this state affecting public service
companies, the enforcement of which is not specifically vested in some
other officer or tribunal. Any employee of the commission may, without
a warrant, arrest any person found violating in his or her presence any
provision of this title, or any rule or regulation adopted by the
commission: PROVIDED, That each such employee shall be first
specifically designated in writing by the commission or a member
thereof as having been found to be a fit and proper person to exercise
such authority. Upon being so designated, such person shall be a peace
officer and a police officer for the purposes herein mentioned.

Sec. 279 RCW 80.04.510 and 1961 c 14 s 80.04.510 are each amended
to read as follows:
It shall be the duty of the attorney general to represent and
appear for the people of the state of Washington and the commission in
all actions and proceedings involving any question under this title, or
under or in reference to any act or order of the commission; and it
shall be the duty of the attorney general generally to see that all
laws affecting any of the persons or corporations herein enumerated are
complied with, and that all laws, the enforcement of which devolves
upon the commission, are enforced, and to that end he or she is
authorized to institute, prosecute, and defend all necessary actions
and proceedings.

Sec. 280 RCW 80.08.110 and 1994 c 251 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every public service company which, directly or indirectly, issues
or causes to be issued, any stock or stock certificate or other
evidence of interest or ownership, or bond, note, or other evidence of
indebtedness, in nonconformity with the provisions of this chapter, or
which applies the proceeds from the sale thereof, or any part thereof,
to any purpose other than the purpose or purposes allowed by this
chapter, shall be subject to a penalty of not more than one thousand
dollars for each offense. Every violation shall be a separate and
distinct offense and in case of a continuing violation every day's
continuance thereof shall be deemed to be a separate and distinct
offense.
The act, omission, or failure of any officer, agent, or employee of
any public service company acting within the scope of his or her
official duties or employment, shall in every case be deemed to be the
act, omission, or failure of such public service company.

Sec. 281 RCW 80.32.100 and 1961 c 14 s 80.32.100 are each amended
to read as follows:
In the event of the violation of any of the requirements of RCW
80.32.080 and 80.32.090 by any corporation availing itself of its
provisions, an appropriate suit may be maintained in the name of the
state upon the relation of the attorney general, or, if he or she shall
refuse or neglect to act, upon the relation of any individual aggrieved
by the violation, or violations, complained of, to compel such
corporation to comply with the requirements of RCW 80.32.080 and
80.32.090. A violation of RCW 80.32.080 and 80.32.090 shall cause the
forfeiture of the corporate franchise if the corporation refuses or
neglects to comply with the orders with respect thereto made in the
suit herein provided for.

Sec. 282 RCW 80.50.080 and 1977 ex.s. c 371 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
After the council has received a site application, the attorney
general shall appoint an assistant attorney general as a counsel for
the environment. The counsel for the environment shall represent the
public and its interest in protecting the quality of the environment.
Costs incurred by the counsel for the environment in the performance of
these duties shall be charged to the office of the attorney general,
and shall not be a charge against the appropriation to the energy
facility site evaluation council. He or she shall be accorded all the
rights, privileges, and responsibilities of an attorney representing a
party in a formal action. This section shall not be construed to
prevent any person from being heard or represented by counsel in
accordance with the other provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 283 RCW 80.50.150 and 1979 ex.s. c 254 s 2 and 1979 c 41 s
1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The courts are authorized to grant such restraining orders, and
such temporary and permanent injunctive relief as is necessary to
secure compliance with this chapter and/or with a site certification
agreement issued pursuant to this chapter or a national pollutant
discharge elimination system (hereafter in this section, NPDES) permit
issued by the council pursuant to chapter 90.48 RCW or any permit
issued pursuant to RCW 80.50.040(14). The court may assess civil
penalties in an amount not less than one thousand dollars per day nor
more than twenty-five thousand dollars per day for each day of
construction or operation in material violation of this chapter, or in
material violation of any site certification agreement issued pursuant
to this chapter, or in violation of any NPDES permit issued by the
council pursuant to chapter 90.48 RCW, or in violation of any permit
issued pursuant to RCW 80.50.040(14). The court may charge the
expenses of an enforcement action relating to a site certification
agreement under this section, including, but not limited to, expenses
incurred for legal services and expert testimony, against any person
found to be in material violation of the provisions of such
certification: PROVIDED, That the expenses of a person found not to be
in material violation of the provisions of such certification,
including, but not limited to, expenses incurred for legal services and
expert testimony, may be charged against the person or persons bringing
an enforcement action or other action under this section.
(2) Willful violation of any provision of this chapter shall be a
gross misdemeanor.
(3) Willful or criminally negligent, as defined in RCW
9A.08.010(([(1)])) (1)(d), violation of any provision of an NPDES
permit issued by the council pursuant to chapter 90.48 RCW or any
permit issued by the council pursuant to RCW 80.50.040(14) or any
emission standards promulgated by the council in order to implement the
federal clean air act and the state implementation plan with respect to
energy facilities under the jurisdiction provisions of this chapter
shall be deemed a crime, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished
by a fine of up to twenty-five thousand dollars per day and costs of
prosecution. Any violation of this subsection shall be a gross
misdemeanor.
(4) Any person knowingly making any false statement,
representation, or certification in any document in any NPDES form,
notice, or report required by an NPDES permit or in any form, notice,
or report required for or by any permit issued pursuant to RCW
80.50.090(14) shall be deemed guilty of a crime, and upon conviction
thereof shall be punished by a fine of up to ten thousand dollars and
costs of prosecution.
(5) Every person who violates the provisions of certificates and
permits issued or administered by the council shall incur, in addition
to any other penalty as provided by law, a penalty in an amount of up
to five thousand dollars a day for every such violation. Each and
every such violation shall be a separate and distinct offense, and in
case of a continuing violation, every day's continuance shall be and be
deemed to be a separate and distinct violation. Every act of
commission or omission which procures, aids, or abets in the violation
shall be considered a violation under the provisions of this section
and subject to the penalty provided in this section. The penalty
provided in this section shall be imposed by a notice in writing,
either by certified mail with return receipt requested or by personal
service, to the person incurring the same from the council describing
such violation with reasonable particularity. The council may, upon
written application therefor received within fifteen days after notice
imposing any penalty is received by the person incurring the penalty,
and when deemed in the best interest to carry out the purposes of this
chapter, remit or mitigate any penalty provided in this section upon
such terms as the council shall deem proper, and shall have authority
to ascertain the facts upon all such applications in such manner and
under such regulations as it may deem proper. Any person incurring any
penalty under this section may appeal the same to the council. Such
appeals shall be filed within thirty days of receipt of notice imposing
any penalty unless an application for remission or mitigation is made
to the council. When an application for remission or mitigation is
made, such appeals shall be filed within thirty days of receipt of
notice from the council setting forth the disposition of the
application. Any penalty imposed under this section shall become due
and payable thirty days after receipt of a notice imposing the same
unless application for remission or mitigation is made or an appeal is
filed. When an application for remission or mitigation is made, any
penalty incurred hereunder shall become due and payable thirty days
after receipt of notice setting forth the disposition of the
application unless an appeal is filed from such disposition. Whenever
an appeal of any penalty incurred hereunder is filed, the penalty shall
become due and payable only upon completion of all review proceedings
and the issuance of a final order confirming the penalty in whole or in
part. If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the council within
thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney general,
upon the request of the council, shall bring an action in the name of
the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston county or of
any county in which such violator may do business, to recover such
penalty. In all such actions, the procedure and rules of evidence
shall be the same as an ordinary civil action except as otherwise
provided in this chapter. All penalties recovered under this section
shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the general fund.
(6) Civil proceedings to enforce this chapter may be brought by the
attorney general or the prosecuting attorney of any county affected by
the violation on his or her own motion or at the request of the
council. Criminal proceedings to enforce this chapter may be brought
by the prosecuting attorney of any county affected by the violation on
his or her own motion or at the request of the council.
(7) The remedies and penalties in this section, both civil and
criminal, shall be cumulative and shall be in addition to any other
penalties and remedies available at law, or in equity, to any person.

Sec. 284 RCW 81.04.020 and 1961 c 14 s 81.04.020 are each amended
to read as follows:
Each commissioner shall have power to administer oaths, certify to
all official acts, and to issue subpoenas for the attendance of
witnesses and the production of papers, waybills, books, accounts,
documents, and testimony in any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or
proceeding in any part of the state.
The superior court of the county in which any such inquiry,
investigation, hearing, or proceeding may be had, shall have power to
compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers,
waybills, books, accounts, documents, and testimony as required by such
subpoena. The commission or the commissioner before which the
testimony is to be given or produced, in case of the refusal of any
witness to attend or testify or produce any papers required by the
subpoena, shall report to the superior court in and for the county in
which the proceeding is pending by petition, setting forth that due
notice has been given of the time and place of attendance of said
witnesses, or the production of said papers, and that the witness has
been summoned in the manner prescribed in this chapter, and that the
fees and mileage of the witness have been paid or tendered to the
witness for his or her attendance and testimony, and that the witness
has failed and refused to attend or produce the papers required by the
subpoena, before the commission, in the cause or proceedings named in
the notice and subpoena, or has refused to answer questions propounded
to him or her in the course of such proceeding, and ask an order of
said court, compelling the witness to attend and testify before the
commission. The court, upon the petition of the commission, shall
enter an order directing the witness to appear before said court at a
time and place to be fixed by the court in such order, and then and
there show cause why he or she has not responded to said subpoena. A
copy of said order shall be served upon said witness. If it shall
appear to the court that said subpoena was regularly issued by the
commission, the court shall thereupon enter an order that said witness
appear before the commission at said time and place as fixed in said
order, and testify or produce the required papers, and upon failing to
obey said order, said witness shall be dealt with as for contempt of
court.

Sec. 285 RCW 81.04.040 and 1961 c 14 s 81.04.040 are each amended
to read as follows:
Each witness who appears under subpoena shall receive for his or
her attendance four dollars per day and ten cents per mile traveled by
the nearest practicable route in going to and returning from the place
of hearing. No witness shall be entitled to fees or mileage from the
state when summoned at the instance of the public service companies
affected.

Sec. 286 RCW 81.04.050 and 1961 c 14 s 81.04.050 are each amended
to read as follows:
The claim by any witness that any testimony sought to be elicited
may tend to incriminate him or her shall not excuse such witness from
testifying, but such evidence or testimony shall not be used against
such person on the trial of any criminal proceeding, excepting in a
prosecution for perjury. The commissioner shall have power to compel
the attendance of witnesses at any place within the state.

Sec. 287 RCW 81.04.070 and 1961 c 14 s 81.04.070 are each amended
to read as follows:
The commission and each commissioner, or any person employed by the
commission, shall have the right, at any and all times, to inspect the
accounts, books, papers, and documents of any public service company,
and the commission, or any commissioner, may examine under oath any
officer, agent, or employee of such public service company in relation
thereto, and with reference to the affairs of such company: PROVIDED,
That any person other than a commissioner who shall make any such
demand shall produce his or her authority from the commission to make
such inspection.

Sec. 288 RCW 81.04.120 and 1961 c 14 s 81.04.120 are each amended
to read as follows:
At the time fixed for the hearing mentioned in RCW 81.04.110, the
complainant and the person or corporation complained of shall be
entitled to be heard and introduce such evidence as he or she or it may
desire. The commission shall issue process to enforce the attendance
of all necessary witnesses. At the conclusion of such hearing, the
commission shall make and render findings concerning the subject matter
and facts inquired into and enter its order based thereon. A copy of
such order, certified under the seal of the commission, shall be served
upon the person or corporation complained of, or his or her or its
attorney, which order shall, of its own force, take effect and become
operative twenty days after the service thereof, except as otherwise
provided. Where an order cannot, in the judgment of the commission, be
complied with within twenty days, the commission may prescribe such
additional time as in its judgment is reasonably necessary to comply
with the order, and may, on application and for good cause shown,
extend the time for compliance fixed in its order. A full and complete
record of all proceedings had before the commission, or any member
thereof, on any formal hearing had, and all testimony shall be taken
down by a stenographer appointed by the commission, and the parties
shall be entitled to be heard in person or by attorney. In case of an
action to review any order of the commission, a transcript of such
testimony, together with all exhibits introduced, and of the record and
proceedings in the cause, shall constitute the record of the
commission.

Sec. 289 RCW 81.04.280 and 2007 c 234 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
A public service company subject to regulation by the commission as
to rates and service shall not: (1) Permit any employee to sell, offer
for sale, or solicit the purchase of any security of any other person
or corporation during such hours as such employee is engaged to perform
any duty of such public service company; (2) by any means or device,
require any employee to purchase or contract to purchase any of its
securities or those of any other person or corporation; or (3) require
any employee to permit the deduction from his or her wages or salary of
any sum as a payment or to be applied as a payment of any purchase or
contract to purchase any security of such public service company or of
any other person or corporation.

Sec. 290 RCW 81.04.460 and 1961 c 173 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty of the commission to enforce the provisions of
this title and all other acts of this state affecting public service
companies, the enforcement of which is not specifically vested in some
other officer or tribunal. Any employee of the commission may, without
a warrant, arrest any person found violating in his or her presence any
provision of this title, or any rule or regulation adopted by the
commission: PROVIDED, That each such employee shall be first
specifically designated in writing by the commission or a member
thereof as having been found to be a fit and proper person to exercise
such authority. Upon being so designated, such person shall be a peace
officer and a police officer for the purposes herein mentioned.

Sec. 291 RCW 81.04.500 and 1961 c 14 s 81.04.500 are each amended
to read as follows:
It shall be the duty of the attorney general to represent and
appear for the people of the state of Washington and the commission in
all actions and proceedings involving any question under this title, or
under or in reference to any act or order of the commission; and it
shall be the duty of the attorney general generally to see that all
laws affecting any of the persons or corporations herein enumerated are
complied with, and that all laws, the enforcement of which devolves
upon the commission, are enforced, and to that end he or she is
authorized to institute, prosecute, and defend all necessary actions
and proceedings.

Sec. 292 RCW 81.04.510 and 1973 c 115 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whether or not any person or corporation is conducting business
requiring operating authority, or has performed or is performing any
act requiring approval of the commission without securing such
approval, shall be a question of fact to be determined by the
commission. Whenever the commission believes that any person or
corporation is engaged in operations without the necessary approval or
authority required by any provision of this title, it may institute a
special proceeding requiring such person or corporation to appear
before the commission at a location convenient for witnesses and the
production of evidence and bring with him or her or it books, records,
accounts, and other memoranda, and give testimony under oath as to his
or her or its operations or acts, and the burden shall rest upon such
person or corporation of proving that his or her or its operations or
acts are not subject to the provisions of this chapter. The commission
may consider any and all facts that may indicate the true nature and
extent of the operations or acts and may subpoena such witnesses and
documents as it deems necessary.
After having made the investigation herein described, the
commission is authorized and directed to issue the necessary order or
orders declaring the operations or acts to be subject to, or not
subject to, the provisions of this title. In the event the operations
or acts are found to be subject to the provisions of this title, the
commission is authorized and directed to issue cease and desist orders
to all parties involved in the operations or acts.
In proceedings under this section, no person or corporation shall
be excused from testifying or from producing any book, waybill,
document, paper, or account before the commission when ordered to do
so, on the ground that the testimony or evidence, book, waybill,
document, paper, or account required of him or her or it may tend to
incriminate him or her or it or subject him or her or it to penalty or
forfeiture; but no person or corporation shall be prosecuted, punished,
or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any
account, transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he or she or it
shall under oath have testified or produced documentary evidence in
proceedings under this section: PROVIDED, That no person so testifying
shall be exempt from prosecution or punishment for any perjury
committed by him or her in his or her testimony.

Sec. 293 RCW 81.08.110 and 1994 c 251 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every public service company which, directly or indirectly, issues
or causes to be issued, any stock or stock certificate or other
evidence of interest or ownership, or bond, note, or other evidence of
indebtedness, in nonconformity with the provisions of this chapter, or
which applies the proceeds from the sale thereof, or any part thereof,
to any purpose other than the purpose or purposes allowed by this
chapter shall be subject to a penalty of not more than one thousand
dollars for each offense. Every violation of any such order, rules,
direction, demand, or requirement of the department, or of any
provision of this chapter, shall be a separate and distinct offense and
in case of a continuing violation every day's continuance thereof shall
be deemed to be a separate and distinct offense.
The act, omission, or failure of any officer, agent, or employee of
any public service company acting within the scope of his or her
official duties or employment, shall in every case be deemed to be the
act, omission, or failure of such public service company.

Sec. 294 RCW 81.24.070 and 1961 c 14 s 81.24.070 are each amended
to read as follows:
All moneys collected under the provisions of this chapter shall
within thirty days be paid to the state treasurer and by him or her
deposited to the public service revolving fund.

Sec. 295 RCW 81.28.290 and 1961 c 14 s 81.28.290 are each amended
to read as follows:
The commission shall investigate all accidents that may occur upon
the lines of any common carrier resulting in loss of life, to any
passenger or employee, and may investigate any and all accidents or
wrecks occurring on the line of any common carrier. Notice of the
investigation shall be given in all cases for a sufficient length of
time to enable the company affected to participate in the hearing and
may be given orally or in writing, in such manner as the commission may
prescribe.
Such witnesses may be examined as the commission deems necessary
and proper to thoroughly ascertain the cause of the accident or wreck
and fix the responsibility therefor. The examination and investigation
may be conducted by an inspector or deputy inspector, and ((they)) he
or she may administer oaths, issue subpoenas, and compel the attendance
of witnesses, and when the examination is conducted by an inspector or
deputy inspector, he or she shall make a full and complete report
thereof to the commission.

Sec. 296 RCW 81.40.060 and 2003 c 53 s 388 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any railroad or other transportation
company doing business in the state of Washington, or of any officer,
agent, or servant of such railroad or other transportation company, to
require any conductor, engineer, ((brakeman)) brake operator,
((fireman)) fire tender, purser, or other employee, as a condition of
his or her continued employment, or otherwise to require or compel, or
attempt to require or compel, any such employees to purchase of any
such railroad or other transportation company or of any particular
person, firm, or corporation or at any particular place or places, any
uniform or other clothing or apparel, required by any such railroad or
other transportation company to be used by any such employee in the
performance of his or her duties as such; and any such railroad or
transportation company or any officer, agent or servant thereof, who
shall order or require any conductor, engineer, ((brakeman)) brake
operator, ((fireman)) fire tender, purser, or other person in its
employ, to purchase any uniform or other clothing or apparel as
aforesaid, shall be deemed to have required such purchase as a
condition of such employee's continued employment.
(2) Any railroad or other transportation company doing business in
the state of Washington, or any officer, agent, or servant thereof,
violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction
thereof shall be punished by a fine in any sum not less than one
hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars, or by imprisonment
in the county jail of the county where the misdemeanor is committed,
not exceeding six months.

Sec. 297 RCW 81.40.110 and 1961 c 14 s 81.40.110 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any railroad operating within this state, shall not employ or use
as ((flagman)) flagger any person or persons who cannot read, write,
and speak the English language.

Sec. 298 RCW 81.44.070 and 1961 c 14 s 81.44.070 are each amended
to read as follows:
It shall be the duty of the inspector of tracks, bridges,
structures, and equipment, and such deputies as may be appointed, to
inspect all equipment, and appliances connected therewith, and all
apparatus, tracks, bridges and structures, depots and facilities and
accommodations connected therewith, and facilities and accommodations
furnished for the use of employees, and make such reports of his or her
inspection to the commission as may be required. He or she shall, on
discovering any defective equipment or appliances connected therewith,
rendering the use of such equipment dangerous, immediately report the
same to the superintendent of the road on which it is found, and to the
proper official at the nearest point where such defect is discovered,
describing the defect. Such inspector may, on the discovery of any
defect rendering the use of any car, motor or locomotive dangerous,
condemn such car, motor or locomotive, and order the same out of
service until repaired and put in good working order. He or she shall,
on discovering any track, bridge, or structure defective or unsafe in
any particular, report such condition to the commission, and, in
addition thereto, report the same to the official in charge of the
division of such railroad upon which such defect is found. In case any
track, bridge, or structure is found so defective as to be dangerous to
the employees or public for a train or trains to be operated over the
same, the inspector is hereby authorized to condemn such track, bridge,
or structure and notify the commission and the office in charge of the
division of such railroad where such defect is found of his or her
action concerning the same, reporting in detail the defect complained
of, and the work or improvements necessary to repair such defect. He
or she shall also report to the commission the violation of any law
governing, controlling, or affecting the conduct of public service
companies in this state, as such companies are defined in this title or
in Title 80 RCW.
The inspector, or such deputies as may be appointed, shall have the
right and privilege of riding on any locomotive, either on freight or
passenger trains, or on the caboose of any freight train, for the
purpose of inspecting the track on any railroad in this state:
PROVIDED, That the engineer or conductor in charge of any such
locomotive or caboose may require such inspector to produce his or her
authority, under the seal of the commission, showing that he or she is
such inspector or deputy inspector.
The inspector, or such deputy inspector or inspectors as may be
appointed, shall, when required by the commission, inspect any street
railroad, gas plant, electrical plant, water system, telephone line, or
telegraph line, and upon discovering any defective or dangerous track,
bridge, structure, equipment, apparatus, machinery, appliance,
facility, instrumentality, or building, rendering the use of the same
dangerous to the public or to the employees of the company owning or
operating the same, report the same to the commission, and to the
official in charge of such road, plant, system, or line.

Sec. 299 RCW 81.48.060 and 1961 c 14 s 81.48.060 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every engineer, ((motorman)) motor operator, ((gripman)) grip
operator, conductor, ((brakeman)) brake operator, switch tender, train
dispatcher, or other officer, agent, or servant of any railway company,
who shall be guilty of any willful violation or omission of his or her
duty as such officer, agent, or servant, by which human life or safety
shall be endangered, for which no punishment is specially prescribed,
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 300 RCW 81.48.070 and 1994 c 261 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
Railroad companies in carrying or transporting animals shall not
permit them to be confined in cars for a longer period than forty-eight
consecutive hours without unloading them for rest, water, and feeding
for a period of at least two consecutive hours, unless prevented from
so unloading them by unavoidable accident. In estimating such
confinement, the time during which the animals have been confined
without such rest on connecting roads from which they are received
shall be included. Animals so unloaded shall, during such rest, be
properly fed, watered by the owner or person having the custody of
them, or in case of his or her default in so doing, then by the
railroad company transporting them, at the expense of said owner or
person in custody thereof, and said company shall in such case have a
lien upon such animals for food, care, and custody furnished, and shall
not be liable for such detention of such animals. If animals are
transported where they can and do have proper food, water, space, and
opportunity for rest, the foregoing provision in regard to their being
unloaded shall not apply. Violators of this section shall be punished
by fine not exceeding one thousand dollars per animal.

Sec. 301 RCW 81.52.050 and 1961 c 14 s 81.52.050 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every person, company, or corporation having the control or
management of any railroad shall, outside of any corporate city or
town, and outside the limits of any sidetrack or switch, cause to be
constructed and maintained in good repair on each side of said
railroad, along the line of said right-of-way of such person, company,
or corporation operating the same, a substantial fence, and at every
point where any roadway or other public highway shall cross said
railroad, a safe and sufficient crossing must be built and maintained,
and on each side of such crossing and at each end of such sidetrack or
switch, outside of any incorporated city or town, a sufficient cattle
guard: PROVIDED, That any person holding land on both sides of said
right-of-way shall have the right to put in gates for his or her own
use at such places as may be convenient.

Sec. 302 RCW 81.53.010 and 1961 c 14 s 81.53.010 are each amended
to read as follows:
The term "commission," when used in this chapter, means the
utilities and transportation commission of Washington.
The term "highway," when used in this chapter, includes all state
and county roads, streets, alleys, avenues, boulevards, parkways, and
other public places actually open and in use, or to be opened and used,
for travel by the public.
The term "railroad," when used in this chapter, means every
railroad, including interurban and suburban electric railroads, by
whatsoever power operated, for the public use in the conveyance of
persons or property for hire, with all bridges, ferries, tunnels,
equipment, switches, spurs, sidings, tracks, stations, and terminal
facilities of every kind, used, operated, controlled, managed, or owned
by or in connection therewith. The said term shall also include every
logging and other industrial railway owned or operated primarily for
the purpose of carrying the property of its owners or operators or of
a limited class of persons, with all tracks, spurs, and sidings used in
connection therewith. The said term shall not include street railways
operating within the limits of any incorporated city or town.
The term "railroad company," when used in this chapter, includes
every corporation, company, association, joint stock association,
partnership, or person, its, their, or his or her lessees, trustees, or
receivers appointed by any court whatsoever, owning, operating,
controlling, or managing any railroad, as that term is defined in this
section.
The term "over-crossing," when used in this chapter, means any
point or place where a highway crosses a railroad by passing above the
same.
The term "under-crossing," when used in this chapter, means any
point or place where a highway crosses a railroad by passing under the
same.
The term "over-crossing" or "under-crossing," shall also mean any
point or place where one railroad crosses another railroad not at
grade.
The term "grade crossing," when used in this chapter, means any
point or place where a railroad crosses a highway or a highway crosses
a railroad or one railroad crosses another, at a common grade.

Sec. 303 RCW 81.53.030 and 1984 c 7 s 373 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever a railroad company desires to cross a highway or railroad
at grade, it shall file a written petition with the commission setting
forth the reasons why the crossing cannot be made either above or below
grade. Whenever the legislative authority of a county, or the
municipal authorities of a city, or the state officers authorized to
lay out and construct state roads, or the state parks and recreation
commission, desire to extend a highway across a railroad at grade, they
shall file a written petition with the commission, setting forth the
reasons why the crossing cannot be made either above or below grade.
Upon receiving the petition, the commission shall immediately
investigate it, giving at least ten days' notice to the railroad
company and the county or city affected thereby, of the time and place
of the investigation, to the end that all parties interested may be
present and heard. If the highway involved is a state road or parkway,
the secretary of transportation or the state parks and recreation
commission shall be notified of the time and place of hearing. The
evidence introduced shall be reduced to writing and be filed by the
commission. If it finds that it is not practicable to cross the
railroad or highway either above or below grade, the commission shall
enter a written order in the cause, either granting or denying the
right to construct a grade crossing at the point in question. The
commission may provide in the order authorizing a grade crossing, or at
any subsequent time, that the railroad company shall install and
maintain proper signals, warnings, ((flagmen)) flaggers, interlocking
devices, or other devices or means to secure the safety of the public
and its employees. In respect to existing railroad grade crossings
over highways the construction of which grade crossings was
accomplished other than under a commission order authorizing it, the
commission may in any event require the railroad company to install and
maintain, at or near each crossing, on both sides of it, a sign known
as the sawbuck crossing sign with the lettering "Railroad Crossing"
inscribed thereon with a suitable inscription indicating the number of
tracks. The sign shall be of standard design conforming to
specifications furnished by the Washington state department of
transportation.

Sec. 304 RCW 81.53.120 and 1961 c 14 s 81.53.120 are each amended
to read as follows:
Whenever two or more lines of railroad owned or operated by
different companies cross a highway, or each other, by an over-crossing, under-crossing, or grade crossing required or permitted by
this chapter or by an order of the commission, the portion of the
expense of making such crossing not chargeable to any municipality,
county, or to the state, and the expense of constructing and
maintaining such signals, warnings, ((flagmen)) flaggers, interlocking
devices, or other devices or means to secure the safety of the public
and the employees of the railroad company, as the commission may
require to be constructed and maintained, shall be apportioned between
said railroad companies by the commission in such manner as justice may
require, regard being had for all facts relating to the establishment,
reason for, and construction of said improvement, unless said companies
shall mutually agree upon an apportionment. If it becomes necessary
for the commission to make an apportionment between the railroad
companies, a hearing for that purpose shall be held, at least ten days'
notice of which shall be given.

Sec. 305 RCW 81.53.261 and 2007 c 234 s 99 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the secretary of transportation or the governing body of
any city, town, or county, or any railroad company whose road is
crossed by any highway, shall deem that the public safety requires
signals or other warning devices, other than sawbuck signs, at any
crossing of a railroad at common grade by any state, city, town, or
county highway, road, street, alley, avenue, boulevard, parkway, or
other public place actually open and in use or to be opened and used
for travel by the public, he or she or it shall file with the utilities
and transportation commission a petition in writing, alleging that the
public safety requires the installation of specified signals or other
warning devices at such crossing or specified changes in the method and
manner of existing crossing warning devices. Upon receiving such
petition, the commission shall promptly set the matter for hearing,
giving at least twenty days notice to the railroad company or companies
and the county or municipality affected thereby, or the secretary of
transportation in the case of a state highway, of the time and place of
such hearing. At the time and place fixed in the notice, all persons
and parties interested shall be entitled to be heard and introduce
evidence, which shall be reduced to writing and filed by the
commission. If the commission shall determine from the evidence that
public safety does not require the installation of the signal, other
warning device or change in the existing warning device specified in
the petition, it shall make determinations to that effect and enter an
order denying said petition in toto. If the commission shall determine
from the evidence that public safety requires the installation of such
signals or other warning devices at such crossing or such change in the
existing warning devices at said crossing, it shall make determinations
to that effect and enter an order directing the installation of such
signals or other warning devices or directing that such changes shall
be made in existing warning devices. The commission shall also at said
hearing apportion the entire cost of installation and maintenance of
such signals or other warning devices, other than sawbuck signs, as
provided in RCW 81.53.271: PROVIDED, That upon agreement by all
parties to waive hearing, the commission shall forthwith enter its
order.
No railroad shall be required to install any such signal or other
warning device until the public body involved has either paid or
executed its promise to pay to the railroad its portion of the
estimated cost thereof.
Nothing in this section shall be deemed to foreclose the right of
the interested parties to enter into an agreement, franchise, or permit
arrangement providing for the installation of signals or other warning
devices at any such crossing or for the apportionment of the cost of
installation and maintenance thereof, or compliance with an existing
agreement, franchise, or permit arrangement providing for the same.
The hearing and determinations authorized by this section may be
instituted by the commission on its own motion, and the proceedings,
hearing, and consequences thereof shall be the same as for the hearing
and determination of any petition authorized by this section.
No part of the record, or a copy thereof, of the hearing and
determination provided for in this section and no finding, conclusion,
or order made pursuant thereto shall be used as evidence in any trial,
civil or criminal, arising out of an accident at or in the vicinity of
any crossing prior to installation of signals or other warning devices
pursuant to an order of the commission as a result of any such
investigation.
Any order entered by the utilities and transportation commission
under this section shall be subject to review, supersedeas, and appeal
as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.
Nothing in this section shall be deemed to relieve any railroad
from liability on account of failure to provide adequate protective
devices at any such crossing.

Sec. 306 RCW 81.64.160 and 2003 c 53 s 397 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person, agent, officer, manager, or superintendent or
receiver of any corporation or owner of streetcars shall require his,
her, or its ((gripmen)) grip operators, ((motormen)) motor operators,
drivers, or conductors to work more than ten hours in any twenty-four
hours.
(2) Any person, agent, officer, manager, superintendent, or
receiver of any corporation, or owner of streetcar or cars, violating
this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be fined in any sum
not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars for
each day in which such ((gripman)) grip operator, ((motorman)) motor
operator, driver, or conductor in the employ of such person, agent,
officer, manager, superintendent, or receiver of such corporation or
owner is required to work more than ten hours during each twenty-four
hours, as provided in this section.
(3) It is the duty of the prosecuting attorney of each county of
this state to institute the necessary proceedings to enforce the
provisions of this section.

Sec. 307 RCW 81.77.020 and 1989 c 431 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
No person, his or her lessees, receivers, or trustees, shall engage
in the business of operating as a solid waste collection company in
this state, except in accordance with the provisions of this chapter:
PROVIDED, That the provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the
operations of any solid waste collection company under a contract of
solid waste disposal with any city or town, nor to any city or town
which itself undertakes the disposal of solid waste.

Sec. 308 RCW 81.80.100 and 1961 c 14 s 81.80.100 are each amended
to read as follows:
Permits granted by the commission shall be in such form as the
commission shall prescribe and shall set forth the name and address of
the person to whom the permit is granted, the nature of the
transportation service to be engaged in and the principal place of
operation, termini or route to be used or territory to be served by the
operation. No permit holder shall operate except in accordance with
the permit issued to him or her.

Sec. 309 RCW 81.80.355 and 1961 c 14 s 81.80.355 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any person not holding a permit authorizing him or her to operate
as a common carrier, contract carrier, or temporary carrier for the
transportation of property for compensation in this state, or an exempt
carrier, who displays on any building, vehicle, billboard, or in any
manner, any advertisement of, or by circular, letter, newspaper,
magazine, poster, card, or telephone directory, advertises the
transportation of property for compensation shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and punishable as such.

Sec. 310 RCW 81.96.030 and 1984 c 7 s 376 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of transportation or his or her designee may serve as
the Washington state member to the western regional short-haul air
transportation compact and may execute the compact on behalf of this
state with any other state or states legally joining therein.

Sec. 311 RCW 82.03.050 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 176 are each
amended to read as follows:
The board shall operate on either a part-time or a full-time basis,
as determined by the governor. If it is determined that the board
shall operate on a full-time basis, each member of the board shall
receive an annual salary to be determined by the governor. If it is
determined that the board shall operate on a part-time basis, each
member of the board shall receive compensation on the basis of seventy-five dollars for each day spent in performance of his or her duties,
but such compensation shall not exceed ten thousand dollars in a fiscal
year. Each board member shall receive reimbursement for travel
expenses incurred in the discharge of his or her duties in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended.

Sec. 312 RCW 82.03.060 and 1967 ex.s. c 26 s 35 are each amended
to read as follows:
Each member of the board of tax appeals:
(1) Shall not be a candidate for nor hold any other public office
or trust, and shall not engage in any occupation or business
interfering with or inconsistent with his or her duty as a member of
the board, nor shall he or she serve on or under any committee of any
political party; and
(2) Shall not for a period of one year after the termination of his
or her membership on the board, act in a representative capacity before
the board on any matter.

Sec. 313 RCW 82.03.080 and 1967 ex.s. c 26 s 37 are each amended
to read as follows:
The board shall as soon as practicable after the initial
appointment of the members thereof, meet and elect from among its
members a ((chairman)) chair, and shall at least biennially thereafter
meet and elect such a ((chairman)) chair.

Sec. 314 RCW 82.04.290 and 2011 c 174 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal
to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.
(2)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business
activity other than or in addition to an activity taxed explicitly
under another section in this chapter or subsection (1) or (3) of this
section; as to such persons the amount of tax on account of such
activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.
(b) This subsection (2) includes, among others, and without
limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials used in
the performance of such business passes to another by accession,
confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged in the
business of rendering any type of service which does not constitute a
"sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of advertising,
demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials furnished to an
agent by his or her principal or supplier to be used for informational,
educational, and promotional purposes shall not be considered a part of
the agent's remuneration or commission and shall not be subject to
taxation under this section.
(3)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of performing aerospace product development for
others, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by a rate of 0.9 percent.
(b) "Aerospace product development" has the meaning as provided in
RCW 82.04.4461.

Sec. 315 RCW 82.04.425 and 1980 c 37 s 78 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter shall not apply to sales for resale by persons
regularly engaged in the business of making sales of the type of
property so sold to other persons similarly engaged in the business of
selling such property where (1) the amount paid by the buyer does not
exceed the amount paid by the seller to his or her vendor in the
acquisition of the article and (2) the sale is made as an accommodation
to the buyer to enable him or her to fill a bona fide existing order of
a customer or is made within fourteen days to reimburse in kind a
previous accommodation sale by the buyer to the seller; nor to sales by
a wholly owned subsidiary of a person making sales at retail which are
exempt under RCW 82.08.0262 when the parent corporation shall have paid
the tax imposed under this chapter.

Sec. 316 RCW 82.08.0266 and 1999 c 358 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales to
nonresidents of this state for use outside of this state of watercraft
requiring coast guard registration or registration by the state of
principal use according to the federal boating act of 1958, even though
delivery be made within this state, but only when (1) the watercraft
will not be used within this state for more than forty-five days and
(2) an appropriate exemption certificate supported by identification
ascertaining residence as required by the department of revenue and
signed by the purchaser or his or her agent establishing the fact that
the purchaser is a nonresident and that the watercraft is for use
outside of this state, a copy of which shall be retained by the dealer.

Sec. 317 RCW 82.08.0269 and 1980 c 37 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales for use in
states, territories, and possessions of the United States which are not
contiguous to any other state, but only when, as a necessary incident
to the contract of sale, the seller delivers the subject matter of the
sale to the purchaser or his or her designated agent at the usual
receiving terminal of the carrier selected to transport the goods,
under such circumstances that it is reasonably certain that the goods
will be transported directly to a destination in such noncontiguous
states, territories, and possessions.

Sec. 318 RCW 82.08.100 and 2004 c 153 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of revenue, by general regulation, shall provide
that a taxpayer whose regular books of account are kept on a cash
receipts basis may file returns based upon his or her cash receipts for
each reporting period and pay the tax herein provided upon such basis
in lieu of reporting and paying the tax on all sales made during such
period. A taxpayer filing returns on a cash receipts basis is not
required to pay such tax on debt subject to credit or refund under RCW
82.08.037.

Sec. 319 RCW 82.12.070 and 2004 c 153 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of revenue, by general regulation, shall provide
that a taxpayer whose regular books of account are kept on a cash
receipts basis may file returns based upon his or her cash receipts for
each reporting period and pay the tax herein provided upon such basis
in lieu of reporting and paying the tax on all sales made during such
period. A taxpayer filing returns on a cash receipts basis is not
required to pay such tax on debt subject to credit or refund under RCW
82.12.037.

Sec. 320 RCW 82.24.210 and 2003 c 25 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of revenue may promulgate rules and regulations
providing for the refund to dealers for the cost of stamps affixed to
articles taxed herein, which by reason of damage become unfit for sale
and are destroyed by the dealer or returned to the manufacturer or
jobber. In the case of any articles to which stamps have been affixed,
and which articles have been sold and shipped to a regular dealer in
such articles in another state, the seller in this state shall be
entitled to a refund of the actual amount of the stamps so affixed,
less the affixing discount, upon condition that the seller in this
state makes affidavit that the articles were sold and shipped outside
of the state and that he or she has received from the purchaser outside
the state a written acknowledgment that he or she has received such
articles with the amount of stamps affixed thereto, together with the
name and address of such purchaser. The department of revenue may
redeem any unused stamps purchased from it at the face value thereof
less the affixing discount. A distributor or wholesaler that has
lawfully affixed stamps to cigarettes, and subsequently is unable to
sell those cigarettes lawfully because the cigarettes are removed from
the directory created pursuant to RCW 70.158.030(2), may apply to the
department for a refund of the cost of the stamps.

Sec. 321 RCW 82.24.250 and 2008 c 226 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person other than: (a) A licensed wholesaler in the
wholesaler's own vehicle; or (b) a person who has given notice to the
board in advance of the commencement of transportation shall transport
or cause to be transported in this state cigarettes not having the
stamps affixed to the packages or containers.
(2) When transporting unstamped cigarettes, such persons shall have
in their actual possession or cause to have in the actual possession of
those persons transporting such cigarettes on their behalf invoices or
delivery tickets for such cigarettes, which shall show the true name
and address of the consignor or seller, the true name and address of
the consignee or purchaser, and the quantity and brands of the
cigarettes so transported.
(3) If unstamped cigarettes are consigned to or purchased by any
person in this state, such purchaser or consignee must be a person who
is authorized by this chapter to possess unstamped cigarettes in this
state.
(4) In the absence of the notice of transportation required by this
section or in the absence of such invoices or delivery tickets, or, if
the name or address of the consignee or purchaser is falsified or if
the purchaser or consignee is not a person authorized by this chapter
to possess unstamped cigarettes, the cigarettes so transported shall be
deemed contraband subject to seizure and sale under the provisions of
RCW 82.24.130.
(5) Transportation of cigarettes from a point outside this state to
a point in some other state will not be considered a violation of this
section provided that the person so transporting such cigarettes has in
his or her possession adequate invoices or delivery tickets which give
the true name and address of such out-of-state seller or consignor and
such out-of-state purchaser or consignee.
(6) In any case where the department or its duly authorized agent,
or any peace officer of the state, has knowledge or reasonable grounds
to believe that any vehicle is transporting cigarettes in violation of
this section, the department, such agent, or such police officer, is
authorized to stop such vehicle and to inspect the same for contraband
cigarettes.
(7) For purposes of this section, the term "person authorized by
this chapter to possess unstamped cigarettes in this state" means:
(a) A wholesaler, licensed under Washington state law;
(b) The United States or an agency thereof;
(c) Any person, including an Indian tribal organization, who, after
notice has been given to the board as provided in this section, brings
or causes to be brought into the state unstamped cigarettes, if within
a period of time after receipt of the cigarettes as the department
determines by rule to be reasonably necessary for the purpose the
person has caused stamps to be affixed in accordance with RCW 82.24.030
or otherwise made payment of the tax required by this chapter in the
manner set forth in rules adopted by the department; and
(d) Any purchaser or consignee of unstamped cigarettes, including
an Indian tribal organization, who has given notice to the board in
advance of receiving unstamped cigarettes and who within a period of
time after receipt of the cigarettes as the department determines by
rule to be reasonably necessary for the purpose the person has caused
stamps to be affixed in accordance with RCW 82.24.030 or otherwise made
payment of the tax required by this chapter in the manner set forth in
rules adopted by the department.
Nothing in this subsection (7) shall be construed as modifying RCW
82.24.050 or 82.24.110.
(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting any
otherwise lawful activity under a cigarette tax compact pursuant to
chapter 43.06 RCW.
(9) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the
right to travel upon all public highways under Article III of the
treaty with the Yakamas of 1855.

Sec. 322 RCW 82.32.070 and 1999 c 358 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every person liable for any fee or tax imposed by chapters
82.04 through 82.27 RCW shall keep and preserve, for a period of five
years, suitable records as may be necessary to determine the amount of
any tax for which he or she may be liable, which records shall include
copies of all federal income tax and state tax returns and reports made
by him or her. All his or her books, records, and invoices shall be
open for examination at any time by the department of revenue. In the
case of an out-of-state person or concern which does not keep the
necessary books and records within this state, it shall be sufficient
if it produces within the state such books and records as shall be
required by the department of revenue, or permits the examination by an
agent authorized or designated by the department of revenue at the
place where such books and records are kept. Any person who fails to
comply with the requirements of this section shall be forever barred
from questioning, in any court action or proceedings, the correctness
of any assessment of taxes made by the department of revenue based upon
any period for which such books, records, and invoices have not been so
kept and preserved.
(2) A person liable for any fee or tax imposed by chapters 82.04
through 82.27 RCW who contracts with another person or entity for work
subject to chapter 18.27 or 19.28 RCW shall obtain and preserve a
record of the unified business identifier account number for the person
or entity performing the work. Failure to obtain or maintain the
record is subject to RCW 39.06.010 and to a penalty determined by the
director, but not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars. The department
shall notify the taxpayer and collect the penalty in the same manner as
penalties under RCW 82.32.100.

Sec. 323 RCW 82.32.120 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 80 are each
amended to read as follows:
All officers empowered by law to administer oaths, the director of
the department of revenue, and such officers as he or she may designate
shall have the power to administer an oath to any person or to take the
acknowledgment of any person with respect to any return or report
required by law or the rules and regulations of the department of
revenue.

Sec. 324 RCW 82.32.170 and 2007 c 111 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person, having paid any tax, original assessment, additional
assessment, or corrected assessment of any tax, may apply to the
department within the time limitation for refund provided in this
chapter, by petition in writing for a correction of the amount paid,
and a conference for examination and review of the tax liability, in
which petition he or she shall set forth the reasons why the conference
should be granted, and the amount in which the tax, interest, or
penalty, should be refunded. The department shall promptly consider
the petition, and may grant or deny it. If denied, the petitioner
shall be notified by mail, or electronically as provided in RCW
82.32.135, thereof forthwith. If a conference is granted, the
department shall notify the petitioner by mail, or electronically as
provided in RCW 82.32.135, of the time and place fixed therefor. After
the hearing, the department may make such determination as may appear
to it just and lawful, and shall mail a copy of its determination to
the petitioner, or provide a copy of its determination electronically
as provided in RCW 82.32.135.

Sec. 325 RCW 82.32.260 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 87 are each
amended to read as follows:
In the case of any corporation organized under the laws of this
state, the courts shall not enter or sign any decree of dissolution,
nor shall the secretary of state file in his or her office any
certificate of dissolution, and in the case of any corporation
organized under the laws of another jurisdiction and admitted to do
business in this state, the secretary of state shall withhold the
issuance of any certificate of withdrawal, until proof, in the form of
a certificate from the department of revenue, has been furnished by the
applicant for such dissolution or withdrawal, that every license fee,
tax, increase, or penalty has been paid or provided for.

Sec. 326 RCW 82.32.270 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 88 are each
amended to read as follows:
The taxes imposed hereunder, and the returns required therefor,
shall be upon a calendar year basis; but, if any taxpayer in
transacting his or her business, keeps books reflecting the same on a
basis other than the calendar year, he or she may, with consent of the
department of revenue, make his or her returns, and pay taxes upon the
basis of his or her accounting period as shown by the method of keeping
the books of his or her business.

Sec. 327 RCW 82.32.310 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 91 are each
amended to read as follows:
When recovery is had in any suit or proceeding against an officer,
agent, or employee of the department of revenue for any act done by him
or her or for the recovery of any money exacted by or paid to him or
her and by him or her paid over to the department, in the performance
of his or her official duty, and the court certifies that there was
probable cause for the act done by such officer, agent, or employee, or
that he or she acted under the direction of the department or an
officer thereof, no execution shall issue against such officer, agent,
or employee, but the amount so recovered shall, upon final judgment, be
paid by the department as an expense of operation.

Sec. 328 RCW 82.36.110 and 1993 c 54 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
If any person liable for the tax imposed by this chapter fails to
pay the same, the amount thereof, including any interest, penalty, or
addition to such tax, together with any costs that may accrue in
addition thereto, shall be a lien in favor of the state upon all
franchises, property, and rights to property, whether real or personal,
then belonging to or thereafter acquired by such person, whether such
property is employed by such person in the prosecution of business or
is in the hands of a trustee, or receiver, or assignee for the benefit
of creditors, from the date the taxes were due and payable, until the
amount of the lien is paid or the property sold in payment thereof.
The lien shall have priority over any lien or encumbrance
whatsoever, except the lien of other state taxes having priority by
law, and except that such lien shall not be valid as against any bona
fide mortgagee, pledgee, judgment creditor, or purchaser whose rights
have attached prior to the time the department has filed notice of such
lien in the office of the county auditor of the county in which the
principal place of business of the taxpayer is located.
The auditor, upon presentation of a notice of lien, and without
requiring the payment of any fee, shall file and index it in the manner
now provided for deeds and other conveyances except that he or she
shall not be required to include, in the index, any description of the
property affected by the lien. The lien shall continue until the
amount of the tax, together with any penalties and interest
subsequently accruing thereon, is paid. The department may issue a
certificate of release of lien when the amount of the tax, together
with any penalties and interest subsequently accruing thereon, has been
satisfied, and such release may be recorded with the auditor of the
county in which the notice of lien has been filed.
The department shall furnish to any person applying therefor a
certificate showing the amount of all liens for motor vehicle fuel tax,
penalties and interest that may be of record in the files of the
department against any person under the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 329 RCW 82.36.250 and 1961 c 15 s 82.36.250 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any person who purchases or otherwise acquires motor vehicle fuel
upon which the tax has not been paid, from the United States
government, or any of its agents or officers, for use not specifically
associated with any governmental function or operation or so acquires
inflammable petroleum products other than motor vehicle fuel and uses
the same in the propulsion of motor vehicles as herein defined, for a
use not associated with any governmental function or operation, shall
pay to the state the tax herein provided upon the motor vehicle fuel,
or other inflammable petroleum products so acquired. It shall be
unlawful for any person to use or to conspire with any governmental
official, agent, or employee for the use of any requisition, purchase
order, or any card or any authority to which he or she is not
specifically entitled by government regulations, for the purpose of
obtaining any motor vehicle fuel or other inflammable petroleum
products upon which the state tax has not been paid.

Sec. 330 RCW 82.36.310 and 1998 c 176 s 38 and 1998 c 115 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Any person claiming a refund for motor vehicle fuel used or
exported as in this chapter provided shall not be entitled to receive
such refund until he or she presents to the director a claim upon forms
to be provided by the director with such information as the director
shall require, which claim to be valid shall in all cases be
accompanied by invoices issued to the claimant at the time of the
purchases of the motor vehicle fuel, approved as to invoice form by the
director. The requirement to provide invoices may be waived for small
refund amounts, as determined by the department. Claims for refund of
motor vehicle fuel tax must be at least twenty dollars.
Any person claiming refund by reason of exportation of motor
vehicle fuel shall in addition to the invoices required furnish to the
director the export certificate therefor, and the signature on the
exportation certificate shall be certified by a notary public. In all
cases, the claim shall be signed by the person claiming the refund, if
it is a corporation, by some proper officer of the corporation, or if
it is a limited liability company, by some proper manager or member of
the limited liability company.

Sec. 331 RCW 82.36.410 and 1973 c 95 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
All moneys collected by the director shall be transmitted forthwith
to the state treasurer, together with a statement showing whence the
moneys were derived, and shall be by him or her credited to the motor
vehicle fund.

Sec. 332 RCW 82.38.060 and 1996 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the event the tax on special fuel imported into this state in
the fuel supply tanks of motor vehicles for taxable use on Washington
highways can be more accurately determined on a mileage basis, the
department is authorized to approve and adopt such basis. When a
special fuel user imports special fuel into or exports special fuel
from the state of Washington in the fuel supply tanks of motor
vehicles, the amount of special fuel consumed in such vehicles on
Washington highways shall be deemed to be such proportion of the total
amount of such special fuel consumed in his or her entire operations
within and without this state as the total number of miles traveled on
the public highways within this state bears to the total number of
miles traveled within and without the state. The department may also
adopt such mileage basis for determining the taxable use of special
fuel used in motor vehicles which travel regularly over prescribed
courses on and off the highways within the state of Washington. In the
absence of records showing the number of miles actually operated per
gallon of special fuel consumed, fuel consumption shall be calculated
at the rate of one gallon for every: (1) Four miles traveled by
vehicles over forty thousand pounds gross vehicle weight; (2) seven
miles traveled by vehicles twelve thousand one to forty thousand pounds
gross vehicle weight; (3) ten miles traveled by vehicles six thousand
one to twelve thousand pounds gross vehicle weight; and (4) sixteen
miles traveled by vehicles six thousand pounds or less gross vehicle
weight.

Sec. 333 RCW 82.38.275 and 1979 c 40 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department may initiate and conduct investigations as may be
reasonably necessary to establish the existence of any alleged
violations of or noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter or
any rules or regulations issued hereunder.
For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this
chapter, the director or any officer designated by him or her may
administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their
attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books,
papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or
records which the director deems relevant or material to the inquiry.
In case of contumacy by or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to,
any person, any court of competent jurisdiction upon application by the
director, may issue to that person an order requiring him or her to
appear before the director, or the officer designated by him or her to
produce testimony or other evidence touching the matter under
investigation or in question. The failure to obey an order of the
court may be punishable by contempt.

Sec. 334 RCW 82.41.080 and 1982 c 161 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department may initiate and conduct investigations as may be
reasonably necessary to establish the existence of any alleged
violations of or noncompliance with this chapter or any rules issued
hereunder.
For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this
chapter, the director or any officer designated by the director may
administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their
attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books,
papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or
records which the director deems relevant or material to the inquiry.
In case of contumacy by or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any
person, any court of competent jurisdiction, upon application by the
director, may issue to that person an order requiring him or her to
appear before the director, or the officer designated by the director,
to produce testimony or other evidence touching the matter under
investigation or in question. The failure to obey an order of the
court may be punishable by contempt.

Sec. 335 RCW 82.42.040 and 2008 c 181 s 507 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall by rule and regulation adopted as provided in
chapter 34.05 RCW (Administrative Procedure Act) set up the necessary
administrative procedure for collection by the department of the
aircraft fuel excise tax as provided for in RCW 82.42.020, placing the
responsibility of collection of said tax upon every distributor of
aircraft fuel within the state; he or she may require the licensing of
every distributor of aircraft fuel and shall require such a corporate
surety bond or security of any distributor or person not otherwise
bonded under provisions of chapter 82.36 RCW as is provided for
distributors of motor vehicle fuel under RCW 82.36.060; he or she shall
provide such forms and may require such reports or statements as in his
or her determination shall be necessary for the proper administration
of this chapter. The director may require such records to be kept, and
for such periods of time, as deemed necessary for the administration of
this chapter, which records shall be available at all times for the
director or his or her representative who may require a statement under
oath as to the contents thereof. During a state of emergency declared
under RCW 43.06.010(12), the director, on his or her own motion or at
the request of any taxpayer affected by the emergency, may extend the
time for filing any report or the due date for tax remittances as the
director deems proper.
Every application for a distributor's license must contain the
following information to the extent it applies to the applicant:
(1) Proof as the department may require concerning the applicant's
identity, including but not limited to his or her fingerprints or those
of the officers of a corporation making the application;
(2) The applicant's form and place of organization including proof
that the individual, partnership, or corporation is licensed to do
business in this state;
(3) The qualification and business history of the applicant and any
partner, officer, or director;
(4) The applicant's financial condition or history including a bank
reference and whether the applicant or any partner, officer, or
director has ever been adjudged bankrupt or has an unsatisfied judgment
in a federal or state court;
(5) Whether the applicant has been adjudged guilty of a crime that
directly relates to the business for which the license is sought and
the time elapsed since the conviction is less than ten years, or has
suffered a judgment within the preceding five years in a civil action
involving fraud, misrepresentation, or conversion and in the case of a
corporation or partnership, all directors, officers, or partners.
After receipt of an application for a license, the director may
conduct an investigation to determine whether the facts set forth are
true. The director may require a fingerprint record check of the
applicant through the Washington state patrol criminal identification
system and the federal bureau of investigation before issuance of a
license. The results of the background investigation including
criminal history information may be released to authorized department
personnel as the director deems necessary. The department shall charge
a license holder or license applicant a fee of fifty dollars for each
background investigation conducted.
An applicant who makes a false statement of a material fact on the
application may be prosecuted for false swearing as defined by RCW
9A.72.040.

Sec. 336 RCW 82.42.100 and 1967 ex.s. c 10 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
The director is charged with the enforcement of the provisions of
this chapter and rules and regulations promulgated hereunder. The
director may, in his or her discretion, call on the state patrol or any
peace officer in the state, who shall then aid in the enforcement of
this chapter or any rules or regulations promulgated hereunder.

Sec. 337 RCW 82.44.140 and 1979 c 158 s 237 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any duties required by this chapter to be performed by the county
auditor may be performed by any other person designated by the director
of licensing and authorized by him or her to receive motor vehicle
license fees and issue receipt therefor.

Sec. 338 RCW 82.50.520 and 1983 c 26 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following travel trailers or campers are specifically exempted
from the operation of this chapter:
(1) Any unoccupied travel trailer or camper when it is part of an
inventory of travel trailers or campers held for sale by a manufacturer
or dealer in the course of his or her business.
(2) A travel trailer or camper owned by any government or political
subdivision thereof.
(3) A travel trailer or camper owned by a nonresident and currently
licensed in another state, unless such travel trailer or camper is
required by law to be licensed in this state.
For the purposes of this subsection only, a camper owned by a
nonresident shall be considered licensed in another state if the
vehicle to which such camper is attached is currently licensed in
another state.
(4) Travel trailers eligible to be used under a dealer's license
plate, and taxed under RCW 82.44.030 while so eligible.

Sec. 339 RCW 82.56.030 and 1967 c 125 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The member representing this state on the multistate tax commission
may be represented thereon by an alternate designated by him or her.
Any such alternate shall be a principal deputy or assistant of the
member of the commission in the agency which the member heads.

Sec. 340 RCW 82.56.040 and 1967 c 125 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The governor, after consultation with representatives of local
governments, shall appoint three persons who are representative of
subdivisions affected or likely to be affected by the multistate tax
compact. The member of the commission representing this state, and any
alternate designated by him or her, shall consult regularly with these
appointees, in accordance with Article VI 1(b) of the compact.

Sec. 341 RCW 83.100.020 and 2005 c 516 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Decedent" means a deceased individual;
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue, the director of
that department, or any employee of the department exercising authority
lawfully delegated to him or her by the director;
(3) "Federal return" means any tax return required by chapter 11 of
the internal revenue code;
(4) "Federal tax" means a tax under chapter 11 of the internal
revenue code;
(5) "Gross estate" means "gross estate" as defined and used in
section 2031 of the internal revenue code;
(6) "Person" means any individual, estate, trust, receiver,
cooperative association, club, corporation, company, firm, partnership,
joint venture, syndicate, or other entity and, to the extent permitted
by law, any federal, state, or other governmental unit or subdivision
or agency, department, or instrumentality thereof;
(7) "Person required to file the federal return" means any person
required to file a return required by chapter 11 of the internal
revenue code, such as the personal representative of an estate;
(8) "Property" means property included in the gross estate;
(9) "Resident" means a decedent who was domiciled in Washington at
time of death;
(10) "Taxpayer" means a person upon whom tax is imposed under this
chapter, including an estate or a person liable for tax under RCW
83.100.120;
(11) "Transfer" means "transfer" as used in section 2001 of the
internal revenue code. However, "transfer" does not include a
qualified heir disposing of an interest in property qualifying for a
deduction under RCW 83.100.046 or ceasing to use the property for
farming purposes;
(12) "Internal revenue code" means, for the purposes of this
chapter and RCW 83.110.010, the United States internal revenue code of
1986, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2005;
(13) "Washington taxable estate" means the federal taxable estate,
less: (a) One million five hundred thousand dollars for decedents
dying before January 1, 2006; and (b) two million dollars for decedents
dying on or after January 1, 2006; and (c) the amount of any deduction
allowed under RCW 83.100.046; and
(14) "Federal taxable estate" means the taxable estate as
determined under chapter 11 of the internal revenue code without regard
to: (a) The termination of the federal estate tax under section 2210
of the internal revenue code or any other provision of law, and (b) the
deduction for state estate, inheritance, legacy, or succession taxes
allowable under section 2058 of the internal revenue code.

Sec. 342 RCW 84.08.120 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 155 are each
amended to read as follows:
It shall be the duty of every public officer to comply with any
lawful order, rule, or regulation of the department of revenue made
under the provisions of this title, and whenever it shall appear to the
department of revenue that any public officer or employee whose duties
relate to the assessment or equalization of assessments of property for
taxation or to the levy or collection of taxes has failed to comply
with the provisions of this title or with any other law relating to
such duties or the rules of the department made in pursuance thereof,
the department after a hearing on the facts may issue its order
directing such public officer or employee to comply with such
provisions of law or of its rules, and if such public officer or
employee for a period of ten days after service on him or her of the
department's order shall neglect or refuse to comply therewith, the
department of revenue may apply to a judge of the superior court or
court commissioner of the county in which said public officer or
employee holds office for an order returnable within five days from the
date thereof to compel such public officer or employee to comply with
such provisions of law or of the department's order, or to show cause
why he or she should not be compelled so to do, and any order issued by
the judge pursuant thereto shall be final. The remedy herein provided
shall be cumulative and shall not exclude the department of revenue
from exercising any power or rights otherwise granted.

Sec. 343 RCW 84.08.140 and 1994 c 301 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any taxpayer feeling aggrieved by the levy or levies of any taxing
district except levies authorized by a vote of the voters of the
district may appeal therefrom to the department of revenue as
hereinafter provided. Such taxpayer, upon the execution of a bond,
with two or more sufficient sureties to be approved by the county
auditor, payable to the state of Washington, in the penal sum of two
hundred dollars and conditioned that if the petitioner shall fail in
his or her appeal for a reduction of said levy or levies the taxpayer
will pay the taxable costs of the hearings hereinafter provided, not
exceeding the amount of such bond, may file a written complaint with
the county auditor wherein such taxing district is located not later
than ten days after the making and entering of such levy or levies,
setting forth in such form and detail as the department of revenue
shall by general rule prescribe, the taxpayer's objections to such levy
or levies. Upon the filing of such complaint, the county auditor shall
immediately transmit a certified copy thereof, together with a copy of
the budget or estimates of such taxing district as finally adopted,
including estimated revenues and such other information as the
department of revenue shall by rule require, to the department of
revenue. The department of revenue shall fix a date for a hearing on
said complaint at the earliest convenient time after receipt of said
record, which hearing shall be held in the county in which said taxing
district is located, and notice of such hearing shall be given to the
officials of such taxing district, charged with determining the amount
of its levies, and to the taxpayer on said complaint by registered mail
at least five days prior to the date of said hearing. At such hearings
all interested parties may be heard and the department of revenue shall
receive all competent evidence. After such hearing, the department of
revenue shall either affirm or decrease the levy or levies complained
of, in accordance with the evidence, and shall thereupon certify its
action with respect thereto to the county auditor, who, in turn, shall
certify it to the taxing district or districts affected, and the action
of the department of revenue with respect to such levy or levies shall
be final and conclusive.

Sec. 344 RCW 84.08.190 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 158 are each
amended to read as follows:
For the purpose of instruction on the subject of taxation, the
county assessors of the state shall meet with the department of revenue
at the capital of the state, or at such place within the state as they
may determine at their previous meeting, on the second Monday of
October of each year or on such other date as may be fixed by the
department of revenue. Each assessor shall be paid by the county of
his or her residence his or her actual expenses in attending such
meeting, upon presentation to the county auditor of proper vouchers.

Sec. 345 RCW 84.09.040 and 1961 c 15 s 84.09.040 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every county auditor, county assessor, and county treasurer who in
any case refuses or knowingly neglects to perform any duty enjoined on
him or her by this title, or who consents to or connives at any evasion
of its provisions whereby any proceeding herein provided for is
prevented or hindered, or whereby any property required to be listed
for taxation is unlawfully exempted, or the valuation thereof is
entered on the tax roll at less than its true taxable value, shall, for
every such neglect, refusal, consent, or connivance, forfeit and pay to
the state not less than two hundred nor more than one thousand dollars,
at the discretion of the court, to be recovered before any court of
competent jurisdiction upon the complaint of any citizen who is a
taxpayer; and the prosecuting attorney shall prosecute such suit to
judgment and execution.

Sec. 346 RCW 84.12.240 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 162 are each
amended to read as follows:
The department of revenue shall have access to all books, papers,
documents, statements, and accounts on file or of record in any of the
departments of the state; and it shall have the power to issue
subpoenas, signed by the director of the department or any duly
authorized employee and served in a like manner as a subpoena issued
from courts of record, to compel witnesses to appear and give evidence
and to produce books and papers. The director of the department or any
employee officially designated by the department is authorized to
administer oaths to witnesses. The attendance of any witness may be
compelled by attachment issued out of any superior court upon
application to said court by the director or any duly authorized
employee of the department, upon a proper showing that such witness has
been duly served with a subpoena and has refused to appear before the
said department. In case of the refusal of a witness to produce books,
papers, documents, or accounts, or to give evidence on matters material
to the hearing, the department may institute proceedings in the proper
superior court to compel such witness to testify or to produce such
books or papers, and to punish him or her for such failure or refusal.
All process issued by the department shall be served by the sheriff of
the proper county or by a duly authorized agent of the department and
such service, if made by the sheriff, shall be certified by him or her
to the department of revenue without any compensation therefor.
Persons appearing before the department in obedience to a subpoena
shall receive the same compensation as witnesses in the superior court.
The records, books, accounts, and papers of each company shall be
subject to visitation, investigation, or examination by the department,
or any employee thereof officially designated by the department. All
real and/or personal property of any company shall be subject to
visitation, investigation, examination, and/or listing at any and all
times by the department, or any person officially designated by the
director.

Sec. 347 RCW 84.16.032 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 176 are each
amended to read as follows:
The department of revenue shall have access to all books, papers,
documents, statements, and accounts on file or of record in any of the
departments of the state; and shall have the power, by summons signed
by director and served in a like manner as a subpoena issued from
courts of record, to compel witnesses to appear and give evidence and
to produce books and papers. The director or any employee officially
designated by the director is authorized to administer oaths to
witnesses. The attendance of any witness may be compelled by
attachment issued out of any superior court upon application to said
court by the department, upon a proper showing that such witness has
been duly served with a summons and has refused to appear before the
said department. In case of the refusal of a witness to produce books,
papers, documents, or accounts or to give evidence on matters material
to the hearing, the department may institute proceedings in the proper
superior court to compel such witness to testify, or to produce such
books or papers and to punish him or her for the refusal. All summons
and process issued by the department shall be served by the sheriff of
the proper county and such service certified by him or her to the
department of revenue without any compensation therefor. Persons
appearing before the department in obedience to a summons, shall, in
the discretion of the department, receive the same compensation as
witnesses in the superior court. The records, books, accounts, and
papers of each company shall be subject to visitation, investigation,
or examination by the department, or any employee thereof officially
designated by the director. All real and/or personal property of any
company shall be subject to visitation, investigation, examination,
and/or listing at any and all times by the department, or any person
employed by the department.

Sec. 348 RCW 84.36.300 and 1973 c 149 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be exempt from taxation a portion of each separately
assessed stock of merchandise, as that word is defined in this section,
owned or held by any taxpayer on the first day of January of any year
computed by first multiplying the total amount of that stock of such
merchandise, as determined in accordance with RCW 84.40.020, by a
percentage determined by dividing the amount of such merchandise
brought into this state by the taxpayer during the preceding year for
that stock by the total additions to that stock by the taxpayer during
that year, and then multiplying the result of the latter computation by
a percentage determined by dividing the total out-of-state shipments of
such merchandise by the taxpayer during the preceding year from that
stock (and regardless of whether or not any such shipments involved a
sale of, or a transfer of title to, the merchandise within this state)
by the total shipments of such merchandise by the taxpayer during the
preceding year from that stock. As used in this section, the word
"merchandise" means goods, wares, merchandise, or material which were
not manufactured in this state by the taxpayer and which were acquired
by him or her (in any other manner whatsoever, including manufacture by
him or her outside of this state) for the purpose of sale or shipment
in substantially the same form in which they were acquired by him or
her within this state or were brought into this state by him or her.
Breaking of packages or of bulk shipments, packaging, repackaging,
labeling, or relabeling shall not be considered as a change in form
within the meaning of this section. A taxpayer who has made no
shipments of merchandise, either out-of-state or in-state, during the
preceding year, may compute the percentage to be applied to the stock
of merchandise on the basis of his or her experience from March 1st of
the preceding year to the last day of February of the current year, in
lieu of computing the percentage on the basis of his or her experience
during the preceding year. The rule of strict construction shall not
apply to this section.
All rights, title, or interest in or to any aircraft parts,
equipment, furnishings, or accessories (but not engines or major
structural components) which are manufactured outside of the state of
Washington and are owned by purchasers of the aircraft constructed,
under construction or to be constructed in the state of Washington, and
are shipped into the state of Washington for installation in or use in
connection with the operation of such aircraft shall be exempt from
taxation prior to and during construction of such aircraft and while
held in this state for periods preliminary to and during the
transportation of such aircraft from the state of Washington.

Sec. 349 RCW 84.36.320 and 1969 ex.s. c 124 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
An owner or agent filing a claim under RCW 84.36.310 shall consent
to the inspection of the books and records upon which the claim has
been based, such inspection to be similar in manner to that provided by
RCW 84.40.340, or if the owner or agent does not maintain records
within this state, the consent shall apply to the records of a
warehouse, person, or agent having custody of the inventory to which
the claim applies. Consent to the inspection of the records shall be
executed as a part of the claim. The owner, his or her agent, or other
person having custody of the inventory referred to herein shall retain
within this state, for a period of at least two years from the date of
the claim, the records referred to above. If adequate records are not
made available to the assessor within the county where the claim is
made, then the exemption shall be denied.

Sec. 350 RCW 84.36.400 and 1972 ex.s. c 125 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any physical improvement to single-family dwellings upon real
property shall be exempt from taxation for the three assessment years
subsequent to the completion of the improvement to the extent that the
improvement represents thirty percent or less of the value of the
original structure. A taxpayer desiring to obtain the exemption
granted by this section must file notice of his or her intention to
construct the improvement prior to the improvement being made on forms
prescribed by the department of revenue and furnished to the taxpayer
by the county assessor: PROVIDED, That this exemption cannot be
claimed more than once in a five-year period.
The department of revenue shall promulgate such rules and
regulations as are necessary and convenient to properly administer the
provisions of this section.

Sec. 351 RCW 84.36.813 and 1977 ex.s. c 209 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
An exempt property owner shall notify the department of revenue of
any change of use prior to each assessment year. Any other person
believing that a change in the use of exempt property has occurred
shall report same to the county assessor, who shall examine the
property and if the use is not in compliance with chapter 84.36 RCW he
or she shall report the information to the department with a
recommendation that the exempt status be canceled. The final
determination shall be made by the department.

Sec. 352 RCW 84.36.850 and 1989 c 378 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any applicant aggrieved by the department of revenue's denial of an
exemption application may petition the state board of tax appeals to
review an application for either real or personal property tax
exemption and the board shall consider any appeals to determine (1) if
the property is entitled to an exemption, and (2) the amount or portion
thereof.
A county assessor of the county in which the exempted property is
located shall be empowered to appeal to the state board of tax appeals
to review any real or personal property tax exemption approved by the
department of revenue which he or she feels is not warranted.
Appeals from a department of revenue decision must be made within
thirty days after the mailing of the approval or denial.

Sec. 353 RCW 84.38.040 and 2001 c 185 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each claimant electing to defer payment of special assessments
and/or real property tax obligations under this chapter shall file with
the county assessor, on forms prescribed by the department and supplied
by the assessor, a written declaration thereof. The declaration to
defer special assessments and/or real property taxes for any year shall
be filed no later than thirty days before the tax or assessment is due
or thirty days after receiving notice under RCW 84.64.050, whichever is
later: PROVIDED, That for good cause shown, the department may waive
this requirement.
(2) The declaration shall designate the property to which the
deferral applies, and shall include a statement setting forth (a) a
list of all members of the claimant's household, (b) the claimant's
equity value in his or her residence, (c) facts establishing the
eligibility for the deferral under the provisions of this chapter, and
(d) any other relevant information required by the rules of the
department. Each copy shall be signed by the claimant subject to the
penalties as provided in chapter 9A.72 RCW for false swearing. The
first declaration to defer filed in a county shall include proof of the
claimant's age acceptable to the assessor.
(3) The county assessor shall determine if each claimant shall be
granted a deferral for each year but the claimant shall have the right
to appeal this determination to the county board of equalization, in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038, whose decision shall
be final as to the deferral of that year.

Sec. 354 RCW 84.38.060 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 291 s 31 are each
amended to read as follows:
If the claimant is unable to make his or her own declaration of
deferral, it may be made by a duly authorized agent or by a guardian or
other person charged with care of the person or property of such
claimant.

Sec. 355 RCW 84.38.080 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 291 s 33 are each
amended to read as follows:
A person's right to defer special assessments and/or property tax
obligations on his or her residence shall not be reduced by contract or
agreement, from January 1, 1976 onward.

Sec. 356 RCW 84.38.090 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 291 s 34 are each
amended to read as follows:
If any residence is under mortgage or purchase contract requiring
accumulation of reserves out of which the holder of the mortgage or
contract is required to pay real estate taxes, said holder shall cosign
the declaration of deferral either before a notary public or the county
assessor or his or her deputy in the county where the real property is
located.

Sec. 357 RCW 84.40.070 and 2003 c 302 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The president, secretary, or principal accounting officer or agent
of any company or association, whether incorporated or unincorporated,
except as otherwise provided for in this title, shall make out and
deliver to the assessor a statement of its property, setting forth
particularly (1) the name and location of the company or association;
(2) the real property of the company or association, and where
situated; and (3) the nature and value of its personal property. The
real and personal property of such company or association shall be
assessed the same as other real and personal property. In all cases of
failure or refusal of any person, officer, company, or association to
make such return or statement, it shall be the duty of the assessor to
make such return or statement from the best information he or she can
obtain.

Sec. 358 RCW 84.40.110 and 1961 c 15 s 84.40.110 are each amended
to read as follows:
When the assessor shall be of opinion that the person listing
property for himself or herself or for any other person, company, or
corporation, has not made a full, fair, and complete list of such
property, he or she may examine such person under oath in regard to the
amount of the property he or she is required to list, and if such
person shall refuse to answer under oath, and a full discovery make,
the assessor may list the property of such person, or his or her
principal, according to his or her best judgment and information.

Sec. 359 RCW 84.40.160 and 1997 c 135 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The assessor shall list all real property according to the largest
legal subdivision as near as practicable. The assessor shall make out
in the plat and description book in numerical order a complete list of
all lands or lots subject to taxation, showing the names and owners, if
to him or her known and if unknown, so stated; the number of acres and
lots or parts of lots included in each description of property and the
value per acre or lot: PROVIDED, That the assessor shall give to each
tract of land where described by metes and bounds a number, to be
designated as Tax No. . . . ., which said number shall be placed on the
tax rolls to indicate that certain piece of real property bearing such
number, and described by metes and bounds in the plat and description
book herein mentioned, and it shall not be necessary to enter a
description by metes and bounds on the tax roll of the county, and the
assessor's plat and description book shall be kept as a part of the tax
collector's records: AND PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the board of county
commissioners of any county may by order direct that the property be
listed numerically according to lots and blocks or section, township
and range, in the smallest platted or government subdivision, and when
so listed the value of each block, lot or tract, the value of the
improvements thereon and the total value thereof, including
improvements thereon, shall be extended after the description of each
lot, block or tract, which last extension shall be in the column headed
"Total value of each tract, lot or block of land assessed with
improvements as returned by the assessor." In carrying the values of
said property into the column representing the equalized value thereof,
the county assessor shall include and carry over in one item the
equalized valuation of all lots in one block, or land in one section,
listed consecutively, which belong to any one person, firm, or
corporation, and are situated within the same taxing district, and in
the assessed value of which the county board of equalization has made
no change. Where assessed valuations are changed, the equalized
valuation must be extended and shown by item.
The assessor shall prepare and possess a complete set of maps drawn
to indicate parcel configuration for lands in the county. The assessor
shall continually update the maps to reflect transfers, conveyances,
acquisitions, or any other transaction or event that changes the
boundaries of any parcel and shall renumber the parcels or prepare new
map pages for any portion of the maps to show combinations or divisions
of parcels.

Sec. 360 RCW 84.40.185 and 1995 c 318 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every individual, corporation, limited liability company,
association, partnership, trust, or estate shall list all personal
property in his or her or its ownership, possession, or control which
is subject to taxation pursuant to the provisions of this title. Such
listing shall be made and delivered in accordance with the provisions
of this chapter.

Sec. 361 RCW 84.40.210 and 1961 c 168 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every person who purchases, receives, or holds personal property of
any description for the purpose of adding to the value thereof by any
process of manufacturing, refining, rectifying, or by the combination
of different materials with the view of making gain or profit by so
doing shall be held to be a manufacturer, and he or she shall, when
required to, make and deliver to the assessor a statement of the amount
of his or her other personal property subject to taxes, also include in
his or her statement the value of all articles purchased, received, or
otherwise held for the purpose of being used in whole or in part in any
process or processes of manufacturing, combining, rectifying, or
refining. Every person owning a manufacturing establishment of any
kind and every manufacturer shall list as part of his or her
manufacturer's stock the value of all engines and machinery of every
description used or designed to be used in any process of refining or
manufacturing except such fixtures as have been considered as part of
any parcel of real property, including all tools and implements of
every kind, used or designed to be used for the first aforesaid
purpose.

Sec. 362 RCW 84.40.220 and 1974 ex.s. c 83 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
Whoever owns, or has in his or her possession or subject to his or
her control, any goods, merchandise, grain, or produce of any kind, or
other personal property within this state, with authority to sell the
same, which has been purchased either in or out of this state, with a
view to being sold at an advanced price or profit, or which has been
consigned to him or her from any place out of this state for the
purpose of being sold at any place within the state, shall be held to
be a merchant, and when he or she is by this title required to make out
and to deliver to the assessor a statement of his or her other personal
property, he or she shall state the value of such property pertaining
to his or her business as a merchant. No consignee shall be required
to list for taxation the value of any property the product of this
state, nor the value of any property consigned to him or her from any
other place for the sole purpose of being stored or forwarded, if he or
she has no interest in such property nor any profit to be derived from
its sale. The growing stock of ((nurserymen)) nursery dealers, which
is owned by the original producer thereof or which has been held or
possessed by the ((nurserymen)) nursery dealers for one hundred eighty
days or more, shall, whether personal or real property, be considered
the same as growing crops on cultivated lands: PROVIDED, That the
((nurserymen)) nursery dealers be licensed by the department of
agriculture: PROVIDED FURTHER, That an original producer, within the
meaning of this section, shall include a person who, beginning with
seeds, cuttings, bulbs, corms, or any form of immature plants, grows
such plants in the course of their development into either a marketable
partially grown product or a marketable consumer product.

Sec. 363 RCW 84.40.240 and 1961 c 15 s 84.40.240 are each amended
to read as follows:
The assessor of each county shall, on or before the first day of
January of each year, obtain from the department of natural resources,
and from the local land offices of the state, lists of public lands
sold or contracted to be sold during the previous year in his or her
county, and certify them for taxation, together with the various
classes of state lands sold during the same year, and it shall be the
duty of the department of natural resources to certify a list or lists
of all public lands sold or contracted to be sold during the previous
year, on application of the assessor of any county applying therefor.

Sec. 364 RCW 84.40.370 and 1984 c 220 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The assessor shall list the property and assess it with reference
to its value on the date the property lost its exempt status unless
such property has been previously listed and assessed. He or she shall
extend the taxes on the tax roll using the rate of percent applicable
as if the property had been assessed in the previous year.

Sec. 365 RCW 84.41.080 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 199 are each
amended to read as follows:
Upon receiving a request from the county assessor, either upon his
or her initiation or at the direction of the board of county
commissioners, for special assistance in the county's revaluation
program, the department of revenue may, before undertaking to render
such special assistance, negotiate a contract with the board of county
commissioners of the county concerned. Such contracts as are
negotiated shall provide that the county will reimburse the state for
fifty percent of the costs of such special assistance within three
years of the date of expenditure of such costs. All such
reimbursements shall be paid to the department of revenue for deposit
to the state general fund. The department of revenue shall keep
complete records of such contracts, including costs incurred, payments
received, and services performed thereunder.

Sec. 366 RCW 84.41.120 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 202 are each
amended to read as follows:
Each county assessor shall keep such books and records as are
required by the rules and regulations of the department of revenue and
shall comply with any lawful order, rule, or regulation of the
department of revenue.
Whenever it appears to the department of revenue that any assessor
has failed to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter
relating to his or her duties or the rules of the department of revenue
made in pursuance thereof, the department of revenue, after a hearing
on the facts, may issue an order directing such assessor to comply with
such provisions of this chapter or rules of the department of revenue.
Such order shall be mailed by registered mail to the assessor at the
county court house. If, upon the expiration of fifteen days from the
date such order is mailed, the assessor has not complied therewith or
has not taken measures that will insure compliance within a reasonable
time, the department of revenue may apply to a judge of the superior
court or court commissioner of the county in which such assessor holds
office, for an order returnable within five days from the date thereof
to compel him or her to comply with such provisions of law or of the
order of the department of revenue or to show cause why he or she
should not be compelled so to do. Any order issued by the judge
pursuant to such order to show cause shall be final. The remedy herein
provided shall be cumulative and shall not exclude the department of
revenue from exercising any powers or rights otherwise granted.

Sec. 367 RCW 84.44.080 and 1961 c 15 s 84.44.080 are each amended
to read as follows:
The owner of personal property removing from one county to another
between the first day of January and the first day of July shall be
assessed in either in which he or she is first called upon by the
assessor. The owner of personal property moving into this state from
another state between the first day of January and the first day of
July shall list the property owned by him or her on the first day of
January of such year in the county in which he or she resides:
PROVIDED, That if such person has been assessed and can make it appear
to the assessor that he or she is held for the tax of the current year
on the property in another state or county, he or she shall not be
again assessed for such year.

Sec. 368 RCW 84.48.018 and 1970 ex.s. c 55 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
The members of each board of equalization shall meet and choose a
((chairman)) chair. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum.

Sec. 369 RCW 84.56.090 and 2007 c 295 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever in the judgment of the assessor or the county treasurer
personal property is being removed or is about to be removed without
the limits of the state, or is being dissipated or about to be
dissipated, or is being or about to be sold, disposed of, or removed
from the county so as to jeopardize collection of taxes, the treasurer
shall immediately prepare papers in distraint, which shall contain a
description of the personal property, including mobile homes,
manufactured homes, or park model trailers, being or about to be
removed, dissipated, sold, disposed of, or removed from the county so
as to jeopardize collection of taxes, the amount of the tax, the amount
of accrued interest at the rate provided by law from the date of
delinquency, and the name of the owner or reputed owner, and he or she
shall without demand or notice distrain sufficient goods and chattels
belonging to the person charged with such taxes to pay the same with
interest at the rate provided by law from the date of delinquency,
together with all accruing costs, and shall advertise and sell said
property as provided in RCW 84.56.070.
If said personal property is being removed or is about to be
removed from the limits of the state, is being dissipated or about to
be dissipated, or is being or about to be sold, disposed of, or removed
from the county so as to jeopardize collection of taxes, at any time
subsequent to the first day of January in any year, and prior to the
levy of taxes thereon, the taxes upon such property so distrained shall
be computed upon the rate of levy for state, county, and local purposes
for the preceding year; and all taxes collected in advance of levy
under this section and RCW 84.56.120, together with the name of the
owner and a brief description of the property assessed shall be entered
forthwith by the county treasurer upon the personal property tax rolls
of such preceding year, and all collections thereon shall be considered
and treated in all respects, and without recourse by either the owner
or any taxing unit, as collections for such preceding year. Property
on which taxes are thus collected shall thereupon become discharged
from the lien of any taxes that may thereafter be levied in the year in
which payment or collection is made.
Whenever property has been removed from the county wherein it has
been assessed, on which the taxes have not been paid, then the county
treasurer, or his or her deputy, shall have the same power to distrain
and sell said property for the satisfaction of said taxes as he or she
would have if said property were situated in the county in which the
property was taxed, and in addition thereto said treasurer, or his or
her deputy, in the distraint and sale of property for the payment of
taxes, shall have the same powers as are now by law given to the
sheriff in making levy and sale of property on execution.

Sec. 370 RCW 84.56.210 and 1961 c 15 s 84.56.210 are each amended
to read as follows:
Whenever standing timber which has been assessed as real estate is
severed from the land as part of which it was so assessed, it may be
considered by the county assessor as personal property, and the county
treasurer shall thereafter be entitled to pursue all of the rights and
remedies provided by law for the collection of personal property taxes
in the collection of taxes levied against such timber: PROVIDED, That
whenever the county assessor elects to treat severed timber as
personalty under the provisions of this section, he or she shall
immediately give notice by mail to the person or persons charged with
the tax of the fact of his or her election, and the amount of tax
standing against the timber.

Sec. 371 RCW 84.56.210 and 1961 c 15 s 84.56.210 are each amended
to read as follows:
Whenever standing timber which has been assessed as real estate is
severed from the land as part of which it was so assessed, it may be
considered by the county assessor as personal property, and the county
treasurer shall thereafter be entitled to pursue all of the rights and
remedies provided by law for the collection of personal property taxes
in the collection of taxes levied against such timber: PROVIDED, That
whenever the county assessor elects to treat severed timber as
personalty under the provisions of this section, he or she shall
immediately give notice by mail to the person or persons charged with
the tax of the fact of his or her election, and the amount of tax
standing against the timber.

Sec. 372 RCW 84.56.270 and 1984 c 132 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county treasurer of any county of the state of Washington,
after he or she has first received the approval of the board of county
commissioners of such county, through a resolution duly adopted, is
hereby empowered to petition the superior court in or for his or her
county to finally cancel and completely extinguish the lien of any
delinquent personal property tax which appears on the tax rolls of his
or her county, which is more than four years delinquent, which he or
she attests to be beyond hope of collection, and the cancellation of
which will not impair the obligation of any bond issue nor be precluded
by any other legal impediment that might invalidate such cancellation.
The superior court shall have jurisdiction to hear any such petition
and to enter such order as it shall deem proper in the premises.

Sec. 373 RCW 84.56.320 and 1961 c 15 s 84.56.320 are each amended
to read as follows:
When any tax on real property is paid by or collected of any
occupant or tenant, or any other person, which, by agreement or
otherwise, ought to have been paid by the owner, lessor, or other party
in interest, such occupant, tenant, or other person may recover by
action the amount which such owner, lessor, or party in interest ought
to have paid, with interest thereon at the rate of ten percent per
annum, or he or she may retain the same from any rent due or accruing
from him or her to such owner or lessor for real property on which such
tax is so paid; and the same shall, until paid, constitute a lien upon
such real property.

Sec. 374 RCW 84.60.040 and 1961 c 15 s 84.60.040 are each amended
to read as follows:
When it becomes necessary, in the opinion of the county treasurer,
to charge the tax on personal property against real property, in order
that such personal property tax may be collected, such county treasurer
shall select for that purpose some particular tract or lots of real
property owned by the person owing such personal property tax, and in
his or her tax roll and certificate of delinquency shall designate the
particular tract or lots of real property against which such personal
property tax is charged, and such real property shall be chargeable
therewith.

Sec. 375 RCW 84.64.040 and 1961 c 15 s 84.64.040 are each amended
to read as follows:
The county prosecuting attorney shall furnish to holders of
certificates of delinquency, at the expense of the county, forms of
applications for judgment and forms of notice and summons when the same
are required, and shall prosecute to final judgment all actions brought
by holders of certificates under the provisions of this chapter for the
foreclosure of tax liens, when requested so to do by the holder of any
certificate of delinquency: PROVIDED, Said holder has duly paid to the
clerk of the court the sum of two dollars for each action brought as
per RCW 84.64.120: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That nothing herein shall be
construed to prevent said holder from employing other and additional
counsel, or prosecuting said action independent of and without
assistance from the prosecuting attorney, if he or she so desires, but
in such cases, no other and further costs or charge whatever shall be
allowed than the costs provided in this section and RCW 84.64.120: AND
PROVIDED, ALSO, That in no event shall the county prosecuting attorney
collect any fee for the services herein enumerated.

Sec. 376 RCW 84.64.130 and 1961 c 15 s 84.64.130 are each amended
to read as follows:
The books and records belonging to the office of county treasurer,
certified by said treasurer, shall be deemed prima facie evidence to
prove the issuance of any certificate, the sale of any land or lot for
taxes, the redemption of the same or payment of taxes thereon. The
county treasurer shall, at the expiration of his or her term of office,
pay over to his or her successor in office all moneys in his or her
hands received for redemption from sale for taxes on real property.

Sec. 377 RCW 84.64.180 and 1961 c 15 s 84.64.180 are each amended
to read as follows:
Deeds executed by the county treasurer, as aforesaid, shall be
prima facie evidence in all controversies and suits in relation to the
right of the purchaser, his or her heirs and assigns, to the real
property thereby conveyed of the following facts: First, that the real
property conveyed was subject to taxation at the time the same was
assessed, and had been listed and assessed in the time and manner
required by law; second, that the taxes were not paid at any time
before the issuance of deed; third, that the real property conveyed had
not been redeemed from the sale at the date of the deed; fourth, that
the real property was sold for taxes, interest, and costs, as stated in
the deed; fifth, that the grantee in the deed was the purchaser, or
assignee of the purchaser; sixth, that the sale was conducted in the
manner required by law. And any judgment for the deed to real property
sold for delinquent taxes rendered after January 9, 1926, except as
otherwise provided in this section, shall estop all parties from
raising any objections thereto, or to a tax title based thereon, which
existed at or before the rendition of such judgment, and could have
been presented as a defense to the application for such judgment in the
court wherein the same was rendered, and as to all such questions the
judgment itself shall be conclusive evidence of its regularity and
validity in all collateral proceedings, except in cases where the tax
has been paid, or the real property was not liable to the tax.

Sec. 378 RCW 84.68.110 and 1961 c 15 s 84.68.110 are each amended
to read as follows:
Whenever a taxpayer believes or has reason to believe that, through
error in description, double assessments, or manifest errors in
assessment which do not involve a revaluation of the property, he or
she has been erroneously assessed or that a tax has been incorrectly
extended against him or her upon the tax rolls, and the tax based upon
such erroneous assessment or incorrect extension has been paid, such
taxpayer may initiate a proceeding for the cancellation or reduction of
the assessment of his or her property and the tax based thereon or for
correction of the error in extending the tax on the tax rolls, and for
the refund of the claimed erroneous tax or excessive portion thereof,
by filing a petition therefor with the county assessor of the county in
which the property is or was located or taxed, which petition shall
legally describe the property, show the assessed valuation and tax
placed against the property for the year or years in question and the
taxpayer's reasons for believing that there was an error in the
assessment within the meaning of RCW 84.68.110 through 84.68.150, or in
extending the tax upon the tax rolls and set forth the sum to which the
taxpayer desires to have the assessment reduced or the extended tax
corrected.

Sec. 379 RCW 84.68.120 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 208 are each
amended to read as follows:
Upon the filing of the petition with the county assessor that
officer shall proceed forthwith to conduct such investigation as may be
necessary to ascertain and determine whether or not the assessment in
question was erroneous or whether or not the tax was incorrectly
extended upon the tax rolls and if he or she finds there is probable
cause to believe that the property was erroneously assessed, and that
such erroneous assessment was due to an error in description, double
assessment, or manifest error in assessment which does not involve a
revaluation of the property, or that the tax was incorrectly extended
upon the tax rolls, he or she shall endorse his or her findings upon
the petition, and thereupon within ten days after the filing of the
petition by the taxpayer forward the same to the county treasurer. If
the assessor's findings be in favor of cancellation or reduction or
correction he or she shall include therein a statement of the amount to
which he or she recommends that the assessment and tax be reduced. It
shall be the duty of the county treasurer, upon whom a petition with
endorsed findings is served, as in RCW 84.68.110 through 84.68.150
provided, to endorse thereon a statement whether or not the tax against
which complaint is made has in fact been paid and, if paid, the amount
thereof, whereupon the county treasurer shall immediately transmit the
petition to the prosecuting attorney and the prosecuting attorney shall
make such investigation as he or she deems necessary and, within ten
days after receipt of the petition and findings by him or her, transmit
the same to the state department of revenue with his or her
recommendation in respect to the granting or denial of the petition.

Sec. 380 RCW 84.68.150 and 1961 c 15 s 84.68.150 are each amended
to read as follows:
No petition for cancellation or reduction of assessment or
correction of tax rolls and the refund of taxes based thereon under RCW
84.68.110 through 84.68.150 shall be considered unless filed within
three years after the year in which the tax became payable or purported
to become payable. The maximum refund under the authority of RCW
84.68.110 through 84.68.150 for each year involved in the taxpayer's
petition shall be two hundred dollars. Should the amount of excess tax
for any such year be in excess of two hundred dollars, a refund of two
hundred dollars shall be allowed under RCW 84.68.110 through 84.68.150,
without prejudice to the right of the taxpayer to proceed as may be
otherwise provided by law to recover the balance of the excess tax paid
by him or her.

Sec. 381 RCW 84.69.090 and 1961 c 15 s 84.69.090 are each amended
to read as follows:
The payment of refunds shall be made payable, at the election of
the appropriate treasurer, to the taxpayer, his or her guardian,
executor, or administrator or the owner of record of the property
taxed, his or her guardian, executor, or administrator.

Sec. 382 RCW 85.05.076 and 1915 c 153 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person deeming himself or herself aggrieved by the assessment
for benefits made against any lot or parcel of land owned by him or
her, may appeal therefrom to the superior court for the county in which
the diking district is situated; such appeal shall be taken within the
time and substantially in the manner prescribed by the laws of this
state for appeals from justices' courts and all notices of appeal shall
be filed with the said board, and the board of diking commissioners
shall at the appellant's expense certify to the superior court so much
of the record as appellant may request, and the hearing in said
superior court shall be de novo, and the superior court shall have
power and authority to reverse or modify the determination of the
commissioners and to certify the result of its determination to the
county auditor and shall have full power and authority to do anything
in the premises necessary to adjust the assessment upon the lots or
parcels of land involved in the appeal in accordance with the benefits.

Sec. 383 RCW 85.05.100 and 1895 c 117 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the preparation of the facts and data to be inserted in said
petition and filed therewith for the purpose of presenting the matter
to the said superior court, the board of commissioners of said diking
district may employ one or more good and competent surveyors and
((draughtsmen)) drafters to assist them in compiling data required to
be presented to the court with said petition as hereinbefore provided,
and such legal assistance as may be necessary, with full power to bind
said district for the compensation of such assistants or employees
employed by them, and such services shall be taxed as costs in the
suit.

Sec. 384 RCW 85.05.120 and 1895 c 117 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any or all of said defendants may appear jointly or separately, and
admit or deny the allegations of said petition, and plead any
affirmative matter in defense thereof, at the time and place appointed
for hearing said petition, or to which the same may have been
adjourned. If the court or judge thereof shall have satisfactory proof
that all of the defendants in said action have been duly served with
said summons, as above provided, and shall be further satisfied by
competent proof that said improvement is practicable, and conducive to
the public health, welfare, and convenience, and will increase the
value of said lands for the purpose of public revenue, and that the
contemplated use for which the land, real estate, premises, or other
property sought to be appropriated is really a public use, and that the
land, real estate, premises, or other property sought to be
appropriated are required and necessary for the establishment of said
improvement, the court or judge thereof shall cause a jury of twelve
qualified persons to be impaneled to assess the damages and benefits as
herein provided, if in attendance upon his or her court; and if not, he
or she may, if satisfied that the public interests require the
immediate construction of said improvement, direct the sheriff of his
or her county to summon from the citizens of the county in which said
petition is filed as many qualified persons as may be necessary in
order to form a jury of twelve persons, unless the parties to the
proceedings consent to a less number, such number to be not less than
three, and such consent shall be entered by the clerk in the minutes of
the trial. If necessary to complete the jury in any case, the sheriff,
under direction of the court or judge thereof, shall summon as many
qualified persons as may be required to complete the jury from the
citizens of the county in which the petition is filed. In case a
special jury is summoned, the cost thereof shall be taxed as part of
the costs in the proceeding, and paid by the district seeking to
appropriate said land, the same as other costs in the case; and no
person shall be competent as a juror who is a resident of, or landowner
in, the district seeking to appropriate said land. The jurors at such
trial shall make in each case a separate assessment of damages which
shall result to any person, corporation or company, or to the state, by
reason of the appropriation and use of such land, real estate,
premises, or other property for said improvement, and shall ascertain,
determine, and award the amount of damages to be paid to said owner or
owners, respectively, and to all tenants, incumbrancers, and others
interested, for the taking or injuriously affecting such land, real
estate, premises, or other property for the establishment of said
improvement; and shall further find the maximum amount of benefits, per
acre, to be derived by each of the landowners from the construction of
said improvement. And upon a return of the verdict into court, the
same shall be recorded as in other cases; whereupon a decree shall be
entered in accordance with the verdict so rendered, setting forth all
the facts found by the jury, and decreeing that said right-of-way be
appropriated, and directing the commissioners of said diking district
to draw their warrant on the county treasurer for the amount awarded by
the jury to each person, for damages sustained by reason of the
establishment of said improvement, payable out of the funds of said
diking district.

Sec. 385 RCW 85.05.130 and 1971 c 81 s 157 are each amended to
read as follows:
If at any time it shall appear to the board of diking commissioners
that any lands within or without said district as originally
established are being benefited by the diking system of said district
and that said lands are not being assessed for the benefits received,
or that any lands within said district are being assessed out of or not
in proportion to the benefits which said lands are receiving from the
maintenance of the diking system of said district, and said board of
diking commissioners shall determine that certain lands, either within
or without the boundaries of the district as originally established,
should be assessed for the purpose of raising funds for the future
maintenance of the diking system of the district, or that the
assessments on land already assessed should be equalized by diminishing
or increasing the same so that said lands shall be assessed in
proportion to the benefits received, said commissioners shall file a
petition in the superior court in the original cause, setting forth the
facts, describing the lands not previously assessed and the lands the
assessments on which should be equalized, stating the estimated amount
of benefits per acre being received by each tract of land respectively,
giving the name of the owner or reputed owner of each such tract of
land, and praying that such original cause be opened for further
proceedings for the purpose of subjecting new lands to assessment or
equalizing the assessments upon lands already assessed, or both.
Upon the filing of such petition, summons shall issue thereon and
be served on the owners of all lands affected, in the same manner as
summons is issued and served in original proceedings, as near as may
be, and if such new lands lie within the boundaries of any other diking
district, said summons shall also be served upon the commissioners of
such other diking district.
In case any of the new lands sought to be assessed in said
proceeding lie within the boundaries of any other diking district, and
the diking commissioners of such other district believe that the
maintenance of the dike or dikes of such other district is benefiting
lands within the district instituting the proceedings, said diking
commissioners of such other districts shall intervene in such
proceedings by petition, setting forth the facts, describing the lands
in the district instituting the proceeding which they believe are being
benefited by the maintenance of the diking system of their district,
and praying that the benefits to such lands may be determined and such
lands subjected to assessment for the further maintenance of the diking
system of their district, to the end that all questions of benefits to
lands in the respective districts may be settled and determined in one
proceeding, and such petitioners in intervention shall cause summons to
be issued upon such petition in intervention and served upon the
commissioners of the diking district instituting the proceeding and
upon the owners of all lands sought to be affected by such petition in
intervention.
In case the owner of any such new lands sought to be assessed in
said proceedings shall be maintaining a private dike against salt or
freshwater for the benefit of said lands, and shall believe that the
maintenance of such private dike is benefiting any lands within or
without the district instituting the proceedings, or in case any such
new lands sought to be assessed are included within the boundaries of
some other diking district and are being assessed for the maintenance
of the dikes of such other district, and the owner of such lands
believes that the maintenance of the dike or dikes of such other
district is benefiting lands included within the district instituting
said proceedings, such owner or owners may by answer and cross-petition
set forth the facts and pray that at the hearing upon said petition and
cross-petition the benefits accruing from the maintenance of the
respective dikes may be considered, to the end that a fair and
equitable adjustment of the benefits being received by any lands from
the maintenance of the various dikes benefiting the same, may be
determined for the purpose of fixing the assessments for the future
maintenance of such dikes, and may interplead in said proceeding such
other diking district in which his or her lands sought to be assessed
in said proceeding are being assessed for the maintenance of the dike
or dikes of such other district.
No answer to any petition or petition in intervention shall be
required, unless the party served with summons desires to offset
benefits or to ask other affirmative relief, and no default judgment
shall be taken for failure to answer any petition or petition in
intervention, but the petitioners or petitioners in intervention shall
be required to establish the facts alleged by competent evidence.
Upon the issues being made up, or upon the lapse of time within
which the parties served are required to appear by any summons, the
court shall impanel a jury to hear and determine the matters in issue,
and the jury shall determine and assess the benefits, if any, which the
respective tracts of land are receiving or will receive from the
maintenance of the dike or dikes to be maintained, taking into
consideration any and all matters relating to the benefits, if any,
received or to be received from any dike, structure, or improvement,
and to credit, or charge, as the case may be, to each tract so situated
as to affect any other tract or tracts, or having improvements or
structures thereon or easements granted in connection therewith
affecting any other tract or tracts included in such proceedings and
shall specify in their verdict the respective amount of benefits per
acre, if any, assessed to each particular tract of land, by legal
subdivisions. Upon the return of the verdict of the jury, the court
shall enter its judgment in accordance therewith, as supplemental to
the original decree, or in case a petition in intervention be filed by
the diking commissioners of some other district than that instituting
the proceeding, such judgment to be supplemental to all such original
decrees, and thereafter, all assessments and levies for the future
maintenance of any dike or dikes described in said judgment shall be
based upon the respective benefits determined and assessed against the
respective tracts of land as specified in said judgment. Every person
or corporation feeling himself or herself or itself aggrieved by any
such judgment may appeal to the supreme court or the court of appeals
within thirty days after the entry thereof, and such appeal shall bring
before the supreme court or the court of appeals the propriety and
justness of the verdicts of the jury in respect to the parties to the
appeal. No bonds shall be allowed on such appeals. Nothing in this
section contained shall be construed as affecting the right of diking
districts to consolidation in any manner provided by law.

Sec. 386 RCW 85.05.150 and 1895 c 117 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person or corporation claiming to be entitled to any money
ordered paid by the court, as provided in this act, may apply to the
court therefor, and upon furnishing evidence satisfactory to the court
that he or she is entitled to the same, the court shall make an order
directing the payment to such claimant of the portion of such money as
he or she or it may be found entitled to; but if, upon application, the
court or judge thereof shall decide that the title to the land, real
estate, or premises specified in the application of such claimant is in
such condition as to require that an action be commenced to determine
the title of claimants thereto, it shall refuse such order until such
action is commenced and the conflicting claims to such land, real
estate, or premises be determined according to law.

Sec. 387 RCW 85.05.160 and 1895 c 117 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the entry of the judgment upon the verdict of the jury, the
clerk of said court shall immediately prepare a transcript, which shall
contain a list of the names of all the persons and corporations
benefited by said improvement and the amount of benefit derived by
each, respectively, and shall duly certify the same, together with a
list of the lands benefited by said improvement belonging to each
person or corporation, and shall file the same with the auditor of the
county, who shall immediately enter the same upon the tax rolls of his
or her office, as provided by law for the entry of other taxes, against
the land of each of the said persons named in said list, together with
the amounts thereof, and the same shall be subject to the same interest
and penalties in case of delinquency as in case of general taxes, and
shall be collected in the same manner as other taxes and subject to the
same right of redemption and the lands sold for the collection of said
taxes shall be subject to the same right of redemption as in the sale
of lands for general taxes: PROVIDED, That said assessment shall not
become due and payable except at such time or times and in such amount
as may be designated by the board of commissioners of said dike
district, which designation shall be made to the county auditor by said
board of commissioners of said diking district, by serving a written
notice upon the county auditor designating the time and the amount of
the assessment, said assessment to be in proportion to benefits, to
become due and payable, which amount shall fall due at the time of the
falling due of general taxes, and the amount so designated shall be
added by the auditor to the general taxes of said person, persons, or
corporations, according to said notice, upon the assessment rolls in
his or her said office, and collected therewith: AND PROVIDED FURTHER,
That no one call for assessments by said commissioners shall be in an
amount to exceed twenty-five percent of the actual amount necessary to
pay the costs of the proceedings, and the establishment of said
district and system of dikes and the cost of construction of said work.

Sec. 388 RCW 85.05.180 and 1895 c 117 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
After the filing of said certificate said commissioners of such
diking district shall proceed at once in the construction of said
improvements, and in carrying on said construction or any extension
thereof they shall have full charge and management thereof, and shall
have the power to employ such assistance as they may deem necessary,
and purchase all material that may be necessary in the construction and
carrying on of the work of said improvement, and shall have power to
let the whole or any portion of said work to any responsible
contractor, and shall in such case enter into all necessary agreements
with such contractor that may be necessary in the premises: PROVIDED,
That in case the whole or any portion of said improvement is let to any
contractor, said commissioners shall require such contractor to give a
bond in double the amount of the contract price of the whole or of such
portion of said work covered by such contract, with two or more good
and sufficient sureties to be approved by the board of commissioners of
said diking district and running to said district as obligee therein,
conditioned for the faithful and accurate performance of said contract
by said contractor, his or her executors, administrators, or assigns,
according to the terms and conditions of said agreement, and shall
cause said contractor to enter into a further and additional bond in
the same amount, with two or more good and sufficient sureties to be
approved by said board of commissioners of said diking district in the
name of said district as obligee therein, conditioned that said
contractor, his or her executors, administrators, or assigns, or
subcontractor, his or her executors, administrators, or assigns, shall
perform the whole or any portion of said work under contract of said
original contractor; shall pay or cause to be paid all just claims of
all persons performing labor or rendering services in the construction
of said work, or furnishing materials, merchandise, or provisions of
any kind or character used by said contractor or subcontractor, or any
employee thereof in the construction of said improvement: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That no sureties on said last mentioned bond shall be liable
thereon unless the persons or corporations performing said labor and
furnishing said materials, goods, wares, merchandise, and provisions,
shall, within ninety days after the completion of such improvement,
file their claim, duly verified, that the amount is just and due and
remains unpaid, with the commissioners of said diking district.

Sec. 389 RCW 85.06.100 and 1895 c 115 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the preparation of the facts and data to be inserted in said
petition and filed therewith for the purpose of presenting the matter
to the superior court, the board of commissioners of said drainage
district may employ one or more good and competent surveyors and
((draughtsmen)) drafters to assist them in compiling data required to
be presented to the court with said petition, as hereinbefore provided,
and such legal assistance as may be necessary, with full power to bind
said district for the compensation of such assistants or employees
employed by them, and such services shall be taxed as costs in the
suit.

Sec. 390 RCW 85.06.120 and 1909 c 143 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any or all of said defendants may appear jointly or separately and
admit or deny the allegations of said petition and plead any
affirmative matter in defense thereof at the time and place appointed
for hearing said petition, or to which the same may have been
adjourned. If the court or judge thereof shall have satisfactory proof
that all of the defendants in said action have been duly served with
said summons, as above provided, and shall be further satisfied by
competent proof that said improvement is practicable and conducive to
the public health, welfare, and convenience, and will increase the
value of said lands for the purpose of public revenue, and that the
contemplated use for which the land, real estate, premises, or other
property sought to be appropriated is really a public use, and that the
land, real estate, premises, or other property sought to be
appropriated are required and necessary for the establishment of said
improvement, and that said improvement has a good and sufficient
outlet, the court or judge thereof shall cause a jury of twelve
qualified persons to be impaneled to assess the damages and benefits,
as herein provided, if in attendance upon his or her court; and if not
he or she may, if satisfied that the public interests require the
immediate construction of said improvement, direct the sheriff of his
or her county to summons from the citizens of the county in which
petition is filed as many qualified persons as may be necessary in
order to form a jury of twelve persons, unless the parties to the
proceedings consent to a less number, such number to be not less than
three, and such consent shall be entered by the clerk in the minutes of
the trial. If necessary, to complete the jury in any case, the
sheriff, under the directions of the court or the judge thereof shall
summon as many qualified persons as may be required to complete the
jury from the citizens of the county in which the petition is filed.
In case a special jury is summoned the cost thereof shall be taxed as
part of the cost in the proceedings and paid by the district seeking to
appropriate said land, the same as other costs in the case; and no
person shall be competent as a juror who is a resident of, or landowner
in, the district seeking to appropriate said land. The jurors at such
trial shall make in each case a separate assessment of damages which
shall result to any person, corporation, or company, or to the state,
by reason of the appropriation and use of such land, real estate,
premises, or other property for said improvements and shall ascertain,
determine and award the amount of damages to be paid to said owner or
owners, respectively, and to all tenants, incumbrancers, and others
interested, for the taking or injuriously affecting such land, real
estate, premises, or other property for the establishment of said
improvement; and shall further find a maximum amount of benefits per
acre to be derived by each of the landowners, and also the maximum
amount of benefits resulting to any municipality, public highway,
corporate road, or district from construction of said improvement. And
upon a return of the verdict into court the same shall be reported as
in other cases; whereupon, a decree shall be entered in accordance with
the verdict so rendered setting forth all the facts found by the jury,
and decreeing that said right-of-way be appropriated, and directing the
commissioners of said drainage district to draw their warrant on the
county treasurer for the amount awarded by the jury to each person for
damages sustained by reason of the establishment of said improvement,
payable out of the funds of said drainage district.

Sec. 391 RCW 85.06.130 and 1971 c 81 s 159 are each amended to
read as follows:
If at any time it shall appear to the board of drainage
commissioners that any lands within or without said district as
originally established are being benefited by the drainage system of
said district and that said lands are not being assessed for the
benefits received, or if after the construction of any drainage system,
it appears that lands embraced therein have in fact received or are
receiving benefits different from those found in the original
proceedings, and which could not reasonably have been foreseen before
the final completion of the improvement, or that any lands within said
district are being assessed out of or not in proportion to the benefits
which said lands are receiving from the maintenance of the drainage
system of said district, and said board of drainage commissioners shall
determine that certain lands, either within or without the boundaries
of the district as originally established, should be assessed for the
purpose of raising funds for the future maintenance of the drainage
system of the district, or that the assessments on land already
assessed should be equalized by diminishing or increasing the same so
that said lands shall be assessed in proportion to the benefits
received, said commissioners shall file a petition in the superior
court in the original cause, setting forth the facts, describing the
lands not previously assessed and the lands the assessment on which
should be equalized, stating the estimated amount of benefits per acre
being received by each tract of land respectively, giving the name of
the owner or reputed owner of each such tract of land and praying that
such original cause be opened for further proceedings for the purpose
of subjecting new lands to assessments or equalizing the assessments
upon lands already assessed, or both. Upon the filing of such
petition, summons shall issue thereon and be served on the owners of
all lands affected, in the same manner as summons is issued and served
in original proceedings, as near as may be, and if such new lands lie
within the boundaries of any other drainage district, said summons
shall also be served upon the commissioners of such other drainage
district. In case any of the new lands sought to be assessed in said
proceeding lie within the boundaries of any other drainage district,
and the drainage commissioners of such other district believe that the
maintenance of the drain or drains of such other district is benefiting
lands within the district instituting the proceeding, said drainage
commissioners of such other districts shall intervene in such
proceedings by petition, setting forth the facts, describing the lands
in the district instituting the proceeding which they believe are being
benefited by the maintenance of the drainage system of their district,
and praying that the benefits to such lands may be determined and such
lands subjected to assessment for the further maintenance of the
drainage system of their district, to the end that all questions of
benefits to lands in the respective districts may be settled and
determined in one proceeding, and such petitioners in intervention
shall cause summons to be issued upon such petition in intervention and
served upon the commissioners of the drainage district instituting the
proceeding and upon the owners of all lands sought to be affected by
such petition in intervention. In case the owner of any such new lands
sought to be assessed in said proceedings shall be maintaining a
private drain against salt or freshwater for the benefit of said lands,
and shall believe that the maintenance of such private drain is
benefiting any lands within or without the district instituting the
proceedings, or in case any such new lands sought to be assessed are
included within the boundaries of some other drainage district and are
being assessed for the maintenance of the drains of such other
district, and the owner of such lands believes that the maintenance of
the drain or drains of such other district is benefiting lands included
within the district instituting said proceedings, such owner or owners
may by answer and cross-petition set forth the facts and pray that at
the hearing upon said petition and cross-petition the benefits accruing
from the maintenance of the respective drains may be considered, to the
end that a fair and equitable adjustment of the benefits being received
by any lands from the maintenance of the various drains benefiting the
same, may be determined for the purpose of fixing the assessments for
the future maintenance of such drains, and may interplead in said
proceeding such other drainage district in which his or her lands
sought to be assessed in said proceeding are being assessed for the
maintenance of the drain or drains of such other district. No answer
to any petition or petition in intervention shall be required, unless
the party served with summons desires to offset benefits or to ask
other affirmative relief, and no default judgment shall be taken for
failure to answer any petition or petition in intervention, but the
petitioners or petitioners in intervention shall be required to
establish the facts alleged by competent evidence. Upon the issues
being made up, or upon the lapse of time within which the parties
served are required to appear by any summons, the court shall impanel
a jury to hear and determine the matters in issue, and the jury shall
determine and assess the benefits, if any, which the respective tracts
of land are receiving or will receive from the maintenance of the drain
or drains to be maintained, taking into consideration any and all
matters relating to the benefits, if any, received or to be received
from any drain, structure or improvement, and to credit or charge, as
the case may be, to each tract so situated as to affect any other tract
or tracts, or having improvement or structures thereon or easements
granted in connection therewith, affecting any other tract or tracts
included in such proceedings, and shall specify in their verdict the
respective amount of benefits per acre, if any, assessed to each
particular tract of land, by legal subdivisions. Upon the return of
the verdict of the jury, the court shall enter its judgment in
accordance therewith, as supplemental to the original decree, or in
case a petition in intervention be filed by the drainage commissioners
of some other district than that instituting the proceeding, such
judgment to be supplemental to all such original decrees, and
thereafter, all assessments and levies for the cost of construction or
future maintenance of any drain or drains described in said judgment
shall be based upon the respective benefits determined and assessed
against the respective tracts of land as specified in said judgment.
Every person or corporation feeling himself or herself or itself
aggrieved by any such judgment may appeal to the supreme court or the
court of appeals within thirty days after the entry thereof, and such
appeal shall bring before the supreme court or the court of appeals the
propriety and justness of the verdicts of the jury in respect to the
parties to the appeal. No bonds shall be required on such appeals.
Nothing in this section contained shall be construed as affecting the
right of drainage districts to consolidation in any manner provided by
law.

Sec. 392 RCW 85.06.150 and 1895 c 115 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person or corporation claiming to be entitled to any money
ordered paid by the court, as provided in this chapter, may apply to
the court therefor, and upon furnishing evidence satisfactory to the
court that he or she is entitled to the same, the court shall make an
order directing the payment to such claimant of the portion of such
money as he or she or it may be found entitled to; but if, upon
application, the court or judge thereof shall decide that the title to
the land, real estate, or premises specified in the application of such
claimant is in such condition as to require that an action be commenced
to determine the title of claimants thereto, it shall refuse such order
until such action is commenced and the conflicting claims to such land,
real estate, or premises be determined according to law.

Sec. 393 RCW 85.06.160 and 1907 c 242 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the entry of the judgment upon the verdict of the jury, the
clerk of said court shall immediately prepare a transcript, which shall
contain a list of the names of all the persons and corporations
benefited by said improvement and the amount of benefit derived by
each, respectively, and shall duly certify the same, together with a
list of the lands benefited by said improvement belonging to each
person and corporation, and shall file the same with the auditor of the
county, who shall immediately enter the same upon the tax rolls of his
or her office, as provided by law for the entry of other taxes, against
the land of each of the said persons named in said list, together with
the amounts thereof, and the same shall be subject to the same interest
and penalties in case of delinquency as in case of general taxes, and
shall be collected in the same manner as other taxes and subject to the
same right of redemption, and the lands sold for the collection of said
taxes shall be subject to the same right of redemption as the sale of
lands for general taxes: PROVIDED, That said assessments shall not
become due and payable except at such time or times and in such amounts
as may be designated by the board of commissioners of said drainage
district, which designation shall be made to the county auditor by said
board of commissioners of said drainage district, by serving written
notice upon the county auditor designating the time and the amount of
the assessment, said assessment to be in proportion to benefits to
become due and payable, which amount shall fall due at the time of the
falling due of general taxes, and the amount so designated shall be
added by the auditor to the general taxes of said person, persons, or
corporation, according to said notice, upon the assessment rolls in his
or her said office, and collected therewith; PROVIDED FURTHER, That no
one call for assessments by said commissioners shall be in an amount to
exceed twenty-five percent of the amount estimated by the board of
commissioners to be necessary to pay the costs of the proceedings, and
the establishment of said district and drainage system and the cost of
construction of said work; PROVIDED FURTHER, That where the amount
realized from the original assessment and tax shall not prove
sufficient to complete the original plans and specifications of any
drainage system, alterations, extensions, or changes therein, for which
the said original assessment was made, the board of commissioners of
said district shall make such further assessment as may be necessary to
complete said system according to the original plans and
specifications, which assessment shall be made and collected in the
manner provided in this section for the original assessment.

Sec. 394 RCW 85.06.180 and 1895 c 115 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
After the filing of said certificate said commissioners of such
drainage district shall proceed at once in the construction of said
improvement, and in carrying on said construction or any extensions
thereof they shall have full charge and management thereof, and shall
have the power to employ such assistance as they may deem necessary and
purchase all material that may be necessary in the construction and
carrying on of the work of said improvement, and shall have power to
let the whole or any portion of said work to any responsible
contractor, and shall in such case enter into all necessary agreements
with such contractor that may be necessary in the premises: PROVIDED,
That in case the whole or any portion of said improvement is let to any
contractor said commissioners shall require said contractor to give a
bond in double the amount of the contract price of the whole or of such
portion of said work covered by said contract, with two or more
sureties to be approved by the board of commissioners of said drainage
district and running to said district as obligee therein, conditioned
for the faithful and accurate performance of said contract by said
contractor, his or her executors, administrators, or assigns, according
to the terms and conditions of said agreement, and shall cause said
contractor to enter into a further or additional bond in the same
amount, with two or more good and sufficient sureties to be approved by
said board of commissioners of said drainage district in the name of
said district as obligee therein, conditioned that said contractor, his
or her executors, administrators, or assigns, or subcontractor, his or
her executors, administrators, or assigns, performing the whole or any
portion of said work under contract of said original contractor, shall
pay or cause to be paid all just claims for all persons performing
labor or rendering services in the construction of said work, or
furnishing materials, merchandise, or provisions of any kind or
character used by said contractor or subcontractor, or any employee
thereof in the construction of said improvement: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That no sureties on said last mentioned bond shall be liable thereon
unless the persons or corporation performing said labor and furnishing
said materials, goods, wares, merchandise, and provisions, shall,
within ninety days after the completion of said improvement, file their
claim, duly verified; that the amount is just and due and remains
unpaid, with the board of commissioners of said drainage district.

Sec. 395 RCW 85.06.210 and 1895 c 115 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person or corporation owning land within said district shall
have a right to connect any private drains or ditches for the proper
drainage of such land with said system, and in case any persons or
corporations shall desire to drain such lands into said system and
shall find it necessary, in order to do so, to procure the right-of-way
over the land of another, or others, and if consent thereto cannot be
procured from such person or persons, then such landowner may present
in writing a request to the board of commissioners of said district,
setting forth therein the necessity of being able to connect his or her
private drainage with said system, and pray therein that said system be
extended to such point as he or she may designate in said writing, and
immediately thereon said board of commissioners shall cause a petition
to be filed in the superior court, for and in the name of said drainage
district, requesting in said petition that said system be extended as
requested, setting forth therein the necessity thereof and praying that
leave be granted by the board to extend the system in accordance with
the prayer of said petition, and the proceedings in such case, upon the
presentation of such petition and the hearing thereof, shall be, in all
matters, the same as in the hearing and presentation of the original
petition for the establishment of the original system of drainage in
said district, as far as applicable. That the costs in such
proceedings shall be paid from the assessment of benefits to be made on
the lands of the person or persons benefited by such extension, and the
assessment and compensation for the right-of-way, damages and benefits,
and payment of damages and compensation, and the collection of the
assessments for benefits, shall be the same as in the proceedings under
the original petition, and the construction of the said extension shall
be made under the same provisions as the construction of the original
improvement; and all things that may be done or performed in connection
therewith shall be, as near as may be applicable, in accordance with
the provisions already set forth herein for the establishment and
construction of said original improvement: PROVIDED, That such
petitioner or petitioners shall, at the time of filing such petition by
said drainage commissioners, enter into a good and sufficient bond to
said drainage district in the full penal sum of five hundred dollars,
with two or more sureties, to be approved by the court, conditioned for
the payment of all costs in case the prayer of said petition should not
be granted, which bond shall be filed in said cause.

Sec. 396 RCW 85.06.250 and 1985 c 396 s 42 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of commissioners of such district shall elect one of
their number ((chairman)) chair and shall either elect one of their
number, or appoint a voter of the district, as secretary, who shall
keep minutes of all the district's proceedings. The board of
commissioners may issue warrants of such district in payment of all
claims of indebtedness against such district, which shall be in form
and substance the same as county warrants, or as near the same as may
be practicable, and shall draw the legal rate of interest from the date
of their presentation to the treasurer for payment, as hereinafter
provided, and shall be signed by the ((chairman)) chair and attested by
the secretary of said board: PROVIDED, That no warrants shall be
issued by said board of commissioners in payment of any indebtedness of
such district for less than the face or par value.

Sec. 397 RCW 85.06.330 and 1986 c 278 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
All warrants issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be
presented by the owners thereof to the county treasurer, who shall
indorse thereon the day of presentation for payment, with the
additional indorsement thereon, in case of nonpayment, that they are
not paid for want of funds; and no warrant shall draw interest under
the provisions of this chapter until it is so presented and indorsed by
the county treasurer. And it shall be the duty of such treasurer, from
time to time, when he or she has sufficient funds in his or her hands
for that purpose, to advertise in the newspaper doing the county
printing for the presentation to him or her for payment of as many of
the outstanding warrants as he or she may be able to pay: PROVIDED,
That thirty days after the first publication of said notice of the
treasurer calling in any of said outstanding warrants said warrants
shall cease to bear interest, which shall be stated in the notice.
Said notice shall be published two weeks consecutively, and said
warrants shall be called in and paid in the order of their indorsement.

Sec. 398 RCW 85.06.550 and 1903 c 67 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When any drainage district has been or shall be established and
created under the provisions of an act of the legislature of the state
of Washington, entitled "An act to provide for the establishment and
creation of drainage districts, and the construction and maintenance of
a system of drainage, and to provide for the means of payment thereof,
and declaring an emergency", approved March 20, 1895, and when the
drainage commissioners of such district have employed surveyors or
((draughtsmen)) drafters, or legal assistance as provided in RCW
85.06.100, and have incurred expenses for the compensation of such
surveyors, ((draughtsmen)) drafters, and legal assistance, and have
issued to such surveyors, ((draughtsmen)) drafters, or persons
rendering said legal assistance any warrants, orders, vouchers, or
other evidence of indebtedness for said expenses so incurred, and when
such warrants, orders, vouchers, or other evidences of indebtedness
remain outstanding and unpaid, and when from any cause no further
proceedings are had as provided for in said act approved March 20,
1895, within a reasonable time, it shall be the duty of the county
commissioners of the county in which such drainage district is located
to assess in accordance with the provisions of RCW 85.06.550 through
85.06.630, the lands constituting and embraced within such drainage
district for the purpose of paying such outstanding warrants, orders,
vouchers, or other evidences of indebtedness, together with interest
thereon.

Sec. 399 RCW 85.06.560 and 1903 c 67 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county auditor of any county in which such drainage district is
located upon the written request of any holder or owner of any such
warrant, order, voucher, or other evidence of indebtedness, mentioned
in the preceding section, shall forthwith cause to be published in the
newspaper doing the county printing, if any such there be, and if not,
then in some newspaper of general circulation in the county, a notice
directing any and all holders or owners of any such warrants, orders,
vouchers, or other evidences of indebtedness, to present the same to
him or her, at his or her office, for registration within ninety days
from the date of the first publication of such notice; and such notice
shall be published once a week for six consecutive weeks. Said notice
shall be directed to all holders and owners of warrants, orders,
vouchers, or other evidences of indebtedness issued by the drainage
commissioners of the particular district giving its name and number,
and shall designate the character of the warrants, orders, vouchers, or
other evidences of indebtedness, the registration of which is called
for by said notice. Upon the presentation to him or her of such
warrants, orders, vouchers, or other evidences of indebtedness, the
county auditor shall register the same in a separate book to be kept
for that purpose, showing the date of registration, the date of issue,
the purpose of issue when the same is shown upon the face, the name of
the person by whom presented, and the face value thereof. Any such
warrants, orders, vouchers, or other evidences of indebtedness, not
presented within the time prescribed in such notice, shall not share in
the benefits of RCW 85.06.550 through 85.06.630, and no assessment or
reassessment shall thereafter be made for the purpose of paying the
same.

Sec. 400 RCW 85.06.570 and 1903 c 67 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
At any time after the expiration of the time within which warrants,
orders, vouchers, or other evidences of indebtedness, may be registered
as provided in the preceding section, the holder or owner of any such
registered warrant, order, voucher, or other evidence of indebtedness,
may for himself or herself and in behalf of all other holders or owners
of such registered warrants, orders, vouchers, or other evidences of
indebtedness, file a petition in the superior court of the county in
which such drainage district is located praying for an order directing
the publication and posting of the notice hereinafter provided for, and
for a hearing upon said petition, and for an order directing the board
of county commissioners to assess the lands embraced within said
drainage district for the purpose of paying such registered warrants,
orders, vouchers, or other evidences of indebtedness and the costs of
the proceedings provided for in RCW 85.06.550 through 85.06.630. Said
petition shall set forth:
(1) That said drainage district was duly established and created,
giving the time.
(2) The facts in connection with the expenses incurred by the
drainage commissioners in the employment of surveyors, ((draughtsmen))
drafters, or legal assistance and the issuance of such registered
warrants, orders, vouchers, or other evidences of indebtedness.
(3) The facts in connection with the compliance with the provisions
of RCW 85.06.550 through 85.06.630.
(4) A list of such registered warrants, orders, vouchers, or other
evidences of indebtedness showing the names of owners or holders, the
amounts, the date of issuance, the purpose for which issued, when shown
upon the face thereof, and the date of presentation for payment,
respectively.

Sec. 401 RCW 85.06.600 and 1903 c 67 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
At the time and place fixed in said order for the hearing of said
petition, or at such time to which the court may continue said hearing,
the court shall proceed to a hearing upon said petition and upon any
objections or exceptions which have been filed thereto. And upon it
appearing to the satisfaction of the court from the proofs offered in
support thereof that the allegations of said petition are true, the
said court shall ascertain the total amount of said registered
warrants, orders, vouchers, or other evidences of indebtedness with the
accrued interest and the costs of said proceedings, and thereupon the
said court shall enter an order directing the board of county
commissioners to levy a tax upon all the real estate within said
drainage district exclusive of improvements, taking as a basis the last
equalized assessment of said real estate for state and county purposes,
sufficient to pay said outstanding registered warrants, orders,
vouchers, or other evidences of indebtedness with interest as aforesaid
and the costs of said proceeding, and the cost of levying said tax, and
further directing the county auditor to issue a warrant on the county
treasurer to the petitioner for the costs advanced by him or her in
such proceeding, which shall be paid in the same manner as the said
registered warrants, orders, vouchers, or other evidences of
indebtedness.

Sec. 402 RCW 85.06.630 and 1988 c 202 s 74 are each amended to
read as follows:
From any final order entered by the said superior court as above
provided for, any party to said proceeding feeling himself or herself
aggrieved thereby may seek appellate review, as provided by the general
appeal law of this state.

Sec. 403 RCW 85.06.750 and 1988 c 202 s 76 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the return of the verdict of the jury as provided in the
preceding section, if it shall appear to the court that the total
benefits found by the jury to have accrued to the lands of the district
is equal to or exceeds the actual cost of the improvement including the
increased cost of completing the same, the court shall enter its
judgment in accordance therewith, as supplemental to and in lieu of the
original decree fixing the benefits to the respective tracts of land,
and thereafter the assessment and levy for the original cost of the
construction of the improvement, including the indebtedness incurred
for completing the improvement together with interest at the legal rate
on the warrants issued therefor, and all assessments and levies if any,
for the future maintenance of the drainage system described in the
judgment shall be based upon the respective benefits determined and
assessed against the respective tracts of land as specified in the
judgment. Every person or corporation feeling himself or herself or
itself aggrieved by any such judgment may seek appellate review within
thirty days after the entry thereof, and such review shall bring before
the appellate court the propriety and justness of the verdict of the
jury in respect to the parties to the proceeding.

Sec. 404 RCW 85.07.070 and 1983 c 167 s 190 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Said bonds shall be numbered consecutively from one upwards and
shall be in denominations of not less than one hundred dollars nor more
than one thousand dollars each. They shall bear the date of issue,
shall be made payable in not more than ten years from the date of their
issue, and shall bear interest at a rate or rates as authorized by the
board of commissioners, payable annually. The bonds may be in any
form, including bearer bonds or registered bonds as provided in RCW
39.46.030. The bonds and any coupon shall be signed by the
((chairman)) chair of the board of commissioners of each district and
shall be attested by the secretary of said board. The seal, if any, of
such district shall be affixed to each bond, but it need not be affixed
to any coupon.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may
be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Sec. 405 RCW 85.07.090 and 1935 c 103 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
All outstanding warrants of such district so sought to be redeemed
shall become due and payable immediately upon receipt by the county
treasurer of the money from the sale of said bonds; and upon a call of
such outstanding warrants or obligations issued by him or her, the same
shall cease to draw interest at the end of thirty days after the date
of the first publication of such call. The call shall be made by the
treasurer by publishing notice thereof for two consecutive weeks in the
county paper authorized to do the county printing. The notice shall
designate the number of each warrant sought to be redeemed.

Sec. 406 RCW 85.07.120 and 1935 c 103 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty of the county treasurer of each county in
which there may be a district issuing bonds under the provisions of RCW
85.07.060 through 85.07.120, whenever he or she has on hand one
thousand dollars over and above interest requirements in the special
fund for the payment of said bonds and interest, to advertise in the
newspaper doing the county printing, for the presentation to him or her
for payment of as many of the bonds issued under the provisions of RCW
85.07.060 through 85.07.120 as he or she may be able to pay with the
funds in his or her hands. The bonds shall be redeemed and paid in
their numerical order, beginning with bond No. 1 and continuing until
all of said bonds are paid. The treasurer's call for presentation and
redemption of such bonds shall state the number of the bond or bonds so
called. Thirty days after the first publication of said notice of the
treasurer calling any of said bonds by their numbers, such bonds shall
cease to bear interest, and the notice of call shall so state. If any
bond so called is not presented, the treasurer shall hold in said fund
until presentation of such bond is made, the amount of money sufficient
to redeem the same with interest thereon to the date interest was
terminated by such call.

Sec. 407 RCW 85.07.140 and 1935 c 102 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the court is satisfied that the status of said property has
changed so that it is no longer susceptible to benefit from the
improvement of such district and should be removed from the assessment
roll thereof, and it be established that all benefits assessed against
said lands up to the date of trial have been paid, such court may enter
a decree striking such land from the assessment roll of said district,
and it shall not be subject to future assessment for benefits or
maintenance by such district, unless, thereafter, it is again brought
into such districts by the proceedings provided by law to extend the
district or include benefited property which is not assessed. Nothing
herein shall prevent such property from being again brought into said
district in the manner provided by law generally for the inclusion of
benefited property, if it appear at a future date that said property
will receive benefits from the improvement in such district. Upon
entry of such decree of the court a certified copy thereof shall be
filed in the office of the auditor of such county wherein the property
is situated, and upon receipt thereof, he or she shall correct the
assessment roll of said district accordingly and strike the property
therefrom.

Sec. 408 RCW 85.08.340 and 1917 c 130 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever in the progress of the construction of the system of
improvement it shall become necessary to construct a portion of such
system across any public or other road or public utility, the board of
supervisors, or in case the work is being done by contract the board of
county commissioners, shall serve notice in writing upon the public
officers, corporation, or person having charge of, or controlling or
owning such road or public utility, as the case may be, of the present
necessity of such crossing, giving the location, kind, dimensions, and
requirement thereof, for the purpose of the system of improvement, and
stating a reasonable time, to be fixed by the county engineer, within
which plans for such crossing must be filed for approval in case the
public officers, corporation, or person controlling or owning such road
or public utility desire to construct such crossing. As soon as
convenient, within the time fixed in the notice, the public officers,
corporation, or person shall, if they desire to construct such
crossing, prepare and submit to the county engineer for approval
duplicate detailed plans and specifications for such crossing. Upon
submission of such plans, the county engineer shall examine and may
modify the same to meet the requirements of the system of improvement,
and when such plans or modified plans are satisfactory to the county
engineer, he or she shall approve the same and return one thereof to
the public officers, corporation, or person submitting the same, and
file the duplicate in his or her office, and shall notify such public
officers, corporation, or person of the time within which said crossing
must be constructed. Upon the return of such approved plans, the
public officers, corporation, or person controlling such road or public
utility shall, within the time fixed by the county engineer, construct
such crossing in accordance with the approved plans, and shall
thereafter maintain the same. In case such public officers,
corporation, or person controlling or owning such road or public
utility shall fail to file plans for such crossing within the time
prescribed in the notice, the board of supervisors or of county
commissioners, as the case may be, shall proceed with the construction
of such crossing in such manner as will cause no unnecessary injury to
or interference with such road or public utility. The cost of
construction and maintenance of only such crossings or such portion of
such cost as would not have been necessary but for the construction of
the system of improvement shall be a proper charge against the
improvement district, and only so much of such cost as the board of
county commissioners shall deem reasonable shall be allowed as a charge
against the district in the case of crossings constructed by others
than the district. The amount of costs of construction allowed as a
charge against the district by the board of county commissioners shall
be credited on the assessments against the property on which the
crossing is constructed, and any excess over such assessment shall be
paid out of the funds of the district.

Sec. 409 RCW 85.08.360 and 1917 c 130 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the improvement is fully completed and accepted by the county
engineer, the clerk of the board shall compile and file with the board
of county commissioners an itemized statement of the total cost of
construction, including engineering and election expenses, the cost of
publishing and posting notices, damages, and costs allowed or awarded
for property taken or damaged, including compensation of attorneys,
including the costs of crossings constructed by the district and the
cost of crossings constructed by others and allowed by the board of
county commissioners, and including the sum paid or to be paid to the
United States, and the discount, if any, on the bonds and warrants sold
and including all other costs and expenses, including fees, per diem,
and necessary expenses of nonsalaried officers incurred in connection
with the improvement, together with interest on such costs and expenses
from the time when incurred at the rate of interest borne by the
warrants issued for the cost of construction. There shall also be
included in said statement, in case the county engineer is a salaried
officer, a statement of the services performed by him or her in
connection with said improvement at a per diem of five dollars per day
and his or her necessary expenses, and a reasonable sum to be fixed by
the board of county commissioners on account of the services rendered
by the prosecuting attorney. Upon the filing of such statement of
costs and expenses the board of county commissioners shall revise and
correct the same if necessary and add thereto a reasonable sum which
shall be not less than five percent nor more than ten percent of the
total thereof in drainage improvement districts, and not less than ten
percent nor more than fifteen percent of the total thereof in diking
improvement districts, to cover possible errors in the statement or the
apportionment hereinafter provided for, and the cost of such
apportionment and other subsequent expenses, and interest on the costs
of construction from the date of the statement until fifty days after
the filing of the assessment roll with the treasurer; and unless the
same have been previously appointed, shall appoint a board of
appraisers consisting of the county engineer and two other competent
persons, to apportion the grand total as contained in said statement as
hereinafter provided. Each member of said board of appraisers shall
take, subscribe, and file with the board of county commissioners an
oath to faithfully and impartially perform his or her duties to the
best of his or her ability in making said apportionment, and said board
of appraisers shall proceed to carefully examine the system and the
public and private property within the district and fairly, justly, and
equitably apportion the grand total cost of the improvement against the
property and the county or counties, cities, and towns within the
district, in proportion to the benefits accruing thereto.

Sec. 410 RCW 85.08.400 and 1984 c 7 s 377 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the filing of the schedule of apportionment, the county
legislative authority shall fix the time and place for a hearing
thereon, which time shall be not more than sixty days from the date of
the filing of the schedule. Notice of the hearing shall be given in
the manner provided for giving notice of a hearing in RCW 85.08.150.
The notice shall fix the time and place of the hearing on the roll, and
shall state that the schedule of apportionment showing the amount of
the cost of the improvement apportioned to each county, city, town, and
piece of property benefited by the improvement is on file in the office
of the county legislative authority and is open to public inspection,
and shall notify all persons who may desire to object thereto that they
may make their objections in writing and file them with the clerk of
the county legislative authority at or before the date fixed for the
hearing. The notice shall also state that at the time and place fixed
and at such other times and places as the hearing may be continued to,
the county legislative authority will sit as a board of equalization
for the purpose of considering the schedule and at the hearing or
hearings will also consider any objections made thereto, or any part
thereof, and will correct, revise, raise, lower, change, or modify the
schedule or any part thereof, or set aside the schedule and order that
the apportionment be made de novo as to such body shall appear just and
equitable, and that at the hearing the board will confirm the schedule
as finally approved by them and will levy an assessment against the
property described thereon for the amounts as fixed by them. The
county legislative authority shall serve by mail, at least ten days
before the hearing, upon the commissioner of public lands of the state
of Washington a like notice, in duplicate, showing the amount of the
cost of the improvements apportioned against all state, school,
granted, or other lands owned by the state of Washington in the
district. The county legislative authority shall serve a like notice
upon the state secretary of transportation showing the amount
apportioned against any state primary or secondary highways. Upon
receipt of the notice the commissioner of public lands or the secretary
of transportation, as the case may be, shall endorse thereon a
statement either that he or she elects to accept or that he or she
elects to contest the apportionment, and shall return the notice, so
endorsed, to the county legislative authority. At or before the
hearing any person interested may file with the clerk of the county
legislative authority written objections to any item or items of the
apportionment.

Sec. 411 RCW 85.08.410 and 1983 c 3 s 230 are each amended to
read as follows:
At such hearing, which may be adjourned from time to time and from
place to place, until finally completed, the board of county
commissioners shall carefully examine and consider said schedule and
any objections filed or made thereto and shall correct, revise, raise,
lower, change, or modify such schedule or any part thereof, or strike
therefrom any property not benefited, or set aside such schedule and
order that such apportionment be made de novo, as to such body shall
appear equitable and just. The board shall cause the clerk of the
board to enter on such schedule all such additions, cancellations,
changes, modifications, and reapportionments, all credits for damages
allowed or awarded to the owner of any piece of property benefited, but
not paid, as provided in RCW 85.08.200; also a credit in favor of the
county on any apportionment against the county, of all sums paid on
account of said improvement, as provided in RCW 85.08.210; and all sums
allowed the county on account of services rendered by the county
engineer or prosecuting attorney, as provided in RCW 85.08.360; and all
credits allowed to property owners constructing crossings as provided
in RCW 85.08.340. When the board of county commissioners shall have
finally determined that the apportionment as filed or as changed and
modified by the board is a fair, just and equitable apportionment, and
that the proper credits have been entered thereon, the members of the
board approving the same shall sign the schedule and cause the clerk of
the board to attest their signature under his or her seal, and shall
enter an order on the journal approving the final apportionment and all
proceedings leading thereto and in connection therewith, and shall levy
the amounts so apportioned against the property benefited, and the
determination by the board of county commissioners in fixing and
approving such apportionment and making such levy shall be final and
conclusive.
The board of county commissioners shall also at said hearing, levy,
in the manner hereinafter provided for the levy of maintenance
assessments, such assessment as they shall deem necessary to provide
funds for the maintenance of the system of improvement until the first
annual assessment for maintenance shall fall due.

Sec. 412 RCW 85.08.420 and 1923 c 46 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the approval of said roll the county auditor shall immediately
prepare a completed assessment roll which shall contain, first, a map
of the district showing each separate description of property assessed;
second, an index of the schedule of apportionments; third, an index of
the record of the proceedings had in connection with the improvement;
fourth, a copy of the resolution of the board of county commissioners
fixing the method of payment of assessments; fifth, the warrant of the
auditor authorizing the county treasurer to collect assessments; and
sixth, the approved schedule of apportionments of assessments; and
shall charge the county treasurer with the total amount of assessment
and turn the roll over to the treasurer, for collection in accordance
with the resolution of the board of county commissioners fixing the
method of payment of assessments. As soon as the assessment roll has
been turned over to the treasurer for collection, he or she shall
publish a notice in the official newspaper of the county for once a
week for at least two consecutive weeks, that the said roll is in his
or her hands for collection and that any assessment thereon or any
portion of any such assessment may be paid at any time on or before a
date stated in such notice, which date shall be thirty days after the
date of the first publication, without interest, and the treasurer
shall accept such payment as in said notice provided. Upon the
expiration of such thirty-day period the county treasurer shall certify
to the county auditor the total amount of assessments so collected by
him or her and the total amount of assessments remaining unpaid upon
said roll.

Sec. 413 RCW 85.08.440 and 1988 c 202 s 77 are each amended to
read as follows:
The decision of the board of county commissioners upon any
objections made within the time and in the manner prescribed in RCW
85.08.400 through 85.08.430, may be reviewed by the superior court upon
an appeal thereto taken in the following manner. Such appeal shall be
made by filing written notice of appeal with the clerk of such board
and with the clerk of the superior court of the county in which such
drainage or diking improvement district is situated, or in case of
joint drainage or diking improvement districts with the clerk of the
court of the county in which the greater length of such drainage or
diking improvement system lies, within ten days after the order
confirming such assessment roll shall have become effective, and such
notice shall describe the property and set forth the objections of such
appellant to such assessment; and, within ten days from the filing of
such notice of appeal with the clerk of the superior court, the
appellant shall file with the clerk of said court a transcript
consisting of the assessment roll and his or her objections thereto,
together with the order confirming such assessment roll, and the record
of the board of county commissioners with reference to said assessment,
which transcript, upon payment of the necessary fees therefor, shall be
furnished by such clerk of the board of county commissioners, and by
him or her certified to contain full, true, and correct copies of all
matters and proceedings required to be included in such transcript.
Such fees shall be the same as the fees payable to the county clerk for
the preparation and certification of transcripts on appeal to the
supreme court or the court of appeals in civil actions. At the time of
the filing of the notice of appeal with the clerk of the superior
court, the appellant shall execute and file with the clerk of the
superior court a sufficient bond in the penal sum of two hundred
dollars, with good and sufficient surety, to be approved by the judge
of said court, conditioned to prosecute such appeal without delay, and
if unsuccessful, to pay all costs to which the county or the drainage
or diking improvement district is put by reason of such appeal. The
court may order the appellant upon application therefor, to execute and
file such additional bond or bonds as the necessity of the case may
require; within three days after such transcript is filed in the
superior court as aforesaid, the appellant shall give written notice to
the prosecuting attorney of the county, and to the clerk of the board
of county commissioners that such transcript is filed. Said notice
shall state a time (not less than three days from the service thereof)
when the appellant will call up the said cause for hearing; and the
superior court of said county shall, at said time or at such further
time as may be fixed by order of the court, hear and determine such
appeal without a jury. The judgment of the court shall confirm,
correct, modify, or annul the assessment insofar as the same affects
the property of the appellant. A certified copy of the decision of the
court shall be filed with the officer who shall have custody of the
assessment roll, and he or she shall modify and correct such assessment
roll in accordance with such decision. Appellate review of the
judgment of the superior court may be sought as in other civil cases.
However, the review must be sought within fifteen days after the date
of the entry of the judgment of such superior court. A certified copy
of the order of the supreme court or the court of appeals upon such
appeal shall be filed with the officer having custody of such
assessment roll, who shall thereupon modify and correct such assessment
roll in accordance with such decision.

Sec. 414 RCW 85.08.490 and 1923 c 46 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purchaser, upon the foreclosure of any certificate of
delinquency for any assessment or installment thereof, shall acquire
title to such property subject to the installments of the assessment
not yet due at the date of the decree of foreclosure, and the
complaint, decree of foreclosure, order of sale, sale, certificate of
sale and deed shall so state.
The holder of any certificate of delinquency for general taxes may,
before commencing any action to foreclose the lien of such certificate,
pay in full all drainage or diking or sewerage improvement district
assessments or any installment thereof due and outstanding against the
whole or any portion of the property included in such certificate of
delinquency and the amount of all assessments so paid together with
interest at ten percent per annum thereon shall be included in the
amount for which foreclosure may be had; or, if he or she elects to
foreclose such certificate without paying such assessments in full, the
purchaser at such foreclosure sale shall acquire title to such property
subject to all such drainage or diking or sewerage improvement district
assessments. Any property in any drainage or diking or sewerage
improvement district sold under foreclosure for general taxes shall
remain subject to the lien of all drainage and diking or sewerage
improvement district assessments or installments thereof not yet due at
the time of the decree of foreclosure and the complaint, decree of
foreclosure, order of sale, sale, certificate of sale and deed shall so
state.

Sec. 415 RCW 85.08.500 and 1923 c 46 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Property subject to a drainage or diking or sewerage improvement
district assessment, acquired by a county pursuant to a foreclosure and
sale for general taxes, when offered for sale by the county, shall be
offered for the amount of the general taxes for which the same was
struck off to the county, together with all drainage or diking or
sewerage improvement district assessments or installments thereof, due
at the time of such resale, including maintenance assessments, and
supplemental assessments levied pursuant to the provisions of RCW
85.08.520, coming due while the property was held in the name of the
county; and the property shall be sold subject to the lien of all
drainage or diking or sewerage improvement district assessments or
installments thereof not yet due at the time of such sale, and the
notice of sale and deed shall so state. PROVIDED, That the county
board may in its discretion, sell said property at a lesser sum than
the amount for which the property is offered in the notice of sale.
The proceeds of such sale shall be applied first to discharge in full
the lien or liens for general taxes for which said property was sold,
and the remainder, or such portion thereof as may be necessary, shall
be applied toward the discharge of all drainage or diking or sewerage
improvement district assessment liens upon such property, and the
surplus, if any, shall be applied toward the payment of any delinquent
or due local assessments or local assessment installments outstanding
against the property levied by any authority other than that of the
county, taking them in the order of their maturities, beginning with
the earliest; after which if any money remains the treasurer shall hold
the same for the person whose interest in the property entitles him or
her thereto. If there be no purchaser, the property shall again be
offered for sale within one year thereafter, and shall be successively
offered for sale each year until a sale thereof be effected.
Property struck off to or bid in by a county may be leased pursuant
to resolution of the county commissioners on such terms as the
commissioners shall determine for a period ending not later than the
time at which such property shall again be offered for sale as required
by law. Rentals received under such lease shall be applied in the
manner hereinabove provided for the proceeds of sale of such property.
All statements of general state taxes where drainage, diking, or
sewer improvement district assessments against the land described
therein are due shall include a notation thereon or be accompanied by
a statement showing such fact.

Sec. 416 RCW 85.08.570 and 1923 c 46 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
When a drainage, diking, or sewerage system is proposed which will
require a location, or the assessment of lands, in more than one
county, application therefor shall be made to the board of county
commissioners in each of said counties, and the county engineers shall
make preliminary reports for their respective counties. The lines of
such proposed improvement shall be examined by the county engineers of
the counties wherein said improvements will lie, jointly. The hearings
in regard to such improvements, provided for by RCW 85.08.150, and
85.08.400 through 85.08.430 shall be had by the boards of county
commissioners of the two counties in joint sessions, and all other
matters required to be done by the county commissioners in regard to
such improvement and the improvement district shall be had and done by
the boards of county commissioners of the counties wherein such system
of improvements shall lie, either in joint session at such place as the
said board shall order, or by concurrent order entered into by the said
boards at their respective offices. Notice of the hearings shall be
given by the auditors of both counties jointly by publication in the
official paper of each of said counties. The county engineer of the
county wherein the greatest length of drainage, diking, or sewerage
system will lie, shall have charge of the engineering work and be ex
officio a member of the boards in this chapter provided for. The
schedule of apportionment shall be prepared in separate parts for the
land in the respective counties; and that part of said roll containing
the assessments upon the lands in each respective county shall be
transmitted to the treasurer thereof, and the treasurer of said county
shall give notice of said assessments as provided in RCW 85.08.400
through 85.08.430, and shall collect the assessments therein contained
and shall also extend and collect the annual maintenance levies of said
district upon the lands of said district lying in his or her county.
The auditor of the county in which the greater length of the drainage,
diking, or sewerage system shall lie shall act as clerk of the joint
session of the boards of county commissioners, and shall issue the
warrants of the improvement district, and shall attest the signatures
of the two boards of county commissioners on the bonds. He or she
shall furnish to the auditor of the other county duplicate copies of
the records of proceedings of such joint sessions. Duplicate records
of all proceedings had and papers filed in connection with such
improvements shall be kept, one with the auditor of each county.
Protests or other papers filed with the auditor who is not clerk of the
joint sessions shall be forwarded forthwith by him or her to the
auditor who acts as clerk of such joint sessions. The treasurer of
said county shall register and certify and pay the warrants and the
bonds, and shall have charge of the funds of the district; and to him
or her, the treasurer of the county in which the lesser portion of such
system of improvements lie, shall remit semiannually, in time for the
semiannual warrant and bond calls, all such collections made in such
other county. A drainage, diking, or sewerage improvement district
lying in more than one county shall be designated "joint drainage (or
diking) or sewerage improvement district No. . . . . of . . . . . . and
. . . . . . counties." All proceedings in regard to joint drainage,
diking improvement districts, which have heretofore been had and done
substantially in accordance with the amendatory provisions of this
chapter are hereby approved and declared to be valid.

Sec. 417 RCW 85.08.820 and 1988 c 127 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the department of ecology shall have purchased and the
state of Washington owns the entire issue of any series of bonds of any
county in the state, the payment of which is to be made from and is
secured by assessments upon the property included within any drainage
improvement district organized and existing in such county, and it
shall appear to the satisfaction of the director of ecology that owing
to and by reason of the nature of the soil within and the topography of
such drainage improvement district the lands contained therein were not
or will not be drained sufficiently to permit the cultivation thereof
within the time when assessments for the payment of the interest on
said bonds and to constitute a sinking fund to retire said bonds as
provided by law became or will become due, and that by reason thereof
the owners of said lands were or will be unable to meet said
assessment, the director of ecology shall have the power and he or she
is hereby authorized under such terms and conditions as he or she shall
deem advisable to enter into a contract in writing with the board of
county commissioners of the county issuing such bonds, waiving the
payment of interest upon such bonds from the date of their issue for
not to exceed five years, and extending the time of payment of said
bonds for not to exceed five years; and upon the execution of said
contract the board of county commissioners of said county shall have
the power and is hereby authorized to cancel all assessments made upon
the lands included within such drainage improvement district for the
payment of principal and/or interest on said bonds prior to the date of
said contract, and to omit the levy of any assessments for said
purposes until the expiration of the time of the waiver of interest
payments upon said bonds specified in said contract.

Sec. 418 RCW 85.08.840 and 1957 c 94 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The boards of county commissioners of the counties in which a joint
drainage improvement district is situated shall have jurisdiction in
joint session to hear, supervise, and conduct the merger proceedings
relating to such a district. The auditor of the county in which the
greater length of the system of improvements lies shall act as clerk of
the joint sessions of the boards of county commissioners, and shall
give the notice provided for in RCW 85.08.870. He or she shall furnish
to the auditor of the other county duplicate copies of the records of
proceedings of the joint sessions. Duplicate records of all
proceedings had and papers filed in connection with the merger of a
joint drainage improvement district shall be kept with the auditor of
each county. The board of county commissioners of the county in which
a drainage improvement district or consolidated drainage improvement
district is situated shall have exclusive jurisdiction to hear,
supervise, and conduct merger proceedings relating to such districts.

Sec. 419 RCW 85.15.030 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 111 are each
amended to read as follows:
To operate under this chapter, the board of commissioners of the
improvement district shall cause to be prepared and filed with the
board of county commissioners a property roll. The roll shall contain:
(1) A description of all properties benefited and improvements thereon
which receive protection and service from the systems of the district
with the name of the owner or the reputed owner thereof and his or her
address as shown on the tax rolls of the assessor or treasurer of the
county wherein the property is located and (2) the determined value of
such land and improvements thereon as last assessed and equalized by
the assessor of such county or counties. Such assessed and equalized
values shall be deemed prima facie to be just, fair, and correct
valuations against which annual taxes shall be levied for the operation
of the district and the maintenance and expansion of its facilities.
If property outside of the limits of the original district are upon
the roll as adopted ultimately, and the original district has
outstanding bonds or long-term warrants, the board of county
commissioners shall set up separate dollar rate levies for the full
retirement thereof.

Sec. 420 RCW 85.15.090 and 1967 c 184 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The decision of the board of county commissioners upon any
objection made within the time and in the manner prescribed may be
reviewed by the superior court of the county wherein the property in
question is located, upon appeal thereto taken in the following manner:
Any person aggrieved must file his or her petition for writ of review
with the clerk of the superior court wherein the property is located
within ten days after the roll affecting such aggrieved party was
adopted by resolution, and serve a copy thereof upon the county
treasurer. The petition shall describe the property in question, shall
set forth the written objections which were made to the decision, and
the date of filing of such objections, and shall be signed by such
party or someone in his or her behalf. The court shall forthwith grant
such petition if correct as to form and filed in accordance with this
chapter.

Sec. 421 RCW 85.15.110 and 1967 c 184 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county clerk shall charge the same filing fees for petitions
for review as in civil actions. At the time of the filing of such a
petition with the clerk, the appellant shall execute and file a bond in
the penal sum of two hundred dollars, with at least two sureties, to be
approved by the judge of the court, conditioned upon his or her
prosecuting his or her appeal without delay and to guarantee all costs
which may be assessed against him or her by reason of such review. The
court shall, on motion of either party to the cause, with notice to the
other party, set the cause for trial at the earliest time available to
the court, fixing a date for hearing and trial without a jury. The
cause shall have preference over all civil actions pending in the court
except eminent domain and forcible entry and detainer proceedings.

Sec. 422 RCW 85.15.150 and 1967 c 184 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of any improvement district proceeding under this chapter
shall, on or before the first day of September of each year, make an
estimate of the costs reasonably anticipated to be required for the
effective functioning of the district during the ensuing year and until
further revenue therefor can be made available, and shall cause its
((chairman)) chair or secretary to file the same with the board of
county commissioners of the county containing the district and other
benefited area. The board of county commissioners shall, on or before
the first Monday in October next ensuing, certify the amount of the
district's estimate, or such amount as it shall deem advisable, to the
county treasurer. The amount so certified shall be applied by the
regular taxing agencies against the benefit valuation of lands,
buildings and improvements as shown by the then current complete roll
of such properties certified to and filed with such county treasurer by
the board of county commissioners. When thus levied, the amount of
assessment produced thereby shall be added by the general taxing
authorities to the general taxes against said lands and collected
therewith as a part thereof. If unpaid, any delinquencies in such
assessments shall bear interest at the same rate and in the same manner
as general taxes and they shall be included in and be made a part of
any general tax foreclosure proceedings, according to the provisions of
law with relation to such foreclosures. As assessment collections are
made, the county treasurer shall credit the same to the funds of the
district.

Sec. 423 RCW 85.16.130 and 1949 c 26 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
At the hearing upon the report of the appraisers, which may be
adjourned from time to time until finally completed, the board shall
carefully examine and consider the special benefits and the
apportionment of estimated costs determined by the appraisers and
reported in the schedule or schedules, and any objections thereto which
shall have been made in writing and filed with the board on or prior to
ten o'clock a.m. of the date fixed for such hearing. Each objector
shall be given reasonable time and opportunity to submit evidence and
be heard on the merits of his or her objections. At the conclusion of
such hearing, the board shall so correct, revise, raise, lower, change,
or modify such schedule or schedules, or any part thereof, or strike
therefrom any property not specially benefited, as to said board shall
appear equitable and just. The board shall cause the clerk of the
board to enter on each such schedule or schedules all such additions,
cancellations, changes, and modifications made by it.

Sec. 424 RCW 85.16.150 and 1949 c 26 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the board shall have determined that the schedule or schedules
of benefits and/or apportionment of costs as filed or as changed and
modified by it are fair, just and equitable and, if estimated costs
have been apportioned, that said benefits equal or exceed said costs
apportioned, the members of the board approving the same shall sign
said schedule or schedules and cause the clerk of the board to attest
their signatures under his or her seal, and shall enter an order in the
journal approving and confirming the final determination of such
benefits and apportionment of costs and all proceedings leading thereto
and in connection therewith. If separate schedules be established for
maintenance of the diking system and of the drainage system, the board
shall by order establish two separate maintenance funds, one for the
maintenance of the diking system and one for the maintenance of the
drainage system.

Sec. 425 RCW 85.18.160 and 1951 c 45 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of commissioners of any diking district proceeding under
this chapter shall, on or before the first day of November of each
year, make an estimate of the costs reasonably anticipated to be
required for the effective functioning of such district during the
ensuing year and until further revenue therefor can be made available,
and cause its ((chairman)) chair or secretary to certify the same on or
before said date to the county auditor, and the amount so certified
shall be levied by the regular taxing agencies against the base
benefits to the lands and buildings within such district as shown by
the then current complete roll of such properties and the determined
benefits thereto as therefore certified to and filed with such county
auditor by the commissioners of such district. When thus levied, the
amount of assessment produced thereby shall be added by the general
taxing authorities to the general taxes against said lands and
collected therewith as a part thereof. If unpaid, any delinquencies in
such assessments shall bear interest at the same rate and in the same
manner as general taxes and they shall be included in and be made a
part of any general tax foreclosure proceedings, according to the
provisions of law with relation to such foreclosures. As assessment
collections are made, the county treasurer shall credit the same to the
funds of such district.

Sec. 426 RCW 85.16.210 and 1988 c 202 s 80 are each amended to
read as follows:
At such hearing, which may be adjourned from time to time as may be
necessary to give all persons interested or affected a reasonable
opportunity to be heard, and after consideration of all evidence
offered and all factors, situations, and conditions bearing upon or
determinative of the benefits accruing and to accrue to such pieces or
parcels of property, the board shall correct, revise, raise, lower, or
otherwise change or confirm the benefits as theretofore determined, in
respect of such pieces or parcels of property, as to it shall seem
fair, just, and equitable under the circumstances, and thereafter such
proceedings shall be had with respect to the confirmation or
determination of the benefits and making and filing of a roll thereof,
as are in RCW 85.16.130, 85.16.150, and 85.16.160 provided. Any
property owner affected by any change thus made in the determination of
benefits accruing to his or her property who shall have appeared at the
hearing by the board and made written objections thereto as provided in
RCW 85.16.130, may appeal from the action of the board to the superior
court and seek appellate review by the supreme court or the court of
appeals, within the time, in the manner and upon the conditions, so far
as applicable, provided in RCW 85.08.440, with respect to appeals from
the order of the board confirming the apportionment of the original
cost of construction.

Sec. 427 RCW 85.16.230 and 1951 c 63 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever any payer of a diking, drainage, or sewerage improvement
district maintenance assessment believes that, through obvious error in
name, number, description, amount of benefit valuation, double
assessment, or extension, or other obvious error, property on which he
or she has paid an assessment has been erroneously assessed, he or she
may pay such assessment under protest. If, within thirty days after
such payment under protest, he or she files with the board a written
verified petition setting out his or her name, address, and legal
description of the property, the nature of the obvious error alleged to
have been made, and the date and amount of any assessment paid thereon,
the board shall cause such claim to be investigated. If upon
investigation any assessment is found to be erroneous through obvious
error, the board shall order such assessment to be corrected if no bond
or long term warrant issue is affected. Where correction is ordered of
an erroneous assessment already collected, the auditor, upon receipt of
a certified copy of the board's order of correction, shall refund to
the person paying the assessment the difference between the correct
assessment and the erroneous assessment, plus legal interest on such
difference from date of payment, by a warrant drawn on the maintenance
fund of the district.

Sec. 428 RCW 85.18.040 and 1985 c 469 s 76 are each amended to
read as follows:
The notice of the time and place of hearing shall be given to any
owner, or reputed owner, of the property which is listed on the roll as
aforesaid, by mailing a copy thereof at least thirty days before the
date fixed for the hearing to the owner or owners at his or her or
their address as shown on the tax rolls of the county treasurer for the
property described. In addition thereto, the notice shall be published
at least once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in the district. At least fifteen days must elapse
between the last date of publication thereof and the date fixed for the
hearing.

Sec. 429 RCW 85.18.100 and 1951 c 45 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The decision of the board of commissioners upon any objection made
within the time and in the manner prescribed may be reviewed by the
superior court of the county wherein the property in question is
located, upon appeal thereto taken in the following manner: Any person
aggrieved must file his or her petition for writ of review with the
clerk of the superior court wherein the property is located within ten
days after the roll affecting such aggrieved party was adopted by
resolution, and serve a copy thereof upon the commissioners. The
petition shall describe the property in question, set forth the written
objections which were made to the decision, the date of filing of such
objections, and be signed by such party or one in his or her behalf.
The court shall forthwith grant such petition if correct as to form and
filed in accordance with this chapter.

Sec. 430 RCW 85.18.120 and 1951 c 45 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county clerk shall charge the same filing fees for petitions
for review as in civil actions. At the time of the filing of such
petition with the clerk, the appellant shall execute and file a bond in
the penal sum of two hundred dollars, with at least two sureties, to be
approved by the judge of said court, conditioned upon his or her
prosecuting his or her appeal without delay and to guarantee all costs
which may be assessed against him or her by reason of such review. The
court shall, on motion of either party to the cause, with notice to the
other party, set said cause for trial at the earliest time available to
the court, fixing a date for hearing and trial without a jury. Said
cause shall have preference over all civil actions pending in said
court except eminent domain and forcible entry and detainer
proceedings.

Sec. 431 RCW 85.24.070 and 1985 c 396 s 53 are each amended to
read as follows:
A three-member board of commissioners shall be the governing body
of an intercounty diking and drainage district. The initial
commissioners shall be appointed, and the elected commissioners
elected, as provided in chapter 85.38 RCW.
The members of such board, before entering upon their duties, shall
take and subscribe on oath substantially as follows:

I, the undersigned, a member of the board of commissioners of the
diking and drainage district No. . . . ., in . . . . . . and
. . . . . . counties, do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will
faithfully discharge my duties as a member of the commission.

Upon the taking of such oath and the entering into a bond, as provided
in RCW 85.38.080, the county legislative authority shall enter an order
upon its records that the three persons named have qualified as the
board of commissioners for diking and drainage district No. . . . ., in
. . . . . . and . . . . . . counties, and that those persons and their
successors do and shall constitute a board of commissioners for the
diking and drainage district. The order when made shall be conclusive
of the regularity of the election and qualification of the board of
diking and drainage commissioners for the particular district, and the
persons named therein shall constitute the board of diking and drainage
commissioners.
The board of diking and drainage commissioners shall thereupon
immediately organize and elect one of their number as ((chairman))
chair and may either appoint a voter of the district or another diking
and drainage commissioner to act as secretary. The board shall then
proceed to make and cause to be made specifications and details of a
system which may be adopted by the board for the improvements to be
made, together with an estimate of the total cost thereof; and shall,
upon the adoption of the plan of improvement of the district, proceed
to acquire the necessary property and property rights for the
construction, establishment, and maintenance of the system either by
purchase or by power of eminent domain as hereinafter provided. Upon
such acquisition being had, the board shall then proceed with the
construction of the diking and drainage system and in doing so shall
have the power to do the work directly or in its discretion to have all
or any part of the work done by contract. In case the board shall
decide upon doing the same by contract, it shall advertise for bids for
the construction work, or such part thereof as they may determine to
have done by contract, and shall have the authority to let a contract
to the lowest responsible bidder after advertising for bids.
Any contractor doing work hereunder shall be required to furnish a
bond as provided by the laws of the state of Washington relating to
contractors of public work.
The board shall have the right, power, and authority to issue
vouchers or warrants in payment or evidence of payment of any and all
expenses incurred under this chapter, and shall have the power to issue
the same to any contractor as the work progresses, the same to be based
upon the partial estimates furnished from time to time by engineers of
the district. All warrants issued hereunder shall draw interest at a
rate determined by the board.
Upon the completion of the construction of the system, and
ascertainment of the total cost thereof including all compensation and
damages and costs and expenses incident to the acquiring of the
necessary property and property right, the board shall then proceed to
levy an assessment upon the taxable real property within the district
which the board may find to be specially benefited by the proposed
improvements; and shall make and levy such assessment upon each piece,
lot, parcel, and separate tract of real estate in proportion to the
particular and special benefits thereto. Upon determining the amount
of the assessment against each particular tract of real estate as
aforesaid, the commissioners shall make or cause to be made an
assessment roll, in which shall appear the names of the owners of the
property assessed, so far as known, and a general description of each
lot, block, parcel, or tract of land within the district, and the
amount assessed against the same, as separate, special, or particular
benefits. The board shall thereupon make an order setting and fixing
a day for hearing any objections to the assessment roll by any one
affected thereby, which day shall be at least twenty days after the
mailing of notices thereof, postage prepaid, as herein provided. The
board shall send or cause to be sent by mail to each owner of the
premises assessed, whose name and place of residence is known, a
notice, substantially in the following form:
To . . . . . .: Your property (here describe the property) is
assessed $ . . . . . A hearing on the assessment roll will be had
before the undersigned at the office of the board at . . . . . . on the
. . . . day of . . . . . . at which time you are notified to be and
appear and to make any and all objections which you may have as to the
amount of the assessment against your property, or as to whether it
should be assessed at all; and to make any and all objections which you
may have to the assessment against your lands, or any part or portion
thereof.
The failure to send or cause to be sent such notice shall not be
fatal to the proceedings herein described. The secretary of the board
on the mailing of the notices shall certify generally that he or she
has mailed such notices to the known address of all owners, and such
certificate shall be prima facie evidence of the mailing of all such
notices at the date mentioned in the certificate.
The board shall cause at least ten days' notice of the hearing to
be given by posting notice in at least ten public places within the
boundaries of the district, and by publishing the same at least five
successive times in a daily newspaper published in each of the counties
affected; and for at least two successive weeks in one or more weekly
newspapers within the boundaries of the district, in each county if
there are such newspapers published therein, and if there is no such
newspaper published, then in one or more weekly newspapers, having a
circulation in the district, for two successive weeks. The notice
shall be signed by the ((chairman)) chair or secretary of the board of
commissioners, and shall state the date and place of hearing of
objections to the assessment roll and levy, and of all other
objections; and that all interested parties will be heard as to any
objection to the assessment roll and the levies as therein made.

Sec. 432 RCW 85.24.075 and 1909 c 225 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((chairman)) chair of the board shall preside at all meetings
and shall have the right to vote upon all questions the same as other
members, and shall perform such duties in addition to those in this
chapter prescribed as may be fixed by the board. The secretary of the
board shall perform the duties in this chapter prescribed, and such
other duties as may be fixed by the board. A majority of the board
shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, but it shall
require a majority of the entire board to authorize any action by the
board.

Sec. 433 RCW 85.24.130 and 1988 c 202 s 82 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person interested in any real estate affected by said
assessment may, within the time fixed, appear and file objections. As
to all parcels, lots, or blocks as to which no objections are filed,
within the time as aforesaid, the assessment thereon shall be confirmed
and shall be final. On the hearing, each person may offer proof, and
proof may also be offered on behalf of the assessment, and the board
shall affirm, modify, change, and determine the assessment, in such sum
as to the board appears just and right. The commissioners may increase
the assessment during such hearing upon any particular tract by mailing
notice to the owner at his or her last known address, to be and appear
within a time not less than ten days after the date of the notice, to
show cause why his or her assessment should not be increased. When the
assessment is finally equalized and fixed by the board, the secretary
thereof shall certify the same to the county treasurer of each county
in which the lands are situated, for collection; or if appeal has been
taken from any part thereof, then so much thereof as has not been
appealed from shall be certified. In case any owner of property
appeals to the superior court in relation to the assessment or other
matter when the amount of the assessment is determined by the court
finally, either upon determination of the superior court, or review by
the supreme court or the court of appeals, then the assessment as
finally fixed and determined by the court shall be certified by the
clerk of the proper court to the county treasurer of the county in
which the lands are situated and shall be spread upon and become a part
of the assessment roll hereinbefore referred to.

Sec. 434 RCW 85.24.140 and 1988 c 202 s 83 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who feels aggrieved by the final assessment made against
any lot, block, or parcel of land owned by him or her, may appeal
therefrom to the superior court of the county in which the land is
situated. Such appeal shall be taken within the time and substantially
in the manner prescribed by the laws of this state for appeals from
justices' courts. All notice of appeal shall be filed with the said
board, and shall be served upon the prosecuting attorney of the county
in which the action is brought. The secretary of the board shall, at
appellant's expense, certify to the superior court so much of the
record as appellant may request, and the cause shall be tried in the
superior court de novo.
Any person aggrieved by any final order or judgment made by the
superior court concerning any assessment authorized by this chapter,
may seek appellate review of the order or judgment as in other civil
cases.

Sec. 435 RCW 85.24.150 and 1985 c 469 s 83 are each amended to
read as follows:
The final assessment shall be a lien paramount to all other liens
except liens for taxes and other special assessments upon the property
assessed, from the time the assessment roll shall have been finally
approved by the board, and placed in the hands of the county treasurers
as collectors. After the roll shall have been delivered to the county
treasurers for collection, each treasurer shall proceed to collect the
amounts due in the manner that other taxes are collected as to all
lands situated within the county of which he or she is treasurer. The
treasurer shall give at least ten days' notice in one or more
newspapers of general circulation in the counties in which the lands
are situated for two successive weeks, that the roll has been certified
to him or her for collection, and that unless payment be made within
thirty days from the date of the notice, that the sum charged against
each lot or parcel of land shall be paid in not more than ten equal
annual payments, with interest upon the whole sum so charged, at a rate
not to exceed seven percent per annum. The interest shall be paid
annually. The county treasurer shall proceed to collect the amount due
each year upon the publication of notice as hereinafter provided. In
such publication notice it shall not be necessary to give a description
of each tract, piece or parcel of land, or of the names of the owners
thereof.
The treasurer shall also mail a copy of the notice to the owner of
the property assessed, when the post office address of the owner is
known to the treasurer; but the failure to mail the notice shall not be
necessary to the validity of the collection of the tax.

Sec. 436 RCW 85.24.160 and 1986 c 278 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
The owner of any lot or parcel of land charged with any assessment,
as hereinbefore provided, may redeem the same from all liability by
paying the entire assessment charged against such lot or parcel of
land, or part thereof, without interest, within thirty days after
notice to him or her of such assessment, as herein provided.

Sec. 437 RCW 85.24.170 and 1909 c 225 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
The treasurer of each county shall collect the taxes levied and
assessed hereunder upon all that portion of the property situated
within the county for which the treasurer is acting. The treasurer of
the county in which the smaller or minor portion of the taxes are to be
collected shall forward the amount collected by him or her quarterly
each year on the first Monday in January, April, July, and October, to
the treasurer of the county in which the larger or major portion of the
taxes are to be collected. The treasurer of the county in which the
larger portion of the taxes have been levied and assessed shall be the
disbursing officer of such diking and drainage district, and shall pay
out the funds of such district upon orders drawn by the ((chairman))
chair and secretary of the board acting under authority of the board,
and shall be the treasurer of the fund.

Sec. 438 RCW 85.24.180 and 1909 c 225 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
If any of the installment of taxes are not paid as herein provided,
the county treasurer shall sell all lots or parcels of land on which
taxes have been levied and assessed, whether in the name of the
designated owner or the name of an unknown owner, to satisfy all
delinquent and unpaid assessments, interest, penalties, and costs. The
treasurer must commence the sale of property upon which taxes are
delinquent within sixty days after the same become delinquent, and
continue such sale from day to day thereafter until all the lots and
parcels of land upon which taxes have not been paid are sold. Such
sales shall take place at the front door of the court house. The
proper treasurer shall give notice of such sales by publishing a notice
thereof once a week for two successive weeks in two or more newspapers
published within the district, or if no such newspaper is published,
within the district, then within any two or more newspapers having a
general circulation in such district; such notice shall contain a list
of all lots and parcels of land upon which such assessments are
delinquent, with the amount of interest, penalty, and cost at the date
of sale, including costs of advertising had upon each of such lots,
pieces, or parcels of land, together with the names of the owners
thereof, if known to the treasurer, or the word "unknown" if unknown to
the treasurer, and shall specify the time and place of sale, and that
the several lots or parcels of land therein described, or so much as
may be necessary, will be sold to satisfy the assessment, interest,
penalty, and cost due upon each. All such sales shall be made between
the hours of ten o'clock a.m. and three o'clock p.m. Such sales shall
be made in the manner now prescribed by the general laws of this state
for the sale of property for delinquent taxes, and certificates and
deeds shall be made to the purchasers and redemptions made as is now
prescribed by the general laws of this state in the manner and upon the
terms therein specified: PROVIDED, That no tax deeds shall be made
until after the expiration of one year after the issuance of the
certificate, and during such year any person interested may redeem. A
certificate of purchase shall be issued to the district for all lots
and parcels of land not sold. Certificates issued to the district
shall be delivered to the board of commissioners of the district. The
board of commissioners of the district may sell and transfer any such
certificate to any person who is willing to pay to the district the
amount for which the lot or parcel of land therein described was
stricken off to the district, with the interest subsequently accrued
thereon. Within ten days after the completion of sale of all lots,
pieces, and parcels of land authorized to be sold as aforesaid, the
treasurer must make a return to the board of commissioners with a
statement of the doings thereon, showing all lots and parcels of land
sold by him or her, to whom sold and the sum paid therefor. The
purchaser at improvement sales acquires a lien on the lot, piece, or
parcel of land sold for the amount paid by him or her at such sales for
all delinquent taxes and assessments, and all costs and charges
thereon, whether levied previously or subsequently to such sale,
subsequently paid by him or her on the lot or parcel of land, and shall
be entitled to interest thereon at the rate of ten percent per annum
from the date of such payment.

Sec. 439 RCW 85.24.290 and 1909 c 225 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
When any notice is required to be given to the owner under any of
the provisions of this chapter, such notice shall be given to the agent
instead of the owner, in case the owner prior to the giving of the
notice required by the board or proper officer has filed with the board
or proper officer the name of the agent with his or her post office
address.

Sec. 440 RCW 85.28.030 and 1899 c 125 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The petitioner, or someone in his or her behalf, shall enter into
a bond in the penal sum of one hundred dollars, with two or more
sureties, to be approved by the clerk of said court, payable to the
state of Washington, conditioned that the petitioner or petitioners
will pay all costs and expenses incurred in the proceeding; which said
bond shall be filed with the petition.

Sec. 441 RCW 85.28.040 and 1899 c 125 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the filing of said petition the court shall appoint three
viewers, two of whom shall be resident freeholders of said county, and
not interested in the result of the proceeding, and the other the
county surveyor of the county in which the lands are situated (unless
said county surveyor shall be a party in interest, in which case some
other competent surveyor shall be appointed in his or her place who
shall receive the same compensation as is allowed by law to county
surveyors) who shall, upon a day to be fixed by the court, in the order
appointing them, view the lands of the petitioner and the lands which
said proposed ditch or drain is to cross, for the purpose of
determining: First, whether there is a necessity for the establishment
of a ditch; and, second, the most practicable route for said ditch to
run, if the same be necessary. The clerk of said court shall furnish
to said viewers a certified copy of the order appointing them, which
shall warrant them entering upon the lands described in the petition
for the purpose of viewing the same.

Sec. 442 RCW 85.28.060 and 1899 c 125 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the filing of the report of the viewers aforesaid, a summons
shall be issued in the same manner as summons are issued in civil
actions, and served upon each person owning or interested in any lands
over which the proposed ditch or drain will pass. Said summons must
inform the person to whom it is directed of the appointment and report
of the viewers; a description of the land over which said ditch will
pass of which such person is the owner, or in which he or she has an
interest; the width and depth of said proposed ditch, and the distance
which it traverses said land, also an accurate description of the
course thereof. It must also show the amount of damages to said land
as estimated by said viewers; and that unless the person so summoned
appears and files objections to the report of the viewers, within
twenty days after the service of said summons upon him or her,
exclusive of the day of service, the same will be approved by the
court, which summons may be in the following form:

In the Superior Court of the State of Washington, for . . . . . .
County.
In the matter of the application of . . . . . . for a private
ditch.
The state of Washington to . . . . . .
Whereas, on the . . . . day of . . . . . . 19. . . filed his or her
petition in the above entitled court praying that a private ditch or
drain be established across the following described lands, to wit: . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .
for the purpose of draining certain lands belonging to said
. . . . . ., and whereas, on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., 19. . .,
Messrs. . . . . . . and . . . . . . with . . . . . . county surveyor of
. . . . . . county, were appointed to view said premises in the manner
provided by law, and said viewers having, on the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., 19. . ., filed their report in this court, finding in
favor of said ditch and locating the same upon the following course:
. . . . . . . . . . . for a distance of . . . . . . upon said land, and
of a width of . . . . feet and a depth of . . . . feet; and they
further find that said land will be damaged by the establishing and
construction of said ditch in the sum of $. . . .: Now therefore, you
are hereby summoned to appear within twenty days after the service of
this summons, exclusive of the day of service, and file your objections
to said petition and the report of said viewers, with this court; and
in case of your failure so to do, said report will be approved and said
petition granted.

Sec. 443 RCW 85.28.080 and 1899 c 125 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
In case any person interested in any of the lands to be crossed by
such ditch, as aforesaid, does not reside in the county, or cannot be
found therein, or conceals himself or herself so that personal service
cannot be had upon him or her, upon proof thereof being made
satisfactorily to appear to said court, said summons may be served by
publication, in the same manner and with like effect as is done in
civil actions: PROVIDED, That no other or different form of summons
shall be required for publication than is required for personal
service.

Sec. 444 RCW 85.28.090 and 1899 c 125 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the expiration of the time within which exceptions may be
filed to the report of the viewers aforesaid, the court shall set a day
upon which the petition and the report of the viewers shall be heard
and considered by the court. In case exceptions have been filed by any
party or parties, which exceptions must have been served upon the
petitioner or petitioners prior to the hearing, the court shall hear
evidence in regard thereto, and without a jury, pass upon the questions
of the necessity for said ditch and the location thereof. If the court
finds that such ditch is necessary, and the route selected is the best
and most practicable, and that the compensation allowed by the viewers
is just and reasonable, then the court shall file his or her findings
to this effect and cause an order to be entered approving the petition
and report of the viewers. If, within twenty days from the filing of
the findings of facts aforesaid, the petitioner or petitioners shall
pay into court all the costs and sums awarded to the owner or owners of
the land over which said ditch shall pass, a decree shall be entered
establishing the same: PROVIDED, If any party shall except to the
amount of damages found by the viewers, then the amount of such damages
shall be tried by jury, unless a jury trial be waived by the parties,
in which case trial thereof may be had by the court. Such trial shall
be at a regular term of said court, at which a jury shall be present,
and shall be conducted and verdict rendered in the same manner as in
civil actions: PROVIDED FURTHER, That it shall not be incumbent on the
petitioner to pay into court the amount of the award or awards of said
jury, until within twenty days after said verdict shall have been
rendered and entered.

Sec. 445 RCW 85.32.050 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 122 are each
amended to read as follows:
The roll of properties referred to in this chapter shall contain
(1) a description of all properties and improvements thereon, with the
name of the owner or the reputed owner thereof and his or her address
as shown on the tax rolls of the assessor or treasurer of the county
wherein the property is located, and (2) the determined value of such
land and improvements thereon as last assessed and equalized by the
taxing agencies of such county. Such assessed and equalized values
shall be deemed prima facie as a just, fair, and correct base of value
for consideration by the board in its determination ultimately of the
just and correct base of value in each instance against which annual
dollar rates shall be levied by the district for the operation of the
district and the expansion and maintenance of its facilities.
If property outside of the territorial limits of the district are
upon the roll as adopted ultimately, and the district has prior
indebtedness existing, the board shall set up separate dollar rate
levies for the retirement thereof until it is extinguished, which
levies shall be applied solely against the properties within the
territorial limits of the district. Adjustments of the roll shall be
made before final adoption in such a manner that the money raised
through annual dollar rate levies for maintenance, expansion, and
operational costs of the district in no instance shall exceed the value
of the service rendered or to be rendered and the benefit received and
to be received by the property involved.

Sec. 446 RCW 85.32.060 and 1985 c 469 s 84 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the board causes a property roll to be filed with it and a
hearing to be held thereon as provided in this chapter, it shall give
notice of the hearing in the following manner:
The notice shall be published at least three times in consecutive
issues in a weekly newspaper, or once a week for three consecutive
weeks in a daily newspaper having general circulation in the area
involved. The last publication shall be more than fifteen days prior
to date of hearing. The board also shall cause a copy of the notice to
be mailed in regular course of the federal mail at least thirty days
prior to the date of the hearing to the owner or reputed owner of the
property at his or her address, all as shown on the tax rolls or
records of the county taxing agencies of the county wherein the
property is situated, such notice being deemed adequate and sufficient.
The sworn affidavit of the one doing such mailing shall be deemed
conclusive of the fact that the notice was mailed.
The notice shall state the following:
(1) That the board has tentatively determined that the property of
the owner or reputed owner named is receiving and will receive service
and benefit from the facilities of the district;
(2) That the board has caused a tentative roll of the properties
with any improvements thereon which are receiving and will receive
service and benefit to be filed with it; and that the roll shows a base
of valuation thereon for the properties against which annual dollar
rates will be levied and collected in the same manner as general taxes
to pay the fair value of the benefit and service received and to be
received by the property through use of the facilities of the district,
and to pay the annual cost of operation, development, and maintenance
of the district and its facilities;
(3) That on a date, time, and place stated, the board will give
consideration to the facts and the roll, will hear all objections
filed, will review the roll and alter, modify, or change the same
consistent with facts established and with equity and fair dealing
concerning the properties involved to the end that just levies will be
made for service and benefits received and to be received against each
property for the purposes mentioned; and at the hearing or continuance
thereof, it will adopt the roll in final form and certify and file a
copy thereof with the assessor and treasurer of the county wherein the
property is located; and will cause annual millage to be levied against
such established valuations for the purposes stated;
(4) That all persons desiring to object to the proceedings, to the
proposed base valuations, or to any other thing or matter in connection
with the proceedings, must file written objections with the board
stating clearly the basis of the objection before the time of the
hearing, or all objections will be deemed waived.

Sec. 447 RCW 85.32.170 and 1961 c 131 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The decision of the board upon any objection made within the time
and in the manner prescribed in this chapter may be reviewed by the
superior court of the county wherein the property in question is
located. Any person aggrieved must file his or her petition for writ
of review with the clerk of the superior court wherein the property is
located within ten days after the roll affecting such aggrieved party
was adopted by resolution, and he or she shall serve a copy thereof
upon the board. The petition shall describe the property in question,
set forth the written objections which were made to the decision, give
the date of filing of such objections, and shall be signed by such
party or someone in his or her behalf. The court shall forthwith grant
such petition if correct as to form and filed in accordance with this
section.

Sec. 448 RCW 86.09.259 and 1985 c 396 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
A flood control district shall be managed by a board of directors
consisting of three members. The initial directors shall be appointed,
and the elected directors elected, as provided in chapter 85.38 RCW.
The directors shall elect a ((chairman)) chair from their number and
shall either elect one of their number, or appoint a voter of the
district, as secretary to hold office at its pleasure and who shall
keep a record of its proceedings.

Sec. 449 RCW 86.09.292 and 1937 c 72 s 98 are each amended to
read as follows:
In case any member of the district board is absent at the time of
any regular monthly meeting of said board, and a quorum of said board
cannot be obtained by reason of the absence of said member, it shall be
the duty of the ((chairman)) chair of the board of county commissioners
of the county in which the office of the district board is located to
act in place of said absent member, and the acts of the district board
at said meeting shall be valid so far as a quorum is concerned and
shall have the same effect as though said absent member were present
and acting thereat.

Sec. 450 RCW 86.09.301 and 1985 c 396 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every district officer, upon taking office, shall take and
subscribe an official oath for the faithful discharge of the duties of
his or her office during the term of his or her incumbency.

Sec. 451 RCW 86.09.304 and 1985 c 396 s 63 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every district officer or employee handling any district funds
shall execute a surety bond payable to the district in the sum of
double the estimated amount of funds handled monthly, conditioned that
the principal will strictly account for all moneys or credit received
by him or her for the use of the district. Each bond and the amount
thereof shall be approved by the county legislative authority of the
county within which the major portion of the district is situated, and
thereafter filed with the secretary of the district.

Sec. 452 RCW 86.09.310 and 1937 c 72 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every person, upon the expiration or sooner termination of his or
her term of office as an officer of the district, shall immediately
turn over and deliver, under oath, to his or her successor in office,
all records, books, papers, and other property under his or her control
and belonging to such office. In case of the death of any officer, his
or her legal representative shall turn over and deliver such records,
books, papers, and other property to the successor in office of such
deceased person.

Sec. 453 RCW 86.09.319 and 1937 c 72 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any county treasurer collecting or handling funds of the district
shall be liable upon his or her official bond and to criminal
prosecution for malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office
relative to any of his or her duties prescribed herein.

Sec. 454 RCW 86.09.325 and 1983 c 167 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ex officio district treasurer shall pay out moneys collected or
deposited with him or her in behalf of the district, or portions
thereof, upon warrants issued by the county auditor against the proper
funds of the districts, except the sums to be paid out of the bond fund
for interest and principal payments on bonds.

Sec. 455 RCW 86.09.328 and 1937 c 72 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
The said ex officio district treasurer shall report in writing on
or before the fifteenth day of each month to the district board, the
amount of money held by him or her, the amount in each fund, the amount
of receipts for the month preceding in each fund, and the amount or
amounts paid out of each fund, and said report shall be filed with the
secretary of the board.

Sec. 456 RCW 86.09.391 and 1985 c 396 s 66 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of appraisers shall elect a member as ((chairman)) chair
and the secretary of the district or his or her deputy shall be ex
officio secretary of the board of appraisers. The appraisers shall
receive such compensation and expenses as the board of directors of the
district, with the approval of the county legislative authority of the
county within which the major portion of the district is situated,
shall determine, and which may forthwith be paid by the issuance of
district warrants.

Sec. 457 RCW 86.09.430 and 1986 c 278 s 43 are each amended to
read as follows:
Said notice of hearing on said determination of assessment ratios
shall state that the base assessment map designating the classes in
which the lands in the district have been placed for assessment
purposes on the ratios authorized by law, has been prepared by the
board of appraisers and is on file at the office of the district board
and may be inspected at any time during office hours; that a hearing on
said map will be held before the county legislative authority at the
office of the district board on . . . . . ., the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., . . . . . ., at the hour of . . . . . . o'clock (naming
the time), where any person may appear and present such objections, if
any, he or she may have to said map, and shall be signed by the
secretary of the district.

Sec. 458 RCW 86.09.433 and 1985 c 396 s 69 are each amended to
read as follows:
At the time set for said hearing the county legislative authority
shall be present at the place designated in the notice and if it
appears that due notice of the hearing has been given, shall proceed to
hear such objections to the base map as shall be presented and shall
hear all pertinent evidence that may be offered. The county
legislative authority shall have authority to adjourn said hearings
from time to time to study the record and evidence presented, to make
such independent investigation as it shall deem necessary and to
correct, modify, or confirm the things set out on said base map or any
part thereof and to determine all questions concerning the matter and
shall finally make an order confirming said map with such
substitutions, changes, or corrections, if any, as may have been made
thereon, which order shall be signed by the ((chairman)) chair of the
county legislative authority and attached to said map.

Sec. 459 RCW 86.09.448 and 1985 c 396 s 71 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person, firm, or corporation feeling aggrieved at any
determination by said county legislative authority of the
classification or relative percentage of his or her or its lands,
aforesaid, may have the same reviewed by a proceeding for that purpose,
in the nature of an appeal, initiated in the superior court of the
county in which the land affected is situated. The matter shall be
heard and tried by the court and shall be informal and summary but full
opportunity to be heard and present evidence shall be given before
judgment is pronounced.

Sec. 460 RCW 86.09.466 and 1985 c 396 s 75 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of the district on or before the first day of
November in each year shall estimate the amount of money necessary to
be raised for any and all district purposes during the ensuing year
based upon a budget furnished him or her by the district board and
submit the same to the county legislative authority of the county
within which the major portion of the district is situated for its
suggestions, approval, and revision and upon the approval of the budget
by said county legislative authority, either as originally submitted or
as revised, the secretary shall prepare an assessment roll with
appropriate headings in which must be listed all the lands in each
assessment classification shown on the base assessment map.

Sec. 461 RCW 86.09.493 and 1937 c 72 s 165 are each amended to
read as follows:
On or before the fifteenth day of January in each year the
secretary must deliver the assessment roll or the respective
segregations thereof to the county treasurer of each respective county
in which the lands described are located, with a statement of the
amounts and/or percentages of the collections on said roll which shall
be apportioned to the respective district funds, and said assessments
shall become due and payable at the time or times general taxes accrue
payable.
One-half of all assessments on said roll shall become delinquent on
the first day of June following the filing of the roll unless said one-half is paid on or before the thirty-first day of May of said year, and
the remaining one-half shall become delinquent on the first day of
December following, unless said one-half is paid on or before the
thirtieth day of November. All delinquent assessments shall bear
interest at the rate of ten percent per annum from the date of
delinquency until paid.
Within twenty days after the filing of the assessment roll as
aforesaid the respective county treasurers shall each publish a notice
in a newspaper published in their respective counties in which any
portion of the district may lie, that said assessments are due and
payable at the office of the county treasurer of the county in which
said land is located and will become delinquent unless paid as herein
provided. Said notice shall state the dates of delinquency as fixed in
this chapter and the rate of interest charged thereon and shall be
published once a week for four successive weeks and shall be posted
within said period of twenty days in some public place in said district
in each county in which any portion of the district is situated.
Upon receiving the assessment roll, the county treasurer shall
prepare therefrom an assessment book in which shall be written the
description of the land as it appears in the assessment roll, the name
of the owner or owners where known, and if assessed to the unknown
owners, then the word "unknown", and the total assessment levied
against each tract of land. Proper space shall be left in said book
for the entry therein of all subsequent proceedings relating to the
payment and collection of said assessments.
Upon payment of any assessment the county treasurer must enter the
date of said payment in said assessment book opposite the description
of the land and the name of the person paying, and give a receipt to
such person specifying the amount of the assessment and the amount paid
with the description of the property assessed.
It shall be the duty of the county treasurer of the county in which
any land in the district is located to furnish upon request of the
owner, or any person interested, a statement showing any and all
assessments levied as shown by the assessment roll in his or her office
upon land described in such request, and all statements of general
taxes covering any land in the district shall be accompanied by a
statement showing the condition of district assessments against such
lands: PROVIDED, That the failure of the county treasurer to render
any statement herein required of him or her shall not render invalid
any assessments made by any district or proceedings had for the
enforcement and collection of district assessments pursuant to this
chapter.

Sec. 462 RCW 86.09.496 and 1937 c 72 s 166 are each amended to
read as follows:
On or before the thirty-first day of December of each year, the
county treasurer of the county in which the land is located shall cause
to be posted the delinquency list which must contain the names of
persons to whom the property is assessed and a description of the
property delinquent and the amount of the assessment and costs due,
opposite each name and description.
He or she must append to and post with the delinquency list a
notice that unless the assessments delinquent, together with costs and
accrued interest, are paid, the real property upon which such
assessments are a lien will be sold at public auction. The said notice
and delinquent list shall be posted at least twenty days prior to the
time of sale. Concurrent as nearly as possible with the date of the
posting aforesaid, the said county treasurer shall publish the location
of the place where said notice is posted and in connection therewith a
notice that unless delinquent assessments together with costs and
accrued interest are paid, the real property upon which such
assessments are a lien will be sold at public auction. Such notice
must be published once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper
of general circulation published in the county within which the land is
located; but said notice of publication need not comprise the
delinquent list where the same is posted as herein provided. Both
notices must designate the time and place of sale. The time of sale
must not be less than twenty-one nor more than twenty-eight days from
the date of posting and from the date of the first publication of the
notice thereof, and the place must be at some point designated by the
treasurer.

Sec. 463 RCW 86.09.499 and 1937 c 72 s 167 are each amended to
read as follows:
The treasurer of the county in which the land is situated shall
conduct the sale of all lands situated therein and must collect in
addition to the assessment due as shown on the delinquent list the
costs and expenses of sale and interest at the rate of ten percent per
annum from the date or dates of delinquency as hereinbefore provided.
On the day fixed for the sale, or some subsequent day to which he or
she may have postponed it, and between the hours of ten o'clock a.m.
and three o'clock p.m., the county treasurer making the sale must
commence the same, beginning at the head of the list, and continuing
alphabetically, or in the numerical order of the parcels, lots, or
blocks, until completed. He or she may postpone the day of commencing
the sale, or the sale from day to day, by giving oral notice thereof at
the time of the postponement, but the sale must be completed within
three weeks from the first day fixed.

Sec. 464 RCW 86.09.502 and 1937 c 72 s 168 are each amended to
read as follows:
The owner or person in possession of any real estate offered for
sale for assessments due thereon may designate in writing to the county
treasurer, by whom the sale is to be made, and prior to the sale, what
portion of the property he or she wishes sold, if less than the whole;
but if the owner or possessor does not, then the treasurer may
designate it, and the person who will take the least quantity of the
land, or in case an undivided interest is assessed, then the smallest
portion of the interest, and pay the assessment and costs due,
including one dollar to the treasurer for duplicate of the certificate
of sale, is the purchaser. The treasurer shall account to the district
for said one dollar. If the purchaser does not pay the assessment and
costs before ten o'clock a.m. the following day, the property must be
resold on the next sale day for the assessments and costs. In case
there is no purchaser in good faith for the same on the first day that
the property is offered for sale, and if there is no purchaser in good
faith when the property is offered thereafter for sale, the whole
amount of the property assessed shall be struck off to the district as
the purchaser, and the duplicate certificate shall be delivered to the
secretary of the district, and filed by him or her in the office of the
district. No charge shall be made for the duplicate certificate where
the district is the purchaser, and in such case the treasurer shall
make an entry, "Sold to the district", and he or she will be credited
with the amount thereof in settlement. The district, as a purchaser at
said sale, shall be entitled to the same rights as a private purchaser,
and may assign or transfer the certificate of sale upon the payment of
the amount which would be due if redemption were being made by the
owner. If no redemption is made of land for which the district holds
a certificate of purchase, the district will be entitled to receive the
treasurer's deed therefor in the same manner as a private person would
be entitled thereto.
After receiving the amount of assessments and costs, the county
treasurer must make out in duplicate a certificate, dated on the day of
sale, stating (when known) the names of the persons assessed, a
description of the land sold, the amount paid therefor, that it was
sold for assessments, giving the amount and the year of assessment, and
specifying the time when the purchaser will be entitled to a deed. The
certificate must be signed by the treasurer making the sale and one
copy delivered to the purchaser, and the other filed in the office of
the county treasurer of the county in which the land is situated:
PROVIDED, That upon the sale of any lot, parcel, or tract of land not
larger than an acre, the fee for a duplicate certificate shall be
twenty-five cents and in case of a sale to a person or a district, of
more than one parcel or tract of land, the several parcels or tracts
may be included in one certificate.

Sec. 465 RCW 86.09.508 and 1937 c 72 s 170 are each amended to
read as follows:
A redemption of the property sold may be made by the owner or any
person on behalf and in the name of the owner or by any party in
interest at any time before deed issues, by paying the amount of the
purchase price and interest as in this chapter provided, and the amount
of any assessments which such purchaser may have paid thereon after
purchase by him or her and during the period of redemption in this
section provided, together with like interest on such amount, and if
the district is the purchaser, the redemptioner shall not be required
to pay the amount of any district assessment levied subsequent to the
assessment for which said land was sold, but all subsequent and unpaid
assessments levied upon said land to the date of such redemption shall
remain a lien and be payable and the land be subject to sale and
redemption at the times applicable to such subsequent annual district
assessment. Redemption must be made in legal tender, as provided for
the collection of state and county taxes, and the county treasurer must
credit the amount paid to the person named in the certificate and pay
it on demand to such person or his or her assignees. No redemption
shall be made except to the county treasurer of the county in which the
land is situated.

Sec. 466 RCW 86.09.511 and 1937 c 72 s 171 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon completion of redemption, the county treasurer to whom
redemption has been made shall enter the word "redeemed", the date of
redemption and by whom redeemed on the certificate and on the margin of
the assessment book where the entry of the certificate is made. If the
property is not redeemed within two years, after the fifteenth day of
January of the year in which such property was sold, the county
treasurer of the county in which the land sold is situated must
thereafter, upon demand of the owner of the certificate of sale, make
to the purchaser, or his or her assignees a deed of the property,
reciting in the deed substantially the matters contained in the
certificate, and that no person redeemed the property during the time
allowed by law for its redemption. The treasurer shall receive from
the purchaser, for the use of the district, one dollar for making such
deed: PROVIDED, If redemption is not made of any lot, parcel, or tract
of land not larger than one acre, the fee for a deed shall be twenty-five cents and when any person or district holds a duplicate
certificate covering more than one tract of land, the several parcels,
or tracts of lands, mentioned in the certificate may be included in one
deed.

Sec. 467 RCW 86.09.556 and 1937 c 72 s 186 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any claim against the district shall be presented to the district
board for allowance or rejection. Upon allowance, the claim shall be
attached to a voucher verified by the claimant or his or her agent and
approved by the ((chairman)) chair of the board and countersigned by
the secretary and directed to the county auditor of the county in which
the office of the district treasurer is located, for the issuance of a
warrant against the proper fund of the district in payment of said
claim.

Sec. 468 RCW 86.09.562 and 1986 c 278 s 45 are each amended to
read as follows:
Said county treasurer shall pay out the moneys received or
deposited with him or her or any portion thereof upon warrants issued
by the county auditor of the same county of which the district
treasurer is an officer against the proper funds of the district except
the sums to be paid out of the special funds for interest and principal
payments on bonds or notes.

Sec. 469 RCW 86.09.619 and 1965 c 26 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty of the board of directors of the district to
make adequate provision for the payment of all district bonds in
accordance with their terms by levy and collection of assessments or
otherwise and upon its failure so to do said levy and collection of
assessments shall be made as follows:
(1) If the annual assessment roll has not been delivered to the
county treasurer on or before the fifteenth day of January, he or she
shall notify the secretary by registered mail that the roll must be
delivered to him or her forthwith.
(2) If the roll is not delivered within ten days from the date of
mailing the notice, or if the roll has not been equalized and the levy
made, the treasurer shall immediately notify the county commissioners
of the county in which the office of the directors is situated, and
such commissioners shall cause an assessment roll for the district to
be prepared and shall equalize it if necessary, and make the levy in
the same manner and with like effect as if it had been made and
equalized by the directors, and all expenses incident thereto shall be
borne by the district.
(3) In case of neglect or refusal of the secretary to perform his
or her duties, the district treasurer shall perform them, and shall be
accountable therefor, on his or her official bond, as in other cases.

Sec. 470 RCW 86.09.703 and 1985 c 396 s 86 are each amended to
read as follows:
If funds are available the county legislative authority shall, at
the expense of the county, refer the petition to the county engineer
for a preliminary investigation as to the feasibility of the objects
sought by the petition. If the investigation discloses that the matter
petitioned for is feasible, conducive to the public welfare, consistent
with a comprehensive plan of development and in the best interest of
the district and will promote the purposes for which the district was
organized, the county legislative authority shall so find, approve the
petition, enter an order in his or her records declaring the
establishment of the new boundaries as petitioned for, or as modified
by him or her, and file a certified copy of the order with each county
auditor, without filing fee, and with the board.
The board shall forthwith cause a review of the classifications and
ratio of benefits, in the same manner and with the same effect as for
the determination of such matters in the first instance.
The lands in the original district shall remain bound for the whole
of the original unpaid assessment thereon for the payment of any
outstanding warrants or bonds to be paid by such assessments. Until
the assessments are collected and all indebtedness of the original
district paid, separate funds shall be maintained for the original
district and the revised district.

Sec. 471 RCW 86.13.030 and 1913 c 54 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
When such a contract shall have been entered into it shall be the
duty of each of the boards of county commissioners to make for their
respective counties, each year, a tax levy at a rate sufficient to meet
the requirements of the contract to be performed by the county, or
sufficient to provide such lesser amount as the boards of county
commissioners shall agree upon for such year, to be evidenced by
separate resolution of each board, and when such levy shall be made the
same shall be extended upon the tax rolls of the county levying the
same as other taxes shall be extended, and shall be collected in the
same manner and shall be a lien upon the property as in the case of
other taxes. The fund realized in each county by such tax levy shall
go into a separate fund in the treasury of the county collecting the
same, to be designated intercounty river improvement fund, and the
entire fund so collected in the two counties shall be devoted to and be
disbursed for the purposes specified in such contract and as in this
chapter provided, and for no other purpose, but without regard to the
particular county in which the work is performed, material required or
expenditure made, it being the intent that the entire fund realized in
the two counties shall be devoted to the one common purpose as if the
two counties were one county and the two funds one fund. The fund in
each county shall be disbursed by the county treasurer of such county
upon warrants signed by the county auditor of that county. Such
warrants shall be issued by order of the board of county commissioners
of such county, or a majority thereof. Each county auditor shall,
whenever requested by the county auditor of the other county, furnish
the county auditor of the other county a statement of payments into and
warrants drawn upon the fund of his or her county from time to time,
and in addition thereto, each county auditor shall on the first Monday
of January, April, July and October each year during the life of the
contract furnish the other a complete statement thereof. Obligations
incurred in the prosecution of such improvement and warrants issued
shall be payable only out of said special funds, and no general
obligation against or debt of either county shall be created thereby or
by any contract entered into by virtue of this chapter, but it is not
the intent of this chapter to deny to either county the right to have
in the courts any proper proceeding to compel compliance with such
contract on the part of the other county.

Sec. 472 RCW 86.13.050 and 1913 c 54 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
When such a contract shall have been entered into and occasion
shall arise for the joint action of the two boards of county
commissioners whether such joint action is provided for in this chapter
or otherwise desired upon any matter having relation to such contract
or the prosecution of such improvement, such joint action may be
secured by a notice calling a joint meeting signed by two county
commissioners, designating the time and place in either county of such
meeting, served by one of the two county auditors upon the remaining
county commissioners at least seven days (exclusive of the date of
service or mailing) prior to the time so designated. If the notice is
signed by two county commissioners of the same county the place of
meeting shall be at some place in the other county designated in the
notice. Such service may be personal or by mail addressed to the
member in care of the county auditor of his or her county. The six
county commissioners may constitute a legal meeting without notice by
being present together for that purpose. The auditor's certificate of
such personal service or mailing, attached to a copy of the notice,
shall be made a part of the records of the meeting and be competent
proof of the fact. Except in the case hereinafter provided for, the
presence of four of the county commissioners shall be necessary to
constitute a legal meeting. Each meeting shall be presided over by one
of those present selected by vote. The county auditor of the county
wherein the meeting is held shall be secretary of the meeting, and
shall make duplicate record of its proceedings, one of which, with his
or her certificate thereon, shall be forwarded to the county auditor of
the other county, and such record shall be a part of the record of the
board of county commissioners of each county. A majority vote of those
present at any legal meeting shall be determinative upon any question
properly considered at the meeting, and shall be binding upon each
county as if enacted or adopted by its own board of county
commissioners separately, but no joint meeting whatsoever shall in any
manner continue, extend, change, alter, modify, or abrogate the
contract when made or any of the terms and conditions contained
therein. Each county commissioner shall be paid out of said fund in
his or her own county all disbursements made by him or her for
traveling and other expenses incurred in attending any joint meeting or
in any way connected with the prosecution of the improvement. Any
legal meeting shall have power to adjourn to another time and place.
An adjourned meeting shall have all the powers of the meeting of which
it is an adjournment, but shall have no power after the end of the
thirtieth day following the date of the original meeting of which it is
an adjournment. If the three county commissioners of either county
shall fail to attend any two meetings consecutively called, the notice
for the next succeeding meeting may be also served upon the special
commissioner hereinafter provided for, and if he or she and three
county commissioners attend pursuant to such notice the four shall
constitute a legal meeting, but if he or she does not so attend and
three county commissioners do attend, the same shall constitute a legal
meeting: PROVIDED, All notices calling a joint meeting shall specify
distinctly and separately each question to be considered at said
meeting; and it shall be unlawful to consider any question at such
meeting or at any adjourned meeting thereof except those which have
been distinctly and separately specified, except in cases where all six
county commissioners are present or five county commissioners present
are unanimous on the question, and in any action which may be taken on
any question other than those specified in the notice shall be void and
shall not be binding on either county, except in cases where all six
county commissioners are present or the action was by unanimous vote of
five county commissioners present at such meeting.

Sec. 473 RCW 86.13.060 and 1913 c 54 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
When such a contract shall have been entered into there shall be
designated at the first legal joint meeting, or adjournment thereof,
held in each calendar year a special commissioner to serve as such
until the first joint meeting held in the ensuing year. If such
designation shall not be made at any such first annual meeting, the
United States engineer in charge of the district in which such
improvement is located shall be such special commissioner until the
next succeeding first annual meeting. If a special commissioner shall
for any reason fail to serve as such officer, or be removed by
unanimous vote of any legal meeting, a successor to him or her may be
chosen at any subsequent legal joint meeting during his or her term.
Such special commissioner shall have power to attend and vote at any
joint meeting in the following cases and none other, to wit: (1) In
cases specially so provided in RCW 86.13.050 hereof; (2) in any case
where the vote of any such joint meeting shall stand equally divided
upon any question arising under this chapter or such contract or in the
prosecution of the work of improvement. The special commissioner shall
have no voice or vote except upon questions on which the vote of the
county commissioners is equally divided. The procedure in cases
covered by the foregoing subdivision (2) of this section shall be
substantially as follows: It shall be the duty of the secretary of the
meeting at which the division shall occur, if the attendance of the
special commissioner at that meeting is not secured, to forthwith
transmit to the special commissioner written notice of the fact of
disagreement and the question involved, and of the time and place to
which the meeting shall have been adjourned or at which the question
will recur. If there shall be no such adjournment of the meeting, or
if the secretary shall not give such notice, any two commissioners may
in the manner provided in RCW 86.13.050 call a joint meeting for the
consideration of the question in dispute, and in such event either
county auditor may give such notice to the special commissioner. No
informality in the mode of securing the attendance of the special
commissioner shall invalidate the proceedings of or any vote taken at
any meeting which he or she shall attend and which he or she is
empowered to attend by the provisions of this chapter. The special
commissioner shall receive, to be paid equally out of the two funds,
his or her traveling and other expenses incurred in attending meetings
or otherwise in connection with the work of improvement, and such
compensation for his or her services as shall be fixed by the joint
meeting which shall have selected him or her, or failing to be so
fixed, his or her compensation shall be ten dollars per day of actual
service.

Sec. 474 RCW 86.13.090 and 1913 c 54 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
When such a contract shall have been entered into, it shall be
lawful to issue warrants upon said fund though there be at the time of
such issuance no money in the fund, but in such cases the aggregate of
such warrants so issued in any year shall not exceed one-half the
amount of the next annual tax levy required by such contract. Such
warrants shall be stamped by the county treasurer when presented to him
or her for payment, to bear interest at a certain rate thereafter until
paid, such rate to be the then current rate as determined by the county
auditor.

Sec. 475 RCW 86.13.100 and 1915 c 103 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever two counties of this state, acting under a contract made
pursuant to RCW 86.13.010 through 86.13.090, shall make an improvement
in connection with the course, channel, or flow of a river, shall
acquire property by statute, purchase, gift, or otherwise, said
counties, acting through their boards of county commissioners jointly
shall have the power, and are hereby authorized to sell, transfer,
trade, lease, or otherwise dispose of said property by public or
private, negotiation or sale. The deeds to the property so granted,
transferred, leased, or sold shall be executed by the ((chairman))
chair of the meeting of the joint boards of county commissioners, and
attested by the secretary of said joint meeting where the sale is
authorized. The proceeds of the sale of said property shall be used by
said counties for the carrying on, completion or maintenance of said
improvement, as directed by the boards of county commissioners of said
counties acting jointly.

Sec. 476 RCW 86.15.060 and 2005 c 127 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
administration of the affairs of zones shall be in the county engineer.
The engineer may appoint such deputies and engage such employees,
specialists, and technicians as may be required by the zone and as are
authorized by the zone's budget. Subject to the approval of the
supervisors, the engineer may organize, or reorganize as required, the
zone into such departments, divisions, or other administrative
relationships as he or she deems necessary to its efficient operation.
(2) In a zone with supervisors elected pursuant to RCW 86.15.050,
the supervisors may provide for administration of the affairs of the
zone by other than the county engineer, pursuant to the authority
established in RCW 86.15.095 to hire employees, staff, and services and
to enter into contracts.

Sec. 477 RCW 86.15.130 and 1961 c 153 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The treasurer of each zone shall be the county treasurer. He or
she shall establish within his or her office a zone flood control fund
for each zone into which shall be deposited the proceeds of all tax
levies, assessments, gifts, grants, loans, or other revenues which may
become available to a zone.
The treasurer shall also establish the following accounts within
the zone fund:
(1) For each flood control improvement financed by a bond issue, an
account to which shall be deposited the proceeds of any such bond
issue; and
(2) An account for each outstanding bond issue to which will be
deposited any revenues collected for the retirement of such outstanding
bonds or for the payment of interest or charges thereon; and
(3) A general account to which all other receipts of the zone shall
be deposited.

Sec. 478 RCW 86.16.035 and 1995 c 8 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to RCW 43.21A.068, the department of ecology shall have
supervision and control over all dams and obstructions in streams, and
may make reasonable regulations with respect thereto concerning the
flow of water which he or she deems necessary for the protection to
life and property below such works from flood waters.

Sec. 479 RCW 86.24.030 and 1988 c 127 s 39 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state director of ecology, when state funds shall be available
therefor, shall have authority on behalf of the state to enter into
contracts with the United States or any agency thereof and/or with any
such flood control district, county, or counties so acting jointly, for
flood control purposes for any such flood control district, county, or
counties so acting jointly, the amount of the state's participation in
any such contract to be such sum as may be appropriated therefor, or,
in event of unallocated state appropriations for flood control
purposes, in such necessary sum as to any such contract as he or she
shall determine.

Sec. 480 RCW 87.03.025 and 1963 c 20 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever public lands of the state are situated in or taken into an
irrigation district they shall be treated the same as other lands,
except as hereinafter provided. The commissioner of public lands shall
be served with a copy of the petition proposing to include such lands,
together with a map of the district and notice of the time and place of
hearing thereon, at least thirty days before the hearing, and if he or
she determines that such lands will be benefited by being included in
the district he or she shall give his or her consent thereto in
writing. If he or she determines that they will not be benefited he or
she shall file with the board a statement of his or her objections
thereto.
Any public lands of the state which are situated within the
boundaries of an irrigation district, but which were not included in
the district at the time of its organization, may be included after a
hearing as herein provided.
Whenever the commissioner or any interested person desires to have
state public lands included in an existing district, he or she shall
file a request to that effect in writing with the district board, which
shall thereupon fix a time and place for hearing the request and post
notice thereof in three public conspicuous places in the district, one
of which shall be at the place of hearing, at least twenty days before
the hearing, and send by registered mail a copy of the notice to the
commissioner. The notice shall describe the lands to be included and
direct all persons objecting to such inclusion to appear at the time
and place stated and present their objections. At the hearing the
district board shall consider all objections and may adjourn to a later
date, and by resolution determine the matter, and its determination
shall be final: PROVIDED, That no such lands shall be included in a
district without the written consent of the commissioner of public
lands.
Any public lands of the state situated in any irrigation district
shall be subject to the provisions of the laws of this state relating
to the collection of irrigation district assessments to the same extent
and in the same manner in which lands of like character held under
private ownership are subject thereto, but collection and payment of
the assessments shall be governed solely by the provisions of chapter
79.44 RCW.

Sec. 481 RCW 87.03.031 and 1961 c 105 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any qualified district elector who certifies as provided in RCW
87.03.032 through 87.03.034 that he or she cannot conveniently be
present to cast his or her ballot at his or her proper election
precinct on the day of any irrigation district election shall be
entitled to vote by absentee ballot in such election in the manner
herein provided.

Sec. 482 RCW 87.03.032 and 1961 c 105 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The notice of election shall conform to the requirements for
election notices provided by Title 87 RCW for the election being held,
and shall specify in addition that any qualified district elector who
certifies that he or she cannot conveniently be present at his or her
proper election precinct on the day of election may vote by absentee
ballot, and that a ballot and form of certificate of qualifications
will be furnished to him or her on written request being made of the
district's secretary. The requisite ballot and a form of certificate
of qualifications shall be furnished by the district's secretary to any
person who prior to the date of election makes written request
therefor, stating that he or she is a qualified district elector. Such
ballot and form may be furnished also to qualified district electors in
any way deemed to be convenient without regard to requests having been
made therefor.

Sec. 483 RCW 87.03.033 and 1961 c 105 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To be counted in a given election, an absentee ballot must
conform to these requirements:
(a) It must be sealed in an unmarked envelope and delivered to the
district's principal office prior to the close of the polls on the day
of that election; or be sealed in an unmarked envelope and mailed to
the district's secretary, postmarked not later than midnight of that
election day and received by the secretary within five days of that
date.
(b) The sealed envelope containing the ballot shall be accompanied
by a certificate of qualifications stating, with respect to the voter,
his or her name, age, citizenship, residence, that he or she holds
title or evidence of title to lands within the district which, under
RCW 87.03.045 entitles him or her to vote in the election, and that he
or she cannot conveniently be present to cast his or her ballot at his
or her proper election precinct on election day.
(c) The statements in the certificate of qualifications shall be
certified as correct by the voter by the affixing of his or her
signature thereto in the presence of a witness who is acquainted with
the voter, and the voter shall enclose and seal his or her ballot in
the unmarked envelope in the presence of this witness but without
disclosing his or her vote. The witness, by affixing his or her
signature to the certificate of qualifications, shall certify that he
or she is acquainted with the voter, that in his or her presence the
voter's signature was affixed and the ballot enclosed as required in
this paragraph.
(2) The form of statement of qualifications and its certification
shall be substantially as prescribed by the district's board of
directors. This form may also provide that the voter shall describe
all or some part of his or her lands within the district which, under
RCW 87.03.045 entitles him or her to vote in the election, but a voter
otherwise qualified shall not be disqualified because of the absence or
inaccuracy of the description so given. The regular form of irrigation
district ballot shall be used by absentee voters.

Sec. 484 RCW 87.03.045 and 1985 c 66 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In districts with two hundred thousand acres or more, a person
eighteen years old, being a citizen of the United States and a resident
of the state and who holds title or evidence of title to land in the
district or proposed district shall be entitled to vote therein. He or
she shall be entitled to one vote for the first ten acres of said land
or fraction thereof and one additional vote for all of said land over
ten acres. A majority of the directors shall be residents of the
county or counties in which the district is situated and all shall be
electors of the district. If more than one elector residing outside
the county or counties is voted for as director, only that one who
receives the highest number of votes shall be considered in
ascertaining the result of the election. Where land is community
property both the husband and wife may vote if otherwise qualified. An
agent of a corporation owning land in the district, duly authorized in
writing, may vote on behalf of the corporation by filing with the
election officers his or her instrument of authority. An elector
resident in the district shall vote in the precinct in which he or she
resides, all others shall vote in the precinct nearest their residence.

Sec. 485 RCW 87.03.075 and 1985 c 66 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Voting in an irrigation district shall be by ballot. Ballots shall
be of uniform size and quality, provided by the district, and for the
election of directors shall contain only the names of the candidates
who have filed with the secretary of the district a declaration in
writing of their candidacy, or a petition of nomination as hereinafter
provided, not later than five o'clock p.m. on the first Monday in
November. Ballots shall contain space for sticker voting or for the
writing in of the name of an undeclared candidate. Ballots shall be
issued by the election board according to the number of votes an
elector is entitled to cast. A person filing a declaration of
candidacy, or petition of nomination as hereinafter provided, shall
designate therein the position for which he or she is a candidate. No
ballots on any form other than the official form shall be received or
counted.
In any election for directors where the number of votes which may
be received will have no bearing on the length of the term to be
served, the candidates for the position of director, in lieu of filing
a declaration of candidacy hereunder, shall file with the secretary of
the district a petition of nomination signed by at least ten qualified
electors of the district, or of the division if the district has been
divided into director divisions, not later than five o'clock p.m. on
the first Monday in November. If, after the expiration of the date for
filing petitions of nomination, it appears that only one qualified
candidate has been nominated thereby for each position to be filled it
shall not be necessary to hold an election, and the board of directors
shall at their next meeting declare such candidate elected as director.
The secretary shall immediately make and deliver to such person a
certificate of election signed by him or her and bearing the seal of
the district. The procedure set forth in this paragraph shall not
apply to any other irrigation district elections.

Sec. 486 RCW 87.03.080 and 1961 c 192 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
An election of directors in an irrigation district shall be held on
the second Tuesday of December of each year, and the term of each
director shall be three years from the first Tuesday of January
following his or her election. The directors elected at the
organization election shall serve until their successors are elected
and qualified. At the first annual election occurring thirty days or
more after the date of the order establishing the district, there shall
be elected directors to succeed those chosen at the organization
election. If the board consists of three directors the candidate
receiving the highest number of votes shall serve a term of three
years; the next highest, two years; and the next highest, one year. In
case of five directors, the two candidates receiving the highest number
of votes shall each serve a term of three years; the next two highest,
two years; and the next highest, one year; or until successors are
elected and qualified. In case of seven directors, the three
candidates receiving the highest number of votes shall each serve a
term of three years, the next two highest, two years, and the next two
highest, one year, or until their successors are elected and qualified.
Whenever a district with three directors desires to increase the number
of its directors to five directors or whenever a district with five
directors desires to increase the number of its directors to seven
directors, the board of directors, acting on its own initiative or on
the written petition of at least twenty electors of the district, shall
submit the question to the electors of the district at a regular or
special district election. In the event the electors by a majority of
the votes cast favor an increase in the number of directors, there
shall be elected at the next annual district election two additional
directors. The person receiving the highest number of votes shall
serve for a three year term and the next highest, a two year term.
The number of directors may be decreased to five or three, as the
case may be, substantially in the same manner as that provided for the
increase of directors. In case of three directors the term of one
director only shall expire annually.

Sec. 487 RCW 87.03.081 and 1961 c 192 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
A vacancy in the office of director shall be filled by appointment
by the board of county commissioners of the county in which the
proceedings for the organization of the district were had. At the next
annual election occurring thirty days or more after the date of the
appointment, a successor shall be elected who shall take office on the
first Tuesday in January following and shall serve for the remainder of
the unexpired term.
A director appointed to fill a vacancy occurring after the
expiration of the term of a director shall serve until his or her
successor is elected and qualified. At the next election of directors
occurring thirty days or more after the appointment, a successor shall
be elected who shall take office on the first Tuesday in January next
and shall serve for the term for which he or she was elected.
Failure on the part of any irrigation district to hold one or more
annual elections for selection of officers, or otherwise to provide
district officers shall not dissolve the district or impair its powers,
where later officers for the district are appointed or elected and
qualify as such and exercise the powers and duties of their offices in
the manner provided by law.

Sec. 488 RCW 87.03.082 and 1961 c 192 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each director shall take and subscribe an official oath for the
faithful discharge of the duties of his or her office, and shall
execute a bond to the district in the sum of one thousand dollars,
conditioned for the faithful discharge of his or her duties, which
shall be approved by the judge of the superior court of the county
where the district was organized, and the oath and bond shall be
recorded in the office of the county clerk of that county and filed
with the secretary of the board of directors. The secretary shall take
and subscribe a written oath of office and execute a bond in the sum of
not less than one thousand dollars to be fixed by the directors, which
shall be approved and filed as in the case of the bond of a director.
If a district is appointed fiscal agent of the United States to collect
money for it, the secretary and directors and the district treasurer
shall each execute such additional bonds as the secretary of the
interior may require, conditioned for the faithful discharge of their
duties which shall be approved, recorded, and filed as other official
bonds. All such bonds shall be secured at the cost of the district.

Sec. 489 RCW 87.03.090 and 1931 c 60 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The inspector is ((chairman)) chair of the election board, and may
First: Administer all oaths required in the progress of an
election.
Second: Appoint judges and clerks, if, during the progress of the
election, any judge or clerk cease to act. Any member of the board of
election, or any clerk thereof, may administer and certify oaths
required to be administered during the progress of an election. The
board of election for each precinct may, if they deem it necessary,
before opening the polls, appoint two persons to act as clerks of the
election. Before opening the polls, each member of the board and each
clerk must take and subscribe an oath to faithfully perform the duties
imposed upon them by law. Any elector of the precinct may administer
and certify such oath. The polls must be opened at one o'clock p.m. on
the afternoon of the election, and be kept open until eight o'clock
p.m., when the same must be closed. The provisions of the general
election law of this state, concerning the form of ballots to be used
shall not apply to elections held under this act: PROVIDED, That any
district elections called before this act shall take effect shall be
noticed and conducted in the manner prescribed by law in effect at the
time the election is called.

Sec. 490 RCW 87.03.100 and 1981 c 345 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
As soon as all the votes are read off and counted, a certificate
shall be drawn upon each of the papers containing the poll list and
tallies, or attached thereto, stating the number of votes each one
voted for has received, and designating the office to fill which he or
she was voted for, which number shall be written in figures and in
words at full length. Each certificate shall be signed by the
((clerk[s])) clerks, ((judge[s])) judges, and the inspector. One of
said certificates, with the poll list and the tally paper to which it
is attached, shall be retained by the inspector, and preserved by him
or her at least six months. The ballots, together with the other of
said certificates, with the poll list and tally paper to which it is
attached, shall be sealed by the inspector, in the presence of the
judges and clerks, and endorsed "Election returns of [naming the
precinct] precinct," and be directed to the secretary of the board of
directors, and shall be immediately delivered by the inspector, or by
some other safe and responsible carrier designated by said inspector,
to said secretary, and the ballots shall be kept unopened for at least
six months, and if any person be of the opinion that the vote of any
precinct has not been correctly counted, he or she may appear on the
day appointed for the board of directors to open and canvass the
returns, and demand a recount of the vote of the precinct that is so
claimed to have been incorrectly counted.

Sec. 491 RCW 87.03.110 and 1913 c 165 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of the board of directors must, as soon as the result
is declared, enter in the records of such board a statement of such
result, which statement must show:
(1) The whole number of votes cast in the district;
(2) The name of the persons voted for;
(3) The office to fill which each person was voted for;
(4) The number of votes given in each precinct to each of such
persons;
(5) The number of votes given in each precinct for and against any
proposition voted upon.
The board of directors must declare elected the person having the
highest number of votes given for each office. The secretary must
immediately make out, and deliver to such person a certificate of
election signed by him or her and authenticated by the seal of the
district.

Sec. 492 RCW 87.03.115 and 1983 c 262 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The directors of the district shall organize as a board and shall
elect a president from their number, and appoint a secretary, who shall
keep a record of their proceedings. The office of the directors and
principal place of business of the district shall be at some place in
the county in which the organization was effected, to be designated by
the directors. The directors serving districts of five thousand acres
or more shall hold a regular monthly meeting at their office on the
first Tuesday in every month, or on such other day in each month as the
board shall direct in its bylaws, and may adjourn any meeting from time
to time as may be required for the proper transaction of business.
Directors serving districts of less than five thousand acres shall hold
at least quarterly meetings on a day designated by the board's bylaws,
and may adjourn any meeting from time to time as may be required for
the proper transaction of business. Special meetings shall be called
and conducted in the manner required by chapter 42.30 RCW. All
meetings of the directors must be public. A majority of the directors
shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and in all
matters requiring action by the board there shall be a concurrence of
at least a majority of the directors. All records of the board shall
be open to the inspection of any electors during business hours. The
board shall have the power, and it shall be its duty, to adopt a seal
of the district, to manage and conduct the business and affairs of the
district, to make and execute all necessary contracts, to employ and
appoint such agents, officers, and employees as may be necessary and
prescribe their duties, and to establish equitable bylaws, rules, and
regulations for the government and management of the district, and for
the equitable distribution of water to the lands within the district,
upon the basis of the beneficial use thereof, and generally to perform
all such acts as shall be necessary to fully carry out the provisions
of this chapter: PROVIDED, That all water, the right to the use of
which is acquired by the district under any contract with the United
States shall be distributed and apportioned by the district in
accordance with the acts of congress, and rules and regulations of the
secretary of the interior until full reimbursement has been made to the
United States, and in accordance with the provisions of said contract
in relation thereto. The bylaws, rules, and regulations must be on
file and open to inspection of any elector during regular business
hours. All leases, contracts, or other form of holding any interest in
any state or other public lands shall be, and the same are hereby
declared to be title to and evidence of title to lands and for all
purposes within this act, shall be treated as the private property of
the lessee or owner of the contractual or possessory interest:
PROVIDED, That nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the
title of the state or other public ownership, nor shall any lien for
such assessment attach to the fee simple title of the state or other
public ownership. The board of directors shall have authority to
develop and to sell, lease, or rent the use of: (1) Water derived from
the operation of the district water facilities to such municipal and
quasi municipal entities, the state of Washington, and state entities
and agencies, public and private corporations and individuals located
within and outside the boundaries of the district and on such terms and
conditions as the board of directors shall determine; and (2) power
derived from hydroelectric facilities authorized by RCW 87.03.015(1) as
now or hereafter amended, to such municipal or quasi municipal
corporations and cooperatives authorized to engage in the business of
distributing electricity, electrical companies subject to the
jurisdiction of the utilities and transportation commission, and other
irrigation districts and on such terms and conditions as the board of
directors shall determine: PROVIDED, No water shall be furnished for
use outside of said district until all demands and requirements for
water for use in said district are furnished and supplied by said
district: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That as soon as any public lands
situated within the limits of the district shall be acquired by any
private person, or held under any title of private ownership, the owner
thereof shall be entitled to receive his or her proportion of water as
in case of other land owners, upon payment by him or her of such sums
as shall be determined by the board, and at the time to be fixed by the
board, which sums shall be such equitable amount as such lands should
pay having regard to placing said lands on the basis of equality with
other lands in the district as to benefits received, and giving credit
if equitable for any sums paid as water rent by the occupant of said
lands prior to the vesting of private ownership, and such lands shall
also become subject to all taxes and assessments of the district
thereafter imposed.

Sec. 493 RCW 87.03.175 and 1923 c 138 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
Said director shall forthwith consider said certified report and if
he or she deem it advisable make, through the appropriate divisions of
his or her department, additional studies of the project at the expense
of the district, and as soon as practicable thereafter, but in any
event within ninety days from the receipt of said certified report,
make his or her findings and submit the same to the district board.

Sec. 494 RCW 87.03.180 and 1923 c 138 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
In his or her findings said state director shall give generally his
or her conclusions regarding the supply of water available for the
project, the nature of the soil proposed to be irrigated and its
susceptibility to irrigation, the duty of water for irrigation and the
probable need of drainage, the probable cost of works, water rights,
and other property necessary for the project, the conditions of land
settlement therein, and the proper amount and dates of maturity of the
bonds proposed to be issued, and such other matters as he or she deems
pertinent to the success of the project, provided that said findings
and conclusions shall be advisory only and shall not be binding upon
the directors of the irrigation district.

Sec. 495 RCW 87.03.245 and 1919 c 180 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of directors must allow the secretary as many deputies,
to be appointed by them, as will, in the judgment of the board, enable
him or her to complete the assessment within the time herein
prescribed. The board must fix the compensation of such deputies for
the time actually engaged.

Sec. 496 RCW 87.03.250 and 1921 c 129 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
On or before the first Tuesday in September in each year to and
including the year 1923, and on or before the first Tuesday in November
beginning with the year 1924 and each year thereafter, the secretary
must complete his or her assessment roll and deliver it to the board,
who must immediately give a notice thereof, and of the time the board
of directors, acting as a board of equalization will meet to equalize
assessments, by publication in a newspaper published in each of the
counties comprising the district. The time fixed for the meeting shall
not be less than twenty nor more than thirty days from the first
publication of the notice, and in the meantime the assessment roll must
remain in the office of the secretary for the inspection of all persons
interested.

Sec. 497 RCW 87.03.255 and 1921 c 129 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the day specified in the notice required by RCW 87.03.250 for
the meeting, the board of directors, which is hereby constituted a
board of equalization for that purpose, shall meet and continue in
session from day to day as long as may be necessary, not to exceed ten
days, exclusive of Sundays, to hear and determine such objections to
the said assessment roll as may come before them; and the board may
change the same as may be just. The secretary of the board shall be
present during its session, and note all changes made at said hearing;
and on or before the 30th day of October in each year to and including
the year 1923, and on or before the 15th day of January beginning with
the (([year])) year 1925 and each year thereafter he or she shall have
the assessment roll completed as finally equalized by the board.

Sec. 498 RCW 87.03.260 and 1983 c 167 s 216 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of directors shall in each year before said roll is
delivered by the secretary to the respective county treasurers, levy an
assessment sufficient to raise the ensuing annual interest on the
outstanding bonds, and all payments due or to become due in the ensuing
year to the United States or the state of Washington under any contract
between the district and the United States or the state of Washington
accompanying which bonds of the district have not been deposited with
the United States or the state of Washington as in this act provided.
Beginning in the year preceding the maturity of the first series of the
bonds of any issue, the board must from year to year increase said
assessment for the ensuing years in an amount sufficient to pay and
discharge the outstanding bonds as they mature. Similar levy and
assessment shall be made for the expense fund which shall include
operation and maintenance costs for the ensuing year. The board shall
also at the time of making the annual levy, estimate the amount of all
probable delinquencies on said levy and shall thereupon levy a
sufficient amount to cover the same and a further amount sufficient to
cover any deficit that may have resulted from delinquent assessments
for any preceding year. The board shall also, at the time of making
the annual levy, estimate the amount of the assessments to be made
against lands owned by the district, including local improvement
assessments, and shall levy a sufficient amount to pay said
assessments. All lands owned by the district shall be exempt from
general state and county taxes: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That in the event
any lands, and any improvements located thereon, acquired by the
district by reason of the foreclosure of irrigation district
assessments, shall be by said district resold on contract, then and in
that event, said land, and any such improvements, shall be by the
county assessor immediately placed upon the tax rolls for taxation as
real property and shall become subject to general property taxes from
and after the date of said contract, and the secretary of the said
irrigation district shall be required to immediately report such sale
within ten days from the date of said contract to the county assessor
who shall cause the property to be entered on the tax rolls as of the
first day of January following.
The board may also at the time of making the said annual levy, levy
an amount not to exceed twenty-five percent of the whole levy for the
said year for the purpose of creating a surplus fund. This fund may be
used for any of the district purposes authorized by law. The
assessments, when collected by the county treasurer, shall constitute
a special fund, or funds, as the case may be, to be called
respectively, the "Bond Fund of . . . . . . Irrigation District," the
"Contract Fund of . . . . . . Irrigation District," the "Expense Fund
of . . . . . . Irrigation District," the " Warrant Fund of . . . . . .
Irrigation District," the "Surplus Fund of . . . . . . Irrigation
District".
If the annual assessment roll of any district has not been
delivered to the county treasurer on or before the 15th day of January
in the year 1927, and in each year thereafter, he or she shall notify
the secretary of the district by registered mail that said assessment
roll must be delivered to the office of the county treasurer forthwith.
If said assessment roll is not delivered within ten days from the date
of mailing of said notice to the secretary of the district, or if said
roll when delivered is not equalized and the required assessments
levied as required by law, or if for any reason the required assessment
or levy has not been made, the county treasurer shall immediately
notify the legislative authority of the county in which the office of
the board of directors is situated, and said county legislative
authority shall cause an assessment roll for the said district to be
prepared and shall equalize the same if necessary and make the levy
required by this chapter in the same manner and with like effect as if
the same had been equalized and made by the said board of directors,
and all expenses incident thereto shall be borne by the district. In
case of neglect or refusal of the secretary of the district to perform
the duties imposed by law, then the treasurer of the county in which
the office of the board of directors is situated must perform such
duties, and shall be accountable therefor, on his or her official bond,
as in other cases.
At the time of making the annual levy in the year preceding the
final maturity of any issue of district bonds, the board of directors
shall levy a sufficient amount to pay and redeem all bonds of said
issue then remaining unpaid. All surplus remaining in any bond fund
after all bonds are paid in full must be transferred to the surplus
fund of the district.
Any surplus moneys in the surplus fund or any surplus moneys in the
bond fund when so requested by the board of directors shall be invested
by the treasurer of said county under the direction of said board of
directors in United States bonds or bonds of the state of Washington,
or any bonds pronounced by the treasurer of the state of Washington as
valid security for the deposit of public funds, and in addition thereto
any bonds or warrants of said district, all of which shall be kept in
the surplus fund until needed by the district for the purposes
authorized by law.

Sec. 499 RCW 87.03.270 and 2009 c 350 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The assessment roll, before its equalization and adoption, shall be
checked and compared as to descriptions and ownerships, with the county
treasurer's land rolls. On or before the fifteenth day of January in
each year the secretary must deliver the assessment roll or the
respective segregation thereof to the county treasurer of each
respective county in which the lands therein described are located, and
said assessments shall become due and payable after the county
treasurer has completed the property tax roll for the current year's
collection and provided the notification required by RCW 84.56.020.
All assessments on said roll shall become delinquent on the first
day of May following the filing of the roll unless the assessments are
paid on or before the thirtieth day of April of said year: PROVIDED,
That if an assessment is ten dollars or more for said year and if one-half of the assessment is paid on or before the thirtieth day of April,
the remainder shall be due and payable on or before the thirty-first
day of October following and shall be delinquent after that date. All
delinquent assessments shall bear interest at the rate of twelve
percent per annum, computed on a monthly basis and without compounding,
from the date of delinquency until paid.
Upon receiving the assessment roll the county treasurer shall
prepare therefrom an assessment book in which shall be written the
description of the land as it appears in the assessment roll, the name
of the owner or owners where known, and if assessed to the unknown
owners, then the word "unknown", and the total assessment levied
against each tract of land. Proper space shall be left in said book
for the entry therein of all subsequent proceedings relating to the
payment and collection of said assessments.
On or before April 1st of each year, the treasurer of the district
shall send a statement of assessments due. County treasurers who
collect irrigation district assessments may send the statement of
irrigation district assessments together with the statement of general
taxes.
Upon payment of any assessment the county treasurer must enter the
date of said payment in said assessment book opposite the description
of the land and the name of the person paying and give a receipt to
such person specifying the amount of the assessment and the amount paid
with the description of the property assessed.
It shall be the duty of the treasurer of the district to furnish
upon request of the owner, or any person interested, a statement
showing any and all assessments levied as shown by the assessment roll
in his or her office upon land described in such request. All
statements of irrigation district assessments covering any land in the
district shall show the amount of the irrigation district assessment,
the dates on which the assessment is due, the place of payment, and, if
the property was sold for delinquent assessments in a prior year, the
amount of the delinquent assessment and the notation "certificate
issued": PROVIDED, That the failure of the treasurer to render any
statement herein required of him or her shall not render invalid any
assessments made by any irrigation district.
It shall be the duty of the county treasurer of any county, other
than the county in which the office of the board of directors is
located, to make monthly remittances to the county treasurer of the
county in which the office of the board of directors is located
covering all amounts collected by him or her for the irrigation
district during the preceding month.
When the treasurer collects a delinquent assessment, the treasurer
shall collect any other amounts due by reason of the delinquency,
including accrued costs, which shall be deposited to the treasurer's
operation and maintenance fund.

Sec. 500 RCW 87.03.272 and 1982 c 102 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 87.03.260, 87.03.270,
87.03.440, and 87.03.445, the board of directors of any district acting
as fiscal agent for the United States or the state of Washington for
the collection of any irrigation charges may authorize the secretary of
the district to act as the exclusive collection agent for the
collection of all nondelinquent irrigation assessments of the district
pursuant to such rules and regulations as the board of directors may
adopt.
When the secretary acts as collection agent, his or her official
bond shall be of a sufficient amount as determined by the board of
directors of the district to cover any amounts he or she may be
handling while acting as collection agent, in addition to any other
amount required by reason of his or her other duties.
The assessment roll of such district shall be delivered to the
county treasurer in accordance with the provisions of RCW 87.03.260 and
87.03.270 and the assessment roll shall be checked and verified by the
county treasurer as provided in RCW 87.03.270.
After the assessment roll has been checked and verified by the
county treasurer, the secretary of the district shall proceed to
publish the notice as required under RCW 87.03.270; except that the
notice shall provide that until the assessments and tolls become
delinquent on November 1st they shall be due and payable in the office
of the secretary of the district.
When the secretary of such district receives payments, he or she
shall issue a receipt for such payments and shall be accountable on his
or her official bond for the safekeeping of such funds and shall remit
the same, along with an itemized statement of receipts, at least once
each month to the county treasurer wherein the land is located on which
the payment was made.
When the county treasurer receives the monthly statement of
receipts from the secretary, he or she shall enter the payments shown
thereon on the assessment roll maintained in his or her office.
On the fifteenth day of November of each year it shall be the duty
of the secretary to transmit to the county treasurer the delinquency
list which shall include the names, amounts, and such other information
as the county treasurer shall require, and thereafter the secretary
shall not accept any payment on the delinquent portion of any account.
Upon receipt of the list of delinquencies, the county treasurer shall
proceed under the provisions of this chapter as though he or she were
the collection agent for such district to the extent of such delinquent
accounts.

Sec. 501 RCW 87.03.280 and 1925 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Where any district under contract with the United States has levied
any assessment for the collection of money payable to the United States
under such contract, and the secretary of the interior has by agreement
with the board of directors of said district, authorized the extension
or cancellation of any payments due to the United States by the
cancellation of assessments already levied therefor but remaining
unpaid, the board of directors of such district shall certify to the
county treasurer of the county in which the land is located, a
statement of the year and amounts assessed against each tract for which
such cancellation has been authorized, and the county treasurer, upon
receipt of such certificate, shall, in all cases where the assessment
remains unpaid and the lands have not been sold, endorse upon the
district's assessment roll, "Corrected under Certificate of Board of
Directors" and shall deduct and cancel from the assessment against each
such tract the amount of such assessment so authorized to be canceled;
and in all cases where such cancellations have been certified to the
county treasurer after such lands assessed have been sold and before
the period of redemption shall have expired, the county treasurer
shall, in those cases where the tract assessed has been sold to the
district, and the district is the owner of the certificate of sale,
require the district to surrender its certificate of sale and shall
thereupon deduct the amount of such cancellation plus the penalties
thereon upon the original assessment roll with an endorsement,
"Corrected under Certificate of Board of Directors" and he or she shall
thereupon issue to the district in lieu of the certificate surrendered,
a substitute certificate of sale for the corrected amount of such
assessment, if any, remaining uncanceled, and shall file a copy thereof
in the office of the county auditor as in the case of the original
certificate surrendered, and such substitute certificate shall entitle
the holder thereof to all rights possessed under the original
certificate so corrected as to amount: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That such
cancellation shall have the same effect as though the lands had
originally not been assessed for the amounts so deducted and shall not
operate to bar the district of the right in making subsequent annual
assessments to levy and collect against such tracts the amount of any
money due the United States, including the amount of any assessments so
canceled.

Sec. 502 RCW 87.03.440 and 1996 c 320 s 18 and 1996 c 214 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The treasurer of the county in which is located the office of the
district shall be ex officio treasurer of the district, and any county
treasurer handling district funds shall be liable upon his or her
official bond and to criminal prosecution for malfeasance and
misfeasance, or failure to perform any duty as county or district
treasurer. The treasurer of each county in which lands of the district
are located shall collect and receipt for all assessments levied on
lands within his or her county. There shall be deposited with the
district treasurer all funds of the district. The district treasurer
shall pay out such funds upon warrants issued by the county auditor
against the proper funds of the district, except the sums to be paid
out of the bond fund for interest and principal payments on bonds:
PROVIDED, That in those districts which designate their own treasurer,
the treasurer may issue the warrants or any checks when the district is
authorized to issue checks. All warrants shall be paid in the order of
their issuance. The district treasurer shall report, in writing, on
the first Monday in each month to the directors, the amount in each
fund, the receipts for the month preceding in each fund, and file the
report with the secretary of the board. The secretary shall report to
the board, in writing, at the regular meeting in each month, the amount
of receipts and expenditures during the preceding month, and file the
report in the office of the board.
The preceding paragraph of this section notwithstanding, the board
of directors or board of control of an irrigation district which lies
in more than one county and which had assessments in each of two of the
preceding three years equal to at least five hundred thousand dollars,
or a board of joint control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, may
designate some other person having experience in financial or fiscal
matters as treasurer of the district. In addition, the board of
directors of an irrigation district which lies entirely within one
county may designate some other person having experience in financial
or fiscal matters as treasurer of the district if the district had
assessments, tolls, and miscellaneous collections in each of two of the
preceding three years equal to at least two million dollars or if the
board has the approval of the county treasurer to designate some other
person. If a board designates a treasurer, it shall require a bond
with a surety company authorized to do business in the state of
Washington in an amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars
conditioned that he or she will faithfully perform the duties of his or
her office as treasurer of the district. The premium on the bond shall
be paid by the district. The designated treasurer shall collect and
receipt for all irrigation district assessments on lands within the
district and shall act with the same powers and duties and be under the
same restrictions as provided by law for county treasurers acting in
matters pertaining to irrigation districts, except the powers, duties,
and restrictions in RCW 87.56.110 and 87.56.210 which shall continue to
be those of county treasurers.
In those districts which have designated their own treasurers, the
provisions of law pertaining to irrigation districts which require
certain acts to be done and which refer to and involve a county
treasurer or the office of a county treasurer or the county officers
charged with the collection of irrigation district assessments, except
RCW 87.56.110 and 87.56.210 shall be construed to refer to and involve
the designated district treasurer or the office of the designated
district treasurer.
Any claim against the district for which it is liable under
existing laws shall be presented to the board as provided in RCW
4.96.020 and upon allowance it shall be attached to a voucher and
approved by the ((chairman)) chair and signed by the secretary and
directed to the proper official for payment: PROVIDED, That in the
event claimant's claim is for crop damage, the claimant in addition to
filing his or her claim within the applicable period of limitations
within which an action must be commenced and in the manner specified in
RCW 4.96.020 must file with the secretary of the district, or in the
secretary's absence one of the directors, not less than three days
prior to the severance of the crop alleged to be damaged, a written
preliminary notice pertaining to the crop alleged to be damaged. Such
preliminary notice, so far as claimant is able, shall advise the
district; that the claimant has filed a claim or intends to file a
claim against the district for alleged crop damage; shall give the name
and present residence of the claimant; shall state the cause of the
damage to the crop alleged to be damaged and the estimated amount of
damage; and shall accurately locate and describe where the crop alleged
to be damaged is located. Such preliminary notice may be given by
claimant or by anyone acting in his or her behalf and need not be
verified. No action may be commenced against an irrigation district
for crop damages unless claimant has complied with the provisions of
RCW 4.96.020 and also with the preliminary notice requirements of this
section.

Sec. 503 RCW 87.03.442 and 1961 c 276 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary or other authorized person shall issue receipts for
all moneys received for deposit in such funds and he or she and any
other person handling the funds shall furnish a surety bond to be
approved by the board and the attorney for the district, in such amount
as the board may designate and conditioned for the safekeeping of such
funds and the premium thereon shall be paid by the district.
Upon depositing any district funds the secretary shall demand and
the depositary bank shall furnish a surety bond, to be approved by the
board and the attorney, in an amount equal to the maximum deposit,
conditioned for the prompt payment of the deposits upon demand, and the
bond shall not be canceled during the time for which it was written.
Or the depositary may deposit with the secretary or in some bank to the
credit of the district in lieu of the bond, securities approved by the
board of a market value in an amount not less than the amount of the
maximum deposit. All depositaries which have qualified for insured
deposits under any federal deposit insurance act need not furnish bonds
or securities, except for so much of the deposit as is not so insured.

Sec. 504 RCW 87.03.570 and 1889-90 p 695 s 50 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of directors, at the time and place mentioned in said
notice, or at such other time or times to which the hearing of said
petition may be adjourned, shall proceed to hear the petition and all
the objections thereto presented in writing by any person showing
cause, as aforesaid, why said proposed change of the boundaries of the
district should not be made. The failure by any person interested in
said district, or in the matter of the proposed change of its
boundaries, to show cause in writing, as aforesaid, shall be deemed and
taken as an assent on his or her part to a change of the boundaries of
the district as prayed for in said petition, or to such a change
thereof as will include a part of said lands. And the filing of such
petition with said board, as aforesaid, shall be deemed and taken as an
assent on the part of each and all of such petitioners to such a change
of said boundaries that they may include the whole or any portion of
the lands described in said petition.

Sec. 505 RCW 87.03.610 and 1889-90 p 698 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
A guardian, an executor or administrator of an estate, who is
appointed as such under the laws of this state, and who, as such
guardian, executor or administrator, is entitled to the possession of
the lands belonging to the estate which he or she represents, may, on
behalf of his or her ward or the estate which he or she represents,
upon being thereunto authorized by the proper court, sign and
acknowledge the petition in this act mentioned, and may show cause, as
in this act mentioned, why the boundaries of the district should not be
changed.

Sec. 506 RCW 87.03.660 and 1921 c 129 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of directors, at the time and place mentioned in the
notice, or at the time or times to which the hearing of said petition
may be adjourned, shall proceed to hear the petition, and all
objections thereto presented in writing, by any person showing cause,
as aforesaid, why the prayer of said petition should not be granted.
The failure of any person interested in said district or consolidated
district to show cause, in writing, why the tract or tracts of land
mentioned in said petition should not be excluded from said district,
or the former district mentioned should not be excluded from the
consolidated district, as the case may be, shall be deemed and taken as
an assent by him or her to such exclusion, and the filing of such
petition with such board, as aforesaid, shall be deemed and taken as an
assent by each and all of such petitioners to such exclusion.

Sec. 507 RCW 87.03.690 and 1889-90 p 703 s 71 are each amended to
read as follows:
A guardian, and executor or an administrator of an estate who is
appointed as such under the laws of this state, and who, as such
guardian, executor or administrator, is entitled to the possession of
the lands belonging to the estate which he or she represents, may, on
behalf of his or her ward or the estate which he or she represents,
upon being thereto properly authorized by the proper court, sign and
acknowledge the petition in this act mentioned, and may show cause, as
in this act provided, why the boundaries of the district should not be
changed.

Sec. 508 RCW 87.03.760 and 1988 c 202 s 86 are each amended to
read as follows:
At the conclusion, or final adjournment, of the hearing provided
for in RCW 87.03.755, the board of directors of the district shall have
the power, by unanimous resolution to adopt the proposed plan, or such
modification thereof as may be determined by the board, and reduce the
boundaries of the district to such area as, in the judgment of the
board, can be furnished with sufficient water for successful irrigation
by the irrigation system of the district, and to exclude from the
district all lands lying outside of such reduced boundaries, and
provide for the repayment to the owners of any such excluded lands,
respectively, of any sums paid for assessments levied by the district,
and to cancel all unpaid assessments levied by the district against the
lands excluded and release such lands from further liability therefor.
Any person interested and feeling himself or herself aggrieved by the
adoption of such final resolution reducing the boundaries of the
district and excluding lands therefrom, shall have a right of appeal
from the action of the board to the superior court of the county in
which the district is situated, which appeal may be taken in the manner
provided by law for appeals from justices' courts, and if upon the
hearing of such appeal it shall be determined by the court that the
irrigation system of the district will not furnish sufficient water for
the successful irrigation of the lands included within the reduced
boundaries of the district, or that any lands have been excluded from
the district unnecessarily, arbitrarily, capriciously, or fraudulently
or without substantial reason for such exclusion, the court shall enter
a decree canceling and setting aside the proceedings of the board of
directors, otherwise the court shall enter a decree confirming the
action of the board. Any party to the proceedings on appeal in the
superior court, feeling himself or herself aggrieved by the decree of
the superior court confirming the action of the board of directors of
the district reducing the boundaries of the district and excluding
lands therefrom, may seek appellate review within thirty days after the
entry of the decree of the superior court in the manner provided by
law. If, at the expiration of thirty days from the entry of the final
resolution of the board of directors of the district reducing the
boundaries of the district and excluding lands therefrom, no appeal has
been taken to the superior court of the county in which the district is
situated, or if, after hearing upon appeal the superior court shall
confirm the action of the district, and at the expiration of thirty
days from the entry of such decree, no appellate review is sought, the
boundaries of the district shall thereafter be in accordance with the
resolution of the board reducing the boundaries, and all lands excluded
from the district by such resolution shall be relieved from all further
liability for any indebtedness of the district or any unpaid
assessments theretofore levied against such lands, and the owners of
excluded lands, upon which assessments have been paid, shall be
entitled to warrants of the district for all sums paid by reason of
such assessments, payable from a special fund created for that purpose,
for which levies shall be made upon the lands remaining in the
district, as the board of directors may provide.

Sec. 509 RCW 87.03.765 and 1988 c 202 s 87 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever it shall appear, to the satisfaction of the director of
ecology, that the irrigation system of any irrigation district, to
which the department of ecology of the state of Washington under a
contract with the district for the purchase of its bonds, has advanced
funds for the purpose of constructing an irrigation system for the
district, has been found incapable of furnishing sufficient water for
the successful irrigation of all of the lands of such district, and
that the board of directors of such district has reduced the boundaries
thereof and excluded from the district, as provided in RCW 87.03.750
through 87.03.760, sufficient lands to render such irrigation system
adequate for the successful irrigation of the lands of the district,
and that more than thirty days have elapsed since the adoption of the
resolution by the board of directors reducing the boundaries of the
district and excluding lands therefrom, and no appeal has been taken
from the action of the board, or that the action of the board has been
confirmed by the superior court of the county in which the district is
situated and no appeal has been taken to the supreme court or the court
of appeals, or that upon review by the supreme court or the court of
appeals the action of the board of directors of the district has been
confirmed, the director of ecology shall be and he or she is hereby
authorized to cancel and reduce the obligation of the district to the
department of ecology, for the repayment of moneys advanced for the
construction of an irrigation system for the district, to such amount
as, in his or her judgment, the district will be able to pay from
revenues derived from assessments upon the remaining lands of the
district, and to accept, in payment of the balance of the obligation of
the district, the authorized bonds of the district, in numerical order
beginning with the lowest number, on the basis of the percentage of the
face value thereof fixed in contracts between the district and the
department of ecology, in an amount equal to said balance of the
obligation of the district, in full and complete satisfaction of all
claims of the department of ecology against the district.

Sec. 510 RCW 87.03.820 and 1973 c 150 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever as the result of abandonment of an irrigation district
right-of-way real property held by an irrigation district is to be sold
or otherwise disposed of, notice shall be given to the owners of lands
adjoining that real property and such owners shall have a right of
first refusal to purchase at the appraised price all or any part of the
real property to be sold or otherwise disposed of which adjoins or is
adjacent to their land.
Real property to be sold or otherwise disposed of under this
section shall have been first appraised by the county assessor or by a
person designated by him or her.
Notice under this section shall be sufficient if sent by registered
mail to the owner, and at the address, as shown in the tax records of
the county in which the land is situated. Notice under this section
shall be in addition to any other notice required by law.
After sixty days from the date of sending of notice, if no
applications for purchase have been received by the irrigation district
or other person or entity sending notice, the rights of first refusal
of owners of adjoining lands shall be deemed to have been waived, and
the real property may be sold or otherwise disposed of.
If two or more owners of adjoining lands apply to purchase the same
real property, or apply to purchase overlapping parts of the real
property, the respective rights of the applicants may be determined in
the superior court of the county in which the real property is
situated; and the court may divide the real property in question
between some or all of the applicants or award the whole to one
applicant, as justice may require.
Any sale or other disposal of real property pursuant to chapters
87.52, 87.53, and 87.56 RCW shall be made in accordance with the
requirements of this section.

Sec. 511 RCW 87.04.010 and 1961 c 192 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
An irrigation district comprising two hundred thousand or more
acres, or irrigation districts comprising less than two hundred
thousand acres which have followed the optional procedure specified in
this amendatory act, shall be divided into divisions of as nearly equal
area as practical, consistent with being fair and equitable to the
electors of the district. The number of divisions shall be the same as
the number of directors, which shall be numbered first, second, third,
etc. One director, who shall be an elector of the division, shall be
elected for each division of the district by the electors of his or her
division. A district elector shall be considered an elector of the
division in which he or she holds title to or evidence of title to
land. An elector holding title to or evidence of title to land in more
than one division shall be considered an elector of the division
nearest his or her place of residence.

Sec. 512 RCW 87.22.065 and 1929 c 120 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
Said notice shall state that the district (naming it) proposes to
issue and dispose of a refunding bond issue specifying the amount; that
proceedings have been instituted in the superior court of the state of
Washington in and for the specified county to determine the maximum
benefits to be received by the lands within the operation of said
district from the issuance and disposal of said proposed bond issue,
and further to determine the irrigable acreage which will be assessed
for the payment of said bonds, shall state that a schedule of the lands
involved together with a statement of the amount of maximum benefits
received by the amount of irrigable acreage in each respectively, is on
file in said proceedings and may be inspected by any interested person,
shall state the time and place fixed for the hearing of the petition
and shall state that any person interested in such proceedings may on
or before the day fixed for said hearing file his or her written
objections thereto with the clerk of said court, or he or she will be
forever bound by such orders as the court shall make in such
proceedings.

Sec. 513 RCW 87.22.215 and 1929 c 120 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any bondholder or group of bondholders shall have the right to
request said county treasurer in writing to pay the interest and
installments of principal of his or her or their bond or bonds to such
agent as may be designated in said request and payment to said agent
shall constitute a valid payment to the record owner or owners of said
bond or bonds within the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 514 RCW 87.25.030 and 1988 c 127 s 51 are each amended to
read as follows:
If, after the investigation herein provided for, the director finds
that the project of the district is feasible, that the bond issue
proposed to be certified is necessary and in sufficient amount to
complete the improvement contemplated and that the district shows a
clear probability of successful operation, he or she shall submit a
complete transcript, to be furnished and certified by the district, of
the proceedings relating to the organization and establishment of the
district and relating to or affecting the validity of the bond issue
involved, to the attorney general, for his or her written opinion as to
the legality of the same. If the attorney general finds that any of
the matters submitted in the transcript are not legally sufficient he
or she shall so state in his or her opinion to the director of ecology.
The district shall then be given an opportunity, if possible, to
correct the proceeding or thing complained of to the satisfaction of
the attorney general. If the attorney general finds that all the
matters submitted in the transcript as originally submitted or as
subsequently corrected are legally sufficient said director shall
thereupon file his or her report with the secretary of state and
forward a copy to the secretary of the district, to be kept among the
records of the district.

Sec. 515 RCW 87.25.060 and 1923 c 51 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
When the proposed bond issue has been finally approved by the
director, he or she shall file a supplemental report with the secretary
of state giving the numbers, date or dates of issue, and denominations
of said bonds which shall then be entitled to certification as herein
provided.

Sec. 516 RCW 87.25.100 and 1988 c 127 s 55 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the bonds of any irrigation district have been certified,
as provided in this chapter, no expenditures shall be made from the
proceeds of such bonds, nor shall any liability chargeable against such
proceeds be incurred, until there shall have been filed with and
approved by the director of ecology a schedule of proposed expenditures
in such form as said director shall prescribe, and no expenditures from
the proceeds of said bonds shall be made for any purpose in excess of
the amount allowed therefor in such schedule without the written
consent of said director: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That, if it shall be
necessary, the attorney general may employ competent attorneys to
assist him or her in the performance of his or her duties under this
chapter, said attorneys to be paid by the irrigation district for which
services are rendered from any of the funds of said district at such
time and in such manner as the attorney general shall require.

Sec. 517 RCW 87.52.030 and 1897 c 79 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the delivery of said petition the board of directors of said
irrigation district shall, at their next succeeding regular monthly
meeting, order an election, the date of which election shall be within
twenty days from the date of said meeting of the board of directors and
which election shall be conducted as other elections of irrigation
districts are conducted. At said election the qualified electors of
said irrigation district shall cast ballots which shall contain the
words "Disorganize, Yes," or "Disorganize, No." No person shall be
entitled to vote at any election held under the provisions of RCW
87.52.010 through 87.52.060 unless he or she is a qualified voter under
the election laws of the state, and holds title or evidence of title to
land in said district.

Sec. 518 RCW 87.52.040 and 1897 c 79 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
If three-fifths of the votes cast at any election under the
provisions of RCW 87.52.010 through 87.52.060 shall contain the words
"Disorganize, Yes," then the board of directors shall present to the
superior judge of the county in which said irrigation district is
located an application for an order of said superior court that such
irrigation district be declared disorganized and dissolved, and that
its affairs be liquidated and wound up, as provided for in RCW
87.52.010 through 87.52.060, and reciting that at an election of such
irrigation district, held as provided in RCW 87.52.010 through
87.52.060, three-fifths of the votes cast contained the words
"Disorganize, Yes," and such petition shall be certified to by the
directors of said district. They shall also file with said superior
court a statement, sworn to by the directors of said irrigation
district, showing all outstanding indebtedness of said irrigation
district, or if there be no such indebtedness, then the directors shall
make oath to that effect. Notice of said application shall be given by
the clerk, which notice shall set forth the nature of the application,
and shall specify the time and place at which it is to be heard, and
shall be published in a newspaper of the county printed and published
nearest to said irrigation district, once each week for four weeks, or
if no newspaper is published in the county, by publication in the
newspaper nearest thereto in the state. At the time and place
appointed in the notice, or at any other time to which it may be
postponed by the judge, he or she shall proceed to consider the
application, and if satisfied that the provisions of RCW 87.52.010
through 87.52.060 have been complied with he or she shall enter an
order declaring said irrigation district dissolved and disorganized.

Sec. 519 RCW 87.52.060 and 1897 c 79 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the disorganization of any irrigation district under the
provisions of RCW 87.52.010 through 87.52.060, the board of directors
at the time of the disorganization shall be trustees of the creditors
and of the property holders of said district for the purpose of
collecting and paying all indebtedness of said district, in which
actual construction work has been done, and shall have the power to sue
and be sued. It shall be the duty of said board of directors, and they
shall have the power and authority, to levy and collect a tax
sufficient to pay all such indebtedness, which tax shall be levied and
collected in the manner prescribed by law for the levying and
collection of taxes of irrigation districts. Any balance of moneys of
said district remaining over after all outstanding indebtedness and the
cost of the proceedings under RCW 87.52.010 through 87.52.060 have been
paid shall be divided and refunded to the assessment payers in said
irrigation district, to each in proportion to the amount contributed by
him or her to the total amount of assessments collected by said
district. Said board of directors shall report to the court from time
to time as the court may direct, and upon a showing to the court that
all indebtedness has been paid, an order shall be entered discharging
said board of directors. Upon the entry of such order said board of
directors and all the officers of said district shall deliver over to
the clerk of said court all books, papers, records, and documents
belonging to said district, or under their control as officers thereof:
PROVIDED, That nothing herein contained shall be construed to validate
or authorize the payment of any indebtedness of said district exceeding
the legal limitation of indebtedness specified by law for irrigation
districts; or any indebtedness contracted by such irrigation district
or its officers without lawful authority.

Sec. 520 RCW 87.53.100 and 1951 c 237 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the entry of final judgment, the court shall issue an order
appointing a trustee for the district and shall deliver to him or her
a certified copy of the order. The court shall fix the compensation of
the trustee and the amount of his or her bond to be obtained at the
cost of the district.

Sec. 521 RCW 87.53.120 and 1951 c 237 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The trustee shall file with the clerk a report of the disposition
made of the cash funds and of the sale and if the court finds the sale
was fairly conducted, it shall enter an order confirming the sale, and
the trustee shall execute and deliver to the purchaser an instrument
conveying to him or her all property and rights of the district, free
from all claims of the district or its creditors, which shall entitle
the purchaser to immediate possession.

Sec. 522 RCW 87.53.150 and 1988 c 127 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever any bonds of the district are held in the state
reclamation revolving account, and, in the opinion of the director of
ecology, the district is or will be unable to meet its obligations, and
that the state's investment can be best preserved by the dissolution of
the district the director may give his or her consent to dissolution
under such stipulations and adjustments of the indebtedness as he or
she deems best for the state.

Sec. 523 RCW 87.56.040 and 1925 ex.s. c 124 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
Such action shall be one in rem and personal service of process
shall not be required to be made on any interested person: PROVIDED,
That the court shall be authorized in proper instances to order
issuance and personal service of process specifying such time for
appearance as the court shall require, AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That any
owner of land within the district or any creditor of the district or
their respective attorneys may file with the receiver provided for in
this chapter, a written request that his or her name and address be
placed on the receiver's mailing list and thereafter the receiver shall
mail to such person at his or her given address at least ten days'
written notice of all subsequent hearings before the court. Personal
service of said notice may be made in any instance in lieu of mailing
at the option of the receiver.

Sec. 524 RCW 87.56.180 and 1925 ex.s. c 124 s 23 are each amended
to read as follows:
The judgment shall also name a trustee to be nominated by the
creditors representing a majority of the indebtedness who shall give
bond conditioned for the faithful performance of his or her duties and
the strict accounting of all funds received by him or her in such
amount as the court shall determine, and who shall have authority to
receive payment on account of said judgment and to satisfy said
judgment against the several lands at the time payment thereon is made
by the landowners in proportion to the amount of said payment. When
any landowner shall make full payment of the amount of the judgment
apportioned against his or her land, he or she shall be entitled to
full satisfaction thereof of record.

Sec. 525 RCW 87.56.190 and 1925 ex.s. c 124 s 24 are each amended
to read as follows:
In case any landowner fails to pay the judgment against his or her
land or any installment thereof, when the same shall become due and
payable, said judgment may be enforced by the trustee named in the
decree in the manner provided by law for the enforcement of judgments
in the superior court, and the costs of execution and sale shall be
charged to the defaulting land.

Sec. 526 RCW 87.56.203 and 1925 ex.s. c 124 s 26 are each amended
to read as follows:
The trustee named in the decree shall receive such compensation for
his or her services as the court shall determine to be paid at such
times as the court shall fix from funds collected on account of said
judgment.

Sec. 527 RCW 87.56.210 and 1925 ex.s. c 124 s 28 are each amended
to read as follows:
If the judgment rendered by the court, upon stipulation, be not
appealed from as in this chapter provided and the time for appeal has
expired, or having been appealed from has been finally determined upon
appeal, the court shall upon application of the receiver, order all
evidences of indebtedness filed in the registry of the court under the
provisions relating to judgment upon stipulation to be delivered to the
office of the county treasurer, who shall have authority and it shall
be his or her duty to cancel the same, and said evidences of
indebtedness shall thereafter cease to be obligations of the district,
and the district thereafter shall be discharged of said indebtedness.

Sec. 528 RCW 87.64.010 and 1983 c 167 s 243 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the state shall now or hereafter own, the entire issue of
the bonds of any irrigation, diking or drainage district, and in the
judgment of the director of ecology such district is, or will be,
unable to meet its obligations to the state as they mature, and in the
judgment of the director of ecology the investment of the state can be
made more secure by extending, without refunding, the time of payment
of any or all said bonds and interest payments, or by the exchange of
the bonds held by the state for refunding bonds of such district issued
as in the manner provided by law at the same or a lower rate of
interest and/or for a longer term, or by the cancellation of a portion
of the bonds held by the state and/or interest accrued thereon, and the
exchange of the remaining bonds held by the state for the refunding
bonds of the district issued in the manner provided by law at the same
or a lower rate of interest and/or for the same or a longer term, the
director of ecology shall be and is hereby authorized and empowered to
enter into contract with the district so extending the time of payment
of said bonds and interest payments, without refunding or to so
exchange the bonds held by the state for such refunding bonds or to
cancel a portion of the bonds held by the state and/or interest accrued
thereon, and exchange the remaining bonds held by the state for such
refunding bonds as in his or her judgment will be for the best interest
of the state.

Sec. 529 RCW 87.64.020 and 1983 c 167 s 244 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the state shall, now or hereafter, own a portion of the
bonds of any irrigation, diking, or drainage district, and in the
judgment of the director of ecology such district is, or will be,
unable to meet its obligations as they mature, and in the judgment of
the director of ecology the investment of the state can be made more
secure by extending, without refunding, the time of payment of any or
all said bonds and interest payments or by exchanging the bonds held by
the state for the refunding bonds of the district issued in the manner
provided by law at the same or a lower rate of interest and/or for a
longer term, or by the cancellation of a portion of the bonds held by
the state and/or interest accrued thereon, and the exchange of the
remaining bonds held by the state for the refunding bonds of the
district issued in the manner provided by law at the same or a lower
rate of interest and/or for a longer term, the director of ecology
shall be and is hereby authorized and empowered to enter into contract
with the district so extending the time of payment of said bonds and
interest payments, without refunding, or to so exchange the bonds held
by the state for such refunding bonds or to cancel a portion of the
bonds held by the state and/or interest accrued thereon, and exchange
the remaining bonds held by the state for such refunding bonds as in
his or her judgment will be for the best interest of the state:
PROVIDED, That the owners of at least ninety percent of all the other
bonds of said district shall make and execute the same arrangement with
the district: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That when, in addition to owning
a portion of the first issue of bonds of any such irrigation, diking,
or drainage district, the state also owns all the outstanding second
issue of bonds of such district, the director of ecology shall be and
he or she is hereby authorized and empowered to surrender and cancel
said second issue of bonds held by the state upon whatsoever terms and
conditions he or she shall deem to the best interest of the state: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That whenever the owners of at least ninety percent
of all other bonds of such district and/or other evidences of
indebtedness are willing to release their existing obligations against
said district and to substitute therefor a contract to pay such
existing indebtedness in whole or in part from the proceeds of the sale
of lands owned by the district at the time of such settlement, or
acquired by the district through levies then existing, the director of
ecology shall be and he or she is hereby authorized and empowered to
cancel the bonds held by the state upon whatsoever terms that he or she
shall deem most beneficial for the state, or if deemed beneficial to
the state, he or she may release the state's bonds and join with the
other holders in the above mentioned contract for the sale of the
district land as hereinbefore stated: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
director of ecology be and he or she is hereby authorized to accept in
any settlement made under this chapter, refunding bonds of any
irrigation district that may be issued in accordance with chapter 87.22
RCW, or any amendment thereto, and he or she is hereby authorized, when
in his or her judgment it is to the interest of the state, to
participate in the refunding of bonds of an irrigation district held
under said chapter 87.22 RCW, or any amendment thereto.

Sec. 530 RCW 87.64.040 and 1988 c 127 s 64 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the department of ecology shall have heretofore entered,
or shall hereafter enter, into a contract with an irrigation, diking,
or drainage district and shall have expended moneys under said
contract, and said district shall be indebted to the state for the
moneys so expended, and in the judgment of the director of ecology said
district shall have not received benefits equal to the amount of said
indebtedness, the director of ecology shall be and is hereby authorized
and empowered to settle and compromise the claim of the state against
said district upon such terms and for such an amount as he or she shall
deem fair and just to the state and the district.

Sec. 531 RCW 87.84.070 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 132 are each
amended to read as follows:
The directors shall be empowered to specially assess land located
in the district for benefits thereto taking as a basis the last
equalized assessment for county purposes: PROVIDED, That such
assessment shall not exceed twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value upon such assessed valuation without securing
authorization by vote of the electors of the district at an election
called for that purpose.
The board shall give notice of such an election, for the time and
in the manner and form provided for irrigation district elections. The
manner of conducting and voting at such an election, opening and
closing polls, canvassing the votes, certifying the returns, and
declaring the result shall be nearly as practicable the same as in
irrigation district elections.
The special assessment provided for herein shall be due and payable
at such times and in such amounts as designated by the district
directors, which designation shall be made to the county auditor in
writing, and the amount so designated shall be added to the general
taxes, and entered upon the assessment rolls in his or her office, and
collected therewith.

Sec. 532 RCW 88.08.060 and 1909 c 249 s 293 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every person not duly licensed thereto, who shall pilot or offer to
pilot any vessel into, within or out of the waters of Juan de Fuca
Strait or Puget Sound, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor: PROVIDED,
That nothing herein shall prohibit a master of a vessel acting as his
or her own pilot, nor compel a master or owner of any vessel to take
out a pilot license for that purpose.

Sec. 533 RCW 88.16.130 and 1977 ex.s. c 337 s 14 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any person not holding a license as pilot under the provisions of
this chapter who pilots any vessel subject to the provisions of this
chapter on waters covered by this chapter shall pay to the board the
pilotage rates payable under the provisions of this chapter. Any
master or owner of a vessel required to employ a pilot licensed under
the provisions of this chapter who refuses to do so when such a pilot
is available shall be punished pursuant to RCW 88.16.150 as now or
hereafter amended and shall be imprisoned in the county jail of the
county wherein he or she is so convicted until said fine and the costs
of his or her prosecution are paid.

Sec. 534 RCW 88.24.010 and Code 1881 s 3271 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person owning land adjoining any navigable waters or
watercourse, within or bordering upon this state, may erect upon his or
her own land any wharf or wharves, and may extend them so far into said
waters or watercourses as the convenience of shipping may require; and
he or she may charge for wharfage such rates as shall be reasonable:
PROVIDED, That he or she shall at all times leave sufficient room in
the channel for the ordinary purposes of navigation.

Sec. 535 RCW 88.24.020 and 1893 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any person shall be desirous of erecting any wharf at
the terminus of any public highway, or at any accustomed landing place,
he or she may apply to the county commissioners of the proper county,
who, if they shall be satisfied that the public convenience requires
said wharf, may authorize the same to be erected and kept up for any
length of time not exceeding twenty years. And they shall annually
prescribe the rates of wharfage and charges thereon, but there shall be
no charge for the landing of passengers or their baggage.
(2) No such authority shall be granted to any person other than the
owner of the land where the wharf is proposed to be erected, unless
such owner shall neglect to apply for such authority; and whenever
application shall be made for such authority by any person other than
such owner, the board of county commissioners shall not grant the same
unless proof shall be made that the applicant caused notice in writing
of his or her intention to make such application, to be given by
posting up at least three notices in public places in the neighborhood
where the proposed wharf is to be erected and one notice at the county
court house, twenty days prior to any regular session of the board of
county commissioners at which application shall be made and by serving
a copy of said notice in writing upon such owner of the land, if
residing in the county, at least ten days before the session of the
board of county commissioners at which the application is made.
(3) When such application is heard, if the owner of such land
applies for such authority and files his or her undertaking with one or
more sureties to be approved by the county commissioners in a sum not
less than one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars, to be
fixed by the county commissioners, conditioned that such person will
erect said wharf within the time therein limited, to be fixed by the
county commissioners, and maintain the same and keep said wharf
according to law; and if default shall at any time be made in the
condition of such undertaking damages not exceeding the penalty may be
recovered by any person aggrieved before any court having competent
jurisdiction, then said county commissioners shall authorize such owner
of the land to erect and keep such wharf.
(4) If such owner of the land does not apply as aforesaid the
commissioners may authorize the same to be erected and kept by such
applicant upon his or her entering into an undertaking as required of
such owner of the land.

Sec. 536 RCW 88.24.030 and Code 1881 s 3273 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever any person or persons shall be desirous of erecting a
wharf at the terminus of any street of any incorporated town or city in
the state, he or she or they may apply to the municipal authorities of
such town or city who, if they shall be satisfied that the public
convenience requires said wharf, may authorize the same to be erected
and kept in repair for any length of time not exceeding ten years; and
every person building, owning or occupying a wharf in this state, upon
which wharfage is charged and received, shall be held accountable to
the owner or owners, consignees or agents, for any and all damage done
to property stored upon, or passing over said wharf, in consequence of
the unfinished, incomplete, or insufficient condition of said wharf;
and every such person shall post or cause to be posted in a conspicuous
place on said wharf the established rates of wharfage, noting
passengers and their baggage free.

Sec. 537 RCW 88.32.020 and 1907 c 236 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the board of county commissioners of any such county shall
have adjudged as provided in RCW 88.32.010, said board shall thereupon
apply to the person, who, for the time being, shall be judge of the
United States district court, for the district within which the county
shall be situated, to name eleven reputable citizens and freeholders of
such county and file a list thereof with said board of county
commissioners. The persons so named, or a majority of them, shall act
as a commission, and be known as the "river and harbor improvement
commission of . . . . . . county", and shall receive no compensation,
except their actual necessary expenses, including necessary clerical
assistance, to be audited by the board of county commissioners; and
they shall be deemed the agents of the county in the performance of the
duties imposed upon them by RCW 88.32.010 through 88.32.220. Each
member of such commission shall, before entering upon his or her
duties, take and subscribe an oath, substantially as follows:

I, the undersigned, a member of the river and harbor improvement
commission of . . . . . . county, to define and establish the
assessment district and assess the costs of the following improvement
(here give the general description of the improvement), do solemnly
swear (or affirm, as the case may be), that I will well and truly
discharge my duties as a member of said commission." In case the
person who is United States judge shall be unable or decline to act,
the board of county commissioners shall name the eleven persons to act
as such commission.

Sec. 538 RCW 88.32.040 and 1907 c 236 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty of such commission to define and establish an
assessment district, within such county, comprising all the taxable
real property, and also (with the limitations hereinafter expressed)
the state shorelands, which shall be specially benefited by said river,
lake, canal, or harbor improvement, and to apportion and assess the
amount of separate, special, and particular benefits against each lot,
block, parcel, or tract of land or shoreland within such district, by
reason of such improvement. The commission in making the assessment
shall include in the properties upon (([which])) which the assessment
is laid, all shorelands of the state, whether unsold or under contract
of sale and subject to sale by it and as against all purchasers from
the state or under contract to purchase such lands, the assessment
shall be a charge upon such land and the purchaser's interest therein.
The county auditor shall certify to the state commissioner of public
lands a schedule of the state shorelands so assessed and of the
assessment thereon, and the purchaser shall from time to time pay to
the proper county treasurer the sums due and unpaid under such
assessment, and at the time of such payment the county treasurer shall
give him or her, in addition to a regular receipt for such payment, a
certificate that such payment has been made, which certificate the
purchaser shall immediately file with the commissioner of public lands,
and no patent from the state nor deed shall issue to such purchaser,
nor shall any assignment of his or her contract to purchase be approved
by the commissioner of public lands until every matured installment of
such assessment shall have first been fully paid and satisfied:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no such assessment shall create any charge
against such shoreland or affect the title thereof as against the
state, and the state shall be as free to forfeit or annul such contract
and again sell such land as if the assessment had never been made, and
in case of such forfeiture or annulment the state shall be free to sell
again such land entirely disembarrassed and unencumbered of all right
and claim of such former purchaser, and such purchaser shall have no
right, interest, or claim upon or against such land or the state or
such new purchaser or at all, but every such sum paid by such former
purchaser upon such assessment shall be utterly forfeited as against
him or her, his or her personal representatives and assigns, and shall
inure to the benefit of such new purchaser.

Sec. 539 RCW 88.32.090 and 1988 c 202 s 90 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who feels aggrieved by the final assessment made against
any lot, block, or parcel of land owned by him or her may appeal
therefrom to the superior court of such county. Such appeal shall be
taken within the time, and substantially in the manner prescribed by
the laws of this state for appeals from justice's courts. All notices
of appeal shall be filed with the board of county commissioners, and
served upon the prosecuting attorney of the county. The clerk of the
board of county commissioners shall at appellant's expense certify to
the superior court so much of the record, as appellant may request, and
the cause shall be tried in the superior court de novo.
Any person aggrieved by any final order or judgment, made by the
superior court concerning any assessment authorized by RCW 88.32.010
through 88.32.220, may seek appellate review of the order or judgment
in accordance with the laws of this state relative to such review,
except that review shall be sought within thirty days after the entry
of such judgment.

Sec. 540 RCW 88.32.100 and 1907 c 236 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
The final assessment shall be a lien, paramount to all other liens,
except liens for taxes and other special assessments, upon the property
assessed, from the time the assessment roll shall be approved by said
board of county commissioners and placed in the hands of the county
treasurer, as collector. After said roll shall have been delivered to
the county treasurer for collection, he or she shall proceed to collect
the same, in the manner as other taxes are collected: PROVIDED, That
such treasurer shall give at least ten days' notice in the official
newspaper (and shall mail a copy of such notice to the owner of the
property assessed, when the post office address of such owner is known,
but failure to mail such notice shall not be fatal when publication
thereof is made), that such roll has been certified to him or her for
collection, and that unless payment be made within thirty days from the
date of such notice, that the sum charged against each lot or parcel of
land shall be paid in not more than ten equal annual payments, with
interest upon the whole sum so charged at a rate not to exceed seven
percent per annum. Said interest shall be paid semiannually, and the
county treasurer shall proceed to collect the amount due each year by
the publication of notice as hereinabove provided.

Sec. 541 RCW 88.32.140 and 1983 c 167 s 245 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In all cases, the county, as the agent of the local improvement
district, shall, by resolution of its county legislative authority,
cause to be issued in the name of the county, the bonds for such local
improvement district for the whole estimated cost of such improvement,
less such amounts as shall have been paid within the thirty days
provided for redemption, as hereinabove specified. Such bonds shall be
called "Local Improvement Bonds, District No. . . . ., County of
. . . . . ., State of Washington", and shall be payable not more than
ten years after date, and shall be subject to annual call by the county
treasurer, in such manner and amounts as he or she may have cash on
hand to pay the same in the respective local improvement fund from
which such bonds are payable, interest to be paid at the office of the
county treasurer. Such bonds shall be issued and delivered to the
contractor for the work from month to month in such amounts as the
engineer of the government, in charge of the improvement, shall certify
to be due on account of work performed, or, if said county legislative
authority resolves so to do, such bonds may be offered for sale after
thirty days public notice thereof given, to be delivered to the highest
bidder therefor, but in no case shall such bonds be sold for less than
par, the proceeds to be applied in payment for such improvement:
PROVIDED, That unless the contractor for the work shall agree to take
such bonds in payment for his or her work at par, such work shall not
be begun until the bonds shall have been sold and the proceeds shall
have been paid into a fund to be called "Local Improvement Fund No.
. . . ., County of . . . . . .", and the owner or owners of such bonds
shall look only to such fund for the payment of either the principal or
interest of such bonds.
Such bonds shall be issued in denominations of one hundred dollars
each, and shall be substantially in the following form:

"Local Improvement Bond, District Number . . . . of the County of
. . . . . ., State of Washington.

This bond is not a general debt of the county of . . . . . . and
has not been authorized by the voters of said county as a part of its
general indebtedness. It is issued in pursuance of an act of the
legislature of the state of Washington, passed the . . . . day of
. . . . . . A.D. 1907, and is a charge against the fund herein
specified and its issuance and sale is authorized by the resolution of
the county legislative authority, passed on the . . . . day of
. . . . . . A.D. 1907. The county of . . . . . ., a municipal
corporation of the state of Washington, hereby promises to pay to
. . . . . ., or bearer, one hundred dollars, lawful money of the United
States of America, out of the fund established by resolution of the
county legislative authority on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., A.D.
19. . ., and known as local improvement fund district number . . . . of
. . . . . . county, and not otherwise.
"This bond is payable ten years after date, and is subject to
annual call by the county treasurer at the expiration of any year
before maturity in such manner and amounts as he or she may have cash
on hand to pay the same in the said fund from which the same is
payable, and shall bear interest at the rate of . . . . percent per
annum, payable semiannually; both principal and interest payable at the
office of the county treasurer. The county legislative authority of
said county, as the agent of said local improvement district No.
. . . ., established by resolution No. . . . ., has caused this bond to
be issued in the name of said county, as the bond of said local
improvement district, the proceeds thereof to be applied in part
payment of so much of the cost of the improvement of the rivers, lakes,
canals, or harbors of . . . . . . county, under resolution No. . . . .,
as is to be borne by the owners of property in said local improvement
district, and the said local improvement fund, district No. . . . . of
. . . . . . county, has been established by resolution for said
purpose; and the owner or owners of this bond shall look only to said
fund for the payment of either the principal or interest of this bond.
"The call for the payment of this bond or any bond, issued on
account of said improvement, may be made by the county treasurer by
publishing the same in an official newspaper of the county for ten
consecutive issues, beginning not more than twenty days before the
expiration of any year from date hereof, and if such call be made,
interest on this bond shall cease at the date named in such call.
"This bond is one of a series of . . . . . . bonds, aggregating in
all the principal sum of . . . . . . dollars, issued for said local
improvement district, all of which bonds are subject to the same terms
and conditions as herein expressed.
"In witness whereof the said county of . . . . . . has caused these
presents to be signed by its ((chairman)) chair of its county
legislative authority, and countersigned by its county auditor and
sealed with its corporate seal, attested by its county clerk, this
. . . . day of . . . . . ., in the year of our Lord one thousand nine
hundred and . . . . . . . . .

Countersigned, . . . . . . County Auditor.
Attest, . . . . . . Clerk."

The bonds may be in any form, including bearer bonds or registered
bonds as provided in RCW 39.46.030.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may
be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Sec. 542 RCW 88.32.160 and 1983 c 167 s 246 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each and every bond issued for any such improvement shall be signed
by the ((chairman)) chair of the county legislative authority and the
county auditor, sealed with the corporate seal of the county, and
attested by the county clerk. The bonds issued for each local
improvement district shall be in the aggregate for such an amount as
authorized by the resolution of the county legislative authority with
reference to such river, lake, canal or harbor improvement, and each
issue of such bonds shall be numbered consecutively, beginning with
number 1.

Sec. 543 RCW 88.32.170 and 1983 c 167 s 247 are each amended to
read as follows:
The owner of any lot or parcel of land charged with any assessment
as provided for hereinabove, may redeem the same from all liability by
paying the entire assessment charged against such lot or parcel of
land, or part thereof, without interest, within thirty days after
notice to him or her of such assessment, as herein provided, or may
redeem the same at any time after the bonds above specified shall have
been issued, by paying the full amount of all the principal and
interest to the end of the interest year then expiring, or next to
expire. The county treasurer shall pay the interest on the bonds
authorized to be issued under RCW 88.32.010 through 88.32.220 out of
the respective local improvement funds from which they are payable, and
whenever there shall be sufficient money in any local improvement fund,
against which bonds have been issued under the provisions of RCW
88.32.010 through 88.32.220, over and above the amount necessary for
the payment of interest on all unpaid bonds, and sufficient to pay the
principal of one or more bonds, the county treasurer shall call in and
pay such bonds, provided that such bonds shall be called in and paid in
their numerical order: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That such call shall be made
by publication in the county official newspaper, on the day following
the delinquency of the installment of the assessment, or as soon
thereafter as practicable, and shall state that bonds numbers
. . . . . . (giving the serial number or numbers of the bonds called),
will be paid on the day the interest payment on said bonds shall become
due, and interest upon such bonds shall cease upon such date. If the
county shall fail, neglect, or refuse to pay said bonds or promptly to
collect any of said assessments when due, the owner of any such bonds
may proceed in his or her own name to collect such assessment and
foreclose the lien thereof in any court of competent jurisdiction, and
shall recover in addition to the amount of such bonds and interest
thereon, five percent, together with the costs of such suit. Any
number of owners of such bonds for any single improvement, may join as
plaintiffs and any number of owners of the property on which the same
are a lien may be joined as defendants in such suit.

Sec. 544 RCW 88.32.190 and 1907 c 236 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
In every case of such joint action, the preliminary procedure of
RCW 88.32.010 having been first had in each county severally, the board
of county commissioners of the several counties proposing to join shall
unite in such an application as is prescribed in RCW 88.32.020, and the
application shall be made to any person, who, for the time being, shall
be a judge of the United States district court in any district in which
such counties, or any of them, may lie, and the list mentioned in RCW
88.32.020 shall be made in as many counterparts as there are counties
so joining, and one counterpart shall be filed with the board of county
commissioners of each county, and if the person who is such United
States judge shall decline or be unable to act, then, the board of such
counties shall meet in joint session, at the county seat of such one of
the counties as shall be agreed upon and shall organize as a joint
board by appointing a ((chairman)) chair and clerk, and by resolution
in which a majority of all the commissioners present, and at least one
commissioner from each county, shall concur, name the eleven persons
for the commission, which eleven in such case shall be citizens of the
counties concerned, and as nearly as may be the same number from each
county. A counterpart of such resolution shall be recorded in the
minutes of the proceedings of the board of each county. The commission
shall make as many assessment rolls as there are counties joining and
one counterpart roll shall be certified by such ((chairman)) chair and
clerk of the joint board, and by such clerk filed with the board of
each of such counties.

Sec. 545 RCW 88.32.200 and 1907 c 236 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of a board of equalization, said boards shall from
time to time meet as a joint board as aforesaid, and have a
((chairman)) chair and clerk as aforesaid, and for all purposes under
RCW 88.32.070 and 88.32.080, in case of counties joining, the word
board wherever occurring in said sections shall be interpreted to mean
such joint board, and the word clerk shall be deemed to mean the clerk
of such joint board, and the posting of notices shall be in at least
ten public places in each county, and the publication of the same shall
be in a newspaper of each county, and the objections mentioned in RCW
88.32.080 shall be filed with the clerk of the joint board, who shall
cause a copy thereof, certified by him or her to be filed with the
clerk of the board of county commissioners of the county where the real
estate of the party objecting is situated.

Sec. 546 RCW 88.32.210 and 1907 c 236 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
The minutes of the proceedings of the joint board and the
assessment roll as finally settled by such board shall be made up in as
many counterparts as there are counties joining as aforesaid, and shall
be signed by the ((chairman)) chair and clerk of said board, and one of
said counterparts so signed shall be filed by said clerk with the clerk
of the board of county commissioners of each of said counties, and any
appeals and subsequent proceedings under RCW 88.32.090 to 88.32.170,
inclusive, as far as relates to real estate in any individual county,
shall be as nearly as may be the same as if the local improvement
district and bond issue concerned that county only.

Sec. 547 RCW 89.08.010 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination:
(1) That the lands of the state of Washington are among the basic
assets of the state and that the preservation of these lands is
necessary to protect and promote the health, safety, and general
welfare of its people; that improper land-use practices have caused and
have contributed to, and are now causing and contributing to, a
progressively more serious erosion of the lands of this state by wind
and water; that the breaking of natural grass, plant, and forest cover
have interfered with the natural factors of soil stabilization, causing
loosening of soil and exhaustion of humus, and developing a soil
condition that favors erosion; that the topsoil is being blown and
washed off of lands; that there has been an accelerated washing of
sloping lands; that these processes of erosion by wind and water speed
up with removal of absorptive topsoil, causing exposure of less
absorptive and less protective but more erosive subsoil; that failure
by any land occupier to conserve the soil and control erosion upon his
or her lands may cause a washing and blowing of soil from his or her
lands onto other lands and makes the conservation of soil and control
of erosion on such other lands difficult or impossible, and that
extensive denuding of land for development creates critical erosion
areas that are difficult to effectively regenerate and the resulting
sediment causes extensive pollution of streams, ponds, lakes, and other
waters.
(2) That the consequences of such soil erosion in the form of soil
blowing and soil washing are the silting and sedimentation of stream
channels, reservoirs, dams, ditches, and harbors, and loading the air
with soil particles; the loss of fertile soil material in dust storms;
the piling up of soil on lower slopes and its deposit over alluvial
plains; the reduction in productivity or outright ruin of rich bottom
lands by overwash of poor subsoil material, sand, and gravel swept out
of the hills; deterioration of soil and its fertility, deterioration of
crops grown thereon, and declining acre yields despite development of
scientific processes for increasing such yields; loss of soil and water
which causes destruction of food and cover for wildlife; a blowing and
washing of soil into streams which silts over spawning beds, and
destroys water plants, diminishing the food supply of fish; a
diminishing of the underground water reserve, which causes water
shortages, intensifies periods of drought, and causes crop failures; an
increase in the speed and volume of rainfall run-off, causing severe
and increasing floods, which bring suffering, disease, and death;
impoverishment of families attempting to farm eroding and eroded lands;
damage to roads, highways, railways, buildings, and other property from
floods and from dust storms; and losses in navigation, hydroelectric
power, municipal water supply, irrigation developments, farming, and
grazing.
(3) That to conserve soil resources and control and prevent soil
erosion and prevent flood water and sediment damages, and further
agricultural and nonagricultural phases of the conservation,
development, utilization, and disposal of water, it is necessary that
land-use practices contributing to soil wastage and soil erosion be
discouraged and discontinued, and appropriate soil-conserving land-use
practices, and works of improvement for flood prevention of
agricultural and nonagricultural phases of the conservation,
development, utilization, and disposal of water be adopted and carried
out; that among the procedures necessary for widespread adoption, are
the carrying on of engineering operations such as the construction of
terraces, terrace outlets, check-dams, desilting basins, flood water
retarding structures, channel floodways, dikes, ponds, ditches, and the
like; the utilization of strip cropping, contour cultivating, and
contour furrowing; land irrigation; seeding and planting of waste,
sloping, abandoned, or eroded lands to water-conserving and erosion-preventing plants, trees, and grasses; forestation and reforestation;
rotation of crops; soil stabilizations with trees, grasses, legumes,
and other thick-growing, soil-holding crops, retardation of run-off by
increasing absorption of rainfall; and retirement from cultivation of
steep, highly erosive areas and areas now badly gullied or otherwise
eroded.
(4) Whereas, there is a pressing need for the conservation of
renewable resources in all areas of the state, whether urban, suburban,
or rural, and that the benefits of resource practices, programs, and
projects, as carried out by the state conservation commission and by
the conservation districts, should be available to all such areas;
therefore, it is hereby declared to be the policy of the legislature to
provide for the conservation of the renewable resources of this state,
and for the control and prevention of soil erosion, and for the
prevention of flood water and sediment damages, and for furthering
agricultural and nonagricultural phases of conservation, development,
utilization, and disposal of water, and thereby to preserve natural
resources, control floods, prevent impairment of dams and reservoirs,
assist in maintaining the navigability of rivers and harbors, preserve
wildlife, protect the tax base, protect public lands, and protect and
promote the health, safety, and general welfare of the people of this
state. To this end all incorporated cities and towns heretofore
excluded from the boundaries of a conservation district established
pursuant to the provisions of the state conservation district law, as
amended, may be approved by the conservation commission as being
included in and deemed a part of the district upon receiving a petition
for annexation signed by the governing authority of the city or town
and the conservation district within the exterior boundaries of which
it lies in whole or in part or to which it lies closest.

Sec. 548 RCW 89.08.170 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 18 are each
amended to read as follows:
If the secretary of state finds that the name of the proposed
district is such as will not be confused with that of any other
district, he or she shall enter the application and statement in his or
her records. If he or she finds the name may be confusing, he or she
shall certify that fact to the commission, which shall submit a new
name free from such objections, and he or she shall enter the
application and statement as modified, in his or her records.
Thereupon the district shall be considered organized into a body
corporate.
The secretary of state shall then issue to the supervisors a
certificate of organization of the district under the seal of the
state, and shall record the certificate in his or her office. Proof of
the issuance of the certificate shall be evidence of the establishment
of the district, and a certified copy of the certificate shall be
admissible as evidence and shall be proof of the filing and contents
thereof. The name of a conservation district may be changed upon
recommendation by the supervisors of a district and approval by the
state conservation commission and the secretary of state. The new name
shall be recorded by the secretary of state following the same general
procedure as for the previous name.

Sec. 549 RCW 89.08.180 and 1999 c 305 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Territory may be added to an existing district upon filing a
petition as in the case of formation with the commission by twenty
percent of the voters of the affected area to be included. The same
procedure shall be followed as for the creation of the district.
As an alternate procedure, the commission may upon the petition of
a majority of the voters in any one or more districts or in unorganized
territory adjoining a conservation district change the boundaries of a
district, or districts, if such action will promote the practical and
feasible administration of such district or districts.
Upon petition of the boards of supervisors of two or more
districts, the commission may approve the combining of all or parts of
such districts and name the district, or districts, with the approval
of the name by the secretary of state. A public hearing and/or a
referendum may be held if deemed necessary or desirable by the
commission in order to determine the wishes of the voters.
When districts are combined, the joint boards of supervisors will
first select a ((chairman)) chair, secretary, and other necessary
officers and select a regular date for meetings. All elected
supervisors will continue to serve as members of the board until the
expiration of their current term of office, and/or until the election
date nearest their expiration date. All appointed supervisors will
continue to serve until the expiration of their current term of office,
at which time the commission will make the necessary appointments. In
the event that more than two districts are combined, a similar
procedure will be set up and administered by the commission.
When districts are combined or territory is moved from one district
to another, the property, records, and accounts of the districts
involved shall be distributed to the remaining district or districts as
approved by the commission. A new certificate of organization, naming
and describing the new district or districts, shall be issued by the
secretary of state.

Sec. 550 RCW 89.08.200 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 21 are each
amended to read as follows:
The term of office of each supervisor shall be three years and
until his or her successor is appointed or elected and qualified,
except that the supervisors first appointed shall serve for one and two
years respectively from the date of their appointments, as designated
in their appointments.
In the case of elected supervisors, the term of office of each
supervisor shall be three years and until his or her successor is
elected and qualified, except that for the first election, the one
receiving the largest number of votes shall be elected for three years;
the next largest two years; and the third largest one year. Successors
shall be elected for three-year terms.
Vacancies in the office of appointed supervisors shall be filled by
the state conservation commission. Vacancies in the office of elected
supervisors shall be filled by appointment made by the remaining
supervisors for the unexpired term.
A majority of the supervisors shall constitute a quorum and the
concurrence of a majority is required for any official action or
determination.
Supervisors shall serve without compensation, but they shall be
entitled to expenses, including traveling expenses, necessarily
incurred in discharge of their duties. A supervisor may be removed by
the state conservation commission upon notice and hearing, for neglect
of duty or malfeasance in office, but for no other reason.
The governing board shall designate a ((chairman)) chair from time
to time.

Sec. 551 RCW 89.08.210 and 2000 c 45 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The supervisors may employ a secretary, treasurer, technical
experts, and such other officers, agents, and employees, permanent and
temporary, as they may require, and determine their qualifications,
duties, and compensation. It may call upon the attorney general for
legal services, or may employ its own counsel and legal staff. The
supervisors may delegate to their ((chairman)) chair, to one or more
supervisors, or to one or more agents or employees such powers and
duties as it deems proper. The supervisors shall furnish to the
commission, upon request, copies of such internal rules, regulations,
orders, contracts, forms, and other documents as they shall adopt or
employ, and such other information concerning their activities as the
commission may require in the performance of its duties under chapter
184, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. The supervisors shall provide for the
execution of surety bonds for officers and all employees who shall be
entrusted with funds or property.
The supervisors shall provide for the keeping of a full and
accurate record of all proceedings, resolutions, regulations, and
orders issued or adopted. The supervisors shall provide for an annual
audit of the accounts of receipts and disbursements in accordance with
procedures prescribed by regulations of the commission.
The board may invite the legislative body of any municipality or
county near or within the district, to designate a representative to
advise and consult with it on all questions of program and policy which
may affect the property, water supply, or other interests of such
municipality or county. The governing body of a district shall appoint
such advisory committees as may be needed to assure the availability of
appropriate channels of communication to the board of supervisors, to
persons affected by district operations, and to local, regional, state
and interstate special-purpose districts and agencies responsible for
community planning, zoning, or other resource development activities.
The district shall keep such committees informed of its work, and such
advisory committees shall submit recommendations from time to time to
the board of supervisors.

Sec. 552 RCW 89.12.020 and 1943 c 275 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter,
The term "secretary" shall mean the secretary of the interior of
the United States, or his or her duly authorized representative.
The term "appraised value" shall mean the value of lands within the
scope of this chapter appraised or reappraised by the secretary without
reference to or increment on account of the irrigation works built or
to be built by the United States.
The term "district" shall mean an irrigation or reclamation
district governed by this chapter as provided in RCW 89.12.030.
The term "federal reclamation laws" shall mean the act of congress
of June 17, 1902 (32 Stat. 388) and acts amendatory thereof or
supplemental thereto including the act of congress entitled "An Act to
amend the Act approved May 27, 1937 (Ch. 269, 50 Stat. 208), by
providing substitute and additional authority for the prevention of
speculation in lands of the Columbia Basin project, and substitute an
additional authority related to the settlement and development of the
project, and for other purposes, enacted and approved in the Seventy-Eighth Session."
The term "lands" shall mean, unless otherwise indicated, lands
within the boundaries of a district contracting or intending to
contract with the United States under the terms of this chapter.
The term "owner," "landowner," and "any one landowner" shall mean
any person, corporation, joint stock association or family owning lands
that are within the scope of this chapter.
The term "family" shall mean a group consisting of either or both
husband and wife, together with their children under eighteen years of
age, or all of such children if both parents are dead, the term "their
children" including the issue and lawfully adopted children of either
or both husband and wife. Within the meaning of this chapter, lands
shall be deemed to be held by a family if held as separate property of
husband or wife, or if held as a part or all of their community
property, or if they are the property of any or all of their children
under eighteen years of age.

Sec. 553 RCW 89.12.050 and 2009 c 145 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A district may enter into repayment and other contracts with
the United States under the terms of the federal reclamation laws in
matters relating to federal reclamation projects, and may with respect
to lands within its boundaries include in the contract, among others,
an agreement that:
(a) The district will not deliver water by means of the project
works provided by the United States to or for excess lands not eligible
therefor under applicable federal law.
(b) As a condition to receiving water by means of the project
works, each excess landowner in the district, unless his or her excess
lands are otherwise eligible to receive water under applicable federal
law, shall be required to execute a recordable contract covering all of
his or her excess lands within the district.
(c) All excess lands within the district not eligible to receive
water by means of the project works shall be subject to assessment in
the same manner and to the same extent as lands eligible to receive
water, subject to such provisions as the secretary may prescribe for
postponement in payment of all or part of the assessment but not beyond
a date five years from the time water would have become available for
such lands had they been eligible therefor.
(d) The secretary is authorized to amend any existing contract,
deed, or other document to conform to the provisions of applicable
federal law as it now exists. Any such amendment may be filed for
record under RCW 89.12.080.
(2) A district may enter into a contract with the United States for
the transfer of operations and maintenance of the works of a federal
reclamation project, but the contract does not impute to the district
negligence for design or construction defects or deficiencies of the
transferred works.

Sec. 554 RCW 89.12.150 and 1988 c 128 s 75 are each amended to
read as follows:
From and after the date that the consent of the United States shall
be given thereto by act of congress, the department of natural
resources is authorized, upon request from the secretary of the
interior, to cause an appraisal to be made by the board of natural
resources of state lands in any division of any federal reclamation
project which the secretary of the interior shall advise the department
that he or she desires to have subdivided into farm units of class
referred to in RCW 89.12.140, and also to cause to be appraised by the
board of natural resources such public lands of the United States on
the same project, or elsewhere in the state of Washington, as the
secretary of the interior may propose to exchange for such state land,
and when the secretary of the interior shall have secured from congress
authority to make such exchange the department is authorized to
exchange such state lands in any federal reclamation project for public
lands of the United States on the same project or elsewhere in the
state of Washington of approximately equal appraised valuation, and in
making such exchange is authorized to execute suitable instruments in
writing conveying or relinquishing to the United States such state
lands and accepting in lieu thereof such public land of approximately
equal appraised valuation.

Sec. 555 RCW 89.16.040 and 1981 c 216 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
From the moneys appropriated from the reclamation account there
shall be paid, upon vouchers approved by the director of ecology, the
administrative expenses of the director under this chapter and such
amounts as are found necessary for the investigation and survey of
reclamation projects proposed to be financed in whole or in part by the
director, and such amounts as may be authorized by him or her for the
reclamation of lands in diking, diking improvement, drainage, drainage
improvement, diking and drainage, diking and drainage improvement,
irrigation and irrigation improvement districts, and such other
districts as are authorized by law for the reclamation or development
of waste or undeveloped lands or the rehabilitation of existing
reclamation projects, and all such districts and improvement districts
shall, for the purposes of this chapter be known as reclamation
districts.

Sec. 556 RCW 89.16.045 and 1972 ex.s. c 51 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the director
of ecology may, by written contract with a reclamation district, loan
moneys from the reclamation account to said district for use in
financing a project of construction, reconstruction or improvement of
district facilities, or a project of additions to such facilities. No
such contract shall exceed fifty thousand dollars per project or a term
of ten years, or provide for an interest rate of more than eight
percent per annum. The director shall not execute any contract as
provided in this section until he or she determines that the project
for which the moneys are furnished is within the scope of the
district's powers to undertake, that the project is feasible, that its
construction is in the best interest of the state and the district, and
that the district proposing the project is in a sound financial
condition and capable of repaying the loan with interest in not more
than ten annual payments. Any district is empowered to enter into a
contract, as provided for in this section, and to levy assessments
based on the special benefits accruing to lands within the district as
are necessary to satisfy the contract, when a resolution of the
governing body of the reclamation district authorizing its execution is
approved by the body: PROVIDED, That no district shall be empowered to
execute with the director any such contract during the term of any
previously executed contract authorized by this section.

Sec. 557 RCW 89.16.050 and 1983 c 167 s 248 are each amended to
read as follows:
In carrying out the purposes of this chapter, the director of the
department of ecology of the state of Washington shall be authorized
and empowered:
To make surveys and investigations of the wholly or partially
unreclaimed and undeveloped lands in this state and to determine the
relative agricultural values, productiveness and uses, and the
feasibility and cost of reclamation and development thereof;
To formulate and adopt a sound policy for the reclamation and
development of the agricultural resources of the state, and from time
to time select for reclamation and development such lands as may be
deemed advisable, and the director may in his or her discretion advise
as to the formation and assist in the organization of reclamation
districts under the laws of this state;
To purchase the bonds of any reclamation district whose project is
approved by the director and which is found to be upon a sound
financial basis, to contract with any such district for making surveys
and furnishing engineering plans and supervision for the construction
of its project, or for constructing or completing its project and to
advance money to the credit of the district for any or all of such
purposes, and to accept the bonds, notes, or warrants of such district
in payment therefor, and to expend the moneys appropriated from the
reclamation account in the purchase of such bonds, notes, or warrants
or in carrying out such contracts: PROVIDED, That interest not to
exceed the annual rate provided for in the bonds, notes, or warrants
agreed to be purchased, shall be charged and received for all moneys
advanced to the district prior to the delivery of the bonds, notes, or
warrants and the amount of such interest shall be included in the
purchase price of such bonds, notes, or warrants: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That no district, the bonds, notes, or warrants of which have been
purchased by the state under the provisions of the state reclamation
act, shall thereafter during the life of said bonds, notes, or warrants
make expenditures of any kind from the bond or warrant funds of the
district or incur obligations chargeable against such funds or issue
any additional notes without previous written approval of the director
of ecology of the state of Washington, and any obligations incurred
without such approval shall be void;
To sell and dispose of any reclamation district bonds acquired by
the director, at public or private sale, and to pay the proceeds of
such sale into the reclamation account: PROVIDED, That such bonds
shall not be sold for less than the purchase price plus accrued
interest, except in case of a sale to an agency supplied with money by
the United States of America, or to the United States of America in
furtherance of refunding operations of any irrigation district, diking
or drainage district, or diking or drainage improvement district, now
pending or hereafter carried on by such district, in which case the
director shall have authority to sell any bonds of such district owned
by the state of Washington under the provisions of the state
reclamation act, to the United States of America, or other federal
agency on such terms as said United States of America, or other federal
agency shall prescribe for bonds of the same issue of such district as
that held by the state of Washington in connection with such refunding
operations;
To borrow money upon the security of any bonds, including refunding
bonds, of any reclamation district, acquired by the director, on such
terms and rate of interest and over such period of time as the director
may see fit, and to hypothecate and pledge reclamation district bonds
or refunding bonds acquired by the director as security for such loan.
Such loans shall have, as their sole security, the bonds so pledged and
the revenues therefrom, and the director shall not have authority to
pledge the general credit of the state of Washington: PROVIDED, That
in reloaning any money so borrowed, or obtained from a sale of bonds it
shall be the duty of the director to fix such rates of interest as will
prevent impairment of the reclamation revolving account;
To purchase delinquent general tax or delinquent special assessment
certificates chargeable against lands included within any reclamation
district obligated to the state under the provisions of the state
reclamation act, and to purchase lands included in such districts and
placed on sale on account of delinquent taxes or delinquent assessments
with the same rights, privileges, and powers with respect thereto as a
private holder and owner of said certificates, or as a private
purchaser of said lands: PROVIDED, That the director shall be entitled
to a delinquent tax certificate upon application to the proper county
treasurer therefor without the necessity of a resolution of the county
legislative authority authorizing the issuance of certificates of
delinquency required by law in the case of the sale of such
certificates to private purchasers;
To sell said delinquent certificates or the lands acquired at sale
on account of delinquent taxes or delinquent assessments at public or
private sale, and on such conditions as the director shall determine;
To, whenever the director shall deem it advisable, require any
district with which he or she may contract, to provide such safeguards
as he or she may deem necessary to assure bona fide settlement and
development of the lands within such district, by securing from the
owners of lands therein agreements to limit the amount of their
holdings to such acreage as they can properly farm and to sell their
excess land holdings at reasonable prices;
To employ all necessary experts, assistants, and employees and fix
their compensation and to enter into any and all contracts and
agreements necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;
To have the assistance, cooperation and services of, and the use of
the records and files in, all the departments and institutions of the
state, particularly the office of the commissioner of public lands, the
state department of agriculture, Washington State University, and the
University of Washington; and all state officers and the governing
authorities of all state institutions are hereby authorized and
directed to cooperate with the director in furthering the purpose of
this chapter;
To cooperate with the United States in any plan of land
reclamation, land settlement or agricultural development which the
congress of the United States may provide and which may effect the
development of agricultural resources within the state of Washington,
and the director shall have full power to carry out the provisions of
any cooperative land settlement act that may be enacted by the United
States.

Sec. 558 RCW 89.30.025 and 1927 c 254 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
Lands held by private persons under possessory rights from the
federal government may be included within the operation of the
district, and as soon as such lands are held under title of private
ownership, the owner thereof shall be entitled to receive his or her
proportion of water as in case of other landowners upon payment by him
or her of such sums as shall be determined by the district board and at
the time to be fixed by said district board, which sum shall be such
equitable amount as such lands should pay having regard to placing said
lands on the basis of equality with other lands in the district as to
benefits received, and giving credit if equitable for any sums paid as
water rent by the occupant of said lands prior to the vesting of
private ownership, and such lands shall also become subject to all
taxes and assessments of the district thereafter imposed.

Sec. 559 RCW 89.30.034 and 1927 c 254 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The petition for organization of such reclamation district shall
consist of any number of separate instruments of uniform similarity,
numbered consecutively. For convenience, lands represented on said
instruments may be grouped separately according to the county in which
said lands are situated. No petitioner shall have the right to
withdraw his or her name from the petition after the same has been
filed with said county board.

Sec. 560 RCW 89.30.055 and 1988 c 127 s 70 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the giving of notice of hearing on the petition by the clerk
of the county board aforesaid, there is hereby authorized and created
a commission composed of the ((chairman)) chair of the board of county
commissioners of each of the counties in which any of the lands to be
included in the proposed reclamation district are situated, and of the
state director of ecology, which commission shall consider and
determine said petition.

Sec. 561 RCW 89.30.058 and 1988 c 127 s 71 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state director of ecology shall be ex officio ((chairman))
chair of said commission, and the clerk of the county board of the
county in which the petition is filed, shall be ex officio clerk of
said commission. A majority of the members of said commission shall
constitute a quorum for the transaction or exercise of any of its
powers, functions, duties and business.

Sec. 562 RCW 89.30.109 and 1927 c 254 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty of the clerk of the board of county
commissioners of every county in which any lands included in the
district are situated forthwith to certify and file for record in the
county auditor's office of his or her county, a statement to the effect
that, under the provisions of this chapter, certain lands (describing
them in township and range and in case of smaller bodies of land in
legal subdivisions or fractions thereof) were, by order of the board of
county commissioners of . . . . . . county (naming the county) entered
on the . . . . day of . . . . . . (naming the day, month and year)
included in the . . . . reclamation district (using the name designated
in the order of the county board establishing the district). Said
statement certified by the clerk of the county board shall be entitled
to record in the office of the county auditor without payment of filing
or recording fee.

Sec. 563 RCW 89.30.229 and 1927 c 254 s 77 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as herein otherwise provided, the term of the office of
director shall be six years from and after the second Monday in January
next succeeding his or her election.

Sec. 564 RCW 89.30.259 and 1927 c 254 s 87 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each director shall take and subscribe an official oath for the
faithful discharge of the duties of his or her office and shall execute
an official bond to the district in the sum of twenty-five hundred
dollars conditioned for the faithful discharge of his or her office,
which bond shall be approved by the judge of the superior court of the
county where the organization of the district was effected, and said
oath and bond shall be recorded in the office of the clerk of the
superior court and filed with the secretary of the district.

Sec. 565 RCW 89.30.265 and 1927 c 254 s 89 are each amended to
read as follows:
In case any district authorized in this chapter is appointed fiscal
agent of the United States or is authorized by the United States in
connection with any irrigation project in which the United States is
interested to make collections of money for or on behalf of the United
States, such secretary and each such director and the county treasurer
of the county where the organization of the district was effected shall
each execute a further additional official bond in such sum
respectively as the secretary of the interior may require conditioned
for the faithful discharge of the duties of his or her respective
office and the faithful discharge by the district of its duties as
fiscal or other agent of the United States in such appointment or
authorization; such additional bonds to be approved, recorded, filed,
and paid for as herein provided for other official bonds.

Sec. 566 RCW 89.30.301 and 1927 c 254 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
No director or any other officer named in this chapter shall in any
manner be interested, directly or indirectly in any contract awarded or
to be awarded by the board, or in the profits to be derived therefrom;
and for any violation of this provision, such officer shall be deemed
guilty of a misdemeanor, and such conviction shall work a forfeiture of
his or her office, and he or she shall be punished by a fine not
exceeding five hundred dollars or by imprisonment in the county jail
not exceeding six months, or by both fine and imprisonment: PROVIDED,
That nothing in this section contained shall be construed to prevent
any district officer from being employed by the district as a day
laborer.

Sec. 567 RCW 89.30.304 and 1927 c 254 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every person, upon the expiration or sooner termination of his or
her term of office as an officer of the district, shall immediately
turn over and deliver, under oath, to his or her successor in office,
all records, books, papers, and other property under his or her control
and belonging to such office. In case of the death of any officer, his
or her legal representative shall turn over and deliver such records,
books, papers, and other property to the successor in office of such
deceased person.

Sec. 568 RCW 89.30.307 and 1927 c 254 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every person hired by the district and having in his or her custody
or under his or her control, in connection with his or her contract of
hire, any records, books, papers, or other property belonging to the
district shall immediately upon the expiration of his or her services,
turn over and deliver, under oath, to the district board or any member
thereof, all such records, books, papers, or other property. Any
person violating any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 569 RCW 89.30.313 and 1927 c 254 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any county treasurer collecting or handling funds of the district
shall be liable upon his or her official bond and to criminal
prosecution for malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office
relative to any of his or her duties prescribed herein.

Sec. 570 RCW 89.30.316 and 1927 c 254 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty of the county treasurer of each county in
which lands of the district are located to collect and receipt for all
assessments and taxes levied as in this chapter provided, and he or she
shall account to the district for all interest received on such funds
from any public depositary with which the same may be deposited.

Sec. 571 RCW 89.30.322 and 1927 c 254 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any claim against the district shall be presented to the district
board for allowance or rejection. Upon allowance the claim shall be
attached to a voucher verified by the claimant or his or her agent and
approved by the president and countersigned by the secretary and
directed to the county auditor of the county in which the organization
of the reclamation district was effected, for the issuance of a warrant
against the proper fund of the district in payment of said claim.

Sec. 572 RCW 89.30.325 and 1983 c 167 s 249 are each amended to
read as follows:
Said county treasurer shall pay out the moneys received or
deposited with him or her or any portion thereof upon warrants issued
by the county auditor against the proper funds of the district except
the sums to be paid out of the bond fund for principal and interest
payments on bonds.

Sec. 573 RCW 89.30.328 and 1927 c 254 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
The said treasurer shall report in writing during the first week in
each month to the board of directors of the district the amount of
money held by him or her, the amount in each fund, the amount of
receipts for the month preceding in each fund, and the amount or
amounts paid out of each fund, and said report shall be filed with the
secretary of the district.

Sec. 574 RCW 89.30.352 and 1927 c 254 s 118 are each amended to
read as follows:
The registration clerk of any county voting precinct, partially
included in a reclamation district voting precinct, is hereby
authorized and it shall be his or her duty to prepare and certify at
the expense of the district a poll list of all registered voters of
said reclamation district voting precinct and to attach the same to the
poll books for his or her county voting precinct.

Sec. 575 RCW 89.30.367 and 1927 c 254 s 123 are each amended to
read as follows:
Immediately upon conclusion of the canvass of the returns of the
reclamation district election held in the precincts located in his or
her county, the county auditor shall mail to the ((chairman)) chair of
said district board, an abstract of the result of said district
election in his or her county.

Sec. 576 RCW 89.30.382 and 1927 c 254 s 128 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any qualified resident elector of any director district which is
entitled at that time to elect a candidate for the office of
reclamation district director may become a candidate for such office by
filing, at least thirty days prior to the election, his or her
declaration of candidacy with the county auditor of his or her county
and by paying a fee of one dollar for said filing.

Sec. 577 RCW 89.30.565 and 1927 c 254 s 189 are each amended to
read as follows:
The proceeds of bond sales for cash shall be paid by the purchaser
to the county treasurer of the county in which the organization of the
district was effected or to his or her duly authorized agent and
credited to the proper fund.

Sec. 578 RCW 89.30.604 and 1927 c 254 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary shall be present during the sessions of the board of
equalization, and note all changes made in the valuation of property
and in the names of the persons whose property is assessed and on or
before the first day of January next following, he or she shall
complete the assessment roll as finally equalized by the board and
deliver the segregations of the same to the respective county
treasurers concerned.

Sec. 579 RCW 89.30.625 and 1927 c 254 s 209 are each amended to
read as follows:
In case of the neglect or refusal of the secretary of the
reclamation district to perform the duties imposed by law, then the
treasurer of the county in which the organization of the reclamation
district was effected may perform such duties and shall be accountable
therefor on his or her official bond as in other cases.

Sec. 580 RCW 89.30.649 and 1927 c 254 s 217 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty of the county treasurer of the county in which
any land in the general improvement or divisional district is located,
to furnish upon request of the owner or any person interested, a
statement showing any and all assessments levied as shown by the
assessment roll in his or her office upon land described in such
request and all statements of general taxes covering any land in such
district shall be accompanied by a statement showing the condition of
district assessments against such lands: PROVIDED, That the failure of
the county treasurer to render any statement herein required of him or
her, shall not render invalid any assessments made for any general
improvement or divisional district or proceeding had for the
enforcement and collection of such assessments pursuant to this
chapter.

Sec. 581 RCW 89.30.652 and 1927 c 254 s 218 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty of the county treasurer of any county other
than the county in which the organization of the reclamation district
was effected to make monthly remittances to the county treasurer of the
county in which the organization of the reclamation district was
effected, covering all amounts collected by him or her for any said
general improvement or divisional district during the preceding month.

Sec. 582 RCW 89.30.655 and 1927 c 254 s 219 are each amended to
read as follows:
On or before the thirtieth day of June in each year each respective
county treasurer concerned shall post the delinquency list which must
contain the names of persons and the descriptions of the property
delinquent and the amount of assessments, interest, and costs opposite
each name and the description in all cases where payment of fifty
percent or more of the assessment against any tract of land has not
been made on or before the thirty-first day of May next preceding.
Likewise on or before the fifteenth day of December in each year he or
she must post the delinquency list of all persons delinquent in the
payment of the final installment of the fifty percent of said
assessments as in this chapter provided.

Sec. 583 RCW 89.30.670 and 1927 c 254 s 224 are each amended to
read as follows:
On the day fixed for the sale or on some subsequent day to which
the treasurer may have postponed it, of which postponement he or she
must give notice at the time of making such postponement, and between
the hours of ten o'clock a.m. and three o'clock p.m., the county
treasurer making the sale must commence the same beginning at the head
of the list and continuing alphabetically or in numerical order of the
parcels, lots, and blocks until completed.

Sec. 584 RCW 89.30.676 and 1927 c 254 s 226 are each amended to
read as follows:
The owner or person in possession of any real estate offered for
sale for assessments thereon may designate in writing to the county
treasurer by whom the sale is to be made and prior to the sale, what
portion of the property he or she wishes sold, if less than the whole,
but if the owner or possessor does not, then the treasurer may
designate it and the person who will take the least quantity of the
land or in case an undivided interest is assessed then the smallest
portion of the interest, and pay the assessment, interest, and cost due
including one dollar to the treasurer for a duplicate of the
certificate of sale, is the purchaser. The treasurer shall account to
the district for said one dollar.

Sec. 585 RCW 89.30.685 and 1927 c 254 s 229 are each amended to
read as follows:
In case the district is the purchaser, the treasurer shall make an
entry "sold to the district", and he or she shall receive proper credit
for the amount of the sale in his or her settlement with the district.

Sec. 586 RCW 89.30.700 and 1927 c 254 s 234 are each amended to
read as follows:
All moneys received by the reclamation district for transfers of
certificates of sale, or through sale or lease of property acquired on
account of sales for delinquent assessments, shall be paid to the
county treasurer of the county in which the lands involved are situated
and by him or her credited to the funds for which the assessments were
levied in proportion to the right of each fund respectively.

Sec. 587 RCW 89.30.709 and 1927 c 254 s 237 are each amended to
read as follows:
The certificate of sale must be signed by the treasurer making the
sale and filed in his or her office. A duplicate of said certificate
shall be delivered to any purchaser, other than the district.

Sec. 588 RCW 89.30.721 and 1927 c 254 s 241 are each amended to
read as follows:
A redemption of the property sold may be made by the owner or any
person on behalf and in the name of the owner or by any party in
interest within one year from the date of purchase by paying the amount
of the purchase price, cost of certificate and interest and the amount
of any assessments which any such purchaser may have paid thereon after
purchase by him or her together with like interest on such amount, and
if the reclamation district is the purchaser, the redemptioner shall
pay in addition to the purchase price and interest, the amount of any
assessments levied against said land during the period of redemption
and which are at that time delinquent.

Sec. 589 RCW 89.30.724 and 1927 c 254 s 242 are each amended to
read as follows:
Redemption must be made in gold or silver coin, as provided for the
collection of state and county taxes, and the county treasurer must
credit the amount paid to the person named in the certificate or his or
her assignee and pay it on demand to such person or his or her
assignee. No redemption shall be made except to the county treasurer
of the county in which the land is situated.

Sec. 590 RCW 89.30.730 and 1927 c 254 s 244 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the property is not redeemed within one year from the date of
sale, the county treasurer of the county in which the land sold is
situated, must make to the purchaser or his or her assignee a deed of
the property reciting in the deed substantially the matters contained
in the certificate and that no person redeemed the property during the
time allowed by law for its redemption.

Sec. 591 RCW 89.30.790 and 1927 c 254 s 264 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any officer of the district collecting tolls as herein provided,
shall be required to give a surety bond in double the probable amount
of monthly collections conditioned that he or she will faithfully
account to the reclamation district for all tolls collected under the
provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 592 RCW 90.03.040 and 1917 c 117 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The beneficial use of water is hereby declared to be a public use,
and any person may exercise the right of eminent domain to acquire any
property or rights now or hereafter existing when found necessary for
the storage of water for, or the application of water to, any
beneficial use, including the right to enlarge existing structures
employed for the public purposes mentioned in this chapter and use the
same in common with the former owner, and including the right and power
to condemn an inferior use of water for a superior use. In
condemnation proceedings the court shall determine what use will be for
the greatest public benefit, and that use shall be deemed a superior
one: PROVIDED, That no property right in water or the use of water
shall be acquired hereunder by condemnation for irrigation purposes,
which shall deprive any person of such quantity of water as may be
reasonably necessary for the irrigation of his or her land then under
irrigation to the full extent of the soil, by the most economical
method of artificial irrigation applicable to such land according to
the usual methods of artificial irrigation employed in the vicinity
where such land is situated. In any case, the court shall determine
what is the most economical method of irrigation. Such property or
rights shall be acquired in the manner provided by law for the taking
of private property for public use by private corporations.

Sec. 593 RCW 90.03.070 and 1987 c 109 s 70 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty of the water master, acting under the
direction of the department, to divide in whole or in part, the water
supply of his or her district among the several water conduits and
reservoirs using said supply, according to the right and priority of
each, respectively. He or she shall divide, regulate, and control the
use of water within his or her district by such regulation of
headgates, conduits, and reservoirs as shall be necessary to prevent
the use of water in excess of the amount to which the owner of the
right is lawfully entitled. Whenever, in the pursuance of his or her
duties, the water master regulates a headgate of a water conduit or the
controlling works of a reservoir, he or she shall attach to such
headgate or controlling works a written notice, properly dated and
signed, stating that such headgate or controlling works has been
properly regulated and is wholly under his or her control and such
notice shall be a legal notice to all parties. In addition to dividing
the available waters and supervising the stream ((patrolmen)) patroller
in his or her district, he or she shall enforce such rules and
regulations as the department shall from time to time prescribe.
The county or counties in which water master districts are created
shall deputize the water masters appointed hereunder, and may without
charge provide to each water master suitable office space, supplies,
equipment, and clerical assistance as are necessary to the water master
in the performance of his or her duties.

Sec. 594 RCW 90.03.210 and 2009 c 332 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) During the pendency of such adjudication proceedings prior to
judgment or upon review by an appellate court, the stream or other
water involved shall be regulated or partially regulated according to
the schedule of rights specified in the department's report upon an
order of the court authorizing such regulation: PROVIDED, Any
interested party may file a bond and obtain an order staying the
regulation of said stream as to him or her, in which case the court
shall make such order regarding the regulation of the stream or other
water as he or she may deem just. The bond shall be filed within five
days following the service of notice of appeal in an amount to be fixed
by the court and with sureties satisfactory to the court, conditioned
to perform the judgment of the court.
(2) Any appeal of a decision of the department on an application to
change or transfer a water right subject to an adjudication that is
being litigated actively shall be conducted as follows:
(a) The appeal shall be filed with the court conducting the
adjudication and served under RCW 34.05.542(3). The content of the
notice of appeal shall conform to RCW 34.05.546. Standing to appeal
shall be based on the requirements of RCW 34.05.530 and is not limited
to parties to the adjudication.
(b) If the appeal includes a challenge to the portion of the
department's decision that pertains to tentative determinations of the
validity and extent of the water right, review of those tentative
determinations shall be conducted by the court consistent with the
provisions of RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, except that the review
shall be de novo.
(c) If the appeal includes a challenge to any portion of the
department's decision other than the tentative determinations of the
validity and extent of the right, the court must certify to the
pollution control hearings board for review and decision those portions
of the department's decision. Review by the pollution control hearings
board shall be conducted consistent with chapter 43.21B RCW and the
board's implementing regulations, except that the requirements for
filing, service, and content of the notice of appeal shall be governed
by (a) of this subsection. Any party to an appeal may move the court
to certify portions of the appeal to the pollution control hearings
board, but the appellant must file a motion for certification no later
than ninety days after the appeal is filed under this section.
(d) Appeals shall be scheduled to afford all parties full
opportunity to participate before the superior court and the pollution
control hearings board.
(e) Any person wishing to appeal the decision of the board made
under (c) of this subsection shall seek review of the decision in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, except that the petition for review
must be filed with the superior court conducting the adjudication.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect or modify
any treaty or other federal rights of an Indian tribe, or the rights of
any federal agency or other person or entity arising under federal law.
Nothing in this section is intended or shall be construed as affecting
or modifying any existing right of a federally recognized Indian tribe
to protect from impairment its federally reserved water rights in
federal court.

Sec. 595 RCW 90.03.220 and 1917 c 117 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever proceedings shall be instituted for the determination of
the rights to the use of water, any defendant who shall fail to appear
in such proceedings, after legal service, and submit proof of his or
her claim, shall be estopped from subsequently asserting any right to
the use of such water embraced in such proceeding, except as determined
by such decree.

Sec. 596 RCW 90.03.250 and 1987 c 109 s 83 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person, municipal corporation, firm, irrigation district,
association, corporation or water users' association hereafter desiring
to appropriate water for a beneficial use shall make an application to
the department for a permit to make such appropriation, and shall not
use or divert such waters until he or she has received a permit from
the department as in this chapter provided. The construction of any
ditch, canal or works, or performing any work in connection with said
construction or appropriation, or the use of any waters, shall not be
an appropriation of such water nor an act for the purpose of
appropriating water unless a permit to make said appropriation has
first been granted by the department: PROVIDED, That a temporary
permit may be granted upon a proper showing made to the department to
be valid only during the pendency of such application for a permit
unless sooner revoked by the department: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That
nothing in this chapter contained shall be deemed to affect RCW
90.40.010 through 90.40.080 except that the notice and certificate
therein provided for in RCW 90.40.030 shall be addressed to the
department, and the department shall exercise the powers and perform
the duties prescribed by RCW 90.40.030.

Sec. 597 RCW 90.03.270 and 1987 c 109 s 85 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon receipt of an application it shall be the duty of the
department to make an endorsement thereon of the date of its receipt,
and to keep a record of same. If upon examination, the application is
found to be defective, it shall be returned to the applicant for
correction or completion, and the date and the reasons for the return
thereof shall be endorsed thereon and made a record in his or her
office. No application shall lose its priority of filing on account of
such defects, provided acceptable maps, drawings, and such data as is
required by the department shall be filed with the department within
such reasonable time as it shall require.

Sec. 598 RCW 90.03.410 and 1971 ex.s. c 152 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Any person or persons who shall willfully interfere with, or
injure or destroy any dam, dike, headgate, weir, canal or reservoir,
flume, or other structure or appliance for the diversion, carriage,
storage, apportionment, or measurement of water for irrigation,
reclamation, power, or other beneficial uses, or who shall willfully
use or conduct water into or through his or her ditch, which has been
lawfully denied him or her by the water master or other competent
authority, or shall willfully injure or destroy any telegraph,
telephone, or electric transmission line, or any other property owned,
occupied, or controlled by any person, association, or corporation, or
by the United States and used in connection with said beneficial use of
water, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor or, if there is actual physical
injury to or destruction of any real or personal property, of property
destruction and shall incur the penalties set forth in RCW 9.61.070.
(2) Any person or persons who shall willfully or unlawfully take or
use water, or conduct the same into his or her ditch or to his or her
land, or land occupied by him or her, and for such purpose shall cut,
dig, break down, or open any headgate, bank, embankment, canal or
reservoir, flume, or conduit, or interfere with, injure, or destroy any
weir, measuring box, or other appliance for the apportionment and
measurement of water, or unlawfully take or cause to run or pour out of
such structure or appliance any water, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
or, if there is actual physical injury to or destruction of any real or
personal property, of property destruction and shall incur the
penalties set forth in RCW 9.61.070.
(3) The use of water through such structure or structures,
appliance or appliances hereinbefore named after its or their having
been interfered with, injured or destroyed, shall be prima facie
evidence of the guilt of the person using it.

Sec. 599 RCW 90.03.440 and 1987 c 109 s 97 are each amended to
read as follows:
When two or more persons, joint owners in an irrigation ditch or
reservoir, not incorporated, or their lessees, are unable to agree
relative to the division or distribution of water received through
their ditch or from their reservoir, and where there is no disagreement
as to the ownership of said water, it shall be lawful for any such
owner or owners, his or her or their lessee or lessees, or either of
them, to apply to the department, in writing, setting forth such fact
and giving such information as shall enable the department to estimate
the probable expense of such service, asking the department to appoint
some suitable person to take charge of such ditch or reservoir for the
purpose of making a just division or distribution of the water from the
same to the parties entitled to the use thereof. The department shall
upon the receipt of such application notify the applicant of the
probable expense of such division and upon receipt of certified check
for said amount, the department shall appoint a suitable person to make
such division. The person so appointed shall take exclusive charge of
such ditch or reservoir for the purpose of dividing the water therefrom
in accordance with the established rights of the diverters therefrom,
and continue the said work until the necessity therefor shall cease to
exist. The expense of such investigation and division shall be a
charge upon all of the co-owners and the person advancing the payment
to the department shall be entitled to recover in any court of
competent jurisdiction from his or her co-owners their proportionate
share of the expense.

Sec. 600 RCW 90.03.450 and 1919 c 71 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon the failure of any co-owner to pay his or her proportionate
share of such expense as mentioned in RCW 90.03.430 within thirty days
after receiving a statement of the same as performed by his or her co-owner or owners, such person or persons so performing such labor may
secure payment of said claim by filing an itemized and sworn statement
thereof, setting forth the date of the performance and the nature of
the labor so performed, with the county auditor of the county wherein
said ditch is situated, and when so filed it shall constitute a valid
lien against the interest of such person or persons who shall fail to
perform their proportionate share of the work requisite to the proper
maintenance of said ditch, which said lien when so taken may be
enforced in the same manner as provided by law for the enforcement of
mechanics' and builders' liens.

Sec. 601 RCW 90.08.040 and 1977 c 22 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Where water rights of a stream have been adjudicated a stream
((patrolman)) patroller shall be appointed by the director of the
department of ecology upon application of water users having
adjudicated water rights in each particular water resource making a
reasonable showing of the necessity therefor, which application shall
have been approved by the district water master if one has been
appointed, at such time, for such stream, and for such periods of
service as local conditions may indicate to be necessary to provide the
most practical supervision and to secure to water users and owners the
best protection in their rights.
The stream ((patrolman)) patroller shall have the same powers as a
water master appointed under RCW 90.03.060, but his or her district
shall be confined to the regulation of waters of a designated stream or
streams. Such ((patrolman)) patroller shall be under the supervision
of the director or his or her designated representative. He or she
shall also enforce such special rules and regulations as the director
may prescribe from time to time.

Sec. 602 RCW 90.08.050 and 1977 c 22 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each stream ((patrolman)) patroller shall receive a wage per day
for each day actually employed in the duties of his or her office, or
if employed by the month, he or she shall receive a salary per month,
which wage or salary shall be fixed in the manner provided by law for
the fixing of the salaries or compensation of other state officers or
employees, plus travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended, to be paid by the
county in which the work is performed. In case the service extends
over more than one county, each county shall pay its equitable part of
such wage to be apportioned by the director. He or she shall be
reimbursed for actual necessary expenses when absent from his or her
designated headquarters in the performance of his or her duties, such
expense to be paid by the county in which he or she renders the
service. The accounts of the stream ((patrolman)) patroller shall be
audited and certified by the director and the county auditor shall
issue a warrant therefor upon the current expense fund.

Sec. 603 RCW 90.08.060 and 1977 c 22 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The salary of the stream ((patrolman)) patroller shall be borne by
the water users receiving the benefits and shall be paid to the county
or counties in the following manner:
The county or counties may assess each water user for his or her
proportionate share of the total stream ((patrolman)) patroller expense
in the same ratio that the amount of water diverted by him or her bears
to the total amount diverted from the stream during each season, on an
annual basis, to recover all such county expenses. The stream
((patrolman)) patroller shall keep an accurate record of the amount of
water diverted by each water user coming under his or her supervision.
On the first of each month the stream ((patrolman)) patroller shall
present his or her record of water diversion to the county or counties
for the preceding month. Where the water users are organized into an
irrigation district or water users' association, such organization may
enter into an agreement with the county or counties for direct payment
to the stream ((patrolman)) patroller in order to minimize
administrative costs.

Sec. 604 RCW 90.08.070 and 1977 c 22 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon failure of any water user to pay his or her proportionate
share of the expense referred to in RCW 90.08.050 and 90.08.060, the
county or counties shall be entitled to sue for and recover any such
unpaid portion in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Sec. 605 RCW 90.14.061 and 1988 c 127 s 74 are each amended to
read as follows:
Filing of a statement of a claim shall take place and be completed
upon receipt by the department of ecology, at its office in Olympia, of
an original statement signed by the claimant or his or her authorized
agent, and two copies thereof. Any person required to file hereunder
may file through a designated representative. A company, district,
public or municipal corporation, or the United States when furnishing
to persons water pertaining to water rights required to be filed under
RCW 90.14.041, shall have the right to file one claim on behalf of said
persons on a form prepared by the department for the total benefits of
each person served; provided that a separate claim shall be filed by
such company, district, public or private corporation, or the United
States for each operating unit of the filing entity providing such
water and for each water source. Within thirty days after receipt of
a statement of claim the department shall acknowledge the same by a
notation on one copy indicating receipt thereof and the date of
receipt, together with the wording of the first sentence of RCW
90.14.081, and shall return said copy by certified or registered mail
to the claimant at the address set forth in the statement of claim. No
statement of claim shall be accepted for filing by the department of
ecology unless accompanied by a two dollar filing fee.

Sec. 606 RCW 90.14.101 and 1988 c 127 s 76 are each amended to
read as follows:
To insure that all persons referred to in RCW 90.14.031 and
90.14.041 are notified of the registration provisions of this chapter,
the department of ecology is directed to give notice of the
registration provisions of this chapter as follows:
(1) It shall cause a notice in writing to be placed in a prominent
and conspicuous place in all newspapers of the state having a
circulation of more than fifty thousand copies for each week day, and
in at least one newspaper published in each county of the state, at
least once each year for five consecutive years.
(2) It shall cause a notice substantially the same as a notice in
writing to be broadcast by each commercial television station operating
in the United States and viewed in the state, and by at least one
commercial radio station operating from each county of the state having
such a station regularly at six month intervals for five consecutive
years.
(3) It shall cause a notice in writing to be placed in a prominent
and conspicuous location in each county court house in the state.
(4) The county treasurer of each county shall enclose with each
mailing of one or more statements of taxes due issued in 1972 a copy of
a notice in writing and a declaration that it shall be the duty of the
recipient of the statement of taxes due to forward the notice to the
beneficial owner of the property. A sufficient number of copies of the
notice and declaration shall be supplied to each county treasurer by
the director of ecology before the fifteenth day of January, 1972. In
the implementation of this subsection the department of ecology shall
provide reimbursement to the county treasurer for the reasonable
additional costs, if any there may be, incurred by said treasurer
arising from the inclusion of a notice in writing as required herein.
(5) It shall provide copies of the notice in writing to the press
services with offices located in Thurston county during January of the
years 1970, 1971, 1972, 1973, and 1974.
The director of the department may also in his or her discretion
give notice in any other manner which will carry out the purposes of
this section. Where notice in writing is given pursuant to subsections
(1) and (3) of this section, RCW 90.14.041, 90.14.051, and 90.14.071
shall be set forth and quoted in full.

Sec. 607 RCW 90.14.130 and 1987 c 109 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
When it appears to the department of ecology that a person entitled
to the use of water has not beneficially used his or her water right or
some portion thereof, and it appears that said right has or may have
reverted to the state because of such nonuse, as provided by RCW
90.14.160, 90.14.170, or 90.14.180, the department of ecology shall
notify such person by order: PROVIDED, That where a company,
association, district, or the United States has filed a blanket claim
under the provisions of RCW 90.14.060 for the total benefits of those
served by it, the notice shall be served on such company, association,
district or the United States and not upon any of its individual water
users who may not have used the water or some portion thereof which
they were entitled to use. The order shall contain: (1) A description
of the water right, including the approximate location of the point of
diversion, the general description of the lands or places where such
waters were used, the water source, the amount involved, the purpose of
use, and the apparent authority upon which the right is based; (2) a
statement that unless sufficient cause be shown on appeal the water
right will be declared relinquished; and (3) a statement that such
order may be appealed to the pollution control hearings board. Any
person aggrieved by such an order may appeal it to the pollution
control hearings board pursuant to RCW 43.21B.310. The order shall be
served by registered or certified mail to the last known address of the
person and be posted at the point of division or withdrawal. The order
by itself shall not alter the recipient's right to use water, if any.

Sec. 608 RCW 90.14.170 and 1967 c 233 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state by
virtue of his or her ownership of land abutting a stream, lake, or
watercourse, who abandons the same, or who voluntarily fails, without
sufficient cause, to beneficially use all or any part of said right to
withdraw or divert said water for any period of five successive years
after July 1, 1967, shall relinquish such right or portion thereof, and
such right or portion thereof shall revert to the state, and the waters
affected by said right shall become available for appropriation in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 90.03.250.

Sec. 609 RCW 90.24.020 and 1939 c 107 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Such petition shall contain a complete description of the property
surrounding said lake with the number of front feet contained in each
tract with the name of the owner thereof and his or her address
together with a brief statement of the reasons and necessity for such
application; that the level sought to be established will in no wise
interfere with the navigability of said lake or in any manner affect or
interfere with fish or game fish which may be then contained or may
thereafter be deposited in said lake, but that in order to protect fish
or game fish in said lake the construction of fish ladders or other
devices may be required to conserve and protect such fish or game fish,
then in that event the property owners to be benefited by the
establishment of said water level in such lake shall be required to pay
the cost thereof, in proportion to lineal feet of water front owned by
each.

Sec. 610 RCW 90.24.050 and 1988 c 127 s 82 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the event the court shall find that to protect fish and game
fish in said lake that fish ladders or other devices should be
constructed therein or that other construction shall be necessary in
order to maintain the determined lake level, the court shall find the
proper device to be constructed, the probable cost thereof and by its
order and judgment shall apportion the cost thereof among the persons
whose property abuts on said lake in proportion to the lineal feet of
waterfront owned by each, which sum so found shall constitute a lien
against said real property and shall be paid to the county treasurer
and by him or her placed in a special fund to be known as "Lake
. . . . . . Improvement Fund." The director of ecology shall appoint
a suitable person to be compensated by the property owners to regulate
the determined level as decreed by the court.

Sec. 611 RCW 90.44.110 and 1987 c 109 s 114 are each amended to
read as follows:
No public groundwaters that have been withdrawn shall be wasted
without economical beneficial use. The department shall require all
wells producing waters which contaminate other waters to be plugged or
capped. The department shall also require all flowing wells to be so
capped or equipped with valves that the flow of water can be completely
stopped when the wells are not in use under the terms of their
respective permits or approved declarations of vested rights.
Likewise, the department shall also require both flowing and nonflowing
wells to be so constructed and maintained as to prevent the waste of
public groundwaters through leaky casings, pipes, fittings, valves, or
pumps -- either above or below the land surface: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That
the withdrawal of reasonable quantities of public groundwater in
connection with the construction, development, testing, or repair of a
well shall not be construed as waste; also, that the inadvertent loss
of such water owing to breakage of a pump, valve, pipe, or fitting
shall not be construed as waste if reasonable diligence is shown by the
permittee in effecting the necessary repair.
In the issuance of an original permit, or of an amendment to an
original permit or certificate of vested right to withdraw and
appropriate public groundwaters under the provisions of this chapter,
the department may, as in his or her judgment is necessary, specify for
the proposed well or wells or other works a manner of construction
adequate to accomplish the provisions of this section.

Sec. 612 RCW 90.44.130 and 1987 c 109 s 116 are each amended to
read as follows:
As between appropriators of public groundwater, the prior
appropriator shall as against subsequent appropriators from the same
groundwater body be entitled to the preferred use of such groundwater
to the extent of his or her appropriation and beneficial use, and shall
enjoy the right to have any withdrawals by a subsequent appropriator of
groundwater limited to an amount that will maintain and provide a safe
sustaining yield in the amount of the prior appropriation. The
department shall have jurisdiction over the withdrawals of groundwater
and shall administer the groundwater rights under the principle just
set forth, and it shall have the jurisdiction to limit withdrawals by
appropriators of groundwater so as to enforce the maintenance of a safe
sustaining yield from the groundwater body. For this purpose, the
department shall have authority and it shall be its duty from time to
time, as adequate factual data become available, to designate
groundwater areas or subareas, to designate separate depth zones within
any such area or subarea, or to modify the boundaries of such existing
area, or subarea, or zones to the end that the withdrawals therefrom
may be administratively controlled as prescribed in RCW 90.44.180 in
order that overdraft of public groundwaters may be prevented so far as
is feasible. Each such area or zone shall, as nearly as known facts
permit, be so designated as to enclose a single and distinct body of
public groundwater. Each such subarea may be so designated as to
enclose all or any part of a distinct body of public groundwater, as
the department deems will most effectively accomplish the purposes of
this chapter.
Designation of, or modification of the boundaries of such a
groundwater area, subarea, or zone may be proposed by the department on
its own motion or by petition to the department signed by at least
fifty or one-fourth, whichever is the lesser number, of the users of
groundwater in a proposed groundwater area, subarea, or zone. Before
any proposed groundwater area, subarea, or zone shall be designated, or
before the boundaries or any existing groundwater area, subarea, or
zone shall be modified the department shall publish a notice setting
forth: (1) In terms of the appropriate legal subdivisions a
description of all lands enclosed within the proposed area, subarea, or
zone, or within the area, subarea, or zone whose boundaries are
proposed to be modified; (2) the object of the proposed designation or
modification of boundaries; and (3) the day and hour, and the place
where written objections may be submitted and heard. Such notice shall
be published in three consecutive weekly issues of a newspaper of
general circulation in the county or counties containing all or the
greater portion of the lands involved, and the newspaper of publication
shall be selected by the department. Publication as just prescribed
shall be construed as sufficient notice to the landowners and water
users concerned.
Objections having been heard as herein provided, the department
shall make and file in its office written findings of fact with respect
to the proposed designation or modification and, if the findings are in
the affirmative, shall also enter a written order designating the
groundwater area, or subarea, or zone or modifying the boundaries of
the existing area, subarea, or zone. Such findings and order shall
also be published substantially in the manner herein prescribed for
notice of hearing, and when so published shall be final and conclusive
unless an appeal therefrom is taken within the period and in the manner
prescribed by RCW 43.21B.310. Publication of such findings and order
shall give force and effect to the remaining provisions of this section
and to the provisions of RCW 90.44.180, with respect to the particular
area, subarea, or zone.
Priorities of right to withdraw public groundwater shall be
established separately for each groundwater area, subarea, or zone and,
as between such rights, the first in time shall be the superior in
right. The priority of the right acquired under a certificate of
groundwater right shall be the date of filing of the original
application for a withdrawal with the department, or the date or
approximate date of the earliest beneficial use of water as set forth
in a certificate of a vested groundwater right, under the provisions of
RCW 90.44.090.
Within ninety days after the designation of a groundwater area,
subarea, or zone as herein provided, any person, firm, or corporation
then claiming to be the owner of artificially stored groundwater within
such area, subarea, or zone shall file a certified declaration to that
effect with the department on a form prescribed by the department.
Such declaration shall cover: (1) The location and description of the
works by whose operation such artificial groundwater storage is
purported to have been created, and the name or names of the owner or
owners thereof; (2) a description of the lands purported to be
underlain by such artificially stored groundwater, and the name or
names of the owner or owners thereof; (3) the amount of such water
claimed; (4) the date or approximate date of the earliest artificial
storage; (5) evidence competent to show that the water claimed is in
fact water that would have been dissipated naturally except for
artificial improvements by the claimant; and (6) such additional
factual information as reasonably may be required by the department.
If any of the purported artificially stored groundwater has been or
then is being withdrawn, the claimant also shall file (1) the
declarations which this chapter requires of claimants to a vested right
to withdraw public groundwaters, and (2) evidence competent to show
that none of the water withdrawn under those declarations is in fact
public groundwater from the area, subarea, or zone concerned:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That in case of failure to file a declaration within
the ninety-day period herein provided, the claimant may apply to the
department for a reasonable extension of time, which shall not exceed
two additional years and which shall be granted only upon a showing of
good cause for such failure.
Following publication of the declaration and findings -- as in the
case of an original application, permit, or certificate of right to
appropriate public groundwaters -- the department shall accept or reject
such declaration or declarations with respect to ownership or
withdrawal of artificially stored groundwater. Acceptance of such
declaration or declarations by the department shall convey to the
declarant no right to withdraw public groundwaters from the particular
area, subarea, or zone, nor to impair existing or subsequent rights to
such public waters.
Any person, firm, or corporation hereafter claiming to be the owner
of groundwater within a designated groundwater area, subarea, or zone
by virtue of its artificial storage subsequent to such designation
shall, within three years following the earliest artificial storage
file a declaration of claim with the department, as herein prescribed
for claims based on artificial storage prior to such designation:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That in case of such failure the claimant may apply
to the department for a reasonable extension of time, which shall not
exceed two additional years and which shall be granted upon a showing
of good cause for such failure.
Any person, firm, or corporation hereafter withdrawing groundwater
claimed to be owned by virtue of artificial storage subsequent to
designation of the relevant groundwater area, subarea, or zone shall,
within ninety days following the earliest such withdrawal, file with
the department the declarations required by this chapter with respect
to withdrawals of public groundwater.

Sec. 613 RCW 90.48.095 and 1991 c 200 s 1103 are each amended to
read as follows:
In carrying out the purposes of this chapter or chapter 90.56 RCW
the department shall, in conjunction with either the adoption of rules,
consideration of an application for a waste discharge permit or the
termination or modification of such permit, or proceedings in
adjudicative hearings, have the authority to issue process and subpoena
witnesses effective throughout the state on its own behalf or that of
an interested party, compel their attendance, administer oaths, take
the testimony of any person under oath and, in connection therewith
require the production for examination of any books or papers relating
to the matter under consideration by the department. In case of
disobedience on the part of any person to comply with any subpoena
issued by the department, or on the refusal of any witness to testify
to any matters regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated,
it shall be the duty of the superior court of any county, or of the
judge thereof, on application of the department, to compel obedience by
proceedings for contempt, as in the case of disobedience of the
requirements of a subpoena issued from such court or a refusal to
testify therein. In connection with the authority granted under this
section no witness or other person shall be required to divulge trade
secrets or secret processes. Persons responding to a subpoena as
provided herein shall be entitled to fees as are witnesses in superior
court.

Sec. 614 RCW 90.58.170 and 1994 c 253 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
A shorelines hearings board sitting as a quasi-judicial body is
hereby established within the environmental and land use hearings
office under RCW 43.21B.005. The shorelines hearings board shall be
made up of six members: Three members shall be members of the
pollution control hearings board; two members, one appointed by the
association of Washington cities and one appointed by the association
of county commissioners, both to serve at the pleasure of the
associations; and the commissioner of public lands or his or her
designee. The ((chairman)) chair of the pollution control hearings
board shall be the ((chairman)) chair of the shorelines hearings board.
Except as provided in RCW 90.58.185, a decision must be agreed to by at
least four members of the board to be final. The members of the
shorelines (([hearings])) hearings board shall receive the
compensation, travel, and subsistence expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 615 RCW 91.08.030 and 1911 c 23 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The plan of such proposed waterway shall be presented to the board
by a written petition of owners of lands which it is represented will
be improved by the construction, deepening or widening of such
waterway; and such petition shall be signed by the owners of thirty-five percent or more of the area of lands in the district, and shall be
verified by one or more of the petitioners to the effect that the
signatures attached are the genuine signature of the persons or
corporations signing the same. Each petitioner shall add a description
of the lands he or she owns. If petitioners are unmarried persons they
shall so state. If lands are owned by married persons, husband and
wife shall join in the petition. If a petitioner is a corporation, the
signature shall be accompanied by a certified copy of a resolution of
the board of directors or trustees of the corporation authorizing the
person signing the petition for the corporation to execute it. If
lands included in the petition are owned by minors, insane persons, or
other persons under guardianship in this state, the petition may be
signed by the guardians of such persons: PROVIDED, That the signature
be accompanied by a certified copy of an order of the superior court
having the guardianship of such person in charge, authorizing the
guardian to sign the petition. A petition may consist of one or more
separate papers or sheets which are identified with the subject matter.
The petitioners shall file with the board, with their petition, a
map of the lands in the district and a statement showing each separate
ownership of lands as shown by the public records of the county, and
their location in the county, with the names of the owners as shown by
such records, and the location of the proposed waterway if a new
waterway is to be constructed. If an existing waterway is to be
deepened the map shall show its location, and if it is to be widened
the map shall show its location and the extent to which it is to be
widened. With the petition there shall also be presented satisfactory
evidence from the real property records of the county that the
petitioners are severally the owners in fee simple of their respective
tracts of land, and that all taxes and assessments due thereon are
paid. If it is proposed that any lands in the district shall be filled
with the material dug or dredged from such waterway, the petition shall
so state, and the map of the district and plan of the improvement shall
show the location, depth, and yardage of such fill. The petition may
also fix the price per cubic yard at which such fill shall be charged
to the land filled, which charge shall be added to the assessment for
the improvement to be made upon such lands and be paid as a part
thereof. If the price of filling is not fixed by the petition it may
be fixed by the board.
At any time after the filing of such petition one or more of the
petitioners may file and record in the office of the auditor of the
county, notice of the pendency of the proceeding, describing the
boundaries of the proposed district, and from the time of such filing
all persons shall be deemed to have notice of the pendency of the
proceeding and be bound thereby. Upon the hearing upon such petition,
hereinafter provided, if the same be denied any person interested may
file in the office of said county auditor a certified copy of the order
denying the same, whereupon the auditor shall enter the discharge of
the notice of the pendency of the proceeding on the margin of the
record thereof. And the like discharge may be filed whenever the
proceeding is terminated for any other reason.

Sec. 616 RCW 91.08.080 and 1911 c 23 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
At the time and place prescribed in the said notice any owner of
land within said proposed improvement district may file with the board
his or her written consent to the proposed improvement, and he or she
shall then be considered as a petitioner; and if the owners of more
than one half of the lands within the district, including the lands
represented by the petition, shall assent to the prayer of said
petition, the board shall then proceed to hear and consider any
objections which may have been filed at that or any previous time, and
may adjourn such hearing from day to day. If the board after full
hearing on the merits of the proposed waterway shall be satisfied that
the same will be of benefit to the public interests, and that private
benefit will result to the lands within the district sufficient to
equal the cost of the proposed improvement, they may make findings
accordingly and declare their intention to establish the waterway
district under the name of the ". . . . . . Waterway District" and make
the improvement as prayed for; but if the owners of less than one half
of the lands in the district shall assent to the creation thereof and
the making of the proposed improvement, the board shall deny the
petition and the proceeding shall be dismissed.

Sec. 617 RCW 91.08.130 and 1911 c 23 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board shall file a petition, verified by its ((chairman)) chair
and signed by the prosecuting attorney, in the superior court of the
county, praying that the property described may be taken or damaged for
the purpose specified and that compensation therefor be ascertained by
a jury or by the court in case a jury be waived. Such petition shall
allege the creation of the waterway district and contain a copy of the
order directing the proceeding, a reasonably accurate description of
the lots or parcels of land or other property which will be taken or
damaged, and the names of the owners and occupants of said lands and of
said persons having any interest therein so far as known to the said
board, or as appears from the records in the office of the county
auditor.

Sec. 618 RCW 91.08.150 and 1911 c 23 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
In case the land or other property sought to be taken or damaged is
state land, the summons and copy of petition shall be served upon the
commissioner of public lands; if it is county land it shall be served
upon the county auditor, and if school land, upon the county auditor
and the ((chairman)) chair of the board of directors of the school
district. Service upon other parties defendant, public or private,
shall be made in the same manner as is or shall be provided by law for
service of summons in other civil actions. If the state is made a
defendant the attorney general shall represent it. If the county is a
defendant the court shall appoint an attorney to represent it at all
stages of the proceedings, and may allow him or her compensation for
his or her services as costs of the proceeding.

Sec. 619 RCW 91.08.170 and 1911 c 23 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The jury or court shall also ascertain the just compensation to be
paid to any person found to have an interest in any lot or parcel of
land or property which may be taken or damaged for such improvement,
whether or not such person's name or such lot or parcel of land or
other property is mentioned or described in said petition: PROVIDED,
That such person shall first be admitted as a party defendant to such
suit by such court and shall file a statement of his or her interest
in, and a description of, the lot or parcel of land or other property
in respect to which he or she claims compensation.

Sec. 620 RCW 91.08.220 and 1911 c 23 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The court shall have power at any time, upon proof that any
defendant who has not been served with process has ceased to be an
owner since the filing of such petition, to substitute the new owner as
a defendant, and after due service of the summons and petition upon him
or her proceed as though he or she had been a party in the first
instance; and the court may upon any finding of the jury, or at any
time during the course of the proceedings, enter every such order,
rule, judgment, or decree as the nature of the case may require.

Sec. 621 RCW 91.08.250 and 1988 c 202 s 94 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any final judgment rendered by said court upon the findings of the
court or a jury, shall be the lawful and sufficient condemnation of the
land or property to be taken, or of the right to damage the same in the
manner proposed, upon the payment of the amount of such findings and
all costs which shall be taxed as in other civil cases: PROVIDED, That
in case any defendant recovers no award, no costs shall be taxed. Such
judgment shall be final and conclusive as to the damages caused by such
improvement, unless appellate review is sought, and no review shall
delay proceedings under the order of said board if it shall pay into
court for the owners and parties interested, as directed by the court,
the amount of the judgment and costs; but such board after making such
payment into court shall be liable to such owner or owners, or parties
interested, for the payment of any further compensation which may at
any time be finally awarded to such parties seeking review in said
proceeding, and his or her costs, and shall pay the same on the
rendition of judgment therefor and abide any rule or order of the court
in relation to the matter in controversy. In case of review by the
supreme court or the court of appeals of the state, the money so paid
into the superior court by the board, as aforesaid, shall remain in the
custody of said superior court until the final determination of the
proceedings. If the owner of the land, real estate, premises, or other
property, accepts the sum awarded by the jury or the court, he or she
shall be deemed thereby to have waived conclusively appellate review
and final judgment may be rendered in the superior court as in other
cases.

Sec. 622 RCW 91.08.250 and 1988 c 202 s 94 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any final judgment rendered by said court upon the findings of the
court or a jury, shall be the lawful and sufficient condemnation of the
land or property to be taken, or of the right to damage the same in the
manner proposed, upon the payment of the amount of such findings and
all costs which shall be taxed as in other civil cases: PROVIDED, That
in case any defendant recovers no award, no costs shall be taxed. Such
judgment shall be final and conclusive as to the damages caused by such
improvement, unless appellate review is sought, and no review shall
delay proceedings under the order of said board if it shall pay into
court for the owners and parties interested, as directed by the court,
the amount of the judgment and costs; but such board after making such
payment into court shall be liable to such owner or owners, or parties
interested, for the payment of any further compensation which may at
any time be finally awarded to such parties seeking review in said
proceeding, and his or her costs, and shall pay the same on the
rendition of judgment therefor and abide any rule or order of the court
in relation to the matter in controversy. In case of review by the
supreme court or the court of appeals of the state, the money so paid
into the superior court by the board, as aforesaid, shall remain in the
custody of said superior court until the final determination of the
proceedings. If the owner of the land, real estate, premises, or other
property, accepts the sum awarded by the jury or the court, he or she
shall be deemed thereby to have waived conclusively appellate review
and final judgment may be rendered in the superior court as in other
cases.

Sec. 623 RCW 91.08.280 and 1911 c 23 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
Said commissioners, before entering upon their duties, shall take
and subscribe an oath that they will faithfully perform the duties of
the office to which they are appointed, and will to the best of their
abilities make true and impartial assessments according to the law.
Every commissioner shall receive compensation at the rate of five
dollars per day for each day actually spent in making the assessment
herein provided for, upon his or her filing in the proceeding a
verified statement showing the number of days he or she has actually
spent therein; and upon the approval of said statement by the judge of
the court in which the proceeding is pending, the board shall issue a
warrant in the amount so approved, upon the special fund created to pay
the awards and costs of said proceeding; and the fees of such
commissioners so paid, and all expenses returned by them and allowed by
the court shall be included in the cost and expense of such proceeding.

Sec. 624 RCW 91.08.340 and 1911 c 23 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person interested in any property assessed and desiring to
object to the assessment thereon, shall file his or her objections to
such report at any time before the day set for hearing said roll, and
serve a copy thereof upon the prosecuting attorney. As to all property
to the assessment upon which no objections are filed and served, as
herein provided, default may be entered and the assessment confirmed by
the court. On the hearing of objections the report of the
commissioners shall be competent evidence to support the assessment,
but either party may introduce such other evidence as may tend to
establish the right of the matter. The hearing shall be conducted as
in other cases at law tried by the court without a jury; and if it
shall appear that the property of the objector is assessed more or less
than it will be benefited, or more or less than its proportionate share
of the cost of the condemnation and improvement, the court shall so
find, and it shall also find the amount in which said property ought to
be assessed and correct the assessment accordingly. Judgment shall be
entered confirming the assessment roll as originally filed or as
corrected, as the case may require.

Sec. 625 RCW 91.08.370 and 1911 c 23 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
The clerk of the court in which such judgment is rendered shall
certify a copy of the assessment roll as confirmed, and of the judgment
confirming the same, to the treasurer of the county, or if there has
been an appeal taken from any part of such judgment, then he or she
shall certify such part of the roll and judgment as is not included in
such appeal, and the remainder when final judgment is entered:
PROVIDED, That if upon such appeal the judgment of the superior court
shall be affirmed, the assessments on such property as to which appeal
has been taken shall bear interest at the same rate and from the same
date which other assessments not paid within the time hereafter
provided shall bear. Such copy of the assessment roll shall be
sufficient warrant to the county treasurer to collect the assessments
therein specified in the manner hereinafter provided.

Sec. 626 RCW 91.08.390 and 1911 c 23 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
The owner of any land charged with an assessment under this
chapter, may discharge the same from all liability for the cost of such
condemnation and improvement by paying the entire assessment charged
against his or her land, without interest, within the time fixed by the
notice of the county treasurer for the payment thereof; or within said
time he or she may pay a part of such assessment and allow the
remainder to continue as an assessment upon his or her land to be
collected and paid as hereinafter provided; or within said time he or
she may pay the entire assessment per square foot upon any part of his
or her land, providing that he or she shall when paying such partial
assessment give to the treasurer a description of the tract paid for.

Sec. 627 RCW 91.08.400 and 1911 c 23 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
When any assessment shall be paid either in full or in part only,
within the time for payment without interest fixed by his or her
notice, the treasurer shall note the fact of such payment opposite the
assessment.

Sec. 628 RCW 91.08.410 and 1981 c 156 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
Immediately after the expiration of the time fixed by his or her
notice for payment of assessments without interest, the treasurer shall
divide the several assessments which remain unpaid in whole or in part
into ten equal amounts or installments, as near as may be, without
fractional cents, and enter said installments upon the roll opposite
the several assessments, numbering the same from one to ten
successively. And thereafter said treasurer shall annually for ten
years, before the time fixed by law for the collection of state and
county taxes, add one of the said assessment installments with interest
for one year from the expiration of the time for payment without
interest, or of the anniversary thereof, at a rate determined by the
board on the entire unpaid assessment, to the tax levied upon the
property assessed, where said tax appears upon the county tax roll, and
collect said installment and interest, without reduction of percentage
for prepayment, at the same time and in the same manner as state and
county taxes are collected. And after delinquency said installments
and interest shall be subject to the same charges for increased
interest and penalties as are other delinquent taxes. But no tax sale
of lands assessed under this chapter shall discharge the same from the
lien of any unpaid installments of the assessment against it until all
installments and interest are fully paid.

Sec. 629 RCW 91.08.430 and 1981 c 156 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
The owner of any lands assessed under this chapter may at any time
after the time fixed by the treasurer's notice for payment without
interest, discharge his or her lands from the unpaid assessment by
paying the principal of all installments unpaid with interest thereon
at a rate determined by the board to the next anniversary of the time
fixed as aforesaid; or he or she may pay one or more installments, with
like interest, beginning with installment number ten and continuing in
the inverse numerical order of installments. The successor in title to
any part of his or her lands may have the proportionate assessment
segregated on the roll and charged to such part upon his or her
producing to the treasurer his or her recorded deed to such part.

Sec. 630 RCW 91.08.460 and 1911 c 23 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
Immediately after expiration of the time fixed by the treasurer for
the payment of assessments levied under this chapter, he or she shall
report to the board in writing the sum collected by him or her and in
his or her hands to the credit of the assessment roll; and thereafter
and on or before the first days of January and July in each year he or
she shall make written reports to said board of the sums collected by
him or her upon said roll, stating in detail the amount of principal,
interest, and penalty so collected, the amount of principal remaining
uncollected, and also, in detail, the principal and interest paid out
by him or her under authority of the board, and the balance in his or
her hands to the credit of the roll.

Sec. 631 RCW 91.08.500 and 1985 c 469 s 98 are each amended to
read as follows:
The treasurer shall pay the interest on the bonds authorized to be
issued by this chapter, on presentation of matured coupons therefor,
out of the funds of the district in his or her hands. Whenever there
shall be sufficient money in any such fund (not less than one thousand
dollars) over and above sufficient for the payment of matured interest
on all outstanding bonds, to pay the principal of one or more bonds,
the treasurer shall call in and pay the bonds in their numerical order:
PROVIDED, That the call for bonds shall be made by publication in the
official newspaper of the county within five days after the semiannual
interest period, and shall state that bonds numbered . . . . . . . . .
(giving the serial numbers of the bonds called) will be paid on
presentation; and that after a date named, not more than fifteen days
thereafter, interest on the bonds called shall cease.

Sec. 632 RCW 91.08.510 and 1983 c 167 s 269 are each amended to
read as follows:
The owner of any bond issued under authority of this chapter shall
not have any claim therefor against any person, body, or corporation,
except from the special assessment made for the improvement for which
such bond was issued; but his or her remedy in case of nonpayment shall
be confined to the enforcement of such assessment. A copy of this
section shall be plainly written, printed, or engraved on each bond so
issued.

Sec. 633 RCW 91.08.550 and 1911 c 23 s 54 are each amended to
read as follows:
The indebtedness of any such district on contracts, or upon
employment or for supplies, shall be paid by warrants on the district
fund only, to be issued by the board upon allowed written claims. Such
warrants shall be in form the same as county warrants, or as nearly the
same as may be practicable; shall draw the legal rate of interest from
the date of their presentation to the county treasurer for payment, and
shall be signed by the ((chairman)) chair and attested by the clerk:
PROVIDED, That no warrants shall be issued in payment of any
indebtedness of such district for less than the face or par value.

Sec. 634 RCW 91.08.560 and 1911 c 23 s 55 are each amended to
read as follows:
All warrants issued under RCW 91.08.550 may be presented by the
holders thereof to the county treasurer, who shall pay them or endorse
thereon the date of presentation for payment and if the same are not
paid, and the reason for their nonpayment; and no warrant shall draw
interest until it is so presented and endorsed by the county treasurer.
It shall be the duty of the treasurer from time to time, when he or she
has sufficient funds in his or her hands for the purpose, to give
notice to warrant holders to present their warrants for payment; such
notice to be given by advertisement in the county newspaper. And
thirty days after the first publication of said notice the warrants
called shall cease to bear interest. Said notice shall be published
once each week for two weeks consecutively, and such warrants shall be
called and paid in the order of their endorsement.

Sec. 635 RCW 91.08.590 and 1911 c 23 s 59 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any defendant in a condemnation proceeding under this chapter,
whose remaining land, or whose other lands in the district, shall be
assessed for benefits arising from the improvement, may pay his or her
assessments in full, if they be less than his or her condemnation
judgment, at or before the time fixed by the treasurer for the payment
of assessments without interest, by satisfying his or her judgment upon
the judgment docket and producing to the treasurer the certificate of
the county clerk that the judgment has been satisfied. And if his or
her assessments be greater than his or her condemnation judgments he or
she may, within the same time, pay his or her assessment to the extent
of his or her judgment by the like satisfaction and the like production
of the clerk's certificate to the treasurer. In each case the
treasurer shall note the payment and the manner thereof on the
assessment roll and report the same to the board.

Sec. 636 RCW 91.08.600 and 1911 c 23 s 60 are each amended to
read as follows:
At any time before the completion of excavations required for the
construction, deepening, or widening of a waterway under this chapter,
when there will be surplus material dug or dredged from such waterway,
any owner of land within the district, for the filling of whose land no
provision has theretofore been made, may have such surplus material
delivered upon his or her land for filling purposes upon paying the
cost of such delivery in a sum to be fixed by the board. The sum so
fixed shall be paid to the treasurer at such time and in such manner as
the board may prescribe, and shall be credited to the district fund.

Sec. 637 RCW 91.08.620 and 1911 c 23 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
Should any sum of money paid into court as compensation or damages
for land or property taken or damaged in any condemnation proceeding
under this chapter be uncalled for the period of two years, the county
clerk shall satisfy the judgment therefor and pay the money in his or
her hands to the treasurer for the road fund of the county. But upon
application to the board of county commissioners within four years
after such payment, the party entitled thereto shall be paid such money
by the county without interest: PROVIDED, That if any such party,
being a natural person, was under legal disabilities when such money
was paid to the treasurer, the time within which he or she or his or
her legal representatives shall make application for the payment
thereof shall not expire until one year after his or her death or the
removal of his or her disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 638 Section 42 of this act expires December 1,
2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 639 Section 43 of this act takes effect
December 1, 2013.

--- END ---