BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may pay no more than fifty thousand dollars per
fiscal year from the state general fund for claims and assessment costs
for damage to livestock caused by wolves submitted under RCW 77.36.100.
(2) If any general fund expenditures authorized under subsection
(1) of this section are unspent as of June 30th of a fiscal year, the
state treasurer shall transfer the unspent amount to the wolf-livestock
conflict account created in section 2 of this act. However, the state
treasurer may only transfer that portion of the unspent amount
necessary to achieve a balance of one hundred thousand dollars in the
wolf-livestock conflict account.
(3) By August 1st of each year, the department shall provide the
office of financial management and the appropriate committees of the
senate and house of representatives with a brief update on wolf-
livestock conflicts including: Reported and confirmed wolf-livestock
damage for the previous fiscal year; claims submitted and any amounts
paid in the previous fiscal year; projected future wolf-livestock
conflicts and claims; and, if applicable, any additional state general
fund resources necessary to ensure compensation for past or predicted
future damage to livestock caused by wolves.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The wolf-livestock conflict account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. Any grants, gifts, or donations to the state for
the purposes of providing compensation for livestock damage caused by
wolves and any transfers under section 1 of this act must be deposited
in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
mitigation, assessment, and payments for livestock damage caused by
wolves consistent with this chapter. Only the director or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. An
appropriation is not required for expenditures from the account and the
account is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.36.010 and 2009 c 521 s 184 and 2009 c 333 s 54 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Claim" means an application to the department for compensation
under this chapter.
(2) "Commercial crop" means a horticultural or agricultural
product, including the growing or harvested product. For the purposes
of this chapter all parts of horticultural trees shall be considered a
commercial crop and shall be eligible for claims.
(3) "((Commercial)) Livestock" means cattle, sheep, and horses
((held or raised by a person for sale)).
(4) "Compensation" means a cash payment, materials, or service.
(5) "Damage" means economic losses caused by wildlife interactions.
(6) "Immediate family member" means spouse, state registered
domestic partner, brother, sister, grandparent, parent, child, or
grandchild.
(7) "Owner" means a person who has a legal right to commercial
crops, ((commercial)) livestock, or other property that was damaged
during a wildlife interaction.
(8) "Wildlife interaction" means the negative interaction and the
resultant damage between wildlife and commercial crops, ((commercial))
livestock, or other property.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.36.100 and 2009 c 333 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) ((Except as limited by RCW 77.36.070 and 77.36.080,)) The
department shall offer to distribute money appropriated to pay claims
to the owner of commercial crops for damage caused by wild deer or elk
or to the owners of ((commercial)) livestock that has been killed by
bears, wolves, or cougars, or injured by bears, wolves, or cougars to
such a degree that the market value of the ((commercial)) livestock has
been diminished.
(i) Payments for claims for damage to commercial crops are subject
to the limitations of RCW 77.36.070 and 77.36.080.
(ii) Payments for claims for damage to ((commercial)) livestock
caused by bears or cougars are not subject to the limitations of RCW
77.36.070 and 77.36.080, but may not exceed the total amount
specifically appropriated therefor.
(iii) Payments for claims for damage to livestock caused by wolves
are not subject to the limitations of RCW 77.36.070 and 77.36.080 but
may not exceed amounts available under sections 1 and 2 of this act.
(b) Owners of commercial crops or ((commercial)) livestock are only
eligible for a claim under this subsection if:
(i) The owner satisfies the definition of "eligible farmer" in RCW
82.08.855;
(ii) The conditions of RCW 77.36.110 have been satisfied; and
(iii) The damage caused to the commercial crop or ((commercial))
livestock satisfies the criteria for damage established by the
commission under this subsection.
(c) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria that
clarifies the damage to commercial crops and ((commercial)) livestock
qualifying for compensation under this subsection. An owner of a
commercial crop or ((commercial)) livestock must satisfy the criteria
prior to receiving compensation under this subsection. The criteria
for damage adopted under this subsection must include, but not be
limited to, a required minimum economic loss to the owner of the
commercial crop or ((commercial)) livestock, which may not be set at a
value of less than five hundred dollars.
(2)(a) The department may offer to provide noncash compensation
only to offset wildlife interactions to a person who applies to the
department for compensation for damage to property other than
commercial crops or ((commercial)) livestock that is the result of a
mammalian or avian species of wildlife on a case-specific basis if the
conditions of RCW 77.36.110 have been satisfied and if the damage
satisfies the criteria for damage established by the commission under
(b) of this subsection.
(b) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria for
damage to property other than a commercial crop or ((commercial))
livestock that is damaged by wildlife and may be eligible for
compensation under this subsection, including criteria for filing a
claim for compensation under this subsection.
(3)(a) To prevent or offset wildlife interactions, the department
may offer materials or services to a person who applies to the
department for assistance in providing mitigating actions designed to
reduce wildlife interactions if the actions are designed to address
damage that satisfies the criteria for damage established by the
commission under this subsection.
(b) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria for
mitigating actions designed to address wildlife interactions that may
be eligible for materials and services under this section, including
criteria for submitting an application under this section.
(4) An owner who files a claim under this section may appeal the
decision of the department pursuant to rules adopted by the commission
if the claim:
(a) Is denied; or
(b) Is disputed by the owner and the owner disagrees with the
amount of compensation determined by the department.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.36.130 and 2009 c 333 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section and as limited by
RCW 77.36.100, 77.36.070, and 77.36.080, the cash compensation portion
of each claim by the department under this chapter is limited to the
lesser of:
(a) The value of the damage to the property by wildlife, reduced by
the amount of compensation provided to the claimant by any nonprofit
organizations that provide compensation to private property owners due
to financial losses caused by wildlife interactions((, except that,
subject to appropriation to pay compensation for damage to commercial
livestock,)). The value of killed or injured ((commercial)) livestock
may be no more than two hundred dollars per sheep, one thousand five
hundred dollars per head of cattle, and one thousand five hundred
dollars per horse; or
(b) Ten thousand dollars.
(2) The department may offer to pay a claim for an amount in excess
of ten thousand dollars to the owners of commercial crops or
((commercial)) livestock filing a claim under RCW 77.36.100 only if the
outcome of an appeal filed by the claimant under RCW 77.36.100
determines a payment higher than ten thousand dollars.
(3) All payments of claims by the department under this chapter
must be paid to the owner of the damaged property and may not be
assigned to a third party.
(4) The burden of proving all property damage, including damage to
commercial crops and ((commercial)) livestock, belongs to the claimant.

--- END ---