BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.80.040 and 2012 c 261 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The vehicle access pass is created solely for access to the
department of fish and wildlife and to the department of natural
resources' recreation sites or lands. The vehicle access pass is only
available to a person who purchases a current valid: Big game hunting
license issued under RCW 77.32.450; small game hunting license issued
under RCW 77.32.460; western Washington pheasant permit issued under
RCW 77.32.575; trapping license issued under RCW 77.65.450; watchable
wildlife decal issued under RCW 77.32.560; or combination, saltwater,
or freshwater personal use fishing license issued under RCW 77.32.470.
(2) One vehicle access pass must be issued per purchase pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The vehicle access pass is valid for the license year of the
license it is purchased with.
(4) The vehicle access pass must contain space for two motor
vehicle license plate numbers. A vehicle access pass is only valid for
those vehicle license plate numbers written on the pass.

--- END ---