BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.770 and 2011 c 324 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person is
guilty of unlawful trade in shark fins in the second degree if:
(a) The person sells, offers for sale, purchases, offers to
purchase, or otherwise exchanges a shark fin or shark fin derivative
product for commercial purposes; or
(b) The person prepares or processes a shark fin or shark fin
derivative product for human or animal consumption for commercial
purposes.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person is
guilty of unlawful trade in shark fins in the first degree if:
(a) The person commits the act described by subsection (1) of this
section and the violation involves shark fins or a shark fin derivative
product with a total market value of two hundred fifty dollars or more;
(b) The person commits the act described by subsection (1) of this
section and acted with knowledge that the shark fin or shark fin
derivative product originated from a shark that was harvested in an
area or at a time where or when the harvest was not legally allowed or
by a person not licensed to harvest the shark; or
(c) The person commits the act described by subsection (1) of this
section and the violation occurs within five years of entry of a prior
conviction under this section or a prior conviction for any other gross
misdemeanor or felony under this title involving fish, other than a
recreational fishing violation.
(3)(a) Unlawful trade in shark fins in the second degree is a gross
misdemeanor. Upon conviction, the department shall suspend any
commercial fishing privileges for the person that requires a license
under this title for a period of one year.
(b) Unlawful trade in shark fins in the first degree is a class C
felony. Upon conviction, the department shall suspend any commercial
fishing privileges for the person that requires a license under this
title for a period of one year.
(4) Any person who obtains a license or permit issued by the
department to take or possess sharks or shark parts for bona fide
research or educational purposes, and who sells, offers for sale,
purchases, offers to purchase, or otherwise trades a shark fin or shark
fin derivative product, exclusively for bona fide research or
educational purposes, may not be held liable under or subject to the
penalties of this section.
(((5) Nothing in this section prohibits the sale, offer for sale,
purchase, offer to purchase, or other exchange of shark fins or shark
fin derivative products for commercial purposes, or preparation or
processing of shark fins or shark fin derivative products for purposes
of human or animal consumption for commercial purposes, if the shark
fins or shark fin derivative products were lawfully harvested or
lawfully acquired prior to July 22, 2011.))

--- END ---