BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.38.034 and 2005 c 179 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governing documents may not prohibit the outdoor display of
political yard signs by an owner or resident on the owner's or
resident's property before any ((primary or general)) public election.
The governing documents may include reasonable rules and regulations
regarding the placement and manner of display of political yard signs.
(2) This section applies retroactively to any governing documents
in effect on July 24, 2005. Any provision in a governing document in
effect on July 24, 2005, that is inconsistent with this section is void
and unenforceable.

--- END ---