BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.80.020 and 2012 c 261 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in ((RCW 79A.80.050, 79A.80.060,
and 79A.80.070)) this chapter and RCW 79A.05.065, a discover pass is
required for any motor vehicle to park or operate on any recreation
site or lands((, except for short-term parking as may be authorized
under RCW 79A.80.070)).
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the cost of a
discover pass is thirty dollars.
(b) The cost of a discover pass is five dollars for any person who
has been provided with a lifetime veterans disability pass from the
state parks and recreation commission under RCW 79A.05.065.
(c) Every four years the office of financial management must review
the cost of the discover pass and, if necessary, recommend to the
legislature an adjustment to the cost of the discover pass to account
for inflation.
(3) A discover pass is valid for one year beginning from the date
that the discover pass is marked for activation. The activation date
may differ from the purchase date pursuant to any policies developed by
the agencies.
(4) Sales of discover passes must be consistent with RCW
79A.80.100.
(5) The discover pass must contain space for two motor vehicle
license plate numbers. A discover pass is valid only for those vehicle
license plate numbers written on the pass. However, the agencies may
offer for sale a family discover pass that is fully transferable among
vehicles and does not require the placement of a license plate number
on the pass to be valid. The agencies must collectively set a price
for the sale of a family discover pass that is no more than fifty
dollars. A discover pass is valid only for use with one motor vehicle
at any one time.
(6) One complimentary discover pass must be provided to a volunteer
who performed twenty-four hours of service on agency-sanctioned
volunteer projects in a year. The agency must provide vouchers to
volunteers identifying the number of volunteer hours they have provided
for each project. The vouchers may be brought to an agency to be
redeemed for a discover pass.

--- END ---