BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the design
alternative selected by the state department of transportation, the
federal highway administration, and the federal transit administration
for a new Interstate 5 bridge that connects Vancouver, Washington to
Portland, Oregon is unacceptable.
(2) The legislature further finds that:
(a) The United States coast guard has not approved the design
alternative due to a lack of clearance between the Columbia river and
the bridge deck that inhibits the free movement of maritime freight;
(b) The inclusion of light rail in the design alternative results
in a cost increase to the project of over nine hundred twenty-five
million dollars for taxpayers;
(c) The people of Clark county voted in November 2012 not to fund
the costs of operating and maintaining light rail; and
(d) The design alternative will shift federal funds outside of the
design corridor in order to make numerous capital improvements in
transit for the state of Oregon at the expense of Washington state.
(3) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that no funds be
spent to further the selected design alternative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The department is prohibited from expending funds on the design or
construction of any project that replaces the bridges on Interstate 5
between Vancouver, Washington and Portland, Oregon and includes light
rail.

--- END ---