BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.79.110 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 411 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commission shall keep a record of all of its proceedings
and make such reports to the governor as may be required. The
commission shall define by rules what constitutes specialized and
advanced levels of nursing practice as recognized by the medical and
nursing profession. The commission may adopt rules or issue advisory
opinions in response to questions put to it by professional health
associations, nursing practitioners, and consumers in this state
concerning the authority of various categories of nursing practitioners
to perform particular acts.
(2) The commission shall approve curricula and shall establish
criteria for minimum standards for schools preparing persons for
licensing as registered nurses, advanced registered nurse
practitioners, and licensed practical nurses under this chapter. The
commission shall approve such schools of nursing as meet the
requirements of this chapter and the commission, and the commission
shall approve establishment of basic nursing education programs and
shall establish criteria as to the need for and the size of a program
and the type of program and the geographical location. The commission
shall establish criteria for proof of reasonable currency of knowledge
and skill as a basis for safe practice after three years' inactive or
lapsed status. The commission shall establish criteria for licensing
by endorsement. The commission shall determine examination
requirements for applicants for licensing as registered nurses,
advanced registered nurse practitioners, and licensed practical nurses
under this chapter, and shall certify to the secretary for licensing
duly qualified applicants.
(3) In adopting rules on the number of active nursing practice
hours needed to meet continuing competency requirements, the commission
must provide exemptions for registered nurses as set out in this
subsection. Registered nurses who are domiciled within and licensed by
the state of Washington and who are enrolled for at least six hours per
semester or quarter period in an accredited bachelors of science in
nursing program or an accredited masters of science nursing program are
exempt from the nursing practice hours requirement for the current
reporting period. The exemption is permitted only if the registered
nurse maintains passing grades and completes the bachelors of science
nursing program or masters of science nursing program within three
years from acceptance of the program.
(4) The commission shall adopt such rules under chapter 34.05 RCW
as are necessary to fulfill the purposes of this chapter.
(5) The commission is the successor in interest of the board of
nursing and the board of practical nursing. All contracts,
undertakings, agreements, rules, regulations, decisions, orders, and
policies of the former board of nursing or the board of practical
nursing continue in full force and effect under the commission until
the commission amends or rescinds those rules, regulations, decisions,
orders, or policies.
(6) The members of the commission are immune from suit in an
action, civil or criminal, based on its disciplinary proceedings or
other official acts performed in good faith as members of the
commission.
(7) Whenever the workload of the commission requires, the
commission may request that the secretary appoint pro tempore members
of the commission. When serving, pro tempore members of the commission
have all of the powers, duties, and immunities, and are entitled to all
of the emoluments, including travel expenses, of regularly appointed
members of the commission.

--- END ---