BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that local
governments have unmet needs in the funding of transportation
infrastructure. The legislature further recognizes that the previous
statewide transportation funding packages have provided insufficient
resources to local governments. As such, it is the intent of the
legislature to restrict the use of certain local option funding sources
for highway purposes as outlined in Article II, section 40 of the state
Constitution.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.80.140 and 2010 c 161 s 917 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions of RCW 36.73.065, a transportation
benefit district under chapter 36.73 RCW may fix and impose an annual
vehicle fee, not to exceed one hundred dollars per vehicle registered
in the district, for each vehicle subject to vehicle license fees under
RCW 46.17.350(1) (a), (c), (d), (e), (g), (h), (j), or (n) through (q)
and for each vehicle subject to gross weight license fees under RCW
46.17.355 with a scale weight of six thousand pounds or less.
(2)(a) A district that includes all the territory within the
boundaries of the jurisdiction, or jurisdictions, establishing the
district may impose by a majority vote of the governing board of the
district up to twenty dollars of the vehicle fee authorized in
subsection (1) of this section. If the district is countywide, the
revenues of the fee ((shall)) must be distributed to each city within
the county by interlocal agreement. The interlocal agreement is
effective when approved by the county and sixty percent of the cities
representing seventy-five percent of the population of the cities
within the county in which the countywide fee is collected.
(b) A district may not impose a fee under this subsection (2):
(i) For a passenger-only ferry transportation improvement unless
the vehicle fee is first approved by a majority of the voters within
the jurisdiction of the district; or
(ii) That, if combined with the fees previously imposed by another
district within its boundaries under RCW 36.73.065(4)(a)(i), exceeds
twenty dollars.
(c) If a district imposes or increases a fee under this subsection
(2) that, if combined with the fees previously imposed by another
district within its boundaries, exceeds twenty dollars, the district
((shall)) must provide a credit for the previously imposed fees so that
the combined vehicle fee does not exceed twenty dollars.
(3) Proceeds from a vehicle fee under this section, initially
authorized by the governing board after January 1, 2013, must be used
exclusively for "highway purposes" as that term is construed in Article
II, section 40 of the state Constitution.
(4) The department of licensing ((shall)) must administer and
collect the fee. The department ((shall)) must deduct a percentage
amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed one percent of the fees
collected, for administration and collection expenses incurred by it.
The department ((shall)) must remit remaining proceeds to the custody
of the state treasurer. The state treasurer ((shall)) must distribute
the proceeds to the district on a monthly basis.
(((4))) (5) No fee under this section may be collected until six
months after approval under RCW 36.73.065.
(((5))) (6) The vehicle fee under this section applies only when
renewing a vehicle registration, and is effective upon the registration
renewal date as provided by the department of licensing.
(((6))) (7) The following vehicles are exempt from the fee under
this section:
(a) Campers, as defined in RCW 46.04.085;
(b) Farm tractors or farm vehicles, as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and
46.04.181;
(c) Mopeds, as defined in RCW 46.04.304;
(d) Off-road and nonhighway vehicles, as defined in RCW 46.04.365;
(e) Private use single-axle trailer, as defined in RCW 46.04.422;
(f) Snowmobiles, as defined in RCW 46.04.546; and
(g) Vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW and the
international registration plan.

--- END ---