BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.138 and 2011 c 337 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receiving notice from a registered person pursuant to RCW
9A.44.130 that the person will be attending a school or institution of
higher education or will be employed with an institution of higher
education, the sheriff must promptly notify the school district and the
school principal or institution's department of public safety and shall
provide that school or department with the person's: (a) Name and any
aliases used; (b) complete residential address; (c) date and place of
birth; (d) place of employment; (e) crime for which convicted; (f) date
and place of conviction; (g) sentence imposed for conviction; (h)
social security number; (((h))) (i) photograph; and (((i))) (j) risk
level classification.
(2) A principal or department receiving notice under this
((subsection)) section must disclose the information received from the
sheriff as follows:
(a) If the student is classified as a risk level II or III, the
principal shall provide the information received to every teacher of
the student and to any other personnel who, in the judgment of the
principal, supervises the student or for security purposes should be
aware of the student's record;
(b) If the student is classified as a risk level I, the principal
or department shall provide the information received only to personnel
who, in the judgment of the principal or department, for security
purposes should be aware of the student's record.
(3) The sheriff shall notify the applicable school district and
school principal or institution's department of public safety whenever
a student's risk level classification is changed or the sheriff is
notified of a change in the student's address.
(4) Any information received by school or institution personnel
under this ((subsection)) section is confidential and may not be
further disseminated except as provided in RCW 28A.225.330, other
statutes or case law, and the family and educational and privacy rights
act of 1994, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g et seq.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a school district or department of public safety of an
institution of higher education receives notice under RCW 9A.44.138
that a person who is required to register as a sex offender plans to
attend the school, it shall make the following notifications:
(a) If the student who is required to register as a sex offender is
classified as a risk level I or is unclassified, the school district or
department of public safety shall provide the information received
under RCW 9A.44.138 only to personnel who, in the judgment of the
school district, the school principal, or department of public safety,
for security purposes should be aware of the student's record.
(b)(i) If the student who is required to register as a sex offender
is classified as a risk level II or III, the school district or
department of public safety shall provide the information received
under RCW 9A.44.138 to the student's teachers and to any other
personnel who, in the judgment of the school district, the school
principal, or department of public safety, supervises the student or
for security purposes should be aware of the student's record.
(ii) If the student who is required to register as a sex offender
is classified as a risk level II or III, the school district or
department of public safety shall also notify parents, legal guardians,
students who are eighteen years of age or older, and any personnel who
may observe or come into contact with the student, including school
administrators, teachers, staff persons, bus drivers, security staff,
coaches, playground supervisors, and maintenance personnel.
(iii) A school district or department of public safety shall
provide the notice required by (b)(ii) of this subsection in writing at
the beginning of the school year and at any time a new student who is
required to register as a sex offender enrolls in or arrives at the
school or institution to attend classes. The school district or
department of public safety shall also provide the notice by e-mail, if
available. The notice provided under (b)(ii) of this subsection must
include the name of the student required to register as a sex offender,
the crime of conviction, the sentence imposed, and an internet link, if
available, to a local law enforcement agency web site where interested
persons may seek further information about registered sex offenders.
(2) Any information received by a school district, principal, or
school personnel under this section is confidential and may not be
further disseminated except as provided in RCW 28A.225.330, other
statutes or case law, and the family and educational and privacy rights
act of 1994, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g et seq.
(3) This section may not be construed to confer any powers pursuant
to RCW 4.24.550 upon the public safety department of any public or
private school or institution of higher education.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.320.125 and 2009 c 578 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature considers it to be a matter of public safety
for public schools and staff to have current safe school plans and
procedures in place, fully consistent with federal law. The
legislature further finds and intends, by requiring safe school plans
to be in place, that school districts will become eligible for federal
assistance. The legislature further finds that schools are in a
position to serve the community in the event of an emergency resulting
from natural disasters or man-made disasters.
(2) Schools and school districts shall consider the guidance
provided by the superintendent of public instruction, including the
comprehensive school safety checklist and the model comprehensive safe
school plans that include prevention, intervention, all hazard/crisis
response, and postcrisis recovery, when developing their own individual
comprehensive safe school plans. Each school district shall adopt, no
later than September 1, 2008, and implement a safe school plan
consistent with the school mapping information system pursuant to RCW
36.28A.060. The plan shall:
(a) Include required school safety policies and procedures;
(b) Address emergency mitigation, preparedness, response, and
recovery;
(c) Include provisions for assisting and communicating with
students and staff, including those with special needs or disabilities;
(d) Use the training guidance provided by the Washington emergency
management division of the state military department in collaboration
with the Washington state office of the superintendent of public
instruction school safety center and the school safety center advisory
committee;
(e) Require the building principal to be certified on the incident
command system;
(f) Take into account the manner in which the school facilities may
be used as a community asset in the event of a community-wide
emergency; and
(g) Set guidelines for requesting city or county law enforcement
agencies, local fire departments, emergency service providers, and
county emergency management agencies to meet with school districts and
participate in safety-related drills.
(3) To the extent funds are available, school districts shall
annually:
(a) Review and update safe school plans in collaboration with local
emergency response agencies;
(b) Conduct an inventory of all hazardous materials;
(c) Update information on the school mapping information system to
reflect current staffing and updated plans, including:
(i) Identifying all staff members who are trained on the national
incident management system, trained on the incident command system, or
are certified on the incident command system; and
(ii) Identifying school transportation procedures for evacuation,
to include bus staging areas, evacuation routes, communication systems,
parent-student reunification sites, and secondary transportation
agreements consistent with the school mapping information system; and
(d) Provide information to all staff on the use of emergency
supplies and notification and alert procedures.
(4) To the extent funds are available, school districts shall
annually record and report on the information and activities required
in subsection (3) of this section to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs.
(5) School districts are encouraged to work with local emergency
management agencies and other emergency responders to conduct one
tabletop exercise, one functional exercise, and two full-scale
exercises within a four-year period.
(6) Schools shall conduct no less than one safety-related drill
each month that school is in session. Schools shall complete no less
than one drill using the school mapping information system, one drill
for lockdowns, one drill for shelter-in-place, and six drills for fire
evacuation in accordance with the state fire code. Schools should
consider drills for earthquakes, tsunamis, or other high-risk local
events. Schools shall document the date and time of such drills. This
subsection is intended to satisfy all federal requirements for
comprehensive school emergency drills and evacuations.
(7) Educational service districts are encouraged to apply for
federal emergency response and crisis management grants with the
assistance of the superintendent of public instruction and the
Washington emergency management division of the state military
department.
(8) School districts shall collect the residential addresses and e-mail addresses of parents, legal guardians, students who are eighteen
years of age or older, and school district personnel. School districts
shall collect this information prior to the beginning of the school
year and at any time a student enrolls in a school in the district or
an employee is hired by the school district.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to
implement provisions of this section. These rules may include, but are
not limited to, provisions for evacuations, lockdowns, or other
components of a comprehensive safe school plan.

--- END ---