BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.30.020 and 2011 c 171 s 76 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No person may operate a motor vehicle subject to
registration under chapter 46.16A RCW in this state unless the person
is insured under a motor vehicle liability policy with liability limits
of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090, is self-insured as
provided in RCW 46.29.630, is covered by a certificate of deposit in
conformance with RCW 46.29.550, or is covered by a liability bond of at
least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090. ((Written)) Proof of
financial responsibility for motor vehicle operation must be provided
on the request of a law enforcement officer in the format specified
under RCW 46.30.030.
(b) A person who drives a motor vehicle that is required to be
registered in another state that requires drivers and owners of
vehicles in that state to maintain insurance or financial
responsibility shall, when requested by a law enforcement officer,
provide evidence of financial responsibility or insurance as is
required by the laws of the state in which the vehicle is registered.
(c) When asked to do so by a law enforcement officer, failure to
display ((an insurance identification card)) proof of financial
responsibility for motor vehicle operation as specified under RCW
46.30.030 creates a presumption that the person does not have motor
vehicle insurance.
(d) Failure to provide proof of motor vehicle insurance is a
traffic infraction and is subject to penalties as set by the supreme
court under RCW 46.63.110 or community restitution.
(e) For the purposes of this section, when a person uses a portable
electronic device to display proof of financial security to a law
enforcement officer, the officer may only view the proof of financial
security and is otherwise prohibited from viewing any other content on
the portable electronic device.
(f) Whenever a person presents a portable electronic device
pursuant to this section, that person assumes all liability for any
damage to the portable electronic device.
(2) If a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this
section appears in person before the court or a violations bureau and
provides written evidence that at the time the person was cited, he or
she was in compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of
subsection (1) of this section, the citation shall be dismissed and the
court or violations bureau may assess court administrative costs of
twenty-five dollars at the time of dismissal. In lieu of personal
appearance, a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this
section may, before the date scheduled for the person's appearance
before the court or violations bureau, submit by mail to the court or
violations bureau written evidence that at the time the person was
cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, in which case the
citation shall be dismissed without cost, except that the court or
violations bureau may assess court administrative costs of twenty-five
dollars at the time of dismissal.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not govern:
(a) The operation of a motor vehicle registered under RCW 46.18.220
or 46.18.255, governed by RCW 46.16A.170, or registered with the
Washington utilities and transportation commission as common or
contract carriers; or
(b) The operation of a motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330, a
motor-driven cycle as defined in RCW 46.04.332, or a moped as defined
in RCW 46.04.304.
(4) RCW 46.29.490 shall not be deemed to govern all motor vehicle
liability policies required by this chapter but only those certified
for the purposes stated in chapter 46.29 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.30.030 and 1989 c 353 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever an insurance company issues or renews a motor vehicle
liability insurance policy, the company shall provide the policyholder
with an identification card as specified by the department of
licensing. At the policyholder's request, the insurer shall provide
the policyholder a card for each vehicle covered under the policy. The
card required by this section may be provided in either paper or
electronic format. Acceptable electronic formats include the display
of electronic images on a cellular phone or any other type of portable
electronic device.
(2) The department of licensing shall adopt rules specifying the
type, style, and content of insurance identification cards to be used
for proof of compliance with RCW 46.30.020, including the method for
issuance of such identification cards by persons or organizations
providing proof of compliance through self-insurance, certificate of
deposit, or bond. In adopting such rules the department shall consider
the guidelines for insurance identification cards developed by the
insurance industry committee on motor vehicle administration.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16A.180 and 2010 c 161 s 432 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A registration certificate must be:
(a) Signed by the registered owner, or if a firm or corporation,
the signature of one of its officers or other authorized agent, to be
valid;
(b) Carried in the vehicle for which it is issued; and
(c) Provided to law enforcement and the department by the operator
of the vehicle upon demand.
(d) The registration certificate required by this section may be
provided in either paper or electronic format. Acceptable electronic
formats include the display of electronic images on a cellular phone or
any other type of portable electronic device.
(2) It is unlawful for any person to operate or be in possession of
a vehicle without carrying a registration certificate for the vehicle.
Any person in charge of a vehicle shall, upon demand of any of the
local authorities or of any police officer or of any representative of
the department, permit an inspection of the vehicle registration
certificate. This section does not apply to a vehicle for which
registration is not required to be renewed annually and is a publicly
owned vehicle marked as required under RCW 46.08.065.

--- END ---