BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.19.648 and 2012 c 171 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Effective June 1, 2015, all state agencies, to the extent
determined practicable by the rules adopted by the department of
commerce pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required to satisfy one
hundred percent of their fuel usage for operating publicly owned
vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment from electricity or
biofuel. Compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, or propane may
be substituted for electricity or biofuel if the department of commerce
determines that electricity and biofuel are not reasonably available.
(2)(a) Effective June 1, 2018, all local government subdivisions of
the state, to the extent determined practicable by the rules adopted by
the department of commerce pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required to
satisfy one hundred percent of their fuel usage for operating publicly
owned vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment from electricity or
biofuel. The department of commerce shall convene an advisory
committee of representatives of local government subdivisions and
representatives from organizations representing each local government
subdivision to work with the department to develop the rules.
(b) The following are exempt from this requirement: (i) Transit
agencies using compressed natural gas on June 1, 2018((, are exempt
from this requirement)), and (ii) engine retrofits that would void
warranties. Nothing in this section is intended to require the
replacement of equipment before the end of its useful life. Compressed
natural gas, liquefied natural gas, or propane may be substituted for
electricity or biofuel if the department of commerce determines that
electricity and biofuel are not reasonably available.
(c) Rules adopted pursuant to RCW 43.325.080 must provide the
authority for local government subdivisions to elect to exempt police,
fire, and other emergency response vehicles, including utility vehicles
frequently used for emergency response, from the fuel usage requirement
in (a) of this subsection.
(3) In order to phase in this transition for the state, all state
agencies, to the extent determined practicable by the department of
commerce by rules adopted pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required to
achieve forty percent fuel usage for operating publicly owned vessels,
vehicles, and construction equipment from electricity or biofuel by
June 1, 2013. Compressed natural gas, liquefied natural gas, or
propane may be substituted for electricity or biofuel if the department
of commerce determines that electricity and biofuel are not reasonably
available. The department of enterprise services, in consultation with
the department of commerce, shall report to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2013, on what percentage of the state's fuel
usage is from electricity or biofuel.
(4) Except for cars owned or operated by the Washington state
patrol, when tires on vehicles in the state's motor vehicle fleet are
replaced, they must be replaced with tires that have the same or better
rolling resistance as the original tires.
(5) By December 31, 2015, the state must, to the extent
practicable, install electrical outlets capable of charging electric
vehicles in each of the state's fleet parking and maintenance
facilities.
(6) The department of transportation's obligations under subsection
(3) of this section are subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for the specific purpose identified in subsection (3) of
this section.
(7) The department of transportation's obligations under subsection
(5) of this section are subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for the specific purpose identified in subsection (5) of
this section unless the department receives federal or private funds
for the specific purpose identified in subsection (5) of this section.
(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component
assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to
charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and
consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.
(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility
that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter
a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged
battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and
consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.

--- END ---