BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.729 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The term of the sentence of an offender committed to a
correctional facility operated by the department may be reduced by
earned release time in accordance with procedures that shall be
developed and adopted by the correctional agency having jurisdiction in
which the offender is confined. The earned release time shall be for
good behavior and good performance, as determined by the correctional
agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency shall not credit
the offender with earned release credits in advance of the offender
actually earning the credits.
(b) Any program established pursuant to this section shall allow an
offender to earn early release credits for presentence incarceration.
If an offender is transferred from a county jail to the department, the
administrator of a county jail facility shall certify to the department
the amount of time spent in custody at the facility and the amount of
earned release time. The department may approve a jail certification
from a correctional agency that calculates earned release time based on
the actual amount of confinement time served by the offender before
sentencing when an erroneous calculation of confinement time served by
the offender before sentencing appears on the judgment and sentence.
(2) An offender who has been convicted of a felony committed after
July 23, 1995, that involves any applicable deadly weapon enhancements
under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, shall not receive any good
time credits or earned release time for that portion of his or her
sentence that results from any deadly weapon enhancements.
(3) An offender may earn early release time as follows:
(a) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, and before July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned
release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence.
(b) In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense, or a sex offense that is a class A felony, committed on or
after July 1, 2003, the aggregate earned release time may not exceed
ten percent of the sentence.
(c) An offender is qualified to earn up to fifty percent of
aggregate earned release time if he or she:
(i) Is not classified as an offender who is at a high risk to
reoffend as provided in subsection (4) of this section;
(ii) Is not confined pursuant to a sentence for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(iii) Has no prior conviction for the offenses listed in (c)(ii) of
this subsection;
(iv) Participates in programming or activities as directed by the
offender's individual reentry plan as provided under RCW 72.09.270 to
the extent that such programming or activities are made available by
the department; and
(v) Has not committed a new felony after July 22, 2007, while under
community custody.
(d) In no other case shall the aggregate earned release time exceed
one-third of the total sentence.
(4) The department shall perform a risk assessment of each offender
who may qualify for earned early release under subsection (3)(c) of
this section utilizing the risk assessment tool recommended by the
Washington state institute for public policy. Subsection (3)(c) of
this section does not apply to offenders convicted after July 1, 2010.
(5)(a) A person who is eligible for earned early release as
provided in this section and who will be supervised by the department
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.501 or 9.94A.5011, shall be transferred to
community custody in lieu of earned release time;
(b) The department shall, as a part of its program for release to
the community in lieu of earned release, require the offender to
propose a release plan that includes an approved residence and living
arrangement. All offenders with community custody terms eligible for
release to community custody in lieu of earned release shall provide an
approved residence and living arrangement prior to release to the
community;
(c) The department may deny transfer to community custody in lieu
of earned release time if the department determines an offender's
release plan, including proposed residence location and living
arrangements, may violate the conditions of the sentence or conditions
of supervision, place the offender at risk to violate the conditions of
the sentence, place the offender at risk to reoffend, or present a risk
to victim safety or community safety. The department's authority under
this section is independent of any court-ordered condition of sentence
or statutory provision regarding conditions for community custody;
(d) If the department is unable to approve the offender's release
plan, the department may do one or more of the following:
(i) Transfer an offender to partial confinement in lieu of earned
early release for a period not to exceed three months. The three
months in partial confinement is in addition to that portion of the
offender's term of confinement that may be served in partial
confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728(5);
(ii) Provide rental vouchers to the offender for a period not to
exceed three months if rental assistance will result in an approved
release plan. ((The))
A voucher must be provided in conjunction with additional
transition support programming or services that enable an offender to
participate in services including, but not limited to, substance abuse
treatment, mental health treatment, sex offender treatment, educational
programming, or employment programming;
(e) The department shall maintain a list of housing providers that
meets the requirements of section 2 of this act. A rental voucher may
only be paid to a housing provider on the department's list;
(f) For each offender who is the recipient of a rental voucher, the
department shall ((include, concurrent with the data that the
department otherwise obtains and records, the housing status of the
offender for the duration of the offender's supervision)) gather data
as recommended by the Washington state institute for public policy in
order to best demonstrate whether rental vouchers are effective in
reducing recidivism.
(6) An offender serving a term of confinement imposed under RCW
9.94A.670(5)(a) is not eligible for earned release credits under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A housing provider may be placed on a list with the department
to receive rental vouchers under RCW 9.94A.729 in accordance with the
provisions of this section.
(2) The department shall give preference to housing providers that
provide a small, family oriented, living environment. For living
environments with between four and eight beds, or a greater number of
individuals if permitted by local code, the department shall provide
transition support that verifies an offender is participating in
programming or services including, but not limited to, substance abuse
treatment, mental health treatment, sex offender treatment, educational
programming, development of positive living skills, or employment
programming. In addition, when selecting housing providers, the
department shall consider the compatibility of the proposed offender
housing with the surrounding neighborhood and underlying zoning. The
department shall adopt procedures to limit the concentration of housing
providers who provide housing to sex offenders in a single neighborhood
or area.
(3)(a) The department shall provide the local law and justice
council or other designated county authority, and a city's chief law
enforcement officer if such housing is located within a city, with
notice any time a housing provider or new housing location is added to
the list within that county.
(b) The notice shall include a community impact statement that has
been developed in collaboration with the county and city local
governments. The community impact statement shall include the number
and location of other special needs housing in the neighborhood and a
review of services and supports in the area to assist offenders in
their transition. When developing the community impact statement, the
department shall utilize information gathered and provided by the local
government to the extent that it is available.
(4) If a certificate of inspection, as provided in RCW 59.18.125,
is required by local regulation and the local government does not have
a current certificate of inspection on file, the local government shall
have ten business days from the later of (a) receipt of notice from the
department as provided in subsection (3) of this section; or (b) from
the date the local government is given access to the dwelling unit to
conduct an inspection or reinspection to issue a certificate. This
section is deemed satisfied if a local government does not issue a
timely certificate of inspection.
(5)(a) If, within ten business days of receipt of a notice from the
department of a new location or new housing provider, the county or
city determines that the housing is in a neighborhood with an existing
concentration of special needs housing, including retirement homes,
assisted living, emergency or transitional housing, or adult family
homes, the county or city may request the new location or new housing
provider be removed from the list.
(b) This subsection does not apply to housing providers approved by
the department to receive rental vouchers on the effective date of this
section.
(6) The county or city may at any time request a housing provider
be removed from the list if it provides information to the department
that:
(a) It has determined that the housing does not comply with state
and local fire and building codes or applicable zoning and development
regulations in effect at the time the housing provider first began
receiving housing vouchers; or
(b) The housing provider is not complying with the provisions of
this section.
(7) After receiving a request to remove a housing provider from the
county or city, the department shall immediately notify the provider of
the concerns and request that the provider demonstrate that it is in
compliance with the provisions of this section. If, after ten days'
written notice, the housing provider cannot demonstrate to the
department that it is in compliance with the reasons for the county's
or city's request for removal, the department shall remove the housing
provider from the list.
(8)(a) The provisions of chapter 59.18 RCW do not apply to the
removal of an offender from a dwelling unit under the provisions of
this section if the housing provider has a supportive living program
that includes a structured plan for monitoring tenants for compliance
with the program rules and at least one or more of the following
components:
(i) A clean and sober environment, covering all tenants, employees,
staff, and guests;
(ii) Referral services for counseling to meet the offender's needs,
such as chemical dependency or personal growth;
(iii) Referral for case management services; or
(iv) A group living environment where all tenants agree to support
each other and hold each other accountable.
(b) A housing provider who meets the provisions of (a) of this
subsection may terminate a tenancy and remove a tenant as follows:
(i) The housing provider shall give written notice to the assigned
community corrections officer no less than forty-eight hours before
terminating the tenancy. A housing provider may subsequently terminate
the tenancy and require the offender to vacate the premises within
forty-eight hours of receipt of written notice if the offender has:
(A) Misused a controlled substance or used or consumed any illegal
drug or alcoholic beverage either on or off of the premises;
(B) Engaged in harassment or verbal abuse of neighbors, staff, or
other tenants;
(C) Absconded;
(D) Returned to the physical custody of the department or other
agency for greater than thirty days; or
(E) Engaged in other behavior that is incompatible with the rules
of the house and has been given at least three written violation
notices.
(ii) If a tenant engages in conduct that presents a clear and
present danger to neighbors, staff, or other tenants, the housing
provider may immediately terminate the tenancy and require the offender
to vacate the premises. The housing provider shall notify the assigned
community corrections officer as soon as possible of the termination.
If the offender's behavior rises to the level of a violation, the
community corrections officer shall proceed as required in RCW
9.94A.716 and 9.94A.737.
(9) An offender's failure to vacate the premises after termination
of the tenancy, as set forth in this section, constitutes criminal
trespass under chapter 9A.52 RCW. A housing provider may enlist the
cooperation of law enforcement in removing the offender from the
premises without having to obtain a court order or writ of restitution.
The housing provider shall provide law enforcement with a signed
written statement attesting to the facts that substantiate the
termination of the tenancy and subsequent criminal trespass.
(10) An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or
public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or units of local government
and its employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune from civil
liability for damages for assisting a housing provider in the removal
of an offender from the premises as provided in this section.
(11) A housing provider who provides housing pursuant to this
section is not liable for civil damages arising from the criminal
conduct of an offender to any greater extent than a regular tenant, and
no special duties are created under this section.

--- END ---