BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.381 and 2012 c 10 s 73 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person is exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a
portion of the amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and
payable in the year following the year in which a claim is filed, and
thereafter, in accordance with the following:
(1) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence
which was occupied by the person claiming the exemption as a principal
place of residence as of the time of filing. However, any person who
sells, transfers, or is displaced from his or her residence may
transfer his or her exemption status to a replacement residence, but no
claimant may receive an exemption on more than one residence in any
year. Moreover, confinement of the person to a hospital, nursing home,
assisted living facility, or adult family home does not disqualify the
claim of exemption if:
(a) The residence is temporarily unoccupied;
(b) The residence is occupied by a spouse or a domestic partner
and/or a person financially dependent on the claimant for support; or
(c) The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home,
hospital, assisted living facility, or adult family home costs;
(2) The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time
of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the
residence on which the property taxes have been imposed or if the
person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership, such person must own a share
therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in which he
or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or state registered domestic partnership or owned
by cotenants is deemed to be owned by each spouse or each domestic
partner or each cotenant, and any lease for life is deemed a life
estate;
(3)(a) The person claiming the exemption must be:
(i) Sixty-one years of age or older on December 31st of the year in
which the exemption claim is filed, or must have been, at the time of
filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason of
disability; or
(ii) A veteran of the armed forces of the United States entitled to
and receiving compensation from the United States department of
veterans affairs at a total disability rating for a service-connected
disability.
(b) However, any surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of
a person who was receiving an exemption at the time of the person's
death will qualify if the surviving spouse or surviving domestic
partner is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets the
requirements of this section;
(4) The amount that the person is exempt from an obligation to pay
is calculated on the basis of combined disposable income, as defined in
RCW 84.36.383. If the person claiming the exemption was retired for
two months or more of the assessment year, the combined disposable
income of such person must be calculated by multiplying the average
monthly combined disposable income of such person during the months
such person was retired by twelve. If the income of the person
claiming exemption is reduced for two or more months of the assessment
year by reason of the death of the person's spouse or the person's
domestic partner, or when other substantial changes occur in disposable
income that are likely to continue for an indefinite period of time,
the combined disposable income of such person must be calculated by
multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of such
person after such occurrences by twelve. If it is necessary to
estimate income to comply with this subsection, the assessor may
require confirming documentation of such income prior to May 31 of the
year following application;
(5)(a) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of ((thirty-five)) forty thousand dollars
or less is exempt from all excess property taxes; and
(b)(i) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of ((thirty)) thirty-five thousand dollars
or less but greater than ((twenty-five)) thirty thousand dollars is
exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater of fifty thousand
dollars or thirty-five percent of the valuation of his or her
residence, but not to exceed seventy thousand dollars of the valuation
of his or her residence; or
(ii) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a
combined disposable income of ((twenty-five)) thirty thousand dollars
or less is exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater of
sixty thousand dollars or sixty percent of the valuation of his or her
residence;
(6)(a) For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and
has a combined disposable income of ((thirty-five)) forty thousand
dollars or less, the valuation of the residence is the assessed value
of the residence on the later of January 1, 1995, or January 1st of the
assessment year the person first qualifies under this section. If the
person subsequently fails to qualify under this section only for one
year because of high income, this same valuation must be used upon
requalification. If the person fails to qualify for more than one year
in succession because of high income or fails to qualify for any other
reason, the valuation upon requalification is the assessed value on
January 1st of the assessment year in which the person requalifies. If
the person transfers the exemption under this section to a different
residence, the valuation of the different residence is the assessed
value of the different residence on January 1st of the assessment year
in which the person transfers the exemption.
(b) In no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater
than the true and fair value of the residence on January 1st of the
assessment year.
(c) This subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to
the property in the year in which the improvements are made.
Subsequent improvements to the property must be added to the value
otherwise determined under this subsection at their true and fair value
in the year in which they are made.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.38.030 and 2008 c 6 s 702 are each amended to read
as follows:
A claimant may defer payment of special assessments and/or real
property taxes on up to eighty percent of the amount of the claimant's
equity value in the claimant's residence if the following conditions
are met:
(1) The claimant must meet all requirements for an exemption for
the residence under RCW 84.36.381, other than the age and income limits
under RCW 84.36.381.
(2) The claimant must be sixty years of age or older on December
31st of the year in which the deferral claim is filed, or must have
been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by
reason of physical disability((: PROVIDED, That)). However, any
surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of a person who was
receiving a deferral at the time of the person's death shall qualify if
the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is fifty-seven years
of age or older and otherwise meets the requirements of this section.
(3) The claimant must have a combined disposable income, as defined
in RCW 84.36.383, of ((forty)) forty-five thousand dollars or less.
(4) The claimant must have owned, at the time of filing, the
residence on which the special assessment and/or real property taxes
have been imposed. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned
by a marital community, owned by domestic partners, or owned by
cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by each spouse, each domestic
partner, or each cotenant. A claimant who has only a share ownership
in cooperative housing, a life estate, a lease for life, or a revocable
trust does not satisfy the ownership requirement.
(5) The claimant must have and keep in force fire and casualty
insurance in sufficient amount to protect the interest of the state in
the claimant's equity value((: PROVIDED, That)). However, if the
claimant fails to keep fire and casualty insurance in force to the
extent of the state's interest in the claimant's equity value, the
amount deferred ((shall)) may not exceed one hundred percent of the
claimant's equity value in the land or lot only.
(6) In the case of special assessment deferral, the claimant must
have opted for payment of such special assessments on the installment
method if such method was available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2014 and thereafter.

--- END ---