BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, an eligible
new business is allowed a credit under either (a) or (b) of this
subsection. The credit must be taken after all other credits and
deductions have been applied.
(a) During the first twelve months after being approved by the
department a credit is allowed in an amount equal to one hundred
percent of the tax otherwise due under this chapter; or
(b) If a new business has less than twenty-five employment
positions at the time it applies for the credit during the first
twenty-four months after being approved by the department, a credit is
allowed in an amount equal to one hundred percent of the tax otherwise
due under this chapter. During the next twelve months of operation of
the business, the business is allowed a credit equal to fifty percent
of the tax otherwise due under this chapter.
(2) The following definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Employment position" means a full-time, permanent employee of
the new business.
(b)(i) "New business" means a business that has not been operating
in Washington longer than twelve months from the time the business
applies for the credit under this section. The date that a new
business began operating in Washington, for purposes of this section,
is calculated from the date that a new business first engages in
business in Washington or engages in any activity that generates gross
income of the business from sources within this state regardless of
physical presence.
(ii) "New business" does not include:
(A) A business that has been reincorporated, restructured,
reorganized, or transferred, unless the majority of the activities to
be conducted after the reincorporation, restructuring, reorganization,
or transfer, calculated by relative gross income, are significantly
different from the activities previously conducted;
(B) A new branch location or other facility, unless such new branch
location or other facility is by an existing out-of-state entity first
doing business in this state; and
(C) A business that is substantially similar to a business
currently operated, or operated within the past five years, when the
majority of the beneficial ownership is the same.
(iii) For the purposes of this section, a business or business
activities are presumed to be "substantially similar" and not
"significantly different" if properly within the same industry group of
the North American industry classification system.
(3) A new business must file an application, in the form and manner
required by the department, to qualify for the credit under this
section.
(4) The credit under this section is not available during any
period in which a business is operating in Washington but has not
registered with the department as required under RCW 82.32.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---