BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.30.040 and 1989 c 431 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a unit of local government is required to make
purchases from the lowest bidder or from the supplier offering the
lowest price for the items desired to be purchased, the unit of local
government may, at its option when awarding a purchase contract, take
into consideration tax revenue it would receive from purchasing the
supplies, materials, or equipment from a supplier located within its
boundaries. The unit of local government must award the purchase
contract to the lowest bidder after such tax revenue has been
considered. However, any local government may allow for preferential
purchase of products made from recycled materials or products that may
be recycled or reused. ((The tax revenues which units of local
government may consider include sales taxes that the unit of local
government imposes upon the sale of such supplies, materials, or
equipment from the supplier to the unit of local government, and
business and occupation taxes that the unit of local government imposes
upon the supplier that are measured by the gross receipts of the
supplier from such sale.)) Any unit of local government which
considers tax revenue((s)) it would receive from the imposition of
taxes upon a supplier located within its boundaries((, shall)) must
also consider tax revenue((s)) it would receive from taxes it imposes
upon a supplier located outside its boundaries.
(2) ((As used in this section, the term)) A unit of local
government may award a contract to a bidder submitting the lowest bid
before taxes are applied. The unit of local government must provide
notice of its intent to award a contract based on this method prior to
bids being submitted. For the purposes of this subsection (2), "taxes"
means only those taxes that are included in "tax revenue" as defined in
this section.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Tax revenue" means sales taxes that units of local government
impose upon the sale of supplies, materials, or equipment from the
supplier to units of local government, and business and occupation
taxes that units of local government impose upon the supplier that are
measured by the gross receipts of the supplier from the sale.
(b) "Unit of local government" means any county, city, town,
metropolitan municipal corporation, public transit benefit area, county
transportation authority, or other municipal or quasi-municipal
corporation authorized to impose sales and use taxes or business and
occupation taxes.

--- END ---