BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There is a theater license to sell beer, including strong beer,
or wine, or both, at retail, for consumption on theater premises. The
annual fee is four hundred dollars for a beer and wine theater license.
(2) If the theater premises is ever to be frequented by minors, an
alcohol control plan must be submitted to the board at the time of
application. The alcohol control plan must be approved by the board,
and be prominently posted on the premises, prior to minors being
allowed.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Alcohol control plan" means a written, dated, and signed plan
submitted to the board by an applicant or licensee for the entire
theater premises, or rooms or areas therein, that shows where and when
alcohol is permitted, where and when minors are permitted, and the
control measures used to ensure that minors are not able to obtain
alcohol or exposed to environments where drinking alcohol predominates.
(b) "Theater" means a place where motion pictures or live musical,
dance, artistic, dramatic, literary, or educational performances are
shown.
(4) The board must adopt rules regarding alcohol control plans and
necessary control measures to ensure that minors are not able to obtain
alcohol or exposed to areas where drinking alcohol predominates.

--- END ---