BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.419 and 2003 c 193 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
State, local, or county law enforcement personnel may enforce
speeding violations under RCW 46.61.400 on private roads within a
community organized under chapter 64.34 or 64.38 RCW if:
(1) A majority of the homeowner's association's or condominium
association's board of directors votes to authorize the issuance of
speeding infractions on its private roads, and declares a speed limit
not lower than twenty miles per hour;
(2) A written agreement regarding the speeding enforcement is
signed by the homeowner's association or condominium association
president and the chief law enforcement official of the city or county
within whose jurisdiction the private road is located;
(3) The homeowner's association or condominium association has
provided written notice to all of the homeowners or unit owners
describing the new authority to issue speeding infractions; and
(4) Signs have been posted declaring the speed limit at all vehicle
entrances to the community.

--- END ---