BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.45.090 and 2009 c 350 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except for a sale of a beneficial interest in real property or
the transfer by court order or by operation of law where no instrument
evidencing the sale or transfer is recorded in the official real
property records of the county in which the property is located, the
tax imposed by this chapter ((shall)) must be paid to and collected by
the treasurer of the county within which is located the real property
((which)) that was sold or transferred. In collecting the tax the
treasurer ((shall)) must act as agent for the state. The county
treasurer ((shall)) must cause a verification of payment evidencing
satisfaction of the lien to be affixed to the instrument of sale or
conveyance prior to its recording or to the real estate excise tax
affidavit in the case of used mobile home sales and used floating home
sales. A receipt issued by the county treasurer for the payment of the
tax imposed under this chapter ((shall be)) is evidence of the
satisfaction of the lien imposed hereunder and may be recorded in the
manner prescribed for recording satisfactions of mortgages. No
instrument of sale or conveyance evidencing a sale subject to the tax
((shall)) may be accepted by the county auditor for filing or recording
until the tax ((shall have been)) is paid and the verification of
payment affixed thereto; in case the tax is not due on the transfer,
the instrument ((shall)) may not be ((so)) accepted until suitable
notation of such fact has been made on the instrument by the treasurer.
Any time there is a sale of a used mobile home, used manufactured home,
used park model, or used floating home that has not been title
eliminated, property taxes must be current in order to complete the
processing of the real estate excise tax affidavit or other documents
transferring title. Verification that the property taxes are current
must be noted on the mobile home real estate excise tax affidavit or on
a form approved by the county treasurer. For the purposes of this
subsection, "mobile home," "manufactured home," and "park model" have
the same meaning as provided in RCW 59.20.030.
(2) For a sale of a beneficial interest in real property where a
tax is due under this chapter and where no instrument is recorded in
the official real property records of the county in which the property
is located, the sale ((shall)) must be reported to the department of
revenue within five days from the date of the sale on such returns or
forms and according to such procedures as the department may prescribe.
Such forms or returns ((shall)) must be signed by both the transferor
and the transferee and ((shall)) must be accompanied by payment of the
tax due.
(3) No real estate excise tax affidavit is required to evidence any
transfer of real property by operation of law or by order of the court
where no instrument of conveyance is recorded in the official records
of the county in which the real property is located.
(4) Any person who intentionally makes a false statement on any
return or form required to be filed with the department under this
chapter is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.45.197 and 2008 c 269 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to receive an exemption from the tax in this chapter on
real property ((transferred)) for an instrument of conveyance recorded
in the official records of the county in which the real property is
located that evidences a transfer by operation of law or order of the
court, as a result of inheritance as set forth under RCW
82.45.010(3)(a), the following documentation must be provided:
(1) If the property is being transferred under the terms of a
community property agreement, a copy of the recorded agreement and a
certified copy of the death certificate;
(2) If the property is being transferred under the terms of a trust
instrument, a certified copy of the death certificate and a copy of the
trust instrument showing the authority of the grantor;
(3) If the property is being transferred under the terms of a
probated will, a certified copy of the letters testamentary or in the
case of intestate administration, a certified copy of the letters of
administration showing that the grantor is the court-appointed
executor, executrix, or administrator, and a certified copy of the
death certificate;
(4) In the case of joint tenants with right of survivorship and
remainder interests, a certified copy of the death certificate is
recorded to perfect title;
(5) If the property is being transferred pursuant to a court order,
a certified copy of the court order requiring the transfer, and
confirming that the grantor is required to do so under the terms of the
order; or
(6) If the community property interest of the decedent is being
transferred to a surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner absent
the documentation set forth in subsections (1) through (5) of this
section, a certified copy of the death certificate and a signed
affidavit from the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner
affirming that he or she is the sole and rightful heir to the property.

--- END ---