BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that one if its
foremost duties is the prioritization and wise use of taxpayer funds.
During times of economic downturn, it is incumbent upon the legislature
to ensure limited state resources are spent prudently. Therefore, the
legislature intends to suspend spending on art related to capital
projects for the remainder of the 2011-2013 biennium and the 2013-2015
biennium.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.335.210 and 2006 c 263 s 327 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall allocate, as a
nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for state assistance
to school districts for the original construction of any school plant
facility the amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to
be expended by the Washington state arts commission for the acquisition
of works of art. However, no moneys may be expended, as of the
effective date of this section, on the acquisition of works of art
through the end of the 2013-2015 biennium, unless a contract for the
acquisition of art existed prior to the effective date of this section.
The works of art may be placed in accordance with Article IX, sections
2 and 3 of the state Constitution on public lands, integral to or
attached to a public building or structure, detached within or outside
a public building or structure, part of a portable exhibition or
collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in
other public facilities. The Washington state arts commission shall,
in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction,
determine the amount to be made available for the purchase of works of
art under this section, and payments therefor shall be made in
accordance with law. The designation of projects and sites, selection,
contracting, purchase, commissioning, reviewing of design, execution
and placement, acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or
disposition of works of art shall be the responsibility of the
Washington state arts commission in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and representatives of school
district boards of directors. The superintendent of public instruction
and the school district board of directors of the districts where the
sites are selected shall have the right to:
(1) Waive its use of the one-half of one percent of the
appropriation for the acquisition of works of art before the selection
process by the Washington state arts commission;
(2) Appoint a representative to the body established by the
Washington state arts commission to be part of the selection process
with full voting rights;
(3) Reject the results of the selection process;
(4) Reject the placement of a completed work or works of art on
school district premises if such works are portable.
Rejection at any point before or after the selection process shall
not cause the loss of or otherwise endanger state construction funds
available to the local school district. Any works of art rejected
under this section shall be applied to the provision of works of art
under this chapter, at the discretion of the Washington state arts
commission, notwithstanding any contract or agreement between the
affected school district and the artist involved. In addition to the
cost of the works of art the one-half of one percent of the
appropriation as provided in this section shall be used to provide for
the administration, including conservation of the state art collection,
by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation
of the work of art. For the purpose of this section building shall not
include sheds, warehouses, or other buildings of a temporary nature.
The executive director of the arts commission, the superintendent
of public instruction, and the Washington state school directors'
association shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the
one-half of one percent for works of art under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.10.027 and 2005 c 36 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
All universities and colleges shall allocate as a nondeductible
item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original construction or
any major renovation or remodel work exceeding two hundred thousand
dollars of any building, an amount of one-half of one percent of the
appropriation to be expended by the Washington state arts commission
with the approval of the board of regents or trustees for the
acquisition of works of art. However, no moneys may be expended, as of
the effective date of this section, on the acquisition of works of art
through the end of the 2013-2015 biennium, unless a contract for the
acquisition of art existed prior to the effective date of this section.
The works of art may be placed on public lands of institutions of
higher education, integral to or attached to a public building or
structure of institutions of higher education, detached within or
outside a public building or structure of institutions of higher
education, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a
temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public
facilities.
In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half of one
percent of the appropriation shall be used to provide for the
administration of the visual arts program, including conservation of
the state art collection, by the Washington state arts commission and
all costs for installation of the work of art. For the purpose of this
section building shall not include sheds, warehouses, and other
buildings of a temporary nature.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.17.200 and 2005 c 36 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
All state agencies including all state departments, boards,
councils, commissions, and quasi public corporations ((shall)) must
allocate, as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for
the original construction of any public building, an amount of one-half
of one percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington
state arts commission for the acquisition of works of art. However, no
moneys may be expended, as of the effective date of this section, on
the acquisition of works of art through the end of the 2013-2015
biennium, unless a contract for the acquisition of art existed prior to
the effective date of this section. The works of art may be placed on
public lands, integral to or attached to a public building or
structure, detached within or outside a public building or structure,
part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a temporary
exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public facilities. In
addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half of one percent
of the appropriation as provided herein ((shall)) must be used to
provide for the administration of the visual arts program, including
conservation of the state art collection, by the Washington state arts
commission and all costs for installation of the works of art. For the
purpose of this section building ((shall)) does not include highway
construction sheds, warehouses or other buildings of a temporary
nature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires July 1, 2015.

--- END ---