BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a fiscally sound
industrial insurance system that assures necessary and proper medical
care for persons injured at work is integral to the health and economic
well-being of workers and the economic welfare of the state. The
legislature further finds that reforms are needed to assure the best
worker outcomes, including return to work. Improvements are also
needed to assure the most efficient and fair system. The legislature
intends to make the workers' compensation system more cost-effective by
assuring that the workers' compensation system will only be responsible
for costs due to workplace injuries.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.08.140 and 1961 c 23 s 51.08.140 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) "Occupational disease" means such disease or infection as
arises ((naturally and proximately)) out of and in the course of the
particular employment under ((the mandatory or elective adoption
provisions of)) this title in which the worker is exposed to such
disease or infection and which meets all of the following criteria:
(a) The disease or infection is proximately caused by the
distinctive conditions under which the work is performed and risk of
exposure inherent therein;
(b) The disease or infection arose as a natural incident of the
employment-related exposure;
(c) The worker would not have ordinarily been exposed to the
disease or infection outside of his or her employment; and
(d) The disease or infection is not an ordinary condition of life
to which the general public is exposed without regard to employment.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "proximate cause" means that
cause which, in a direct sequence, unbroken by any new, independent
cause, produces the disease or infection, and without which the disease
or infection would not have occurred.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.32.180 and 1988 c 161 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every worker who suffers disability from an occupational disease
arising out of and in the course of employment under the mandatory or
elective adoption provisions of this title, or his or her family and
dependents in case of death of the worker from such disease or
infection, shall receive the same compensation benefits and medical,
surgical and hospital care and treatment as would be paid and provided
for a worker injured or killed in employment under this title, except
as follows: (((a) [(1)])) (1) This section and RCW 51.16.040 shall not
apply where the last exposure to the hazards of the disease or
infection occurred prior to January 1, 1937; and (((b) [(2)])) (2) for
claims filed on or after July 1, 1988, the rate of compensation for
occupational diseases shall be established as of the date the disease
requires medical treatment or becomes totally or partially disabling,
whichever occurs first, and without regard to the date of the
contraction of the disease or the date of filing the claim.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.28.055 and 2004 c 65 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section for
claims filed for occupational hearing loss, claims for occupational
disease or infection to be valid and compensable must be filed within
two years following the date the worker had written notice from a
physician or a licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner: (a) Of
the existence of his or her occupational disease, and (b) that a claim
for disability benefits may be filed. The notice shall also contain a
statement that the worker has two years from the date of the notice to
file a claim. The physician or licensed advanced registered nurse
practitioner shall file the notice with the department. The department
shall send a copy to the worker and to the self-insurer if the worker's
employer is self-insured. However, a claim is valid if it is filed
within two years from the date of death of the worker suffering from an
occupational disease.)) To be valid and compensable, claims for
occupational disease or infection must be filed within one year
following the earliest of the following dates:
(a) The date the disease or infection was first diagnosed;
(b) The date the worker first received treatment for symptoms of
the disease or infection from any health services provider; or
(c) The date the worker was first partially or fully restricted
from work due to the disease or infection.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, to be valid
and compensable, claims for hearing loss due to occupational noise
exposure must be filed within two years of the date of the worker's
last injurious exposure to occupational noise in employment covered
under this title ((or within one year of September 10, 2003, whichever
is later)).
(b) A claim for hearing loss due to occupational noise exposure
that is not timely filed under (a) of this subsection can only be
allowed for medical aid benefits under chapter 51.36 RCW. A claim for
hearing loss due to occupational noise exposure that is not timely
filed under subsection (1) of this section is not valid, and is not
allowed for any benefits under this title.
(3) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---