BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Notwithstanding RCW 51.04.060 or any other provision of this
title, beginning September 1, 2013, the parties to an allowed claim for
benefits may enter into a voluntary settlement agreement as provided in
this section with respect to one or more allowed claims for benefits
under this title. All voluntary settlement agreements must be approved
by the board of industrial insurance appeals. The voluntary settlement
agreement may:
(i) Resolve a claim for all benefits other than medical;
(ii) Not subject any employer who is not a signatory to the
agreement to any responsibility or burden under any claim; and
(iii) Not be initiated until at least one hundred eighty days have
passed since the claim was received by the department or self-insurer
and the order allowing the claim is final and binding.
(b) For purposes of this section, "parties" means:
(i) For a self-insured claim, the worker and the employer; and
(ii) For a state fund claim, the worker, the employer, and the
department.
(c) For state fund claims, the department shall negotiate the
settlement with the worker. Any voluntary settlement agreement entered
into under this section must be signed by the parties or their
representatives and must clearly state that the parties understand and
agree to the terms of the voluntary settlement agreement. Unless one
of the parties revokes consent to the agreement, as provided in
subsection (3) of this section, the voluntary settlement agreement
becomes final and binding thirty days after approval of the agreement
by the board of industrial insurance appeals.
(d) A voluntary settlement agreement that has become final and
binding as provided in this section is binding on the department and on
all parties to the agreement as to its terms and the injuries and
occupational diseases to which the voluntary settlement applies. A
voluntary settlement agreement that has become final and binding is not
subject to appeal.
(2)(a) If a worker is not represented by an attorney at the time of
signing a voluntary settlement agreement, the parties must forward a
copy of the signed settlement agreement to the board with a request for
a conference with a settlement officer. Unless one of the parties
requests a later date, the settlement officer must convene a conference
within fourteen days after receipt of the request for the limited
purpose of receiving the voluntary settlement agreement of the parties,
explaining to the worker the benefits generally available under this
title, and explaining that a voluntary settlement agreement may alter
the benefits payable on a claim. In no event may a settlement officer
render legal advice to any party.
(b) Before approving the settlement agreement, the settlement
officer shall ensure that the worker has an adequate understanding of
the settlement proposal and its consequences to the worker.
(c)(i) The settlement officer may approve a settlement agreement
only if the officer finds that the settlement is in the best interest
of the worker. When determining whether the settlement is in the best
interest of the worker, the settlement officer shall consider the
following factors, taken as a whole, with no individual factor being
determinative:
(A) The nature and extent of the injuries and disabilities of the
worker;
(B) The age and life expectancy of the injured worker;
(C) Whether the injured worker has any health, disability, or
related insurance;
(D) Any other benefits the injured worker is receiving or is
entitled to receive and the effect a settlement agreement might have on
those benefits;
(E) The marital status of the injured worker; and
(F) The number of dependents of the injured worker.
(ii) Within seven days after the conference, the settlement officer
shall issue an order allowing or rejecting the voluntary settlement
agreement. There is no appeal from the settlement officer's decision.
(d) If the settlement officer issues an order allowing the
voluntary settlement agreement, the order must be submitted to the
board.
(3) If a worker is represented by an attorney at the time of
signing a voluntary settlement agreement, the parties may submit the
agreement directly to the board without the conference described in
this section.
(4) Upon receiving the voluntary settlement agreement, the board
shall approve the agreement within thirty working days of receipt
unless it finds that the parties have not entered into the agreement
knowingly and willingly. If the board approves the agreement, it shall
provide notice to the department of the binding terms of the agreement
and provide for placement of the agreement in the applicable claim
files.
(5) A party may revoke consent to the voluntary settlement
agreement by providing written notice to the other parties and the
board within thirty days after the date the agreement is approved by
the board.
(6) To the extent the worker is found to be entitled to temporary
total disability or permanent total disability benefits while a
voluntary settlement agreement is being negotiated, or during the
revocation period of an agreement, the benefits must be paid until the
agreement becomes final.
(7) A claim closed pursuant to a voluntary settlement agreement can
be reopened only upon a showing of worsening of the related medical
conditions under RCW 51.32.160 for medical treatment only. Further
temporary total, temporary partial, permanent partial, or permanent
total benefits are not payable under the same claim for which a
voluntary settlement has been approved by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In calendar years 2016, 2021, and 2026, the department shall
contract for an independent study of voluntary settlement agreements
approved by the board under this section. The study must be performed
by a researcher that has experience in workers' compensation systems.
When selecting the independent researcher, the department shall consult
with the workers' compensation advisory committee. The study must
evaluate the quality and effectiveness of settlement agreements of
state fund and self-insured claims, provide information on the impact
of settlement agreements to the state fund and to self-insured
employers, and evaluate the outcomes of workers who have settled their
claims. The study must be submitted to the appropriate committees of
the legislature.
(2) The department shall contract for an independent study of the
return to work provisions under RCW 51.32.090. The study must be
performed by a researcher that has experience in workers' compensation
systems. When selecting the independent researcher, the department
shall consult with the workers' compensation advisory committee. The
study must evaluate the quality and effectiveness of the return to work
program and whether the program is being utilized by employers, and
evaluate the outcomes of workers participating in the program. The
study must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must maintain copies of all voluntary settlement
agreements entered into between the parties and develop processes under
RCW 51.28.070 to furnish copies of such agreements to any party
contemplating any subsequent voluntary settlement agreement with the
worker on any claim. The department shall also furnish claims
histories that include all prior permanent disability awards received
by the worker on any claims by body part and category or percentage
rating, as applicable. Copies of such agreements and claims histories
shall be furnished within ten working days of a written request. An
employer may not consider a prior settlement agreement or claims
history when making a decision about hiring or the terms or conditions
of employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
If a worker has received a prior award of, or entered into a
voluntary settlement for, total or partial permanent disability
benefits, it shall be conclusively presumed that the medical condition
causing the prior permanent disability exists and is disabling at the
time of any subsequent industrial injury or occupational disease.
Except in the case of total permanent disability, the accumulation of
all permanent disability awards issued with respect to any one part of
the body in favor of the worker may not exceed one hundred percent over
the worker's lifetime. When entering into a voluntary settlement
agreement under this chapter, the department or self-insured employer
may exclude amounts paid to settle claims for prior portions of a
worker's permanent total or partial disability.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.32.090 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 37 s 101 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) When the total disability is only temporary, the schedule of
payments contained in RCW 51.32.060 (1) and (2) shall apply, so long as
the total disability continues.
(2) Any compensation payable under this section for children not in
the custody of the injured worker as of the date of injury shall be
payable only to such person as actually is providing the support for
such child or children pursuant to the order of a court of record
providing for support of such child or children.
(3)(a) As soon as recovery is so complete that the present earning
power of the worker, at any kind of work, is restored to that existing
at the time of the occurrence of the injury, the payments shall cease.
If and so long as the present earning power is only partially restored,
the payments shall:
(i) For claims for injuries that occurred before May 7, 1993,
continue in the proportion which the new earning power shall bear to
the old; or
(ii) For claims for injuries occurring on or after May 7, 1993,
equal eighty percent of the actual difference between the worker's
present wages and earning power at the time of injury, but: (A) The
total of these payments and the worker's present wages may not exceed
one hundred fifty percent of the average monthly wage in the state as
computed under RCW 51.08.018; (B) the payments may not exceed one
hundred percent of the entitlement as computed under subsection (1) of
this section; and (C) the payments may not be less than the worker
would have received if (a)(i) of this subsection had been applicable to
the worker's claim.
(b) No compensation shall be payable under this subsection (3)
unless the loss of earning power shall exceed five percent.
(c) The prior closure of the claim or the receipt of permanent
partial disability benefits shall not affect the rate at which loss of
earning power benefits are calculated upon reopening the claim.
(4)(a) The legislature finds that long-term disability and the cost
of injuries is significantly reduced when injured workers remain at
work following their injury. To encourage employers at the time of
injury to provide light duty or transitional work for their workers,
wage subsidies and other incentives are made available to employers
insured with the department.
(b) ((Whenever)) The employer of injury ((requests that)) may
provide light duty or transitional work to a worker who is entitled to
temporary total disability under this chapter ((be certified by a
physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner as able to
perform available work other than his or her usual work,)). The
employer or the department shall obtain from the physician or licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioner a statement confirming the light
duty or transitional work is consistent with the worker's medical
restrictions related to the injury. This statement should be obtained
before the start of the light duty or transitional work unless the
worker has already returned to work with the employer of injury in
which case the statement may be obtained following the start date of
the job. The employer shall furnish to the physician or licensed
advanced registered nurse practitioner, with a copy to the worker, a
statement describing the work ((available)) with the employer of injury
in terms that will enable the physician or licensed advanced registered
nurse practitioner to relate the physical activities of the job to the
worker's disability. The physician or licensed advanced registered
nurse practitioner shall ((then determine)) confirm whether the worker
is physically able to perform the work described. The worker's
temporary total disability payments shall ((continue until the worker
is released by his or her physician or licensed advanced registered
nurse practitioner for the work, and begins the work with the employer
of injury. If)) stop effective the date the light duty or transitional
job starts. Temporary total disability payments shall resume if the
work thereafter comes to an end before the worker's recovery is
sufficient in the judgment of his or her physician or licensed advanced
registered nurse practitioner to permit him or her to return to his or
her usual job, or to perform other available work offered by the
employer of injury((, the worker's temporary total disability payments
shall be resumed)). Should the available work described, once
undertaken by the worker, impede his or her recovery to the extent that
in the judgment of his or her physician or licensed advanced registered
nurse practitioner he or she should not continue to work, the worker's
temporary total disability payments shall be resumed when the worker
ceases such work at the direction of the physician or licensed advanced
registered nurse practitioner.
(c) To further encourage employers to maintain the employment of
their injured workers, an employer insured with the department and that
offers work to a worker pursuant to this subsection (4) shall be
eligible for reimbursement of the injured worker's wages for light duty
or transitional work equal to fifty percent of the basic, gross wages
paid for that work, for a maximum of sixty-six work days within a
consecutive twenty-four month period. In no event may the wage
subsidies paid to an employer on a claim exceed ten thousand dollars.
Wage subsidies shall be calculated using the worker's basic hourly
wages or basic salary, and no subsidy shall be paid for any other form
of compensation or payment to the worker such as tips, commissions,
bonuses, board, housing, fuel, health care, dental care, vision care,
per diem, reimbursements for work-related expenses, or any other
payments. An employer may not, under any circumstances, receive a wage
subsidy for a day in which the worker did not actually perform any
work, regardless of whether or not the employer paid the worker wages
for that day.
(d) If an employer insured with the department offers a worker work
pursuant to this subsection (4) and the worker must be provided with
training or instruction to be qualified to perform the offered work,
the employer shall be eligible for a reimbursement from the department
for any tuition, books, fees, and materials required for that training
or instruction, up to a maximum of one thousand dollars. Reimbursing
an employer for the costs of such training or instruction does not
constitute a determination by the department that the worker is
eligible for vocational services authorized by RCW 51.32.095 and
51.32.099.
(e) If an employer insured with the department offers a worker work
pursuant to this subsection (4), and the employer provides the worker
with clothing that is necessary to allow the worker to perform the
offered work, the employer shall be eligible for reimbursement for such
clothing from the department, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars.
However, an employer shall not receive reimbursement for any clothing
it provided to the worker that it normally provides to its workers.
The clothing purchased for the worker shall become the worker's
property once the work comes to an end.
(f) If an employer insured with the department offers a worker work
pursuant to this subsection (4) and the worker must be provided with
tools or equipment to perform the offered work, the employer shall be
eligible for a reimbursement from the department for such tools and
equipment and related costs as determined by department rule, up to a
maximum of two thousand five hundred dollars. An employer shall not be
reimbursed for any tools or equipment purchased prior to offering the
work to the worker pursuant to this subsection (4). An employer shall
not be reimbursed for any tools or equipment that it normally provides
to its workers. The tools and equipment shall be the property of the
employer.
(g) An employer may offer work to a worker pursuant to this
subsection (4) more than once, but in no event may the employer receive
wage subsidies for more than sixty-six days of work in a consecutive
twenty-four month period under one claim. An employer may continue to
offer work pursuant to this subsection (4) after the worker has
performed sixty-six days of work, but the employer shall not be
eligible to receive wage subsidies for such work.
(h) An employer shall not receive any wage subsidies or
reimbursement of any expenses pursuant to this subsection (4) unless
the employer has completed and submitted the reimbursement request on
forms developed by the department, along with all related information
required by department rules. No wage subsidy or reimbursement shall
be paid to an employer who fails to submit a form for such payment
within one year of the date the work was performed. In no event shall
an employer receive wage subsidy payments or reimbursements of any
expenses pursuant to this subsection (4) unless the worker's physician
or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner has restricted him
or her from performing his or her usual work and the worker's physician
or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner has released him or
her to perform the work offered.
(i) Payments made under (b) through (g) of this subsection are
subject to penalties under RCW 51.32.240(5) in cases where the funds
were obtained through willful misrepresentation.
(j) Once the worker returns to work under the terms of this
subsection (4), he or she shall not be assigned by the employer to work
other than the available work described without the worker's written
consent, or without prior review and approval by the worker's physician
or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner. An employer who
directs a claimant to perform work other than that approved by the
attending physician and without the approval of the worker's physician
or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner shall not receive
any wage subsidy or other reimbursements for such work.
(k) If the worker returns to work under this subsection (4), any
employee health and welfare benefits that the worker was receiving at
the time of injury shall continue or be resumed at the level provided
at the time of injury. Such benefits shall not be continued or resumed
if to do so is inconsistent with the terms of the benefit program, or
with the terms of the collective bargaining agreement currently in
force.
(l) In the event of any dispute as to the validity of the work
offered or as to the worker's ability to perform the available work
offered by the employer, the department shall make the final
determination pursuant to an order that contains the notice required by
RCW 51.52.060 and that is subject to appeal subject to RCW 51.52.050.
(5) An employer's experience rating shall not be affected by the
employer's request for or receipt of wage subsidies.
(6) The department shall create a Washington stay-at-work account
which shall be funded by assessments of employers insured through the
state fund for the costs of the payments authorized by subsection (4)
of this section and for the cost of creating a reserve for anticipated
liabilities. Employers may collect up to one-half the fund assessment
from workers.
(7) No worker shall receive compensation for or during the day on
which injury was received or the three days following the same, unless
his or her disability shall continue for a period of fourteen
consecutive calendar days from date of injury: PROVIDED, That attempts
to return to work in the first fourteen days following the injury shall
not serve to break the continuity of the period of disability if the
disability continues fourteen days after the injury occurs.
(8) Should a worker suffer a temporary total disability and should
his or her employer at the time of the injury continue to pay him or
her the wages which he or she was earning at the time of such injury,
such injured worker shall not receive any payment provided in
subsection (1) of this section during the period his or her employer
shall so pay such wages: PROVIDED, That holiday pay, vacation pay,
sick leave, or other similar benefits shall not be deemed to be
payments by the employer for the purposes of this subsection.
(9) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in this
section:
(a) Exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in
the state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(b) For dates of injury or disease manifestation after July 1,
2008, be less than fifteen percent of the average monthly wage in the
state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 plus an additional ten dollars
per month if the worker is married and an additional ten dollars per
month for each child of the worker up to a maximum of five children.
However, if the monthly payment computed under this subsection (9)(b)
is greater than one hundred percent of the wages of the worker as
determined under RCW 51.08.178, the monthly payment due to the worker
shall be equal to the greater of the monthly wages of the worker or the
minimum benefit set forth in this section on June 30, 2008.
(10) If the supervisor of industrial insurance determines that the
worker is voluntarily retired and is no longer attached to the
workforce, benefits shall not be paid under this section.
(11) The department shall adopt rules as necessary to implement
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department of labor and industries may
adopt rules to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 51.04.063 (Injured worker options -- Claim resolution
structured settlement agreements) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 37 s 302;
(2) RCW 51.04.065 (Claim resolution structured settlement
agreements -- Availability of copies) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 37 s 303; and
(3) RCW 51.04.069 (Claim resolution structured settlement
agreements -- Reports and studies) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 37 s 306.

--- END ---