BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 2.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The chief justice of the supreme court may establish veterans'
treatment courts for veterans and members of the United States armed
forces. The supreme court may adopt administrative orders and court
rules of practice and procedure as necessary.
(2) Any jurisdiction that establishes a veterans' treatment court
under this section may seek federal funding as it becomes available for
the establishment, maintenance, and expansion of veterans' treatment
courts and for the provision by participating agencies of treatment to
participating veterans. The administrative office of the courts may
enter into contracts and cooperative agreements with the departments
and agencies to provide treatment and other social services to
participants. The departments and agencies shall collaborate and, to
the extent possible, provide financial and other assistance to the
judicial branch in order to establish and maintain veterans' treatment
courts.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "veterans' treatment court"
means a specialized sentencing docket in select criminal cases in which
the defendant is a veteran or member of the United States armed forces
to enable veterans agencies and social services agencies to provide
treatment for that defendant. The veterans' treatment court does not
provide treatment but contracts or collaborates with experienced and
expert treatment providers.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.28.190 and 2011 c 293 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any county that has established a DUI court, drug court, veterans'
treatment court, and a mental health court under this chapter may
combine the functions of these courts into a single therapeutic court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---