BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.20.520 and 1988 c 173 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Phenylketonuria is a rare inherited genetic disorder.
(b) Children with phenylketonuria are unable to metabolize an
essential amino acid, phenylalanine, which is found in the proteins of
most food.
(c) To remain healthy, children with phenylketonuria must maintain
a strict diet and ingest a mineral and vitamin-enriched formula.
(d) Children who do not maintain their diets with the formula
acquire severe mental and physical difficulties.
(e) Originally, the formulas were listed as prescription drugs but
were reclassified as medical foods to increase their availability.
(2))) Subject to requirements and exceptions which may be
established by rules adopted by the commissioner, any disability
insurance contract delivered or issued for delivery or renewed in this
state on or after September 1, 1988, that insures for hospital or
medical expenses shall provide coverage for the formulas necessary for
the treatment of phenylketonuria. Contracts issued or renewed on or
after January 1, 2016, or upon the earliest update of the benchmark
plan, as defined in RCW 48.43.715 shall include formulas necessary for
the treatment of eosinophilia gastrointestinal associated disorders,
regardless of the delivery method of the formula.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.21.300 and 1988 c 173 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Phenylketonuria is a rare inherited genetic disorder.
(b) Children with phenylketonuria are unable to metabolize an
essential amino acid, phenylalanine, which is found in the proteins of
most food.
(c) To remain healthy, children with phenylketonuria must maintain
a strict diet and ingest a mineral and vitamin-enriched formula.
(d) Children who do not maintain their diets with the formula
acquire severe mental and physical difficulties.
(e) Originally, the formulas were listed as prescription drugs but
were reclassified as medical foods to increase their availability.
(2))) Subject to requirements and exceptions which may be
established by rules adopted by the commissioner, any group disability
insurance contract delivered or issued for delivery or renewed in this
state on or after September 1, 1988, that insures for hospital or
medical expenses shall provide coverage for the formulas necessary for
the treatment of phenylketonuria. Contracts issued or renewed on or
after January 1, 2016, or upon the earliest update of the benchmark
plan, as defined in RCW 48.43.715 shall include formulas necessary for
the treatment of eosinophilia gastrointestinal associated disorders,
regardless of the delivery method of the formula.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.44.440 and 1988 c 173 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Phenylketonuria is a rare inherited genetic disorder.
(b) Children with phenylketonuria are unable to metabolize an
essential amino acid, phenylalanine, which is found in the proteins of
most food.
(c) To remain healthy, children with phenylketonuria must maintain
a strict diet and ingest a mineral and vitamin-enriched formula.
(d) Children who do not maintain their diets with the formula
acquire severe mental and physical difficulties.
(e) Originally, the formulas were listed as prescription drugs but
were reclassified as medical foods to increase their availability.
(2))) Subject to requirements and exceptions which may be
established by rules adopted by the commissioner, any contract for
health care services delivered or issued for delivery or renewed in
this state on or after September 1, 1988, shall provide coverage for
the formulas necessary for the treatment of phenylketonuria. Contracts
issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2016, or upon the earliest
update of the benchmark plan, as defined in RCW 48.43.715 shall include
formulas necessary for the treatment of eosinophilia gastrointestinal
associated disorders, regardless of the delivery method of the formula.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.46.510 and 1988 c 173 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The legislature finds that:
(a) Phenylketonuria is a rare inherited genetic disorder.
(b) Children with phenylketonuria are unable to metabolize an
essential amino acid, phenylalanine, which is found in the proteins of
most food.
(c) To remain healthy, children with phenylketonuria must maintain
a strict diet and ingest a mineral and vitamin-enriched formula.
(d) Children who do not maintain their diets with the formula
acquire severe mental and physical difficulties.
(e) Originally, the formulas were listed as prescription drugs but
were reclassified as medical foods to increase their availability.
(2))) Subject to requirements and exceptions which may be
established by rules adopted by the commissioner, any agreement for
health care services delivered or issued for delivery or renewed in
this state on or after September 1, 1988, shall provide coverage for
the formulas necessary for the treatment of phenylketonuria. Contracts
issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2016, or upon the earliest
update of the benchmark plan, as defined in RCW 48.43.715 shall include
formulas necessary for the treatment of eosinophilia gastrointestinal
associated disorders, regardless of the delivery method of the formula.
(2) Such formulas shall be covered when deemed medically necessary
by the medical director or his or her designee of the health
maintenance organization and if provided by the health maintenance
organization or upon the health maintenance organization's referral.
Formulas shall be covered at the usual and customary rates for such
formulas, subject to contract provisions with respect to deductible
amounts or co-payments.

--- END ---