BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.88.031 and 1991 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A capital appropriation bill ((shall)) must include the
estimated general fund debt service costs associated with new capital
appropriations contained in that bill for the biennia in which the
appropriations occur and for the succeeding two biennia. The estimated
general fund debt service costs must be itemized by functional areas of
government, including, but not limited to, general government agencies,
human services agencies, corrections, natural resources, public
schools, community and technical colleges, four-year higher education
institutions, housing, community development, and local projects. The
itemization must also be included in the bill's supporting documents
prepared by the legislative fiscal committees.
(2) Using the categories of expenditures identified in subsection
(1) of this section, an operating appropriation bill making
appropriations for state debt service must include an estimated
itemization of the debt services expenditures contained in that bill.
The estimated itemization must be calculated by the state treasurer and
must also be included in the bill's supporting documents prepared by
the legislative fiscal committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---