BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.36.095 and 1993 c 408 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Persons selected to serve on a petit jury, grand jury, or jury
of inquest shall be summoned by mail or personal service. The county
clerk shall issue summons and thereby notify persons selected for jury
duty. The clerk may issue summons for any jury term, in any
consecutive twelve-month period, at any time thirty days or more before
the beginning of the jury term for which the summons are issued.
However, when applicable, the provisions of RCW 2.36.130 apply.
(2) In courts of limited jurisdiction summons shall be issued by
the court. Upon the agreement of the courts, the county clerk may
summon jurors for any and all courts in the county or judicial
district.
(((3) The county clerk shall notify the county auditor of each
summons for jury duty that is returned by the postal service as
undeliverable.))

Sec. 2 RCW 11.96A.090 and 1999 c 42 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A judicial proceeding under this title is a special proceeding
under the civil rules of court. The provisions of this title governing
such actions control over any inconsistent provision of the civil
rules.
(2) A judicial proceeding under this title ((may)) must be
commenced as a new action ((or as an action incidental to an existing
judicial proceeding relating to the same trust or estate or nonprobate
asset)).
(3) Once commenced, the action may be consolidated with an existing
proceeding ((or converted to a separate action)) upon the motion of a
party for good cause shown, or by the court on its own motion.
(4) The procedural rules of court apply to judicial proceedings
under this title only to the extent that they are consistent with this
title, unless otherwise provided by statute or ordered by the court
under RCW 11.96A.020 or 11.96A.050, or other applicable rules of court.

--- END ---