BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.36.201 and 1999 c 291 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) During any consecutive six ((months)) month period, at least
four samples of: (a) Either raw milk((,)) or raw milk for
pasteurization, or both, from each ((dairy farm and)) milk producer; or
(b)(i) raw milk for pasteurization((,)) after receipt by the milk
processing plant and prior to pasteurization((,)); (ii) heat-treated
milk products((,)); and (iii) pasteurized milk and milk products from
each ((grade A)) milk processing plant((, for purposes of compliance
with the PMO,)) shall be collected ((in at least four separate months))
and examined in an official laboratory((: PROVIDED, That)) to
determine compliance with bacteriological or cooling temperature
standards for milk or milk products established in this chapter and
rules adopted under this chapter. However, in the case of raw milk for
pasteurization, the director may accept the results of an officially
designated laboratory.
(2) If ((two of the last four consecutive)) a bacterial count((s)),
somatic cell count((s)), coliform determination((s)), or cooling
temperature((s, taken on separate days,)) exceeds the standard ((for
milk or milk products established in this chapter and rules adopted
under this chapter)), the director shall send written notice
((thereof)) to the ((person concerned. This notice shall remain in
effect so long as two of the last four consecutive samples exceed the
limit of the same standard. An additional sample shall be taken after
sending of the notice, but not before the lapse of three days)) milk
producer or milk processor. The director may initiate proceedings to
degrade or suspend the milk producer's license or milk processing plant
license ((or)) and may assess a civil penalty whenever the standard is
again violated ((so that three of the last five consecutive samples
exceed the limit of the same standard)).

Sec. 2 RCW 15.36.451 and 1999 c 291 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any producer or milk processing plant whose milk has been degraded
by the director, or whose license has been suspended may at any time
make application for the regrading of his or her products or the
reinstatement of his or her license.
((Upon receipt of a satisfactory application,)) In case the lowered
grade or the license suspension was the result of violation of the
bacteriological or cooling temperature standards, the director
((shall)) may take further samples of the applicant's output, at a rate
of not more than two samples per week. The director shall regrade the
milk or milk products upward or reinstate the license on compliance
with grade requirements as determined in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 15.36.201.
In case the lowered grade of the applicant's product or the license
suspension was due to a violation of an item other than bacteriological
standard or cooling temperature, the said application must be
accompanied by a statement signed by the applicant to the effect that
the violated item of the specifications had been conformed with.
Within one week of the receipt of such an application and statement the
director shall make a reinspection of the applicant's establishment and
thereafter as many additional reinspections as he or she may deem
necessary to assure himself or herself that the applicant is again
complying with the higher grade requirements. The higher grade or
license shall be reinstated upon confirmation that all violated items
are corrected and any period for reduction in grade or license
suspensions as ordered by the director has been completed.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.36.454 and 1999 c 291 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Except as provided in RCW 15.36.471 or subsection (2) or (3)
of this section,)) Any person who fails to comply with this chapter or
the rules adopted under this chapter may be subject to a civil penalty
in an amount of not more than one thousand dollars per violation per
day.
(2) The director ((shall)) may adopt ((rules establishing civil
penalties assessed under RCW 15.36.111(1) and 15.36.201(2). The
penalties shall be equitably based on the volume of milk or milk
product handled by the producer or milk processor subject to the
penalty)) by rule a penalty matrix that establishes procedures for
civil penalties assessed under this chapter.
(3) Whenever the results of an antibiotic, pesticide, or other drug
residue test on a producer's milk are above the actionable level
established in the PMO, the producer is subject to a civil penalty ((in
an amount equal to one-half the value of the sum of the volumes of milk
produced on the day prior to and the day of the adulteration. The
value of the milk shall be computed using the weighted average price
for the federal market order under which the milk is delivered)) under
this section in addition to any other action taken under this chapter.
(4) The director may impose a civil penalty under this section for
violations of the standards for component parts of fluid dairy products
that are established in this chapter or rules adopted under this
chapter.
(5) Each violation is a separate and distinct offense. The
director shall impose the civil penalty in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW. Moneys collected under this section ((and RCW 15.36.471))
shall be remitted to the department and deposited into the revolving
fund of the Washington state dairy products commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 15.36.457 (Authority to assess civil penalty) and 1999 c
291 s 19; and
(2) RCW 15.36.471 (Component parts of fluid dairy products--Violations of standards -- Civil penalty -- Investigation) and 1999 c 291
s 20, 1994 c 143 s 511, 1993 c 212 s 3, 1989 c 175 s 49, & 1986 c 203
s 19.

--- END ---