BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the operator
of a street legal motorcycle approaching an intersection, including a
left turn intersection, that is controlled by a triggered traffic
control signal using a vehicle detection device that is inoperative due
to the size of the street legal motorcycle shall come to a full and
complete stop at the intersection. If the traffic control signal,
including the left turn signal, as appropriate, fails to operate after
one cycle of the traffic signal, the operator may, after exercising due
care, proceed directly through the intersection or proceed to turn
left, as appropriate. It is not a defense to a violation of RCW
46.61.050 that the driver of a motorcycle proceeded under the belief
that a traffic control signal used a vehicle detection device or was
inoperative due to the size of the motorcycle when the signal did not
use a vehicle detection device or that any such device was not in fact
inoperative due to the size of the motorcycle.

--- END ---