BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.360.050 and 2012 c 153 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A medical assistant-certified may perform the following duties
delegated by, and under the supervision of, a health care practitioner:
(a) Fundamental procedures:
(i) Wrapping items for autoclaving;
(ii) Procedures for sterilizing equipment and instruments;
(iii) Disposing of biohazardous materials; and
(iv) Practicing standard precautions.
(b) Clinical procedures:
(i) Performing aseptic procedures in a setting other than a
hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW;
(ii) Preparing of and assisting in sterile procedures in a setting
other than a hospital under chapter 70.41 RCW;
(iii) Taking vital signs;
(iv) Preparing patients for examination;
(v) Capillary blood withdrawal, venipuncture, arterial blood
withdrawal, and intradermal, subcutaneous, and intramuscular
injections; and
(vi) Observing and reporting patients' signs or symptoms.
(c) Specimen collection:
(i) Capillary puncture ((and)), venipuncture, and arterial invasive
procedures for blood withdrawal;
(ii) Obtaining specimens for microbiological testing; and
(iii) Instructing patients in proper technique to collect urine and
fecal specimens.
(d) Diagnostic testing:
(i) Electrocardiography;
(ii) Respiratory testing; ((and))
(iii) Tests waived under the federal clinical laboratory
improvement amendments program on July 1, 2013. The department shall
periodically update the tests authorized under this subsection (1)(d)
based on changes made by the federal clinical laboratory improvement
amendments program; and
(iv) Moderate complexity tests if the medical assistant-certified
meets standards for personnel qualifications and responsibilities in
compliance with federal regulation for nonwaived testing.
(e) Patient care:
(i) Telephone and in-person screening limited to intake and
gathering of information without requiring the exercise of judgment
based on clinical knowledge;
(ii) Obtaining vital signs;
(iii) Obtaining and recording patient history;
(iv) Preparing and maintaining examination and treatment areas;
(v) Preparing patients for, and assisting with, routine and
specialty examinations, procedures, treatments, and minor office
surgeries;
(vi) Maintaining medication and immunization records; and
(vii) Screening and following up on test results as directed by a
health care practitioner.
(f)(i) Administering medications. A medical assistant-certified
may only administer medications if the drugs are:
(A) Administered only by unit or single dosage, or by a dosage
calculated and verified by a health care practitioner. For purposes of
this section, a combination vaccine shall be considered a unit dose;
(B) Limited to legend drugs, vaccines, and Schedule III-V
controlled substances as authorized by a health care practitioner under
the scope of his or her license and consistent with rules adopted by
the secretary under (f)(ii) of this subsection; and
(C) Administered pursuant to a written order from a health care
practitioner.
(ii) The secretary may, by rule, limit the drugs that may be
administered under this subsection. The rules adopted under this
subsection must limit the drugs based on risk, class, or route.
(g) Intravenous injections. A medical assistant-certified may
administer intravenous injections for diagnostic or therapeutic agents
if he or she meets minimum standards established by the secretary in
rule. The minimum standards must be substantially similar to the
qualifications for category D and F health care assistants as they
exist on July 1, 2013.
(2) A medical assistant-hemodialysis technician may perform
hemodialysis when delegated and supervised by a health care
practitioner. A medical assistant-hemodialysis technician may also
administer drugs and oxygen to a patient when delegated and supervised
by a health care practitioner and pursuant to rules adopted by the
secretary.
(3) A medical assistant-phlebotomist may perform the following
duties delegated by, and under the supervision of, a health care
practitioner:
(a) Capillary, venous, or arterial invasive procedures for blood
withdrawal when delegated and supervised by a health care practitioner
and pursuant to rules adopted by the secretary;
(b) Tests waived under the federal clinical laboratory improvement
amendments program on July 1, 2013. The department shall periodically
update the tests authorized under subsection (1)(d) of this section
based on changes made by the federal clinical laboratory improvement
amendments program.
(c) Moderate complexity tests if the medical assistant-phlebotomist
meets standards for personnel qualifications and responsibilities in
compliance with federal regulation for nonwaived testing.
(4) A medical assistant-registered may perform the following duties
delegated by, and under the supervision of, a health care practitioner:
(a) Fundamental procedures:
(i) Wrapping items for autoclaving;
(ii) Procedures for sterilizing equipment and instruments;
(iii) Disposing of biohazardous materials; and
(iv) Practicing standard precautions.
(b) Clinical procedures:
(i) Preparing for sterile procedures;
(ii) Taking vital signs;
(iii) Preparing patients for examination; and
(iv) Observing and reporting patients' signs or symptoms.
(c) Specimen collection:
(i) Obtaining specimens for microbiological testing; and
(ii) Instructing patients in proper technique to collect urine and
fecal specimens.
(d) Patient care:
(i) Telephone and in-person screening limited to intake and
gathering of information without requiring the exercise of judgment
based on clinical knowledge;
(ii) Obtaining vital signs;
(iii) Obtaining and recording patient history;
(iv) Preparing and maintaining examination and treatment areas;
(v) Maintaining medication and immunization records; and
(vi) Screening and following up on test results as directed by a
health care practitioner.
(e) Tests waived under the federal clinical laboratory improvement
amendments program on July 1, 2013. The department shall periodically
update the tests authorized under subsection (1)(d) of this section
based on changes made by the federal clinical laboratory improvement
amendments program.
(f) Moderate complexity tests if the medical assistant-registered
meets standards for personnel qualifications and responsibilities in
compliance with federal regulation for nonwaived testing.
(g) Administering vaccines, including combination vaccines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.360 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant who has completed a registered apprenticeship program
administered by a department of the state of Washington satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the
secretary determines that the apprenticeship program training or
experience is not substantially equivalent to the standards of this
state.

--- END ---