BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any fire department may develop a community assistance referral
and education services program to provide community outreach and
assistance to residents of its district in order to advance injury and
illness prevention within its community. The program should identify
members of the community who use the 911 system for low acuity
assistance calls and connect them to their primary care providers,
other health care professionals, low-cost medication programs, and
other social services. The program may also provide a fire department-based, nonemergency contact in order to provide an alternative resource
to the 911 system. The program may hire health care professionals as
needed.
(2) A participating fire department may seek grant opportunities
and private gifts in order to support its community assistance referral
and education services program.
(3) In developing a community assistance referral and education
services program, a fire department may consult with the health care
personnel shortage task force to identify health care professionals
capable of working in a nontraditional setting and providing
assistance, referral, and education services.
(4) Community assistance referral and education services programs
implemented under this section must, at least annually, measure any
reduction of repeated use of the 911 emergency system and any reduction
in avoidable emergency room trips attributable to implementation of the
program. Results of findings under this subsection must be reportable
to the legislature or other local governments upon request. Findings
should include estimated amounts of medicaid dollars that would have
been spent on emergency room visits had the program not been in
existence.
(5) For purposes of this section, "fire department" includes city
and town fire departments, fire protection districts organized under
Title 52 RCW, and regional fire authorities organized under chapter
52.26 RCW.

--- END ---