BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that investing in institutions involved
in providing early opportunities for informal science, technology,
engineering, and mathematics education are key to engaging future
generations in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics
careers.
(2) A competitive grant program to assist nonprofit organizations
in acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating science or technology
center, zoo, and aquarium facilities is created. A facility for a
science or technology center must be for an organization that meets the
requirements to be a member of the association of science and
technology centers. A facility for a zoo or aquarium must be an
organization accredited by the association of zoos and aquariums.
Qualifying organizations must provide school programs that supplement,
complement, and support the essential academic learning requirements in
RCW 28A.655.070.
(3)(a) The department shall submit a list of recommended projects
eligible for funding to the governor and the legislature in the
department's biennial capital budget request beginning with the 2015-2017 biennium and thereafter.
(b) The list, in priority order, must include a description of each
project, the amount of recommended state funding, and documentation of
nonstate funds to be used for the project. The total amount of
recommended state funding for projects on a biennial project list may
not exceed ten million dollars.
(4) The department shall establish a competitive process to
prioritize applications for state assistance as follows:
(a) The department shall conduct a statewide solicitation of
project applications from nonprofit organizations and local governments
as determined by the department.
(b) The department shall evaluate and rank applications in
consultation with a citizen advisory committee using objective
criteria. The evaluation and ranking process must also consider local
community support for projects, a project timeline, and an examination
of existing assets that applicants may apply to projects.
(5) As needed for the purposes of subsection (4)(b) of this
section, the department shall establish an advisory committee that
includes:
(a) A university faculty member specializing in science education;
(b) A representative from a state science or technology industry;
(c) A representative of the Washington tourism alliance; and
(d) Representatives of pre-K and K-12 educators.
(6) The department may establish the amount of state grant
assistance for individual project applications but the amount may not
exceed twenty percent of the estimated total capital cost or actual
cost of a project or two million dollars, whichever is less. The
remaining portions of the project capital cost must be a match from
nonstate sources. The nonstate match may include cash, the value of
real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and
in-kind contributions. The department may set matching requirements
for individual projects.
(7) State assistance may be used to fund separate definable phases
of a project if the project demonstrates adequate progress and has
secured the necessary match funding.
(8) The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise
financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has
approved a specific list of projects. In contracts for grants
authorized under this section, the department must include provisions
requiring that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a
specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and
that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the
grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the
contract, the grantee must repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

--- END ---