BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.32A.030 and 2010 c 289 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Abuse or neglect" means the injury, sexual abuse, sexual
exploitation, negligent treatment, or maltreatment of a child by any
person under circumstances ((which)) that indicate ((that)) the child's
health, welfare, and safety is harmed, excluding conduct permitted
under RCW 9A.16.100. An abused child is a child who has been subjected
to child abuse or neglect as defined in this section.
(2) "Administrator" means the individual who has the daily
administrative responsibility of a crisis residential center, or his or
her designee.
(3) "At-risk youth" means a juvenile:
(a) Who is absent from home for at least seventy-two consecutive
hours without consent of his or her parent;
(b) Who is beyond the control of his or her parent such that the
child's behavior endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the child
or any other person; or
(c) Who has a substance abuse problem for which there are no
pending criminal charges related to the substance abuse.
(4) "Child," "juvenile," ((and)) "youth," and "minor" mean any
unemancipated individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen
years.
(5) "Child in need of services" means a juvenile:
(a) Who is beyond the control of his or her parent such that the
child's behavior endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the child
or any other person;
(b) Who has been reported to law enforcement as absent without
consent for at least twenty-four consecutive hours on two or more
separate occasions from the home of either parent, a crisis residential
center, an out-of-home placement, or a court-ordered placement; and
(i) Has exhibited a serious substance abuse problem; or
(ii) Has exhibited behaviors that create a serious risk of harm to
the health, safety, or welfare of the child or any other person;
(c)(i) Who is in need of: (A) Necessary services, including food,
shelter, health care, clothing, or education; or (B) services designed
to maintain or reunite the family;
(ii) Who lacks access to, or has declined to ((utilize)) use, these
services; and
(iii) Whose parents have evidenced continuing but unsuccessful
efforts to maintain the family structure or are unable or unwilling to
continue efforts to maintain the family structure; or
(d) Who is a "sexually exploited child."((.))
(6) "Child in need of services petition" means a petition filed in
juvenile court by a parent, child, or the department seeking
adjudication of placement of the child.
(7) "Crisis residential center" means a secure or semi-secure
facility established pursuant to chapter 74.13 RCW.
(8) "Custodian" means the person or entity ((who)) that has the
legal right to ((the)) custody of the child.
(9) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(10) "Extended family member" means an adult who is a grandparent,
brother, sister, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, aunt, or first cousin
with whom the child has a relationship and is comfortable, and who is
willing and available to care for the child.
(11) "Guardian" means ((that)) the person or agency that (a) has
been appointed as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding other
than a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, and (b) has the legal right
to ((legal)) custody of the child pursuant to such appointment. The
term "guardian" does not include a "dependency guardian" appointed
pursuant to a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.
(12) "Multidisciplinary team" means a group formed to provide
assistance and support to a child who is an at-risk youth or a child in
need of services and his or her parent. The team ((shall)) must
include the parent, a department caseworker, a local government
representative when authorized by the local government, and when
appropriate, members from the mental health and substance abuse
disciplines. The team may also include, but is not limited to, the
following persons: Educators, law enforcement personnel, probation
officers, employers, church persons, tribal members, therapists,
medical personnel, social service providers, placement providers, and
extended family members. The team members ((shall)) must be volunteers
who do not receive compensation while acting in a capacity as a team
member, unless the member's employer chooses to provide compensation or
the member is a state employee.
(13) "Out-of-home placement" means a placement in a foster family
home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or
placement in a home, other than that of the child's parent, guardian,
or legal custodian, not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter
74.15 RCW.
(14) "Parent" means the parent or parents who have the legal right
to custody of the child. "Parent" includes custodian or guardian.
(15) "Secure facility" means a crisis residential center, or
portion thereof, that has locking doors, locking windows, or a secured
perimeter, designed and operated to prevent a child from leaving
without permission of the facility staff.
(16) "Semi-secure facility" means any facility, including but not
limited to crisis residential centers or specialized foster family
homes, operated in a manner to reasonably assure that youth placed
there will not run away. Pursuant to rules established by the
department, the facility administrator shall establish reasonable hours
for residents to come and go from the facility such that no residents
are free to come and go at all hours of the day and night. To prevent
residents from taking unreasonable actions, the facility administrator,
where appropriate, may condition a resident's leaving the facility upon
the resident being accompanied by the administrator or the
administrator's designee and the resident may be required to notify the
administrator or the administrator's designee of any intent to leave,
his or her intended destination, and the probable time of his or her
return to the center.
(17) "Sexually exploited child" means any person under the age of
eighteen who is a victim of the crime of commercial sex abuse of a
minor under RCW 9.68A.100, promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor
under RCW 9.68A.101, or promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of
a minor under RCW 9.68A.102.
(18) "Staff secure facility" means a structured group care facility
licensed under rules adopted by the department with a ratio of at least
one adult staff member to every two children.
(19) "Temporary out-of-home placement" means an out-of-home
placement of not more than fourteen days ordered by the court at a
fact-finding hearing on a child in need of services petition.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.32A.082 and 2011 c 151 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any person
((who)), unlicensed youth shelter, or runaway and homeless youth
program that, without legal authorization, provides shelter to a minor
and ((who)) that knows at the time of providing the shelter that the
minor is away from ((the parent's home without the permission of the
parent, or other)) a lawfully prescribed residence or home without
parental permission, shall promptly report the location of the child to
the parent, the law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the
person lives, or the department.
((The report)) (b)(i) If a licensed overnight youth shelter, or
another licensed organization with a stated mission to provide services
to homeless or runaway youth and their families, shelters a child and
knows at the time of providing the shelter that the child is away from
a lawfully prescribed residence or home without parental permission, it
must contact the youth's parent within seventy-two hours, but
preferably within twenty-four hours, following the time that the youth
is admitted to the shelter or other licensed organization's program.
The notification must include the whereabouts of the youth, a
description of the youth's physical and emotional condition, and the
circumstances surrounding the youth's contact with the shelter or
organization. If there are compelling reasons not to notify the
parent, the shelter or organization must instead notify the department.
(ii) At least once every eight hours after learning that a youth
receiving services or shelter under this section is away from home
without permission, the shelter or organization staff must consult the
information that the Washington state patrol makes publicly available
under RCW 43.43.510(2). If the youth is publicly listed as missing,
the shelter or organization must immediately notify the department of
its contact with the youth listed as missing. The notification must
include a description of the minor's physical and emotional condition
and the circumstances surrounding the youth's contact with the shelter
or organization.
(c) Reports required under this section may be made by telephone or
any other reasonable means.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Shelter" means the person's home or any structure over which
the person has any control.
(b) "Promptly report" means to report within eight hours after the
person has knowledge that the minor is away from a lawfully prescribed
residence or home without parental permission.
(c) "Compelling reasons" include, but are not limited to,
circumstances that indicate that notifying the parent or legal guardian
will subject the minor to abuse or neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020.
(3) When the department receives a report under subsection (1) of
this section, it shall make a good faith attempt to notify the parent
that a report has been received and offer services designed to resolve
the conflict and accomplish a reunification of the family.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits any person, unlicensed youth
shelter, or runaway and homeless youth program from immediately
reporting the identity and location of any minor who is away from a
lawfully prescribed residence or home without parental permission more
promptly than required under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.32A.085 and 2010 c 229 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A private right of action or claim on the part of a parent is
created against an unlicensed youth shelter or unlicensed runaway and
homeless youth program ((who)) that fails to meet the ((notification))
reporting requirements in RCW 13.32A.082(1) (a), (b), and (c).

Sec. 4 RCW 43.43.510 and 2010 c 229 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As soon as is practical and feasible there shall be
established, by means of data processing, files listing stolen and
wanted vehicles, outstanding warrants, identifying children whose
parents, custodians, or legal guardians have reported as having run
away from home or the custodial residence, identifiable stolen
property, files maintaining the central registry of sex offenders
required to register under chapter 9A.44 RCW, and such other files as
may be of general assistance to law enforcement agencies.
(2)(a) At the request of a parent, legal custodian, or guardian who
has reported a child as having run away from home or the custodial
residence, the Washington state patrol shall make the information about
the runaway child as is filed in subsection (1) of this section
publicly available.
(b) The information that can be made publicly available under (a)
of this subsection is limited to ((the)) information that will
facilitate the safe return of the child to his or her home or custodial
residence and so long as making the information publicly available
incurs no additional costs.

--- END ---