BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The legislature shall convene a task
force to examine reform of the mental health system, with members as
provided in this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses in the house of
representatives.
(iii) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives jointly shall appoint five members consisting of the
secretary of the department of social and health services or the
secretary's designee, a representative of law enforcement, a
representative of a regional support network, a representative of
treatment providers, and a consumer or family representative.
(b) The task force shall choose two cochairs from among its
legislative members.
(2) The task force shall undertake a systemwide review of the
public mental health system and make recommendations for reform
concerning, but not limited to, the following:
(a) The means by which services are delivered for adults with
serious mental illness;
(b) Availability of effective means to promote recovery and prevent
harm associated with mental illness;
(c) Crisis services; and
(d) Public safety practices involving persons with mental illness
with forensic involvement.
(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(4) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
senate and house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(5) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2014.
(6) This section expires June 1, 2014.

--- END ---