BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2013, the department shall propose rules and
procedures to govern transfers of clients between regional support
networks which allow the department to assume the authority to resolve
disputes that arise. The department shall work collaboratively with
stakeholders, including representatives of consumers and families, in
developing these rules and procedures, which when finalized, must be
incorporated in regional support network contracts.
(2) The department must submit a copy of the proposed rules and
procedures to the chairs of the relevant committees of the legislature
when the proposed rules and procedures are completed.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2015.

--- END ---