BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a
cooperative finance organization where the amounts are derived from
loans to rural electric cooperatives or other nonprofit or governmental
providers of utility services organized under the laws of this state.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Cooperative finance organization" means a nonprofit
organization with the primary purpose of providing, securing, or
otherwise arranging financing for rural electric cooperatives.
(b) "Rural electric cooperative" means a nonprofit, customer-owned
organization that provides utility services to rural areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act applies to amounts
received on or after August 1, 2013.

--- END ---