BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that child care
providers positively contribute to local communities by offering
important services that support the well-being of children and their
families. The legislature further recognizes that most child care
providers make every effort to ensure that subsidy payments received
are correct and align with agency rules. When a child care provider is
found to have fraudulently accepted subsidy payments, however, it is
the legislature's intent to prohibit such a provider from receiving
future child care subsidy payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must refer all suspected incidents of child care
subsidy fraud to the department of social and health services office of
fraud and accountability for appropriate investigation and action.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "fraud" has the definition in
RCW 74.04.004.
(3) This section does not limit or preclude the department or the
department of social and health services from establishing and
collecting overpayments consistent with federal regulation or seek
other remedies that may be legally available, including but not limited
to criminal investigation or prosecution.

--- END ---