BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each agency shall develop a home assignment policy or procedure
that, at a minimum, complies with section 2 of this act. These
policies or procedures must comply with any applicable collective
bargaining agreements.
(2) Agencies shall review their policies or procedures annually to
ensure compliance with section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employee may be placed on home assignment if the employee's
appointing authority determines that home assignment is necessary.
(2) The appointing authority must notify the agency governing
officer or designee and the agency human resources director in writing
of the home assignment and the reasons for the home assignment.
(3) A home assignment may last up to fifteen calendar days. The
fifteen-day home assignment may be extended in thirty-day increments
upon a determination by the governing officer or designee that
additional time is needed.
(4) Before extending the home assignment, the governing officer or
designee must receive an update of activities since the initial home
assignment or previous extension and the reason additional time is
necessary. If the extension is necessary, the governing officer or
designee shall document the reason for the extension and the estimated
time the home assignment is expected to end. The governing officer or
designee must notify the agency human resources director of any
extensions.
(5) When the home assignment ends, the governing officer or
designee must document whether the employee returned to work and the
date the home assignment ended.
(6) If the governing officer is responsible to the governor, the
agency must notify the state human resources director of all home
assignments, extensions, and any other information the state human
resources director requests.
(7) Beginning March 1, 2014, and each March 1st thereafter, the
state human resources director shall submit an annual report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the use of home
assignments during the preceding year.
(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Agency" has the definition in RCW 41.06.020.
(b) "Home assignment" means administratively reassigning an
employee to home during scheduled work hours.
(c) "Employee" includes all employees of an agency, whether or not
covered by civil service.
(d) "Governing officer" means the person, or combination of persons
such as a commission, board, or council, by law empowered to operate
the agency.
(e) "Appointing authority" means an individual lawfully authorized
to appoint, transfer, layoff, reduce, dismiss, suspend, or demote
employees.

--- END ---