BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.18.245 and 2010 c 161 s 621 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A registered owner who is ((the mother or father)) an eligible
family member of a member of the United States armed forces who died
while in service to his or her country, or as a result of his or her
service, may apply to the department for special gold star license
plates for use on a motor vehicle. The registered owner must:
(a) Be a resident of this state;
(b) Provide proof to the satisfaction of the department that the
registered owner is an eligible family member, which includes:
(i) A widow;
(ii) A widower;
(iii) A biological parent;
(iv) An adoptive parent;
(v) A stepparent; or
(vi) An adult in loco parentis or foster parent;
(c) Provide certification from the Washington state department of
veterans affairs that the registered owner qualifies for the special
license plate under this section;
(((c))) (d) Be recorded as the registered owner of the motor
vehicle on which the gold star license plates will be displayed; and
(((d))) (e) Pay all fees and taxes required by law for registering
the motor vehicle.
(2) Gold star license plates must be issued:
(a) Only for motor vehicles owned by qualifying applicants; and
(b) Without payment of any license plate fee.
(3) Gold star license plates must be replaced, free of charge, if
the license plates become lost, stolen, damaged, defaced, or destroyed.
(4) Gold star license plates may be transferred from one motor
vehicle to another motor vehicle owned by the ((mother or father))
eligible family member, as described in subsection (1) of this section,
upon application to the department, county auditor or other agent, or
subagent appointed by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---