BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Any child protective services worker who is directly engaged in:
(1) Investigation of reports of alleged child abuse or neglect; (2)
assessment of risk of abuse or neglect to children; or (3) provision of
or referral to services, including law enforcement, to remedy
conditions that endanger the health, safety, and welfare of children,
must be licensed in good standing in a social work classification under
chapter 18.225 RCW, and bonded.

--- END ---