BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16A.080 and 2011 c 171 s 45 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following vehicles are not required to be registered under this
chapter:
(1) Converter gears used to convert a semitrailer into a trailer or
a two-axle truck or tractor into a three or more axle truck or tractor
or used in any other manner to increase the number of axles of a
vehicle;
(2) Electric-assisted bicycles;
(3)(a) ((Farm implements, tractors, trailers, and other)) Farm
vehicles (((i))) operated within a radius of fifteen miles of the farm
where it is principally used or garaged, (b) farm tractors and farm
implements including trailers designed as cook or bunk houses((, (ii)))
used exclusively for animal herding((, and (iii))) temporarily
operating or drawn upon the public highways, and (((b))) (c) trailers
used exclusively to transport farm implements from one farm to another
during daylight hours or at night when the trailer is equipped with
lights that comply with applicable law;
(4) Forklifts operated during daylight hours on public highways
adjacent to and within five hundred feet of the warehouses they serve;
(5) Golf carts, as defined in RCW 46.04.1945, operating within a
designated golf cart zone as described in RCW 46.08.175;
(6) Motor vehicles operated solely within a national recreation
area that is not accessible by a state highway, including motorcycles,
motor homes, passenger cars, and sport utility vehicles. This
exemption applies only after initial registration;
(7) Motorized foot scooters;
(8) Nurse rigs or equipment auxiliary for the use of and designed
or modified for the fueling, repairing, or loading of spray and
fertilizer applicator rigs and not used, designed, or modified
primarily for the purpose of transportation;
(9) Off-road vehicles operated on a street, road, or highway as
authorized under RCW 46.09.360, or nonhighway roads under RCW
46.09.450;
(10) Special highway construction equipment;
(11) Dump trucks and tractor-dump trailer combinations that are:
(a) Designed and used primarily for construction work on highways;
(b) Not designed or used primarily for the transportation of
persons or property on a public highway; and
(c) Only incidentally operated or moved over the highways;
(12) Spray or fertilizer applicator rigs designed and used
exclusively for spraying or fertilization in the conduct of
agricultural operations and not primarily for the purpose of
transportation;
(13) Tow dollies;
(14) Trams used for transporting persons to and from facilities
related to the horse racing industry as regulated in chapter 67.16 RCW,
as long as the public right-of-way routes over which the trams operate
are not more than one mile from end to end, the public rights-of-way
over which the tram operates have average daily traffic of not more
than fifteen thousand vehicles per day, and the activity is in
conformity with federal law. The operator must be a licensed driver
and at least eighteen years old. For the purposes of this section,
"tram" also means a vehicle, or combination of vehicles linked together
with a single mode of propulsion, used to transport persons from one
location to another; and
(15) Vehicles used by the state parks and recreation commission
exclusively for park maintenance and operations upon public highways
within state parks.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16A.420 and 2010 c 161 s 409 and 2010 c 8 s 9010
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A farmer shall apply to the department, county auditor or other
agent, or subagent appointed by the director for a farm exempt
((decal)) plate for a farm vehicle if the farm vehicle is exempt under
RCW 46.16A.080(3). The farm exempt ((decal)) plate:
(a) Allows the farm vehicle to be operated within a radius of
fifteen miles of the farm where it is principally used or garaged;
(b) Must be displayed on the farm vehicle so that it is clearly
visible from outside of the farm vehicle; and
(c) Must identify that the farm vehicle is exempt from the
registration requirements of this chapter.
(2) A farmer or the farmer's representative must apply for a farm
exempt ((decal)) plate on a form furnished or approved by the
department. The application must show:
(a) The name and address of the person who is the owner of the
vehicle;
(b) A full description of the vehicle, including its make, model,
year, the motor number or the vehicle identification number if the
vehicle is a motor vehicle, or the serial number if the vehicle is a
trailer;
(c) The purpose for which the vehicle is principally used;
(d) The place where the farm vehicle is principally used or
garaged; and
(e) Other information as required by the department upon
application.
(3) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall collect the fee required under RCW
46.17.325 (as recodified by this act) when issuing a farm exempt
((decal)) plate.
(4) A farm exempt ((decal)) plate may not be renewed. The status
as an exempt vehicle continues until suspended or revoked for misuse,
or when the vehicle is no longer used as a farm vehicle.
(5) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.17.325 and 2010 c 161 s 526 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before accepting an application for a farm exempt ((decal)) plate
as required under RCW 46.16A.420, the department, county auditor or
other agent, or subagent appointed by the director shall require the
applicant to pay a five dollar fee in addition to any other fees and
taxes required by law. The five dollar fee must be deposited in the
motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 46.17.325 is recodified as a section in
chapter 46.17 RCW under the subchapter heading "license plate fees."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---