BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.05.137 and 1989 c 174 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The judges of the superior court of the county by majority vote may
authorize mental health commissioners, appointed pursuant to RCW
71.05.135, to perform any or all of the following duties:
(1) Receive all applications, petitions, and proceedings filed in
the superior court for the purpose of disposing of them pursuant to
this chapter or RCW 10.77.094;
(2) Investigate the facts upon which to base warrants, subpoenas,
orders to directions in actions, or proceedings filed pursuant to this
chapter or RCW 10.77.094;
(3) For the purpose of this chapter, exercise all powers and
perform all the duties of a court commissioner appointed pursuant to
RCW 2.24.010;
(4) Hold hearings in proceedings under this chapter or RCW
10.77.094 and make written reports of all proceedings under this
chapter or RCW 10.77.094 which shall become a part of the record of
superior court;
(5) Provide such supervision in connection with the exercise of its
jurisdiction as may be ordered by the presiding judge; and
(6) Cause the orders and findings to be entered in the same manner
as orders and findings are entered in cases in the superior court.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.34.315 and 1989 c 174 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The judges of the superior court of the county by majority vote may
authorize mental health commissioners, appointed pursuant to RCW
71.05.135, to perform any or all of the following duties:
(1) Receive all applications, petitions, and proceedings filed in
the superior court for the purpose of disposing of them pursuant to
this chapter or RCW 10.77.094;
(2) Investigate the facts upon which to base warrants, subpoenas,
orders to directions in actions, or proceedings filed pursuant to this
chapter or RCW 10.77.094;
(3) For the purpose of this chapter, exercise all powers and
perform all the duties of a court commissioner appointed pursuant to
RCW 2.24.010;
(4) Hold hearings in proceedings under this chapter or RCW
10.77.094 and make written reports of all proceedings under this
chapter or RCW 10.77.094 which shall become a part of the record of
superior court;
(5) Provide such supervision in connection with the exercise of its
jurisdiction as may be ordered by the presiding judge; and
(6) Cause the orders and findings to be entered in the same manner
as orders and findings are entered in cases in the superior court.

Sec. 3 RCW 2.24.010 and 2009 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There may be appointed in each county or judicial district, by
the judges of the superior court having jurisdiction therein, one or
more court commissioners for said county or judicial district. Each
such commissioner shall be a citizen of the United States and shall
hold the office during the pleasure of the judges making the
appointment.
(2)(a) There may be appointed in counties with a population of more
than four hundred thousand, by the presiding judge of the superior
court having jurisdiction therein, one or more attorneys to act as
criminal commissioners to assist the superior court in disposing of
adult criminal cases. Such criminal commissioners shall have power,
authority, and jurisdiction, concurrent with the superior court and the
judges thereof, in adult criminal cases, to preside over arraignments,
preliminary appearances, initial extradition hearings, and
noncompliance proceedings pursuant to RCW 9.94A.6333 or 9.94B.040;
accept pleas if authorized by local court rules; appoint counsel; make
determinations of probable cause; set, amend, and review conditions of
pretrial release; set bail; set trial and hearing dates; authorize
continuances; ((and)) accept waivers of the right to speedy trial; and
authorize and issue search warrants and orders to intercept, monitor,
or record wired or wireless telecommunications or for the installation
of electronic taps or other devices to include, but not be limited to,
vehicle global positioning system or other mobile tracking devices with
all the powers conferred upon the judge of the superior court in such
matters.
(b) The county legislative authority must approve the creation of
criminal commissioner positions.

--- END ---