BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 48.32.145 (Credit against premium tax
for assessments paid pursuant to RCW 48.32.060(1)(c)) and 1997 c 300 s
1, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 901, 1977 ex.s. c 183 s 1, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c
109 s 11 are each repealed.

--- END ---