BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.230 and 2011 c 350 s 2 and 2011 c 173 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2) Personal information((,)) including, but not limited to,
addresses, telephone numbers, personal electronic mail addresses,
social security numbers, emergency contact and date of birth
information for a participant in a public or nonprofit program serving
or pertaining to children, adolescents, or students, including but not
limited to early learning or child care services, parks and recreation
programs, youth development programs, and after-school programs.
Emergency contact information may be provided to appropriate
authorities and medical personnel for the purpose of treating the
individual during an emergency situation;
(3) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(4) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons
by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, or any ordinance
authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b) violate the taxpayer's right to
privacy or result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer;
(5) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial ((account
numbers)) information as defined in RCW 9.35.005 including social
security numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or
governed by other law;
(6) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or
any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093; and
(7)(a) Documents and related materials and scanned images of
documents and related materials used to prove identity, age,
residential address, social security number, or other personal
information required to apply for a driver's license or identicard.
(b) Information provided under RCW 46.20.111 that indicates that an
applicant declined to register with the selective service system.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.250 and 2010 c 257 s 1 and 2010 c 128 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following employment and licensing information is exempt from
public inspection and copying under this chapter:
(1) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
to administer a license, employment, or academic examination;
(2) All applications for public employment, including the names of
applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect
to an applicant, subject to the following exceptions:
(a) The applications of finalists applying for the highest
management position in a public agency, county, or local government
department with confidential reference information removed or redacted
is not exempt from inspection and copying; and
(b) Application materials not exempt from inspection and copying
must be available to the public after the finalists are selected, but
before the agency, county, or local government makes its decision;
(3) The residential addresses, residential telephone numbers,
personal wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail
addresses, social security numbers, and emergency contact information
of employees or volunteers of a public agency, and the names, dates of
birth, residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, personal
wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail addresses, social
security numbers, and emergency contact information of dependents of
employees or volunteers of a public agency that are held by any public
agency in personnel records, public employment related records, or
volunteer rosters, or are included in any mailing list of employees or
volunteers of any public agency. For purposes of this subsection,
"employees" includes independent provider home care workers as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240;
(4) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency
employee: (a) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by
the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in
connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
against the person; and (b) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed;
(5) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency
conducting an active and ongoing investigation of a possible unfair
practice under chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other
federal, state, or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment;
(6) Criminal history records checks for board staff finalist
candidates conducted pursuant to RCW 43.33A.025;
(7) Except as provided in RCW 47.64.220, salary and benefit
information for maritime employees collected from private employers
under RCW 47.64.220(1) and described in RCW 47.64.220(2); and
(8) Photographs and month and year of birth in the personnel files
of employees and workers of criminal justice agencies as defined in RCW
10.97.030. The news media, as defined in RCW 5.68.010(5), shall have
access to the photographs and full date of birth. For the purposes of
this subsection, news media does not include any person or organization
of persons in the custody of a criminal justice agency as defined in
RCW 10.97.030.
For the purposes of this section, "employment" does not include
service on boards or commissions where the individual does not receive
pay or benefits, even if that individual may receive minimal
reimbursement or stipend for expenses.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.56.330 and 2012 c 68 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to public utilities and
transportation is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095;
(2) The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of
the customers of a public utility contained in the records or lists
held by the public utility of which they are customers, except that
this information may be released to the division of child support or
the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another
state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order;
(3) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service((; however, these records)). Participant's names, general
locations, and e-mail addresses may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides;
(4) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons;
(5) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes or other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose personally identifying information to a
person, employer, educational institution, or other entity that is
responsible, in whole or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring
or using a transit pass or other fare payment media for the purpose of
preventing fraud((, or to the news media when reporting on public
transportation or public safety)). As used in this subsection,
"personally identifying information" includes acquisition or use
information pertaining to a specific, individual transit pass or fare
payment media.
(a) Information regarding the acquisition or use of transit passes
or fare payment media may be disclosed in aggregate form if the data
does not contain any personally identifying information.
(b) Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies if the request is accompanied by a court order;
(6) Any information obtained by governmental agencies that is
collected by the use of a motor carrier intelligent transportation
system or any comparable information equipment attached to a truck,
tractor, or trailer; however, the information may be given to other
governmental agencies or the owners of the truck, tractor, or trailer
from which the information is obtained. As used in this subsection,
"motor carrier" has the same definition as provided in RCW 81.80.010;
(7) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transponders or other technology to facilitate payment of
tolls. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form as long as
the data does not contain any personally identifying information. For
these purposes aggregate data may include the census tract of the
account holder as long as any individual personally identifying
information is not released. Personally identifying information may be
released to law enforcement agencies only for toll enforcement
purposes. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies for other purposes only if the request is
accompanied by a court order; and
(8) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use a driver's license or identicard that includes a radio
frequency identification chip or similar technology to facilitate
border crossing. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form
as long as the data does not contain any personally identifying
information. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies only for United States customs and border
protection enforcement purposes. Personally identifying information
may be released to law enforcement agencies for other purposes only if
the request is accompanied by a court order.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.37.060 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 460 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) When the commissioner determines that other market conduct
actions identified in RCW 48.37.040(4)(a) have not sufficiently
addressed issues raised concerning company activities in Washington
state, the commissioner has the discretion to conduct market conduct
examinations in accordance with the NAIC market conduct uniform
examination procedures and the NAIC market regulation handbook.
(2)(a) In lieu of an examination of an insurer licensed in this
state, the commissioner shall accept an examination report of another
state, unless the commissioner determines that the other state does not
have laws substantially similar to those of this state, or does not
have a market oversight system that is comparable to the market conduct
oversight system set forth in this law.
(b) The commissioner's determination under (a) of this subsection
is discretionary with the commissioner and is not subject to appeal.
(c) If the insurer to be examined is part of an insurance holding
company system, the commissioner may also seek to simultaneously
examine any affiliates of the insurer under common control and
management which are licensed to write the same lines of business in
this state.
(3) Before commencement of a market conduct examination, market
conduct oversight personnel shall prepare a work plan consisting of the
following:
(a) The name and address of the insurer being examined;
(b) The name and contact information of the examiner-in-charge;
(c) The name of all market conduct oversight personnel initially
assigned to the market conduct examination;
(d) The justification for the examination;
(e) The scope of the examination;
(f) The date the examination is scheduled to begin;
(g) Notice of any noninsurance department personnel who will assist
in the examination;
(h) A time estimate for the examination;
(i) A budget for the examination if the cost of the examination is
billed to the insurer; and
(j) An identification of factors that will be included in the
billing if the cost of the examination is billed to the insurer.
(4)(a) Within ten days of the receipt of the information contained
in subsection (3) of this section, insurers may request the
commissioner's discretionary review of any alleged conflict of
interest, pursuant to RCW 48.37.090(2), of market conduct oversight
personnel and noninsurance department personnel assigned to a market
conduct examination. The request for review shall specifically
describe the alleged conflict of interest in the proposed assignment of
any person to the examination.
(b) Within five business days of receiving a request for
discretionary review of any alleged conflict of interest in the
proposed assignment of any person to a market conduct examination, the
commissioner or designee shall notify the insurer of any action
regarding the assignment of personnel to a market conduct examination
based on the insurer's allegation of conflict of interest.
(5) Market conduct examinations shall, to the extent feasible, use
desk examinations and data requests before an on-site examination.
(6) Market conduct examinations shall be conducted in accordance
with the provisions set forth in the NAIC market regulation handbook
and the NAIC market conduct uniform examinations procedures, subject to
the precedence of the provisions of chapter 82, Laws of 2007.
(7) The commissioner shall use the NAIC standard data request.
(8) Announcement of the examination shall be sent to the insurer
and posted on the NAIC's examination tracking system as soon as
possible but in no case later than sixty days before the estimated
commencement of the examination, except where the examination is
conducted in response to extraordinary circumstances as described in
RCW 48.37.050(2)(a). The announcement sent to the insurer shall
contain the examination work plan and a request for the insurer to name
its examination coordinator.
(9) If an examination is expanded significantly beyond the original
reasons provided to the insurer in the notice of the examination
required by subsection (3) of this section, the commissioner shall
provide written notice to the insurer, explaining the expansion and
reasons for the expansion. The commissioner shall provide a revised
work plan if the expansion results in significant changes to the items
presented in the original work plan required by subsection (3) of this
section.
(10) The commissioner shall conduct a preexamination conference
with the insurer examination coordinator and key personnel to clarify
expectations at least thirty days before commencement of the
examination, unless otherwise agreed by the insurer and the
commissioner.
(11) Before the conclusion of the field work for market conduct
examination, the examiner-in-charge shall review examination findings
to date with insurer personnel and schedule an exit conference with the
insurer, in accordance with procedures in the NAIC market regulation
handbook.
(12)(a) No later than sixty days after completion of each market
conduct examination, the commissioner shall make a full written report
of each market conduct examination containing only facts ascertained
from the accounts, records, and documents examined and from the sworn
testimony of individuals, and such conclusions and recommendations as
may reasonably be warranted from such facts.
(b) The report shall be certified by the commissioner or by the
examiner-in-charge of the examination, and shall be filed in the
commissioner's office subject to (c) of this subsection.
(c) The commissioner shall furnish a copy of the market conduct
examination report to the person examined not less than ten days and,
unless the time is extended by the commissioner, not more than thirty
days prior to the filing of the report for public inspection in the
commissioner's office. If the person so requests in writing within
such period, the commissioner shall hold a hearing to consider
objections of such person to the report as proposed, and shall not so
file the report until after such hearing and until after any
modifications in the report deemed necessary by the commissioner have
been made.
(d) Within thirty days of the end of the period described in (c) of
this subsection, unless extended by order of the commissioner, the
commissioner shall consider the report, together with any written
submissions or rebuttals and any relevant portions of the examiner's
work papers and enter an order:
(i) Adopting the market conduct examination report as filed or with
modification or corrections. If the market conduct examination report
reveals that the company is operating in violation of any law, rule, or
order of the commissioner, the commissioner may order the company to
take any action the commissioner considers necessary and appropriate to
cure that violation;
(ii) Rejecting the market conduct examination report with
directions to the examiners to reopen the examination for purposes of
obtaining additional data, documentation, or information, and refiling
under this subsection; or
(iii) Calling for an investigatory hearing with no less than twenty
days' notice to the company for purposes of obtaining additional
documentation, data, information, and testimony.
(e) All orders entered under (d) of this subsection must be
accompanied by findings and conclusions resulting from the
commissioner's consideration and review of the market conduct
examination report, relevant examiner work papers, and any written
submissions or rebuttals. The order is considered a final
administrative decision and may be appealed under the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and must be served upon the company
by certified mail or certifiable electronic means, together with a copy
of the adopted examination report. A copy of the adopted examination
report must be sent by certified mail or certifiable electronic means
to each director at the director's residential address or to a personal
e-mail account.
(f)(i) Upon the adoption of the market conduct examination report
under (d) of this subsection, the commissioner shall continue to hold
the content of the examination report as private and confidential
information for a period of five days except that the order may be
disclosed to the person examined. Thereafter, the commissioner ((may))
must open the report for public inspection so long as no court of
competent jurisdiction has stayed its publication.
(ii) If the commissioner determines that regulatory action is
appropriate as a result of any market conduct examination, he or she
may initiate any proceedings or actions as provided by law.
(iii) Nothing contained in this subsection requires the
commissioner to disclose any information or records that would indicate
or show the existence or content of any investigation or activity of a
criminal justice agency.
(g) The insurer's response shall be included in the commissioner's
order adopting the final report as an exhibit to the order. The
insurer is not obligated to submit a response.
(13) Except as provided in subsection (12)(f)(i) of this section,
the commissioner may withhold from public inspection any examination or
investigation report for so long as he or she deems it advisable.
(14)(a) Market conduct examinations within this state of any
insurer domiciled or having its home offices in this state, other than
a title insurer, made by the commissioner or the commissioner's
examiners and employees shall, except as to fees, mileage, and expense
incurred as to witnesses, be at the expense of the state.
(b) Every other examination, whatsoever, or any part of the market
conduct examination of any person domiciled or having its home offices
in this state requiring travel and services outside this state, shall
be made by the commissioner or by examiners designated by the
commissioner and shall be at the expense of the person examined; but a
domestic insurer shall not be liable for the compensation of examiners
employed by the commissioner for such services outside this state.
(c) When making a market conduct examination under this chapter,
the commissioner may contract, in accordance with applicable state
contracting procedures, for qualified attorneys, appraisers,
independent certified public accountants, contract actuaries, and other
similar individuals who are independently practicing their professions,
even though those persons may from time to time be similarly employed
or retained by persons subject to examination under this chapter, as
examiners as the commissioner deems necessary for the efficient conduct
of a particular examination. The compensation and per diem allowances
paid to such contract persons shall be reasonable in the market and
time incurred, shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the
compensation and per diem allowances for examiners set forth in the
guidelines adopted by the national association of insurance
commissioners, unless the commissioner demonstrates that one hundred
twenty-five percent is inadequate under the circumstances of the
examination, and subject to the provisions of (a) of this subsection.
(d)(i) The person examined and liable shall reimburse the state
upon presentation of an itemized statement thereof, for the actual
travel expenses of the commissioner's examiners, their reasonable
living expenses allowance, and their per diem compensation, including
salary and the employer's cost of employee benefits, at a reasonable
rate approved by the commissioner, incurred on account of the
examination. Per diem, salary, and expenses for employees examining
insurers domiciled outside the state of Washington shall be established
by the commissioner on the basis of the national association of
insurance commissioner's recommended salary and expense schedule for
zone examiners, or the salary schedule established by the human
resources director and the expense schedule established by the office
of financial management, whichever is higher. A domestic title insurer
shall pay the examination expense and costs to the commissioner as
itemized and billed by the commissioner.
(ii) The commissioner or the commissioner's examiners shall not
receive or accept any additional emolument on account of any
examination.
(iii) Market conduct examination fees subject to being reimbursed
by an insurer shall be itemized and bills shall be provided to the
insurer on a monthly basis for review prior to submission for payment,
or as otherwise provided by state law.
(e) Nothing contained in this chapter limits the commissioner's
authority to terminate or suspend any examination in order to pursue
other legal or regulatory action under the insurance laws of this
state. Findings of fact and conclusions made pursuant to any
examination are prima facie evidence in any legal or regulatory action.
(f) The commissioner shall maintain active management and oversight
of market conduct examination costs, including costs associated with
the commissioner's own examiners, and with retaining qualified contract
examiners necessary to perform an examination. Any agreement with a
contract examiner shall:
(i) Clearly identify the types of functions to be subject to
outsourcing;
(ii) Provide specific timelines for completion of the outsourced
review;
(iii) Require disclosure to the insurer of contract examiners'
recommendations;
(iv) Establish and use a dispute resolution or arbitration
mechanism to resolve conflicts with insurers regarding examination
fees; and
(v) Require disclosure of the terms of the contracts with the
outside consultants that will be used, specifically the fees and/or
hourly rates that can be charged.
(g) The commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, shall review
and affirmatively endorse detailed billings from the qualified contract
examiner before the detailed billings are sent to the insurer.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.148.060 and 2005 c 274 s 341 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All ((examination and proprietary reports and)) information
except for proprietary reports or information obtained by the director
and the director's staff in soliciting bids from insurers and in
monitoring the insurer selected by the director shall ((not)) be made
public or otherwise disclosed to any person, firm, corporation, agency,
association, governmental body, or other entity.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the director
may furnish all or part of examination reports prepared by the director
or by any person, firm, corporation, association, or other entity
preparing the reports on behalf of the director to:
(a) The Washington state insurance commissioner;
(b) A person or organization officially connected with the insurer
as officer, director, attorney, auditor, or independent attorney or
independent auditor; and
(c) The attorney general in his or her role as legal advisor to the
director.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the director
may furnish all or part of the examination or proprietary reports or
information obtained by the director to:
(a) The Washington state insurance commissioner; and
(b) A person, firm, corporation, association, governmental body, or
other entity with whom the director has contracted for services
necessary to perform his or her official duties.
(4) ((Examination reports and)) Proprietary information obtained by
the director and the director's staff ((are)) is not subject to public
disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.
(5) A person who violates any provision of this section is guilty
of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 6 RCW 13.34.100 and 2010 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child who is
the subject of an action under this chapter, unless a court for good
cause finds the appointment unnecessary. The requirement of a guardian
ad litem may be deemed satisfied if the child is represented by
independent counsel in the proceedings. The court shall attempt to
match a child with special needs with a guardian ad litem who has
specific training or education related to the child's individual needs.
(2) If the court does not have available to it a guardian ad litem
program with a sufficient number of volunteers, the court may appoint
a suitable person to act as guardian ad litem for the child under this
chapter. Another party to the proceeding or the party's employee or
representative shall not be so appointed.
(3) Each guardian ad litem program shall maintain a background
information record for each guardian ad litem in the program.
Information obtained pursuant to this subsection (3) must be made
available for public inspection and copying, subject to the court's
discretion. The background information record shall include, but is
not limited to, the following information:
(a) Level of formal education;
(b) General training related to the guardian ad litem's duties;
(c) Specific training related to issues potentially faced by
children in the dependency system;
(d) Specific training or education related to child disability or
developmental issues;
(e) Connection with an organization or association involved in the
placement of children including a membership, referrals, contracts, or
other financial dealings;
(f) Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;
(((f))) (g) Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and the
county or counties of appointment and number of appointments as a
guardian ad litem or court appointed special advocate in other states
with the location and duration of the appointments in other states;
(((g))) (h) The names of any counties in Washington or other states
in which the person was removed from a guardian ad litem registry
pursuant to a grievance action, and the name of the court and the cause
number of any case in which the court has removed the person for cause;
(((h))) (i) Any complaint made to a court or to a guardian ad litem
program or court appointed special advocate program, or request for
review under subsection (9) of this section, unless proven false;
(j) Founded allegations of abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020;
(((i))) (k) The results of an examination of state and national
criminal identification data. The examination shall consist of a
background check as allowed through the Washington state criminal
records privacy act under RCW 10.97.050, the Washington state patrol
criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.832 through 43.43.834,
and the federal bureau of investigation. The background check shall be
done through the Washington state patrol criminal identification
section and must include a national check from the federal bureau of
investigation based on the submission of fingerprints; and
(((j))) (l) Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, for the
period covering ten years prior to the appointment.
The background information record shall be updated annually. As a
condition of appointment, the guardian ad litem's background
information record shall be made available to the court. If the
appointed guardian ad litem is not a member of a guardian ad litem
program a suitable person appointed by the court to act as guardian ad
litem shall provide the background information record to the court.
Upon appointment, the guardian ad litem, or guardian ad litem
program, shall provide the parties or their attorneys with a copy of
the background information record. ((The portion of the background
information record containing the results of the criminal background
check and the criminal history shall not be disclosed to the parties or
their attorneys.)) The background information record shall not include
identifying information that may be used to harm a guardian ad litem,
such as home addresses and home telephone numbers, and for volunteer
guardians ad litem the court may allow the use of maiden names or
pseudonyms as necessary for their safety.
(4) The appointment of the guardian ad litem shall remain in effect
until the court discharges the appointment or no longer has
jurisdiction, whichever comes first. The guardian ad litem may also be
discharged upon entry of an order of guardianship.
(5) A guardian ad litem through counsel, or as otherwise authorized
by the court, shall have the right to present evidence, examine and
cross-examine witnesses, and to be present at all hearings. A guardian
ad litem shall receive copies of all pleadings and other documents
filed or submitted to the court, and notice of all hearings according
to court rules. The guardian ad litem shall receive all notice
contemplated for a parent or other party in all proceedings under this
chapter.
(6)(a) Pursuant to this subsection, the department or supervising
agency and the child's guardian ad litem shall each notify a child of
his or her right to request counsel and shall ask the child whether he
or she wishes to have counsel. The department or supervising agency
and the child's guardian ad litem shall notify the child and make this
inquiry immediately after:
(i) The date of the child's twelfth birthday;
(ii) Assignment of a case involving a child age twelve or older; or
(iii) July 1, 2010, for a child who turned twelve years old before
July 1, 2010.
(b) The department or supervising agency and the child's guardian
ad litem shall repeat the notification and inquiry at least annually
and upon the filing of any motion or petition affecting the child's
placement, services, or familial relationships.
(c) The notification and inquiry is not required if the child has
already been appointed counsel.
(d) The department or supervising agency shall note in the child's
individual service and safety plan, and the guardian ad litem shall
note in his or her report to the court, that the child was notified of
the right to request counsel and indicate the child's position
regarding appointment of counsel.
(e) At the first regularly scheduled hearing after:
(i) The date of the child's twelfth birthday;
(ii) The date that a dependency petition is filed pursuant to this
chapter on a child age twelve or older; or
(iii) July 1, 2010, for a child who turned twelve years old before
July 1, 2010;
the court shall inquire whether the child has received notice of his or
her right to request legal counsel from the department or supervising
agency and the child's guardian ad litem. The court shall make an
additional inquiry at the first regularly scheduled hearing after the
child's fifteenth birthday. No inquiry is necessary if the child has
already been appointed counsel.
(f) If the child requests legal counsel and is age twelve or older,
or if the guardian ad litem or the court determines that the child
needs to be independently represented by counsel, the court may appoint
an attorney to represent the child's position.
(7) For the purposes of child abuse prevention and treatment act
(42 U.S.C. Secs. 5101 et seq.) grants to this state under P.L. 93-247,
or any related state or federal legislation, a person appointed
pursuant to this section shall be deemed a guardian ad litem to
represent the best interests of the minor in proceedings before the
court.
(8) When a court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian
ad litem is requested on a case, the program shall give the court the
name of the person it recommends. The program shall attempt to match
a child with special needs with a guardian ad litem who has specific
training or education related to the child's individual needs. The
court shall immediately appoint the person recommended by the program.
(9) If a party in a case reasonably believes the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem is inappropriate or
unqualified, the party may request a review of the appointment by the
program. The program must complete the review within five judicial
days and remove any appointee for good cause. If the party seeking the
review is not satisfied with the outcome of the review, the party may
file a motion with the court for the removal of the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem on the grounds the
advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or unqualified.

--- END ---