BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.240 and 2012 c 88 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following investigative, law enforcement, and crime victim
information is exempt from public inspection and copying under this
chapter:
(1) Specific intelligence information and specific investigative
records compiled by investigative, law enforcement, and penology
agencies, and state agencies vested with the responsibility to
discipline members of any profession, the nondisclosure of which is
essential to effective law enforcement or for the protection of any
person's right to privacy;
(2) Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses
to or victims of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law
enforcement, or penology agencies, other than the commission, if
disclosure would endanger any person's life, physical safety, or
property. If at the time a complaint is filed the complainant, victim,
or witness indicates a desire for disclosure or nondisclosure, such
desire shall govern. However, all complaints filed with the commission
about any elected official or candidate for public office must be made
in writing and signed by the complainant under oath;
(3) Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state,
county, municipal, or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex
offenses contained in chapter 9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as
defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have been transferred to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW 40.14.070(2)(b);
(4) License applications under RCW 9.41.070; copies of license
applications or information on the applications may be released to law
enforcement or corrections agencies;
(5) Information revealing the identity of child victims of sexual
assault who are under age eighteen. Identifying information ((means))
includes, but is not limited to the child victim's name, address,
location, photograph, and in cases in which the child victim is a
relative or stepchild of the alleged perpetrator, identification of the
relationship between the child and the alleged perpetrator;
(6) Information contained in a local or regionally maintained gang
database as well as the statewide gang database referenced in RCW
43.43.762;
(7) Data from the electronic sales tracking system established in
RCW 69.43.165;
(8) Information submitted to the statewide unified sex offender
notification and registration program under RCW 36.28A.040(6) by a
person for the purpose of receiving notification regarding a registered
sex offender, including the person's name, residential address, and e-mail address; and
(9) Personally identifying information collected by law enforcement
agencies pursuant to local security alarm system programs and vacation
crime watch programs. Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted
so as to prohibit the legal owner of a residence or business from
accessing information regarding his or her residence or business.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.400 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
The following information relating to insurance and financial
institutions is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals
that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed
with the board under RCW 7.68.110;
(2) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW;
(3) The names and individual identification data of either all
owners or all insureds, or both, received by the insurance commissioner
under chapter 48.102 RCW;
(4) Information provided under RCW 48.30A.045 through 48.30A.060;
(5) Information provided under RCW 48.05.510 through 48.05.535,
48.43.200 through 48.43.225, 48.44.530 through 48.44.555, and 48.46.600
through 48.46.625;
(6) Examination reports and information obtained by the department
of financial institutions from banks under RCW 30.04.075, from savings
banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW
33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from check cashers
and sellers under RCW 31.45.030(3), and from securities brokers and
investment advisers under RCW 21.20.100, all of which is confidential
and privileged information;
(7) Information provided to the insurance commissioner under RCW
48.110.040(3);
(8) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.02.065, all of which are confidential and
privileged;
(9) Confidential proprietary and trade secret information provided
to the commissioner under RCW 48.31C.020 through 48.31C.050 and
48.31C.070;
(10) ((Data filed under RCW 48.140.020, 48.140.030, 48.140.050, and
7.70.140 that, alone or in combination with any other data, may reveal
the identity of a claimant, health care provider, health care facility,
insuring entity, or self-insurer involved in a particular claim or a
collection of claims. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Claimant" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(2).
(b) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(6).
(c) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(7).
(d) "Insuring entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(8).
(e) "Self-insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(11);
(11))) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the
insurance commissioner under RCW 48.135.060;
(((12))) (11) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the
insurance commissioner under RCW 48.37.060;
(((13))) (12) Confidential and privileged documents obtained or
produced by the insurance commissioner and identified in RCW 48.37.080;
(((14))) (13) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the
insurance commissioner under RCW 48.37.140;
(((15))) (14) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the
insurance commissioner under RCW 48.17.595;
(((16))) (15) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the
insurance commissioner under RCW 48.102.051(1) and 48.102.140 (3) and
(7)(a)(ii);
(((17))) (16) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the
insurance commissioner in the commissioner's capacity as receiver under
RCW 48.31.025 and 48.99.017, which are records under the jurisdiction
and control of the receivership court. The commissioner is not
required to search for, log, produce, or otherwise comply with the
public records act for any records that the commissioner obtains under
chapters 48.31 and 48.99 RCW in the commissioner's capacity as a
receiver, except as directed by the receivership court;
(((18))) (17) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the
insurance commissioner under RCW 48.13.151;
(((19))) (18) Data, information, and documents provided by a
carrier pursuant to section 1, chapter 172, Laws of 2010;
(((20))) (19) Information in a filing of usage-based insurance
about the usage-based component of the rate pursuant to RCW
48.19.040(5)(b); and
(((21))) (20) Data, information, and documents, other than those
described in RCW 48.02.210(2), that are submitted to the office of the
insurance commissioner by an entity providing health care coverage
pursuant to RCW 28A.400.275 and 48.02.210.

--- END ---