BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the federal
individual with disabilities education act and Washington state law
provide that education programs are to be provided for students with
disabilities until the student is twenty-one, but when the twenty-first
birthday occurs during the school year, the education program may be
continued until the end of that school year. The legislature further
finds that students with disabilities can benefit from being involved
in extracurricular teams or activities at the school they attend. The
legislature intends to permit a waiver that allows a physically or
mentally disabled student to participate in extracurricular high school
activities for the duration of their enrollment in high school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
The Washington interscholastic activities association shall provide
a waiver that allows a student with a physical or mental disability, or
both, to participate in extracurricular high school activities for the
duration of his or her enrollment in high school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act shall be known and cited as the Ike
act.

--- END ---