BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that persons with a
mental illness or developmental disability are more likely to be
victimized by crime than to be perpetrators of crime. The legislature
finds that it is appropriate to lengthen the term of civil commitment
available for the small number of persons who receive commitment on the
basis of the commission of an offense classified as violent under RCW
9.94A.030 who, based on a mental disorder, present a substantial
likelihood of committing similar acts after criminal charges that
include a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030 have been dismissed based
on incompetence to stand trial that cannot be restored within the
treatment periods authorized by RCW 10.77.086.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.77.086 and 2012 c 256 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If the defendant is charged with a felony and determined to
be incompetent, until he or she has regained the competency necessary
to understand the proceedings against him or her and assist in his or
her own defense, or has been determined unlikely to regain competency
pursuant to RCW 10.77.084(1)(b), but in any event for a period of no
longer than ninety days, the court:
(i) Shall commit the defendant to the custody of the secretary who
shall place such defendant in an appropriate facility of the department
for evaluation and treatment; or
(ii) May alternatively order the defendant to undergo evaluation
and treatment at some other facility as determined by the department,
or under the guidance and control of a professional person.
(b) For a defendant whose highest charge is a class C felony, or a
class B felony that is not classified as violent under RCW 9.94A.030,
the maximum time allowed for the initial period of commitment for
competency restoration is forty-five days.
(2) On or before expiration of the initial period of commitment
under subsection (1) of this section the court shall conduct a hearing,
at which it shall determine whether or not the defendant is
incompetent.
(3) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a
defendant charged with a felony is incompetent, the court shall have
the option of extending the order of commitment or alternative
treatment for an additional period of ninety days, but the court must
at the time of extension set a date for a prompt hearing to determine
the defendant's competency before the expiration of the second
restoration period. The defendant, the defendant's attorney, or the
prosecutor has the right to demand that the hearing be before a jury.
No extension shall be ordered for a second or third restoration period
as provided in subsection (4) of this section if the defendant's
incompetence has been determined by the secretary to be solely the
result of a developmental disability which is such that competence is
not reasonably likely to be regained during an extension.
(4) For persons charged with a felony, at the hearing upon the
expiration of the second restoration period or at the end of the first
restoration period, in the case of a defendant with a developmental
disability, if the jury or court finds that the defendant is
incompetent, the charges shall be dismissed without prejudice, and the
court shall ((either order the release of the defendant or)) order the
defendant be committed to a state hospital ((or secure mental health
facility)) as defined in RCW 72.23.010 for up to seventy-two hours
starting from admission to the facility, excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
and holidays, for evaluation for the purpose of filing a civil
commitment petition. The criminal charges shall not be dismissed if
the court or jury finds that: (a) The defendant (i) is a substantial
danger to other persons; or (ii) presents a substantial likelihood of
committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security; and
(b) there is a substantial probability that the defendant will regain
competency within a reasonable period of time. In the event that the
court or jury makes such a finding, the court may extend the period of
commitment for up to an additional six months.

Sec. 3 RCW 10.77.088 and 2007 c 375 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If the defendant is charged with a nonfelony crime which is
a serious offense ((as identified in)) under RCW 10.77.092 and found by
the court to be not competent, ((then)) the court shall order the
secretary to place the defendant:
(i) At a secure mental health facility in the custody of the
department or an agency designated by the department for mental health
treatment and restoration of competency. The placement shall not
exceed fourteen days in addition to any unused time of the evaluation
under RCW 10.77.060. The court shall compute this total period and
include its computation in the order. The fourteen-day period plus any
unused time of the evaluation under RCW 10.77.060 shall be considered
to include only the time the defendant is actually at the facility and
shall be in addition to reasonable time for transport to or from the
facility;
(ii) On conditional release for up to ninety days for mental health
treatment and restoration of competency; or
(iii) Any combination of this subsection.
(b)(i) If the proceedings are dismissed under RCW 10.77.084 and the
defendant was on conditional release at the time of dismissal, the
court shall order the designated mental health professional within that
county to evaluate the defendant pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW. The
evaluation may be conducted in any location chosen by the professional.
(ii) If the defendant was in custody and not on conditional release
at the time of dismissal, the defendant shall be detained and sent to
an evaluation and treatment facility ((for up to)) within seventy-two
hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, for evaluation for
purposes of filing a petition under chapter 71.05 RCW. A designated
mental health professional or other professional person agreed upon by
the department and regional support network must be permitted to screen
the defendant prior to transport and release the defendant if civil
commitment criteria are not met, provided that notification is provided
under RCW 10.77.065(4). The seventy-two-hour period shall commence
upon the next nonholiday weekday following the court order and shall
run to the end of the last nonholiday weekday within the seventy-two-hour period.
(2) If the defendant is charged with a nonfelony crime that is not
a serious offense as defined in RCW 10.77.092((:)), the court ((may
stay or)) shall dismiss ((proceedings)) the charges and detain the
defendant for sufficient time to allow the designated mental health
professional to evaluate the defendant ((and consider initial detention
proceedings)) for commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW. ((The court must
give notice to all parties at least twenty-four hours before the
dismissal of any proceeding under this subsection, and provide an
opportunity for a hearing on whether to dismiss the proceedings.))

Sec. 4 RCW 10.77.270 and 2010 c 263 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall establish an independent public safety
review panel for the purpose of advising the secretary and the courts
with respect to persons who have been found not guilty by reason of
insanity, or persons committed for an indefinite period under RCW
71.05.290(3). The panel shall provide advice regarding all
recommendations by the secretary: (a) For a change in commitment
status; (b) to allow furloughs or temporary leaves accompanied by
staff; or (c) to permit movement about the grounds of the treatment
facility, with or without the accompaniment of staff.
(2) The members of the public safety review panel shall be
appointed by the governor for a renewable term of three years and shall
include the following:
(a) A psychiatrist;
(b) A licensed clinical psychologist;
(c) A representative of the department of corrections;
(d) A prosecutor or a representative of a prosecutor's association;
(e) A representative of law enforcement or a law enforcement
association;
(f) A consumer and family advocate representative; and
(g) A public defender or a representative of a defender's
association.
(3) Thirty days prior to issuing a recommendation for conditional
release under RCW 10.77.150 or forty-five days prior to issuing a
recommendation for release under RCW 10.77.200, the secretary shall
submit its recommendation with the committed person's application and
the department's risk assessment to the public safety review panel.
The public safety review panel shall complete an independent assessment
of the public safety risk entailed by the secretary's proposed
conditional release recommendation or release recommendation and
provide this assessment in writing to the secretary. The public safety
review panel may, within funds appropriated for this purpose, request
additional evaluations of the committed person. The public safety
review panel may indicate whether it is in agreement with the
secretary's recommendation, or whether it would issue a different
recommendation. The secretary shall provide the panel's assessment
when it is received along with any supporting documentation, including
all previous reports of evaluations of the committed person in the
person's hospital record, to the court, prosecutor in the county that
ordered the person's commitment, and counsel for the committed person.
(4) The secretary shall notify the public safety review panel at
appropriate intervals concerning any changes in the commitment or
custody status of persons found not guilty by reason of insanity. The
panel shall have access, upon request, to a committed person's complete
hospital record.
(5) The secretary shall notify the public safety review panel at
least thirty days prior to the planned termination of a commitment for
a person committed for an indefinite period under RCW 71.05.290(3).
(6) The department shall provide administrative and financial
support to the public safety review panel. The department, in
consultation with the public safety review panel, may adopt rules to
implement this section.
(((6))) (7) By December 1, 2014, the public safety review panel
shall report to the appropriate legislative committees the following:
(a) Whether the public safety review panel has observed a change in
statewide consistency of evaluations and decisions concerning changes
in the commitment status of persons found not guilty by reason of
insanity;
(b) Whether the public safety review panel should be given the
authority to make release decisions and monitor release conditions;
(c) Whether changes in the law are appropriate concerning persons
committed for an indefinite period under RCW 71.05.290(3); and
(d) Any other issues the public safety review panel deems relevant.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.05.235 and 2008 c 213 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((If an individual is referred to a designated mental health
professional under RCW 10.77.088(1)(b)(i),)) The designated mental
health professional shall ((examine the individual)) evaluate
individuals referred under RCW 10.77.088(1)(b)(i) within forty-eight
hours. ((If the designated mental health professional determines it is
not appropriate to detain the individual or petition for a ninety-day
less restrictive alternative under RCW 71.05.230(4), that decision
shall be immediately presented to the superior court for hearing. The
court shall hold a hearing to consider the decision of the designated
mental health professional not later than the next judicial day. At
the hearing the superior court shall review the determination of the
designated mental health professional and determine whether an order
should be entered requiring the person to be evaluated at an evaluation
and treatment facility. No person referred to an evaluation and
treatment facility may be held at the facility longer than seventy-two
hours.))
(2) If an individual is ((placed in)) sent to an evaluation and
treatment facility under RCW 10.77.088(1)(b)(ii), a professional person
shall evaluate the individual within seventy-two hours from admission
to the facility, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, for
purposes of ((determining whether to file a ninety-day inpatient or
outpatient petition under chapter 71.05 RCW. Before expiration of the
seventy-two hour evaluation period authorized under RCW
10.77.088(1)(b)(ii), the professional person shall file a petition or,
if the recommendation of the professional person is to release the
individual, present his or her recommendation to the superior court of
the county in which the criminal charge was dismissed. The superior
court shall review the recommendation not later than forty-eight hours,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, after the recommendation is
presented. If the court rejects the recommendation to unconditionally
release the individual, the court may order the individual detained at
a designated evaluation and treatment facility for not more than a
seventy-two hour evaluation and treatment period and direct the
individual to appear at a surety hearing before that court within
seventy-two hours, or the court may release the individual but direct
the individual to appear at a surety hearing set before that court
within eleven days, at which time the prosecutor may file a petition
under this chapter for ninety-day inpatient or outpatient treatment.
If a petition is filed by the prosecutor, the court may order that the
person named in the petition be detained at the evaluation and
treatment facility that performed the evaluation under this subsection
or order the respondent to be in outpatient treatment. If a petition
is filed but the individual fails to appear in court for the surety
hearing, the court shall order that a mental health professional or
peace officer shall take such person or cause such person to be taken
into custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment facility to be
brought before the court the next judicial day after detention. Upon
the individual's first appearance in court after a petition has been
filed, proceedings under RCW 71.05.310 and 71.05.320 shall commence.
For an individual subject to this subsection,)) filing a petition under
this chapter. The ((prosecutor or)) professional person may directly
file a petition for ((ninety-day inpatient or outpatient treatment and
no)) ninety days of treatment under RCW 71.05.280 without filing a
petition for initial detention or fourteen-day detention ((is required
before such a petition may be filed)).
((The court shall conduct the hearing on the petition filed under
this subsection within five judicial days of the date the petition is
filed. The court may continue the hearing upon the written request of
the person named in the petition or the person's attorney, for good
cause shown, which continuance shall not exceed five additional
judicial days. If the person named in the petition requests a jury
trial, the trial shall commence within ten judicial days of the date of
the filing of the petition. The burden of proof shall be by clear,
cogent, and convincing evidence and shall be upon the petitioner. The
person shall be present at such proceeding, which shall in all respects
accord with the constitutional guarantees of due process of law and the
rules of evidence pursuant to RCW 71.05.360 (8) and (9).
During the proceeding the person named in the petition shall
continue to be detained and treated until released by order of the
court. If no order has been made within thirty days after the filing
of the petition, not including any extensions of time requested by the
detained person or his or her attorney, the detained person shall be
released.
(3) If a designated mental health professional or the professional
person and prosecuting attorney for the county in which the criminal
charge was dismissed or attorney general, as appropriate, stipulate
that the individual does not present a likelihood of serious harm or is
not gravely disabled, the hearing under this section is not required
and the individual, if in custody, shall be released.
(4) The individual shall have the rights specified in RCW 71.05.360
(8) and (9).))

Sec. 6 RCW 71.05.280 and 2008 c 213 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
At the expiration of the fourteen-day period of intensive
treatment, a person may be confined for further treatment pursuant to
RCW 71.05.320 if:
(1) Such person after having been taken into custody for evaluation
and treatment has threatened, attempted, or inflicted: (a) Physical
harm upon the person of another or himself or herself, or substantial
damage upon the property of another, and (b) as a result of mental
disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm; or
(2) Such person was taken into custody as a result of conduct in
which he or she attempted or inflicted physical harm upon the person of
another or himself or herself, or substantial damage upon the property
of others, and continues to present, as a result of mental disorder, a
likelihood of serious harm; or
(3) Such person has been determined to be incompetent and criminal
charges have been dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4), and has
committed acts constituting a felony, and as a result of a mental
disorder, presents a substantial likelihood of repeating similar acts.
In any proceeding pursuant to this subsection it shall not be necessary
to show intent, willfulness, or state of mind as an element of the
crime, and the court shall further determine whether the dismissed
criminal charges include a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030, and
also determine whether the person has committed acts that would
constitute a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030; or
(4) Such person is gravely disabled.

Sec. 7 RCW 71.05.290 and 2009 c 217 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At any time during a person's fourteen day intensive treatment
period, the professional person in charge of a treatment facility or
his or her professional designee or the designated mental health
professional may petition the superior court for an order requiring
such person to undergo an additional period of treatment. Such
petition must be based on one or more of the grounds set forth in RCW
71.05.280.
(2) The petition shall summarize the facts which support the need
for further confinement and shall be supported by affidavits signed by:
(a) Two examining physicians;
(b) One examining physician and examining mental health
professional;
(c) Two psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners;
(d) One psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner and a
mental health professional; or
(e) An examining physician and an examining psychiatric advanced
registered nurse practitioner. The affidavits shall describe in detail
the behavior of the detained person which supports the petition and
shall explain what, if any, less restrictive treatments which are
alternatives to detention are available to such person, and shall state
the willingness of the affiant to testify to such facts in subsequent
judicial proceedings under this chapter.
(3) If a person has been determined to be incompetent pursuant to
RCW 10.77.086(4), then the professional person in charge of the
treatment facility or his or her professional designee or the
designated mental health professional may directly file a petition
((for one hundred eighty day treatment)) under RCW 71.05.280(3). The
length of commitment shall be for one hundred eighty days, or if the
court determines that the dismissed charges include a violent offense
under RCW 9.94A.030 and determines the person committed acts
constituting a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030, the commitment
shall last until such time as the person no longer meets grounds for
involuntary commitment, or until such a time as the commitment period
ends as provided in subsection (4) of this section. No petition for
initial detention or fourteen day detention is required before such a
petition may be filed.
(4) For a person committed for an indefinite period under RCW
71.05.280(3) based on dismissal of a violent offense under RCW
9.94A.030 and a determination that the person committed acts
constituting a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030, at the time of
commitment the court shall set a review date in one hundred eighty
days. The commitment shall end on the review date unless the
superintendent or professional person in charge of the facility or
designated mental health professional files a petition for review
alleging that the person continues to meet one or more of the grounds
for involuntary commitment specified in RCW 71.05.320(3). The petition
for review shall be submitted in the form specified in subsection (2)
of this section. The court shall approve the petition for review and
set a new review date in one hundred eighty days if the review petition
presents prima facie evidence that the person continues to meet one or
more grounds for commitment specified in RCW 71.05.320(3), except that
the court shall schedule a hearing as provided in RCW 71.05.310 if the
person presents proof that the person's condition has so changed that
the person no longer meets one or more of the grounds for involuntary
commitment. The person shall be entitled to counsel upon filing of a
petition for review under this subsection.

Sec. 8 RCW 71.05.320 and 2009 c 323 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW
71.05.280 have been proven and that the best interests of the person or
others will not be served by a less restrictive treatment which is an
alternative to detention, the court shall remand him or her to the
custody of the department or to a facility certified for ninety day
treatment by the department for a further period of intensive treatment
not to exceed ninety days from the date of judgment. If the grounds
set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the basis of commitment, then the
period of treatment ((may be up to but not exceed one hundred eighty
days from the date of judgment)) shall be for the time period specified
in RCW 71.05.290(3) in a facility certified for one hundred eighty day
treatment by the department.
(2) If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW
71.05.280 have been proven, but finds that treatment less restrictive
than detention will be in the best interest of the person or others,
then the court shall remand him or her to the custody of the department
or to a facility certified for ninety day treatment by the department
or to a less restrictive alternative for a further period of less
restrictive treatment not to exceed ninety days from the date of
judgment. If the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the basis
of commitment, then the period of treatment ((may be up to but not
exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment)) shall be for
the time period specified in RCW 71.05.290(3).
(3) The person shall be released from involuntary treatment at the
expiration of the period of commitment imposed under subsection (1) or
(2) of this section unless the superintendent or professional person in
charge of the facility in which he or she is confined, or in the event
of a less restrictive alternative, the designated mental health
professional, files a new petition for involuntary treatment on the
grounds that the committed person:
(a) During the current period of court ordered treatment: (i) Has
threatened, attempted, or inflicted physical harm upon the person of
another, or substantial damage upon the property of another, and (ii)
as a result of mental disorder or developmental disability presents a
likelihood of serious harm; or
(b) Was taken into custody as a result of conduct in which he or
she attempted or inflicted serious physical harm upon the person of
another, and continues to present, as a result of mental disorder or
developmental disability a likelihood of serious harm; or
(c) Is in custody pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) and as a result of
mental disorder ((or developmental disability)) presents a substantial
likelihood of repeating similar acts considering the charged criminal
behavior, life history, progress in treatment, and the public safety;
or
(d) Continues to be gravely disabled.
If the conduct required to be proven in (b) and (c) of this
subsection was found by a judge or jury in a prior trial under this
chapter, it shall not be necessary to prove such conduct again.
(4) For a person committed under subsection (2) of this section who
has been remanded to a period of less restrictive treatment, in
addition to the grounds specified in subsection (3) of this section,
the designated mental health professional may file a new petition for
continued less restrictive treatment if:
(a) The person was previously committed by a court to detention for
involuntary mental health treatment during the thirty-six months that
preceded the person's initial detention date during the current
involuntary commitment cycle, excluding any time spent in a mental
health facility or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;
(b) In view of the person's treatment history or current behavior,
the person is unlikely to voluntarily participate in outpatient
treatment without an order for less restrictive treatment; and
(c) Outpatient treatment that would be provided under a less
restrictive treatment order is necessary to prevent a relapse,
decompensation, or deterioration that is likely to result in the person
presenting a likelihood of serious harm or the person becoming gravely
disabled within a reasonably short period of time.
(5) A new petition for involuntary treatment filed under subsection
(3) or (4) of this section shall be filed and heard in the superior
court of the county of the facility which is filing the new petition
for involuntary treatment unless good cause is shown for a change of
venue. The cost of the proceedings shall be borne by the state.
(6) The hearing shall be held as provided in RCW 71.05.310, and if
the court or jury finds that the grounds for additional confinement as
set forth in this section are present, the court may order the
committed person returned for an additional period of treatment not to
exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment. At the end
of the one hundred eighty day period of commitment, the committed
person shall be released unless a petition for another one hundred
eighty day period of continued treatment is filed and heard in the same
manner as provided in this section. Successive one hundred eighty day
commitments are permissible on the same grounds and pursuant to the
same procedures as the original one hundred eighty day commitment.
However, a commitment is not permissible under subsection (4) of this
section if thirty-six months have passed since the last date of
discharge from detention for inpatient treatment that preceded the
current less restrictive alternative order, nor shall a commitment
under subsection (4) of this section be permissible if the likelihood
of serious harm in subsection (4)(c) of this section is based solely on
harm to the property of others.
(7) No person committed as provided in this section may be detained
unless a valid order of commitment is in effect. No order of
commitment can exceed one hundred eighty days in length, except as
provided in RCW 71.05.290(3).

Sec. 9 RCW 71.05.425 and 2011 c 305 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the
earliest possible date, and in no event later than thirty days before
conditional release, final release, authorized leave under RCW
71.05.325(2), or transfer to a facility other than a state mental
hospital, the superintendent shall send written notice of conditional
release, release, authorized leave, or transfer of a person committed
under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3)(c) following dismissal of a sex,
violent, or felony harassment offense pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4) to
the following:
(i) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the person
will reside; ((and))
(ii) The sheriff of the county in which the person will reside; and
(iii) The prosecuting attorney of the county in which the criminal
charges against the committed person were dismissed.
(b) The same notice as required by (a) of this subsection shall be
sent to the following, if such notice has been requested in writing
about a specific person committed under RCW 71.05.280(3) or
71.05.320(3)(c) following dismissal of a sex, violent, or felony
harassment offense pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4):
(i) The victim of the sex, violent, or felony harassment offense
that was dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4) preceding commitment
under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3)(c) or the victim's next of kin
if the crime was a homicide;
(ii) Any witnesses who testified against the person in any court
proceedings;
(iii) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney.
Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the
notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing by
the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the notice are
confidential and shall not be available to the person committed under
this chapter; and
(iv) The chief of police of the city, if any, and the sheriff of
the county, if any, which had jurisdiction of the person on the date of
the applicable offense.
(c) The thirty-day notice requirements contained in this subsection
shall not apply to emergency medical transfers.
(d) The existence of the notice requirements in this subsection
will not require any extension of the release date in the event the
release plan changes after notification.
(2) If a person committed under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3)(c)
following dismissal of a sex, violent, or felony harassment offense
pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4) escapes, the superintendent shall
immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means
available, the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the
county in which the person escaped and in which the person resided
immediately before the person's arrest and the prosecuting attorney of
the county in which the criminal charges against the committed person
were dismissed. If previously requested, the superintendent shall also
notify the witnesses and the victim of the sex, violent, or felony
harassment offense that was dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4)
preceding commitment under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3) or the
victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide. In addition, the
secretary shall also notify appropriate parties pursuant to RCW
71.05.390(18). If the person is recaptured, the superintendent shall
send notice to the persons designated in this subsection as soon as
possible but in no event later than two working days after the
department learns of such recapture.
(3) If the victim, the victim's next of kin, or any witness is
under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be
sent to the parent or legal guardian of the child.
(4) The superintendent shall send the notices required by this
chapter to the last address provided to the department by the
requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department
with a current address.
(5) For purposes of this section the following terms have the
following meanings:
(a) "Violent offense" means a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) "Sex offense" means a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030;
(c) "Next of kin" means a person's spouse, state registered
domestic partner, parents, siblings, and children;
(d) "Felony harassment offense" means a crime of harassment as
defined in RCW 9A.46.060 that is a felony.

Sec. 10 RCW 10.77.200 and 2010 c 263 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon application by the committed or conditionally released
person, the secretary shall determine whether or not reasonable grounds
exist for release. In making this determination, the secretary may
consider the reports filed under RCW 10.77.060, 10.77.110, 10.77.140,
and 10.77.160, and other reports and evaluations provided by
professionals familiar with the case. If the secretary approves the
release he or she then shall authorize the person to petition the
court.
(2) In instances in which persons have not made application for
release, but the secretary believes, after consideration of the reports
filed under RCW 10.77.060, 10.77.110, 10.77.140, and 10.77.160, and
other reports and evaluations provided by professionals familiar with
the case, that reasonable grounds exist for release, the secretary may
petition the court. If the secretary petitions the court for release
under this subsection, notice of the petition must be provided to the
person who is the subject of the petition and to his or her attorney.
(3) The petition shall be served upon the court and the prosecuting
attorney. The court, upon receipt of the petition for release, shall
within forty-five days order a hearing. Continuance of the hearing
date shall only be allowed for good cause shown. The prosecuting
attorney shall represent the state, and shall have the right to have
the ((petitioner)) person who is the subject of the petition examined
by an expert or professional person of the prosecuting attorney's
choice. If the secretary is the petitioner, the attorney general shall
represent the secretary. If the ((petitioner)) person who is the
subject of the petition is indigent, and the person so requests, the
court shall appoint a qualified expert or professional person to
examine him or her. If the ((petitioner)) person who is the subject of
the petition has a developmental disability, the examination shall be
performed by a developmental disabilities professional. The hearing
shall be before a jury if demanded by either the petitioner or the
prosecuting attorney. The burden of proof shall be upon the petitioner
to show by a preponderance of the evidence that the ((petitioner))
person who is the subject of the petition no longer presents, as a
result of a mental disease or defect, a substantial danger to other
persons, or a substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts
jeopardizing public safety or security, unless kept under further
control by the court or other persons or institutions. If the person
who is the subject of the petition will be transferred to a state
correctional institution or facility upon release to serve a sentence
for any class A felony, the petitioner must show that the person's
mental disease or defect is manageable within a state correctional
institution or facility, but must not be required to prove that the
person does not present either a substantial danger to other persons,
or a substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing
public safety or security, if released.
(4) For purposes of this section, a person affected by a mental
disease or defect in a state of remission is considered to have a
mental disease or defect requiring supervision when the disease may,
with reasonable medical probability, occasionally become active and,
when active, render the person a danger to others. Upon a finding that
the ((petitioner)) person who is the subject of the petition has a
mental disease or defect in a state of remission under this subsection,
the court may deny release, or place or continue such a person on
conditional release.
(5) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the patient
from petitioning the court for release or conditional release from the
institution in which he or she is committed. The petition shall be
served upon the court, the prosecuting attorney, and the secretary.
Upon receipt of such petition, the secretary shall develop a
recommendation as provided in subsection (1) of this section and
provide the secretary's recommendation to all parties and the court.
The issue to be determined on such proceeding is whether the
((petitioner)) patient, as a result of a mental disease or defect, is
a substantial danger to other persons, or presents a substantial
likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or
security, unless kept under further control by the court or other
persons or institutions.
(6) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the committed
person from petitioning for release by writ of habeas corpus.

Sec. 11 RCW 10.77.065 and 2012 c 256 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a)(i) The expert conducting the evaluation shall provide his or
her report and recommendation to the court in which the criminal
proceeding is pending. For a competency evaluation of a defendant who
is released from custody, if the evaluation cannot be completed within
twenty-one days due to a lack of cooperation by the defendant, the
evaluator shall notify the court that he or she is unable to complete
the evaluation because of such lack of cooperation.
(ii) A copy of the report and recommendation shall be provided to
the designated mental health professional, the prosecuting attorney,
the defense attorney, and the professional person at the local
correctional facility where the defendant is being held, or if there is
no professional person, to the person designated under (a)(iv) of this
subsection. Upon request, the evaluator shall also provide copies of
any source documents relevant to the evaluation to the designated
mental health professional.
(iii) Any facility providing inpatient services related to
competency shall discharge the defendant as soon as the facility
determines that the defendant is competent to stand trial. Discharge
shall not be postponed during the writing and distribution of the
evaluation report. Distribution of an evaluation report by a facility
providing inpatient services shall ordinarily be accomplished within
two working days or less following the final evaluation of the
defendant. If the defendant is discharged to the custody of a local
correctional facility, the local correctional facility must continue
the medication regimen prescribed by the facility, when clinically
appropriate, unless the defendant refuses to cooperate with medication.
(iv) If there is no professional person at the local correctional
facility, the local correctional facility shall designate a
professional person as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in cooperation with
the regional support network, a professional person at the regional
support network to receive the report and recommendation.
(v) Upon commencement of a defendant's evaluation in the local
correctional facility, the local correctional facility must notify the
evaluator of the name of the professional person, or person designated
under (a)(iv) of this subsection, to receive the report and
recommendation.
(b) If the evaluator concludes, under RCW 10.77.060(3)(f), the
person should be evaluated by a designated mental health professional
under chapter 71.05 RCW, the court shall order such evaluation be
conducted prior to release from confinement when the person is
acquitted or convicted and sentenced to confinement for twenty-four
months or less, or when charges are dismissed pursuant to a finding of
incompetent to stand trial.
(2) The designated mental health professional shall provide written
notification within twenty-four hours of the results of the
determination whether to commence proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.
The notification shall be provided to the persons identified in
subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(3) The prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the results of
any proceedings commenced by the designated mental health professional
under subsection (2) of this section to the secretary.
(4) A facility, designated mental health professional, or
professional person conducting a civil commitment evaluation under RCW
10.77.086(4) or 10.77.088(1)(b)(ii) that makes a determination to
release the person instead of filing a civil commitment petition must
provide written notification to the prosecuting attorney and defense
attorney within twenty-four hours of the determination.
(5) The fact of admission and all information and records compiled,
obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services under this
chapter may also be disclosed to the courts solely to prevent the entry
of any evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any
order entered under chapter 71.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---