BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.56.350 and 2009 c 431 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of organized retail theft if he or she:
(a) Commits theft of property with a value of at least seven
hundred fifty dollars from a mercantile establishment with an
accomplice;
(b) Possesses stolen property, as defined in RCW 9A.56.140, with a
value of at least seven hundred fifty dollars from a mercantile
establishment with an accomplice; ((or))
(c) Commits theft of property with a cumulative value of at least
seven hundred fifty dollars from one or more mercantile establishments
within a period of up to one hundred eighty days; or
(d) Commits theft of property with a cumulative value of at least
five hundred dollars from a mercantile establishment with no less than
six accomplices and makes or receives at least one electronic
communication seeking participation in the theft in the course of
planning or commission of the theft. For the purposes of this
subsection, "electronic communication" has the same meaning as defined
in RCW 9.61.260(5).
(2) A person is guilty of organized retail theft in the first
degree if the property stolen or possessed has a value of five thousand
dollars or more. Organized retail theft in the first degree is a class
B felony.
(3) A person is guilty of organized retail theft in the second
degree if the property stolen or possessed has a value of at least
seven hundred fifty dollars, but less than five thousand dollars.
Organized retail theft in the second degree is a class C felony.
(4) A first offense of organized retail theft under subsection
(1)(d) of this section is a gross misdemeanor. A second or subsequent
offense of organized retail theft under subsection (1)(d) of this
section is a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.
(5) For purposes of this section, a series of thefts committed by
the same person from one or more mercantile establishments over a
period of one hundred eighty days may be aggregated in one count and
the sum of the value of all the property shall be the value considered
in determining the degree of the organized retail theft involved.
Thefts committed by the same person in different counties that have
been aggregated in one county may be prosecuted in any county in which
any one of the thefts occurred. For purposes of subsection (1)(d) of
this section, thefts committed by the principal and accomplices may be
aggregated into one count and the value of all the property shall be
the value considered in determining the degree of organized retail
theft involved.
(((5))) (6) The mercantile establishment or establishments whose
property is alleged to have been stolen may request that the charge be
aggregated with other thefts of property about which the mercantile
establishment or establishments is aware. In the event a request to
aggregate the prosecution is declined, the mercantile establishment or
establishments shall be promptly advised by the prosecuting
jurisdiction making the decision to decline aggregating the prosecution
of the decision and the reasons for such decision.

--- END ---