BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that postsecondary
education helps individuals to become productive and contributing
members of society, and that individuals with disabilities are equally
benefited by obtaining postsecondary education. The legislature also
finds that students with disabilities face a disproportionate number of
challenges when transitioning to postsecondary education, and that
people who have disabilities are less than half as likely to have a
baccalaureate degree compared to people who do not have a disability.
The legislature finds it is incumbent upon the state to address these
challenges in order to provide all students in Washington state with an
equal opportunity to pursue a successful future.
In calling together a diverse group of experts from throughout the
state, the legislature intends to develop recommendations that will
directly increase the success rate for students with disabilities who
are transitioning from secondary to postsecondary education, which are
distinctively different parts of the educational system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A legislative task force on improving
access to higher education for students with disabilities is
established.
(2) The task force must collaborate to carry out the following
goals:
(a) Make the transition from K-12 education to higher education
more seamless and successful;
(b) Select a statewide method of sharing best practices between and
among K-12 education institutions and postsecondary education
institutions;
(c) Review documentation of disabilities at postsecondary education
institutions, including developing resources for how school districts,
in collaboration with students and their families, can get disability
documentation applicable for postsecondary education institutions
completed before a student's high school graduation; and
(d) Create a plan for how school districts and postsecondary
education institutions can improve outreach to students and their
families regarding available options in higher education.
(3) The task force must consist of not more than twenty-nine
members and must include the following members:
(a) Seven members appointed by the governor as follows:
(i) Four private citizens with experience advocating and providing
services for students with disabilities, at least one of whom must
currently be or who in the past was a parent of a student with a
disability, at least one of whom must be a current student at a
postsecondary education institution in Washington, and at least one of
whom must have experience advocating for veterans with disabilities;
and
(ii) Three representatives from nonprofit organizations focused on
advocating for citizens with disabilities or providing services for
citizens with disabilities, or both;
(b) Eight members appointed by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction as follows:
(i) Two representatives from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction;
(ii) Two representatives from educational service districts; and
(iii) Four representatives from local school districts that have
high concentrations of students with disabilities enrolled in the
district;
(c) Four members appointed by the state board for community and
technical colleges as follows:
(i) One representative from the state board for community and
technical colleges; and
(ii) Three representatives from public community or technical
colleges;
(d) Four members appointed by the council of presidents, including
one representative from the council and three representatives from a
regional university as defined in RCW 28B.10.016;
(e) One member appointed by the superintendent of the state school
for the blind, from the state school for the blind;
(f) One member appointed by the secretary of the department of
social and health services, from the department of social and health
services;
(g) One member appointed by the executive secretary of the
governor's committee on disability issues and employment, from the
governor's committee on disability issues and employment;
(h) One member appointed by the chair of the developmental
disabilities council, from the developmental disabilities council;
(i) One member appointed by the superintendent of the state school
for the deaf, from the state school for the deaf; and
(j) One member appointed by the workforce training and education
coordinating board, from the workforce training and education
coordinating board.
(4) The purpose of the task force is to make recommendations to the
legislature and to coordinate and implement the goals in subsection (2)
of this section.
(5)(a) When making the recommendations regarding subsection (2)(a)
of this section, the task force must consider:
(i) How to ensure students' interests, goals, and strengths guide
the transition planning process;
(ii) How to enable collaboration and communication between and
among schools, institutions of higher education, and relevant state
agencies to provide an effective transition;
(iii) How assessment and disability documentation that is
acceptable to postsecondary institutions should best be determined and
obtained;
(iv) How to identify the types of supports and accommodations that
students will need in postsecondary environments;
(v) How students can plan their high school coursework to
sufficiently prepare for the higher education environment; and
(vi) If a statewide database of student disability accommodation
equipment, software, and resources owned by school districts and
postsecondary education institutions should be created to assist
students' educational transitions and, if created, what public entity
is best suited to be responsible for the creation, maintenance, and the
scope of that database.
(b) When making recommendations regarding subsection (2)(c) of this
section, the task force is encouraged to consider:
(i) What should constitute a proper and complete documentation of
a disability;
(ii) How recently the documentation must have been completed; and
(iii) Which testing information, if any, must be included in the
documentation.
(6) The student achievement council must provide staff support to
the task force within existing funds. The task force is encouraged to
use technology to expand access and limit costs.
(7) The task force shall report its recommendations for each goal
to the legislature by December 1, 2013, and annually each December 1st
thereafter until expiration of the task force.
(8) This section expires January 1, 2016.

--- END ---