BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.76.010 and 2007 c 65 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Comestible" means edible.
(2) "Commercial decabromo diphenyl ether" or "commercial deca-bde"
means the chemical mixture of decabromo diphenyl ether, including
associated polybrominated diphenyl ether impurities not intentionally
added.
(3) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(4) "Electronic enclosure" means the plastic housing that encloses
the components of electronic products, including but not limited to
televisions and computers.
(5) "Manufacturer" means any person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint
venture that produces a product containing:
(a) A flame retardant or an importer or domestic distributor of a
product containing a flame retardant; or
(b) Polybrominated diphenyl ethers or an importer or domestic
distributor of a noncomestible product containing polybrominated
diphenyl ethers. A manufacturer does not include a retailer who:
(((a))) (i) Adds a private label brand or cobrands a product for
sale; or
(((b))) (ii) Assembles components to create a single noncomestible
product based on an individual consumer preference.
(6) "Mattress" has the same meaning as defined by the United States
consumer product safety commission in 16 C.F.R. Part 1633 (2007) as it
existed on July 22, 2007, and includes mattress sets, box springs,
futons, crib mattresses, and youth mattresses. "Mattress" includes
mattress pads.
(7) "Medical device" means an instrument, machine, implant, or
diagnostic test used to help diagnose a disease or other condition or
to cure, treat, or prevent disease.
(8) "Polybrominated diphenyl ethers" or "PBDEs" means chemical
forms that consist of diphenyl ethers bound with bromine atoms.
Polybrominated diphenyl ethers include, but are not limited to, the
three primary forms of the commercial mixtures known as pentabromo
diphenyl ether (penta-bde), octabromo diphenyl ether (octa-bde), and
decabromo diphenyl ether (deca-bde).
(9) "Residential upholstered furniture" means residential seating
products intended for indoor use in a home or other dwelling intended
for residential occupancy that consists in whole or in part of
resilient cushioning materials enclosed within a covering consisting of
fabric or related materials, if the resilient cushioning materials are
sold with the item of upholstered furniture and the upholstered
furniture is constructed with a contiguous upholstered seat and back
that may include arms.
(10) "Retailer" means a person who offers a product for sale at
retail through any means including, but not limited to, remote
offerings such as sales outlets, catalogs, or the internet, but does
not include a sale that is a wholesale transaction with a distributor
or a retailer. A retailer does not include a person, firm,
association, partnership, corporation, governmental entity,
organization, or joint venture that both manufactures and sells a
product at retail.
(11) "Technically feasible" means an alternative that is available
at a cost and in sufficient quantity to permit the manufacturer to
produce an economically viable product.
(12) "Transportation vehicle" means a mechanized vehicle that is
used to transport goods or people including, but not limited to,
airplanes, automobiles, motorcycles, trucks, buses, trains, boats,
ships, streetcars, or monorail cars.
(13) "TRIS" means either TDCPP (tris(1,3-dichloro-2-propyl)phosphate), chemical abstracts service number 13674-87-8, as of
the effective date of this section, or TCEP (tris(2-chloroethyl)
phosphate), chemical abstracts service number 115-96-8, as of the
effective date of this section, or both.
(14) "Alternative" means a substitute process, product, material,
chemical, strategy, or combination of these that serve a functionally
equivalent purpose to a chemical in a children's product or residential
upholstered furniture.
(15) "Flame retardant" means a chemical or chemicals intentionally
added to a product or product component where the functional use is to
inhibit or resist the spread of fire.
(16) "Product component" means a uniquely identifiable material or
coating, including ink or dye, that is intended to be included as part
of a finished product.
(17) "Greenscreen" means a method for comparative chemical hazard
assessment, version 1.2 as of 2012 and benchmarks version 1.2 as of
October 2011, developed by clean production action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.76 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2014, no manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer
may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale,
or distribute for use in this state residential upholstered furniture
or children's products, as regulated under chapter 70.240 RCW,
containing TRIS in amounts greater than fifty parts per million in any
product component.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.76 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2015, no manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer
may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale or
distribute for use in this state, residential upholstered furniture or
children's products, as regulated under chapter 70.240 RCW, containing
a flame retardant in amounts greater than fifty parts per million
identified by the department as a high priority chemical of high
concern for children as required under RCW 70.240.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except for TRIS or PBDEs restricted under this chapter, the
department shall grant an exemption to restrictions under section 3 of
this act for a length of time requested by the manufacturer, but not to
exceed two years, if the manufacturer of residential upholstered
furniture or children's products demonstrates that there is no
technically feasible safer alternative to meet applicable Washington
state or federal fire safety standards.
(2) A manufacturer of residential upholstered furniture or
children's products may request an exemption to the restrictions of
using high priority chemicals of high concern for children when the
manufacturer demonstrates there is no technically feasible safer
alternative to meet applicable Washington state or federal fire safety
standards. A technically feasible safer alternative may not include
any unspecified or benchmark 1 chemicals as identified by greenscreen.
The request for exemption must include:
(a) Information on the specific chemical, including the chemical
abstracts service number, and nonchemical alternatives considered in
lieu of the use of the high priority chemical of high concern for
children;
(b) A description of why the high priority chemical of high concern
for children must be used;
(c) A description of why there is no technically feasible
alternative to meet fire safety standards; and
(d) An evaluation of alternatives using greenscreen.
(3) The department shall provide technical assistance to
manufacturers requesting assistance with completing an evaluation of
alternatives as required under subsection (2)(d) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2015, at the request of the department, a
manufacturer of residential upholstered furniture or children's
products shall, within sixty days of the request, submit a certificate
of compliance stating that the product or product component meets the
requirements of section 3 of this act. A manufacturer required under
any other state statute to provide a certificate of compliance may
develop one certificate containing all required information.
(2) The certificate of compliance must include the following:
(a) Chemical names and chemical abstracts service registry numbers
for all chemicals present in the product or product component that act
as flame retardants;
(b) The specific basis upon which an exemption, if applicable, is
claimed; and
(c) The signature of an authorized official of the manufacturing
company.
(3) A manufacturer completing a certificate of compliance shall
keep a copy of the certificate on file for as long as the product or
product component contains flame retardants. If a manufacturer ceases
to sell or distribute products or product components containing flame
retardants, the manufacturer must retain the certificate on file for
three years from the date of the last sale or distribution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 70.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In submitting data required by this chapter, a manufacturer of
residential upholstered furniture or children's products may:
(a) Mark clearly any portions that, in the manufacturer's opinion,
are trade secrets or commercial or financial information; and
(b) Submit these marked materials separately from other material
required to be submitted under section 4 or 5 of this act.
(2) Upon the director's determination that the information is
privileged or confidential, the department must follow procedures for
release of information as provided under RCW 43.21A.160.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.76.070 and 2007 c 65 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
A manufacturer of products containing PBDEs ((that are)), TRIS, or
flame retardants restricted under this chapter must notify persons that
sell the manufacturer's products in this state about the provisions of
this chapter no less than ninety days prior to the effective date of
the restrictions.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.76.100 and 2007 c 65 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Enforcement of this chapter must rely on notification and
information exchange between the department and manufacturers. The
department shall achieve compliance with this chapter using the
following enforcement sequence: (((a))) Before the effective date of
the product prohibition in RCW 70.76.020 ((or)), 70.76.030, or section
2 of this act, the department shall prepare and distribute information
to in-state manufacturers and out-of-state manufacturers, to the
maximum extent practicable, to assist them in identifying products
prohibited for manufacture, sale, or distribution under this chapter.
(((b) The department may request a certificate of compliance from
a manufacturer. A certificate of compliance attests that a
manufacturer's product or products meets the requirements of this
chapter.)) (2)(a) Beginning January 1, 2015, the department may require
a manufacturer to provide a certificate of compliance stating the
product is in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.
(b) The department must provide manufacturers sixty days to submit
a certificate of compliance.
(c) The department may issue a warning letter to a manufacturer
that produces, sells, or distributes prohibited products in violation
of this chapter. The department shall offer information or other
appropriate assistance to the manufacturer in complying with this
chapter. If, after one year, compliance is not achieved, penalties may
be assessed under subsection (((3))) (4) of this section.
(((2))) (3) A manufacturer that knowingly produces, sells, or
distributes a product prohibited from manufacture, sale, or
distribution in this state under this chapter shall recall the product
and reimburse the retailer or any other purchaser for the product and
any applicable shipping and handling for returning the products.
(((3))) (4) A manufacturer of products containing ((PBDEs)) flame
retardants in violation of this chapter is subject to a civil penalty
not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation in the case of a
first offense. Manufacturers who are repeat violators are subject to
a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars for each repeat
offense. Penalties collected under this section must be deposited in
the state toxics control account created in RCW 70.l05D.070.
(5) Retailers who unknowingly sell products that are restricted
from sale under this chapter are not liable under this chapter.
(6) The sale or purchase of any previously owned product containing
a chemical restricted under this chapter made in casual or isolated
sales as defined in RCW 82.04.040, or by a nonprofit organization, is
exempt from sections 2 and 3 of this act.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.240.030 and 2008 c 288 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) By January 1, 2009,)) The department, in consultation with
the department of health, shall identify high priority chemicals that
are of high concern for children after considering a child's or
developing fetus's potential for exposure to each chemical. ((In
identifying the chemicals,)) The department may add chemicals to or
delete chemicals from the list of high priority chemicals of high
concern for children using the procedures of chapter 34.05 RCW. When
making a determination regarding a chemical, the department shall
include chemicals that meet one or more of the following criteria:
(((a))) (1) The chemical has been found through biomonitoring
studies that demonstrate the presence of the chemical in human
umbilical cord blood, human breast milk, human urine, or other bodily
tissues or fluids;
(((b))) (2) The chemical has been found through sampling and
analysis to be present in household dust, indoor air, drinking water,
or elsewhere in the home environment; or
(((c))) (3) The chemical has been added to or is present in a
consumer product used or present in the home.
(((2) By January 1, 2009, the department shall identify children's
products or product categories that may contain chemicals identified
under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) By January 1, 2009, the department shall submit a report on the
chemicals of high concern to children and the children's products or
product categories they identify to the appropriate standing committees
of the legislature. The report shall include policy options for
addressing children's products that contain chemicals of high concern
for children, including recommendations for additional ways to inform
consumers about toxic chemicals in products, such as labeling.))

--- END ---