BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 62A.9A-502 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(a) Sufficiency of financing statement. Subject to subsection (b)
of this section, a financing statement is sufficient only if it:
(1) Provides the name of the debtor;
(2) Provides the name of the secured party or a representative of
the secured party; and
(3) Indicates the collateral covered by the financing statement.
(b) Real-property-related financing statements. Except as
otherwise provided in RCW 62A.9A-501(b), to be sufficient, a financing
statement that covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut, or
which is filed as a fixture filing and covers goods that are or are to
become fixtures, must satisfy subsection (a) of this section and also:
(1) Indicate that it covers this type of collateral;
(2) Indicate that it is to be filed for record in the real property
records;
(3) Provide a description of the real property to which the
collateral is related sufficient to give constructive notice of a
mortgage under the law of this state if the description were contained
in a record of the mortgage of the real property; and
(4) If the debtor does not have an interest of record in the real
property, provide the name of a record owner.
(c) Record of mortgage as financing statement. A record of a
mortgage is effective, from the date of recording, as a financing
statement filed as a fixture filing or as a financing statement
covering as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut only if:
(1) The record indicates the goods or accounts that it covers;
(2) The goods are or are to become fixtures related to the real
property described in the record or the collateral is related to the
real property described in the record and is as-extracted collateral or
timber to be cut;
(3) The record satisfies the requirements for a financing statement
in this section ((other than an indication that it is to be filed in
the real property records)), but: (A) The record need not indicate
that it is to be filed in the real property records; and (B) the record
sufficiently provides the name of a debtor who is an individual if it
provides the individual name of the debtor or the surname and personal
name of the debtor, even if the debtor is an individual to whom RCW
62A.9A-503(a)(4) applies; and
(4) The record is recorded.
(d) Filing before security agreement or attachment. A financing
statement may be filed before a security agreement is made or a
security interest otherwise attaches.

Sec. 2 RCW 62A.9A-503 and 2011 c 74 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(a) Sufficiency of debtor's name. A financing statement
sufficiently provides the name of the debtor:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in (3) of this subsection (a), if
the debtor is a registered organization or the collateral is held in a
trust that is a registered organization, only if the financing
statement provides the name that is stated to be the registered
organization's name on the public organic record most recently filed
with or issued or enacted by the registered organization's jurisdiction
of organization which purports to state, amend, or restate the
registered organization's name;
(2) Subject to subsection (f) of this section, if the collateral is
being administered by the personal representative of a decedent, only
if the financing statement provides, as the name of the debtor, the
name of the decedent and, in a separate part of the financing
statement, indicates that the collateral is being administered by a
personal representative;
(3) If the collateral is held in a trust that is not a registered
organization, only if the financing statement:
(A) Provides, as the name of the debtor:
(i) If the organic record of the trust specifies a name for the
trust, the name specified; or
(ii) If the organic record of the trust does not specify a name for
the trust, the name of the settlor or testator; and
(B) In a separate part of the financing statement:
(i) If the name is provided in accordance with (3)(A)(i) of this
subsection, indicates that the collateral is held in a trust; or
(ii) If the name is provided in accordance with (3)(A)(ii) of this
subsection, provides additional information sufficient to distinguish
the trust from other trusts having one or more of the same settlors or
the same testator and indicates that the collateral is held in a trust,
unless the additional information so indicates;
(4) Subject to subsection (g) of this section, if the debtor is an
individual to whom this state has issued a driver's license or
identification card that has not expired, only if the financing
statement((:
(A) Provides the individual name of the debtor;
(B) Provides the surname and first personal name of the debtor; or
(C) Subject to subsection (g) of this section,)) provides the name
of the individual which is indicated on a driver's license or
identification card ((that this state has issued to the individual and
which has not expired)); ((and))
(5) If the debtor is an individual to whom (4) of this subsection
does not apply, only if the financing statement provides the individual
name of the debtor or the surname and first personal name of the
debtor; and
(6) In other cases:
(A) If the debtor has a name, only if the financing statement
provides the organizational name of the debtor; and
(B) If the debtor does not have a name, only if the financing
statement provides the names of the partners, members, associates, or
other persons comprising the debtor, in a manner that each name
provided would be sufficient if the person named were the debtor.
(b) Additional debtor-related information. A financing statement
that provides the name of the debtor in accordance with subsection (a)
of this section is not rendered ineffective by the absence of:
(1) A trade name or other name of the debtor; or
(2) Unless required under subsection (a)(((5))) (6)(B) of this
section, names of partners, members, associates, or other persons
comprising the debtor.
(c) Debtor's trade name insufficient. A financing statement that
provides only the debtor's trade name does not sufficiently provide the
name of the debtor.
(d) Representative capacity. Failure to indicate the
representative capacity of a secured party or representative of a
secured party does not affect the sufficiency of a financing statement.
(e) Multiple debtors and secured parties. A financing statement
may provide the name of more than one debtor and the name of more than
one secured party.
(f) Name of decedent. The name of the decedent indicated on the
order appointing the personal representative of the decedent issued by
the court having jurisdiction over the collateral is sufficient as the
"name of the decedent" under subsection (a)(2) of this section.
(g) Multiple driver's licenses. If this state has issued to an
individual more than one driver's license or identification card of a
kind described in subsection (a)(4) of this section, the one that was
issued most recently is the one to which subsection (a)(4) of this
section refers.
(h) Definition. In this section, the "name of the settlor or
testator" means:
(1) If the settlor is a registered organization, the name that is
stated to be the settlor's name on the public organic record most
recently filed with or issued or enacted by the settlor's jurisdiction
of organization which purports to state, amend, or restate the
settlor's name; or
(2) In other cases, the name of the settlor or testator indicated
in the trust's organic record.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---