BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.10.220 and 2007 c 494 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board is created in the department of ((general
administration)) enterprise services to provide an evaluation of public
capital projects construction processes, including the impact of
contracting methods on project outcomes, and to advise the legislature
on policies related to public works delivery methods.
(2)(a) The board shall consist of the following members appointed
by the governor: Two representatives from construction general
contracting; one representative from the architectural profession; one
representative from the engineering profession; two representatives
from construction specialty subcontracting; two representatives from
construction trades labor organizations; one representative from the
office of minority and women's business enterprises; one representative
from a higher education institution; one representative from the
department of ((general administration)) enterprise services; two
representatives from private industry; and one representative of a
domestic insurer authorized to write surety bonds for contractors in
Washington state. All appointed members must be knowledgeable about
public works contracting procedures.
(b) ((Three)) Four members shall be positions representing
different local public owners, selected by the association of
Washington cities, the Washington state association of counties,
((and)) the Washington public ports association, and regional transit
authorities, respectively.
(c) ((One member shall be a representative from the public hospital
districts, selected by the association of Washington public hospital
districts.
(d))) One member shall be a representative from school districts,
selected by the Washington state school directors' association.
(((e))) (d) The board shall include two members of the house of
representatives, one from each major caucus, appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives, and two members of the senate, one
from each major caucus, appointed by the president of the senate.
Legislative members are nonvoting.
(3) Members selected under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall
serve for terms of four years, with the terms expiring on June 30th on
the fourth year of the term.
(4) The board chair is selected from among the appointed members by
the majority vote of the voting members.
(5) Legislative members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members of
the board, project review committee members, and subcommittee chairs
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.
(6) If a vacancy occurs of the appointive members of the board, the
governor shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term. Members of the
board may be removed for malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon
specific written charges by the governor, under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(7) The board shall meet as often as necessary.
(8) Board members are expected to consistently attend board
meetings. The chair of the board may ask the governor to remove any
member who misses more than two meetings in any calendar year without
cause.
(9) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services shall provide staff support as may be required for the proper
discharge of the function of the board.
(10) The board may establish subcommittees as it desires and may
invite nonmembers of the board to serve as committee members.
(11) The board shall encourage participation from persons and
entities not represented on the board.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.131.407 and 2007 c 494 s 506 are each amended to
read as follows:
The alternative (([public])) public works contracting procedures
under chapter 39.10 RCW shall be terminated June 30, ((2013)) 2021, as
provided in RCW 43.131.408.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.131.408 and 2012 c 102 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, ((2014)) 2022:
(1) RCW 39.10.200 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 2, 2007 c 494 s 1, &
1994 c 132 s 1;
(2) RCW 39.10.210 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6014, 2007 c 494 s 101,
& 2005 c 469 s 3;
(3) RCW 39.10.220 and 2013 c . . . s 1 (section 1 of this act),
2007 c 494 s 102, & 2005 c 377 s 1;
(4) RCW 39.10.230 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 3, 2009 c 75 s 1, 2007
c 494 s 103, & 2005 c 377 s 2;
(5) RCW 39.10.240 and 2007 c 494 s 104;
(6) RCW 39.10.250 and 2009 c 75 s 2 & 2007 c 494 s 105;
(7) RCW 39.10.260 and 2007 c 494 s 106;
(8) RCW 39.10.270 and 2009 c 75 s 3 & 2007 c 494 s 107;
(9) RCW 39.10.280 and 2007 c 494 s 108;
(10) RCW 39.10.290 and 2007 c 494 s 109;
(11) RCW 39.10.300 and 2009 c 75 s 4 & 2007 c 494 s 201;
(12) RCW 39.10.320 and 2007 c 494 s 203 & 1994 c 132 s 7;
(13) RCW 39.10.330 and 2009 c 75 s 5 & 2007 c 494 s 204;
(14) RCW 39.10.340 and 2007 c 494 s 301;
(15) RCW 39.10.350 and 2007 c 494 s 302;
(16) RCW 39.10.360 and 2009 c 75 s 6 & 2007 c 494 s 303;
(17) RCW 39.10.370 and 2007 c 494 s 304;
(18) RCW 39.10.380 and 2007 c 494 s 305;
(19) RCW 39.10.385 and 2010 c 163 s 1;
(20) RCW 39.10.390 and 2007 c 494 s 306;
(21) RCW 39.10.400 and 2007 c 494 s 307;
(22) RCW 39.10.410 and 2007 c 494 s 308;
(23) RCW 39.10.420 and 2012 c 102 s 1, 2009 c 75 s 7, 2007 c 494 s
401, & 2003 c 301 s 1;
(24) RCW 39.10.430 and 2007 c 494 s 402;
(25) RCW 39.10.440 and 2007 c 494 s 403;
(26) RCW 39.10.450 and 2012 c 102 s 2 & 2007 c 494 s 404;
(27) RCW 39.10.460 and 2012 c 102 s 3 & 2007 c 494 s 405;
(28) RCW 39.10.470 and 2005 c 274 s 275 & 1994 c 132 s 10;
(29) RCW 39.10.480 and 1994 c 132 s 9;
(30) RCW 39.10.490 and 2007 c 494 s 501 & 2001 c 328 s 5;
(31) RCW 39.10.500 and 2007 c 494 s 502;
(32) RCW 39.10.510 and 2007 c 494 s 503;
(33) RCW 39.10.900 and 1994 c 132 s 13;
(34) RCW 39.10.901 and 1994 c 132 s 14;
(35) RCW 39.10.903 and 2007 c 494 s 510;
(36) RCW 39.10.904 and 2007 c 494 s 512; and
(37) RCW 39.10.905 and 2007 c 494 s 513.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 30, 2013.

--- END ---