BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person with a valid limited energy system electrician
certificate or a valid telecommunications electrician certificate may
obtain an endorsement from the department allowing the person to
install, maintain, replace, or repair photovoltaic electrical systems.
(2) In order to obtain the endorsement, the person must provide the
department with proof of photovoltaic installer certification by the
North American board of certified energy practitioners or an equivalent
certification board.
(3) The scope of work under a photovoltaic electrical system
endorsement is limited to the installation, maintenance, replacement,
and repair of photovoltaic electrical systems that generate a maximum
of ninety volts and twenty-five kilowatts of power, and includes all
electrical wiring and electrical equipment used to create or convey
photovoltaic energy up to and including the inverter.
(4) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---