BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The intent of the legislature is to
facilitate the transition of the state's efforts from gray wolf
recovery to management as wolf recovery objectives are reached.
Listing the gray wolf as a statutory "game species" does not negatively
impact the current endangered classification of the gray wolf by the
Washington department of fish and wildlife. Listing the gray wolf as
a "game species" positions Washington to use proven population control
management tools that have been utilized by our neighboring regions as
they have navigated through the wolf recovery process. The lessons
learned by other states and provinces have suggested it is better to
have a management framework in place before recovery objectives are
achieved. This allows for a more seamless transition to minimize
unnecessary losses to local industries, unwanted threats to public
safety, or negative impacts to wildlife populations and ecosystems.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.36.010 and 2009 c 521 s 184 and 2009 c 333 s 54 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Claim" means an application to the department for compensation
under this chapter.
(2) "Commercial crop" means a horticultural or agricultural
product, including the growing or harvested product. For the purposes
of this chapter all parts of horticultural trees shall be considered a
commercial crop and shall be eligible for claims.
(3) "((Commercial)) Livestock" means cattle, sheep, and horses
((held or raised by a person for sale)).
(4) "Compensation" means a cash payment, materials, or service.
(5) "Damage" means economic losses caused by wildlife interactions.
(6) "Immediate family member" means spouse, state registered
domestic partner, brother, sister, grandparent, parent, child, or
grandchild.
(7) "Owner" means a person who has a legal right to commercial
crops, ((commercial)) livestock, or other property that was damaged
during a wildlife interaction.
(8) "Wildlife interaction" means the negative interaction and the
resultant damage between wildlife and commercial crops, ((commercial))
livestock, or other property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may pay no more than fifty thousand dollars per
fiscal year from the state wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170
for claims and assessment costs for injury or loss of livestock caused
by wolves submitted under RCW 77.36.100.
(2) Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, the
department may also accept and expend money from other sources to
address injury or loss of livestock or other property caused by wolves
consistent with the requirements on that source of funding.
(3) If any wildlife account expenditures authorized under
subsection (1) of this section are unspent as of June 30th of a fiscal
year, the state treasurer shall transfer the unspent amount to the
wolf-livestock conflict account created in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The wolf-livestock conflict account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. Any transfers under section 3 of this act must
be deposited in the account. The department may also deposit into the
account any grants, gifts, or donations to the state for the purposes
of providing compensation for injury or loss of livestock caused by
wolves. Consistent with this chapter, expenditures from the account
may be used only for mitigation, assessment, and payments for injury or
loss of livestock caused by wolves. Only the director or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2)(a) The department must maintain a list of claims submitted
under RCW 77.36.100, organized chronologically by the date wolf
predation is confirmed, for injury or loss of livestock caused by
wolves that have been approved for payment but not yet been fully paid
by the department. As funding becomes available to the department
under this section, section 3 of this act, or any other source, the
department must pay claims in the chronologic order they appear on the
list. The department must maintain, and is authorized to pay, claims
that appear on the list due to injury or loss that occurred in a
previous fiscal biennium.
(b) The payment of a claim included on the list maintained by the
department under this section is conditional on the availability of
specific funding for this purpose and is not a guarantee of
reimbursement.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.36.100 and 2009 c 333 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as limited by RCW 77.36.070 ((and)), 77.36.080, and
sections 3 and 4 of this act, the department shall offer to distribute
money appropriated to pay claims to the owner of commercial crops for
damage caused by wild deer or elk or to the owners of ((commercial))
livestock that has been killed by bears, wolves, or cougars, or injured
by bears, wolves, or cougars to such a degree that the market value of
the ((commercial)) livestock has been diminished. Payments for claims
for damage to ((commercial)) livestock are not subject to the
limitations of RCW 77.36.070 and 77.36.080, but may not, except as
provided in sections 3 and 4 of this act, exceed the total amount
specifically appropriated therefor.
(b) Owners of commercial crops or ((commercial)) livestock are only
eligible for a claim under this subsection if:
(i) The commercial crop owner satisfies the definition of "eligible
farmer" in RCW 82.08.855;
(ii) The conditions of RCW 77.36.110 have been satisfied; and
(iii) The damage caused to the commercial crop or ((commercial))
livestock satisfies the criteria for damage established by the
commission under (c) of this subsection.
(c) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria that
clarifies the damage to commercial crops and ((commercial)) livestock
qualifying for compensation under this subsection. An owner of a
commercial crop or ((commercial)) livestock must satisfy the criteria
prior to receiving compensation under this subsection. The criteria
for damage adopted under this subsection must include, but not be
limited to, a required minimum economic loss to the owner of the
commercial crop or ((commercial)) livestock, which may not be set at a
value of less than five hundred dollars.
(2)(a) Subject to the availability of nonstate funds, nonstate
resources other than cash, or amounts appropriated for this specific
purpose, the department may offer to provide ((noncash)) compensation
((only)) to offset wildlife interactions to a person who applies to the
department for compensation for damage to property other than
commercial crops or ((commercial)) livestock that is the result of a
mammalian or avian species of wildlife on a case-specific basis if the
conditions of RCW 77.36.110 have been satisfied and if the damage
satisfies the criteria for damage established by the commission under
(b) of this subsection.
(b) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria for
damage to property other than a commercial crop or ((commercial))
livestock that is damaged by wildlife and may be eligible for
compensation under this subsection, including criteria for filing a
claim for compensation under this subsection.
(3)(a) To prevent or offset wildlife interactions, the department
may offer materials or services to a person who applies to the
department for assistance in providing mitigating actions designed to
reduce wildlife interactions if the actions are designed to address
damage that satisfies the criteria for damage established by the
commission under this ((subsection)) section.
(b) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria for
mitigating actions designed to address wildlife interactions that may
be eligible for materials and services under this section, including
criteria for submitting an application under this section.
(4) An owner who files a claim under this section may appeal the
decision of the department pursuant to rules adopted by the commission
if the claim:
(a) Is denied; or
(b) Is disputed by the owner and the owner disagrees with the
amount of compensation determined by the department.
(5) The commission shall adopt rules setting limits and conditions
for the department's expenditures on claims and assessments for
commercial crops, livestock, other property, and mitigating actions.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.36.130 and 2009 c 333 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section and as limited by
RCW 77.36.100, 77.36.070, ((and)) 77.36.080, and sections 3 and 4 of
this act, the cash compensation portion of each claim by the department
under this chapter is limited to the lesser of:
(a) The value of the damage to the property by wildlife, reduced by
the amount of compensation provided to the claimant by any nonprofit
organizations that provide compensation to private property owners due
to financial losses caused by wildlife interactions((, except that,
subject to appropriation to pay compensation for damage to commercial
livestock,)). The value of killed or injured ((commercial)) livestock
may be no more than ((two hundred dollars per sheep, one thousand five
hundred dollars per head of cattle, and one thousand five hundred
dollars per horse)) the market value of the lost livestock subject to
the conditions and criteria established by rule of the commission; or
(b) Ten thousand dollars.
(2) The department may offer to pay a claim for an amount in excess
of ten thousand dollars to the owners of commercial crops or
((commercial)) livestock filing a claim under RCW 77.36.100 only if the
outcome of an appeal filed by the claimant under RCW 77.36.100
determines a payment higher than ten thousand dollars.
(3) All payments of claims by the department under this chapter
must be paid to the owner of the damaged property and may not be
assigned to a third party.
(4) The burden of proving all property damage, including damage to
commercial crops and ((commercial)) livestock, belongs to the claimant.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.17.220 and 2012 c 65 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application for a vehicle registration in chapter 46.16A RCW, the
holder of a special license plate shall pay the appropriate special
license plate fee as listed in this section.

PLATE TYPE INITIAL FEE RENEWAL FEE DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) 4-H $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(b) Amateur radio license $ 5.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(c) Armed forces $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(d) Baseball stadium $ 40.00 $ 30.00 Subsection (2) of this
section

(e) Collector vehicle $ 35.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(f) Collegiate $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.430

(g) Endangered wildlife $ ((40.00)) 50.00 $ ((30.00)) 40.00 RCW 46.68.425

(h) Gonzaga University
alumni association $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(i) Helping kids speak $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(j) Horseless carriage $ 35.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(k) Keep kids safe $ 45.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(l) Law enforcement
memorial $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(m) Military affiliate radio
system $ 5.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(n) Music matters $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(o) Professional firefighters
and paramedics $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(p) Ride share $ 25.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(q) Share the road $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(r) Ski & ride Washington $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(s) Square dancer $ 40.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(t) State flower $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(u) Volunteer firefighters $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(v) Washington lighthouses $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(w) Washington state parks $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(x) Washington's national
parks $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(y) Washington's wildlife
collection $ ((40.00)) 50.00 $ ((30.00)) 40.00 RCW 46.68.425

(z) We love our pets $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(aa) Wild on Washington $ ((40.00)) 50.00 $ ((30.00)) 40.00 RCW 46.68.425

(2) After deducting administration and collection expenses for the
sale of baseball stadium license plates, the remaining proceeds must be
distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.68.425 and 2011 c 171 s 88 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Collect special license plate fees established under RCW
46.17.220;
(b) Deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars for initial issue
and two dollars for renewal issue for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it; and
(c) Remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.
(2) The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle fund until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the special license plate.
Upon determination by the department that the state has been
reimbursed, the state treasurer shall credit the remaining special
license plate fees to the following accounts by special license plate
type:

SPECIAL LICENSE PLATE TYPE ACCOUNT CONDITIONS FOR USE OF FUNDS

Armed forces RCW 43.60A.140 N/A

Endangered wildlife RCW 77.12.170 Must be used only for the department of
fish and wildlife's endangered wildlife
program activities and as specified under
subsection (3) of this section

Keep kids safe RCW 43.121.100 ((As specified in RCW 43.121.050)) N/A

Washington state parks RCW 79A.05.059 Provide public educational opportunities
and enhancement of Washington state
parks

Washington's wildlife collection RCW 77.12.170 Must be used only for the department of
fish and wildlife's game species
management activities and as specified
under subsection (3) of this section

Wild on Washington RCW 77.12.170 ((Dedicated to)) Must be used only for the
department of fish and wildlife's watchable
wildlife activities, as defined in RCW
77.32.560, and as specified under
subsection (3) of this section

(3) Ten dollars of the amount deposited to the state wildlife
account established under RCW 77.12.170 from each initial or renewal
issuance of an endangered wildlife, Washington's wildlife collection,
and Wild on Washington special license plate may only be used for the
department of fish and wildlife's wolf management efforts or payments
for livestock injury and loss caused by wolves under section 3 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 7 and 8 of this act take effect
January 1, 2014.

--- END ---