BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
By December 1, 2014, a school district shall either:
(1) Work with its local law enforcement agency to develop and
implement a panic alarm system using technology to expedite law
enforcement's arrival and effective response in the event of a threat
at a school; or
(2) Implement a model policy developed by the superintendent of
public instruction that the school district may use to implement a
panic alarm system that uses technology to expedite law enforcement's
arrival and effective response in the event of a threat at a school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall collaborate with
law enforcement and the school safety advisory committee to develop a
model policy that school districts may use to implement a panic alarm
system that uses technology to expedite law enforcement's arrival and
effective response in the event of a threat at a school.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and make
the model policy available to school districts by June 1, 2014.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.335.010 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.102 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Every board of directors, unless otherwise specifically
provided by law, shall:
(((1))) (a) Cause all school buildings to be properly heated,
lighted, and ventilated and maintained in a clean and sanitary
condition; ((and
(2))) (b) Maintain and repair, furnish, and insure such school
buildings;
(c) Strongly consider installing a perimeter security control
mechanism or system on all school campuses, as is appropriate to the
design of each campus; and
(d) Give preference to all school building plans and designs for
new school construction or remodeling of more than forty percent of an
existing school building that promote:
(i) An optimal level of security for the specific school site that
incorporates evolving technology and best practices to protect students
and staff in the event of a threat during school hours;
(ii) Direct control and observation of the public entering school
grounds; and
(iii) The public entering school grounds through as few entrances
as possible, such as through the main entrance of a school's
administrative offices.
(2) Specific school designs and construction started before the
effective date of this section are not subject to subsection (1)(c) and
(d) of this section.

--- END ---