BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Tens of thousands of stray and homeless dogs and cats are
handled by Washington's animal care and control agencies and other
animal welfare organizations each year, costing millions of dollars.
This presents a significant financial burden to these organizations and
to Washington taxpayers.
(2) Unaltered dogs account for most serious incidences of
unprovoked dog aggression and dog bites, causing injury, suffering,
expense, and financial liability. This is a public safety issue that
has not been adequately addressed in Washington state.
(3) Many thousands of adoptable dogs and cats are put to death in
shelters each year because there are not enough homes found to place
them. This is a tragic consequence of animal overpopulation.
(4) Pets owned by low-income individuals are less likely to be
spayed or neutered than pets owned by individuals with higher levels of
income. The cost of spay and neuter surgery is a barrier to achieving
higher levels of surgically sterilized pets.
(5) The majority of feral and free-roaming cats in Washington are
not spayed or neutered, thus contributing significantly to the
population of cats that are homeless and euthanized in shelters.
(6) Reducing the companion animal population through spay and
neuter surgery will reduce the number of animals handled and cared for
by animal care and control agencies and other animal welfare
organizations. This, in turn, will help reduce costs these agencies
and organizations incur for handling stray, abandoned, relinquished,
and homeless animals and, most importantly, will help reduce the number
of animals that die in shelters.
(7) Increasing the numbers of dogs that are surgically sterilized
will help reduce risks of dog bites that result in injury, death,
medical costs, and liability. Increasing the numbers of feral and
free-roaming cats that are surgically sterilized will reduce the
burdens they place on animal care and control agencies, shelters,
animal rescue organizations, and individuals who care for these
unowned, lost, or abandoned animals.
(8) The most effective and humane way to reduce the number of
animals dying in shelters is to reduce animal overpopulation through a
targeted, statewide spay and neuter surgery network.
(9) A companion animal safety, population control, and spay/neuter
assistance program is necessary to address the problems and costs of
companion animal overpopulation. The program should be funded through
a fee that is practical, administratively feasible, and targeted at the
class of Washington residents that is most responsible for companion
animals and their impact on our communities: Owners of cats and dogs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Account" means the companion animal spay/neuter assistance
account created in section 8 of this act.
(2) "Animal care and control agency" means an agency or authority
as defined in RCW 16.52.011(2)(c).
(3) "Cat" means a member of the species Felis catus.
(4) "Companion animal" means a cat or dog and includes a feral or
free-roaming cat as defined in this section.
(5) "Copayment" means the amount in dollars that a low-income owner
of a dog or cat may be required to pay for spay or neuter surgery.
(6) "Department" means the department of health.
(7) "Dog" means a member of the species Canis familiaris.
(8) "Feral or free-roaming cat" means a cat that is unowned, lost,
or abandoned.
(9) "Low income" means an individual who is a resident of
Washington state and meets the income limitations defined in section
4(2) of this act or participates in a public assistance program defined
in section 4(2) of this act.
(10) "Medically unfit" means unsuitable for a surgical procedure
due to any medical condition that may place a dog or cat at
life-threatening risk if a surgical procedure is performed on such an
animal, as determined by a veterinarian.
(11) "Neuter" means the surgical procedure of castrating a male dog
or cat.
(12) "Owner" means an individual or individuals with ownership
rights and responsibilities for a dog or cat.
(13) "Participating spay and neuter surgery provider" means a
private veterinarian, private veterinary practice, animal care and
control agency, or nonprofit organization that performs spay and neuter
surgeries on companion animals belonging to low-income individuals, or
spay and neuter surgeries on feral or free-roaming cats, and is
participating in the program established under this chapter.
(14) "Program" means the companion animal safety, population
control, and spay/neuter assistance program created in this chapter.
(15) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health or
the secretary's designee.
(16) "Shelter" means a facility that is owned by a public, private,
or nonprofit organization that provides food, water, and housing for
stray, abandoned, abused, or owner-surrendered dogs and cats.
(17) "Spay" means the surgical procedure of ovariohysterectomy on
a female dog or cat.
(18) "Surgical sterilization" means performing spay or neuter
surgery on a dog or cat.
(19) "Voucher" means a nontransferable document that, when approved
by the secretary or the secretary's designee, authorizes low-income
owners of companion animals or caretakers of feral and free-roaming
cats to receive program-supported companion animal spay or neuter
surgeries, presurgical examinations, and vaccinations by participating
spay and neuter surgery providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The companion animal safety, population
control, and spay/neuter assistance program is established. The
purpose of the program is to provide for spaying and neutering of
companion animals owned by low-income individuals and for spaying and
neutering feral and free-roaming cats. This, in turn, will promote
greater public safety and humanely reduce the number of homeless
animals that require animal control services and enter our state's
animal shelters.
(2) The department shall administer the program and shall:
(a) Enroll spay and neuter surgery providers and publicize the
program and the names and locations of participating spay and neuter
surgery providers;
(b) Establish criteria and procedures for screening companion
animal owners and caretakers of feral and free-roaming cats for
eligibility to participate in the program. Caretakers of feral and
free-roaming cats are not subject to the low-income requirements set
forth in section 4(2) of this act;
(c) Screen companion animal owners and caretakers of feral and
free-roaming cats for eligibility or contract for screening to promote
the ease and convenience of applying for services under the program;
(d) Obtain the greatest number of spay and neuter surgeries that
can be accomplished efficiently, consistent with the program's purpose
and availability of funds;
(e) To the extent practical, maximize the ease and convenience for
eligible owners and caretakers of companion animals to apply for and
receive spay, neuter, and other authorized veterinary medical services,
and minimize administrative burdens, procedures, and costs for
participating spay and neuter surgery providers that participate in the
program; and
(f) Actively promote the program to inform the public about
companion animal overpopulation issues and surgical sterilization.
(3) The department's priorities for expenditures are to fund spay
and neuter surgeries on companion animals belonging to low-income
individuals who are Washington state residents and for spaying and
neutering feral and free-roaming cats.
(4) The department may expend moneys from the account to pay the
costs of presurgical examinations and vaccinations of companion animals
eligible for spay or neuter surgery.
(5) To the extent that moneys from the account are available and
spay and neuter funding priorities are met, as determined by the
secretary, the department may expend money from the account for spay
and neuter surgeries on companion animals that are in the possession of
animal shelters, animal care and control agencies, and other animal
welfare organizations. Expenditures under this subsection may be made
for spay and neuter surgeries on companion animals: Received as stray
or abandoned; relinquished by companion animals' owners or caretakers;
transferred in from other shelters, agencies, or organizations; or
taken into custody in accordance with chapter 16.52 RCW or local
ordinances.
(6) The department shall set copayment amounts for spay or neuter
surgery on owned companion animals. The copayment amounts may not
exceed twenty dollars per dog and ten dollars per cat. Any copayments
due must be paid by or on behalf of low-income owners of companion
animals to participating spay and neuter surgery providers. There is
no copayment due for spay or neuter surgery performed on feral or free-roaming cats.
(7) The department may not use moneys from the account to provide
veterinary medical services to the public at large.
(8) Other agencies of the state, including but not limited to the
department of social and health services and the Washington state
health care authority, shall work cooperatively with the department to
facilitate the development of screening procedures for determining the
eligibility of low-income applicants to participate in the program.
(9) The department may contract with public, private, or nonprofit
agencies or organizations with relevant experience and expertise to
accomplish the purposes of the program.
(10) At least ninety percent of the funds from the account must be
used for payments to spay/neuter surgery providers for performing
spay/neuter surgery and other authorized services, informing and
educating the public about the benefits of spay/neuter surgery for
companion animals, and promoting the program to the public. No more
than ten percent of the funds from the account may be expended for
other purposes, including program administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department may expend moneys from
the account for spay and neuter surgeries and other authorized services
for companion animals that are:
(a) Owned by qualified low-income individuals;
(b) Feral or free-roaming cats; or
(c) Not owned by individuals but are in the possession of animal
shelters, animal care and control agencies, and other animal welfare
organizations.
(2) An individual is "low income" if the individual is a resident
of Washington state and certifies or provides evidence that he or she:
(a) Meets the definition of "low-income household" defined in RCW
43.185A.010; or
(b) Is eligible for and participates in at least one of the
following public assistance programs:
(i) The Washington basic food program administered by the
Washington state department of social and health services;
(ii) Basic health administered by the Washington state health care
authority;
(iii) Medical assistance programs administered by the Washington
state department of social and health services that fall within a
household income limitation of two hundred fifty percent of the federal
poverty level as defined by the United States department of health and
human services;
(iv) Supplemental security income administered by the federal
social security administration; or
(v) Any other public assistance program that the secretary
determines is sufficient to qualify a person as a low-income
individual.
(3) No unowned dog or cat transferred from jurisdictions outside
Washington state into this state is eligible for spay or neuter surgery
under the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Any private veterinarian, private
veterinary practice, animal care and control agency, and nonprofit
organization whose services include performing spay and neuter
surgeries on companion animals is eligible to apply to the department
to participate in the program.
(2) Spay and neuter services provided under the program may only be
performed by veterinarians licensed under chapter 18.92 RCW.
(3) Participation by spay and neuter surgery providers in the
program is voluntary. Participating spay and neuter surgery providers
may also elect to exclude particular species (dog or cat) and
participants may exclude acceptance of feral or free-roaming cats.
(4) Any private veterinarian, private veterinary practice, animal
care and control agency, or nonprofit organization that performs
companion animal spay and neuter surgeries that is interested in
participating in the program must submit an application to the
department that includes a schedule listing the fees charged for
companion animal sterilization in its normal course of business.
Applicants must list separate fees for surgical sterilization of female
cats, male cats, female dogs within various weight ranges, male dogs
within various weight ranges, and for other surgical classifications as
the department determines. In addition to providing a schedule of
fees, applicants that are animal care and control agencies or nonprofit
organizations must include reasonable documentation of their direct and
indirect costs of performing surgical sterilization.
(5) The department shall reimburse each participating private
veterinary spay and neuter surgery provider for companion animal
sterilization based upon the provider's normal fee schedule, provided
that it does not exceed an amount that the department determines is
usual, customary, and reasonable. The usual, customary, and reasonable
fee limit shall be calculated at the seventieth percentile rate, based
upon the department's review of prevailing fees for similar services
charged by peer private veterinary practices in Washington state. That
fee limit is the rate at which seventy percent of private practice
prevailing fees do not exceed. The department may establish rates of
compensation for presurgical examinations and for administration of
vaccinations in such a manner and at a level as the department
determines is fair and reasonable.
(6) The department shall establish separate rates of compensation
for the reasonable costs of surgical sterilization provided by animal
care and control agencies and nonprofit organizations that are
participating spay and neuter surgery providers. Compensation provided
under this section may not exceed the fee limit established for private
veterinary practices under subsection (5) of this section.
(7) The department shall adjust rates of compensation at two-year
intervals.
(8) No participating spay and neuter surgery provider is required
to perform medical procedures on an animal that the provider determines
is medically unfit.
(9) Participating private veterinarians or private veterinary
practices are not required to screen applicants for eligibility,
although they may do so voluntarily. The department may require that
animal care and control agencies and nonprofit organizations that are
participating spay and neuter surgery providers screen applicants for
eligibility.
(10) The department shall provide payment on a monthly basis to all
participating spay and neuter surgery providers for spay and neuter
surgeries, presurgical examinations, and vaccinations authorized by the
department for reimbursement. Services not authorized for payment may
not be reimbursed. Companion animal owners and caretakers of feral and
free-roaming cats are responsible for payment of any additional fees
due to the participating spay and neuter surgery provider that are
mutually agreed upon, administered by that provider, and not covered
under the program.
(11) To receive reimbursement for spay and neuter surgeries and
other approved services, the participating spay and neuter surgery
provider must submit documentation of authorized services performed as
required by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department shall adopt policies and
procedures relative to:
(1) Determining eligibility for spay and neuter surgery;
(2) Establishing copayment amounts for spay and neuter surgeries on
companion animals owned by qualified low-income individuals;
(3) Enrolling spay and neuter surgery providers in the program;
(4) Determining the percentage of moneys to be allocated to spay
and neuter surgery, education of the public, and other purposes;
(5) Determining fair and reasonable rates of compensation for spay
and neuter surgeries, presurgical examinations, and vaccinations, and
for making fair and reasonable adjustments to those rates;
(6) Providing guidance to shelters concerning shelter reporting as
required under section 12 of this act; and
(7) Any other matter necessary for the administration of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Animal care and control agencies are
authorized to add to each companion animal licensing fee a charge in an
amount to be determined by the animal care and control agency, up to
one dollar per license, to fund the program. Any fees collected shall
be deposited into the companion animal spay/neuter assistance account
created in section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The companion animal spay/neuter assistance
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
companion animal spay/neuter fees received under section 7 of this act,
gifts and grants to the program under section 9 of this act, or other
revenue directed to the account must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the program as
authorized by this chapter. Only the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The department may accept any donations,
grants, bequests, and devises, conditional or otherwise, or money,
property, service, or other things of value which may be received from
the United States or any agency thereof, any governmental agency, any
institution, person, firm, or corporation, public and private, to be
held, used, or applied for the purposes of the program established
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A person who knowingly falsifies the
following information is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be suspended
from participation in the program:
(1) Individual and household income or ownership of a pet in order
to qualify for pet sterilization;
(2) Prevailing fees and rates charged for spay and neuter
surgeries, presurgical examinations, and vaccinations; or
(3) Payment requests submitted to the department for performance of
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 By April 30, 2015, and annually thereafter,
the department shall prepare and submit to the governor and the
legislature a report that describes and evaluates the program's
performance and impact over the previous year and cumulatively since
its inception. At the least, the report must include the following
elements: The number of spay and neuter surgeries performed by
individual spay/neuter surgery providers, the number of surgeries
performed within each county, and the number performed statewide; the
number of dogs and cats received by animal shelters and the sources and
fates of these animals reported by shelter, by county, and statewide;
program revenue and expenditures; effectiveness, efficiency, and
accomplishment of objectives; and recommendations for legislative or
administrative actions as the department deems appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 To assist the department in evaluating the
impact of the program, animal care and control agencies, humane
societies, and other nonprofit organizations that serve as animal
shelter for dogs and cats within the state must annually report to the
department, in a form and manner required by the department, the number
of cats, kittens, dogs, and puppies received and the sources and fates
of these animals. However, animal shelters that handle small numbers
of cats or dogs, as determined by the department, may not be required
to report. The department shall provide guidance to shelters on
classifying animals by age, health, and other factors for reporting
purposes. Animal shelters that fail to report as required under this
section may, at the department's discretion, be disqualified from
receiving moneys under this chapter.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.92.260 and 2002 c 157 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Subject to the limitations in this section, animal care and
control agencies as defined in RCW 16.52.011 and nonprofit humane
societies, that have qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the internal
revenue code may provide limited veterinary services to animals owned
by qualified low-income households. The veterinary services provided
shall be limited to electronic identification, surgical sterilization,
and vaccinations. A veterinarian or veterinary technician acting
within his or her scope of practice must perform the limited veterinary
services. For purposes of this section, "low-income household" means
the same as in RCW 43.185A.010 and section 4(2)(b) of this act.
(b) Animal control agencies and nonprofit humane societies,
receiving animals on an emergency basis, may provide emergency care,
subject to a local ordinance that defines an emergency situation and
establishes temporary time limits.
(c) Any local ordinance addressing the needs under this section
that was approved by the voters and is in effect on July 1, 2003,
remains in effect.
(2) Veterinarians and veterinary technicians employed at these
facilities must be licensed under this chapter. No officer, director,
supervisor, or any other individual associated with an animal care or
control agency or nonprofit humane society owning and operating a
veterinary medical facility may impose any terms or conditions of
employment or direct or attempt to direct an employed veterinarian in
any way that interferes with the free exercise of the veterinarian's
professional judgment or infringes upon the utilization of his or her
professional skills.
(3) Veterinarians, veterinary technicians, and animal control
agencies and humane societies acting under this section shall, for
purposes of providing the limited veterinary services, meet the
requirements established under this chapter and are subject to the
rules adopted by the veterinary board of governors in the same fashion
as any licensed veterinarian or veterinary medical facility in the
state.
(4) The Washington state veterinary board of governors shall adopt
rules to:
(a) Establish registration and registration renewal requirements;
(b) Govern the purchase and use of drugs for the limited veterinary
services authorized under this section; and
(c) Ensure that agencies and societies are in compliance with this
section.
(5) The limited veterinary medical service authority granted by
registration under this section may be denied, suspended, revoked, or
conditioned by a determination of the board of governors for any act of
noncompliance with this chapter. The uniform disciplinary act, chapter
18.130 RCW, governs unregistered operation, the issuance and denial of
registrations, and the discipline of registrants under this section.
(6) No animal control agency or humane society may operate under
this chapter without registering with the department. An application
for registration shall be made upon forms provided by the department
and shall include the information the department reasonably requires,
as provided by RCW 43.70.280. The department shall establish
registration and renewal fees as provided by RCW 43.70.250. A
registration fee shall accompany each application for registration or
renewal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 16 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 12 of this act take
effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---