BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.230.010 and 2010 c 73 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affiliate" means any person who directly or indirectly through
one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under
common control with, another person.
(2) "Annual assessment due date" means the date specified in rule
by the director upon which the annual assessment is due.
(3) "Applicant" means a person that files an application for a
license under this chapter, including the applicant's proposed
responsible individual and executive officers, and persons in control
of the applicant.
(4) "Authorized delegate" means a person a licensee designates to
provide money services on behalf of the licensee. A person that is
exempt from licensing under this chapter cannot have an authorized
delegate.
(5) "Board director" means a member of the applicant's or
licensee's board of directors if the applicant is a corporation or
limited liability company, or a partner if the applicant or licensee is
a partnership.
(6) "Closed loop stored value ((device))" means ((a)) stored value
((device)), when that value or credit is primarily intended to be
redeemed for a limited universe of goods, intangibles, services, or
other items provided by the issuer of the stored value, its affiliates,
or others involved in transactions functionally related to the issuer
or its affiliates.
(7) "Control" means:
(a) Ownership of, or the power to vote, directly or indirectly, at
least twenty-five percent of a class of voting securities or voting
interests of a licensee or applicant, or person in control of a
licensee or applicant;
(b) Power to elect a majority of executive officers, managers,
directors, trustees, or other persons exercising managerial authority
of a licensee or applicant, or person in control of a licensee or
applicant; or
(c) Power to exercise directly or indirectly, a controlling
influence over the management or policies of a licensee or applicant,
or person in control of a licensee or applicant.
(8) "Currency exchange" means exchanging the money of one
government for money of another government, or holding oneself out as
able to exchange the money of one government for money of another
government. The following persons are not considered currency
exchangers:
(a) Affiliated businesses that engage in currency exchange for a
business purpose other than currency exchange;
(b) A person who provides currency exchange services for a person
acting primarily for a business, commercial, agricultural, or
investment purpose when the currency exchange is incidental to the
transaction;
(c) A person who deals in coins or a person who deals in money
whose value is primarily determined because it is rare, old, or
collectible; and
(d) A person who in the regular course of business chooses to
accept from a customer the currency of a country other than the United
States in order to complete the sale of a good or service other than
currency exchange, that may include cash back to the customer, and does
not otherwise trade in currencies or transmit money for compensation or
gain.
(9) "Currency exchanger" means a person that is engaged in currency
exchange.
(10) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.
(11) "Executive officer" means a president, chairperson of the
executive committee, chief financial officer, responsible individual,
or other individual who performs similar functions.
(12) "Financial institution" means any person doing business under
the laws of any state or the United States relating to commercial
banks, bank holding companies, savings banks, savings and loan
associations, trust companies, or credit unions.
(13) "Licensee" means a person licensed under this chapter.
(14) "Material litigation" means litigation that according to
generally accepted accounting principles is significant to an
applicant's or a licensee's financial health and would be required to
be disclosed in the applicant's or licensee's annual audited financial
statements, report to shareholders, or similar records.
(15) "Mobile location" means a vehicle or movable facility where
money services are provided.
(16) "Money" means a medium of exchange that is authorized or
adopted by the United States or a foreign government or other
recognized medium of exchange. "Money" includes a monetary unit of
account established by an intergovernmental organization or by
agreement between two or more governments.
(17) "Money services" means money transmission or currency
exchange.
(18) "Money transmission" means receiving money or its equivalent
value to transmit, deliver, or instruct to be delivered the money or
its equivalent value to another location, inside or outside the United
States, by any means including but not limited to by wire, facsimile,
or electronic transfer. "Money transmission" does not include the
provision solely of connection services to the internet,
telecommunications services, or network access. "Money transmission"
includes selling, issuing, or acting as an intermediary for open loop
stored value ((devices)) and payment instruments, but not closed loop
stored value ((devices)).
(19) "Money transmitter" means a person that is engaged in money
transmission.
(20) "Open loop stored value ((device))" means ((a)) stored value
((device)) redeemable at multiple, unaffiliated merchants or service
providers, or automated teller machines.
(21) "Outstanding money transmission" means the value of all money
transmissions reported to the licensee for which the money transmitter
has received money or its equivalent value from the customer for
transmission, but has not yet completed the money transmission by
delivering the money or monetary value to the person designated by the
customer.
(22) "Payment instrument" means a check, draft, money order, or
traveler's check for the transmission or payment of money or its
equivalent value, whether or not negotiable. "Payment instrument" does
not include a credit card voucher, letter of credit, or instrument that
is redeemable by the issuer in goods or services.
(23) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture; government, governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality; public corporation; or any other legal or commercial
entity.
(24) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible
medium, or that is stored in an electronic or other medium, and is
retrievable in perceivable form.
(25) "Responsible individual" means an individual who is employed
by a licensee and has principal managerial authority over the provision
of money services by the licensee in this state.
(26) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States.
(27) "Stored value ((device))" means a card or other device that
electronically stores or provides access to funds and is available for
making payments to others.
(28) "Tangible net worth" means the physical worth of a licensee,
calculated by taking a licensee's assets and subtracting its
liabilities and its intangible assets, such as copyrights, patents,
intellectual property, and goodwill.
(29) "Unsafe or unsound practice" means a practice or conduct by a
person licensed to provide money services, or an authorized delegate of
such a person, which creates the likelihood of material loss,
insolvency, or dissipation of the licensee's assets, or otherwise
materially prejudices the financial condition of the licensee or the
interests of its customers.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.230.020 and 2010 c 73 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter does not apply to:
(1) The United States or a department, agency, or instrumentality
thereof;
(2) Money transmission by the United States postal service or by a
contractor on behalf of the United States postal service;
(3) A state, county, city, or a department, agency, or
instrumentality thereof;
(4) A financial institution or its subsidiaries, affiliates, and
service corporations, or any office of an international banking
corporation, branch of a foreign bank, or corporation organized
pursuant to the Bank Service Corporation Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1861-1867)
or a corporation organized under the Edge Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 611-633);
(5) Electronic funds transfer of governmental benefits for a
federal, state, county, or governmental agency by a contractor on
behalf of the United States or a department, agency, or instrumentality
thereof, or a state or governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality thereof;
(6) A board of trade designated as a contract market under the
federal Commodity Exchange Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 1-25) or a person that,
in the ordinary course of business, provides clearance and settlement
services for a board of trade to the extent of its operation as, or
for, a board of trade;
(7) A registered futures commission merchant under the federal
commodities laws to the extent of its operation as such a merchant;
(8) A person that provides clearance or settlement services under
a registration as a clearing agency, or an exemption from that
registration granted under the federal securities laws, to the extent
of its operation as such a provider;
(9) An operator of a payment system only to the extent that it
provides processing, clearing, or settlement services, between or among
persons who are all excluded by this section, in connection with wire
transfers, credit card transactions, debit card transactions, stored-value transactions, automated clearinghouse transfers, or similar funds
transfers;
(10) A person registered as a securities broker-dealer or
investment advisor under federal or state securities laws to the extent
of its operation as such a broker-dealer or investment advisor;
(11) An insurance company, title insurance company, or escrow agent
to the extent that such an entity is lawfully authorized to conduct
business in this state as an insurance company, title insurance
company, or escrow agent and to the extent that they engage in money
transmission or currency exchange as an ancillary service when
conducting insurance, title insurance, or escrow activity;
(12) The issuance, sale, use, redemption, or exchange of closed
loop stored value ((devices)) or of payment instruments by a person
licensed under chapter 31.45 RCW;
(13) An attorney, to the extent that the attorney is lawfully
authorized to practice law in this state and to the extent that the
attorney engages in money transmission or currency exchange as an
ancillary service to the practice of law; or
(14) A stored value ((device)) seller or issuer when the funds ((on
the device)) are covered by federal deposit insurance immediately upon
sale or issue.
The director may, at his or her discretion, waive applicability of
the licensing provisions of this chapter when the director determines
it necessary to facilitate commerce and protect consumers. The
director may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.230.040 and 2003 c 287 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person applying for a money transmitter license under this
chapter shall do so in a form and in a medium prescribed in rule by the
director. The application must state or contain:
(a) The legal name, business addresses, and residential address, if
applicable, of the applicant and any fictitious or trade name used by
the applicant in conducting its business;
(b) The legal name, residential and business addresses, date of
birth, social security number, employment history for the five-year
period preceding the submission of the application of the applicant's
proposed responsible individual, and documentation that the proposed
responsible individual is a citizen of the United States or has
obtained legal immigration status to work in the United States. In
addition, the applicant shall provide the fingerprints of the proposed
responsible individual upon the request of the director;
(c) For the ten-year period preceding submission of the
application, a list of any criminal convictions of the proposed
responsible individual of the applicant, any material litigation in
which the applicant has been involved, and any litigation involving the
proposed responsible individual relating to the provision of money
services;
(d) A description of any money services previously provided by the
applicant and the money services that the applicant seeks to provide
((in this state)) to persons in Washington state;
(e) A list of the applicant's proposed authorized delegates and the
locations ((in this state)) where the applicant and its authorized
delegates ((propose to)) will engage in the provision of money services
to persons in Washington state on behalf of the licensee;
(f) A list of other states in which the applicant is licensed to
engage in money transmission, or provide other money services, and any
license revocations, suspensions, restrictions, or other disciplinary
action taken against the applicant in another state;
(g) A list of any license revocations, suspensions, restrictions,
or other disciplinary action taken against any money services business
involving the proposed responsible individual;
(h) Information concerning any bankruptcy or receivership
proceedings involving or affecting the applicant or the proposed
responsible individual;
(i) A sample form of contract for authorized delegates, if
applicable;
(j) A description of the source of money and credit to be used by
the applicant to provide money services; and
(k) Any other information regarding the background, experience,
character, financial responsibility, and general fitness of the
applicant, the applicant's responsible individual, or authorized
delegates that the director may require in rule.
(2) If an applicant is a corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity, the applicant shall also provide:
(a) The date of the applicant's incorporation or formation and
state or country of incorporation or formation;
(b) If applicable, a certificate of good standing from the state or
country in which the applicant is incorporated or formed;
(c) A brief description of the structure or organization of the
applicant, including any parent or subsidiary of the applicant, and
whether any parent or subsidiary is publicly traded;
(d) The legal name, any fictitious or trade name, all business and
residential addresses, date of birth, social security number, and
employment history in the ten-year period preceding the submission of
the application for each executive officer, board director, or person
that has control of the applicant;
(e) If the applicant or its corporate parent is not a publicly
traded entity, the director may request the fingerprints of each
executive officer, board director, or person that has control of the
applicant;
(f) A list of any criminal convictions, material litigation, and
any litigation related to the provision of money services, in the ten-year period preceding the submission of the application in which any
executive officer, board director, or person in control of the
applicant has been involved;
(g) A copy of the applicant's audited financial statements for the
most recent fiscal year or, if the applicant is a wholly owned
subsidiary of another corporation, the most recent audited consolidated
annual financial statement of the parent corporation or the applicant's
most recent audited consolidated annual financial statement, and in
each case, if available, for the two-year period preceding the
submission of the application;
(h) A copy of the applicant's unconsolidated financial statements
for the current fiscal year, whether audited or not, and, if available,
for the two-year period preceding the submission of the application;
(i) If the applicant is publicly traded, a copy of the most recent
report filed with the United States securities and exchange commission
under section 13 of the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15
U.S.C. Sec. 78m);
(j) If the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of:
(i) A corporation publicly traded in the United States, a copy of
audited financial statements for the parent corporation for the most
recent fiscal year or a copy of the parent corporation's most recent
report filed under section 13 of the federal Securities Exchange Act of
1934 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 78m); or
(ii) A corporation publicly traded outside the United States, a
copy of similar documentation filed with the regulator of the parent
corporation's domicile outside the United States;
(k) If the applicant has a registered agent in this state, the name
and address of the applicant's registered agent in this state; and
(l) Any other information that the director may require in rule
regarding the applicant, each executive officer, or each board director
to determine the applicant's background, experience, character,
financial responsibility, and general fitness.
(3) A nonrefundable application fee and an initial license fee, as
determined in rule by the director, must accompany an application for
a license under this chapter. The initial license fee must be refunded
if the application is denied.
(4) As part of or in connection with an application for any license
under this section, or periodically upon license renewal, each officer,
director, and owner applicant shall furnish information concerning his
or her identity, including fingerprints for submission to the
Washington state patrol or the federal bureau of investigation for a
state and national criminal history background check, personal history,
experience, business record, purposes, and other pertinent facts, as
the director may reasonably require. As part of or in connection with
an application for a license under this chapter, or periodically upon
license renewal, the director is authorized to receive criminal history
record information that includes nonconviction data as defined in RCW
10.97.030. The department may only disseminate nonconviction data
obtained under this section to criminal justice agencies. This section
does not apply to financial institutions regulated under chapters 31.12
and 31.13 RCW and Titles 30, 32, and 33 RCW. The requirements of this
subsection do not apply when the applicant or its corporate parents are
publicly traded entities.
(5) The director may waive one or more requirements ((of subsection
(1) or (2))) of this section or permit an applicant to submit other
information in lieu of the required information.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.230.110 and 2010 c 73 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A licensee shall pay an annual assessment as established in
rule by the director no later than the annual assessment due date or,
if the annual assessment due date is not a business day, on the next
business day. A licensee shall pay an annual assessment based on the
previous year's Washington dollar volume of: (a) Money transmissions;
(b) payment instruments; (c) currency exchanges; and (d) stored value
sales. The total minimum assessment must be one thousand dollars per
year, and the maximum assessment may not exceed one hundred thousand
dollars per year.
(2) A licensee shall submit an accurate annual report with the
annual assessment, in a form and in a medium prescribed by the director
in rule. The annual report must state or contain:
(a) If the licensee is a money transmitter, a copy of the
licensee's most recent audited annual financial statement or, if the
licensee is a wholly owned subsidiary of another corporation, the most
recent audited consolidated annual financial statement of the parent
corporation or the licensee's most recent audited consolidated annual
financial statement;
(b) A description of each material change, as defined in rule by
the director, to information submitted by the licensee in its original
license application which has not been previously reported to the
director on any required report;
(c) If the licensee is a money transmitter, a list of the
licensee's permissible investments and a certification that the
licensee continues to maintain permissible investments according to the
requirements set forth in RCW 19.230.200 and 19.230.210;
(d) If the licensee is a money transmitter, proof that the licensee
continues to maintain adequate security as required by RCW 19.230.050;
and
(e) A list of the locations ((in this state)) where the licensee or
an authorized delegate of the licensee engages in or provides money
services to persons in Washington state.
(3) If a licensee does not file an annual report or pay its annual
assessment by the annual assessment due date, the director or the
director's designee shall send the licensee a notice of suspension and
assess the licensee a late fee not to exceed twenty-five percent of the
annual assessment as established in rule by the director. The
licensee's annual report and payment of both the annual assessment and
the late fee must arrive in the department's offices by 5:00 p.m. on
the thirtieth day after the assessment due date or any extension of
time granted by the director, unless that date is not a business day,
in which case the licensee's annual report and payment of both the
annual assessment and the late fee must arrive in the department's
offices by 5:00 p.m. on the next occurring business day. If the
licensee's annual report and payment of both the annual assessment and
late fee do not arrive by such date, the expiration of the licensee's
license is effective at 5:00 p.m. on the thirtieth day after the
assessment due date, unless that date is not a business day, in which
case the expiration of the licensee's license is effective at 5:00 p.m.
on the next occurring business day. The director, or the director's
designee, may reinstate the license if, within twenty days after its
effective date, the licensee:
(a) Files the annual report and pays both the annual assessment and
the late fee; and
(b) Did not engage in or provide money services during the period
its license was expired.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.230.120 and 2003 c 287 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In this section, "remit" means to make direct payments of money
to a licensee or its representative authorized to receive money or to
deposit money in a bank in an account specified by the licensee.
(2) A contract between a licensee and an authorized delegate must
require the authorized delegate to operate in full compliance with this
chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter.
(3) Neither the licensee nor an authorized delegate may authorize
subdelegates.
(4) An authorized delegate shall remit all money owing to the
licensee in accordance with the terms of the contract between the
licensee and the authorized delegate.
(5) If a license is suspended or revoked or a licensee surrenders
its license, the director shall notify all of the licensee's authorized
delegates ((of the licensee)) whose names are filed with the director,
at the address of record with the director, of the suspension,
revocation, or surrender and shall publish the name of the licensee.
An authorized delegate shall immediately cease to provide money
services as a delegate of the licensee upon receipt of notice, or after
publication is made, that the licensee's license has been suspended,
revoked, or surrendered.
(6) An authorized delegate may not provide money services other
than those allowed the licensee under its license. In addition, an
authorized delegate may not provide money services outside the scope of
activity permissible under the contract between the authorized delegate
and the licensee, except activity in which the authorized delegate is
authorized to engage under RCW 19.230.030 or 19.230.080.

Sec. 6 RCW 19.230.150 and 2003 c 287 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A licensee shall file with the director within thirty business
days any material changes in information provided in a licensee's
application as prescribed in rule by the director. If this information
indicates that the licensee is no longer in compliance with this
chapter, the director may take any action authorized under this chapter
to ensure that the licensee operates in compliance with this chapter.
(2) A licensee shall file with the director within forty-five days
after the end of each fiscal quarter a current list of all authorized
delegates ((and locations in this state where the licensee, or an
authorized delegate of the licensee, provides money services, including
mobile locations. The licensee shall state the name and street address
of each location and authorized delegate operating at the location))
including the name, address, and e-mail address, if available, of each
authorized delegate providing money services to persons in Washington.
The licensee shall also file with the director within forty-five days
after the end of each fiscal quarter a current list of all licensee
locations providing money services to persons in Washington, including
mobile locations, which includes the address, and e-mail address if
available, of the licensee.
(3) A licensee shall file a report with the director within one
business day after the licensee has reason to know of the occurrence of
any of the following events:
(a) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee, or any
authorized delegate of the licensee, under the United States Bankruptcy
Code (11 U.S.C. Sec. 101-110) for bankruptcy or reorganization;
(b) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee, or any
authorized delegate of the licensee, for receivership, the commencement
of any other judicial or administrative proceeding for its dissolution
or reorganization, or the making of a general assignment for the
benefit of its creditors;
(c) The commencement of a proceeding to revoke, suspend, restrict,
or condition its license, or otherwise discipline or sanction the
licensee, in a state or country in which the licensee engages in
business or is licensed;
(d) The cancellation or other impairment of the licensee's bond or
other security;
(e) A charge or conviction of the licensee or of an executive
officer, responsible individual, board director of the licensee, or
person in control of the licensee, for a felony; or
(f) A charge or conviction of an authorized delegate for a felony.

Sec. 7 RCW 19.230.200 and 2010 c 73 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A money transmitter licensee shall maintain, at all times,
permissible investments that have a market value computed in accordance
with generally accepted accounting principles of not less than the
amount of the licensee's average outstanding money transmission
liability.
(b) For the purposes of this section, average outstanding money
transmission liability means the sum of the daily amounts of a
licensee's outstanding money transmissions, as computed each day of the
month divided by the number of days in the month.
(2) The director, with respect to any money transmitter licensee,
may limit the extent to which a type of investment within a class of
permissible investments may be considered a permissible investment,
except for money, time deposits, savings deposits, demand deposits, and
certificates of deposit issued by a federally insured financial
institution. The director may prescribe in rule, or by order allow,
other types of investments that the director determines to have a
safety substantially equivalent to other permissible investments.

Sec. 8 RCW 19.230.310 and 2003 c 287 s 33 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director has the authority and administrative discretion to
administer and interpret this chapter to fulfill the intent of the
legislature as expressed in RCW 19.230.005. In accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW, the director may issue rules under this chapter that are
clearly required to govern the activities of licensees and other
persons subject to this chapter.

--- END ---