BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington state
is a provider friendly state within which to practice medicine. As
part of health care reform, Washington state endeavors to establish and
operate a state-based health benefits exchange wherein insurance
products will be offered for sale and add potentially three hundred
thousand patients to commercial insurance, and to expand access to
medicaid for potentially three hundred thousand new enrollees. Such a
successful and new insurance market in Washington state will require
the willing participation of all categories of health care providers.
The legislature further finds that principles of fair contracting apply
to all contracts between health care providers and health insurance
carriers offering insurance within Washington state and that fair
dealings and transparency in expectations should be present in
interactions between all third-party payors and health care providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Health care provider" or "provider" has the same meaning as in
RCW 48.43.005 and, for the purposes of this chapter, includes
facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.
(2) "Payor" or "third-party payor" means carriers licensed under
chapters 48.20, 48.21, 48.44, and 48.46 RCW, and managed health care
systems as defined in RCW 74.09.522.
(3) "Material amendment" means an amendment to a contract between
a payor and health care provider that would result in requiring a
health care provider to participate in a health plan, product, or line
of business with a lower fee schedule in order to continue to
participate in a health plan, product, or line of business with a
higher fee schedule. A material amendment does not include any of the
following:
(a) A decrease in payment or compensation resulting from a change
in a fee schedule published by the payor upon which the payment or
compensation is based and the date of applicability is clearly
identified in the contract, compensation addendum, or fee schedule
notice;
(b) A decrease in payment or compensation that was anticipated
under the terms of the contract, if the amount and date of
applicability of the decrease is clearly identified in the contract; or
(c) Changes unrelated to compensation so long as reasonable notice
of not less than sixty days is provided.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A third-party payor shall provide no
less than sixty days' notice to the health care provider of any
proposed material amendments to a health care provider's contract with
the third-party payor.
(2) Any material amendment to a contract must be clearly defined in
a notice to the provider from the third-party payor as being a material
change to the contract before the provider's notice period begins. The
notice must also inform the providers that they may choose to reject
the terms of the proposed material amendment through written or
electronic means at any time during the notice period and that such
rejection may not affect the terms of the health care provider's
existing contract with the third-party payor.
(3) A health care provider's rejection of the material amendment
does not affect the terms of the health care provider's existing
contract with the third-party payor.
(4) A failure to comply with the terms of subsections (1), (2), and
(3) of this section shall void the effectiveness of the material
amendment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A payor may not, without the express written
agreement of the health care provider, require a health care provider
to extend the payor's medicaid rates, or some percentage above the
payor's medicaid rates, that govern a health benefit program
administered by a public purchaser to a commercial plan or line of
business offered by a payor that is not administered by a public
purchaser. For the purposes of this section, "administered by a public
purchaser" does not include commercial coverage offered through the
Washington health benefit exchange.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
No licensee subject to this chapter may be required to participate
in any public or private third-party reimbursement program or any plans
or products offered by a payor as a condition of licensure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

--- END ---