BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.17.380 and 2005 c 384 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in RCW 43.17.385 ((and 43.17.390)):
(1) "State agency" or "agency" means a state agency, department,
office, officer, board, commission, bureau, division, institution, or
institution of higher education, and all offices of executive branch
state government-elected officials, except agencies with less than one
hundred full-time equivalent employees and agricultural commissions
under Title 15 RCW.
(2) "Quality management, accountability, and performance system"
means a nationally recognized integrated, interdisciplinary system of
measures, tools, and reports used to improve the performance of a work
unit or organization.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.185C.210 and 2011 c 353 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The transitional housing operating and rent program is created
in the department to assist individuals and families who are homeless
or who are at risk of becoming homeless to secure and retain safe,
decent, and affordable housing. The department shall provide grants to
eligible organizations, as described in RCW 43.185.060, to provide
assistance to program participants. The eligible organizations must
use grant moneys for:
(a) Rental assistance, which includes security or utility deposits,
first and last month's rent assistance, and eligible moving expenses to
be determined by the department;
(b) Case management services designed to assist program
participants to secure and retain immediate housing and to transition
into permanent housing and greater levels of self-sufficiency;
(c) Operating expenses of transitional housing facilities that
serve homeless families with children; and
(d) Administrative costs of the eligible organization, which must
not exceed limits prescribed by the department.
(2) Eligible to receive assistance through the transitional housing
operating and rent program are:
(a) Families with children who are homeless or who are at risk of
becoming homeless and who have household incomes at or below fifty
percent of the median household income for their county;
(b) Families with children who are homeless or who are at risk of
becoming homeless and who are receiving services under chapter 13.34
RCW;
(c) Individuals or families without children who are homeless or at
risk of becoming homeless and who have household incomes at or below
thirty percent of the median household income for their county;
(d) Individuals or families who are homeless or who are at risk of
becoming homeless and who have a household with an adult member who has
a mental health or chemical dependency disorder; and
(e) Individuals or families who are homeless or who are at risk of
becoming homeless and who have a household with an adult member who is
an offender released from confinement within the past eighteen months.
(3) All program participants must be willing to create and actively
participate in a housing stability plan for achieving permanent housing
and greater levels of self-sufficiency.
(4) Data on all program participants must be entered into and
tracked through the Washington homeless client management information
system as described in RCW 43.185C.180. For eligible organizations
serving victims of domestic violence or sexual assault, compliance with
this subsection must be accomplished in accordance with 42 U.S.C. Sec.
11383(a)(8).
(5)(((a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, beginning in
2011, each eligible organization receiving over five hundred thousand
dollars during the previous calendar year from the transitional housing
operating and rent program and from sources including: (i) State
housing-related funding sources; (ii) the affordable housing for all
surcharge in RCW 36.22.178; (iii) the home security fund surcharges in
RCW 36.22.179 and 36.22.1791; and (iv) any other surcharge imposed
under chapter 36.22 or 43.185C RCW to fund homelessness programs or
other housing programs, shall apply to the Washington state quality
award program for an independent assessment of its quality management,
accountability, and performance system, once every three years.
(b) Cities and counties are exempt from the provisions of (a) of
this subsection until 2018.
(6))) The department may develop rules, requirements, procedures,
and guidelines as necessary to implement and operate the transitional
housing operating and rent program.
(((7))) (6) The department shall produce an annual transitional
housing operating and rent program report that must be included in the
department's homeless housing strategic plan as described in RCW
43.185C.040. The report must include performance measures to be
determined by the department that address, at a minimum, the following
issue areas:
(a) The success of the program in helping program participants
transition into permanent affordable housing and achieve self-sufficiency or increase their levels of self-sufficiency, which shall
be defined by the department based upon the costs of living, including
housing costs, needed to support: (i) One adult individual; and (ii)
two adult individuals and one preschool-aged child and one school-aged
child;
(b) The financial performance of the program related to efficient
program administration by the department and program operation by
selected eligible organizations, including an analysis of the costs per
program participant served;
(c) The quality, completeness, and timeliness of the information on
program participants provided to the Washington homeless client
management information system database; and
(d) The satisfaction of program participants in the assistance
provided through the program.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.185C.240 and 2012 c 90 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As a means of efficiently and cost-effectively providing
housing assistance to very-low income and homeless households:
(a) Any local government that has the authority to issue housing
vouchers, directly or through a contractor, using document recording
surcharge funds collected pursuant to RCW 36.22.178, 36.22.179, or
36.22.1791 must:
(i)(A) Maintain an interested landlord list, which at a minimum,
includes information on rental properties in buildings with fewer than
fifty units;
(B) Update the list at least once per quarter;
(C) Distribute the list to agencies providing services to
individuals and households receiving housing vouchers;
(D) Ensure that a copy of the list or information for accessing the
list online is provided with voucher paperwork; and
(E) Use reasonable best efforts to communicate and interact with
landlord and tenant associations located within its jurisdiction to
facilitate development, maintenance, and distribution of the list;
(ii) Using cost-effective methods of communication, convene, on a
semiannual or more frequent basis, landlords represented on the
interested landlord list and agencies providing services to individuals
and households receiving housing vouchers to identify successes,
barriers, and process improvements. The local government is not
required to reimburse any participants for expenses related to
attendance;
(iii) Produce data, limited to document recording fee uses and
expenditures, on a calendar year basis in consultation with landlords
represented on the interested landlord list and agencies providing
services to individuals and households receiving housing vouchers, that
include the following: Total amount expended from document recording
fees; amount expended on, number of households that received, and
number of housing vouchers issued in each of the private, public, and
nonprofit markets; amount expended on, number of households that
received, and number of housing placement payments provided in each of
the private, public, and nonprofit markets; amount expended on and
number of eviction prevention services provided in the private market;
and amount expended on and number of other tenant-based rent assistance
services provided in the private market. If these data elements are
not readily available, the reporting government may request the
department to use the sampling methodology established pursuant to
(((c))) (b)(iii) of this subsection to obtain the data; and
(iv) Annually submit the calendar year data to the department by
October 1st, with preliminary data submitted by October 1, 2012, and
full calendar year data submitted beginning October 1, 2013.
(b) ((Any local government receiving more than three million five
hundred thousand dollars during the previous calendar year from
document recording surcharge funds collected pursuant to RCW 36.22.178,
36.22.179, and 36.22.1791, must apply to the Washington state quality
award program, or similar Baldrige assessment organization, for an
independent assessment of its quality management, accountability, and
performance system. The first assessment may be a lite assessment.
After submitting an application, a local government is required to
reapply at least every two years.
(c))) The department must:
(i) Require contractors that provide housing vouchers to distribute
the interested landlord list created by the appropriate local
government to individuals and households receiving the housing
vouchers;
(ii) Using cost-effective methods of communication, annually
convene local governments issuing housing vouchers, landlord
association representatives, and agencies providing services to
individuals and households receiving housing vouchers to identify
successes, barriers, and process improvements. The department is not
required to reimburse any participants for expenses related to
attendance;
(iii) Develop a sampling methodology to obtain data required under
this section when a local government or contractor does not have such
information readily available. The process for developing the sampling
methodology must include providing notification to and the opportunity
for public comment by local governments issuing housing vouchers,
landlord association representatives, and agencies providing services
to individuals and households receiving housing vouchers;
(iv) Develop a report, limited to document recording fee uses and
expenditures, on a calendar year basis in consultation with local
governments, landlord association representatives, and agencies
providing services to individuals and households receiving housing
vouchers, that includes the following: Total amount expended from
document recording fees; amount expended on, number of households that
received, and number of housing vouchers issued in each of the private,
public, and nonprofit markets; amount expended on, number of households
that received, and number of housing placement payments provided in
each of the private, public, and nonprofit markets; amount expended on
and number of eviction prevention services provided in the private
market; and amount expended on and number of other tenant-based rent
assistance services provided in the private market. The information in
the report must include data submitted by local governments and data on
all additional document recording fee activities for which the
department contracted that were not otherwise reported; and
(v) Annually submit the calendar year report to the legislature by
December 15th, with a preliminary report submitted by December 15,
2012, and full calendar year reports submitted beginning December 15,
2013((; and
(vi) Work with the Washington state quality award program, local
governments, and any other organizations to ensure the appropriate
scheduling of assessments for all local governments meeting the
criteria described in subsection (1)(b) of this section)).
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Housing placement payments" means one-time payments, such as
first and last month's rent and move-in costs, funded by document
recording surcharges collected pursuant to RCW 36.22.178, 36.22.179, or
36.22.1791 that are made to secure a unit on behalf of a tenant.
(b) "Housing vouchers" means payments funded by document recording
surcharges collected pursuant to RCW 36.22.178, 36.22.179, or
36.22.1791 that are made by a local government or contractor to secure:
(i) A rental unit on behalf of an individual tenant; or (ii) a block of
units on behalf of multiple tenants.
(c) "Interested landlord list" means a list of landlords who have
indicated to a local government or contractor interest in renting to
individuals or households receiving a housing voucher funded by
document recording surcharges.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2017.
(((4) If section 1, chapter 90, Laws of 2012 is not enacted into
law by July 31, 2012, this section is null and void.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.17.390 (Quality management, accountability, and
performance system -- Independent assessment) and 2009 c 564 s 931 & 2005
c 384 s 4; and
(2) RCW 43.330.084 (Washington state quality award -- Reimbursement
of application fee) and 2007 c 249 s 4.

--- END ---