BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.26.110 and 2005 c 66 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All claims for disability shall be acted upon and either
approved or disapproved by either type of disability board authorized
to be created in this section.
(a) Each city having a population of twenty thousand or more shall
establish a disability board having jurisdiction over all members
employed by those cities and composed of the following five members:
Two members of the city legislative body to be appointed by the mayor;
one active or retired firefighter employed by or retired from the city
to be elected by the firefighters employed by or retired from the city
who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; one active or retired
law enforcement officer employed by or retired from the city to be
elected by the law enforcement officers employed by or retired from the
city who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board; and one member
from the public at large who resides within the city to be appointed by
the other four members designated in this subsection. Only those
active or retired firefighters and law enforcement officers who are
subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the right to elect under
this section. All firefighters and law enforcement officers employed
by or retired from the city are eligible for election. Each of the
elected members shall serve a two year term. If there are no
firefighters under the jurisdiction of the board eligible to vote, a
second eligible employee representative shall be elected by the law
enforcement officers eligible to vote. The members appointed pursuant
to this subsection shall serve for two year terms: PROVIDED, That
cities of the first class only, shall retain existing ((firemen's))
firefighters' pension boards established pursuant to RCW 41.16.020 and
existing boards of trustees of the relief and pension fund of the
police department as established pursuant to RCW 41.20.010 which such
boards shall have authority to act upon and approve or disapprove
claims for disability by firefighters or law enforcement officers as
provided under the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system act.
(b) Each county shall establish a disability board having
jurisdiction over all members employed by or retired from an employer
within the county and not employed by a city in which a disability
board is established. The county disability board so created shall be
composed of five members to be chosen as follows: One member of the
legislative body of the county to be appointed by the county
legislative body; one member of a city or town legislative body located
within the county which does not contain a city disability board
established pursuant to ((subsection (1)))(a) of this subsection to be
chosen by a majority of the mayors of such cities and towns within the
county which does not contain a city disability board; one active
firefighter or retired firefighter employed by or retired from an
employer within the county to be elected by the firefighters employed
or retired from an employer within the county who are not employed by
or retired from a city in which a disability board is established and
who are subject to the jurisdiction of that board; one law enforcement
officer or retired law enforcement officer employed by or retired from
an employer within the county to be elected by the law enforcement
officers employed in or retired from an employer within the county who
are not employed by or retired from a city in which a disability board
is established and who are subject to the jurisdiction of that board;
and one member from the public at large who resides within the county
but does not reside within a city in which a city disability board is
established, to be appointed by the other four members designated in
this subsection. However, in counties with a population less than
sixty thousand, the member of the disability board appointed by a
majority of the mayors of the cities and towns within the county that
do not contain a city disability board must be a resident of one of the
cities and towns but need not be a member of a city or town legislative
body. Only those active or retired firefighters and law enforcement
officers who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have the
right to elect under this section. All firefighters and law
enforcement officers employed by or retired from an employer within the
county who are not employed by or retired from a city in which a
disability board is established are eligible for election. All members
appointed or elected pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two
year terms. If there are no firefighters under the jurisdiction of the
board eligible to vote, a second eligible employee representative shall
be elected by the law enforcement officers eligible to vote. If there
are no law enforcement officers under the jurisdiction of the board
eligible to vote, a second eligible representative shall be elected by
the firefighters eligible to vote.
(2) The members of both the county and city disability boards shall
not receive compensation for their service upon the boards but the
members shall be reimbursed by their respective county or city for all
expenses incidental to such service as to the amount authorized by law.
(3) The disability boards authorized for establishment by this
section shall perform all functions, exercise all powers, and make all
such determinations as specified in this chapter.

--- END ---