BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.77.065 and 2012 c 256 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a)(i) The expert conducting the evaluation shall provide his or
her report and recommendation to the court in which the criminal
proceeding is pending. For a competency evaluation of a defendant who
is released from custody, if the evaluation cannot be completed within
twenty-one days due to a lack of cooperation by the defendant, the
evaluator shall notify the court that he or she is unable to complete
the evaluation because of such lack of cooperation.
(ii) A copy of the report and recommendation shall be provided to
the designated mental health professional, the prosecuting attorney,
the defense attorney, and the professional person at the local
correctional facility where the defendant is being held, or if there is
no professional person, to the person designated under (a)(iv) of this
subsection. Upon request, the evaluator shall also provide copies of
any source documents relevant to the evaluation to the designated
mental health professional.
(iii) Any facility providing inpatient services related to
competency shall discharge the defendant as soon as the facility
determines that the defendant is competent to stand trial. Discharge
shall not be postponed during the writing and distribution of the
evaluation report. Distribution of an evaluation report by a facility
providing inpatient services shall ordinarily be accomplished within
two working days or less following the final evaluation of the
defendant. If the defendant is discharged to the custody of a local
correctional facility, the local correctional facility must continue
the medication regimen prescribed by the facility, when clinically
appropriate, unless the defendant refuses to cooperate with medication.
(iv) If there is no professional person at the local correctional
facility, the local correctional facility shall designate a
professional person as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in cooperation with
the regional support network, a professional person at the regional
support network to receive the report and recommendation.
(v) Upon commencement of a defendant's evaluation in the local
correctional facility, the local correctional facility must notify the
evaluator of the name of the professional person, or person designated
under (a)(iv) of this subsection, to receive the report and
recommendation.
(b) If the evaluator concludes, under RCW 10.77.060(3)(f), the
person should be evaluated by a designated mental health professional
under chapter 71.05 RCW, the court shall order such evaluation be
conducted prior to release from confinement when the person is
acquitted or convicted and sentenced to confinement for twenty-four
months or less, or when charges are dismissed pursuant to a finding of
incompetent to stand trial.
(2) The designated mental health professional shall provide written
notification within twenty-four hours of the results of the
determination whether to commence proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.
The notification shall be provided to the persons identified in
subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(3) The prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the results of
any proceedings commenced by the designated mental health professional
under subsection (2) of this section to the secretary.
(4) A facility conducting a civil commitment evaluation under RCW
10.77.086(4) or 10.77.088(1)(b)(ii) that makes a determination to
release the person instead of filing a civil commitment petition must
provide written notification to the prosecuting attorney and defense
attorney within twenty-four hours of the determination.
(5) The fact of admission and all information and records compiled,
obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services under this
chapter may also be disclosed to the courts solely to prevent the entry
of any evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any
order entered under chapter 71.05 RCW.

--- END ---