BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to investigate the
various economic opportunities and industrial uses associated with
industrial hemp cultivation and production as a farm product in the
state of Washington. By commissioning a study, the legislature intends
to assess whether the state's growing conditions and economic potential
are favorable for the production of industrial hemp so that growers and
other businesses in Washington's agricultural industry may take
advantage of this market opportunity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The university shall study the
feasibility and desirability of industrial hemp production in
Washington state. The university is encouraged to conduct the study at
its Everett branch campus. In conducting the study, the university
shall gather information from agricultural and scientific literature,
consulting with experts and the public, and reviewing the best
practices of other states and countries worldwide regarding the
development of markets for industrial hemp and hemp products. The
study must include an analysis of:
(a) The market economic conditions affecting the development of an
industrial hemp industry in the state;
(b) The estimated value-added benefit that Washington's economy
would reap from having a developed industrial hemp industry in the
state;
(c) Whether Washington soils and growing conditions are appropriate
for economically viable levels of industrial hemp production;
(d) An analysis of the agronomy research being conducted worldwide
relating to industrial hemp varieties, production, and utilization,
including its use for erosion control;
(e) An analysis of other legislative acts, experiences, and
outcomes around the world regarding industrial hemp production;
(f) Recommendations for any legislative actions necessary to
encourage and support the development of an industrial hemp industry in
the state of Washington.
(2) The university shall report its findings to the legislature by
January 14, 2014.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Hemp products" includes all products made with or derived from
industrial hemp including, but not limited to, cloth, cordage, fiber,
food, fuel, paint, paper, particleboard, plastics, seed, seed meal and
seed oil for consumption, and certified seed for cultivation if the
seeds originate from industrial hemp varieties.
(b) "Industrial hemp" means all parts and varieties of the plant
cannabis sativa, cultivated or possessed by a licensed grower, whether
growing or not, that contain a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of
point three percent or less by weight, except that the THC
concentration limit of point three percent may be exceeded for licensed
industrial hemp seed research.
(c) "Tetrahydrocannabinol" or "THC" means the natural or synthetic
equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, or in the
resinous extractives of, cannabis, or any synthetic substances,
compounds, salts, or derivatives of the plant or chemicals and their
isomers with similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity.
(d) "University" means Washington State University.

--- END ---