BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2014, the department shall establish guidance for
local health jurisdictions to consider while developing community
health alert notification plans. The guidance must assist local health
jurisdictions with the adoption of community health alert notification
plans by addressing components of the plan including the:
(a) Methods for monitoring the incidence of notifiable conditions
within the local health jurisdiction and determining when the incidence
of notifiable conditions exceeds the rate that would be expected within
the particular jurisdiction; and
(b) Manner and content for informing the public within the local
health jurisdiction's territory as notifiable conditions exceed the
rate that would be expected. The department shall identify factors to
consider when determining the appropriate level of public notification
such as the risk to the public from the notifiable condition, the
duration of the higher incidence of the notifiable condition, the
extent of the increased incidence, the cost-effectiveness of various
options, and the balancing of the need to keep the public informed
without creating either undue concern or diminished receptivity to
severe public health risks.
(2) In developing the guidelines, the department shall establish a
temporary work group of public health officials, representatives of
local media establishments, and the public.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Local health jurisdiction" means a county board of health
organized under chapter 70.05 RCW, a health district organized under
chapter 70.46 RCW, or a combined city-county health department
organized under chapter 70.08 RCW.
(b) "Notifiable condition" means a disease or condition that the
state board of health has determined to be of public health importance
and must be reported to either the local health officer or the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2014, each local board of health shall adopt a
community health alert notification plan that establishes the method by
which the local health department, health district, or combined city-county health department shall keep the public who reside in its
jurisdiction informed of variations in the incidence of notifiable
conditions that exceeds the rate that would be expected. The plan must
address the elements identified in section 1 of this act and must give
consideration to the guidance established by the department.
(2) The plan must be made available to the public on the web site
of each local health department.

--- END ---