BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.5055 and 2012 c 183 s 12, 2012 c 42 s 2, and
2012 c 28 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as
follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than three
hundred sixty-four days. Twenty-four consecutive hours of the
imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds
that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the
court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based.
In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under
this subsection (1)(a)(i), the court may order not less than fifteen
days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of
electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which the
penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an
alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount
of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than three
hundred sixty-four days. Two consecutive days of the imprisonment may
not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition
of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to
the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection
(1)(b)(i), the court may order not less than thirty days of electronic
home monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home
monitoring. The county or municipality in which the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount of
alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as
follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than
three hundred sixty-four days and sixty days of electronic home
monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of sixty days
electronic home monitoring, the court may order at least an additional
four days in jail. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is
being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and sixty days of electronic
home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds
that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the
court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based;
and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than
three hundred sixty-four days and ninety days of electronic home
monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of ninety days
electronic home monitoring, the court may order at least an additional
six days in jail. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is
being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. Forty-five days of imprisonment and ninety days of
electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the
court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or
deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the
suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or
deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has two or three prior offenses within seven years shall be
punished as follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than
three hundred sixty-four days and one hundred twenty days of electronic
home monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of one hundred
twenty days of electronic home monitoring, the court may order at least
an additional eight days in jail. The offender shall pay for the cost
of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the
penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an
alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol
the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic
home monitoring. Ninety days of imprisonment and one hundred twenty
days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum
sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or
mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is
suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for
granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor
more than three hundred sixty-four days and one hundred fifty days of
electronic home monitoring. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of
one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring, the court may
order at least an additional ten days in jail. The offender shall pay
for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality
where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court
may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device
include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount
of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment
and one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars
nor more than five thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars
of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(4) A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 shall be punished under chapter 9.94A RCW if:
(a) The person has four or more prior offenses within ten years; or
(b) The person has ever previously been convicted of:
(i) A violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(ii) A violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(iii) An out-of-state offense comparable to the offense specified
in (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection; or
(iv) A violation of RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6).
(5)(a) The court shall require any person convicted of a violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance to
comply with the rules and requirements of the department regarding the
installation and use of a functioning ignition interlock device
installed on all motor vehicles operated by the person.
(b) If the court orders that a person refrain from consuming any
alcohol, the court may order the person to submit to alcohol monitoring
through an alcohol detection breathalyzer device, transdermal sensor
device, or other technology designed to detect alcohol in a person's
system. The person shall pay for the cost of the monitoring, unless
the court specifies that the cost of monitoring will be paid with funds
that are available from an alternative source identified by the court.
The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall
determine the cost.
(6) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, if a person
who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 committed
the offense while a passenger under the age of sixteen was in the
vehicle, the ((court shall)) following must occur:
(a) ((Order)) The department of licensing must require the use of
an ignition interlock or other device for an additional six months;
(b) In any case in which the person has no prior offenses within
seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or
46.61.504(6), the court must order ((a)) an additional penalty by ((a))
an additional fine of not less than one thousand dollars and not more
than five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not
be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent;
(c) In any case in which the person has one prior offense within
seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or
46.61.504(6), the court must order ((a)) an additional penalty by ((a))
an additional fine of not less than two thousand dollars and not more
than five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not
be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent;
(d) In any case in which the person has two or three prior offenses
within seven years, and except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or
46.61.504(6), the court must order ((a)) an additional penalty by ((a))
an additional fine of not less than three thousand dollars and not more
than ten thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent.
(7) In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the
limits allowed by this section, the court shall particularly consider
the following:
(a) Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was
responsible for injury or damage to another or another's property; and
(b) Whether at the time of the offense the person was driving or in
physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers.
(8) An offender punishable under this section is subject to the
alcohol assessment and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.
(9) The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person
convicted of driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:
(a) If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if
for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
suspended or denied by the department for ninety days;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years;
(b) If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for one year;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for nine hundred days; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years; or
(c) If by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308, there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there have been no prior offenses within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for three years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more previous offenses within
seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years.
The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for any
portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under
this subsection for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under
RCW 46.20.3101 arising out of the same incident.
Upon its own motion or upon motion by a person, a court may find,
on the record, that notice to the department under RCW 46.20.270 has
been delayed for three years or more as a result of a clerical or court
error. If so, the court may order that the person's license, permit,
or nonresident privilege shall not be revoked, suspended, or denied for
that offense. The court shall send notice of the finding and order to
the department and to the person. Upon receipt of the notice from the
court, the department shall not revoke, suspend, or deny the license,
permit, or nonresident privilege of the person for that offense.
For purposes of this subsection (9), the department shall refer to
the driver's record maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the
existence of prior offenses.
(10) After expiration of any period of suspension, revocation, or
denial of the offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive
required by this section, the department shall place the offender's
driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.
(11)(a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail
sentence required by this section, whenever the court imposes up to
three hundred sixty-four days in jail, the court shall also suspend but
shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not exceeding five
years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that include:
(i) Not driving a motor vehicle within this state without a valid
license to drive and proof of financial responsibility for the future;
(ii) not driving a motor vehicle within this state while having an
alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more within two hours after driving;
and (iii) not refusing to submit to a test of his or her breath or
blood to determine alcohol concentration upon request of a law
enforcement officer who has reasonable grounds to believe the person
was driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within
this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor. The court
may impose conditions of probation that include nonrepetition,
installation of an ignition interlock device on the probationer's motor
vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment, supervised probation, or other
conditions that may be appropriate. The sentence may be imposed in
whole or in part upon violation of a condition of probation during the
suspension period.
(b) For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under
(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection, the court shall order the
convicted person to be confined for thirty days, which shall not be
suspended or deferred.
(c) For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory
condition of probation imposed under this subsection, the license,
permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be suspended by the
court for thirty days or, if such license, permit, or privilege to
drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the finding
of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial
then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall
notify the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any
extension of a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this
subsection.
(12) A court may waive the electronic home monitoring requirements
of this chapter when:
(a) The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or
any other necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system;
(b) The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or
(c) The court determines that there is reason to believe that the
offender would violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring
penalty.
Whenever the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring
is waived, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the
waiver and the facts upon which the waiver is based, and shall impose
an alternative sentence with similar punitive consequences. The
alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to, additional
jail time, work crew, or work camp.
Whenever the combination of jail time and electronic home
monitoring or alternative sentence would exceed three hundred sixty-four days, the offender shall serve the jail portion of the sentence
first, and the electronic home monitoring or alternative portion of the
sentence shall be reduced so that the combination does not exceed three
hundred sixty-four days.
(13) An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or
not a mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an
extraordinary medical placement by the jail administrator subject to
the standards and limitations set forth in RCW 9.94A.728(3).
(14) For purposes of this section and RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504:
(a) A "prior offense" means any of the following:
(i) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(ii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(iii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a conviction
for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed in a reckless manner or with
the disregard for the safety of others if the conviction is the result
of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.520
committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(iv) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or a conviction
for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed in a reckless manner or with
the disregard for the safety of others if the conviction is the result
of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.522
committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(v) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or
9A.36.050 or an equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the
result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW
46.61.520 or 46.61.522;
(vi) An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have
been a violation of (a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this
subsection if committed in this state;
(vii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an
equivalent local ordinance;
(viii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local
ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred prosecution was
granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or
46.61.522; or
(ix) A deferred prosecution granted in another state for a
violation of driving or having physical control of a vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the out-of-state deferred prosecution is equivalent to the deferred prosecution
under chapter 10.05 RCW, including a requirement that the defendant
participate in a chemical dependency treatment program;
If a deferred prosecution is revoked based on a subsequent
conviction for an offense listed in this subsection (14)(a), the
subsequent conviction shall not be treated as a prior offense of the
revoked deferred prosecution for the purposes of sentencing;
(b) "Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within seven years before or after the arrest for the current
offense; and
(c) "Within ten years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within ten years before or after the arrest for the current
offense.

--- END ---