BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) An automated external defibrillator is often a critical
component in the chain of survival for a cardiac arrest victim.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with school districts and stakeholder groups, shall
develop guidance for a medical emergency response and automated
external defibrillator program for high schools.
(3) The medical emergency response and automated external
defibrillator program must comply with current evidence-based guidance
from the American heart association or other national science
organization.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the department of health, shall assist districts in
carrying out the provisions of this section, including procedures to
seek grants for the purchase of automated external defibrillators or to
seek donations of automated external defibrillators. The
superintendent may coordinate with local health districts or other
organizations in seeking grants and donations for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction and its
employees and agents are not liable for injuries or accidents involving
automated external defibrillators.

--- END ---