BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this chapter is to establish
a training program for managers of manufactured housing communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Manufactured housing community" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 59.20.030.
(2) "Manufactured housing community management" means those
actions, functions, or duties related to the management of a
manufactured housing community including, but not limited to, the
collection of rent and other charges, renting mobile home lots, the
enforcement of the terms of tenancy, and the implementation of landlord
and tenant duties and responsibilities under chapter 59.20 RCW.
(3) "Manufactured housing community manager" means a person who
performs manufactured housing community management, and is required to
be trained under this chapter to perform manufactured housing community
management services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A person must not manage a manufactured
housing community in this state beyond the grace period identified in
subsection (3) of this section until the person has received
manufactured housing community manager training in accordance with this
chapter.
(2) An owner of a manufactured housing community is not required to
be trained under this chapter if the owner employs a resident manager,
property manager, or independent contract manager trained under this
chapter to perform manufactured housing community management duties.
(3) If a person becomes a manufactured housing community manager
and has not previously received manufactured housing community manager
training as required in this chapter, the person must complete
manufactured housing community manager training within one year of
beginning employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Any person required to be trained as a
manufactured housing community manager must acquire a certificate of
completion of training from an approved manufactured housing community
manager training program.
(2) The certificate of completion of training must:
(a) Be made available for view by the public; and
(b) Indicate that the person has satisfactorily completed a minimum
of four hours of manufactured housing community manager training as
prescribed under subsection (4) of this section.
(3) A certificate of completion of training is effective upon the
date of issue and is valid for one year.
(4) A minimum of four hours of manufactured housing community
manager training is required annually.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Any statewide nonprofit association
exclusively representing manufactured housing communities may
administer the manufactured housing community manager training courses
as required under this chapter. The association may set and charge a
fee between ninety and one hundred twenty dollars for the training
courses. The association may increase the fee above one hundred twenty
dollars only after approval by the advisory council on manufactured
housing community manager training.
(2) Any statewide nonprofit association performing the manufactured
housing community manager training must develop the curriculum of the
training course with approval from the advisory council on manufactured
housing community manager training.
(3) The training course must include a one-hour presentation by a
representative of the manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution
program. The representative must provide an overview of the
manufactured/mobile home dispute resolution program as well as
highlight cases that have been before the dispute resolution program as
case studies. If a representative is unavailable, a representative
from any statewide nonprofit association exclusively representing
manufactured housing community tenants must conduct the one-hour
presentation. The presenter is entitled to mileage reimbursement from
the association conducting the training.
(4) Any association performing manufactured housing community
manager training must issue certificates of completion of training to
qualified training attendees, and must maintain a list of the names of
attendees completing the manufactured housing community manager
training to be made available to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) An advisory council on manufactured
housing community manager training is created. The council must
consist of four members as follows: Two members of the council must be
current residents of manufactured housing communities who own their own
homes; and two members must be owners of manufactured housing
communities.
(2) The resident members of the advisory council must be selected
by statewide associations exclusively representing manufactured housing
community tenants, with one member from each of the two largest
statewide nonprofit associations exclusively representing manufactured
housing community tenants. The owner members of the advisory council
must be selected by statewide associations exclusively representing
manufactured housing community owners. Terms for council members are
four years.
(3) Members of the advisory council must serve without
compensation, but are entitled to receive reimbursement for travel
expenses as provided by law.
(4) The advisory council must:
(a) Review and approve the curriculum of the manufactured housing
community manager training program;
(b) Consider training course fee increases as proposed by an
association under section 5(1) of this act; and
(c) Meet at the call of its chair, at the request of a majority of
its membership, a minimum of once per year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The manufactured/mobile home dispute
resolution program created under RCW 59.30.030, in consultation with
the advisory council on manufactured housing community manager
training, may enforce this chapter and must facilitate the maintenance
of a listing composed of those individuals who have successfully
completed manufactured housing community manager training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 No government agency, trade association, or
instructor of the manufactured housing community manager training
program is responsible for the conduct of a landlord, manager, owner,
or other person attending manufactured housing community manager
training under this chapter. This section does not create a cause of
action against any government agency, trade association, or instructor
of the manufactured housing community manager training program related
to manufactured housing community manager training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 No government agency, trade association,
instructor of the manufactured housing community manager training
program, or member of the advisory council on manufactured housing
community manager training is responsible for the conduct of any person
required to comply with this chapter. This section does not create a
cause of action against any government agency, trade association,
instructor of the manufactured housing community manager training
program, or member of the advisory council on manufactured housing
community manager training for a violation of this chapter by any
person required to comply with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A violation of this chapter is a class 1
civil infraction under RCW 7.80.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 3 through 5 of this act take
effect July 1, 2014, or six months after review and approval of the
initial curriculum for the manufactured housing community manager
training program by the advisory council on manufactured housing
community manager training under section 6(4) of this act, whichever
occurs later.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Except for sections 3 through 5 of this
act, this act takes effect August 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 13 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 59 RCW.

--- END ---