BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The systems responsible for financing, administration, and
delivery of publicly funded mental health and chemical dependency
services to adults must be designed and administered to achieve
improved outcomes for adult clients served by those systems through
increased use and development of evidence-based, research-based, and
promising practices, as defined in RCW 71.24.025. For purposes of this
section, client outcomes include: Improved health status; increased
participation in employment and education; reduced involvement with the
criminal justice system; enhanced safety and access to treatment for
forensic patients; reduction in avoidable utilization of and costs
associated with hospital, emergency room, and crisis services;
increased housing stability; improved quality of life, including
measures of recovery and resilience; and decreased population level
disparities in access to treatment and treatment outcomes.
(2) To implement a strategy for the improvement of the adult
behavioral health system:
(a) The department must establish a steering committee that
includes at least the following members: Behavioral health service
recipients and their families; local government; representatives of
regional support networks; representatives of county coordinators; law
enforcement; city and county jails; tribal representatives; behavioral
health service providers; housing providers; medicaid managed care plan
representatives; long-term care service providers; the Washington state
hospital association; individuals with expertise in evidence-based and
research-based behavioral health service practices; and the health care
authority.
(b) The adult behavioral health system improvement strategy must
include:
(i) An assessment of the capacity of the current publicly funded
behavioral health services system to provide evidence-based, research-based, and promising practices;
(ii) Identification, development, and increased use of evidence-based, research-based, and promising practices;
(iii) Design and implementation of a transparent quality management
system, including analysis of current system capacity to implement
outcomes reporting and development of baseline and improvement targets
for each outcome measure provided in this section; and
(iv) Identification of behavioral health services delivery and
financing mechanisms that will best promote improvement of the
behavioral health system described in this section.
(c) The department must seek private foundation and federal grant
funding to support the adult behavioral health system improvement
strategy.
(d) By August 1, 2014, the department must report to the governor
and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the legislature on the
status of implementation of the behavioral health improvement strategy,
including strategies developed, timelines, and costs to implement the
adult behavioral health system improvement strategy.
(3) The department must contract for the services of an independent
consultant to review the provision of forensic mental health services
in Washington state and provide recommendations as to whether and how
the state's forensic mental health system should be modified to provide
an appropriate treatment environment for individuals with mental
disorders who have been charged with a crime while enhancing the safety
and security of the public and other patients and staff at forensic
treatment facilities. By August 1, 2014, the department must submit a
report regarding the recommendations of the independent consultant to
the governor and the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.97 RCW
to read as follows:
To the extent that funds are specifically appropriated for this
purpose, the department must issue a request for a proposal for
enhanced services facility services by June 1, 2014, and complete the
procurement process by January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW
to read as follows:
When a person has been involuntarily committed for treatment to a
hospital for a period of ninety or one hundred eighty days, and the
superintendent or professional person in charge of the hospital
determines that the person no longer requires active psychiatric
treatment at an inpatient level of care, the regional support network
responsible for resource management services for the person must work
with the hospital to develop an individualized discharge plan and
arrange for a transition to the community in accordance with the
person's individualized discharge plan within twenty-one days of the
determination.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.24.025 and 2012 c 10 s 59 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Acutely mentally ill" means a condition which is limited to a
short-term severe crisis episode of:
(a) A mental disorder as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case
of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020;
(b) Being gravely disabled as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the
case of a child, a gravely disabled minor as defined in RCW 71.34.020;
or
(c) Presenting a likelihood of serious harm as defined in RCW
71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020.
(2) "Available resources" means funds appropriated for the purpose
of providing community mental health programs, federal funds, except
those provided according to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and
state funds appropriated under this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW by the
legislature during any biennium for the purpose of providing
residential services, resource management services, community support
services, and other mental health services. This does not include
funds appropriated for the purpose of operating and administering the
state psychiatric hospitals.
(3) "Child" means a person under the age of eighteen years.
(4) "Chronically mentally ill adult" or "adult who is chronically
mentally ill" means an adult who has a mental disorder and meets at
least one of the following criteria:
(a) Has undergone two or more episodes of hospital care for a
mental disorder within the preceding two years; or
(b) Has experienced a continuous psychiatric hospitalization or
residential treatment exceeding six months' duration within the
preceding year; or
(c) Has been unable to engage in any substantial gainful activity
by reason of any mental disorder which has lasted for a continuous
period of not less than twelve months. "Substantial gainful activity"
shall be defined by the department by rule consistent with Public Law
92-603, as amended.
(5) "Clubhouse" means a community-based program that provides
rehabilitation services and is certified by the department of social
and health services.
(6) "Community mental health program" means all mental health
services, activities, or programs using available resources.
(7) "Community mental health service delivery system" means public
or private agencies that provide services specifically to persons with
mental disorders as defined under RCW 71.05.020 and receive funding
from public sources.
(8) "Community support services" means services authorized,
planned, and coordinated through resource management services
including, at a minimum, assessment, diagnosis, emergency crisis
intervention available twenty-four hours, seven days a week,
prescreening determinations for persons who are mentally ill being
considered for placement in nursing homes as required by federal law,
screening for patients being considered for admission to residential
services, diagnosis and treatment for children who are acutely mentally
ill or severely emotionally disturbed discovered under screening
through the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis,
and treatment program, investigation, legal, and other nonresidential
services under chapter 71.05 RCW, case management services, psychiatric
treatment including medication supervision, counseling, psychotherapy,
assuring transfer of relevant patient information between service
providers, recovery services, and other services determined by regional
support networks.
(9) "Consensus-based" means a program or practice that has general
support among treatment providers and experts, based on experience or
professional literature, and may have anecdotal or case study support,
or that is agreed but not possible to perform studies with random
assignment and controlled groups.
(10) "County authority" means the board of county commissioners,
county council, or county executive having authority to establish a
community mental health program, or two or more of the county
authorities specified in this subsection which have entered into an
agreement to provide a community mental health program.
(11) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(12) "Designated mental health professional" means a mental health
professional designated by the county or other authority authorized in
rule to perform the duties specified in this chapter.
(13) "Emerging best practice" or "promising practice" means a
((practice that presents, based on preliminary information, potential
for becoming a research-based or consensus-based practice)) program or
practice that, based on statistical analyses or a well established
theory of change, shows potential for meeting the evidence-based or
research-based criteria, which may include the use of a program that is
evidence-based for outcomes other than those listed in subsection (14)
of this section.
(14) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has ((had
multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations
demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the
population)) been tested in heterogeneous or intended populations with
multiple randomized, or statistically controlled evaluations, or both;
or one large multiple site randomized, or statistically controlled
evaluation, or both, where the weight of the evidence from a systemic
review demonstrates sustained improvements in at least one outcome.
"Evidence-based" also means a program or practice that can be
implemented with a set of procedures to allow successful replication in
Washington and, when possible, is determined to be cost-beneficial.
(15) "Licensed service provider" means an entity licensed according
to this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW or an entity deemed to meet state
minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a recognized
behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a current
agreement with the department, that meets state minimum standards or
persons licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.71, 18.83, or 18.79 RCW, as it
applies to registered nurses and advanced registered nurse
practitioners.
(16) "Long-term inpatient care" means inpatient services for
persons committed for, or voluntarily receiving intensive treatment
for, periods of ninety days or greater under chapter 71.05 RCW. "Long-term inpatient care" as used in this chapter does not include: (a)
Services for individuals committed under chapter 71.05 RCW who are
receiving services pursuant to a conditional release or a court-ordered
less restrictive alternative to detention; or (b) services for
individuals voluntarily receiving less restrictive alternative
treatment on the grounds of the state hospital.
(17) "Mental health services" means all services provided by
regional support networks and other services provided by the state for
persons who are mentally ill.
(18) "Mentally ill persons," "persons who are mentally ill," and
"the mentally ill" mean persons and conditions defined in subsections
(1), (4), (27), and (28) of this section.
(19) "Recovery" means the process in which people are able to live,
work, learn, and participate fully in their communities.
(20) "Regional support network" means a county authority or group
of county authorities or other entity recognized by the secretary in
contract in a defined region.
(21) "Registration records" include all the records of the
department, regional support networks, treatment facilities, and other
persons providing services to the department, county departments, or
facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness.
(22) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has ((some
research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the
standard of evidence-based practices)) been tested with a single
randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both,
demonstrating sustained desirable outcomes; or where the weight of the
evidence from a systemic review supports sustained outcomes as
described in subsection (14) of this section but does not meet the full
criteria for evidence-based.
(23) "Residential services" means a complete range of residences
and supports authorized by resource management services and which may
involve a facility, a distinct part thereof, or services which support
community living, for persons who are acutely mentally ill, adults who
are chronically mentally ill, children who are severely emotionally
disturbed, or adults who are seriously disturbed and determined by the
regional support network to be at risk of becoming acutely or
chronically mentally ill. The services shall include at least
evaluation and treatment services as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW,
acute crisis respite care, long-term adaptive and rehabilitative care,
and supervised and supported living services, and shall also include
any residential services developed to service persons who are mentally
ill in nursing homes, assisted living facilities, and adult family
homes, and may include outpatient services provided as an element in a
package of services in a supported housing model. Residential services
for children in out-of-home placements related to their mental disorder
shall not include the costs of food and shelter, except for children's
long-term residential facilities existing prior to January 1, 1991.
(24) "Resilience" means the personal and community qualities that
enable individuals to rebound from adversity, trauma, tragedy, threats,
or other stresses, and to live productive lives.
(25) "Resource management services" mean the planning,
coordination, and authorization of residential services and community
support services administered pursuant to an individual service plan
for: (a) Adults and children who are acutely mentally ill; (b) adults
who are chronically mentally ill; (c) children who are severely
emotionally disturbed; or (d) adults who are seriously disturbed and
determined solely by a regional support network to be at risk of
becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. Such planning,
coordination, and authorization shall include mental health screening
for children eligible under the federal Title XIX early and periodic
screening, diagnosis, and treatment program. Resource management
services include seven day a week, twenty-four hour a day availability
of information regarding enrollment of adults and children who are
mentally ill in services and their individual service plan to
designated mental health professionals, evaluation and treatment
facilities, and others as determined by the regional support network.
(26) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.
(27) "Seriously disturbed person" means a person who:
(a) Is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to
himself or herself or others, or to the property of others, as a result
of a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW;
(b) Has been on conditional release status, or under a less
restrictive alternative order, at some time during the preceding two
years from an evaluation and treatment facility or a state mental
health hospital;
(c) Has a mental disorder which causes major impairment in several
areas of daily living;
(d) Exhibits suicidal preoccupation or attempts; or
(e) Is a child diagnosed by a mental health professional, as
defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, as experiencing a mental disorder which
is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school
or with peers or is clearly interfering with the child's personality
development and learning.
(28) "Severely emotionally disturbed child" or "child who is
severely emotionally disturbed" means a child who has been determined
by the regional support network to be experiencing a mental disorder as
defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, including those mental disorders that
result in a behavioral or conduct disorder, that is clearly interfering
with the child's functioning in family or school or with peers and who
meets at least one of the following criteria:
(a) Has undergone inpatient treatment or placement outside of the
home related to a mental disorder within the last two years;
(b) Has undergone involuntary treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW
within the last two years;
(c) Is currently served by at least one of the following child-serving systems: Juvenile justice, child-protection/welfare, special
education, or developmental disabilities;
(d) Is at risk of escalating maladjustment due to:
(i) Chronic family dysfunction involving a caretaker who is
mentally ill or inadequate;
(ii) Changes in custodial adult;
(iii) Going to, residing in, or returning from any placement
outside of the home, for example, psychiatric hospital, short-term
inpatient, residential treatment, group or foster home, or a
correctional facility;
(iv) Subject to repeated physical abuse or neglect;
(v) Drug or alcohol abuse; or
(vi) Homelessness.
(29) "State minimum standards" means minimum requirements
established by rules adopted by the secretary and necessary to
implement this chapter for: (a) Delivery of mental health services;
(b) licensed service providers for the provision of mental health
services; (c) residential services; and (d) community support services
and resource management services.
(30) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records
concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received
services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department, by
regional support networks and their staffs, and by treatment
facilities. Treatment records do not include notes or records
maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services
for the department, regional support networks, or a treatment facility
if the notes or records are not available to others.
(31) "Tribal authority," for the purposes of this section and RCW
71.24.300 only, means: The federally recognized Indian tribes and the
major Indian organizations recognized by the secretary insofar as these
organizations do not have a financial relationship with any regional
support network that would present a conflict of interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1,
2018.

--- END ---