BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the adoption of
Initiative Measure No. 1183 by the voters in 2011 privatized the sale
and distribution of spirits in Washington. The legislature also finds
that reporting requirements for all liquor taxes and fees are
administratively complex and require payment and reporting to multiple
state agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW
to read as follows:
By September 30, 2013, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the
board and the department of revenue must make recommendations to the
legislature that detail the statutory changes necessary to: Streamline
the collection of liquor taxes, fees, and reports; and require a
singular state agency to be responsible for the collection of this
revenue and information.

--- END ---