BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that progress is
being made in making dual high school and college credit courses
available for students:
(a) Overall dual credit program enrollments increased by almost
four percent between 2009 and 2012;
(b) The number of dual credit programs offered by Washington high
schools increased by almost fifteen percent between the 2009-10 school
year and the 2011-12 school year; and
(c) Dual credit program participation rates for low-income students
increased more than fourteen percent between the 2009-10 school year
and the 2011-12 school year.
(2) However, the legislature further finds that more can be done to
promote academic acceleration for all students and eliminate barriers,
real or perceived, that may prevent students from enrolling in rigorous
advanced courses, including dual credit courses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By September 1, 2013, each school district board of directors
must adopt an academic acceleration policy for high school students as
provided under this section.
(2) Under the academic acceleration policy:
(a) The district must automatically enroll any student who meets
the state standard on the high school statewide student assessment or
meets a district-approved minimum threshold score on the preliminary
scholastic aptitude test (PSAT) in the next most rigorous level of
advanced courses offered by the high school. Students who successfully
complete such an advanced course must then be enrolled in the next most
rigorous level of advanced course, with the objective that students
will eventually be automatically enrolled in courses that offer the
opportunity to earn dual credit for high school and college.
(b) The subject matter of the advanced courses in which the student
is automatically enrolled depends on the content area or areas of the
statewide student assessment where the student has met the state
standard or has met the minimum threshold score on the PSAT. Students
who meet the state standard on both end-of-course mathematics
assessments are considered to have met the state standard for high
school mathematics. Students who meet the state standard in both
reading and writing are eligible for enrollment in advanced courses in
English, social studies, humanities, and other related subjects.
Students who meet the minimum threshold score on the math problem-solving skills portion of the PSAT are eligible for enrollment in
advanced courses in mathematics and science. Students who meet the
minimum threshold score in the critical reading skills and writing
skills sections of the PSAT are eligible for enrollment in advanced
courses in English, social studies, humanities, and other related
subjects.
(c) The district must notify students and parents or guardians
regarding the academic acceleration policy and the advanced courses
available to students.
(d) The district must provide a parent or guardian with an
opportunity to opt out of the academic acceleration policy and enroll
a student in an alternative course.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose,
the academic acceleration incentive program is established as provided
in this section. The intent of the legislature is that the funds
awarded under the program be used to support teacher training,
curriculum, technology, examination fees, and other costs associated
with offering dual credit courses to high school students.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
allocate half of the funds appropriated under subsection (1) of this
section by calculating each high school's growth of year-to-year dual
credit students based on the data collected pursuant to section 4 of
this act, identify the schools in the top ten percent, and allocate the
funds to districts based on the rankings of the districts' high
schools. Funding shares to districts must be calculated such that high
schools receive amounts proportional to the individual school's share
of the number of students enrolled in dual credit courses in the top
ten percent of schools identified. Districts receiving this funding
must distribute it to the identified schools for the purposes of
subsection (1) of this section. A student who earns more than one dual
credit in the same school year counts only once for the purposes of the
incentive award.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
allocate half of the funds appropriated under subsection (1) of this
section to school districts for the purpose of promoting the growth of
enrollment in dual credit courses. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction will distribute funding by calculating each high
school's percent of student enrollment in a dual credit program, rank
the high schools by the percent of student enrollment, identify the
lowest twenty-five percent, and allocate the money to the districts.
Funding shares to districts must be calculated such that high schools
in the lowest quartile receive amounts proportional to their total
student enrollment. Districts must further distribute the funding to
the identified schools to promote and encourage increased enrollment in
dual credit courses, or for one of the purposes outlined in subsection
(1) of this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the following students are
considered to have earned dual high school and college credit in a
course offered by a high school:
(a) Students who achieve a score of three or higher on an AP
examination;
(b) Students who achieve a score of four or higher on an
examination of the international baccalaureate diploma programme;
(c) Students who successfully complete a Cambridge advanced
international certificate of education examination;
(d) Students who successfully complete a course through the college
in the high school program under RCW 28A.600.290 and are awarded credit
by the partnering institution of higher education;
(e) Students who successfully complete a course through the running
start program under RCW 28A.600.300 and are awarded credit by a
partnering institution of higher education; and
(f) Students who satisfy the dual enrollment and class performance
requirements to earn college credit through a career and technical
education or tech prep course.
(5) If a high school provides access to online courses for students
to earn dual high school and college credit at no cost to the student,
such a course is considered to be offered by the high school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to data on student enrollment in dual credit courses,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collect
and post on the Washington state report card web site the rates at
which students earn college credit through a dual credit course, using
the following criteria:
(1) Students who achieve a score of three or higher on an AP
examination;
(2) Students who achieve a score of four or higher on an
examination of the international baccalaureate diploma programme;
(3) Students who successfully complete a Cambridge advanced
international certificate of education examination;
(4) Students who successfully complete a course through the college
in the high school program under RCW 28A.600.290 and are awarded credit
by the partnering institution of higher education;
(5) Students who satisfy the dual enrollment and class performance
requirements to earn college credit through a tech prep course; and
(6) Students who successfully complete a course through the running
start program under RCW 28A.600.300 and are awarded credit by the
institution of higher education.

--- END ---