BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.600.015 and 2006 c 263 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt and
distribute to all school districts lawful and reasonable rules
prescribing the substantive and procedural due process guarantees of
pupils in the common schools. Such rules shall authorize a school
district to use informal due process procedures in connection with the
short-term suspension of students to the extent constitutionally
permissible: PROVIDED, That the superintendent of public instruction
deems the interest of students to be adequately protected. When a
student suspension or expulsion is appealed, the rules shall authorize
a school district to impose the suspension or expulsion temporarily
after an initial hearing for no more than ten consecutive school days
or until the appeal is decided, whichever is earlier. Any days that
the student is temporarily suspended or expelled before the appeal is
decided shall be applied to the term of the student suspension or
expulsion and shall not limit or extend the term of the student
suspension or expulsion. An expulsion or suspension of a student may
not be for an indefinite period of time.
(2) Short-term suspension procedures may be used for suspensions of
students up to and including, ten consecutive school days.
(3) Emergency expulsions must end or be converted to another form
of corrective action within ten school days from the date of the
emergency removal from school. Notice and due process rights must be
provided when an emergency expulsion is converted to another form of
corrective action.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.600.020 and 2006 c 263 s 706 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The rules adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.600.010 shall be
interpreted to ensure that the optimum learning atmosphere of the
classroom is maintained, and that the highest consideration is given to
the judgment of qualified certificated educators regarding conditions
necessary to maintain the optimum learning atmosphere.
(2) Any student who creates a disruption of the educational process
in violation of the building disciplinary standards while under a
teacher's immediate supervision may be excluded by the teacher from his
or her individual classroom and instructional or activity area for all
or any portion of the balance of the school day, or up to the following
two days, or until the principal or designee and teacher have
conferred, whichever occurs first. Except in emergency circumstances,
the teacher first must attempt one or more alternative forms of
corrective action. In no event without the consent of the teacher may
an excluded student return to the class during the balance of that
class or activity period or up to the following two days, or until the
principal or his or her designee and the teacher have conferred.
(3) In order to preserve a beneficial learning environment for all
students and to maintain good order and discipline in each classroom,
every school district board of directors shall provide that written
procedures are developed for administering discipline at each school
within the district. Such procedures shall be developed with the
participation of parents and the community, and shall provide that the
teacher, principal or designee, and other authorities designated by the
board of directors, make every reasonable attempt to involve the parent
or guardian and the student in the resolution of student discipline
problems. Such procedures shall provide that students may be excluded
from their individual classes or activities for periods of time in
excess of that provided in subsection (2) of this section if such
students have repeatedly disrupted the learning of other students. The
procedures must be consistent with the rules of the superintendent of
public instruction and must provide for early involvement of parents in
attempts to improve the student's behavior.
(4) The procedures shall assure, pursuant to RCW 28A.400.110, that
all staff work cooperatively toward consistent enforcement of proper
student behavior throughout each school as well as within each
classroom.
(5)(a) A principal shall consider imposing long-term suspension or
expulsion as a sanction when deciding the appropriate disciplinary
action for a student who, after July 27, 1997:
(((a))) (i) Engages in two or more violations within a three-year
period of RCW 9A.46.120, 28A.320.135, 28A.600.455, 28A.600.460,
28A.635.020, 28A.600.020, 28A.635.060, 9.41.280, or 28A.320.140; or
(((b))) (ii) Engages in one or more of the offenses listed in RCW
13.04.155.
(b) The principal shall communicate the disciplinary action taken
by the principal to the school personnel who referred the student to
the principal for disciplinary action.
(6) Any corrective action involving a suspension or expulsion from
school for more than ten days must have an end date of not more than
one calendar year from the time of corrective action. Districts shall
make reasonable efforts to assist students and parents in returning to
an educational setting prior to and no later than the end date of the
corrective action. Where warranted based on public health or safety,
a school district may petition the superintendent of public
instruction, pursuant to policies and procedures adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction, for authorization to exceed the
one calendar year limitation provided in this subsection.
(7) Nothing in this section prevents a public school district,
educational service district, the Washington state center for childhood
deafness and hearing loss, or the state school for the blind if it has
suspended or expelled a student from the student's regular school
setting from providing educational services to the student in an
alternative setting or modifying the suspension or expulsion on a case-by-case basis.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.600.410 and 1992 c 155 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state of Washington excludes tens of thousands of students from
school each year due to out-of-school suspensions and expulsions. Out-of-school suspensions and expulsions contribute to poor academic
achievement, lower graduation rates, and higher dropout rates. It is
the intent of the legislature to minimize the use of out-of-school
suspension and expulsion and its impact on student achievement by
reducing the number of days that students are excluded from school due
to disciplinary action. Student behavior should not result in the
permanent loss of educational opportunity in the public school system.
School districts are encouraged to find alternatives to suspension
including reducing the length of a student's suspension conditioned by
the commencement of counseling or other treatment services. Consistent
with current law, the conditioning of a student's suspension does not
obligate the school district to pay for the counseling or other
treatment services except for those stipulated and agreed to by the
district at the inception of the suspension.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.300.046 and 2011 c 288 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
establishing a standard definition of student absence from school. In
adopting the definition, the superintendent shall review current
practices in Washington school districts, definitions used in other
states, and any national standards or definitions used by the national
center for education statistics or other national groups. The
superintendent shall also consult with the building bridges work group
established under RCW 28A.175.075.
(b) Using the definition of student absence adopted under this
section, the superintendent shall establish an indicator for measuring
student attendance in high schools for purposes of the PASS program
under RCW 28A.175.130.
(2)(a) The K-12 data governance group under RCW 28A.300.507 shall
establish the parameters and an implementation schedule for statewide
collection through the comprehensive education and data research system
of: (i) Student attendance data using the definitions of student
absence adopted under this section; and (ii) student discipline data
with a focus on suspensions and expulsions from school.
(b) ((At a minimum,)) Student suspension and expulsion data
collected for the purposes of this subsection (2) must be:
(i) Made publicly available and easily accessible on the
superintendent of public instruction's web site; and
(ii) Disaggregated and crosstabulated as established under RCW
28A.300.042.
(c) School districts must collect and submit student attendance
data and student discipline data for high school students through the
comprehensive education and data research system for purposes of the
PASS program under RCW 28A.175.130 beginning in the 2012-13 school
year.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.300.042 and 2009 c 468 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All student data-related reports required of the superintendent
of public instruction in this title must be disaggregated by at least
the following subgroups of students: White, Black, Hispanic, American
Indian/Alaskan Native, Asian, Pacific Islander/Hawaiian Native, low
income, transitional bilingual, migrant, special education, and
students covered by section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of
1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794).
(2) All student data-related reports required of the superintendent
of public instruction regarding student suspensions and expulsions as
required in RCW 28A.300.046 are subject to disaggregation by subgroups
including:
(a) Gender;
(b) Foster care;
(c) Homeless;
(d) School district;
(e) School;
(f) Grade level;
(g) Behavior infraction code, including:
(i) Bullying;
(ii) Tobacco;
(iii) Alcohol;
(iv) Illicit drug;
(v) Fighting without major injury;
(vi) Violence without major injury;
(vii) Violence with major injury;
(viii) Possession of a weapon; and
(ix) Other behavior resulting from a short-term or long-term
suspension, expulsion, or interim alternative education setting
intervention;
(h) Intervention applied, including:
(i) Short-term suspension;
(ii) Long-term suspension;
(iii) Emergency expulsion;
(iv) Expulsion;
(v) Interim alternative education settings;
(vi) No intervention applied; and
(vii) Other intervention applied that is not described in this
subsection (2)(h);
(i) Number of days a student is suspended or expelled, to be
counted in half or full days; and
(j) Any other categories added at a future date by the data
governance group.
(3) All student data-related reports required of the superintendent
of public instruction regarding student suspensions and expulsions as
required in RCW 28A.300.046 are subject to cross-tabulation at a
minimum by the following:
(a) School and district;
(b) Race, low income, special education, transitional bilingual,
migrant, foster care, homeless, students covered by section 504 of the
federal rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794),
and categories to be added in the future;
(c) Behavior infraction code; and
(d) Intervention applied.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.300.507 and 2009 c 548 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A K-12 data governance group shall be established within the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to assist in the
design and implementation of a K-12 education data improvement system
for financial, student, and educator data. It is the intent that the
data system reporting specifically serve requirements for teachers,
parents, superintendents, school boards, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the legislature, and the public.
(2) The K-12 data governance group shall include representatives of
the education data center, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, the professional educator standards board, the state board
of education, and school district staff, including information
technology staff. Additional entities with expertise in education data
may be included in the K-12 data governance group.
(3) The K-12 data governance group shall:
(a) Identify the critical research and policy questions that need
to be addressed by the K-12 education data improvement system;
(b) Identify reports and other information that should be made
available on the internet in addition to the reports identified in
subsection (5) of this section;
(c) Create a comprehensive needs requirement document detailing the
specific information and technical capacity needed by school districts
and the state to meet the legislature's expectations for a
comprehensive K-12 education data improvement system as described under
RCW 28A.655.210;
(d) Conduct a gap analysis of current and planned information
compared to the needs requirement document, including an analysis of
the strengths and limitations of an education data system and programs
currently used by school districts and the state, and specifically the
gap analysis must look at the extent to which the existing data can be
transformed into canonical form and where existing software can be used
to meet the needs requirement document;
(e) Focus on financial and cost data necessary to support the new
K-12 financial models and funding formulas, including any necessary
changes to school district budgeting and accounting, and on assuring
the capacity to link data across financial, student, and educator
systems; and
(f) Define the operating rules and governance structure for K-12
data collections, ensuring that data systems are flexible and able to
adapt to evolving needs for information, within an objective and
orderly data governance process for determining when changes are needed
and how to implement them. Strong consideration must be made to the
current practice and cost of migration to new requirements. The
operating rules should delineate the coordination, delegation, and
escalation authority for data collection issues, business rules, and
performance goals for each K-12 data collection system, including:
(i) Defining and maintaining standards for privacy and
confidentiality;
(ii) Setting data collection priorities;
(iii) Defining and updating a standard data dictionary;
(iv) Ensuring data compliance with the data dictionary;
(v) Ensuring data accuracy; and
(vi) Establishing minimum standards for school, student, financial,
and teacher data systems. Data elements may be specified "to the
extent feasible" or "to the extent available" to collect more and
better data sets from districts with more flexible software. Nothing
in RCW 43.41.400, this section, or RCW 28A.655.210 should be construed
to require that a data dictionary or reporting should be hobbled to the
lowest common set. The work of the K-12 data governance group must
specify which data are desirable. Districts that can meet these
requirements shall report the desirable data. Funding from the
legislature must establish which subset data are absolutely required.
(4)(a) The K-12 data governance group shall provide updates on its
work as requested by the education data center and the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee.
(b) The work of the K-12 data governance group shall be
periodically reviewed and monitored by the educational data center and
the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.
(5) To the extent data is available, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall make the following minimum
reports available on the internet. The reports must either be run on
demand against current data, or, if a static report, must have been run
against the most recent data:
(a) The percentage of data compliance and data accuracy by school
district;
(b) The magnitude of spending per student, by student estimated by
the following algorithm and reported as the detailed summation of the
following components:
(i) An approximate, prorated fraction of each teacher or human
resource element that directly serves the student. Each human resource
element must be listed or accessible through online tunneling in the
report;
(ii) An approximate, prorated fraction of classroom or building
costs used by the student;
(iii) An approximate, prorated fraction of transportation costs
used by the student; and
(iv) An approximate, prorated fraction of all other resources
within the district. District-wide components should be disaggregated
to the extent that it is sensible and economical;
(c) The cost of K-12 basic education, per student, by student, by
school district, estimated by the algorithm in (b) of this subsection,
and reported in the same manner as required in (b) of this subsection;
(d) The cost of K-12 special education services per student, by
student receiving those services, by school district, estimated by the
algorithm in (b) of this subsection, and reported in the same manner as
required in (b) of this subsection;
(e) Improvement on the statewide assessments computed as both a
percentage change and absolute change on a scale score metric by
district, by school, and by teacher that can also be filtered by a
student's length of full-time enrollment within the school district;
(f) Number of K-12 students per classroom teacher on a per teacher
basis;
(g) Number of K-12 classroom teachers per student on a per student
basis;
(h) Percentage of a classroom teacher per student on a per student
basis; and
(i) The cost of K-12 education per student by school district
sorted by federal, state, and local dollars.
(6) ((The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a
preliminary report to the legislature by November 15, 2009, including
the analyses by the K-12 data governance group under subsection (3) of
this section and preliminary options for addressing identified gaps.
A final report, including a proposed phase-in plan and preliminary cost
estimates for implementation of a comprehensive data improvement system
for financial, student, and educator data shall be submitted to the
legislature by September 1, 2010.
(7))) All reports and data referenced in this section and RCW
43.41.400 and 28A.655.210 shall be made available in a manner
consistent with the technical requirements of the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee and the education data
center so that selected data can be provided to the legislature,
governor, school districts, and the public.
(((8))) (7) Reports shall contain data to the extent it is
available. All reports must include documentation of which data are
not available or are estimated. Reports must not be suppressed because
of poor data accuracy or completeness. Reports may be accompanied with
documentation to inform the reader of why some data are missing or
inaccurate or estimated.
(8) The K-12 data governance group shall examine the data collected
under the behavior infraction subgroup in RCW 28A.300.042(2)(g)(ix) and
create at least four additional behavior infraction codes including the
four most common behaviors reported under the behavior infraction
subgroup in RCW 28A.300.042(2)(g)(ix), and may create other categories
as needed, by December 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School districts should make efforts to have suspended or
expelled students return to the educational setting they were suspended
or expelled from as soon as possible. School districts should convene
a school reentry meeting with the student and the student's parents or
guardians within twenty days of the student's long-term suspension or
expulsion to discuss a plan to reenter and reengage the student in a
school program.
(2) In developing a reentry and reengagement plan, school districts
should consider shortening the length of time that the student is
suspended or expelled, other forms of corrective action, and supportive
interventions that aid in the student's academic success and keep the
student engaged and on track to graduate. School districts must create
a reentry and reengagement plan tailored to the student's individual
circumstances, including consideration of the incident that led to the
student's long-term suspension or expulsion. The plan should aid the
student in taking the necessary steps to remedy the situation that led
to the student's suspension or expulsion.
(3) Any reentry meetings conducted by the school district involving
the suspended or expelled student and his or her parents or guardians
are not intended to replace a petition for readmission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The Washington state school directors'
association shall develop a model policy for school districts to
implement changes to suspension and expulsion policies.
(2) The model policy must include at a minimum: Appropriate
discipline actions for unwanted student behavior, training in cultural
sensitivity regarding school discipline policies and procedures;
prevention and intervention guidance including best practices; and
parental engagement.
(3) The model policy must be made available on the Washington state
school directors' association web site by May 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Nothing in chapter . . ., Laws of 2013 (this
act) prevents a public school district, law enforcement agencies, or
law enforcement personnel from enforcing laws protecting health and
human safety. Such laws encompass crimes that include, but are not
limited to, prohibitions against possession of firearms or other
dangerous weapons; gang activity; abusing or insulting teachers;
willfully disobeying school administrative personnel or refusing to
leave public property; disturbing school, school activities, or
meetings; intimidating any administrator, teacher, classified employee,
or student by threat of force or violence; or interfering by force or
violence with any administrator, teacher, classified employee, person
under contract with the school or school district, or student of any
common school who is in the peaceful discharge or conduct of his or her
duties or studies.

--- END ---