BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.046 and 2011 c 288 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
establishing a standard definition of student absence from school. In
adopting the definition, the superintendent shall review current
practices in Washington school districts, definitions used in other
states, and any national standards or definitions used by the national
center for education statistics or other national groups. The
superintendent shall also consult with the building bridges work group
established under RCW 28A.175.075.
(b) Using the definition of student absence adopted under this
section, the superintendent shall establish an indicator for measuring
student attendance in high schools for purposes of the PASS program
under RCW 28A.175.130.
(2)(a) The K-12 data governance group under RCW 28A.300.507 shall
establish the parameters and an implementation schedule for statewide
collection through the comprehensive education and data research system
of: (i) Student attendance data using the definitions of student
absence adopted under this section; and (ii) student discipline data
with a focus on suspensions and expulsions from school.
(b) ((At a minimum,)) Student suspension and expulsion data
collected for the purposes of this subsection (2) must be:
(i) Made publicly available and easily accessible on the
superintendent of public instruction's web site;
(ii) Disaggregated and crosstabulated as established under RCW
28A.300.042; and
(iii) If reported by schools, reviewed for accuracy by the
superintendent of public instruction, which shall include the
superintendent of public instruction reviewing twenty high schools'
discipline data for accuracy each year.
(c) School districts must collect and submit student attendance
data and student discipline data for high school students through the
comprehensive education and data research system for purposes of the
PASS program under RCW 28A.175.130 beginning in the 2012-13 school
year.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.300.042 and 2009 c 468 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All student data-related reports required of the superintendent
of public instruction in this title must be disaggregated by at least
the following subgroups of students: White, Black, Hispanic, American
Indian/Alaskan Native, Asian, Pacific Islander/Hawaiian Native, low
income, transitional bilingual, migrant, special education, and
students covered by section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of
1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794).
(2) All student data-related reports required of the superintendent
of public instruction regarding student suspensions and expulsions as
required in RCW 28A.300.046 are subject to disaggregation by subgroups
including:
(a) Gender;
(b) Foster care;
(c) Homeless;
(d) School district;
(e) School;
(f) Grade level;
(g) Behavior infraction code, including:
(i) Bullying;
(ii) Tobacco;
(iii) Alcohol;
(iv) Illicit drug;
(v) Fighting without major injury;
(vi) Violence without major injury;
(vii) Violence with major injury;
(viii) Possession of a weapon; and
(ix) Other behavior resulting from a short-term or long-term
suspension, expulsion, or interim alternative education setting
intervention;
(h) Intervention applied, including:
(i) Short-term suspension;
(ii) Long-term suspension;
(iii) Emergency expulsion;
(iv) Expulsion;
(v) Interim alternative education settings;
(vi) No intervention applied; and
(vii) Other intervention applied that is not described in this
subsection (2)(h);
(i) Number of days a student is suspended or expelled, to be
counted in half or full days; and
(j) Any other categories added at a future date by the data
governance group.
(3) All student data-related reports required of the superintendent
of public instruction regarding student suspensions and expulsions as
required in RCW 28A.300.046 are subject to cross-tabulation at a
minimum by the following:
(a) School and district;
(b) Race, low income, special education, transitional bilingual,
migrant, foster care, homeless, students covered by section 504 of the
federal rehabilitation act of 1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794),
and categories to be added in the future;
(c) Behavior infraction code; and
(d) Intervention applied.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.300.507 and 2009 c 548 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A K-12 data governance group shall be established within the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to assist in the
design and implementation of a K-12 education data improvement system
for financial, student, and educator data. It is the intent that the
data system reporting specifically serve requirements for teachers,
parents, superintendents, school boards, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the legislature, and the public.
(2) The K-12 data governance group shall include representatives of
the education data center, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, the professional educator standards board, the state board
of education, and school district staff, including information
technology staff. Additional entities with expertise in education data
may be included in the K-12 data governance group.
(3) The K-12 data governance group shall:
(a) Identify the critical research and policy questions that need
to be addressed by the K-12 education data improvement system;
(b) Identify reports and other information that should be made
available on the internet in addition to the reports identified in
subsection (5) of this section;
(c) Create a comprehensive needs requirement document detailing the
specific information and technical capacity needed by school districts
and the state to meet the legislature's expectations for a
comprehensive K-12 education data improvement system as described under
RCW 28A.655.210;
(d) Conduct a gap analysis of current and planned information
compared to the needs requirement document, including an analysis of
the strengths and limitations of an education data system and programs
currently used by school districts and the state, and specifically the
gap analysis must look at the extent to which the existing data can be
transformed into canonical form and where existing software can be used
to meet the needs requirement document;
(e) Focus on financial and cost data necessary to support the new
K-12 financial models and funding formulas, including any necessary
changes to school district budgeting and accounting, and on assuring
the capacity to link data across financial, student, and educator
systems; and
(f) Define the operating rules and governance structure for K-12
data collections, ensuring that data systems are flexible and able to
adapt to evolving needs for information, within an objective and
orderly data governance process for determining when changes are needed
and how to implement them. Strong consideration must be made to the
current practice and cost of migration to new requirements. The
operating rules should delineate the coordination, delegation, and
escalation authority for data collection issues, business rules, and
performance goals for each K-12 data collection system, including:
(i) Defining and maintaining standards for privacy and
confidentiality;
(ii) Setting data collection priorities;
(iii) Defining and updating a standard data dictionary;
(iv) Ensuring data compliance with the data dictionary;
(v) Ensuring data accuracy; and
(vi) Establishing minimum standards for school, student, financial,
and teacher data systems. Data elements may be specified "to the
extent feasible" or "to the extent available" to collect more and
better data sets from districts with more flexible software. Nothing
in RCW 43.41.400, this section, or RCW 28A.655.210 should be construed
to require that a data dictionary or reporting should be hobbled to the
lowest common set. The work of the K-12 data governance group must
specify which data are desirable. Districts that can meet these
requirements shall report the desirable data. Funding from the
legislature must establish which subset data are absolutely required.
(4)(a) The K-12 data governance group shall provide updates on its
work as requested by the education data center and the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee.
(b) The work of the K-12 data governance group shall be
periodically reviewed and monitored by the educational data center and
the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.
(5) To the extent data is available, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall make the following minimum
reports available on the internet. The reports must either be run on
demand against current data, or, if a static report, must have been run
against the most recent data:
(a) The percentage of data compliance and data accuracy by school
district;
(b) The magnitude of spending per student, by student estimated by
the following algorithm and reported as the detailed summation of the
following components:
(i) An approximate, prorated fraction of each teacher or human
resource element that directly serves the student. Each human resource
element must be listed or accessible through online tunneling in the
report;
(ii) An approximate, prorated fraction of classroom or building
costs used by the student;
(iii) An approximate, prorated fraction of transportation costs
used by the student; and
(iv) An approximate, prorated fraction of all other resources
within the district. District-wide components should be disaggregated
to the extent that it is sensible and economical;
(c) The cost of K-12 basic education, per student, by student, by
school district, estimated by the algorithm in (b) of this subsection,
and reported in the same manner as required in (b) of this subsection;
(d) The cost of K-12 special education services per student, by
student receiving those services, by school district, estimated by the
algorithm in (b) of this subsection, and reported in the same manner as
required in (b) of this subsection;
(e) Improvement on the statewide assessments computed as both a
percentage change and absolute change on a scale score metric by
district, by school, and by teacher that can also be filtered by a
student's length of full-time enrollment within the school district;
(f) Number of K-12 students per classroom teacher on a per teacher
basis;
(g) Number of K-12 classroom teachers per student on a per student
basis;
(h) Percentage of a classroom teacher per student on a per student
basis; and
(i) The cost of K-12 education per student by school district
sorted by federal, state, and local dollars.
(6) ((The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a
preliminary report to the legislature by November 15, 2009, including
the analyses by the K-12 data governance group under subsection (3) of
this section and preliminary options for addressing identified gaps.
A final report, including a proposed phase-in plan and preliminary cost
estimates for implementation of a comprehensive data improvement system
for financial, student, and educator data shall be submitted to the
legislature by September 1, 2010.
(7))) All reports and data referenced in this section and RCW
43.41.400 and 28A.655.210 shall be made available in a manner
consistent with the technical requirements of the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee and the education data
center so that selected data can be provided to the legislature,
governor, school districts, and the public.
(((8))) (7) Reports shall contain data to the extent it is
available. All reports must include documentation of which data are
not available or are estimated. Reports must not be suppressed because
of poor data accuracy or completeness. Reports may be accompanied with
documentation to inform the reader of why some data are missing or
inaccurate or estimated.
(8) The K-12 data governance group shall examine the data collected
under the behavior infraction subgroup in RCW 28A.300.042(2)(g)(ix) and
create at least four additional behavior infraction codes including
defiance, disruption, cell phone violations, and gang activity, and may
create other categories as needed, by December 1, 2013.

--- END ---