BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
During the first five years of production, this chapter does not
apply to any person with respect to the value of products manufactured
in Washington when:
(1) The product was developed as a result of research and
development, as defined in RCW 82.63.010, carried out at the University
of Washington or Washington State University; and
(2) The product is being manufactured pursuant to a licensing
agreement with the University of Washington or Washington State
University.

--- END ---