BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state
environmental policy act requires a thorough exploration and a careful
analysis of a wide range of alternatives based upon the best available
science. The legislature further finds that any gaps in scientific
data uncovered by the examination of alternatives will provide a
guidepost for future research, but should not prevent protective
actions from being taken by public agencies where warranted by existing
scientific evidence and applicable state environmental and public
health policies. As new scientific data and analysis become available,
public agencies should continue to review existing decisions and adjust
them when warranted by the new data and analysis. The legislature
reaffirms the declaration in RCW 43.21C.020 that each person has a
fundamental and inalienable right to a healthy environment and that
each person has a responsibility to contribute to the preservation and
enhancement of the environment.
Therefore, it is the intent of this act that all agencies should
implement environmental quality and public health policies through a
precautionary approach, meaning that where there are threats of serious
or irreversible damage to human health or to the environment, the lack
of full scientific certainty about cause and effect may not be viewed
as sufficient reason for the state to postpone cost-effective measures
to prevent the damage.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.21C.030 and 2010 c 8 s 7002 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature authorizes and directs that, to the fullest
extent possible:
(((1))) (a) The policies, regulations, and laws of the state of
Washington shall be interpreted and administered in accordance with the
policies set forth in this chapter((,)); and (((2)))
(b) All branches of government of this state, including state
agencies, municipal and public corporations, and counties shall:
(((a))) (i) Utilize a systematic, interdisciplinary approach which
will ((insure)) ensure the integrated use of the natural and social
sciences and the environmental design arts in planning and in decision
making which may have an impact on the environment;
(((b))) (ii) Identify and develop methods and procedures, in
consultation with the department of ecology and the ecological
commission, which will ((insure)) ensure that presently unquantified
environmental amenities and values will be given appropriate
consideration in decision making along with economic and technical
considerations;
(((c))) (iii) Include in every recommendation or report on
proposals for legislation and other major actions significantly
affecting the quality of the environment, a detailed statement by the
responsible official on:
(((i))) (A) The environmental impact of the proposed action;
(((ii))) (B) Any adverse environmental effects which cannot be
avoided should the proposal be implemented;
(((iii))) (C) Alternatives to the proposed action;
(((iv))) (D) The relationship between local short-term uses of the
environment and the maintenance and enhancement of long-term
productivity; and
(((v))) (E) Any irreversible and irretrievable commitments of
resources which would be involved in the proposed action should it be
implemented;
(((d))) (iv) Prior to making any detailed statement, the
responsible official shall consult with and obtain the comments of any
public agency which has jurisdiction by law or special expertise with
respect to any environmental impact involved. Copies of such statement
and the comments and views of the appropriate federal, province, state,
and local agencies, which are authorized to develop and enforce
environmental standards, shall be made available to the governor, the
department of ecology, the ecological commission, and the public, and
shall accompany the proposal through the existing agency review
processes;
(((e))) (v) Study, develop, and describe appropriate alternatives
to recommended courses of action in any proposal which involves
unresolved conflicts concerning alternative uses of available
resources;
(((f))) (vi) Recognize the worldwide and long-range character of
environmental problems and, where consistent with state policy, lend
appropriate support to initiatives, resolutions, and programs designed
to maximize international cooperation in anticipating and preventing a
decline in the quality of the world environment;
(((g))) (vii) Make available to the federal government, other
states, provinces of Canada, municipalities, institutions, and
individuals, advice and information useful in restoring, maintaining,
and enhancing the quality of the environment;
(((h))) (viii) Initiate and utilize ecological information in the
planning and development of natural resource-oriented projects.
(2) The legislature further authorizes and directs that where there
are threats of serious or irreversible damage to human health or to the
environment, lack of full scientific certainty about cause and effect
may not be viewed as sufficient reason for the state to postpone cost-effective measures to prevent the damage.
(3) As used throughout this chapter, the term "environment" must be
construed to include all aspects of human health, including
consideration of physical, mental, economic, and social well-being and
not merely the absence of disease or infirmity.

--- END ---