BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.50.105 and 2011 c 61 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Reports and records of autopsies or postmortems shall be
confidential, except that the following persons may examine and obtain
copies of any such report or record: The personal representative of
the decedent as defined in RCW 11.02.005, any family member, the
attending physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner, the
prosecuting attorney or law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction,
public health officials, the department of labor and industries in
cases in which it has an interest under RCW 68.50.103, or the secretary
of the department of social and health services or his or her designee
in cases being reviewed under RCW 74.13.640. Nothing in this chapter
prohibits a coroner, or his or her designee, or medical examiner, or
his or her designee, from discussing his or her conclusions as to the
cause, manner, and mechanism of death in cases where actions of a law
enforcement officer have been determined to be a proximate cause of the
death or in cases where the death occurs in a penitentiary or
institution.
The coroner, the medical examiner, or the attending physician
shall, upon request, meet with the family of the decedent to discuss
the findings of the autopsy or postmortem. For the purposes of this
section, the term "family" means the surviving spouse, state registered
domestic partner, or any child, parent, grandparent, grandchild,
brother, or sister of the decedent, or any person who was guardian of
the decedent at the time of death.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---