BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.32.080 and 1989 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided otherwise by this section, the county
legislative authority of each county shall hold regular meetings at the
county seat to transact any business required or permitted by law.
(2) Regular meetings may be held on an occasional basis at a
location outside of the county seat but within the county if the county
legislative authority determines that holding a meeting at an alternate
location would be in the interest of supporting greater citizen
engagement in local government.

--- END ---