BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Retailers may not sell any spirits, wine, or beer through a
self-checkout machine or system that enables a customer to purchase
items with limited or no assistance from the retailer or an employee of
the retailer.

--- END ---