BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.74.191 and 2002 c 370 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The laws contained in this chapter and regulations prescribed by
the department of labor and industries pursuant to this chapter shall
not apply to:
(1) Explosives or blasting agents in the course of transportation
by way of railroad, water, highway, or air under the jurisdiction of,
and in conformity with, regulations adopted by the federal department
of transportation, the Washington state utilities and transportation
commission, and the Washington state patrol;
(2) The laboratories of schools, colleges, and similar institutions
if confined to the purpose of instruction or research and if not
exceeding the quantity of one pound;
(3) Explosives in the forms prescribed by the official United
States Pharmacopoeia;
(4) The transportation, storage, and use of explosives or blasting
agents in the normal and emergency operations of United States agencies
and departments including the regular United States military
departments on military reservations; arsenals, navy yards, depots, or
other establishments owned by, operated by, or on behalf of, the United
States; or the duly authorized militia of any state; or to emergency
operations of any state department or agency, any police, or any
municipality or county;
(5) A hazardous devices technician when carrying out normal and
emergency operations, handling evidence, and operating and maintaining
a specially designed emergency response vehicle that carries no more
than ten pounds of explosive material or when conducting training and
whose employer possesses the minimum safety equipment prescribed by the
federal bureau of investigation for hazardous devices work. For
purposes of this section, a hazardous devices technician is a person
who is a graduate of the federal bureau of investigation hazardous
devices school and who is employed by a state, county, or municipality;
(6) The importation, sale, possession, and use of fireworks as
defined in chapter 70.77 RCW, signaling devices, flares, fuses, and
torpedoes;
(7) The transportation, storage, and use of explosives or blasting
agents in the normal and emergency avalanche control procedures as
conducted by trained and licensed ski area operator personnel.
However, the storage, transportation, and use of explosives and
blasting agents for such use shall meet the requirements of regulations
adopted by the director of labor and industries;
(8) The storage of consumer fireworks as defined in chapter 70.77
RCW pursuant to a forfeiture or seizure under chapter 70.77 RCW by the
chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire
protection, or his or her deputy, or by state agencies or local
governments having general law enforcement authority; ((and))
(9) The transportation and storage of explosive actuated tactical
devices, including noise and flash diversionary devices, by local law
enforcement tactical response teams and officers in law enforcement
department-issued vehicles designated for use by tactical response
teams and officers, provided the explosive devices are stored and
secured in compliance with regulations and rulings adopted by the
federal bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms and explosives; and
(10) Any violation under this chapter if any existing ordinance of
any city, municipality, or county is more stringent than this chapter.

--- END ---