BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to provide a
convenient method for users of state recreational lands to purchase the
annual discover pass at the time of annual vehicle relicensing. By
providing this option for purchasing the discover pass, the legislature
intends to foster greater participation in the annual pass program and
provide for a more adequate and stable source of funding for the
maintenance and operation of state parks and other state recreational
facilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16A.090 and 2012 c 261 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director must provide an opportunity for a vehicle
owner to make a voluntary donation and to purchase a discover pass as
provided in this section when applying for an initial or renewal
vehicle registration.
(2)(a) A vehicle owner who registers a vehicle under this chapter
may donate one dollar or more to the organ and tissue donation
awareness account to promote the donation of organs and tissues under
the uniform anatomical gift act as described in chapter 68.64 RCW. The
donation of one or more dollars is voluntary and may be refused by the
vehicle owner.
(b) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director must:
(i) Ask a vehicle owner applying for a vehicle registration if the
owner would like to donate one dollar or more;
(ii) Inform a vehicle owner of the option for organ and tissue
donations as required under RCW 46.20.113; and
(iii) Make information booklets or other informational material
available regarding the importance of organ and tissue donations to
vehicle owners.
(c) All reasonable costs associated with the creation of the
donation program created under this section must be paid proportionally
or by another agreement by a participating Washington state organ
procurement organization established for organ and tissue donation
awareness purposes by the Washington state organ procurement
organizations. For the purposes of this section, "reasonable costs"
and "Washington state organ procurement organization" have the same
meaning as in RCW 68.64.010.
(3) The department must collect from a vehicle owner who pays a
vehicle license fee under RCW 46.17.350(1) (a), (d) through (l), (n),
(o), or (q) or who registers a vehicle under RCW 46.16A.455 with a
declared gross weight of twelve thousand pounds or less a voluntary
donation of five dollars. The donation may not be collected from any
vehicle owner actively opting not to participate in the donation
program. The department must ensure that the opt-out donation under
this section is clear, visible, and prominently displayed in both paper
and online vehicle registration renewals. Notification of intent to
not participate in the donation program must be provided annually at
the time of vehicle registration renewal. The donation must be
deposited in the state parks renewal and stewardship account
established in RCW 79A.05.215 to be used for the operation and
maintenance of state parks.
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a vehicle
owner who registers a vehicle under this chapter ((may)) must purchase
a discover pass for the price amount established in RCW 79A.80.020.
Purchase of a discover pass is ((voluntary by the vehicle owner)) not
required where the owner affirms in the registration renewal that any
of the following apply:
(i) That the vehicle will not be used to access a state park or
other state recreational facility requiring the display of a discover
pass;
(ii) That the owner plans to purchase a discover pass or day pass
at a later time if the vehicle will be used to access a facility
requiring a pass; or
(iii) That a discover pass has already been obtained for the
vehicle and is valid for at least the next succeeding six months from
the vehicle license renewal date.
(b) The department must inform the owner in the vehicle
registration renewal form that a discover pass may be used for two
vehicles. The discover pass fee must be deposited in the recreation
access pass account created in RCW 79A.80.090. The department, county
auditor((,)) or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director is
not responsible for delivering a purchased discover pass to a motor
vehicle owner. The agencies, as defined in RCW 79A.80.010, must
deliver the purchased discover pass to a motor vehicle owner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect November 1, 2013.

--- END ---