BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.81A.020 and 2007 c 97 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall administer and enforce the law pertaining to
the motorcycle skills education program as set forth in this chapter.
(2) The director may adopt and enforce reasonable rules that are
consistent with this chapter.
(3) The director shall revise the Washington motorcycle safety
program to:
(a) Institute separate novice and advanced motorcycle skills
education courses for both two-wheeled and three-wheeled motorcycles
that are each a minimum of eight hours and no more than sixteen hours
at a cost, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, of (i)
no more than fifty dollars for Washington state residents under the age
of eighteen, and (ii) no more than one hundred twenty-five dollars for
Washington state residents who are eighteen years of age or older and
military personnel of any age stationed in Washington state;
(b) Encourage the use of loaned or used motorcycles for use in the
motorcycle skills education course if the instructor approves them;
(c) Require all instructors for two-wheeled motorcycles to conduct
at least three classes in a one-year period, and all instructors for
three-wheeled motorcycles to conduct at least one class in a one-year
period, to maintain their teaching eligibility.
(4) The department may enter into agreements to review and certify
that a private motorcycle skills education course meets educational
standards equivalent to those required of courses conducted under the
motorcycle skills education program. An agreement entered into under
this subsection must provide that the department may conduct periodic
audits to ensure that educational standards continue to meet those
required for courses conducted under the motorcycle skills education
program, and that the costs of the review, certification, and audit
process will be borne by the party seeking certification.
(5) Subject to the requirements provided in this subsection, the
department must allow private motorcycle skills education programs to
offer motorcycle safety education where students pay the full cost for
the training. After the department has reviewed and certified that a
private motorcycle skills education course proposed under this
subsection meets educational standards equivalent to those offered
under subsection (3)(a) of this section, the department must enter into
an agreement with the private motorcycle skills education program. An
agreement entered into under this subsection must provide that (a) the
department may conduct periodic audits to ensure that educational
standards continue to meet those of other programs approved by the
department, and (b) the costs of the review, certification, and audit
process will be borne by the program seeking certification.
(6) The department shall obtain and compile information from
applicants for a motorcycle endorsement regarding whether they have
completed a state approved or certified motorcycle skills education
course.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---