BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to clarify the
provisions regarding the protection of designated agricultural land for
future agricultural use.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.060 and 2005 c 423 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in RCW 36.70A.1701, each county that is
required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, and each city within
such county, shall adopt development regulations on or before September
1, 1991, to assure the conservation of agricultural, forest, and
mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations
adopted under this subsection may not prohibit uses legally existing on
any parcel prior to their adoption and shall remain in effect until the
county or city adopts development regulations pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040. Such regulations shall assure that the use of lands
adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands shall not
interfere with the continued use, in the accustomed manner and in
accordance with best management practices, of these designated lands
for the production of food, agricultural products, or timber, or for
the extraction of minerals.
(b) Counties and cities shall require that all plats, short plats,
development permits, and building permits issued for development
activities on, or within five hundred feet of, lands designated as
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a
notice that the subject property is within or near designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands on which a
variety of commercial activities may occur that are not compatible with
residential development for certain periods of limited duration. The
notice for mineral resource lands shall also inform that an application
might be made for mining-related activities, including mining,
extraction, washing, crushing, stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and
recycling of minerals.
(c) Any city, county, or state agency owning land designated as
agricultural land of long-term commercial significance by a
comprehensive plan or development regulations adopted under this
chapter must protect and maintain that land for future agricultural use
and for uses compatible with agricultural uses allowed by the
applicable development regulations. This subsection (1)(c) shall not
be construed to prohibit uses compatible with future agricultural use
or prohibit the exchange or sale of state forest lands or state lands
as defined in RCW 79.02.010 at the highest and best value for use as
allowed by applicable development regulations. This subsection (1)(c)
shall not constrain the acquisition or use of lands necessary for
construction, operation, and maintenance of highway facilities,
however, siting of mitigation projects shall not take place on
agricultural lands of long-term commercial significance.
(2) Each county and city shall adopt development regulations that
protect critical areas that are required to be designated under RCW
36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or choose to
plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be
adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the
counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on
or before March 1, 1992.
(3) Such counties and cities shall review these designations and
development regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under
RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development regulations under RCW
36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and development regulations
to insure consistency.
(4) Forest land and agricultural land located within urban growth
areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forest land or
agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW
36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing
transfer or purchase of development rights.

--- END ---