BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08.580 and 2012 c 253 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person receiving public assistance is prohibited from using
electronic benefit cards or cash obtained with electronic benefit
cards:
(a) For the purpose of participating in any of the activities
authorized under chapter 9.46 RCW;
(b) For the purpose of parimutuel wagering authorized under chapter
67.16 RCW;
(c) To purchase lottery tickets or shares authorized under chapter
67.70 RCW;
(d) For the purpose of participating in or purchasing any
activities located in a tattoo, body piercing, or body art shop
licensed under chapter 18.300 RCW;
(e) To purchase cigarettes as defined in RCW 82.24.010 or tobacco
products as defined in RCW 82.26.010;
(f) To purchase any items regulated under Title 66 RCW; ((or))
(g) To purchase marijuana as defined under RCW 69.50.101 or any
paraphernalia associated with the use of marijuana; or
(h) For the purpose of purchasing or participating in any
activities in any location listed in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) On or before January 1, 2012, the businesses listed in this
subsection must disable the ability of ATM and point-of-sale machines
located on their business premises to accept the electronic benefit
card. The following businesses are required to comply with this
mandate:
(a) Taverns licensed under RCW 66.24.330;
(b) Beer/wine specialty stores licensed under RCW 66.24.371;
(c) Nightclubs licensed under RCW 66.24.600;
(d) ((Contract liquor stores defined under RCW 66.04.010;
(e))) Bail bond agencies regulated under chapter 18.185 RCW;
(((f))) (e) Gambling establishments licensed under chapter 9.46
RCW;
(((g))) (f) Tattoo, body piercing, or body art shops regulated
under chapter 18.300 RCW;
(((h))) (g) Adult entertainment venues with performances that
contain erotic material where minors under the age of eighteen are
prohibited under RCW 9.68A.150; and
(((i))) (h) Any establishments where persons under the age of
eighteen are not permitted.
(3) On or before January 1, 2014, any establishment holding a
spirits retail license under RCW 66.24.630 shall not accept an
electronic benefits card for the purchase of spirits. The department
must notify the licensing authority of any business listed in this
subsection or subsection (2) of this section that such business has
continued to allow the use of the electronic benefit card in violation
of this subsection or subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Only the recipient, an eligible member of the household, or the
recipient's authorized representative may use an electronic benefit
card or the benefit and such use shall only be for the respective
benefit program purposes. Unless a recipient's family member is an
eligible member of the household, the recipient's authorized
representative, an alternative cardholder, or has been assigned as a
protective payee, no family member may use the benefit card. The
recipient shall not sell, or attempt to sell, exchange, or donate an
electronic benefit card or any benefits to any other person or entity.
(5) The first violation of subsection (1) of this section by a
recipient constitutes a class 4 civil infraction under RCW 7.80.120.
Second and subsequent violations of subsection (1) of this section
constitute a class 3 civil infraction under RCW 7.80.120.
(a) The department shall notify, in writing, all recipients of
electronic benefit cards that any violation of subsection (1) of this
section could result in legal proceedings and forfeiture of all cash
public assistance.
(b) Whenever the department receives notice that a person has
violated subsection (1) of this section, the department shall notify
the person in writing that the violation could result in legal
proceedings and forfeiture of all cash public assistance.
(c) The department shall assign a protective payee to the person
receiving public assistance who violates subsection (1) of this section
two or more times.
(6) In assigning a personal identification number to an electronic
benefit card, the department shall not routinely use any sequence of
numbers that appear on the card except in circumstances resulting from
in-state or national disasters. Personal identification numbers
assigned to electronic benefit cards issued to support the distribution
of benefits when there is a disaster may include a sequence of numbers
that appears on the card.

--- END ---