BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington state institute for public
policy shall conduct an empirical study of the validity and reliability
of the safety assessment tool currently used in child welfare cases by
the children's administration at the department of social and health
services. In conducting this study, the institute must identify: (1)
Whether other empirically based child welfare safety assessment tools
exist and, if so, compare those tools to the tool used by the
children's administration; (2) whether other factors or combination of
factors not included in the current safety assessment tool should be
included to help predict real outcomes; and (3) where possible, whether
there is unneccesary duplication in the application of the family
assessment tool used by the department.
As part of this study, the institute must consult with an advisory
group consisting of representatives of the research department at the
administrative office of the courts, the research and data analysis
division at the department of social and health services, a
university-based child welfare research entity, and caseworkers with
the children's administration who use the tool.
A report on the study is due to the appropriate policy committees
of the legislature by December 15, 2013.

--- END ---