BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of licensing, Washington
state patrol, department of social and health services, administrative
office of the courts, and representatives of regional support networks
and superior courts shall participate in a work group convened by the
department of licensing for the purpose of making a proposal for
consolidation of statewide involuntary commitment information for the
purpose of accurate and efficient verification of eligibility to
possess a firearm. The work group shall also make recommendations with
respect to how to maintain the privacy of commitment information and
whether access to the database can legally be provided to designated
mental health professionals or law enforcement officials for use in the
official course of their duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW
to read as follows:
By August 1, 2013, all regional support networks in the state of
Washington must forward historical mental health involuntary commitment
information retained by the organization including identifying
information and dates of commitment to the department. As soon as
feasible, the regional support networks must arrange to report new
commitment data to the department within twenty-four hours. Commitment
information under this section does not need to be resent if it is
already in the possession of the department. Regional support networks
and the department shall be immune from liability related to the
sharing of commitment information under this section.

--- END ---