BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 76.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature finds and declares that:
(i) Forest wildfires are a threat to public health and safety and
can cause catastrophic damage to public and private resources,
including clean air, clean water, fish and wildlife habitat, timber
resources, forest soils, scenic beauty, recreational opportunities,
economic and employment opportunities, structures, and other
improvements; and
(ii) All landowners in the state have a shared interest in
protecting forests and forest resources by preventing and suppressing
forest wildfires.
(b) It is therefore the intent of the legislature that the costs of
fire protection be equitably shared by all landowners through a
statewide special benefit charge (i) to ensure that there will be
sufficient local firefighters who are equipped and trained to respond
quickly to forest wildfires in order to keep fires small and manage
those large fires that do occur and (ii) to increase and stabilize
funding for the forest protection program to protect the public's
interest in maintaining healthy forests and eliminating sources of fuel
for forest wildfires.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, the department
shall annually, beginning in calendar year 2013, impose a special
benefit charge of five dollars on each taxable parcel of land within
the state of Washington, except parcels that are exempt in whole or in
part from property tax under RCW 84.36.381. The charge must be
collected at the time, in the same manner, by the same procedure, and
with the same penalties attached that general state and county taxes on
the same property are collected, except that errors in charges may be
corrected at any time by the assessor or treasurer of the county in
which the land involved is situated.
(b)(i) Upon the collection of each special benefit charge paid on
a parcel, the county treasurer must:
(A) Deposit twenty-five cents into the county current expense fund
to defray the costs of listing, billing, and collecting the charge;
(B) Transmit twenty-five cents to the local fire protection
district or municipality providing fire protection service to the
parcel to be used exclusively for training and equipping local
firefighters to respond quickly to forest wildfires or transmit twenty-five cents to the department if the department is providing fire
protection service to the parcel or, if no fire protection service is
provided to the parcel, for forest fire protection activities and
training; and
(C) Transmit the remaining balance to the department.
(ii) The collection of charges under this subsection (2)(b) must be
applied against expenses incurred in carrying out this section,
including necessary and reasonable administrative costs incurred by the
department in the enforcement of this section.
(c) When land, against which the special benefit charge provided in
this section is outstanding, is acquired for delinquent taxes and sold
at public auction, the state has a prior lien on the proceeds of sale
over and above the amount necessary to satisfy the county's delinquent
tax judgment. The county treasurer, in case the proceeds of sale
exceed the amount of the delinquent tax judgment, must immediately
remit to the department the amount of the outstanding charges.
(d) All nonfederal public bodies owning or administering forest
land must pay the special benefit charge. The charge must be payable
annually by nonfederal public bodies from available funds within thirty
days following the receipt of written notice from the department, which
must be no later than October 1st of each calendar year. Unpaid
charges are not a lien against the nonfederal publicly owned land but
constitute a debt by the nonfederal public body to the department and
are subject to interest charges at the legal rate.
(e) The department may adopt rules to implement this section
including, but not limited to, rules on imposing and collecting the
special benefit charge.

--- END ---