BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.10.030 and 2012 c 237 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the secretary may
enter into contracts with health care practitioners, health care
facilities, and other entities or agents as may be necessary to provide
medical, behavioral health, and chemical dependency treatment care to
inmates. The contracts shall not cause the termination of classified
employees of the department rendering the services at the time the
contract is executed.
(2) In contracting for services, the secretary is authorized to
provide for indemnification of health care practitioners who cannot
obtain professional liability insurance through reasonable effort, from
liability on any action, claim, or proceeding instituted against them
arising out of the good faith performance or failure of performance of
services on behalf of the department. The contracts may provide that
for the purposes of chapter 4.92 RCW only, those health care
practitioners with whom the department has contracted shall be
considered state employees.
(3) Providers of hospital services that are hospitals licensed
under chapter 70.41 RCW shall contract with the department for
inpatient, outpatient, and ancillary services if deemed appropriate by
the department. Payments to hospitals shall conform to the following
requirements:
(a) The department shall pay ((hospitals)) all health care
contractors including, but not limited to, hospitals, providers, and
ancillary vendors through the provider one system operated by the
Washington state health care authority;
(b) The department shall reimburse ((the hospitals)) all health
care contractors including, but not limited to, hospitals, providers,
and ancillary vendors using the reimbursement methodology in use by the
state medicaid program; and
(c) The department shall only reimburse ((a provider of hospital
services to a hospital patient)) health care contractors including, but
not limited to, hospitals, providers, and ancillary vendors at a rate
no more than the amount payable under the medicaid reimbursement
structure plus a percentage increase that is determined in the
operating budget, regardless of whether the ((hospital)) vendor is
located within or outside of Washington.

--- END ---