BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.80.020 and 2012 c 261 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in ((RCW 79A.80.050, 79A.80.060,
and 79A.80.070)) this chapter, a discover pass is required for any
motor vehicle to:
(a) Park ((or operate on)) at any recreation site or lands((,
except for short-term parking as may be authorized under RCW
79A.80.070)); or
(b) Operate on any recreation site or lands.
(2) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, the cost of a
discover pass is thirty dollars. Every four years the office of
financial management must review the cost of the discover pass and, if
necessary, recommend to the legislature an adjustment to the cost of
the discover pass to account for inflation.
(3) A discover pass is valid for one year beginning from the date
that the discover pass is marked for activation. The activation date
may differ from the purchase date pursuant to any policies developed by
the agencies.
(4) Sales of discover passes must be consistent with RCW
79A.80.100.
(5) The discover pass must contain space for two motor vehicle
license plate numbers. A discover pass is valid only for those vehicle
license plate numbers written on the pass. However, the agencies may
offer for sale a family discover pass that is fully transferable among
vehicles and does not require the placement of a license plate number
on the pass to be valid. The agencies must collectively set a price
for the sale of a family discover pass that is no more than fifty
dollars. A discover pass is valid only for use with one motor vehicle
at any one time.
(6) One complimentary discover pass must be provided to a volunteer
who performed twenty-four hours of service on agency-sanctioned
volunteer projects in a year. The agency must provide vouchers to
volunteers identifying the number of volunteer hours they have provided
for each project. The vouchers may be brought to an agency to be
redeemed for a discover pass.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.80.030 and 2012 c 261 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person may purchase a day-use permit to meet the requirements
of RCW 79A.80.080. Except as provided in section 4 of this act, a day-use permit is ten dollars per day and must be available for purchase
from each agency. A day-use permit is valid for one calendar day.
(2) The agencies may provide short-term parking under RCW
79A.80.070 where a day-use permit is not required.
(3) Every four years the office of financial management must review
the cost of the day-use permit and, if necessary, recommend to the
legislature an adjustment to the cost of the day-use permit to account
for inflation.
(4) Sales of day-use permits must be consistent with RCW
79A.80.100.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.80.080 and 2012 c 261 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A discover pass, vehicle access pass, or day-use permit must be
visibly displayed in the front windshield, or otherwise in a prominent
location for motor vehicles without a windshield, of any motor vehicle
((or otherwise in a prominent location for vehicles without a
windshield)):
(a) Operating on ((a)) any recreation site or lands; or
(b) Parking at ((a)) any recreation site or lands.
(2) The discover pass, the vehicle access pass, or the day-use
permit is not required:
(a) On private lands, state-owned aquatic lands other than water
access areas, or at agency offices, hatcheries, or other facilities
where public business is conducted((.
(3) The discover pass, the vehicle access pass, or the day-use
permit is not required for:
(a)));
(b) For persons who use, possess, or enter lands owned or managed
by the agencies for nonrecreational purposes consistent with a written
authorization from the agency, including but not limited to leases,
contracts, and easements; ((or
(b))) (c) On department of fish and wildlife lands only, for
persons possessing a current vehicle access pass pursuant to RCW
79A.80.040; or
(d) When operating on an agency managed road, including a forest or
land management road, that is not blocked by a gate. However, a
discover pass or day-use permit is required for operation of any motor
vehicle in a state park beyond a staffed entrance booth or otherwise at
the entrance to a state park where staff is present for purposes of
discover pass or day-use permit compliance.
(((4))) (3)(a) An agency may waive the requirements of this section
for any person who has secured the ability to access specific
recreational land through the provision of monetary consideration to
the agency or for any person attending an event or function that
required the provision of monetary compensation to the agency.
(b) Special events and group activities are core recreational
activities and major public service opportunities within state parks.
When waiving the requirements of this section for special events, the
state parks and recreation commission must consider the direct and
indirect costs and benefits to the state, local market rental rates,
the public service functions of the event sponsor, and other public
interest factors when setting appropriate fees for each event or
activity.
(((5))) (4) Failure to comply with subsection (1) of this section
is a natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW. An agency is
authorized to issue a notice of infraction to any person who fails to
comply with subsection (1)(a) of this section or to any motor vehicle
that fails to comply with subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(((6))) (5) The penalty for failure to comply with the requirements
of this section is ninety-nine dollars. This penalty must be reduced
to fifty-nine dollars if an individual provides proof of purchase of a
discover pass to the court within fifteen days after the issuance of
the notice of violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 79A.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By mutual agreement, the agencies may sell discounted discover
passes at a rate below that established under RCW 79A.80.020 or
discounted day-use permits at a rate below that established under RCW
79A.80.030 for purposes of bulk sales to retailers, agency license and
permit product bundling, and partnership opportunities to expand
accessibility and visibility of the discover pass and recreational
opportunities on agency-managed lands.
(2) In exercising this authority, the agencies must prioritize
opportunities for discounted sales that result in a net revenue gain.

--- END ---