BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.40.091 and 2011 c 349 s 17, 2011 c 348 s 3, 2011
c 182 s 1, and 2011 c 10 s 39 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) The county auditor shall send each voter a ballot, a security
envelope in which to conceal the ballot after voting, a larger envelope
in which to return the security envelope, a declaration that the voter
must sign, and instructions on how to obtain information about the
election, how to mark the ballot, and how to return the ballot to the
county auditor.
(2) The voter must swear under penalty of perjury that he or she
meets the qualifications to vote, and has not voted in any other
jurisdiction at this election. The declaration must clearly inform the
voter that it is illegal to vote if he or she is not a United States
citizen; it is illegal to vote if he or she has been convicted of a
felony and has not had his or her voting rights restored; and it is
illegal to cast a ballot or sign a ((return envelope)) ballot
declaration on behalf of another voter. The ballot materials must
provide space for the voter ((must)) to sign the declaration, indicate
the date on which the ballot was voted, and ((sign the declaration.
The ballot materials must also contain a space so that the voter may))
include a telephone number.
(3) For overseas and service voters, the signed declaration ((on
the return envelope)) constitutes the equivalent of a voter
registration for the election or primary ((for which the ballot has
been issued)). Return envelopes for overseas and service voters must
enable the ballot to be returned postage free if mailed through the
United States postal service, United States armed forces postal
service, or the postal service of a United States foreign embassy under
39 U.S.C. 3406.
(4) The voter must be instructed to either return or mail the
ballot to the county auditor so that the ballot is received by the
county auditor no later than 8:00 p.m. the day of the election or
primary((, or mail the ballot to the county auditor with a postmark no
later than the day of the election or primary)). A ballot from an out-of-state, overseas, or service voter may be counted if it was
postmarked no later than the day of the primary or election. Service
and overseas voters must be provided with instructions and a ((secrecy
cover)) privacy sheet for returning the ballot and signed declaration
by fax or e-mail. A voted ballot and signed declaration returned by
fax or e-mail must be received by 8:00 p.m. on the day of the election
or primary.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.40.110 and 2011 c 349 s 18, 2011 c 348 s 4, and
2011 c 10 s 41 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes for
any primary or election may begin upon receipt. The tabulation of
absentee ballots must not commence until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of
the primary or election.
(2) All received return envelopes must be placed in secure
locations from the time of delivery to the county auditor until their
subsequent opening. After opening the return envelopes, the county
canvassing board or its designated representatives shall place all of
the ballots in secure storage until processing. Ballots may be taken
from the inner security envelopes and all the normal procedural steps
may be performed to prepare these ballots for tabulation.
(3) The canvassing board, or its designated representatives, shall
examine the postmark on the return envelope and signature on the
declaration before processing the ballot. The ballot ((must either be
received no later than 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election,
or must be)) may be counted only if the return envelope was signed by
the date of the primary or election for which it was issued and the
ballot is in the office of the county auditor by 8:00 p.m. on the day
of the primary or election for which it was issued. A ballot from an
out-of-state, overseas, or service voter may be counted if it was
postmarked no later than the day of the primary or election. All
personnel assigned to verify signatures must receive training on
statewide standards for signature verification. Personnel shall verify
that the voter's signature on the ballot declaration is the same as the
signature of that voter in the registration files of the county.
Verification may be conducted by an automated verification system
approved by the secretary of state. A variation between the signature
of the voter on the ballot declaration and the signature of that voter
in the registration files due to the substitution of initials or the
use of common nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and
handwriting are clearly the same.
(4) If the postmark is missing or illegible, the date on the ballot
declaration to which the voter has attested determines the validity, as
to the time of voting, for that ballot. For overseas voters and
service voters, the date on the declaration to which the voter has
attested determines the validity, as to the time of voting, for that
ballot. Any overseas voter or service voter may return the signed
declaration and voted ballot by fax or e-mail by 8:00 p.m. on the day
of the primary or election, and the county auditor must use established
procedures to maintain the secrecy of the ballot.

--- END ---