BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.18.200 and 2012 c 65 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Special license plate series reviewed and approved by the
department:
(a) May be issued in lieu of standard issue or personalized license
plates for vehicles required to display one and two license plates
unless otherwise specified;
(b) Must be issued under terms and conditions established by the
department;
(c) Must not be issued for vehicles registered under chapter 46.87
RCW; and
(d) Must display a symbol or artwork approved by the department.
(2) The department approves and shall issue the following special
license plates:

LICENSE PLATE DESCRIPTION, SYMBOL, OR ARTWORK

4-H Displays the "4-H" logo.

Armed forces collection Recognizes the contribution of veterans, active duty
military personnel, reservists, and members of the national
guard, and includes six separate designs, each containing a
symbol representing a different branch of the armed forces
to include army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard,
and national guard.

Endangered wildlife Displays a symbol or artwork, approved by the special
license plate review board and the legislature.

Gonzaga University alumni association Recognizes the Gonzaga University alumni association.

Helping kids speak Recognizes an organization that supports programs that
provide no-cost speech pathology programs to children.

Keep kids safe Recognizes efforts to prevent child abuse and neglect.

Law enforcement memorial Honors law enforcement officers in Washington killed in
the line of duty.

Music matters Displays the "Music Matters" logo.

Professional firefighters and paramedics Recognizes professional firefighters and paramedics who
are members of the Washington state council of
firefighters.

Share the road
Recognizes an organization that promotes bicycle safety
and awareness education.

Ski & ride Washington Recognizes the Washington snowsports industry.

State flower Recognizes the Washington state flower.

Volunteer firefighters Recognizes volunteer firefighters.

Washington lighthouses Recognizes an organization that supports selected
Washington state lighthouses and provides environmental
education programs.

Washington state parks Recognizes Washington state parks as premier destinations
of uncommon quality that preserve significant natural,
cultural, historical, and recreational resources.

Washington's national park fund Builds awareness of Washington's national parks and
supports priority park programs and projects in
Washington's national parks, such as enhancing visitor
experience, promoting volunteerism, engaging
communities, and providing educational opportunities
related to Washington's national parks.

Washington's wolves Recognizes Washington's wolf population and their special
management needs.

Washington's wildlife collection Recognizes Washington's wildlife.

We love our pets Recognizes an organization that assists local member
agencies of the federation of animal welfare and control
agencies to promote and perform spay/neuter surgery on
Washington state pets to reduce pet overpopulation.

Wild on Washington Symbolizes wildlife viewing in Washington state.

(3) Applicants for initial and renewal professional firefighters
and paramedics special license plates must show proof eligibility by
providing a certificate of current membership from the Washington state
council of firefighters.
(4) Applicants for initial volunteer firefighters special license
plates must (a) have been a volunteer firefighter for at least ten
years or be a volunteer firefighter for one or more years and (b) have
documentation of service from the district of the appropriate fire
service. If the volunteer firefighter leaves firefighting service
before ten years of service have been completed, the volunteer
firefighter shall surrender the license plates to the department on the
registration renewal date. If the volunteer firefighter stays in
service for at least ten years and then leaves, the license plate may
be retained by the former volunteer firefighter and as long as the
license plate is retained for use the person will continue to pay the
future registration renewals. A qualifying volunteer firefighter may
have no more than one set of license plates per vehicle, and a maximum
of two sets per applicant, for their personal vehicles. If the
volunteer firefighter is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
a felony, the license plates must be surrendered upon conviction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Washington's wolves license plates" means special license plates
issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display a symbol or artwork of a wolf.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.17.220 and 2012 c 65 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application for a vehicle registration in chapter 46.16A RCW, the
holder of a special license plate shall pay the appropriate special
license plate fee as listed in this section.

PLATE TYPE INITIAL FEE RENEWAL FEE DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) 4-H $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(b) Amateur radio license $ 5.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(c) Armed forces $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(d) Baseball stadium $ 40.00 $ 30.00 Subsection (2) of this
section

(e) Collector vehicle $ 35.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(f) Collegiate $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.430

(g) Endangered wildlife $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(h) Gonzaga University
alumni association $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(i) Helping kids speak $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(j) Horseless carriage $ 35.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(k) Keep kids safe $ 45.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(l) Law enforcement
memorial $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(m) Military affiliate radio
system $ 5.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(n) Music matters $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(o) Professional firefighters
and paramedics $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(p) Ride share $ 25.00 N/A RCW 46.68.030

(q) Share the road $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(r) Ski & ride Washington $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(s) Square dancer $ 40.00 N/A RCW 46.68.070

(t) State flower $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(u) Volunteer firefighters $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(v) Washington lighthouses $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(w) Washington state parks $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(x) Washington's national
parks $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(y) Washington's wolves $40.00 $30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(z) Washington's wildlife
collection $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(((z))) (aa) We love our pets $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.420

(((aa))) (bb) Wild on
Washington $ 40.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.425

(2) After deducting administration and collection expenses for the
sale of baseball stadium license plates, the remaining proceeds must be
distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the state general fund.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.68.425 and 2011 c 171 s 88 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Collect special license plate fees established under RCW
46.17.220;
(b) Deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars for initial issue
and two dollars for renewal issue for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it; and
(c) Remit the remaining proceeds to the custody of the state
treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.
(2) The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the motor
vehicle fund until the department determines that the state has been
reimbursed for the cost of implementing the special license plate.
Upon determination by the department that the state has been
reimbursed, the state treasurer shall credit the remaining special
license plate fees to the following accounts by special license plate
type:

SPECIAL LICENSE PLATE TYPE ACCOUNT CONDITIONS FOR USE OF FUNDS

Armed forces RCW 43.60A.140 N/A

Endangered wildlife RCW 77.12.170 Must be used only for the department of
fish and wildlife's endangered wildlife
program activities

Keep kids safe RCW 43.121.100 ((As specified in RCW 43.121.050)) N/A

Washington state parks RCW 79A.05.059 Provide public educational opportunities
and enhancement of Washington state
parks

Washington's wolves RCW 77.12.170 Dedicated to the department of fish and
wildlife's preventative wolf management
efforts

Washington's wildlife collection RCW 77.12.170 Only for the department of fish and
wildlife's game species management
activities

Wild on Washington RCW 77.12.170 Dedicated to the department of fish and
wildlife's watchable wildlife activities, as
defined in RCW 77.32.560

Sec. 5 RCW 46.18.060 and 2012 c 65 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department must review and either approve or reject special
license plate applications submitted by sponsoring organizations.
(2) Duties of the department include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(a) Review and approve the annual financial reports submitted by
sponsoring organizations with active special license plate series and
present those annual financial reports to the joint transportation
committee;
(b) Report annually to the joint transportation committee on the
special license plate applications that were considered by the
department;
(c) Issue approval and rejection notification letters to sponsoring
organizations, the executive committee of the joint transportation
committee, and the legislative sponsors identified in each application.
The letters must be issued within seven days of making a determination
on the status of an application; and
(d) Review annually the number of plates sold for each special
license plate series created after January 1, 2003. The department may
submit a recommendation to discontinue a special plate series to the
executive committee of the joint transportation committee.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 46.18.245, in order to assess the
effects and impact of the proliferation of special license plates, the
legislature declares a temporary moratorium on the issuance of any
additional plates until July 1, 2013. During this period of time, the
department is prohibited from accepting, reviewing, processing, or
approving any applications. Additionally, a special license plate may
not be enacted by the legislature during the moratorium, unless the
proposed license plate has been approved by the former special license
plate review board before February 15, 2005.
(4) The limitations under subsection (3) of this section do not
apply to the following special license plates:
(a) 4-H license plates created under RCW 46.18.200;
(b) Music Matters license plates created under RCW 46.18.200;
(c) State flower license plates created under RCW 46.18.200;
(d) Volunteer firefighter license plates created under RCW
46.18.200;
(e) Washington's wolves license plates created under RCW 46.18.200.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.12.170 and 2011 c 339 s 3, 2011 c 320 s 23, and
2011 c 171 s 112 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife
account which consists of moneys received from:
(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;
(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department
purposes, unless the property is seized or recovered through a fish,
shellfish, or wildlife enforcement action;
(c) The assessment of administrative penalties;
(d) The sale of licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by
chapter 77.32 RCW, RCW 77.65.490, and application fees;
(e) Fees for informational materials published by the department;
(f) Fees for personalized vehicle, Wild on Washington, ((and))
Endangered Wildlife, and Washington's wolves license plates and
Washington's Wildlife license plate collection as provided in chapter
46.17 RCW;
(g) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;
(h) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife
losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320.
However, this excludes fish and shellfish overages, and court-ordered
restitution or donations associated with any fish, shellfish, or
wildlife enforcement action, as such moneys must be deposited pursuant
to RCW 77.15.425;
(i) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter
82.27 RCW;
(j) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles
authorized by the commission;
(k) The sale of watchable wildlife decals under RCW 77.32.560;
((and))
(l) Moneys received from the recreation access pass account created
in RCW 79A.80.090 must be dedicated to stewardship, operations, and
maintenance of department lands used for public recreation purposes;
and
(m) Donations received by the director under RCW 77.12.039.
(2) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury
to be credited to the state wildlife account.

--- END ---