BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall develop and maintain a process to offer,
negotiate, and enter into cooperative agreements with livestock owners
to prevent or minimize damage to livestock caused by wolves.
(2) Cooperative agreements must include, at minimum:
(a) Nonlethal management efforts that, at the livestock owner's
discretion, must be taken by the owner or for which the department may
access property that the owner owns or has the legal right to access
for livestock management purposes. These may include:
(i) Sanitation-related actions, such as carcass removal;
(ii) The use of fencing or repellants such as flandry, wire, or
electric fencing;
(iii) Hazing-related activities, such as human presence or guard
dogs; and
(iv) Operational-related activities, such as protecting calving
areas or avoiding areas of high wolf activity;
(b) Provisions for livestock owners to share wolf-related
information with the department. This may include information
regarding management activities taken by the livestock owner under (a)
of this subsection as well as information regarding wolf activities and
livestock behavior; and
(c) Provisions for the department to provide information or
assistance to implement actions under (a) of this subsection. This may
include technical assistance, information regarding wolf activities in
the area, or, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for
this specific purpose or other nonmonetary resources, cost-sharing
measures to assist the livestock owner's implementation of activities
under (a) of this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.36.110 and 2009 c 333 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No owner may receive compensation for wildlife interactions
under this chapter unless the owner has, as determined by the
department, first:
(a) Utilized applicable legal and practicable self-help preventive
measures available to prevent the damage, including the use of
nonlethal methods and department-provided materials and services when
available under RCW 77.36.100; ((and))
(b) Exhausted all available compensation options available from
nonprofit organizations that provide compensation to private property
owners due to financial losses caused by wildlife interactions; and
(c) For owners of commercial livestock seeking compensation for
damage to commercial livestock caused by wolves, have a cooperative
agreement with the department under section 1 of this act in effect at
the time the damage occurred.
(2) In determining if the requirements of this section have been
satisfied, the department may recognize and consider the following:
(a) Property losses may occur without future or anticipated
knowledge of potential problems resulting in an owner being unable to
take preemptive measures.
(b) Normal agricultural practices, animal husbandry practices,
recognized standard management techniques, and other industry-recognized management practices may represent adequate preventative
efforts.
(c) Under certain circumstances, as determined by the department,
wildlife may not logistically or practicably be managed by nonlethal
efforts.
(d) Not all available legal preventative efforts are cost-effective
for the owner to practicably employ.
(e) There are certain effective preventative control options not
available due to federal or state restrictions.
(f) Under certain circumstances, as determined by the department,
permitting public hunting may not be a practicable self-help method due
to the size and nature of the property, the property's setting, or the
ability of the landowner to accommodate public access.
(3) An owner is not eligible to receive compensation if the damages
are covered by insurance.
(4) The commission shall adopt rules implementing this section,
including requirements that owners document nonlethal preventive
efforts undertaken and all permits issued by the department under RCW
77.12.240 and 77.12.150.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.12.037 and 2000 c 107 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may acquire by gift, easement, purchase, lease,
or condemnation lands, buildings, water rights, rights-of-way, or other
necessary property, and construct and maintain necessary facilities for
purposes consistent with this title. The commission may authorize the
director to acquire property under this section, but the power of
condemnation may only be exercised by the director when an
appropriation has been made by the legislature for the acquisition of
a specific property, except to clear title and acquire access
rights-of-way.
(2)(a) The commission may sell, lease, convey, or grant concessions
upon real or personal property under the control of the department.
(b) The commission may only enter into a lease, renew a lease, or
otherwise permit the use of department-managed real property within the
estimated range of a confirmed wolf pack for grazing or other
commercial livestock purposes where the livestock owner: (i) Has a
cooperative agreement with the department under section 1 of this act
covering that property in effect at the time of the transaction; and
(ii) as a condition of the lease or other authorization, agrees to
maintain such a cooperative agreement.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.12.210 and 2009 c 333 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall maintain and manage real or personal
property owned, leased, or held by the department and shall control the
construction of buildings, structures, and improvements in or on the
property. The director may adopt rules for the operation and
maintenance of the property.
(2)(a) The commission may authorize the director to sell, lease,
convey, or grant concessions upon real or personal property under the
control of the department. This includes the authority to sell timber,
gravel, sand, and other materials or products from real property held
by the department, and to sell or lease the department's real or
personal property or grant concessions or rights-of-way for roads or
utilities in the property. Oil and gas resources owned by the state
which lie below lands owned, leased, or held by the department shall be
offered for lease by the commissioner of public lands pursuant to
chapter 79.14 RCW with the proceeds being deposited in the state
wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170((: PROVIDED, That)). The
commissioner of public lands shall condition such leases at the request
of the department to protect wildlife and its habitat.
(b) The director may only enter into a lease, renew a lease, or
otherwise permit the use of department-managed real property within the
estimated range of a confirmed wolf pack for grazing or other
commercial livestock purposes where the livestock owner: (i) Has a
cooperative agreement with the department under section 1 of this act
covering that property in effect at the time of the transaction; and
(ii) as a condition of the lease or other authorization, agrees to
maintain such a cooperative agreement.
(3)(a) If the commission determines that real or personal property
held by the department cannot be used advantageously by the department,
the director may dispose of that property if it is in the public
interest.
(b) If the state acquired real property with use limited to
specific purposes, the director may negotiate terms for the return of
the property to the donor or grantor. Other real property shall be
sold to the highest bidder at public auction. After appraisal, notice
of the auction shall be published at least once a week for two
successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the
county where the property is located at least twenty days prior to
sale.
(c) Proceeds from the sales shall be deposited in the state
wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 79.13 RCW
under the subheading "part 3 agricultural/grazing leases" to read as
follows:
The department may only enter into a lease, renew a lease, or
otherwise permit the use of department-managed real property within the
estimated range of a confirmed wolf pack, as determined by the
department of fish and wildlife, for grazing or other commercial
livestock purposes where the livestock owner: (1) Has a cooperative
agreement with the department under section 1 of this act covering that
property in effect at the time of the transaction; and (2) as a
condition of the lease or other authorization, agrees to maintain such
a cooperative agreement.

--- END ---