BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.41.440 and 2009 c 359 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A hospital shall report to a local law enforcement authority as
soon as reasonably possible, taking into consideration a patient's
emergency care needs, when the hospital provides treatment for a bullet
wound, gunshot wound, or stab wound to a patient ((who is
unconscious)). A hospital shall establish a written policy to identify
the person or persons responsible for making the report.
(2) The report required under subsection (1) of this section must
include the following information, if known:
(a) The name, residence, sex, and age of the patient;
(b) Whether the patient has received a bullet wound, gunshot wound,
or stab wound; and
(c) The name of the health care provider providing treatment for
the bullet wound, gunshot wound, or stab wound.
(3) Nothing in this section shall limit a person's duty to report
under RCW 26.44.030 or 74.34.035.
(4) Any bullets, clothing, or other foreign objects that are
removed from a patient for whom a hospital is required to make a report
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be preserved and kept
in custody in such a way that the identity and integrity thereof are
reasonably maintained until the bullets, clothing, or other foreign
objects are taken into possession by a law enforcement authority or the
hospital's normal period for retention of such items expires, whichever
occurs first.
(5) Any hospital or person who in good faith, and without gross
negligence or willful or wanton misconduct, makes a report required by
this section, cooperates in an investigation or criminal or judicial
proceeding related to such report, or maintains bullets, clothing, or
other foreign objects, or provides such items to a law enforcement
authority as described in subsection (4) of this section, is immune
from civil or criminal liability or professional licensure action
arising out of or related to the report and its contents or the absence
of information in the report, cooperation in an investigation or
criminal or judicial proceeding, and the maintenance or provision to a
law enforcement authority of bullets, clothing, or other foreign
objects under subsection (4) of this section.
(6) The physician-patient privilege described in RCW 5.60.060(4),
the registered nurse-patient privilege described in RCW 5.62.020, and
any other health care provider-patient privilege created or recognized
by law are not a basis for excluding as evidence in any criminal
proceeding any report, or information contained in a report made under
this section.
(7) All reporting, preservation, or other requirements of this
section are secondary to patient care needs and may be delayed or
compromised without penalty to the hospital or person required to
fulfill the requirements of this section.
(8) If the health care provider believes that the patient's injury
could be the result of domestic violence, the hospital must alert a
case manager, social worker, domestic violence advocate, or other
patient advocate to coordinate with the law enforcement officer who
responds to the report required by this section. The law enforcement
officer and case manager, social worker, domestic violence advocate, or
other patient advocate must determine whether there should be a delay
in contact with the patient, suspect, or other witness to assist the
patient in ensuring his or her safety or the safety of the patient's
family.

--- END ---