BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon written request of a landlord, a tenant must:
(a) Provide the landlord with the name, address, and telephone
number of a designated person to contact in the event of the tenant's
death; and
(b) Sign a statement authorizing the landlord in the event of the
tenant's death to: (i) Grant the designated person access to the
tenant's leased premises at a reasonable time and in the presence of
the landlord or the landlord's agent; (ii) allow the designated person
to remove any of the tenant's property found at the leased premises;
(iii) refund the tenant's security deposit, less lawful deductions, to
the designated person for the benefit of the tenant's estate; and (iv)
dispose of the tenant's property consistent with the tenant's intent
and any applicable law or will. The designated person is liable to the
tenant's estate for the property received. The designated person is
appointed for a period of two years, subject to reappointment.
(2) A tenant may, without request from the landlord, provide the
landlord with the information specified in subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, in the
event of the death of a tenant who is the sole occupant of a leased
premises:
(a) The landlord may remove and store all property found in the
tenant's leased premises;
(b) The landlord must turn over possession of the property to the
designated person or to any other person lawfully entitled to the
property if the request is made before the property is discarded
pursuant to (e) of this subsection;
(c) The landlord shall refund the tenant's security deposit, less
lawful deductions, including the cost of removing and storing the
property, to the designated person or to any other person lawfully
entitled to the refund;
(d) Any person who removes property from the tenant's leasehold
premises shall, at the time of removal, create and sign an inventory of
the removed property and submit the signed inventory to the landlord;
and
(e) The landlord may discard the property he or she removes from
the tenant's leased premises if: (i) The landlord clearly informed the
tenant and designated person in writing of the consequences of failing
to take action after notice; (ii) the landlord mailed a written request
by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the designated person
that the property be removed; (iii) the designated person failed to
remove the property by the thirtieth day after the postmark date of the
notice; and (iv) the landlord, prior to the date of discarding the
property, was not contacted by anyone claiming the property.
(4) In a written lease or other agreement, a landlord and tenant
may agree to a procedure different than the procedure in subsections
(1) and (3) of this section for removing, storing, or disposing of
property in the leased premises of a deceased tenant.
(5) If a tenant, after being furnished with a notice of request,
knowingly violates subsection (1) of this section by failing to provide
the required information and statement, or no representative of the
deceased tenant's estate provides notice to the landlord of intent to
administer the deceased tenant's estate within sixty days of the
tenant's death, the landlord is not responsible for removal, storage,
disappearance, damage, or disposition of property in the deceased
tenant's leased premises.
(6) If a landlord, after being furnished with a copy of this
section, knowingly violates subsection (3) of this section or fails to
facilitate proper administration of the deceased tenant's estate after
proper notice under Title 11 RCW, the landlord is liable to the
deceased tenant's estate for actual damages.
(7) A landlord who complies with this section is relieved from any
liability relating to the deceased tenant's property.

--- END ---