BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 7.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commercially sexually exploited children statewide
coordinating committee is established to address the issue of children
who are commercially sexually exploited, to examine the practices of
local and regional entities involved in addressing sexually exploited
children, and to make recommendations on statewide laws and practices.
(2) The committee is called to order by the governor's office and
consists of the following members:
(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives;
(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the Senate;
(c) A representative of the governor's office appointed by the
governor;
(d) The secretary of the children's administration or his or her
designee;
(e) The secretary of the juvenile rehabilitation administration or
his or her designee;
(f) The attorney general or his or her designee;
(g) The superintendent of public instruction or his or her
designee;
(h) A representative of the administrative office of the courts
appointed by the administrative office of the courts;
(i) The executive director of the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs or his or her designee;
(j) The executive director of the Washington state criminal justice
training commission or his or her designee;
(k) A representative of the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys appointed by the association;
(l) The executive director of the office of public defense or his
or her designee;
(m) Three representatives of community service providers that
provide direct services to commercially sexually exploited children
appointed by the governor;
(n) Two representatives of nongovernmental organizations familiar
with the issues affecting commercially sexually exploited children
appointed by the governor;
(o) The president of the superior court judges' association or his
or her designee;
(p) The president of the juvenile court administrators or his or
her designee;
(q) Any existing chairs of regional task forces on commercially
sexually exploited children;
(r) A representative from the criminal defense bar;
(s) A representative from the office of crime victims advocacy; and
(t) A representative from the Washington coalition of sexual
assault programs.
(3) The duties of the committee include, but are not limited to:
(a) Receiving reports and data from local and regional entities
regarding the incidence of commercially sexually exploited children in
their areas as well as data information regarding perpetrators,
geographic data and location trends, and any other data deemed
relevant;
(b) Receiving reports on local coordinated community response
practices and results of the community responses;
(c) Reviewing recommendations from local and regional entities
regarding policy and legislative changes that would improve the
efficiency and effectiveness of local response practices;
(d) Making recommendations regarding policy and legislative changes
that would improve the effectiveness of the state's response to and
promote best practices for suppression of the commercial sexual
exploitation of children;
(e) Making recommendations regarding data collection useful to
understanding or addressing the problem of commercially sexually
exploited children; and
(f) Reviewing and making recommendations regarding strategic local
investments or opportunities for federal and state funding to address
the commercial sexual exploitation of children.
(4) The committee must meet no less than annually.

--- END ---