BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.130 and 2011 c 309 s 27 and 2011 c 292 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
If, after a fact-finding hearing pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, it has
been proven by a preponderance of the evidence that the child is
dependent within the meaning of RCW 13.34.030 after consideration of
the social study prepared pursuant to RCW 13.34.110 and after a
disposition hearing has been held pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, the court
shall enter an order of disposition pursuant to this section.
(1) The court shall order one of the following dispositions of the
case:
(a) Order a disposition that maintains the child in his or her
home, which shall provide a program designed to alleviate the immediate
danger to the child, to mitigate or cure any damage the child has
already suffered, and to aid the parents so that the child will not be
endangered in the future. In determining the disposition, the court
should choose services to assist the parents in maintaining the child
in the home, including housing assistance, if appropriate, that least
interfere with family autonomy and are adequate to protect the child.
(b)(i) Order the child to be removed from his or her home and into
the custody, control, and care of a relative or other suitable person,
the department, or a supervising agency for supervision of the child's
placement. If the court orders that the child be placed with a
caregiver over the objections of the parent, the court shall
articulate, on the record, his or her reasons for ordering the
placement. The court may not order an Indian child, as defined in RCW
13.38.040, to be removed from his or her home unless the court finds,
by clear and convincing evidence including testimony of qualified
expert witnesses, that the continued custody of the child by the parent
or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional or
physical damage to the child.
(ii) The department or supervising agency has the authority to
place the child, subject to review and approval by the court (A) with
a relative as defined in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a), (B) in the home of
another suitable person if the child or family has a preexisting
relationship with that person, and the person has completed all
required criminal history background checks and otherwise appears to
the department or supervising agency to be suitable and competent to
provide care for the child, or (C) in a foster family home or group
care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.
(iii) The department may also consider placing the child, subject
to review and approval by the court, with a person with whom the
child's sibling or half-sibling is residing or a person who has adopted
the sibling or half-sibling of the child being placed as long as the
person has completed all required criminal history background checks
and otherwise appears to the department or supervising agency to be
competent to provide care for the child.
(2) Absent good cause, the department or supervising agency shall
follow the wishes of the natural parent regarding the placement of the
child in accordance with RCW 13.34.260.
(3) The department or supervising agency may only place a child
with a person not related to the child as defined in RCW
74.15.020(2)(a), including a placement provided for in subsection
(1)(b)(iii) of this section, when the court finds that such placement
is in the best interest of the child. Unless there is reasonable cause
to believe that the health, safety, or welfare of the child would be
jeopardized or that efforts to reunite the parent and child will be
hindered, the child shall be placed with a person who is willing,
appropriate, and available to care for the child, and who is: (I)
Related to the child as defined in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a) with whom the
child has a relationship and is comfortable; or (II) a suitable person
as described in subsection (1)(b) of this section. The court shall
consider the child's existing relationships and attachments when
determining placement.
(4) When placing an Indian child in out-of-home care, the
department or supervising agency shall follow the placement preference
characteristics in RCW 13.38.180.
(5) Placement of the child with a relative or other suitable person
as described in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be given
preference by the court. An order for out-of-home placement may be
made only if the court finds that reasonable efforts have been made to
prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's
home and to make it possible for the child to return home, specifying
the services, including housing assistance, that have been provided to
the child and the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and
that preventive services have been offered or provided and have failed
to prevent the need for out-of-home placement, unless the health,
safety, and welfare of the child cannot be protected adequately in the
home, and that:
(a) There is no parent or guardian available to care for such
child;
(b) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian is not willing to take
custody of the child; or
(c) The court finds, by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, a
manifest danger exists that the child will suffer serious abuse or
neglect if the child is not removed from the home and an order under
RCW 26.44.063 would not protect the child from danger.
(6) If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home
pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court shall consider
whether it is in a child's best interest to be placed with, have
contact with, or have visits with siblings.
(a) There shall be a presumption that such placement, contact, or
visits are in the best interests of the child provided that:
(i) The court has jurisdiction over all siblings subject to the
order of placement, contact, or visitation pursuant to petitions filed
under this chapter or the parents of a child for whom there is no
jurisdiction are willing to agree; and
(ii) There is no reasonable cause to believe that the health,
safety, or welfare of any child subject to the order of placement,
contact, or visitation would be jeopardized or that efforts to reunite
the parent and child would be hindered by such placement, contact, or
visitation. In no event shall parental visitation time be reduced in
order to provide sibling visitation.
(b) The court may also order placement, contact, or visitation of
a child with a stepbrother or stepsister provided that in addition to
the factors in (a) of this subsection, the child has a relationship and
is comfortable with the stepsibling.
(7) If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home
pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section and placed into
nonparental or nonrelative care, the court shall order a placement that
allows the child to remain in the same school he or she attended prior
to the initiation of the dependency proceeding when such a placement is
practical and in the child's best interest.
(8) If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home
pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court may order that
a petition seeking termination of the parent and child relationship be
filed if the requirements of RCW 13.34.132 are met.
(9) If there is insufficient information at the time of the
disposition hearing upon which to base a determination regarding the
suitability of a proposed placement with a relative or other suitable
person, the child shall remain in foster care and the court shall
direct the department or supervising agency to conduct necessary
background investigations as provided in chapter 74.15 RCW and report
the results of such investigation to the court within thirty days.
However, if such relative or other person appears otherwise suitable
and competent to provide care and treatment, the criminal history
background check need not be completed before placement, but as soon as
possible after placement. Any placements with relatives or other
suitable persons, pursuant to this section, shall be contingent upon
cooperation by the relative or other suitable person with the agency
case plan and compliance with court orders related to the care and
supervision of the child including, but not limited to, court orders
regarding parent-child contacts, sibling contacts, and any other
conditions imposed by the court. Noncompliance with the case plan or
court order shall be grounds for removal of the child from the
relative's or other suitable person's home, subject to review by the
court.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.136 and 2011 c 309 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a child is ordered removed from the home, a permanency
plan shall be developed no later than sixty days from the time the
supervising agency assumes responsibility for providing services,
including placing the child, or at the time of a hearing under RCW
13.34.130, whichever occurs first. The permanency planning process
continues until a permanency planning goal is achieved or dependency is
dismissed. The planning process shall include reasonable efforts to
return the child to the parent's home.
(2) The agency supervising the dependency shall submit a written
permanency plan to all parties and the court not less than fourteen
days prior to the scheduled hearing. Responsive reports of parties not
in agreement with the department's or supervising agency's proposed
permanency plan must be provided to the department or supervising
agency, all other parties, and the court at least seven days prior to
the hearing.
The permanency plan shall include:
(a) A permanency plan of care that shall identify one of the
following outcomes as a primary goal and may identify additional
outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the home of the
child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian; adoption, including a
tribal customary adoption as defined in RCW 13.38.040; guardianship;
permanent legal custody; long-term relative or foster care, until the
child is age eighteen, with a written agreement between the parties and
the care provider; successful completion of a responsible living skills
program; or independent living, if appropriate and if the child is age
sixteen or older. The department or supervising agency shall not
discharge a child to an independent living situation before the child
is eighteen years of age unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant
to chapter 13.64 RCW;
(b) Unless the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(((6)))
(8), that a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where
the child will be placed, what steps will be taken to return the child
home, what steps the supervising agency or the department will take to
promote existing appropriate sibling relationships and/or facilitate
placement together or contact in accordance with the best interests of
each child, and what actions the department or supervising agency will
take to maintain parent-child ties. All aspects of the plan shall
include the goal of achieving permanence for the child.
(i) The department's or supervising agency's plan shall specify
what services the parents will be offered to enable them to resume
custody, what requirements the parents must meet to resume custody, and
a time limit for each service plan and parental requirement.
(ii)(A) Visitation is the right of the family, including the child
and the parent, in cases in which visitation is in the best interest of
the child. Early, consistent, and frequent visitation is crucial for
maintaining parent-child relationships and making it possible for
parents and children to safely reunify. The supervising agency or
department shall encourage the maximum parent and child and sibling
contact possible, when it is in the best interest of the child,
including regular visitation and participation by the parents in the
care of the child while the child is in placement.
(B) Visitation shall not be limited as a sanction for a parent's
failure to comply with court orders or services where the health,
safety, or welfare of the child is not at risk as a result of the
visitation.
(C) Visitation may be limited or denied only if the court
determines that such limitation or denial is necessary to protect the
child's health, safety, or welfare. When a parent or sibling has been
identified as a suspect in an active criminal investigation that, if
the allegations are true, would impact the safety of the child, the
department shall make a concerted effort to consult with the assigned
law enforcement officer in the criminal case before recommending any
changes in parent/child or child/sibling contact. The results of the
consultation shall be communicated to the court.
(D) The court and the department or supervising agency should rely
upon community resources, relatives, foster parents, and other
appropriate persons to provide transportation and supervision for
visitation to the extent that such resources are available, and
appropriate, and the child's safety would not be compromised.
(iii) A child shall be placed as close to the child's home as
possible, preferably in the child's own neighborhood, unless the court
finds that placement at a greater distance is necessary to promote the
child's or parents' well-being.
(iv) The plan shall state whether both in-state and, where
appropriate, out-of-state placement options have been considered by the
department or supervising agency.
(v) Unless it is not in the best interests of the child, whenever
practical, the plan should ensure the child remains enrolled in the
school the child was attending at the time the child entered foster
care.
(vi) The supervising agency or department shall provide all
reasonable services that are available within the department or
supervising agency, or within the community, or those services which
the department has existing contracts to purchase. It shall report to
the court if it is unable to provide such services; and
(c) If the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(((6))) (8),
that a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the
child will be placed, what steps will be taken to achieve permanency
for the child, services to be offered or provided to the child, and, if
visitation would be in the best interests of the child, a
recommendation to the court regarding visitation between parent and
child pending a fact-finding hearing on the termination petition. The
department or supervising agency shall not be required to develop a
plan of services for the parents or provide services to the parents if
the court orders a termination petition be filed. However, reasonable
efforts to ensure visitation and contact between siblings shall be made
unless there is reasonable cause to believe the best interests of the
child or siblings would be jeopardized.
(3) Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest
possible date. If the child has been in out-of-home care for fifteen
of the most recent twenty-two months, the court shall require the
department or supervising agency to file a petition seeking termination
of parental rights in accordance with RCW 13.34.145(3)(b)(vi). In
cases where parental rights have been terminated, the child is legally
free for adoption, and adoption has been identified as the primary
permanency planning goal, it shall be a goal to complete the adoption
within six months following entry of the termination order.
(4) If the court determines that the continuation of reasonable
efforts to prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from his
or her home or to safely return the child home should not be part of
the permanency plan of care for the child, reasonable efforts shall be
made to place the child in a timely manner and to complete whatever
steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.
(5) The identified outcomes and goals of the permanency plan may
change over time based upon the circumstances of the particular case.
(6) The court shall consider the child's relationships with the
child's siblings in accordance with RCW 13.34.130(((4))) (6). Whenever
the permanency plan for a child is adoption, the court shall encourage
the prospective adoptive parents, birth parents, foster parents,
kinship caregivers, and the department or other supervising agency to
seriously consider the long-term benefits to the child adoptee and his
or her siblings of providing for and facilitating continuing
postadoption contact between the siblings. To the extent that it is
feasible, and when it is in the best interests of the child adoptee and
his or her siblings, contact between the siblings should be frequent
and of a similar nature as that which existed prior to the adoption.
If the child adoptee or his or her siblings are represented by an
attorney or guardian ad litem in a proceeding under this chapter or in
any other child custody proceeding, the court shall inquire of each
attorney and guardian ad litem regarding the potential benefits of
continuing contact between the siblings and the potential detriments of
severing contact. This section does not require the department of
social and health services or other supervising agency to agree to any
specific provisions in an open adoption agreement and does not create
a new obligation for the department to provide supervision or
transportation for visits between siblings separated by adoption from
foster care.
(7) For purposes related to permanency planning:
(a) "Guardianship" means a dependency guardianship or a legal
guardianship pursuant to chapter 11.88 RCW or equivalent laws of
another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.
(b) "Permanent custody order" means a custody order entered
pursuant to chapter 26.10 RCW.
(c) "Permanent legal custody" means legal custody pursuant to
chapter 26.10 RCW or equivalent laws of another state or a federally
recognized Indian tribe.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.34.380 and 2009 c 520 s 45 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall develop consistent policies and protocols,
based on current relevant research, concerning visitation for dependent
children to be implemented consistently throughout the state. The
department shall develop the policies and protocols in consultation
with researchers in the field, community-based agencies, court-appointed special advocates, parents' representatives, and court
representatives. The policies and protocols shall include, but not be
limited to: The structure and quality of visitations; consultation
with the assigned law enforcement officer in the event the parent or
sibling of the child is identified as a suspect in an active criminal
investigation that may impact the safety of the child; and training for
department and supervising agency caseworkers, visitation supervisors,
and foster parents related to visitation.
The policies and protocols shall be consistent with the provisions
of this chapter and implementation of the policies and protocols shall
be consistent with relevant orders of the court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW
to read as follows:
In the event a judge orders a parent to undergo a psychosexual
evaluation, and pending the outcome of the evaluation, the department
shall reassess visitation duration, supervision, and location, if
appropriate. If the assessment indicates the current visitation plan
is contrary to the child's health, safety, or welfare, the department,
subject to approval by the court, may alter the visitation plan pending
the outcome of the investigation.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.14B.010 and 1999 c 389 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Caseworkers employed in children services shall meet minimum
standards established by the department of social and health services.
Comprehensive training for caseworkers shall be completed before such
caseworkers are assigned to case-carrying responsibilities without
direct supervision. Intermittent, part-time, and standby workers shall
be subject to the same minimum standards and training.
(2) Ongoing specialized training shall be provided for persons
responsible for investigating child sexual abuse. Training
participants shall have the opportunity to practice interview skills
and receive feedback from instructors.
(3) The department, the criminal justice training commission, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, and the
Washington association of prosecuting attorneys shall design and
implement statewide training that contains consistent elements for
persons engaged in the interviewing of children, including law
enforcement, prosecution, and child protective services.
(4) The training shall: (a) Be based on research-based practices
and standards; (b) minimize the trauma of all persons who are
interviewed during abuse investigations; (c) provide methods of
reducing the number of investigative interviews necessary whenever
possible; (d) assure, to the extent possible, that investigative
interviews are thorough, objective, and complete; (e) recognize needs
of special populations, such as persons with developmental
disabilities; (f) recognize the nature and consequences of
victimization; (g) require investigative interviews to be conducted in
a manner most likely to permit the interviewed persons the maximum
emotional comfort under the circumstances; (h) address record retention
and retrieval; and (i) documentation of investigative interviews.
(5) The identification of domestic violence is critical in ensuring
the safety of children in the child welfare system. As a result,
ongoing domestic violence training and consultation shall be provided
to caseworkers, including how to use the children's administration's
practice guide to domestic violence.

--- END ---