BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.40.091 and 2011 c 349 s 17, 2011 c 348 s 3, 2011
c 182 s 1, and 2011 c 10 s 39 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) The county auditor shall send each voter a ballot, a security
envelope in which to conceal the ballot after voting, a larger envelope
in which to return the security envelope, a declaration that the voter
must sign, and instructions on how to obtain information about the
election, how to mark the ballot, and how to return the ballot to the
county auditor.
(2) The voter must swear under penalty of perjury that he or she
meets the qualifications to vote, and has not voted in any other
jurisdiction at this election. The declaration must clearly inform the
voter that it is illegal to vote if he or she is not a United States
citizen; it is illegal to vote if he or she has been convicted of a
felony and has not had his or her voting rights restored; and it is
illegal to cast a ballot or sign a return envelope on behalf of another
voter. The voter must indicate the date on which the ballot was voted
and sign the declaration. The ballot materials must also contain a
space so that the voter may include a telephone number.
(3) For overseas and service voters, the signed declaration on the
return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a voter registration for
the election or primary for which the ballot has been issued. Return
envelopes for overseas and service voters must enable the ballot to be
returned postage free if mailed through the United States postal
service, United States armed forces postal service, or the postal
service of a United States foreign embassy under 39 U.S.C. 3406.
(4) The voter must be instructed to either return the ballot to the
county auditor no later than 8:00 p.m. the day of the election or
primary, or mail the ballot to the county auditor with a postmark ((no
later than the day of the election or primary)) in accordance with the
time requirements of RCW 29A.40.110. Service and overseas voters must
be provided with instructions and a secrecy cover sheet for returning
the ballot and signed declaration by fax or e-mail. A voted ballot and
signed declaration returned by fax or e-mail must be received by 8:00
p.m. on the day of the election or primary.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.40.110 and 2011 c 349 s 18, 2011 c 348 s 4, and
2011 c 10 s 41 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes for
any primary or election may begin upon receipt. The tabulation of
((absentee)) ballots ((must not)) may commence ((until after)) at 8:00
((p.m.)) a.m. on the Monday immediately before the day of the primary
or election. Tabulation results must be held in secrecy, as provided
in RCW 29A.84.730, until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or
election.
(2) All received return envelopes must be placed in secure
locations from the time of delivery to the county auditor until their
subsequent opening. After opening the return envelopes, the county
canvassing board or its designated representatives shall place all of
the ballots in secure storage until ((processing)) tabulation. Ballots
may be taken from the inner envelopes and all the normal procedural
steps may be performed to prepare these ballots for tabulation.
(3) The canvassing board, or its designated representatives, shall
examine the ((postmark on the return envelope)) oath and signature on
the declaration before processing the ballot. ((The ballot must either
be received no later than 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or
election, or must be postmarked no later than the day of the primary or
election.)) All personnel assigned to verify signatures must receive
training on statewide standards for signature verification. Personnel
shall verify that the voter's signature on the ballot declaration is
the same as the signature of that voter in the registration files of
the county. Verification may be conducted by an automated verification
system approved by the secretary of state. A variation between the
signature of the voter on the ballot declaration and the signature of
that voter in the registration files due to the substitution of
initials or the use of common nicknames is permitted so long as the
surname and handwriting are clearly the same.
(4) ((If the postmark is missing or illegible, the date on the
ballot declaration to which the voter has attested determines the
validity, as to the time of voting, for that ballot.)) (a) Except as
provided in (b) of this subsection, ballots must be received by the
county auditor by 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election in
order to be valid. The county auditor may designate poll sites,
deposit sites, or other locations for the receipt of ballots.
(b) For overseas voters ((and)) or service voters returning ballots
by mail, the date on the declaration to which the voter has attested
((determines the validity, as to the time of voting, for that ballot))
must not be later than the day of the primary or election in order for
the ballot to be valid. Any overseas voter or service voter may return
the signed declaration and voted ballot by fax or e-mail by 8:00 p.m.
on the day of the primary or election, and the county auditor must use
established procedures to maintain the secrecy of the ballot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 29A.40 RCW
to read as follows:
Following certification of each election, the county auditor shall
notify each voter whose ballot was not counted because it was not
returned within the time requirements provided in RCW 29A.40.110.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2011 c 349 s 21 and 2011 c 10 s 58 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Fourteen days after a primary or special election and twenty-one
days after a general election, the county canvassing board shall
complete the canvass and certify the results. Each ballot that was
returned ((before 8:00 p.m. on the day of the special election, general
election, or primary, and each ballot bearing a postmark on or before
the date of the special election, general election, or primary and
received no later than the day before certification,)) in accordance
with the time requirements of RCW 29A.40.110 must be included in the
canvass report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---