BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.80.020 and 2012 c 261 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 79A.80.050, 79A.80.060, and
79A.80.070, a discover pass is required for any motor vehicle to park
or operate on any recreation site or lands, except for short-term
parking as may be authorized under RCW 79A.80.070.
(2) The cost of a discover pass is thirty dollars. Every four
years the office of financial management must review the cost of the
discover pass and, if necessary, recommend to the legislature an
adjustment to the cost of the discover pass to account for inflation.
(3) A discover pass is valid for one year beginning from the date
that the discover pass is marked for activation. The activation date
may differ from the purchase date pursuant to any policies developed by
the agencies.
(4) Sales of discover passes must be consistent with RCW
79A.80.100.
(5) The discover pass must contain space for two motor vehicle
license plate numbers. A discover pass is valid only for those vehicle
license plate numbers written on the pass. However, the agencies may
offer for sale a family discover pass that is fully transferable among
vehicles and does not require the placement of a license plate number
on the pass to be valid. The agencies must collectively set a price
for the sale of a family discover pass that is no more than fifty
dollars. A discover pass is valid only for use with one motor vehicle
at any one time.
(6)(a) One complimentary discover pass must be provided to ((a)):
(i) A person who has been provided with a lifetime veteran's
disability pass from the state parks and recreation commission under
RCW 79A.05.065; and
(ii) A volunteer who performed twenty-four hours of service on
agency-sanctioned volunteer projects in a year. The agency must
provide vouchers to volunteers identifying the number of volunteer
hours they have provided for each project.
((The)) (b) Volunteer vouchers or lifetime veteran's disability
passes may be brought to an agency ((to be redeemed)) for the receipt
of a discover pass.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.80.080 and 2012 c 261 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A discover pass, vehicle access pass, or day-use permit must be
visibly displayed in the front windshield of any motor vehicle or
otherwise in a prominent location for vehicles without a windshield:
(a) Operating on a recreation site or lands; or
(b) Parking at a recreation site or lands.
(2) The discover pass, the vehicle access pass, or the day-use
permit is not required on private lands, state-owned aquatic lands
other than water access areas, or at agency offices, hatcheries, or
other facilities where public business is conducted.
(3) The discover pass, the vehicle access pass, or the day-use
permit is not required for:
(a) Persons who use, possess, or enter lands owned or managed by
the agencies for nonrecreational purposes consistent with a written
authorization from the agency, including but not limited to leases,
contracts, and easements; or
(b) On department of fish and wildlife lands only, ((for)) persons
possessing a current vehicle access pass pursuant to RCW 79A.80.040.
(4)(a) An agency may waive the requirements of this section for any
person who has secured the ability to access specific recreational land
through the provision of monetary consideration to the agency or for
any person attending an event or function that required the provision
of monetary compensation to the agency.
(b) Special events and group activities are core recreational
activities and major public service opportunities within state parks.
When waiving the requirements of this section for special events, the
state parks and recreation commission must consider the direct and
indirect costs and benefits to the state, local market rental rates,
the public service functions of the event sponsor, and other public
interest factors when setting appropriate fees for each event or
activity.
(5) Failure to comply with subsection (1) of this section is a
natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW. An agency is
authorized to issue a notice of infraction to any person who fails to
comply with subsection (1)(a) of this section or to any motor vehicle
that fails to comply with subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(6) The penalty for failure to comply with the requirements of this
section is ninety-nine dollars. This penalty must be:
(a) Reduced to fifty-nine dollars if an individual provides proof
of purchase of a discover pass to the court within fifteen days after
the issuance of the notice of violation; and
(b) Waived entirely if an individual shows that he or she either
has a lifetime veteran's disability pass from the state parks and
recreation commission under RCW 79A.05.065 or is eligible for a
lifetime veteran's disability pass.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.05.065 and 2011 c 171 s 115 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The commission shall grant to any person who meets the
eligibility requirements specified in this section a senior citizen's
pass which shall: (i) Entitle such a person, and members of his or her
camping unit, to a fifty percent reduction in the campsite rental fee
prescribed by the commission; and (ii) entitle such a person to free
admission to any state park.
(b) The commission shall grant a senior citizen's pass to any
person who applies for the senior citizen's pass and who meets the
following requirements:
(i) The person is at least sixty-two years of age;
(ii) The person is a domiciliary of the state of Washington and
meets reasonable residency requirements prescribed by the commission;
and
(iii) The person and his or her spouse have a combined income that
would qualify the person for a property tax exemption pursuant to RCW
84.36.381. The financial eligibility requirements of this subsection
(1)(b)(iii) apply regardless of whether the applicant for a senior
citizen's pass owns taxable property or has obtained or applied for
such property tax exemption.
(c) Each senior citizen's pass granted pursuant to this section is
valid as long as the senior citizen meets the requirements of (b)(ii)
of this subsection. A senior citizen meeting the eligibility
requirements of this section may make a voluntary donation for the
upkeep and maintenance of state parks.
(d) A holder of a senior citizen's pass shall surrender the pass
upon request of a commission employee when the employee has reason to
believe the holder fails to meet the criteria in (b) of this
subsection. The holder shall have the pass returned upon providing
proof to the satisfaction of the director that the holder meets the
eligibility criteria for obtaining the senior citizen's pass.
(2)(a) Any resident of Washington who is disabled as defined by the
social security administration and who receives social security
benefits for that disability, or any other benefits for that disability
from any other governmental or nongovernmental source, or who is
entitled to benefits for permanent disability under RCW
71A.10.020(((3))) (4) due to unemployability full time at the minimum
wage, or who is legally blind or profoundly deaf, or who has been
issued a card, decal, or special license plate for a permanent
disability under RCW 46.19.010 shall be entitled to receive, regardless
of age and upon making application therefor, a disability pass at no
cost to the holder. The pass shall: (i) Entitle such a person, and
members of his or her camping unit, to a fifty percent reduction in the
campsite rental fee prescribed by the commission; and (ii) entitle such
a person to free admission to any state park.
(b) A card, decal, or special license plate issued for a permanent
disability under RCW 46.19.010 may serve as a pass for the holder to
entitle that person and members of the person's camping unit to a fifty
percent reduction in the campsite rental fee prescribed by the
commission, and to allow the holder free admission to state parks.
(3) Any resident of Washington who is a veteran and has a service-connected disability of at least thirty percent shall be entitled to
receive a lifetime veteran's disability pass at no cost to the holder.
The pass shall: (a) Entitle such a person, and members of his or her
camping unit, to free use of any campsite within any state park; (b)
entitle such a person to free admission to any state park; ((and)) (c)
entitle such a person to an exemption from any reservation fees; and
(d) entitle such a person to a complimentary discover pass consistent
with the provisions of RCW 79A.80.020.
(4)(a) Any Washington state resident who provides out-of-home care
to a child, as either a licensed foster-family home or a person related
to the child, is entitled to a foster home pass.
(b) An applicant for a foster home pass must request a pass in the
manner required by the commission. Upon receipt of a properly
submitted request, the commission shall verify with the department of
social and health services that the applicant qualifies under (a) of
this subsection. Once issued, a foster home pass is valid for the
period, which may not be less than one year, designated by the
commission.
(c) When accompanied by a child receiving out-of-home care from the
pass holder, a foster home pass: (i) Entitles such a person, and
members of his or her camping unit, to free use of any campsite within
any state park; and (ii) entitles such a person to free admission to
any state park.
(d) For the purposes of this subsection (4):
(i) "Out-of-home care" means placement in a foster-family home or
with a person related to the child under the authority of chapter
13.32A, 13.34, or 74.13 RCW;
(ii) "Foster-family home" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
74.15.020; and
(iii) "Person related to the child" means those persons referred to
in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a) (i) through (vi).
(5) All passes issued pursuant to this section are valid at all
parks any time during the year. However, the pass is not valid for
admission to concessionaire operated facilities.
(6) The commission shall negotiate payment and costs, to allow
holders of a foster home pass free access and usage of park campsites,
with the following nonoperated, nonstate-owned parks: Central Ferry,
Chief Timothy, Crow Butte, and Lyons Ferry. The commission shall seek
state general fund reimbursement on a biennial basis.
(7) The commission may deny or revoke any Washington state park
pass issued under this section for cause, including but not limited to
the following:
(a) Residency outside the state of Washington;
(b) Violation of laws or state park rules resulting in eviction
from a state park;
(c) Intimidating, obstructing, or assaulting a park employee or
park volunteer who is engaged in the performance of official duties;
(d) Fraudulent use of a pass;
(e) Providing false information or documentation in the application
for a state parks pass;
(f) Refusing to display or show the pass to park employees when
requested; or
(g) Failing to provide current eligibility information upon request
by the agency or when eligibility ceases or changes.
(8) This section shall not affect or otherwise impair the power of
the commission to continue or discontinue any other programs it has
adopted for senior citizens.
(9) The commission may engage in a mutually agreed upon reciprocal
or discounted program for all or specific pass programs with other
outdoor recreation agencies.
(10) The commission shall adopt those rules as it finds appropriate
for the administration of this section. Among other things, the rules
shall prescribe a definition of "camping unit" which will authorize a
reasonable number of persons traveling with the person having a pass to
stay at the campsite rented by such a person, a minimum Washington
residency requirement for applicants for a senior citizen's pass, and
an application form to be completed by applicants for a senior
citizen's pass.

--- END ---