BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.40.160 and 2011 c 10 s 43 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county auditor shall open a voting center each primary,
special election, and general election. The voting center shall be
open during business hours during the voting period, which begins
eighteen days before, and ends at 8:00 p.m. on the day of, the primary,
special election, or general election.
(2) The voting center must provide voter registration materials,
ballots, provisional ballots, disability access voting units, sample
ballots, instructions on how to properly vote the ballot, a ballot drop
box, and voters' pamphlets, if a voters' pamphlet has been published.
(3) The voting center must be accessible to persons with
disabilities. Each state agency and entity of local government shall
permit the use of any of its accessible facilities as voting centers
when requested by a county auditor.
(4) The voting center must provide at least one voting unit
certified by the secretary of state that provides access to individuals
who are blind or visually impaired, enabling them to vote with privacy
and independence.
(5) No person may interfere with a voter attempting to vote in a
voting center. Interfering with a voter attempting to vote is a
violation of RCW 29A.84.510.
(6) Before opening the voting center, the voting equipment shall be
inspected to determine if it has been properly prepared for voting. If
the voting equipment is capable of direct tabulation of each voter's
choices, the county auditor shall verify that no votes have been
registered for any issue or office, and that the device has been sealed
with a unique numbered seal at the time of final preparation and logic
and accuracy testing. A log must be made of all device numbers and
seal numbers.
(7) The county auditor shall require any person desiring to vote at
a voting center to either sign a ballot declaration or provide
identification.
(a) The signature on the declaration must be compared to the
signature on the voter registration record before the ballot may be
counted. If the voter registered using a mark, or can no longer sign
his or her name, the election officers shall require the voter to be
identified by another registered voter.
(b) The identification must be valid photo identification, such as
a driver's license, state identification card, student identification
card, tribal identification card, or employer identification card. Any
individual who desires to vote in person but cannot provide
identification shall be issued a provisional ballot, which shall be
accepted if the signature on the declaration matches the signature on
the voter's registration record.
(8) Provisional ballots must be accompanied by a declaration and
security envelope, as required by RCW 29A.40.091, and space for the
voter's name, date of birth, current and former registered address,
reason for the provisional ballot, and disposition of the provisional
ballot. The voter shall vote and return the provisional ballot at the
voting center. The voter must be provided information on how to
ascertain whether the provisional ballot was counted and, if
applicable, the reason why the vote was not counted.
(9) Any voter may take printed or written material into the voting
device to assist in casting his or her vote. The voter shall not use
this material to electioneer and shall remove it when he or she leaves
the voting center.
(10) If any voter states that he or she is unable to cast his or
her votes due to a disability, the voter may designate a person of his
or her choice, or two election officers, to enter the voting booth and
record the votes as he or she directs.
(11) No voter is entitled to vote more than once at a primary,
special election, or general election. If a voter incorrectly marks a
ballot, he or she may be issued a replacement ballot.
(12) A voter who has already returned a ballot but requests to vote
at a voting center shall be issued a provisional ballot. The
canvassing board shall not count the provisional ballot if it finds
that the voter has also voted a regular ballot in that primary, special
election, or general election.
(13) The county auditor must prevent overflow of each ballot drop
box to allow a voter to deposit his or her ballot securely. Ballots
must be removed from a ballot drop box by at least two people, with a
record kept of the date and time ballots were removed, and the names of
people removing them. Ballots from drop boxes must be returned to the
counting center in secured transport containers. A copy of the record
must be placed in the container, and one copy must be transported with
the ballots to the counting center, where the seal number must be
verified by the county auditor or a designated representative. All
ballot drop boxes must be secured at 8:00 p.m. on the day of the
primary, special election, or general election.
(14) Any voter who is inside or in line at the voting center at
8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary, special election, or general
election must be allowed to vote.
(15) For each primary, special election, and general election, the
county auditor may provide election services at locations in addition
to the voting center. The county auditor has discretion to establish
which services will be provided at the additional locations, and which
days and hours the locations will be open; provided that the county
auditor must establish a minimum of one ballot drop box per twenty
thousand residents or one ballot drop box per city with a population
greater than one thousand, whichever is greater.

--- END ---