BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A city or town may declare by ordinance what is deemed to be a
nuisance within the city or town, including but not limited to "litter"
and "potentially dangerous litter" as defined in RCW 70.93.030;
prevent, remove, and abate a nuisance at the expense of the parties
creating, causing, or committing the nuisance; and levy a special
assessment on the land or premises on which the nuisance is situated to
defray the cost, or to reimburse the city or town for the cost of
abating it. This assessment shall constitute a lien against the
property, which shall be of equal rank with state, county, and
municipal taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
A city may declare by ordinance what is deemed to be a nuisance
within the city, including but not limited to "litter" and "potentially
dangerous litter" as defined in RCW 70.93.030; prevent, remove, and
abate a nuisance at the expense of the parties creating, causing, or
committing the nuisance; and levy a special assessment on the land or
premises on which the nuisance is situated to defray the cost, or to
reimburse the city for the cost of abating it. This assessment shall
constitute a lien against the property, which shall be of equal rank
with state, county, and municipal taxes.

--- END ---