BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county, city, town, water-sewer district, or flood control
zone district constructing, improving, operating, or maintaining storm
water control facilities under chapter 35.67, 35.92, 36.89, 36.94,
57.08, or 86.15 RCW that include storm water retention ponds, also
known as wet ponds, wet retention ponds, or wet extended detention
ponds, as part of a storm water control facility for which the primary
function of the pond is to detain storm water, must:
(a) Consider and to the extent possible consistent with department
design guidelines, and without compromising the intended function of
the storm water retention pond, construct storm water facilities to
maintain and control vegetation to minimize mosquito propagation;
(b) Consult with the local mosquito control district, where
established, in the development of construction plans that include
storm water retention ponds; and
(c) Provide for maintenance and control of vegetation growth in
storm water retention ponds to reduce mosquito habitat and inhibit
mosquito propagation.
(2) A county, city, town, water-sewer district, or flood control
zone district operating or maintaining storm water control facilities
must, except where mosquito control districts are established, when
notified by the department of health or a local health jurisdiction of
the positive identification of west nile virus or other mosquito-borne
human disease viruses in mosquitoes, birds, or mammals, including
humans, consult with the department of health or a mosquito control
district concerning which integrated pest management strategies, as
defined under chapter 17.15 RCW, for mosquito control or abatement in
storm water retention ponds would be most effective to prevent the
spread of the disease.
(3) Where a mosquito control district is established, when notified
by the department of health or a local health jurisdiction of the
positive identification of west nile virus or other mosquito-borne
human disease viruses in mosquitoes, birds, or mammals, including
humans, the mosquito control district is responsible for mosquito
control or abatement in storm water retention ponds.

--- END ---