BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
Any county that borders a state without a sales tax is an eligible
county for purposes of the provisions of RCW 82.14.370 regarding
establishing a sales and use tax to finance public facilities serving
economic development purposes.

--- END ---