BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The primary purposes of a school-grading program are to enhance
the learning gains of all students, provide feedback to schools and
school districts, supply parents and community members with
understandable information about their schools, and provide information
regarding school accountability and recognition.
(2) Beginning with the 2013-14 school year, the state board of
education must implement a school-grading program that identifies
schools as having one of the following grades:
(a) "A" for schools making excellent progress;
(b) "B" for schools making above average progress;
(c) "C" for schools making satisfactory progress;
(d) "D" for schools making less than satisfactory progress; and
(e) "F" for schools failing to make adequate progress.
(3) Each school that has students who are tested using the
assessments administered statewide in reading, writing, mathematics,
and science required under RCW 28A.655.061, 28A.655.066, and
28A.655.070 shall earn a school grade, except as follows:
(a) To protect the privacy of students, schools, and districts
testing fewer than ten students in a grade level; and
(b) A school that serves any combination of students in
kindergarten through grade three shall not earn a school grade based on
test scores because its students are not tested. Such schools shall be
included in the school-grading program by earning the grade designation
of the K-3 feeder-pattern school identified by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and verified by the school
district. A school feeder pattern exists if at least sixty percent of
the students in the school serving a combination of students in
kindergarten through grade three are scheduled to be assigned to the
graded school. The school with students in kindergarten through grade
three will earn the grade earned by its feeder-pattern school.
(4)(a) A school's grade shall be determined by the state board of
education using the accountability index, cooperatively developed under
RCW 28A.657.110 by the state board of education and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. The index must measure the
increase in student achievement on the statewide administered
assessments in reading, writing, mathematics, and science; and the
reduction in student achievement gaps. The index may include other
student outcome measurements.
(b) For schools with any combination of grades nine, ten, eleven,
and twelve, at least fifty percent of a school's grade shall be
determined using the accountability index and the remaining percentage
shall be based on the following factors, if the factors are not already
included in the accountability index:
(i) The high school graduation rate of the school as calculated by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction;
(ii) As valid data becomes available, the performance and
participation of the school's students in AP courses, international
baccalaureate courses, and dual enrollment courses; and student
achievement of national industry certification;
(iii) Postsecondary readiness of all of the school's on-time
graduates as measured by the SAT, the ACT, or a placement test; and
(iv) The high school graduation rate of at-risk students.
(5)(a) The state board of education shall adopt appropriate
criteria for each school grade.
(b) The criteria must give added weight to student achievement in
reading.
(c) Schools earning a grade of "C," or higher must demonstrate that
at least half of the students in the school who are in the lowest
twenty-fifth percentile in reading and mathematics on the statewide
administered assessments are making adequate progress; if not, the
school letter grade is decreased by one letter.
(d) For schools with any combination of grades nine, ten, eleven,
and twelve, the criteria for school grades must also give added weight
to the graduation rate of all eligible at-risk students. In order for
a high school to earn a grade of "A," the school must demonstrate that
its at-risk students are making adequate progress.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
annually report each school district's grade to the governor and the
legislature. A school district's grade must be calculated using
student performance and learning gains data on statewide assessments
used for determining school grades under subsection (4) of this section
for each eligible student enrolled for a full school year in the
district. This calculation methodology captures information describing
each eligible student in the district who may have transferred among
schools within the district or who is enrolled in a school that does
not earn a grade.
(7) By August 1, 2014, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall adapt the model school performance report and the
agency web site originally developed under RCW 28A.655.110 to include
each school district's grade and each school's grade. Each school
district's and school's report card shall be published annually, with
the school and district grade history, by the agency on its web site.
(8) Each school district must include in its annual school
performance report required under RCW 28A.655.110 each school's grade
and must also include the school district's grade.
(9) For the purposes of this section, "at-risk students" means
students scoring at level one or level two on the eighth grade
statewide administered reading and mathematics assessment.
(10) The state board of education and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules, as necessary,
to administer this section.
(11)(a) The school-grading program shall be a pilot program during
the 2013-14 school year. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall conduct the pilot program in five geographically
diverse school districts, including urban, rural, large, and small
districts.
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
contract with an organization in Washington state that conducts and
disseminates action research, partners with state and local agencies
and organizations, and provides data services and support for school
and district improvement planning to conduct an independent evaluation
of the school-grading pilot program. The evaluation shall be submitted
to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
governor, and the legislature by December 1, 2014. The evaluation must
include recommendations on any necessary modifications, if any, to the
criteria or the process used to grade schools and districts.
(12) The state board of education and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall make all the modifications
recommended in the evaluation and implement the school-grading program
statewide in the 2014-15 school year.
(13) Beginning in 2015, any school district with at least one
school designated as an "F" school under the school-grading program
created by this act shall be designated a required action district and
subject to the provisions of chapter 28A.657 RCW. Any school districts
designated as a required action district under the authority of this
section shall receive state funding to support the implementation of a
required action plan.

--- END ---