BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in 2010 an
accountability system was created for the Washington public schools,
which was to be implemented in two phases. The first phase used
federal guidelines to designate the persistently lowest-achieving
schools that were eligible for federal Title I funds to apply for a
federal school improvement grant to implement federal intervention
strategies to improve student performance. The system was initially
voluntary but a required action process was to begin in 2011. The
legislature further finds that under the required action process four
of the persistently lowest-achieving schools that were on a downward
trend were offered the opportunity to use the federal school
improvement grants to take required actions. The legislature further
finds that the Renton and Onalaska school districts show promising
improvement that other districts can build upon. The legislature
intends to implement phase two of the accountability process beginning
in the 2013-14 school year to assist the ten most persistently lowest-achieving schools. Additionally, the legislature intends to create a
second level in the required action process that authorizes the office
of the superintendent of public instruction to take certain actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.657
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2013, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction must identify the ten most persistently lowest-achieving
schools using the student results on the statewide reading and
mathematics assessments.
(2) A school district with at least one school identified as one of
the ten most persistently lowest-achieving schools shall be designated
as a required action district.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide each
required action school district superintendent with written notice by
certified mail or personal service of the identification of the school
within the district as one of the most persistently lowest-achieving
schools causing the district to be designated a required action
district.
(4) A district designated as a required action district must notify
all parents of students attending a school identified as one of the
most persistently lowest-achieving schools in the district, the
designation of the district as a required action district, and the
process for complying with the required action process in RCW
28A.657.040 through 28A.657.100.
(5) Each required action district designated under this section
must follow the process and comply with the requirements in RCW
28A.657.040 through 28A.657.100, to the extent state funding is
provided to support the process.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.657.050 and 2012 c 53 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The local district superintendent and local school board of a
school district designated as a required action district must submit a
required action plan to the state board of education for approval.
Unless otherwise required by subsection (3) of this section, the plan
must be submitted under a schedule as required by the state board. A
required action plan must be developed in collaboration with
administrators, teachers, and other staff, parents, unions representing
any employees within the district, students, and other representatives
of the local community. The superintendent of public instruction shall
provide a district with assistance in developing its plan if requested.
The school board must conduct a public hearing to allow for comment on
a proposed required action plan. The local school district shall
submit the plan first to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to review and approve that the plan is consistent with
federal guidelines. After the office of the superintendent of public
instruction has approved that the plan is consistent with federal
guidelines, the local school district must submit its required action
plan to the state board of education for approval, unless the district
is designated a required action district in accordance with section 2
of this act.
(2) A required action plan must include all of the following:
(a) Implementation of one of the four federal intervention models
required for the receipt of a federal school improvement grant, for
those persistently lowest-achieving schools that the district will be
focusing on for required action, or for a district designated a
required action district in accordance with section 2 of this act, one
of the four federal intervention models or the collaborative schools
for innovation and success model in accordance with chapter 28A.630
RCW. However, a district may not establish a charter school under a
federal intervention model without express legislative authority,
unless the district is designated a required action district in
accordance with section 2 of this act. If a required action district
chooses to establish a charter school as the intervention model, then
the charter school that is established counts towards the maximum
number of charter schools that may be established in accordance with
RCW 28A.710.150. The intervention models are the turnaround, restart,
school closure, and transformation models, or for a district designated
a required action district in accordance with section 2 of this act,
the intervention models are the four federal intervention models or the
collaborative schools for innovation and success model in accordance
with chapter 28A.630 RCW. The intervention model selected must address
the concerns raised in the academic performance audit and be intended
to improve student performance to allow a school district to be removed
from the list of districts designated as a required action district by
the state board of education within three years of implementation of
the plan;
(b) Submission of an application for a federal school improvement
grant or a grant from other federal funds for school improvement to the
superintendent of public instruction, except that a district designated
as a required action district in accordance with section 2 of this act
shall receive the state funds appropriated for this purpose;
(c) A budget that provides for adequate resources to implement the
federal model selected and any other requirements of the plan;
(d) A description of the changes in the district's or school's
existing policies, structures, agreements, processes, and practices
that are intended to attain significant achievement gains for all
students enrolled in the school and how the district intends to address
the findings of the academic performance audit; and
(e) Identification of the measures that the school district will
use in assessing student achievement at a school identified as a
persistently lowest-achieving school, which include improving
mathematics and reading student achievement and graduation rates as
defined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction that
enable the school to no longer be identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school.
(3)(a) For any district designated for required action, the parties
to any collective bargaining agreement negotiated, renewed, or extended
under chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW after June 10, 2010, and for a school
district designated a required action district in accordance with
section 2 of this act after the effective date of this section, must
reopen the agreement, or negotiate an addendum, if needed, to make
changes to terms and conditions of employment that are necessary to
implement a required action plan. For any district applying to
participate in a collaborative schools for innovation and success pilot
project under RCW 28A.630.104, the parties to any collective bargaining
agreement negotiated, renewed, or extended under chapter 41.59 or 41.56
RCW after June 7, 2012, must reopen the agreement, or negotiate an
addendum, if needed, to make changes to terms and conditions of
employment that are necessary to implement an innovation and success
plan.
(b) If the school district and the employee organizations are
unable to agree on the terms of an addendum or modification to an
existing collective bargaining agreement, the parties, including all
labor organizations affected under the required action plan, shall
request the public employment relations commission to, and the
commission shall, appoint an employee of the commission to act as a
mediator to assist in the resolution of a dispute between the school
district and the employee organizations. Beginning in 2011, and each
year thereafter, mediation shall commence no later than April 15th.
All mediations held under this section shall include the employer and
representatives of all affected bargaining units.
(c) If the executive director of the public employment relations
commission, upon the recommendation of the assigned mediator, finds
that the employer and any affected bargaining unit are unable to reach
agreement following a reasonable period of negotiations and mediation,
but by no later than May 15th of the year in which mediation occurred,
the executive director shall certify any disputed issues for a decision
by the superior court in the county where the school district is
located. The issues for determination by the superior court must be
limited to the issues certified by the executive director.
(d) The process for filing with the court in this subsection (3)(d)
must be used in the case where the executive director certifies issues
for a decision by the superior court.
(i) The school district shall file a petition with the superior
court, by no later than May 20th of the same year in which the issues
were certified, setting forth the following:
(A) The name, address, and telephone number of the school district
and its principal representative;
(B) The name, address, and telephone number of the employee
organizations and their principal representatives;
(C) A description of the bargaining units involved;
(D) A copy of the unresolved issues certified by the executive
director for a final and binding decision by the court; and
(E) The academic performance audit that the office of the
superintendent of public instruction completed for the school district
in the case of a required action district, or the comprehensive needs
assessment in the case of a collaborative schools for innovation and
success pilot project.
(ii) Within seven days after the filing of the petition, each party
shall file with the court the proposal it is asking the court to order
be implemented in a required action plan or innovation and success plan
for the district for each issue certified by the executive director.
Contemporaneously with the filing of the proposal, a party must file a
brief with the court setting forth the reasons why the court should
order implementation of its proposal in the final plan.
(iii) Following receipt of the proposals and briefs of the parties,
the court must schedule a date and time for a hearing on the petition.
The hearing must be limited to argument of the parties or their counsel
regarding the proposals submitted for the court's consideration. The
parties may waive a hearing by written agreement.
(iv) The court must enter an order selecting the proposal for
inclusion in a required action plan that best responds to the issues
raised in the school district's academic performance audit, and allows
for the award of a federal school improvement grant or a grant from
other federal or state funds for school improvement to the district
from the office of the superintendent of public instruction to
implement one of the ((four federal)) intervention models. In the case
of an innovation and success plan, the court must enter an order
selecting the proposal for inclusion in the plan that best responds to
the issues raised in the school's comprehensive needs assessment. The
court's decision must be issued no later than June 15th of the year in
which the petition is filed and is final and binding on the parties;
however the court's decision is subject to appeal only in the case
where it does not allow the school district to implement a required
action plan consistent with the requirements for the award of a federal
school improvement grant or other federal or state funds for school
improvement by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) Each party shall bear its own costs and attorneys' fees
incurred under this statute.
(f) Any party that proceeds with the process in this section after
knowledge that any provision of this section has not been complied with
and who fails to state its objection in writing is deemed to have
waived its right to object.
(4) All contracts entered into between a school district and an
employee must be consistent with this section and allow school
districts designated as required action districts to implement one of
the ((four federal)) intervention models in a required action plan.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.657.050 and 2010 c 235 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The local district superintendent and local school board of a
school district designated as a required action district must submit a
required action plan to the state board of education for approval.
Unless otherwise required by subsection (3) of this section, the plan
must be submitted under a schedule as required by the state board. A
required action plan must be developed in collaboration with
administrators, teachers, and other staff, parents, unions representing
any employees within the district, students, and other representatives
of the local community. The superintendent of public instruction shall
provide a district with assistance in developing its plan if requested.
The school board must conduct a public hearing to allow for comment on
a proposed required action plan. The local school district shall
submit the plan first to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to review and approve that the plan is consistent with
federal guidelines. After the office of the superintendent of public
instruction has approved that the plan is consistent with federal
guidelines, the local school district must submit its required action
plan to the state board of education for approval.
(2) A required action plan must include all of the following:
(a) Implementation of one of the four federal intervention models
required for the receipt of a federal school improvement grant, for
those persistently lowest-achieving schools that the district will be
focusing on for required action, or for a district designated a
required action district in accordance with section 2 of this act, one
of the four federal intervention models or the collaborative schools
for innovation and success model in accordance with chapter 28A.630
RCW. However, a district may not establish a charter school under a
federal intervention model without express legislative authority,
unless the district is designated a required action district in
accordance with section 2 of this act. If a required action district
chooses to establish a charter school as the intervention model, then
the charter school that is established counts towards the maximum
number of charter schools that may be established in accordance with
RCW 28A.710.150. The intervention models are the turnaround, restart,
school closure, and transformation models, or for a district designated
a required action district in accordance with section 2 of this act,
the intervention models are the four federal intervention models or the
collaborative schools for innovation and success model in accordance
with chapter 28A.630 RCW. The intervention model selected must address
the concerns raised in the academic performance audit and be intended
to improve student performance to allow a school district to be removed
from the list of districts designated as a required action district by
the state board of education within three years of implementation of
the plan;
(b) Submission of an application for a federal school improvement
grant or a grant from other federal funds for school improvement to the
superintendent of public instruction, except that a district designated
as a required action district in accordance with section 2 of this act
shall receive the state funds appropriated for this purpose;
(c) A budget that provides for adequate resources to implement the
federal model selected and any other requirements of the plan;
(d) A description of the changes in the district's or school's
existing policies, structures, agreements, processes, and practices
that are intended to attain significant achievement gains for all
students enrolled in the school and how the district intends to address
the findings of the academic performance audit; and
(e) Identification of the measures that the school district will
use in assessing student achievement at a school identified as a
persistently lowest-achieving school, which include improving
mathematics and reading student achievement and graduation rates as
defined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction that
enable the school to no longer be identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school.
(3)(a) For any district designated for required action, the parties
to any collective bargaining agreement negotiated, renewed, or extended
under chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW after June 10, 2010, and for a school
district designated a required action district in accordance with
section 2 of this act after the effective date of this section, must
reopen the agreement, or negotiate an addendum, if needed, to make
changes to terms and conditions of employment that are necessary to
implement a required action plan.
(b) If the school district and the employee organizations are
unable to agree on the terms of an addendum or modification to an
existing collective bargaining agreement, the parties, including all
labor organizations affected under the required action plan, shall
request the public employment relations commission to, and the
commission shall, appoint an employee of the commission to act as a
mediator to assist in the resolution of a dispute between the school
district and the employee organizations. Beginning in 2011, and each
year thereafter, mediation shall commence no later than April 15th.
All mediations held under this section shall include the employer and
representatives of all affected bargaining units.
(c) If the executive director of the public employment relations
commission, upon the recommendation of the assigned mediator, finds
that the employer and any affected bargaining unit are unable to reach
agreement following a reasonable period of negotiations and mediation,
but by no later than May 15th of the year in which mediation occurred,
the executive director shall certify any disputed issues for a decision
by the superior court in the county where the school district is
located. The issues for determination by the superior court must be
limited to the issues certified by the executive director.
(d) The process for filing with the court in this subsection (3)(d)
must be used in the case where the executive director certifies issues
for a decision by the superior court.
(i) The school district shall file a petition with the superior
court, by no later than May 20th of the same year in which the issues
were certified, setting forth the following:
(A) The name, address, and telephone number of the school district
and its principal representative;
(B) The name, address, and telephone number of the employee
organizations and their principal representatives;
(C) A description of the bargaining units involved;
(D) A copy of the unresolved issues certified by the executive
director for a final and binding decision by the court; and
(E) The academic performance audit that the office of the
superintendent of public instruction completed for the school district.
(ii) Within seven days after the filing of the petition, each party
shall file with the court the proposal it is asking the court to order
be implemented in a required action plan for the district for each
issue certified by the executive director. Contemporaneously with the
filing of the proposal, a party must file a brief with the court
setting forth the reasons why the court should order implementation of
its proposal in the final plan.
(iii) Following receipt of the proposals and briefs of the parties,
the court must schedule a date and time for a hearing on the petition.
The hearing must be limited to argument of the parties or their counsel
regarding the proposals submitted for the court's consideration. The
parties may waive a hearing by written agreement.
(iv) The court must enter an order selecting the proposal for
inclusion in a required action plan that best responds to the issues
raised in the school district's academic performance audit, and allows
for the award of a federal school improvement grant or a grant from
other federal or state funds for school improvement to the district
from the office of the superintendent of public instruction to
implement one of the ((four federal)) intervention models. The court's
decision must be issued no later than June 15th of the year in which
the petition is filed and is final and binding on the parties; however
the court's decision is subject to appeal only in the case where it
does not allow the school district to implement a required action plan
consistent with the requirements for the award of a federal school
improvement grant or other federal or state funds for school
improvement by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) Each party shall bear its own costs and attorneys' fees
incurred under this statute.
(f) Any party that proceeds with the process in this section after
knowledge that any provision of this section has not been complied with
and who fails to state its objection in writing is deemed to have
waived its right to object.
(4) All contracts entered into between a school district and an
employee must be consistent with this section and allow school
districts designated as required action districts to implement one of
the ((four federal)) intervention models in a required action plan.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.657.060 and 2010 c 235 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
A required action plan developed by a district's school board and
superintendent must be submitted to the state board of education for
approval. The state board must accept for inclusion in any required
action plan the final decision by the superior court on any issue
certified by the executive director of the public employment relations
commission under the process in RCW 28A.657.050. The state board of
education shall approve a plan proposed by a school district only if
the plan meets the requirements in RCW 28A.657.050 and provides
sufficient remedies to address the findings in the academic performance
audit to improve student achievement. Any addendum or modification to
an existing collective bargaining agreement, negotiated under RCW
28A.657.050 or by agreement of the district and the exclusive
bargaining unit, related to student achievement or school improvement
shall not go into effect until approval of a required action plan by
the state board of education. If the state board does not approve a
proposed plan, it must notify the local school board and local
district's superintendent in writing with an explicit rationale for why
the plan was not approved. Nonapproval by the state board of education
of the local school district's initial required action plan submitted
is not intended to trigger any actions under RCW 28A.657.080. With the
assistance of the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
the superintendent and school board of the required action district
shall either: (((a) [(1)])) (1) Submit a new plan to the state board
of education for approval within forty days of notification that its
plan was rejected, or (((b) [(2)])) (2) submit a request to the
required action plan review panel established under RCW 28A.657.070 for
reconsideration of the state board's rejection within ten days of the
notification that the plan was rejected. If federal or state funds are
not available, the plan is not required to be implemented until such
funding becomes available. If federal or state funds for this purpose
are available, a required action plan must be implemented in the
immediate school year following the district's designation as a
required action district.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.657.090 and 2010 c 235 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
A school district must implement a required action plan upon
approval by the state board of education. The office of (([the])) the
superintendent of public instruction must provide the required action
district with technical assistance and federal school improvement grant
funds or other federal funds for school improvement, if available, or
state funds, to implement an approved plan. The district must submit
a report to the superintendent of public instruction that provides the
progress the district is making in meeting the student achievement
goals based on the state's assessments, identifying strategies and
assets used to solve audit findings, and establishing evidence of
meeting plan implementation benchmarks as set forth in the required
action plan.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.657.100 and 2010 c 235 s 110 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction must provide a report
twice per year to the state board of education regarding the progress
made by all school districts designated as required action districts.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction must recommend to the
state board of education that a school district be released from the
designation as a required action district after the district implements
a required action plan for a period of three years; has made progress,
as defined by the superintendent of public instruction, in reading and
mathematics on the state's assessment over the past three consecutive
years; and no longer has a school within the district identified as
persistently lowest-achieving. The state board shall release a school
district from the designation as a required action district upon
confirmation that the district has met the requirements for a release.
(3)(a) If the state board of education determines that the required
action district has not met the requirements for release and the
required action district has received adequate federal or state funding
for three years to implement one of the intervention models as
determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
the district ((remains in required action and must submit a new or
revised plan under the process in RCW 28A.657.050)) enters level two of
the required action process. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall review the actions taken in accordance with
the required action process and create a new three-year plan with input
from the school district board of directors to be implemented by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction using a management
structure chosen by the superintendent of public instruction. The
superintendent of public instruction may choose to implement one of the
federal intervention models as provided in RCW 28A.657.050 or the
collaborative schools for innovation and success model in accordance
with chapter 28A.630 RCW. If the superintendent chooses to establish
a charter school as the intervention model, then the charter school
that is established counts towards the maximum number of charter
schools that may be established in accordance with RCW 28A.710.150.
(b) The three-year plan for level two of the required action
process must contain a performance framework that sets out the
indicators, measures, and metrics for improvement of student learning
including: Student academic proficiency, student academic growth,
achievement gap among subgroups, attendance, recurrent enrollment
graduation rates, postsecondary readiness, financial performance, and
sustainability.
(c) A required action district that is designated to enter level
two of the required action process must notify all parents of students
attending a school identified as one of the most persistently lowest-achieving schools in the district of the designation of the district as
a level two required action district, and the process for complying
with the requirements in this subsection (3).
(d) The superintendent of public instruction must provide a report
twice per year to the state board of education regarding the progress
made by all school districts designated for level two of the required
action process. The biannual report must include data on student
learning indicators identified in the required action district level
two plan; outline implementation success, challenges, and risks; and
include a sustainability plan. The state board of education may
provide input and recommended actions if it deems the three-year plan
is not making sufficient improvement.
(4) If at the end of the three-year plan instituted in accordance
with subsection (3) of this section the state board of education
determines that the required action district has not made sufficient
improvement as determined by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the school must be closed and the students assigned to
another school, unless there is no viable option to accommodate the
students due to lack of capacity or inability to provide equitable
access to educational programs and services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28A.657
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Certificated and classified employees assigned to a school that
is scheduled to enter level two of the required action process may
apply to the original school district for a transfer of assignment
within the original district, which request must be considered
according to the policies and procedures of the district regarding
transfers of assignment.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall exercise the
powers of a school district board of directors under RCW 28A.400.300
with regard to employment of certificated and classified employees
assigned at the schools entering level two of the required action
process.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction may delegate the
responsibility to hire, assign, evaluate, and dismiss employees
assigned at the schools entering level two of the required action
process.
(4) For any district designated for level two of the required
action process, the parties to any collective bargaining agreement
negotiated, renewed, or extended under chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW after
the effective date of this section must reopen the agreement, or
negotiate an addendum, if needed, to make changes to terms and
conditions of employment that are necessary to implement a required
action plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 3 of this act expires June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 4 of this act takes effect June 30,
2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2013, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---