BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to respond to our
constitutional obligation to amply fund basic education by targeting
our initial investments in the new basic education program on research-based practices that will result in improving student achievement,
closing the opportunity gap, and reducing dropout rates. The
legislature recognizes that reform efforts without funding is simply
another unfunded mandate on our schools and an empty promise to our
children. The legislature recognizes that funding is necessary but not
sufficient to fully provide an equal opportunity for all students to
learn. The legislature further recognizes that each student is
different and that to provide the opportunity to learn, the state must
provide additional resources and programs to those students with the
greatest barriers to being successful members of society, the
workforces, and a democracy. It is the intent of the legislature to
provide the necessary resources to each student through programs and
initiatives that demonstrate the greatest relationship to that
student's learning and ultimate success. By focusing our initial
funding on programs that have positive student outcomes we are moving
away from an input-based approach to school funding and towards a
funding system that is tied to producing results.
The legislature intends to continue to make changes to the program
of basic education in those areas where emerging research and evidence
shows there are better and more efficient strategies for helping
students succeed.
The legislature further intends to continue to focus on the
individualized needs of every child and recognize that different
children need differing levels of support in order to have an equal
opportunity to access their full potential. By investing now in those
educational support services that research demonstrates have a low risk
of failure and good return on investment, the state anticipates we will
save money in the future as the need for continuing intervention
strategies for those same children later in their educational career is
reduced. With this approach, the overall funding needs of the
educational system will over time be reduced even as student
achievement improves.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.220 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the
basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school
districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality
and give students the opportunity to complete graduation requirements
that are intended to prepare them for postsecondary education, gainful
employment, and citizenship. The program established under this
section shall be the minimum instructional program of basic education
offered by school districts.
(2) Each school district shall make available to students the
following minimum instructional offering each school year:
(a) For students enrolled in grades one through twelve, at least a
district-wide annual average of one thousand hours, which shall be
increased to at least one thousand eighty instructional hours for
students enrolled in each of grades seven through twelve and at least
one thousand instructional hours for students in each of grades one
through six according to an implementation schedule adopted by the
legislature, but not before the 2014-15 school year; and
(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least four hundred
fifty instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least one
thousand instructional hours according to the implementation schedule
under RCW 28A.150.315.
(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each
school district shall include:
(a) Instruction in the essential academic learning requirements
under RCW 28A.655.070;
(b) Instruction that provides students the opportunity to complete
twenty-four credits for high school graduation, subject to a phased-in
implementation of the twenty-four credits as established by the
legislature. Course distribution requirements may be established by
the state board of education under RCW 28A.230.090;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages;
(d) Supplemental instruction and services for underachieving
students through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005
through 28A.165.065;
(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled
students whose primary language is other than English through the
transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010
through 28A.180.080;
(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense
as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with
disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and
(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010
through 28A.185.030.
(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require
individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours
per day or to take any particular courses.
(5) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five
years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one
years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred eighty
school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school
district, and one hundred eighty half-days of instruction, or
equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of one
hundred eighty school days per school year according to the
implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315. However, schools
administering the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing
skills may use up to three school days at the beginning of the school
year to meet with parents and families as required in the parent
involvement component of the inventory. In addition, effective May 1,
1979, a school district may schedule the last five school days of the
one hundred ((and)) eighty day school year for noninstructional
purposes in the case of students who are graduating from high school,
including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early
release from school upon the request of a student, and all such
students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent
they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260.
(6) Nothing in this section precludes a school district from
enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as
offering additional instruction or providing additional services,
programs, or activities that the school district determines to be
appropriate for the education of the school district's students.
(7) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and
regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use
basic education instructional funds to implement a particular
instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires
school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student
ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay
for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this
section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning
period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a
school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(4)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers
needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following
general education average class size of full-time equivalent students
per teacher:

General education
average
class size
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium and beginning with schools with
the highest percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price
meals in the prior school year, the general education average class
size for grades K-3 shall be reduced until the average class size
funded under this subsection (4) is no more than 17.0 full-time
equivalent students per teacher beginning in the 2017-18 school year.
Districts shall receive the funds allocated in excess of an average
class size of 25.23 for grades K-3 only to the extent that the district
documents a class size between 25.23 and the class size funded in the
biennial operating budget.
(c) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high
school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers
based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per
teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical
education average
class size
Approved career and technical education offered at
the middle school and high school level . . . . . . . . . . . . 26.57
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 22.76

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum
specify:
(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than
fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price
meals; and
(ii) A specialty average class size for laboratory science,
advanced placement, and international baccalaureate courses.
(5)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:

Elementary
School Middle
School High
School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level
administrators . . . . . . . . . . . .
1.253
1.353
1.880

Teacher librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology,
and media to support school library media programs . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.663
0.519
0.523

Health and social services:

School nurses . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.076 0.060 0.096

Social workers . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.042 0.006 0.015

Psychologists . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.017 0.002 0.007

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and graduation
advising . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.493
1.116
1.909

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional
services provided by classified employees . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.936
0.700
0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.012 2.325 3.269

Custodians . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.657 1.942 2.965

Classified staff providing student and staff safety . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.079 0.092 0.141

Parent involvement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.00 0.00 0.00

(b) The omnibus appropriations act shall specify the level of state
funding for parent involvement coordinators. State funds provided for
parent involvement coordinators must be spent by the school districts
to employ parent involvement coordinators and implement parent
involvement programs that have been shown by research to be successful.
(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to
provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as
follows:

Staff per 1,000
K-12 students
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.628
Facilities, maintenance, and grounds . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.813
Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district
to support certificated and classified staffing of central
administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under
subsections (4)(a) and (b) and (5) of this section and (a) of this
subsection.
(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to
school districts for career and technical education and skill center
administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum
allocation for each school district shall include allocations per
annual average full-time equivalent student for the following
materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted for inflation
from the 2008-09 school year:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $54.43
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $147.90
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $58.44
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $124.07
Instructional professional development for certified and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $9.04
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $73.27
Security and central office . . . . . . . . . . . . $50.76

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium, the minimum allocation for
((maintenance)) materials, supplies, and operating costs shall be
increased as specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The
following allocations, adjusted for inflation from the 2007-08 school
year, are provided in the 2015-16 school year, after which the
allocations shall be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in
the omnibus appropriations act:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $113.80
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $309.21
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $122.17
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $259.39
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $18.89
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $153.18
Security and central office administration . . . . . . . . . . . . $106.12

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this
section, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based
on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:
(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students
in grades seven through twelve;
(b) Laboratory science courses for students in grades nine through
twelve;
(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and
(d) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.
(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this
section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs
and services:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for
free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum
allocation for the program shall provide for each level of prototypical
school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 1.5156 hours per
week in extra instruction with a class size of fifteen learning
assistance program students per teacher.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the head count number of students in each school who are
eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction
program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide
resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in
extra instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction
program students per teacher. Notwithstanding other provisions of this
subsection (10), the actual per-student allocation may be scaled to
provide a larger allocation for students needing more intensive
intervention and a commensurate reduced allocation for students needing
less intensive intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations
act.
(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for
highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030,
allocations shall be based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school district's full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs
shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590
hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program
students per teacher.
(11) The allocations under subsections (4)(a) and (b), (5), (6),
and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW
28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(12)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical high
schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4),
(7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(13)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education funds
shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to an appropriation for this specific purpose, the
educator support program is created to provide mentor support to novice
and probationary teachers. The superintendent of public instruction
shall provide funding for the components in subsection (2) of this
section and an average of two hours of mentor support per week for
first year and probationary teachers and an average caseload of not
greater than fifteen novice teachers for a full-time mentor. Mentor
support is decreased to an average of one and one-half hours per week
for second year teachers and an average of one hour per week for third-year teachers, with the mentor caseload adjusted accordingly.
(2) The program provided by a district must include: A paid
orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a
professional growth plan for each beginning teacher aligned with
professional certification; release time for mentors and new teachers
to work together; and teacher observation time with accomplished peers.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.165.005 and 2009 c 548 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter is designed to: (1) Promote the use of assessment
data when developing programs to assist underachieving students and
students who exhibit behavior that is not conducive to their own
learning or the learning of other students; and (2) guide school
districts in providing the most effective and efficient practices when
implementing supplemental instruction and services to assist
underachieving students.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.165.015 and 2009 c 548 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Approved program" means a program submitted to and approved by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction and conducted
pursuant to the plan that addresses the required elements as provided
for in this chapter. The approved program must be included on the
inventory of effective practices, activities, and programs developed by
the Washington institute for public policy as provided under section 6
of this act unless the program is approved by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction under section 7 of this act.
(2) "Basic skills areas" means reading, writing, and mathematics as
well as readiness associated with these skills.
(3) "Participating student" means a student in kindergarten through
grade twelve who:
(a) Scores below standard for his or her grade level on the
statewide assessments and who is identified in the approved plan to
receive services; or
(b) Has behavior that is not conducive to his or her own learning
or the learning of others and who is not eligible for special education
or related services.
(4) "Statewide assessments" means:
(a) One or more of the several basic skills assessments
administered as part of the state's student assessment system, and
assessments in the basic skills areas administered by local school
districts; or
(b) For students who have behavior problems, an age-appropriate,
research-based, standardized screening to be recommended by the office
of the superintendent of public instruction.
(5) "Underachieving students" means students with the greatest
academic deficits in basic skills as identified by the statewide
assessments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.165
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By August 1, 2014, the Washington institute for public policy
shall prepare an inventory of evidence-based and research-based
effective practices, activities, and programs for use by school
districts in the learning assistance program. The inventory shall be
updated every two years.
(2) School districts shall report to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction:
(a) Annual entrance and exit data for individual students
participating in the learning assistance program;
(b) The amount of academic growth gained by each student and the
number of students that gain at least one year of academic growth; and
(c) The specific practices, activities, and programs used by each
school building that receives learning assistance program funding. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop
standard categories and definitions of the specific practices,
activities, and programs for school district reporting purposes.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
use monitoring and quality control procedures designed to measure
school district fidelity in implementing the programs on the inventory.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28A.165
RCW to read as follows:
School districts may use a practice, activity, or program that is
not on the inventory list developed under section 6 of this act for one
school year. If at the end of the school year, the school district can
show that the students in the program experienced an increase in
academic achievement, then the office of the superintendent of public
instruction must approve the program for one additional school year.
Subsequent annual approval by the superintendent's office is dependent
on continued success in increasing academic performance of the students
in the program.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.165.025 and 2009 c 556 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A participating school district shall submit the district's
plan for using learning assistance funds to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for approval, to the extent
required under subsection (((2))) (3) of this section. The program
plan must identify the program activities to be implemented from RCW
28A.165.035 and implement all of the elements in (a) through (((h)))
(i) of this subsection. The school district plan shall include the
following:
(a) District and school-level data on reading, writing, and
mathematics achievement as reported pursuant to chapter 28A.655 RCW and
relevant federal law;
(b) Processes used for identifying the underachieving students or
students who have behaviors that are not conducive to their own
learning or the learning of others, to be served by the program,
including the identification of school or program sites providing
program activities;
(c) A statement that the program or activities are included on the
inventory referenced in section 6 of this act or meets the exception
provided under section 7 of this act;
(d) How ((accelerated)) learning plans are developed and
implemented for participating students. ((Accelerated)) Learning plans
may be developed as part of existing student achievement plan process
such as student plans for achieving state high school graduation
standards, individual student academic plans, or the achievement plans
for groups of students. ((Accelerated)) Learning plans shall include:
(i) Achievement goals for the students;
(ii) Roles of the student, parents, or guardians and teachers in
the plan;
(iii) Communication procedures regarding student accomplishment;
and
(iv) Plan reviews and adjustments processes;
(((d))) (e) How state level ((and)), classroom assessments, or
screening tools recommended by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction are used to inform instruction;
(((e))) (f) How focused and intentional instructional strategies
including strategies to assist students to identify ways to help
themselves establish a calm, safe, and orderly demeanor have been
identified and implemented;
(((f))) (g) How highly qualified instructional staff are developed
and supported in the program and in participating schools;
(((g))) (h) How other federal, state, district, and school
resources are coordinated with school improvement plans and the
district's strategic plan to support underachieving students; and
(((h))) (i) How a program evaluation will be conducted to determine
direction for the following school year.
(2) For students with behaviors that are not conducive to learning,
placement in the program may be temporary and episodic due to adverse
childhood experiences or may be for a full school year.
(3) If a school district has received approval of its plan once, it
is not required to submit a plan for approval under RCW 28A.165.045 or
this section unless the district has made a significant change to the
plan. If a district has made a significant change to only a portion of
the plan the district need only submit a description of the changes
made and not the entire plan. Plans or descriptions of changes to the
plan must be submitted by July 1st as required under this section. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish
guidelines for what a "significant change" is.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.165.035 and 2008 c 321 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Use of best practices magnifies the opportunities for student
success. The following are services and activities that may be
supported by the learning assistance program:
(1) Extended learning time opportunities occurring:
(a) Before or after the regular school day;
(b) On Saturday; and
(c) Beyond the regular school year;
(2) Services under RCW 28A.320.190;
(3) Professional development for certificated and classified staff
that focuses on:
(a) The needs of a diverse student population;
(b) Specific literacy and mathematics content and instructional
strategies; and
(c) The use of student work and student behavior to guide effective
instruction and appropriate assistance;
(4) Consultant teachers to assist in implementing effective
instructional practices by teachers serving participating students;
(5) Tutoring support for participating students; and
(6) Research-based outreach activities and support for parents of
participating students, including employing a parent involvement
coordinator as provided in RCW 28A.150.260.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.175.025 and 2007 c 408 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall create a
grant program and award grants to local partnerships of schools,
families, and communities to begin the phase in of a statewide
comprehensive dropout prevention, intervention, and retrieval system.
This program shall be known as the building bridges program.
(1) For purposes of RCW 28A.175.025 through 28A.175.075, a
"building bridges program" means a local partnership of schools,
families, and communities that provides all of the following programs
or activities:
(a) A system that identifies individual students at risk of
dropping out from middle through high school based on local predictive
data, including state assessment data starting in the fourth grade, and
provides timely interventions for such students and for dropouts,
including a plan for educational success as already required by the
student learning plan as defined under RCW 28A.655.061. Students
identified shall include foster care youth, youth involved in the
juvenile justice system, and students receiving special education
services under chapter 28A.155 RCW;
(b) Coaches or mentors for students as necessary;
(c) Staff responsible for coordination of community partners that
provide a seamless continuum of academic and nonacademic support in
schools and communities;
(d) Retrieval or reentry activities; and
(e) Alternative educational programming, including, but not limited
to, career and technical education exploratory and preparatory programs
and online learning opportunities.
(2) One of the grants awarded under this section shall be for a
two-year demonstration project focusing on providing fifth through
twelfth grade students with a program that utilizes technology and is
integrated with state standards, basic academics, cross-cultural
exposures, and age-appropriate preemployment training. The project
shall:
(a) Establish programs in two western Washington and one eastern
Washington urban areas;
(b) Identify at-risk students in each of the distinct communities
and populations and implement strategies to close the achievement gap;
(c) Collect and report data on participant characteristics and
outcomes of the project, including the characteristics and outcomes
specified under RCW 28A.175.035(1)(e); and
(d) Submit a report to the legislature by December 1, 2009.
(3) The following school districts shall receive priority when
grants are awarded under this section:
(a) School districts that have the highest levels of truancy as
demonstrated by the number of petitions filed in accordance with RCW
28A.225.015 and 28A.225.030;
(b) School districts that receive readiness to learn grants in
accordance with RCW 28A.300.555; and
(c) Nonprofit organizations engaged in effective programs to lower
the dropout rate, engage students in learning, and improve student
achievement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The legislature finds that in the past ten
years, there has been a significant increase in the number of students
who participate in the transitional bilingual program. This
demographic shift requires changes in the services and support provided
in schools to ensure the success of each and every student, including
addressing the students' cultures and linguistic needs. The
legislature further finds that there are successful partnerships
between institutions of higher education and school districts that are
increasing the ability for educators to work effectively with English
language learners and are models for providing job-embedded training in
classrooms with greater than fifteen percent English language learners,
including training regarding language acquisition; appropriate
assessment of student language proficiency, including academic
achievement and social language; and cultural competence training. The
legislature intends to build on the success of these partnerships and
provide training in other districts based upon the level of language
diversity of the students in the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 28A.180
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School districts with more than fifteen percent language
diversity in the student population must be allocated funding to the
extent funds are specifically appropriated for this purpose, to provide
research-based professional development to all educators in the school
on successful, best practice strategies for English language learner
instruction. The professional development strategies must be one
developed or identified by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Develop or identify research-based or evidence-based
professional development of effective professional development
strategies for English language learner instruction; and
(b) Adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 28A.180
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in the 2013-14 school year and thereafter, funding
for the transitional bilingual instruction program shall be scaled to
provide more support to students requiring the most intensive
intervention and less support to students requiring less intervention,
as specified in the omnibus appropriations act.
(2) Beginning in the 2014-15 school year and thereafter, additional
funding shall be provided in the omnibus appropriations act for
students who exit the program the previous year. The additional
funding shall be used to provide academic support for students who have
exited the transitional bilingual instruction program, if needed, or
the school district shall use this funding within the transitional
bilingual instruction program. The funding provided under this
subsection is not a component of the basic education program and does
not represent an individual entitlement to any particular student.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Better decisions require better information. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall create a pilot program with
one school district and provide support for the district to use
longitudinal data.
(2) The purposes of the program are as follows:
(a) To enhance the ability of the school district to efficiently
and accurately manage, analyze, and use education data, including
individual student records and program and funding information;
(b) To enable the school district to make data-informed decisions
to improve student learning and outcomes and close achievement gaps.
(3) This section expires December 1, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Audits of school districts by the state auditor shall include, but
not be limited to, findings determining the compliance of school
districts regarding the expenditure and the reporting of the
expenditure of the state funds provided for parent involvement
coordinators and parent involvement programs funded under RCW
28A.150.260.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
establish interagency agreements with the department of social and
health services, the department of services for the blind, and any
other state agency that provides high school transition services for
students with disabilities. The purpose of the interagency agreements
is to foster effective multiagency collaboration to provide transition
services for students with disabilities age fourteen through twenty-one, or through high school graduation, whichever occurs first.
Interagency agreements are also intended to streamline services and
programs, promote efficiencies, and establish a uniform focus on
improved outcomes related to self-sufficiency. This subsection does
not require transition services plan development in addition to what
exists on the effective date of this section.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
collaborate with the professional educator standards board to build
into existing and ongoing educator requirements that special education
teachers and school psychologists receive training to be appropriately
prepared to address the transition needs of students with disabilities.
(3) To the extent that data is available through data-sharing
agreements established by the education data center under RCW
43.41.400, the education data center must monitor the following
outcomes for students with disabilities after high school graduation:
(a) The number of students who, within one year of high school
graduation:
(i) Enter integrated employment paid at the greater of minimum wage
or competitive wage for the type of employment, with access to related
employment and health benefits; or
(ii) Enter a postsecondary education or training program focused on
leading to integrated employment;
(b) The wages and number of hours worked per pay period;
(c) The impact of employment on any state and federal benefits for
individuals with disabilities;
(d) Indicators of the types of settings in which students who
previously received transition services primarily reside;
(e) Indicators of improved economic status and self-sufficiency;
(f) Data on those students for whom a postsecondary or integrated
employment outcome does not occur within one year of high school
graduation, including:
(i) Information on the reasons that the desired outcome has not
occurred;
(ii) The number of months the student has not achieved the desired
outcome; and
(iii) The efforts made to ensure the student achieves the desired
outcome.
(4) To the extent that the data elements in subsection (3) of this
section are not available to the education data center through data-sharing agreements, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction must attempt to collect the data through a single
communication after the student's graduation.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
prepare an annual report on the data and outcomes in subsection (3) of
this section and submit the report to the legislature.

--- END ---