BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 52.18.050 and 1998 c 16 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Any)) The initial imposition of a benefit charge authorized
by this chapter ((shall not be effective unless a proposition to impose
the benefit charge is)) must be approved by ((a)) sixty percent
((majority)) of the voters of the district voting at a general election
or at a special election called by the district for that purpose((,
held within the fire protection district)). An election held
((pursuant to this section shall)) for the initial imposition of a
benefit charge must be held not more than twelve months prior to the
date on which the first ((such)) charge is to be assessed((: PROVIDED,
That)). A benefit charge approved at an election ((shall not remain in
effect for a period of more than six years nor more than the number
of)) expires in six or fewer years as authorized by the voters ((if
fewer than six years)) unless subsequently reapproved by the voters.
(2) ((The)) Ballot ((shall)) measures calling for the initial
imposition of a benefit charge must be submitted so as to enable
((the)) voters favoring the authorization of a ((fire protection
district)) benefit charge to vote "Yes" and those opposed ((thereto))
to vote "No," and the ballot ((shall be)) question must be as follows:

"Shall . . . . . . county fire protection district No. . . . .
be authorized to impose benefit charges each year for . . . .
(insert number of years not to exceed six) years, not to exceed
an amount equal to sixty percent of its operating budget, and
be prohibited from imposing an additional property tax under
RCW 52.16.160?

YES NO

□ □"

(3) ((Districts renewing the benefit charge may elect to use the
following alternative ballot)) (a) The continued imposition of a
benefit charge authorized by this chapter must be approved by a
majority of the voters of the district voting at a general election or
at a special election called by the district for that purpose.
(b) Ballot measures calling for the continued imposition of a
benefit charge must be submitted so as to enable voters favoring the
continued imposition of the benefit charge to vote "Yes" and those
opposed to vote "No." The ballot question must be substantially in the
following form:

"Shall . . . . . . county fire protection district No. . . . .
be authorized to continue voter-authorized benefit charges each
year for . . . . (insert number of years not to exceed six)
years, not to exceed an amount equal to sixty percent of its
operating budget, and be prohibited from imposing an additional
property tax under RCW 52.16.160?

YES NO

□ □"

--- END ---