BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that a lack of
information about mental health problems amongst the general public
leads to stigmatizing attitudes and prevents people from seeking help
early and seeking the best sort of help. It also prevents people from
providing support to family members, friends, and colleagues because
they might not know what to do. This lack of knowledge about mental
health problems limits the initial accessibility of evidence-based
treatments and leads to a lack of support for people with a mental
disorder from family, friends, and other members of the community.
(2) The focus on training for teachers and educational staff is
intended to provide opportunities for early intervention when the first
signs of developing mental illness may be recognized in children,
teens, and young adults, so that appropriate referrals may be made to
evidence-based behavioral health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall provide funds for mental health first-aid
training targeted at teachers and educational staff. The training will
follow the model developed by the department of psychology in
Melbourne, Australia. Instruction provided will describe common mental
disorders that arise in youth, their possible causes and risk factors,
the availability of evidence-based medical, psychological, and
alternative treatments, processes for making referrals for behavioral
health services, and methods to effectively render assistance in both
initial intervention and crisis situations. The department shall
collaborate with the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to identify sites and methods of instruction that leverage local
resources to the extent possible for the purpose of making the mental
health first-aid training broadly available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2013, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---