BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.160.010 and 2012 c 225 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that it is the ((public)) policy of the
state of Washington to ((direct financial resources toward the
fostering of economic development through the stimulation of investment
and job opportunities and the retention of sustainable existing
employment)) employ state and federal resources to foster economic
development to promote private investment and to create or retain job
opportunities for the general welfare of the inhabitants of the state.
Reducing unemployment and reducing the time citizens remain jobless
((is)) are important for the economic welfare of the state.
(2) The legislature finds that a valuable means of fostering
economic development is the construction of public facilities which
contribute to the stability and growth of the state's economic base.
Expenditures made for these purposes as authorized in this chapter are
declared to be in the public interest, and constitute a proper use of
public funds. ((A community economic revitalization board is needed
which shall aid the development of economic opportunities. The general
objectives of the board should include:
(a) Strengthening the economies of areas of the state which have
experienced or are expected to experience chronically high unemployment
rates or below average growth in their economies;
(b) Encouraging the diversification of the economies of the state
and regions within the state in order to provide greater seasonal and
cyclical stability of income and employment;
(c) Encouraging wider access to financial resources for both large
and small industrial development projects;
(d) Encouraging new economic development or expansions to maximize
employment;
(e) Encouraging the retention of viable existing firms and
employment;
(f) Providing incentives for expansion of employment opportunities
for groups of state residents that have been less successful relative
to other groups in efforts to gain permanent employment; and
(g) Enhancing job and business growth through facility development
and other improvements in innovation partnership zones designated under
RCW 43.330.270.
(2))) (3) The legislature also finds that the state's economic
development efforts can be enhanced by, in certain instances, providing
funds to improve state highways, county roads, or city streets for
industries considering locating or expanding in this state.
(((3))) (4) The legislature finds it desirable to provide a process
whereby the need for diverse public works improvements necessitated by
planned economic development can be addressed in a timely fashion and
with coordination among all responsible governmental entities.
(((4))) (5) The legislature also finds that the state's economic
development efforts can be enhanced by, in certain instances, providing
funds to assist development of telecommunications infrastructure that
supports business development, retention, and expansion in the state.
(((5))) (6) The legislature also finds that the state's economic
development efforts can be enhanced by providing funds to improve
markets for those recyclable materials representing a large fraction of
the waste stream. The legislature finds that the construction or
rehabilitation of public facilities ((which)) that result in private
construction of processing or remanufacturing facilities for recyclable
materials ((are)) is eligible for consideration from the board.
(((6))) (7) The legislature finds that sharing economic growth
statewide is important to the welfare of the state. The ability of
communities to pursue business and job retention, expansion, and
development opportunities depends on their capacity to ready necessary
economic development project plans, sites, permits, and infrastructure
for private investments. Project-specific planning, predevelopment,
and infrastructure are critical ingredients for economic development.
((It is, therefore, the intent of the legislature to increase the
amount of funding available through the community economic
revitalization board and to authorize flexibility for available
resources in these areas to help fund planning, predevelopment, and
construction costs of infrastructure and facilities and sites that
foster economic vitality and diversification.))
(8) It is, therefore, the intent of the legislature to create a
community economic revitalization board to aid the development of
economic opportunities. The general objectives of the board should
include:
(a) Strengthening the economies of areas of the state which have
experienced or are expected to experience chronically high unemployment
rates or below average growth in their economies;
(b) Encouraging the diversification of the economies of the state
and regions within the state in order to provide greater stability of
income and employment;
(c) Encouraging greater access to financial resources for both
large and small industrial development projects;
(d) Encouraging new economic development or expansions to maximize
employment;
(e) Encouraging the retention of viable existing firms and
promoting employment within these firms;
(f) Providing incentives for expansion of employment opportunities
for groups of state residents that have been less successful relative
to other groups in efforts to gain permanent employment; and
(g) Enhancing job and business growth through facility development
and other improvements in innovation partnership zones designated under
RCW 43.330.270.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.160 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the community economic revitalization
board has successfully acted as an economic development infrastructure
financier for local governments. It is, therefore, the intent of the
legislature to authorize flexibility for the community economic
revitalization board to help fund planning, predevelopment, and
construction costs of infrastructure and facilities and sites that
foster economic vitality and diversification.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.160.020 and 2012 c 225 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board.
(2) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department.
(4) "Local government" or "political subdivision" means any port
district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any other
municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state
providing for public facilities under this chapter.
(((4))) (5) "Planning project" means project-specific
environmental, capital facilities, land use, permitting, feasibility,
and marketing studies and plans; project design, site planning, and
analysis; project debt and revenue impact analysis; and economic
development industry cluster analysis.
(6) "Project" means a project of a local government or a federally
recognized Indian tribe for the planning, acquisition, construction,
repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of
a public facility.
(7) "Public facilities" means ((a project of a local government or
a federally recognized Indian tribe for the planning, acquisition,
construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or
improvement of:)) bridges; roads; research, testing, training, and
incubation facilities in areas designated as innovation partnership
zones under RCW 43.330.270; buildings or structures; domestic and
industrial water, earth stabilization, sanitary sewer, storm ((sewer))
water, railroad, electricity, broadband, telecommunications,
transportation, natural gas, and port facilities((; all for the purpose
of job creation, job retention, or job expansion)).
(((5))) (8) "Rural county" means a county with a population density
of fewer than one hundred persons per square mile or a county smaller
than two hundred twenty-five square miles, as determined by the office
of financial management and published each year by the department for
the period July 1st to June 30th.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.160.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 25 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The community economic revitalization board is hereby created
to exercise the powers granted under this chapter.
(2) The board ((shall)) must consist of one member from each of the
two major caucuses of the house of representatives to be appointed by
the speaker of the house and one member from each of the two major
caucuses of the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate.
The board ((shall)) must also consist of the following members
appointed by the director of commerce: A recognized private or public
sector economist; one port district official; one county official; one
city official; one representative of a federally recognized Indian
tribe; one representative of the public; ((one)) four representatives
of small businesses ((each from: (a) The area west of Puget Sound, (b)
the area east of Puget Sound and west of the Cascade range, (c) the
area east of the Cascade range and west of the Columbia river, and (d)
the area east of the Columbia river; one executive from large
businesses each from the area west of the Cascades and the area east of
the Cascades)), two from the area east of the Cascade range and two
from the area west of the Cascade range; and two executives from large
businesses, one from the area east of the Cascade range and one from
the area west of the Cascade range. The appointive members ((shall))
must initially be appointed to terms as follows: Three members for
one-year terms, three members for two-year terms, and three members for
three-year terms ((which shall)) that must include the chair.
Thereafter each succeeding term ((shall)) must be for three years. The
chair of the board ((shall)) must be selected by the director of
commerce. The members of the board ((shall)) must elect one of their
members to serve as vice((-))chair. The director of commerce, the
director of revenue, the commissioner of employment security, and the
secretary of transportation ((shall)) must serve as nonvoting advisory
members of the board.
(3) ((Management services, including fiscal and contract services,
shall be provided by the department to assist the board in implementing
this chapter.
(4))) Members of the board ((shall)) must be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(((5))) (4) If a vacancy occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise
of appointive members of the board, the director of commerce ((shall))
must fill the same for the unexpired term. Members of the board may be
removed for malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific written
charges by the director of commerce, under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(((6))) (5) A member appointed by the director of commerce may not
be absent from more than fifty percent of the regularly scheduled
meetings in any one calendar year. Any member who exceeds this absence
limitation is deemed to have withdrawn from the office and may be
replaced by the director of commerce.
(((7))) (6) A majority of members currently appointed constitutes
a quorum.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.160.050 and 2008 c 327 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board may:
(1) Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct
of its business.
(2) Adopt an official seal and alter the seal at its pleasure.
(3) Utilize the services of other governmental agencies.
(4) Accept from any federal agency loans or grants for the planning
or financing of any project and enter into an agreement with the agency
respecting the loans or grants.
(5) Conduct examinations and investigations and take testimony at
public hearings of any matter material for its information that will
assist in determinations related to the exercise of the board's lawful
powers.
(6) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or
financial or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms
and conditions which are not in conflict with this chapter.
(7) Enter into agreements or other transactions with and accept
grants and the cooperation of any governmental agency in furtherance of
this chapter.
(8) Consistent with the guidelines issued by the office of
financial management and in consultation with the department, prepare
biennial operating and capital budgets and, as needed, update these
budgets during the biennium.
(9) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter.
(((9))) (10) Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to
carry out the powers expressly granted or implied under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.160 RCW
to read as follows:
Management services, including fiscal and contract services, must
be provided by the department to assist the board in implementing this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.160 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to assist political subdivisions of the state and
federally recognized Indian tribes in financing the cost of public
facilities, the board:
(a) Must execute contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds
from the public facilities construction loan revolving account for
projects approved for funding by the board under the following
programs:
(i) Committed private sector partner construction;
(ii) Prospective development construction;
(iii) Planning; and
(iv) Any other program authorized by the legislature.
(b) Must provide loans to political subdivisions and federally
recognized Indian tribes for the purposes of financing the cost of
public facilities.
(i) The board must determine the interest rate that loans bear.
The interest rate may not exceed ten percent per annum.
(ii) The board may provide reasonable terms and conditions for
repayment for loans, including partial forgiveness of loan principal
and interest payments on projects located in rural communities as
defined by the board, or rural counties. The loans may not exceed
twenty years in duration.
(c) May provide grants for purposes designated in this chapter, but
only when, and to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible,
given the limited resources of the political subdivision or the
federally recognized Indian tribe and the finding by the board that
financial circumstances require grant assistance to enable the project
to move forward. The board must balance the need for grants with the
need to sustain the public facilities construction loan revolving
account.
(2) No more than twenty-five percent of all financial assistance
approved by the board in any biennium may consist of grants to
political subdivisions and federally recognized Indian tribes.
(3) Except as authorized to the contrary under subsection (4) of
this section, from all funds available to the board for financial
assistance in a biennium under this chapter, the board must approve at
least seventy-five percent of the first twenty million dollars of funds
available and at least fifty percent of any additional funds for
financial assistance for projects in rural counties or board defined
rural communities.
(4) If at any time during the last six months of a biennium the
board finds that the actual and anticipated applications for qualified
projects in rural counties or board defined rural communities are
clearly insufficient to use up the allocations under subsection (3) of
this section, the board must estimate the amount of the insufficiency
and during the remainder of the biennium may use that amount of the
allocation for financial assistance to projects not located in rural
counties or board defined rural communities.
(5) The board may elect to reserve up to one million dollars of its
biennial appropriation to use as state match for federal grant awards.
The purpose and use of the federal funds must be consistent with the
board's purpose of financing economic development infrastructure.
Reserved board funds must be matched, at a minimum, dollar for dollar
by federal funds. If the set aside funds are not fully utilized for
federal grant match by the 18th month of the biennium, the board may
use those funds for other eligible projects as stated in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.160 RCW
to read as follows:
The board must:
(1) Establish and maintain collaborative relations with
governmental, private, and other financing organizations, advocate
groups, and other stakeholders associated with state economic
development activities and policies;
(2) Provide information and advice to the governor and legislature
on matters related to economic development; and
(3) At the direction of the governor, provide information and
advocacy at the national level on matters related to economic
development financing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.160 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board must prioritize awards for committed private sector
partner construction and prospective development construction projects
by considering at a minimum the following criteria:
(a) The number of jobs created by the expected business creation or
expansion and the average wage of those expected jobs. In evaluating
proposals for their job creation potential, the board may adjust the
job estimates in applications based on the board's judgment of the
credibility of the job estimates;
(b) The need for job creation based on the unemployment rate of the
county or counties in which the project is located. In evaluating the
average wages of the jobs created, the board must compare those wages
to median wages of private sector jobs in the county or counties
surrounding the project location. When evaluating the jobs created by
the project, the board may consider the area labor supply and readily
available skill sets of the labor pool in the county or counties
surrounding the project location;
(c) How the expected business creation or expansion fits within the
region's preferred economic growth strategy as indicated by the efforts
of nearby innovation partnership zones, industry clusters, future
export prospects, or local government equivalent if available;
(d) The speed with which the project can begin construction; and
(e) The extent that the project leverages nonstate funds, and
achieves overall the greatest benefit in job creation at good wages for
the amount of money provided.
(2) The board may not provide financial assistance:
(a) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or
promote a retail shopping development or expansion;
(b) For any project for which evidence exists that would result in
a development or expansion that would displace jobs in any other
community in the state;
(c) For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or
promote gambling; or
(d) For a project located outside the jurisdiction of the applicant
political subdivision or federally recognized Indian tribe.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.160.076 and 2011 c 180 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) Except as authorized to the contrary under subsection (2) of
this section, from all funds available to the board for financial
assistance in a biennium under this chapter, the board shall approve at
least seventy-five percent of the first twenty million dollars of funds
available and at least fifty percent of any additional funds for
financial assistance for projects in rural counties.
(2) If at any time during the last six months of a biennium the
board finds that the actual and anticipated applications for qualified
projects in rural counties are clearly insufficient to use up the
allocations under subsection (1) of this section, then the board shall
estimate the amount of the insufficiency and during the remainder of
the biennium may use that amount of the allocation for financial
assistance to projects not located in rural counties.
(3))) The board ((shall)) must solicit qualifying projects to plan,
design, and construct public facilities needed to attract new
industrial and commercial activities in areas impacted by the closure
or potential closure of large coal-fired electric generation
facilities, which for the purposes of this section means a facility
that emitted more than one million tons of greenhouse gases in any
calendar year prior to 2008. The projects should be consistent with
any applicable plans for major industrial activity on lands formerly
used or designated for surface coal mining and supporting uses under
RCW 36.70A.368. When the board receives timely and eligible project
applications from a political subdivision of the state for financial
assistance for such projects, the board from available funds ((shall))
must give priority consideration to such projects.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.160.080 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6011 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There ((shall)) must be a fund in the state treasury known as
the public facilities construction loan revolving account, which
((shall)) consists of all moneys collected under this chapter and any
moneys appropriated to it by law. Disbursements from the revolving
account ((shall)) must be on authorization of the board. In order to
maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the public
facilities construction loan revolving account ((shall be)) is subject
in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW. During the 2009-2011 biennium,
sums in the public facilities construction loan revolving account may
be used for community economic revitalization board export assistance
grants and loans in section 1018, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp.
sess. and for matching funds for the federal energy regional innovation
cluster in section 1017, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.
(2) The moneys in the public facilities construction loan revolving
account must be used solely to fulfill commitments arising from
financial assistance authorized in this chapter. The total outstanding
amount, which the board must dispense at any time pursuant to this
section, may not exceed the moneys available from the account.
(3) Repayments of loans made from the public facilities
construction loan revolving account under the contracts for public
facilities construction loans must be paid into the public facilities
construction loan revolving account.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.160.900 and 2008 c 327 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The community economic revitalization board ((shall)) must
conduct biennial outcome-based evaluations of the financial assistance
provided under this chapter. The evaluations ((shall)) must include
information on the number of applications for community economic
revitalization board assistance; the number and types of projects
approved; the grant or loan amount awarded each project; the projected
number of jobs created or retained by each project; the actual number
and cost of jobs created or retained by each project; the wages and
health benefits associated with the jobs; the amount of state funds and
total capital invested in projects; the number and types of businesses
assisted by funded projects; the location of funded projects; the
transportation infrastructure available for completed projects; the
local match and local participation obtained; the number of delinquent
loans; and the number of project terminations. The evaluations may
also include additional performance measures and recommendations for
programmatic changes.
(2)(a) By September 1st of each even-numbered year, the board
((shall)) must forward its draft evaluation to the Washington state
economic development commission for review and comment((, as required
in section 10 of this act)). The board ((shall)) must provide any
additional information as may be requested by the commission for the
purpose of its review.
(b) Any written comments or recommendations provided by the
commission as a result of its review ((shall)) must be included in the
board's completed evaluation. The evaluation must be presented to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31st
of each even-numbered year. ((The initial evaluation must be submitted
by December 31, 2010.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.160.060 (Loans and grants to political subdivisions and
federally recognized Indian tribes for public facilities authorized--Application -- Requirements for financial assistance) and 2012 c 196 s
10, 2008 c 327 s 5, 2007 c 231 s 3, & 2004 c 252 s 3;
(2) RCW 43.160.070 (Conditions) and 2008 c 327 s 6, 1999 c 164 s
104, 1998 c 321 s 27, 1997 c 235 s 721, 1996 c 51 s 6, 1990 1st ex.s.
c 16 s 802, 1983 1st ex.s. c 60 s 4, & 1982 1st ex.s. c 40 s 7; and
(3) RCW 43.160.078 (Board to familiarize government officials and
public with chapter provisions) and 1985 c 446 s 5.

--- END ---