BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A stakeholder group comprised of a
representative of the office of the attorney general along with debt
adjuster stakeholders including, but not limited to, for-profit and
nonprofit debt adjusters conducting business in the state of
Washington, shall convene to discuss the concept of creditor
compensation known as "fair share" and whether debt adjusters may
receive such compensation, among other related issues. The stakeholder
group must provide any legislative proposals to the legislature by
December 1, 2013.

--- END ---