BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the tax
levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to restaurants of
products that impart flavor to food during the cooking process and
that:
(a) Are completely or substantially consumed by combustion during
the cooking process, such as wood chips, charcoal, charcoal briquettes,
and grape vines; or
(b) Support the food during the cooking process and are comprised
entirely of wood, such as cedar grilling planks.
(2) The exemption provided by this section does not apply to any
type of gas fuel.
(3) Sellers making tax-exempt sales under this section must obtain
an exemption certificate from the buyer in a form and manner prescribed
by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the exemption
certificate for the seller's files. In lieu of an exemption
certificate, a seller may capture the relevant data elements as allowed
under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.
(4) For purposes of this subsection, "restaurant" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.9995.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
provisions of this chapter do not apply to restaurants with respect to
the use of products that impart flavor to food during the cooking
process and that:
(a) Are completely or substantially consumed by combustion during
the cooking process, such as wood chips, charcoal, charcoal briquettes,
and grape vines; or
(b) Support the food during the cooking process and are comprised
entirely of wood, such as cedar grilling planks.
(2) The exemption provided by this section does not apply to any
type of gas fuel.
(3) For purposes of this subsection, "restaurant" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 82.08.9995.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---