BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.36.010 and 1983 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this
section, the following persons are not qualified to act as personal
representatives: Corporations, minors, persons of unsound mind, or
persons who have been convicted of any felony or of ((a)) any crime or
misdemeanor involving moral turpitude((: PROVIDED, That)).
(2) Trust companies regularly organized under the laws of this
state and national banks when authorized so to do may act as the
personal representative of ((decedents' or incompetents' estates)) an
individual's estate or of the estate of an incapacitated person upon
petition of any person having a right to such appointment and may act
as ((executors)) personal representatives or guardians when so
appointed by will((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That professional service
corporations regularly organized under the laws of this state whose
shareholder or shareholders are exclusively attorneys may act as
personal representatives)). No trust company or national bank may
qualify as such ((executor)) personal representative or guardian under
any will hereafter drawn by it or its agents or employees, and no
salaried attorney of any such company may be allowed any attorney fee
for probating any such will or in relation to the administration or
settlement of any such estate, and no part of any attorney fee may
inure, directly or indirectly, to the benefit of any trust company or
national bank.
(3) Professional service corporations or professional limited
liability companies regularly organized under the laws of this state
whose shareholder or shareholders, or whose member or members, are
exclusively attorneys may act as personal representatives.
(4) Any nonprofit corporation may act as personal representative if
the articles of incorporation or bylaws of that corporation permit the
action and the corporation is in compliance with all applicable
provisions of Title 24 RCW.
(5) When any person to whom letters testamentary or of
administration have been issued becomes disqualified to act because of
becoming of unsound mind or being convicted of a felony or of any crime
or misdemeanor involving moral turpitude, the court having jurisdiction
((shall)) must revoke his or her letters.
(6) A nonresident may be appointed to act as personal
representative if the nonresident appoints an agent who is a resident
of the county where such estate is being probated or who is an attorney
of record of the estate, upon whom service of all papers may be made;
such appointment to be made in writing and filed by the clerk with
other papers of such estate; and, unless bond has been waived as
provided by RCW 11.28.185, such nonresident personal representative
((shall)) must file a bond to be approved by the court.

Sec. 2 RCW 11.36.021 and 1991 c 72 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following may serve as trustees:
(a) Any suitable persons over the age of eighteen years, if not
otherwise disqualified;
(b) Any trust company regularly organized under the laws of this
state and national banks when authorized to do so;
(c) Any nonprofit corporation, if the articles of incorporation or
bylaws of that corporation permit the action and if the corporation is
in compliance with all applicable provisions of Title 24 RCW;
(d) Any professional service corporations or professional limited
liability companies regularly organized under the laws of this state
whose shareholder or shareholders, or whose member or members, are
exclusively attorneys; ((and))
(e) Any state or regional college or university, as those
institutions are defined in RCW 28B.10.016;
(f) Any community or technical college, as those institutions are
defined in RCW 28B.50.030; and
(g) Any other entity so authorized under the laws of the state of
Washington.
(2) The following are disqualified to serve as trustees:
(a) Minors, persons of unsound mind, or persons who have been
convicted of any felony or ((a)) any crime or misdemeanor involving
moral turpitude; and
(b) A corporation organized under Title 23B RCW that is not
authorized under the laws of the state of Washington to act as a
fiduciary.

Sec. 3 RCW 11.96A.050 and 2011 c 327 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Venue for proceedings pertaining to trusts ((shall be)) are:
(a) For testamentary trusts established under wills probated in the
state of Washington, in the superior court of the county where the
probate of the will is being administered or was completed or, in the
alternative, the superior court of the county where any qualified
beneficiary of the trust ((entitled to notice under RCW 11.97.010)) as
defined in section 8 of this act resides, the county where any trustee
resides or has a place of business, or the county where any real
property that is an asset of the trust is located; and
(b) For all other trusts, in the superior court of the county where
any qualified beneficiary of the trust ((entitled to notice under RCW
11.97.010)) as defined in section 8 of this act resides, the county
where any trustee resides or has a place of business, or the county
where any real property that is an asset of the trust is located. If
no county has venue for proceedings pertaining to a trust under the
preceding sentence, then in any county.
(2) A party to a proceeding pertaining to a trust may request that
venue be changed. If the request is made within four months of the
giving of the first notice of a proceeding pertaining to the trust,
except for good cause shown, venue must be moved to the county with the
strongest connection to the trust as determined by the court,
considering such factors as the residence of a qualified beneficiary of
the trust ((entitled to notice under RCW 11.97.010)) as defined in
section 8 of this act, the residence or place of business of a trustee,
and the location of any real property that is an asset of the trust.
(3) Venue for proceedings subject to chapter 11.88 or 11.92 RCW
((shall)) must be determined under the provisions of those chapters.
(4) Venue for proceedings pertaining to the probate of wills, the
administration and disposition of a decedent's property, including
nonprobate assets, and any other matter not identified in subsection
(1), (2), or (3) of this section, ((shall)) must be in any county in
the state of Washington that the petitioner selects. A party to a
proceeding may request that venue be changed if the request is made
within four months of the mailing of the notice of appointment and
pendency of probate required by RCW 11.28.237, and except for good
cause shown, venue must be moved as follows:
(a) If the decedent was a resident of the state of Washington at
the time of death, to the county of the decedent's residence; or
(b) If the decedent was not a resident of the state of Washington
at the time of death, to any of the following:
(i) Any county in which any part of the probate estate might be;
(ii) If there are no probate assets, any county where any
nonprobate asset might be; or
(iii) The county in which the decedent died.
(5) Once letters testamentary or of administration have been
granted in the state of Washington, all orders, settlements, trials,
and other proceedings under this title ((shall)) must be had or made in
the county in which such letters have been granted unless venue is
moved as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(6) Venue for proceedings pertaining to powers of attorney
((shall)) must be in the superior court of the county of the
principal's residence, except for good cause shown.
(7) If venue is moved, an action taken before venue is changed is
not invalid because of the venue.
(8) Any request to change venue that is made more than four months
after the commencement of the action may be granted in the discretion
of the court.

Sec. 4 RCW 11.96A.070 and 2011 c 327 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A beneficiary of an express trust may not commence a
proceeding against a trustee for breach of trust more than three years
after the date a report was delivered in the manner provided in RCW
11.96A.110 to the beneficiary or to a representative of the beneficiary
((was sent a report that)) if the report adequately disclosed the
existence of a potential claim for breach of trust and informed the
beneficiary of the time allowed for commencing a proceeding.
(b) A report adequately discloses the existence of a potential
claim for breach of trust if it provides sufficient information so that
the beneficiary or representative knows or should have known of the
potential claim ((or should have inquired into its existence)). A
report that includes ((the following information)) all of the items
described in this subsection (b) that are relevant for the reporting
period is presumed to have provided such sufficient information
regarding the existence of potential claims for breach of trust for
such period:
(i) A statement of receipts and disbursements of principal and
income that have occurred during the accounting period;
(ii) A statement of the assets and liabilities of the trust and
their values at the beginning and end of the period;
(iii) The trustee's compensation for the period;
(iv) The agents hired by the trustee, their relationship to the
trustee, if any, and their compensation, for the period;
(v) Disclosure of any pledge, mortgage, option, or lease of trust
property, or other agreement affecting trust property binding for a
period of five years or more that was granted or entered into during
the accounting period;
(vi) Disclosure of all transactions during the period that are
equivalent to one of the types of transactions described in RCW
11.98.078 or otherwise could have been affected by a conflict between
the trustee's fiduciary and personal interests;
(vii) A statement that the recipient of the account information may
petition the superior court pursuant to chapter 11.106 RCW to obtain
review of the statement and of acts of the trustee disclosed in the
statement; and
(viii) A statement that claims against the trustee for breach of
trust may not be made after the expiration of three years from the date
the ((beneficiary receives the statement)) trustee delivers the report
in the manner provided in RCW 11.96A.110.
(c) If (a) of this subsection does not apply, a judicial proceeding
by a beneficiary against a trustee for breach of trust must be
commenced within three years after the first to occur of:
(i) The removal, resignation, or death of the trustee;
(ii) The termination of the beneficiary's interest in the trust; or
(iii) The termination of the trust.
(d) For purposes of this section, "express trust" does not include
resulting trusts, constructive trusts, business trusts in which
certificates of beneficial interest are issued to the beneficiary,
investment trusts, voting trusts, trusts in the nature of mortgages or
pledges, liquidation trusts, or trusts for the sole purpose of paying
dividends, interest, interest coupons, salaries, wages, pensions, or
profits, trusts created in deposits in any financial institution under
chapter 30.22 RCW, unless any such trust that is created in writing
specifically incorporates this chapter in whole or in part.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 11.96A.250 with respect to special
representatives, an action against a personal representative for
alleged breach of fiduciary duty by an heir, legatee, or other
interested party must be brought before discharge of the personal
representative.
(3) The legislature hereby confirms the long standing public policy
of promoting the prompt and efficient resolution of matters involving
trusts and estates. To further implement this policy, the legislature
adopts the following statutory provisions in order to:
(a) Encourage and facilitate the participation of qualified
individuals as special representatives;
(b) Serve the public's interest in having a prompt and efficient
resolution of matters involving trusts or estates; and
(c) Promote complete and final resolution of proceedings involving
trusts and estates.
(i) Actions against a special representative must be brought before
the earlier of:
(A) Three years from the discharge of the special representative as
provided in RCW 11.96A.250; or
(B) The entry of an order by a court of competent jurisdiction
under RCW 11.96A.240 approving the written agreement executed by all
interested parties in accord with the provisions of RCW 11.96A.220.
(ii) If a legal action is commenced against the special
representative after the expiration of the period during which claims
may be brought against the special representative as provided in (c)(i)
of this subsection, alleging property damage, property loss, or other
civil liability caused by or resulting from an alleged act or omission
of the special representative arising out of or by reason of the
special representative's duties or actions as special representative,
the special representative ((shall)) must be indemnified: (A) From the
assets held in the trust or comprising the estate involved in the
dispute; and (B) by the persons bringing the legal action, for all
expenses, attorneys' fees, judgments, settlements, decrees, or amounts
due and owing or paid in satisfaction of or incurred in the defense of
the legal action. To the extent possible, indemnification must be made
first by the persons bringing the legal action, second from that
portion of the trust or estate that is held for the benefit of, or has
been distributed or applied to, the persons bringing the legal action,
and third from the other assets held in the trust or comprising the
estate involved in the dispute.
(4) The tolling provisions of RCW 4.16.190 apply to this chapter
except that the running of a statute of limitations under subsection
(1) or (2) of this section, or any other applicable statute of
limitations for any matter that is the subject of dispute under this
chapter, is not tolled as to an individual who had a guardian ad litem,
limited or general guardian of the estate, or a special representative
to represent the person during the probate or dispute resolution
proceeding.

Sec. 5 RCW 11.96A.120 and 2011 c 327 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((With respect to a particular matter that affects a trust,
probate estate, guardianship estate, or property subject to a power of
attorney, in which the interests of such fiduciary estate and the
beneficiaries are not in conflict:)) Notice to a person who may
represent and bind another person under this section has the same
effect as if notice were given directly to the other person.
(2) The consent of a person who may represent and bind another
person under this section is binding on the person represented unless
the person represented objects to the representation before the consent
would otherwise have become effective.
(3) The following limitations on the ability to serve as a virtual
representative apply:
(a) A trustor may not represent and bind a beneficiary under this
section with respect to the termination and modification of an
irrevocable trust; and
(b) Representation of an incapacitated trustor with respect to his
or her powers over a trust is subject to the provisions of RCW
11.103.030, and chapters 11.96A, 11.88, and 11.92 RCW.
(4) To the extent there is no conflict of interest between the
representative and the person represented or among those being
represented with respect to the particular question or dispute:
(a) A guardian may represent and bind the estate that the guardian
controls, subject to chapters 11.96A, 11.88, and 11.92 RCW;
(b) A guardian of the person may represent and bind the
incapacitated person if a guardian of the incapacitated person's estate
has not been appointed;
(c) An agent having authority to act with respect to the particular
question or dispute may represent and bind the principal;
(((c))) (d) A trustee may represent and bind the beneficiaries of
the trust; ((and
(d))) (e) A personal representative of a decedent's estate may
represent and bind persons interested in the estate((.
(2) This section is intended to adopt the common law concept of
virtual representation. This section supplements the common law
relating to the doctrine of virtual representation and shall not be
construed as limiting the application of that common law doctrine.
(3) Any notice requirement in this title is satisfied if:
(a))); and
(f) A parent may represent and bind the parent's minor or unborn
child or children if a guardian for the child or children has not been
appointed.
(5) Unless otherwise represented, a minor, incapacitated, or unborn
individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown and not
reasonably ascertainable, may be represented by and bound by another
having a substantially identical interest with respect to the
particular question or dispute, but only to the extent there is no
conflict of interest between the representative and the person
represented with regard to the particular question or dispute.
(6) Where an interest ((in an estate, trust, or nonprobate asset or
an interest that may be affected by a power of attorney)) has been
given to persons who comprise a certain class upon the happening of a
certain event, ((notice may be given to the living persons who would
constitute the class if the event had happened immediately before the
commencement of the proceeding requiring notice, and the persons shall
virtually represent all other members of the class;
(b))) the living persons who would constitute the class as of the
date the representation is to be determined may virtually represent all
other members of the class as of that date, but only to the extent that
there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the
person(s) represented with regard to the particular question or
dispute.
(7) Where an interest ((in an estate, trust, or nonprobate asset or
an interest that may be affected by a power of attorney)) has been
given to a living person, and the same interest, or a share in it, is
to pass to the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner or to
persons who are, or might be, the ((distributees,)) heirs, issue, or
other kindred of that living person ((upon the happening of a future
event, notice may be given to that living person, and the living person
shall virtually represent the surviving spouse or surviving domestic
partner, distributees, heirs, issue, or other kindred of the person;
(c))) or the distributees of the estate of that living person upon
the happening of a future event, that living person may virtually
represent the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, heirs,
issue, or other kindred of the person, and the distributees of the
estate of the person, but only to the extent that there is no conflict
of interest between the representative and the person(s) represented
with regard to the particular question or dispute.
(8) Except as otherwise provided in ((this)) subsection (7) of this
section, where an interest ((in an estate, trust, or nonprobate asset
or an interest that may be affected by a power of attorney)) has been
given to a person or a class of persons, or both, upon the happening of
any future event, and the same interest or a share of the interest is
to pass to another person or class of persons, or both, upon the
happening of an additional future event, ((notice may be given to)) the
living person or persons who would take the interest upon the happening
of the first event((, and the living person or persons shall)) may
virtually represent the persons and classes of persons who might take
on the happening of the additional future event((; and
(d) The holder of a general power of appointment, exercisable
either during the power holder's life or by will, or a limited power of
appointment, exercisable either during the power holder's life or by
will, that excludes as possible appointees only the power holder, his
or her estate, his or her creditors, and the creditors of his or her
estate, may accept notice and virtually represent and bind persons
whose interests, as permissible appointees, takers in default, or
otherwise, are subject to the power, to the extent there is no conflict
of interest between the holder of the power of appointment and the
persons represented with respect to the particular question or dispute.
(4) A party is not virtually represented by a person receiving
notice if a conflict of interest involving the matter is known to exist
between the notified person and the party)), but only to the extent
that there is no conflict of interest between the representative and
the person(s) represented with regard to the particular question or
dispute.
(((5))) (9) To the extent there is no conflict of interest between
the holder of the power of appointment and the persons represented with
respect to the particular question or dispute, the holder of a lifetime
or testamentary power of appointment may virtually represent and bind
persons who are permissible appointees or takers in default (but only
to the extent that they are permissible appointees in the case of a
limited power of appointment) under the power, and who are not
permissible distributees.
(10) The attorney general may virtually represent and bind a
charitable organization if:
(a) The charitable organization is not a qualified beneficiary
specified in the trust instrument or acting as trustee; or
(b) The charitable organization is a qualified beneficiary, but is
not a permissible distributee, and its beneficial interest in the trust
is subject to change by the trustor or by a person designated by the
trustor.
(11) An action taken by the court is conclusive and binding upon
each person receiving actual or constructive notice or who is otherwise
represented under this section.
(12) This section is intended to adopt the common law concept of
virtual representation. This section supplements the common law
relating to the doctrine of virtual representation and may not be
construed as limiting the application of that common law doctrine.

Sec. 6 RCW 11.96A.125 and 2011 c 327 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The terms of a will or trust, even if unambiguous, may be reformed
by judicial proceedings ((or binding nonjudicial procedure)) under this
chapter to conform the terms to the intention of the testator or
trustor if it is proved by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence((, or
the parties to a binding nonjudicial agreement agree that there is
clear, cogent, and convincing evidence,)) that both the intent of the
testator or trustor and the terms of the will or trust were affected by
a mistake of fact or law, whether in expression or inducement. This
does not limit the ability to reform the will or trust using the
binding nonjudicial procedures of RCW 11.96A.220.

Sec. 7 RCW 11.97.010 and 2011 c 327 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The trustor of a trust may by the provisions of the trust
relieve the trustee from any or all of the duties, restrictions, and
liabilities which would otherwise be imposed by chapters 11.95, 11.98,
11.100, and 11.104A RCW and RCW 11.106.020, or may alter or deny any or
all of the privileges and powers conferred by those provisions; or may
add duties, restrictions, liabilities, privileges, or powers to those
imposed or granted by those provisions. If any specific provision of
those chapters is in conflict with the provisions of a trust, the
provisions of the trust control whether or not specific reference is
made in the trust to any of those chapters, except as provided in RCW
6.32.250, 11.96A.190, 19.36.020, section 8 of this act, 11.98.200
through 11.98.240, section 16(1) of this act, 11.95.100 through
11.95.150, and chapter 11.103 RCW. In no event may a trustee be
relieved of the duty to act in good faith and with honest judgment ((or
the duty to provide information to beneficiaries as required in this
section)). Notwithstanding the breadth of discretion granted to a
trustee in the terms of the trust, including the use of such terms as
"absolute," "sole," or "uncontrolled," the trustee ((shall)) must
exercise a discretionary power in good faith and in accordance with the
terms and purposes of the trust and the interests of the beneficiaries.
(((2) Within sixty days after the date of acceptance of the
position of trustee of an irrevocable trust, or the date the trustee of
a formerly revocable trust acquires knowledge that the trust has become
irrevocable, whether by the death of the trustor or otherwise, the
trustee shall give notice of: (a) The existence of the trust, (b) the
identity of the trustor or trustors, (c) the trustee's name, address,
and telephone number, and (d) the right to request such information as
is reasonably necessary to enable the notified person to enforce his or
her rights under the trust, to all persons interested in the trust, as
defined in RCW 11.96A.030, and who would be entitled to notice under
RCW 11.96A.110 and 11.96A.120 if they were a party to judicial
proceedings regarding the trust. If any such person is a minor and no
guardian has been appointed for such person by any court, then such
notice may be given to a parent of the person. If a person otherwise
entitled to notice under this section is a charitable organization, and
the charitable organization's only interest in the trust is a future
interest that may be revoked, then such notice shall instead be given
to the attorney general. A trustee who gives notice pursuant to this
section satisfies the duty to inform the beneficiaries of the existence
of the trust. The notice required under this subsection (2) applies
only to irrevocable trusts created after December 31, 2011, and
revocable trusts that become irrevocable after December 31, 2011,
provided that all common law duties of a trustee to notify
beneficiaries applicable to trusts created or that became irrevocable
before such date are not affected.
(3) A trustee shall keep all persons interested in the trust, as
defined in RCW 11.96A.030, and who would be entitled to notice under
RCW 11.96A.110 and 11.96A.120 if they were a party to judicial
proceedings regarding the trust, reasonably informed about the
administration of the trust and of the material facts necessary for
them to protect their interests. A report that contains the following
is presumed to satisfy the trustee's duty to keep such persons
reasonably informed for the relevant period of trust administration:
(a) A statement of receipts and disbursements of principal and
income that have occurred during the accounting period;
(b) A statement of the assets and liabilities of the trust and
their values at the beginning and end of the period;
(c) The trustee's compensation for the period;
(d) The agents hired by the trustee, their relationship to the
trustee, if any, and their compensation, for the period;
(e) Disclosure of any pledge, mortgage, option, or lease of trust
property, or other agreement affecting trust property binding for a
period of five years or more that was granted or entered into during
the accounting period;
(f) Disclosure of all transactions during the period that are
equivalent to one of the types of transactions described in RCW
11.98.078 or otherwise could have been affected by a conflict between
the trustee's fiduciary and personal interests;
(g) A statement that the recipient of the account information may
petition the superior court pursuant to chapter 11.106 RCW to obtain
review of the statement and of acts of the trustee disclosed in the
statement; and
(h) A statement that claims against the trustee for breach of trust
may not be made after the expiration of three years from the date the
beneficiary receives the statement.
(4) Unless unreasonable under the circumstances, a trustee shall
promptly respond to any beneficiary's request for information related
to the administration of the trust.
(5) If a person entitled to notice under this section requests
information reasonably necessary to enable the notified person to
enforce his or her rights under the trust, then the trustee must
provide such information within sixty days of receipt of such request.
Delivery of the entire trust instrument to the persons entitled to
notice under this section who request information concerning the terms
of the trust reasonably necessary to enable the notified person to
enforce his or her rights under the trust is deemed to satisfy the
trustee's obligations under this subsection.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 11.98 RCW
to be codified before RCW 11.98.005 to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter, and
throughout this title where specifically referenced, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Permissible distributee" means a trust beneficiary who is
currently eligible to receive distributions of trust income or
principal, whether the distribution is mandatory or discretionary.
(2) "Qualified beneficiary" means a trust beneficiary who, on the
date that such beneficiary's qualification is determined:
(a) Is a permissible distributee;
(b) Would be a permissible distributee if the interests of the
distributees described in (a) of this subsection terminated on that
date; or
(c) Would be a permissible distributee if the trust terminated on
that date.

Sec. 9 RCW 11.98.005 and 2011 c 327 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If provisions of a trust instrument designate Washington as the
situs of the trust or designate Washington law to govern the trust or
any of its terms, then the situs of the trust is Washington provided
that one of the following conditions is met:
(a) A trustee has a place of business in or a trustee is a resident
of Washington; or
(b) More than an insignificant part of the trust administration
occurs in Washington; or
(c) The trustor resides in Washington at the time situs is being
established, or resided in Washington at the time the trust became
irrevocable; or
(d) One or more of the qualified beneficiaries resides in
Washington; or
(e) An interest in real property located in Washington is an asset
of the trust.
(2)(a) Unless the trust instrument designates a state other than
Washington as the situs of the trust and does not expressly authorize
transfer of situs, the trustee may register the trust as a Washington
trust if any of the factors in subsection (1)(a) through (e) of this
section are present. The trustee ((shall)) must register the trust by
filing with the clerk of the court in any county where venue lies for
the trust under RCW 11.96A.050, a statement including the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the trustee;
(ii) The date of the trust, name of the trustor, and name of the
trust, if any;
(iii) The factor or factors listed in subsection (1)(a) through (e)
of this section that are present for the trust and which qualify the
trust for registration.
(b) Within five days of filing the registration with the court, the
trustee ((shall)) must mail a copy of the registration to each ((person
who would be entitled to notice under RCW 11.97.010 and)) qualified
beneficiary who has not waived notice of the registration, in writing,
filed in the cause, together with a notice that must be in
substantially the same form as set forth in this section. Persons
receiving such notice ((shall)) have thirty days from the date of
filing the registration to file a petition in the court objecting to
such registration and requesting the court to issue an order that
Washington is not the proper situs of the trust, and to serve a copy of
such petition upon the trustee or the trustee's lawyer. If a petition
objecting to the registration is filed within thirty days of the date
of filing the registration, the trustee must request the court to fix
a time and place for the hearing of the petition and notify by mail,
personal service or electronic transmission, if a valid consent to
electronic transmission is in effect under the terms of RCW 11.96A.110,
all ((persons who were entitled to notice of the registration))
qualified beneficiaries of the time and place of the hearing, not less
than ten days before the hearing on the petition.
(c) Unless a person receiving notice of the registration files a
petition with the court objecting to the registration within thirty
days of the date of filing the registration, the registration ((shall))
will be deemed the equivalent of an order entered by the court
declaring that the situs of the trust is Washington. After expiration
of the thirty-day period following filing of the registration, the
trustee may obtain a certificate of registration signed by the clerk,
and issued under the seal of the court, which may be in the form
specified in (d) of this subsection.
(d) Notice of registration and certificates of registration may be
in the following form:
(i) Notice form:

NOTICE OF FILING OF REGISTRATION OF [NAME AND DATE OF TRUST] AS A
WASHINGTON TRUST
NOTICE IS GIVEN that the attached Registration of Trust was filed
by the undersigned in the above-entitled court on the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., 20. . .; unless you file a petition in the above-entitled
court objecting to such registration and requesting the court to issue
an order that Washington is not the proper situs of the trust, and
serve a copy thereof upon the trustee or the trustee's lawyer, within
thirty days after the date of the filing, the registration will be
deemed the equivalent of an order entered by the court declaring that
the situs of the trust is Washington.
If you file and serve a petition within the period specified, the
undersigned will request the court to fix a time and place for the
hearing of your petition, and you will be notified of the time and
place thereof, by mail, or personal service, not less than ten days
before the hearing on the petition.
(ii) Certificate of Registration:

State of Washington, County of . . . . . .
In the superior court of the county of . . . . . .
Whereas, the attached Registration of Trust was filed with this
court on . . . ., the attached Notice of Filing Registration of Trust
and Affidavit of Mailing Notice of Filing Registration of Trust were
filed with this court on . . . ., and no objections to such
Registration have been filed with this court, the trust known as
. . . ., under trust agreement dated . . . ., between . . . . as
Trustor and . . . . as Trustee, is hereby registered as a Washington
trust.
Witness my hand and the seal of said court this . . . day of
. . . . . ., 20 . . ..

(3) If the instrument establishing a trust does not designate
((Washington as the situs or designate Washington)) any jurisdiction as
the situs or designate any jurisdiction's governing law to apply to the
trust, and the trustee of the trust has not registered the trust as
allowed in subsection (2) of this section, the situs of the trust is
Washington if ((the)) situs has not previously been established by any
court proceeding and the additional conditions specified in this
subsection (3) are met.
(a) For a testamentary trust, the situs of the trust is Washington
if:
(i) The will was admitted to probate in Washington; or
(ii) The will has not been admitted to probate in Washington, but
any trustee of the trust resides or has a place of business in
Washington, any qualified beneficiary ((entitled to notice under RCW
11.97.010)) resides in Washington, or any real property that is an
asset of the trust is located in Washington.
(b) For an inter vivos trust ((where the trustor is domiciled in
Washington either when the trust becomes irrevocable or, in the case of
a revocable trust, when judicial proceedings under chapter 11.96A RCW
are commenced)), the situs of the trust is Washington if:
(i) The trustor is living and Washington is the trustor's domicile
or any of the trustees reside in or have a place of business in
Washington; or
(ii) The trustor is deceased((, situs has not previously been
established by any court proceeding,)); and:
(A) The trustor's will was admitted to probate in Washington; or
(B) The trustor's will was not admitted to probate in Washington,
but any ((person entitled to notice under RCW 11.97.010)) qualified
beneficiary resides in Washington, any trustee resides or has a place
of business in Washington, or any real property that is an asset of the
trust is located in Washington.
(c) If the situs of the trust is not determined under (a) or (b) of
this subsection, the determination regarding the situs of the trust is
a matter for purposes of RCW 11.96A.030. Whether Washington is the
situs ((shall)) must be determined by a court in a judicial proceeding
conducted under RCW 11.96A.080 if:
(i) A trustee has a place of business in or a trustee is a resident
of Washington; or
(ii) More than an insignificant part of the trust administration
occurs in Washington; or
(iii) One or more of the qualified beneficiaries resides in
Washington; or
(iv) An interest in real property located in Washington is an asset
of the trust.
(d) Determination of situs under (c) of this subsection (3) cannot
be made by nonjudicial agreement under RCW 11.96A.220.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 11.98 RCW
to be codified between RCW 11.98.016 and 11.98.019 to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
a person designated as trustee accepts the trusteeship:
(a) By substantially complying with a method of acceptance provided
in the terms of the trust; or
(b) If the terms of the trust do not provide a method of acceptance
or the method provided in the terms is not expressly made exclusive, by
accepting delivery of the trust property, exercising powers or
performing duties as trustee, or otherwise indicating acceptance of the
trusteeship.
(2) A person designated as trustee who has not yet accepted the
trusteeship may decline the trusteeship by delivering a written
declination of the trusteeship to the trustor or, if the trustor is
deceased or is incapacitated, to a successor trustee, if any, and if
none, to a qualified beneficiary.
(3) A person designated as trustee, without accepting the
trusteeship, may:
(a) Act to preserve the trust property if, within a reasonable time
after acting, the person sends a written declination of the trusteeship
to the trustor or, if the trustor is dead or is incapacitated, to a
successor trustee, if any, and if none, to a qualified beneficiary; and
(b) Inspect or investigate trust property to determine potential
liability under environmental or other law or for any other purpose.

Sec. 11 RCW 11.98.019 and 1985 c 30 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any trustee may, by written instrument delivered to any then acting
co-trustee and to the ((current adult income beneficiaries))
permissible distributees of the trust, relinquish to any extent and
upon any terms any or all of the trustee's powers, rights, authorities,
or discretions that are or may be tax sensitive in that they cause or
may cause adverse tax consequences to the trustee or the trust. Any
trustee not relinquishing such a power, right, authority, or discretion
and upon whom it is conferred continues to have full power to exercise
it.

Sec. 12 RCW 11.98.039 and 2011 c 327 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Where a vacancy occurs in the office of the trustee and there
is a successor trustee who is willing to serve as trustee and (a) is
named in the governing instrument as successor trustee or (b) has been
selected to serve as successor trustee under the procedure established
in the governing instrument for the selection of a successor trustee,
the outgoing trustee, or any other interested party, ((shall)) must
give notice of such vacancy, whether arising because of the trustee's
resignation or because of any other reason, and of the successor
trustee's agreement to serve as trustee, to each ((adult distributee or
permissible distributee of trust income or of trust principal or of
both trust income and trust principal. If there are no such adults, no
notice need be given)) permissible distributee. The successor trustee
named in the governing instrument or selected pursuant to the procedure
therefor established in the governing instrument ((shall be)) is
entitled to act as trustee except for good cause or disqualification.
The successor trustee ((shall serve)) is deemed to have accepted the
trusteeship as of the effective date of the discharge of the
predecessor trustee as provided in RCW 11.98.041.
(2) Where a vacancy exists or occurs in the office of the trustee
and there is no successor trustee who is named in the governing
instrument or who has been selected to serve as successor trustee under
the procedure established in the governing instrument for the selection
of a successor trustee, and who is willing to serve as trustee, then
all parties with an interest in the trust may agree to a nonjudicial
change of the trustee under RCW 11.96A.220. The successor trustee
((shall serve)) is deemed to have accepted the trusteeship as of the
effective date of the discharge of the predecessor trustee as provided
in RCW 11.98.041 or, in circumstances where there is no predecessor
trustee, as of the effective date of the trustee's appointment.
(3) When there is a desire to name one or more cotrustees to serve
with the existing trustee, then all parties with an interest in the
trust may agree to the nonjudicial addition of one or more cotrustees
under RCW 11.96A.220. The additional cotrustee ((shall serve)) is
deemed to have accepted the trusteeship as of the effective date of the
cotrustee's appointment.
(4) Unless subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section applies, any
beneficiary of a trust, the trustor, if alive, or the trustee may
petition the superior court having jurisdiction for the appointment or
change of a trustee or cotrustee under the procedures provided in RCW
11.96A.080 through 11.96A.200: (a) Whenever the office of trustee
becomes vacant; (b) upon filing of a petition of resignation by a
trustee; or (c) for any other reasonable cause.
(5) For purposes of this subsection, the term fiduciary includes
both trustee and personal representative.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in the governing instrument, a
successor fiduciary, absent actual knowledge of a breach of fiduciary
duty: (i) Is not liable for any act or omission of a predecessor
fiduciary and is not obligated to inquire into the validity or
propriety of any such act or omission; (ii) is authorized to accept as
conclusively accurate any accounting or statement of assets tendered to
the successor fiduciary by a predecessor fiduciary; and (iii) is
authorized to receipt only for assets actually delivered and has no
duty to make further inquiry as to undisclosed assets of the trust or
estate.
(b) Nothing in this section relieves a successor fiduciary from
liability for retaining improper investments, nor does this section in
any way bar the successor fiduciary, trust beneficiaries, or other
party in interest from bringing an action against a predecessor
fiduciary arising out of the acts or omissions of the predecessor
fiduciary, nor does it relieve the successor fiduciary of liability for
its own acts or omissions except as specifically stated or authorized
in this section.
(6) A change of trustee to a foreign trustee does not change the
situs of the trust. Transfer of situs of a trust to another
jurisdiction requires compliance with RCW 11.98.005 and RCW 11.98.045
through 11.98.055.

Sec. 13 RCW 11.98.041 and 1985 c 30 s 141 are each amended to
read as follows:
Where a vacancy occurs in the office of trustee under the
circumstances described in RCW 11.98.039 (1) or (2), the outgoing
trustee ((shall be)) is discharged upon the agreement of all parties
entitled to notice or upon the expiration of thirty days after notice
is given of such vacancy as required by the applicable subsection of
RCW 11.98.039, whichever occurs first, or if no notice is required
under RCW 11.98.039(1), upon the date the vacancy occurs, unless before
the effective date of such discharge a petition is filed under RCW
11.98.039(((3))) (4) regarding the appointment or change of a trustee
of the trust. Where a petition is filed under RCW 11.98.039(((3))) (4)
regarding the appointment or change of a trustee, the superior court
having jurisdiction may discharge the trustee from the trust and may
appoint a successor trustee upon such terms as the court may require.

Sec. 14 RCW 11.98.045 and 2011 c 327 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a trust is a Washington trust under RCW 11.98.005, a trustee
may transfer the situs of the trust to a jurisdiction other than
Washington if the trust instrument so provides or in accordance with
RCW 11.98.051 or 11.98.055.
(2) Transfer under this section is permitted only if:
(a) The transfer would facilitate the economic and convenient
administration of the trust;
(b) The transfer would not materially impair the interests of the
qualified beneficiaries or others interested in the trust;
(c) The transfer does not violate the terms of the trust;
(d) The new trustee is qualified and able to administer the trust
or such assets on the terms set forth in the trust; and
(e) The trust meets at least one condition for situs listed in RCW
11.98.005(1) with respect to the new jurisdiction.
(3) Acceptance of such transfer by a foreign corporate trustee or
trust company under this section or RCW 11.98.051 or 11.98.055
((shall)) may not be construed to be doing a "trust business" as
described in RCW 30.08.150(9).

Sec. 15 RCW 11.98.051 and 2011 c 327 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The trustee may transfer trust situs (a) in accordance with RCW
11.96A.220; or (b) by giving written notice to ((those persons entitled
to notice as provided for under RCW 11.96A.110 and to)) the attorney
general in the case of a charitable trust subject to chapter 11.110 RCW
and to the qualified beneficiaries not less than sixty days before
initiating the transfer. The notice must:
(a) State the name and mailing address of the trustee;
(b) Include a copy of the governing instrument of the trust;
(c) Include a statement of assets and liabilities of the trust
dated within ninety days of the notice;
(d) State the name and mailing address of the trustee to whom the
trust will be transferred together with evidence that the trustee has
agreed to accept the trust in the manner provided by law of the new
situs. The notice must also contain a statement of the trustee's
qualifications and the name of the court, if any, having jurisdiction
of that trustee or in which a proceeding with respect to the
administration of the trust may be heard;
(e) State the facts supporting the requirements of RCW
11.98.045(2);
(f) Advise the ((beneficiaries)) recipients of the notice of the
date, not less than sixty days after the giving of the notice, by which
((the beneficiary)) such recipients must notify the trustee of an
objection to the proposed transfer; and
(g) Include a form on which the recipient may ((indicate consent or
objection)) object to the proposed transfer.
(2) If the date upon which the ((beneficiaries')) right to object
to the transfer expires without receipt by the trustee of any
objection, the trustee may transfer the trust situs as provided in the
notice. If the trust was registered under RCW 11.98.045(2), the
trustee must file a notice of transfer of situs and termination of
registration with the court of the county where the trust was
registered.
(3) The authority of a trustee under this section to transfer a
trust's situs terminates if a ((beneficiary)) recipient of the notice
notifies the trustee of an objection to the proposed transfer on or
before the date specified in the notice.
(4) A change of trust situs does not authorize a change of trustee.
Change of trustee of a trust requires compliance with RCW 11.98.039.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 11.98 RCW
between RCW 11.98.070 and 11.98.080 to read as follows:
(1) A trustee must keep all qualified beneficiaries of a trust
reasonably informed about the administration of the trust and of the
material facts necessary for them to protect their interests. Unless
unreasonable under the circumstances, a trustee must promptly respond
to any beneficiary's request for information related to the
administration of the trust. The trustee is deemed to have satisfied
the request of a qualified beneficiary who requests information
concerning the terms of the trust reasonably necessary to enable such
beneficiary to enforce his or her rights under the trust if the trustee
provides a copy of the entire trust instrument. If a qualified
beneficiary must compel production of information from the trustee by
order of the court, then the court may order costs, including
reasonable attorneys' fees, to be awarded to such beneficiary pursuant
to RCW 11.96A.150.
(2)(a) Except to the extent waived or modified as provided in
subsection (5) of this section, within sixty days after the date of
acceptance of the position of trustee, the trustee must give notice of:
(i) The existence of the trust;
(ii) The identity of the trustor or trustors;
(iii) The trustee's name, address, and telephone number; and
(iv) The right to request such information as is reasonably
necessary to enable the notified person to enforce his or her rights
under the trust, to the qualified beneficiaries of the trust.
(b) The notice required under this subsection (2) applies only to
irrevocable trusts created after December 31, 2011, and revocable
trusts that become irrevocable after December 31, 2011.
(3) Despite any other provision of this section, and except to the
extent waived or modified as provided in subsection (5) of this
section, the trustee may not be required to provide any information
described in subsection (1) or (2) of this section to any beneficiary
of a trust other than the trustor's spouse or domestic partner if:
(a) Such spouse or domestic partner has capacity;
(b) Such spouse or domestic partner is the only permissible
distributee of the trust; and
(c) All of the other qualified beneficiaries of the trust are the
descendants of the trustor and the trustor's spouse or domestic
partner.
(4) While the trustor of a revocable trust is living, no
beneficiary other than the trustor is entitled to receive any
information under this section.
(5) The trustor may waive or modify the notification requirements
of subsections (2) and (3) of this section in the trust document or in
a separate writing, made at any time, that is delivered to the trustee.

Sec. 17 RCW 11.98.080 and 1999 c 42 s 621 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Two or more trusts may be consolidated if:
(((a))) (i) The trusts so provide; or
(((b))) (ii) Whether provided in the trusts or not, ((in accordance
with subsection (2) of this section, if all interested persons consent
as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section and the requirements
of subsection (1)(d) of this section are satisfied; or
(c) Whether provided in the trusts or not, in accordance with
subsection (3) of this section if the requirements of subsection (1)(d)
of this section are satisfied;
(d))) the requirements of subsection (2), (3), or (4) of this
section are satisfied.
(b) Consolidation under subsection (2) ((or)), (3), or (4) of this
section is permitted only if:
(i) The dispositive provisions of each trust to be consolidated are
substantially similar;
(ii) Consolidation is not inconsistent with the intent of the
trustor with regard to any trust to be consolidated; and
(iii) Consolidation would facilitate administration of the trusts
and would not materially impair the interests of the beneficiaries((;
(e))).
(c) Trusts may be consolidated whether created inter vivos or by
will, by the same or different instruments, by the same or different
trustors, whether the trustees are the same, and regardless of where
the trusts were created or administered.
(2) ((The trustees of two or more trusts may consolidate the trusts
on such terms and conditions as appropriate without court approval as
provided in RCW 11.96A.220.))
(a) ((The trustee shall give written notice of proposed
consolidation by personal service or by certified mail to the)) A
trustee must deliver sixty days in advance written notice of a proposed
consolidation in the manner provided in RCW 11.96A.110 to the qualified
beneficiaries of every trust affected by the consolidation ((as
provided in RCW 11.96A.110)) and to any trustee of such trusts who does
not join in the notice. The notice ((shall)) must: (i) State the name
and mailing address of the trustee; (ii) include a copy of the
governing instrument of each trust to be consolidated; (iii) include a
statement of assets and liabilities of each trust to be consolidated,
dated within ninety days of the notice; (iv) fully describe the terms
and manner of consolidation; and (v) state the reasons supporting the
requirements of subsection (1)(((d))) (b) of this section. The notice
((shall)) must advise the recipient of the right to petition for a
judicial determination of the proposed consolidation as provided in
subsection (((3))) (4) of this section((. The notice shall include a
form on which consent or objection to the proposed consolidation may be
indicated.
(b) If the trustee receives written consent to the proposed
consolidation from all persons entitled to notice as provided in RCW
11.96A.110 or from their representatives, the trustee may consolidate
the trusts as provided in the notice. Any person dealing with the
trustee of the resulting consolidated trust is entitled to rely on the
authority of that trustee to act and is not obliged to inquire into the
validity or propriety of the consolidation under this section.
(3)(a) Any trustee, beneficiary, or special representative may
petition the superior court of the county in which the principal place
of administration of a trust is located for an order consolidating two
or more trusts under RCW 11.96A.080 through 11.96A.200. If nonjudicial
consolidation has been commenced pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, a petition may be filed under this section unless the trustee
has received all necessary consents. The principal place of
administration of the trust is the trustee's usual place of business
where the records pertaining to the trust are kept, or the trustee's
residence if the trustee has no such place of business)), and must
indicate that the recipient has thirty days to object to the proposed
consolidation.
(b) If the trustee receives written objection to the proposed
consolidation from any trustee or beneficiary entitled to notice or
from their representatives within the objection period provided in
subsection (a) of this section, the trustee(s) may not consolidate the
trusts as provided in the notice, though an objection does not preclude
the trustee or a beneficiary's right to petition for a judicial
determination of the proposed consolidation as provided in subsection
(4) of this section. If the trustee does not receive any objection
within the objection period provided above, then the trustee may
consolidate the trusts, and such will be deemed the equivalent of an
order entered by the court declaring that the trusts were combined in
the manner provided in the initial notice.
(3) The trustees of two or more trusts may consolidate the trusts
on such terms and conditions as appropriate without court approval as
provided in RCW 11.96A.220.
(4)(a) Any trustee, beneficiary, or special representative may
petition the superior court of the county in which the situs of a trust
is located for an order consolidating two or more trusts under RCW
11.96A.080 through 11.96A.200.
(b) At the conclusion of the hearing, if the court finds that the
requirements of subsection (1)(((d))) (b) of this section have been
satisfied, it may direct consolidation of two or more trusts on such
terms and conditions as appropriate. The court in its discretion may
provide for payment from one or more of the trusts of reasonable fees
and expenses for any party to the proceeding.
(((4))) (5) This section applies to all trusts whenever created.
Any person dealing with the trustee of the resulting consolidated trust
is entitled to rely on the authority of that trustee to act and is not
obliged to inquire into the validity or propriety of the consolidation
under this section.
(((5))) (6) For powers of fiduciaries to divide trusts, see RCW
11.108.025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 RCW 11.98.090 (Nonliability of third
persons without knowledge of breach) and 1985 c 30 s 52 are each
repealed.

Sec. 19 RCW 11.103.040 and 2011 c 327 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
While ((a trust is revocable by the trustor,)) the trustor of a
revocable trust is living, the rights of the beneficiaries are subject
to the control of, and the duties of the trustee are owed exclusively
to, the trustor. If a revocable trust has more than one trustor, the
duties of the trustee are owed to all of the living trustors having the
right to revoke the trust.

Sec. 20 RCW 11.103.050 and 2011 c 327 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person may commence a judicial proceeding to contest the
validity of a trust that was revocable at the trustor's death within
the earlier of:
(a) Twenty-four months after the trustor's death; or
(b) Four months after the trustee sent to the person by personal
service, mail, or in an electronic transmission if there is a consent
of the recipient to electronic transmission then in effect under the
terms of RCW 11.96A.110, a notice ((with the information required in
RCW 11.97.010, and)) including:
(i) The name and date of the trust;
(ii) The identity of the trustor or trustors;
(iii) The trustee's name, address, and telephone number; and
(iv) Notice of the time allowed for commencing a proceeding.
(2) Upon the death of the trustor of a trust that was revocable at
the trustor's death, the trustee may proceed to distribute the trust
property in accordance with the terms of the trust, unless:
(a) The trustee knows of a pending judicial proceeding contesting
the validity of the trust; or
(b) A potential contestant has notified the trustee of a possible
judicial proceeding to contest the trust and a judicial proceeding is
commenced within sixty days after the contestant sent the notification.
(3) A beneficiary of a trust that is determined to have been
invalid is liable to return any distribution received.

Sec. 21 RCW 11.96A.250 and 2001 c 14 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) ((The personal representative or trustee may petition the
court having jurisdiction over the matter for the appointment of a
special representative to represent a person who is interested in the
estate or trust and)) Any party or the parent of a minor or unborn
party may petition the court for the appointment of a special
representative to represent a party: (i) Who is a minor; (ii) who is
((incompetent or disabled)) incapacitated without an appointed guardian
of his or her estate; (iii) who is yet unborn or unascertained; or (iv)
whose identity or address is unknown. The petition may be heard by the
court without notice.
(b) In appointing the special representative the court shall give
due consideration and deference to any nomination(s) made in the
petition, the special skills required in the representation, and the
need for a representative who will act independently and prudently.
The nomination of a person as special representative by the ((personal
representative or trustee)) petitioner and the person's willingness to
serve as special representative are not grounds by themselves for
finding a lack of independence, however, the court may consider any
interests that the nominating ((fiduciary)) party may have in the
estate or trust in making the determination.
(c) The special representative may enter into a binding agreement
on behalf of the person or beneficiary. The special representative may
be appointed for more than one person or class of persons if the
interests of such persons or class are not in conflict. The petition
((shall)) must be verified. The petition and order appointing the
special representative may be in the following form:

CAPTION PETITION FOR APPOINTMENT
OF CASE OF SPECIAL REPRESENTATIVE
UNDER RCW 11.96A.250

The undersigned petitioner petitions the court for the appointment
of a special representative in accordance with RCW 11.96A.250 and shows
the court as follows:
1. Petitioner. Petitioner . . . [is the qualified and presently
acting (personal representative) (trustee) of the above (estate)
(trust) having been named (personal representative) (trustee) under
(describe will and reference probate order or describe trust
instrument)] or [is the (describe relationship of the petitioner to the
party to be represented or to the matter at issue).].
2. ((Issue Concerning (Estate) (Trust) Administration)) Matter. A
question concerning ((administration of the (estate) (trust))) . . .
has arisen as to (describe issue, for example: Related to
interpretation, construction, administration, distribution). The
((issues are appropriate for determination under RCW 11.96A.250.
3. Beneficiaries. The beneficiaries of the (estate) (trust)
include persons who are unborn, unknown, or unascertained persons, or
who are under eighteen years of age)) issue is a matter as defined in
RCW 11.96A.030 and is appropriate for determination under RCW
11.96A.210 through 11.96A.250.
3. Party/Parties to be Represented. This matter involves (include
description of asset(s) and related beneficiaries and/or interested
parties). Resolution of this matter will require the involvement of
. . . . . . (name of person or class of persons), who is/are (minors),
(incapacitated and without an appointed guardian), (unborn or
unascertained) (whose identity or address is unknown).
4. Special Representative. The nominated special representative
. . . is a lawyer licensed to practice before the courts of this state
or an individual with special skill or training in the administration
of estates or trusts. The nominated special representative does not
have an interest in the ((affected estate or trust)) matter and is not
related to any person interested in the ((estate or trust)) matter.
The nominated special representative is willing to serve. The
petitioner has no reason to believe that the nominated special
representative will not act in an independent and prudent manner and in
the best interests of the represented parties. (It is recommended that
the petitioner also include information specifying the particular
skills of the nominated special representative that relate to the
matter in issue.)
5. Resolution. Petitioner desires to achieve a resolution of the
questions that have arisen ((concerning the (estate) (trust))) in this
matter. Petitioner believes that proceeding in accordance with the
procedures permitted under RCW 11.96A.210 through 11.96A.250 would be
in the best interests of the (((estate) (trust) and the beneficiaries))
parties, including the party requiring a special representative.
6. Request of Court. Petitioner requests that . . .((,)) . . . an
attorney licensed to practice in the State of Washington((.)),

(OR)

. . . . an individual with special skill or training in the
administration of estates or trusts

be appointed special representative for ((those beneficiaries who are
not yet adults, as well as for the unborn, unknown, and unascertained
beneficiaries)) . . . (describe party or parties being represented),
who is/are (minors), (incapacitated and without an appointed guardian),
(unborn or unascertained) (whose identity or address is unknown), as
provided under RCW 11.96A.250.

DATED this . . . day of . . . . ., . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Petitioner ((or petitioner's
legal representative)))

VERIFICATION

I certify under penalty of perjury under the laws of the state of
Washington that the foregoing is true and correct.

DATED . . . . . ., ((2000)) 20.., at . . . . . ., Washington.

. . . . . . . . .
(Petitioner or other person
having knowledge)

CAPTION ORDER FOR APPOINTMENT
OF CASE OF SPECIAL REPRESENTATIVE

THIS MATTER having come on for hearing before this Court on
Petition for Appointment of Special Representative filed herein, and it
appearing that it would be in the best interests of the (((estate)
(trust))) parties related to the matter described in the Petition to
appoint a special representative to address the issues that have arisen
((concerning the (estate) (trust))) in the matter and the Court finding
that the facts stated in the Petition are true, now, therefore,
IT IS ORDERED that . . . is appointed under RCW 11.96A.250 as
special representative ((for the (estate) (trust) beneficiaries who are
not yet adult age, and for unborn, unknown, or unascertained
beneficiaries to represent their respective interests in the (estate)
(trust))) (describe party or parties being represented) who is/are
(minors), (incapacitated and without an appointed guardian), (unborn or
unascertained) (whose identity or address is unknown), to represent
their respective interests in the matter as provided in RCW 11.96A.250.
The special representative shall be discharged of responsibility with
respect to the matter as provided in RCW 11.96A.250. The special
representative ((shall be)) is discharged of responsibility with
respect to the (((estate) (trust))) matter at such time as a written
agreement is executed resolving the present issues, all as provided in
that statute, or if an agreement is not reached within six months from
entry of this Order, the special representative appointed under this
Order ((shall be)) is discharged of responsibility, subject to
subsequent reappointment under RCW 11.96A.250.

DONE IN OPEN COURT this . . . day of . . . . ., . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
JUDGE/COURT COMMISSIONER

(2) Upon appointment by the court, the special representative
((shall)) must file a certification made under penalty of perjury in
accordance with RCW 9A.72.085 that he or she (a) is not interested in
the ((estate or trust)) matter; (b) is not related to any person
interested in the ((estate or trust)) matter; (c) is willing to serve;
and (d) will act independently, prudently, and in the best interests of
the represented parties.
(3) The special representative must be a lawyer licensed to
practice before the courts of this state or an individual with special
skill or training in the administration of estates or trusts. The
special representative may not have an interest in the ((affected
estate or trust)) matter, and may not be related to a person interested
in the ((estate or trust)) matter. The special representative is
entitled to reasonable compensation for services that must be paid from
the principal of ((the estate or trust whose beneficiaries are
represented)) an asset involved in the matter.
(4) The special representative ((shall be)) is discharged from any
responsibility and ((shall)) will have no further duties with respect
to the ((estate or trust)) matter or with respect to any ((person
interested in the estate or trust)) party, on the earlier of: (a) The
expiration of six months from the date the special representative was
appointed unless the order appointing the special representative
provides otherwise, or (b) the execution of the written agreement by
all parties or their virtual representatives. Any action against a
special representative must be brought within the time limits provided
by RCW 11.96A.070(3)(c)(i).

Sec. 22 RCW 11.98.015 and 2011 c 327 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in chapter 11.118 RCW or by another
statute, the following rules apply:
(1) A trust may be created for a noncharitable purpose without a
definite or definitely ascertainable beneficiary or for a noncharitable
but otherwise valid purpose to be selected by the trustee. The trust
may not be enforced for longer than the time period specified in RCW
11.98.130 as the period during which a trust cannot be deemed to
violate the rule against perpetuities;
(2) A trust authorized by this section may be enforced by a person
appointed in the terms of the trust or, if no person is so appointed,
by a person appointed by the court. Such person is considered to be a
permissible distributee of the trust; and
(3) Property of a trust authorized by this section may be applied
only to its intended use, except to the extent the court determines
that the value of the trust property exceeds the amount required for
the intended use. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the
trust, property not required for the intended use must be distributed
to the trustor, if then living, otherwise to the trustor's successors
in interest. Successors in interest include the beneficiaries under
the trustor's will, if the trustor has a will, or, in the absence of an
effective will provision, the trustor's heirs.

Sec. 23 RCW 11.98.078 and 2011 c 327 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A trustee ((shall)) must administer the trust solely in the
interests of the beneficiaries.
(2) Subject to the rights of persons dealing with or assisting the
trustee as provided in RCW ((11.98.090)) 11.98.105, a sale,
encumbrance, or other transaction involving the investment or
management of trust property entered into by the trustee for the
trustee's own personal account or which is otherwise affected by a
conflict between the trustee's fiduciary and personal interests is
voidable by a beneficiary affected by the transaction unless:
(a) The transaction was authorized by the terms of the trust;
(b) The transaction was approved by the court or approved in a
nonjudicial binding agreement in compliance with RCW 11.96A.210 through
11.96A.250;
(c) The beneficiary did not commence a judicial proceeding within
the time allowed by RCW 11.96A.070;
(d) The beneficiary consented to the trustee's conduct, ratified
the transaction, or released the trustee in compliance with RCW
11.98.108; or
(e) The transaction involves a contract entered into or claim
acquired by the trustee before the person became or contemplated
becoming trustee.
(3)(a) A sale, encumbrance, or other transaction involving the
investment or management of trust property is presumed to be "otherwise
affected" by a conflict between fiduciary and personal interests under
this section if it is entered into by the trustee with:
(i) The trustee's spouse or registered domestic partner;
(ii) The trustee's descendants, siblings, parents, or their spouses
or registered domestic partners;
(iii) An agent or attorney of the trustee; or
(iv) A corporation or other person or enterprise in which the
trustee, or a person that owns a significant interest in the trustee,
has an interest that might affect the trustee's best judgment.
(b) The presumption is rebutted if the trustee establishes that the
conflict did not adversely affect the interests of the beneficiaries.
(4) A sale, encumbrance, or other transaction involving the
investment or management of trust property entered into by the trustee
for the trustee's own personal account that is voidable under
subsection (2) of this section may be voided by a beneficiary without
further proof.
(5) An investment by a trustee in securities of an investment
company or investment trust to which the trustee, or its affiliate,
provides services in a capacity other than as trustee is not presumed
to be affected by a conflict between personal and fiduciary interests
if the investment complies with the prudent investor rule of chapter
11.100 RCW. In addition to its compensation for acting as trustee, the
trustee may be compensated by the investment company or investment
trust for providing those services out of fees charged to the trust.
If the trustee receives compensation from the investment company or
investment trust for providing investment advisory or investment
management services, the trustee must at least annually notify the
((persons entitled under RCW 11.106.020 to receive a copy of the
trustee's annual report of the rate and method by which that
compensation was determined)) permissible distributees of the rate and
method by which that compensation was determined. The obligation of
the trustee to provide the notice described in this section may be
waived or modified by the trustor in the trust document or in a
separate writing, made at any time, that is delivered to the trustee.
(6) The following transactions, if fair to the beneficiaries,
cannot be voided under this section:
(a) An agreement between a trustee and a beneficiary relating to
the appointment or compensation of the trustee;
(b) Payment of reasonable compensation to the trustee and any
affiliate providing services to the trust, provided total compensation
is reasonable;
(c) A transaction between a trust and another trust, decedent's
estate, or guardianship of which the trustee is a fiduciary or in which
a beneficiary has an interest;
(d) A deposit of trust money in a regulated financial-service
institution operated by the trustee or its affiliate;
(e) A delegation and any transaction made pursuant to the
delegation from a trustee to an agent that is affiliated or associated
with the trustee; or
(f) Any loan from the trustee or its affiliate.
(7) The court may appoint a special fiduciary to make a decision
with respect to any proposed transaction that might violate this
section if entered into by the trustee.
(8) If a trust has two or more beneficiaries, the trustee ((shall))
must act impartially in administering the trust and distributing the
trust property, giving due regard to the beneficiaries' respective
interests.

Sec. 24 RCW 11.103.030 and 2011 c 327 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless the terms of a trust expressly provide that the trust is
revocable, the trustor may not revoke or amend the trust.
(2) If a revocable trust is created or funded by more than one
trustor and unless the trust agreement provides otherwise:
(a) To the extent the trust consists of community property, the
trust may be revoked by either spouse or either domestic partner acting
alone but may be amended only by joint action of both spouses or both
domestic partners;
(b) To the extent the trust consists of property other than
community property, each trustor may revoke or amend the trust with
regard to the portion of the trust property attributable to that
trustor's contribution;
(c) The character of community property or separate property is
unaffected by its transfer to and from a revocable trust; and
(d) Upon the revocation or amendment of the trust by fewer than all
of the trustors, the trustee ((shall)) must promptly notify the other
trustors of the revocation or amendment.
(3) The trustor may revoke or amend a revocable trust:
(a) By substantial compliance with a method provided in the terms
of the trust; or
(b)(i) If the terms of the trust do not provide a method or the
method provided in the terms is not expressly made exclusive, by:
(A) A later will or codicil that expressly refers to the trust or
specifically devises property that would otherwise have passed
according to the terms of the trust; or
(B) A written instrument signed by the trustor evidencing intent to
revoke or amend.
(ii) The requirements of chapter 11.11 RCW do not apply to
revocation or amendment of a revocable trust under (b)(i) of this
subsection.
(4) Upon revocation of a revocable trust, the trustee ((shall))
must deliver the trust property as the trustor directs.
(5) A trustor's powers with respect to ((revocation, amendment, or
distribution of trust property may be exercised by an agent under a
power of attorney only to the extent expressly authorized by the terms
of the power)) the revocation or amendment of a trust or distribution
of the property of a trust, may be exercised by the trustor's agent
under a power of attorney only to the extent specified in the power of
attorney document, as provided in RCW 11.94.050(1) and to the extent
consistent with or expressly authorized by the trust agreement.
(6) A guardian of the trustor may exercise a trustor's powers with
respect to revocation, amendment, or distribution of trust property
only with the approval of the court supervising the guardianship
pursuant to RCW 11.92.140.
(7) A trustee who does not know that a trust has been revoked or
amended is not liable to the trustor or trustor's successors in
interest for distributions made and other actions taken on the
assumption that the trust had not been amended or revoked.
(8) This section does not limit or affect operation of RCW
11.96A.220 through 11.96A.240.

Sec. 25 RCW 11.106.010 and 1985 c 30 s 95 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to resulting trusts, constructive
trusts, business trusts where certificates of beneficial interest are
issued to the beneficiaries, investment trusts, voting trusts,
insurance trusts prior to the death of the insured, trusts in the
nature of mortgages or pledges((, trusts created by judgment or decree
of a federal court or of the superior court when not sitting in
probate)), liquidation trusts or trusts for the sole purpose of paying
dividends, interest or interest coupons, salaries, wages or pensions;
nor does this chapter apply to personal representatives.

Sec. 26 RCW 11.106.020 and 1985 c 30 s 96 are each amended to
read as follows:
The trustee or trustees appointed by any will, deed, or agreement
executed ((shall)) must mail or deliver at least annually to each
((adult income trust beneficiary)) permissible distributee, as defined
in section 8 of this act, a written itemized statement of all current
receipts and disbursements made by the trustee of the funds of the
trust both principal and income, and upon the request of any such
beneficiary ((shall)) must furnish the beneficiary an itemized
statement of all property then held by that trustee, and may also file
any such statement in the superior court of the county in which the
trustee or one of the trustees resides.

Sec. 27 RCW 11.118.050 and 2001 c 327 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The intended use of the principal or income can be enforced by a
person designated for that purpose in the trust instrument, by the
person having custody of an animal that is a beneficiary of the trust,
or by a person appointed by a court upon application to it by any
person. Such person is considered to be a permissible distributee, as
defined in section 8 of this act, of the trust. A person with an
interest in the welfare of the animal may petition for an order
appointing or removing a person designated or appointed to enforce the
trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 Except as otherwise provided in this act:
(1) This act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after
January 1, 2013;
(2) This act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts
commenced on or after January 1, 2013;
(3) An action taken before January 1, 2013, is not affected by this
act; and
(4) If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the
expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any
other statute before January 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply
to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

--- END ---