BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Decisions as to the hours of in-home care to be provided must be
based solely upon an objective assessment of medical need, as follows:
The department must provide eligible individuals with the hours of
in-home care designated as the "base hours" for their in-home group, as
set forth in WAC 388-106-0125, as it existed on December 1, 2010,
unless the individual is eligible for a modification in hours pursuant
to the objective standards set forth in WAC 388-106-0130 (2) through
(6), as those subsections existed on December 1, 2010. The department
may consider no other factors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.0273 (Exemptions -- Sales to
nonresidents of tangible personal property, digital goods, and digital
codes for use outside the state -- Proof of nonresident status--
Penalties) and 2011 c 7 s 1, 2010 c 106 s 215, 2009 c 535 s 512, 2007
c 135 s 2, 2003 c 53 s 399, 1993 c 444 s 1, 1988 c 96 s 1, 1982 1st
ex.s. c 5 s 1, & 1980 c 37 s 39 are each repealed.

--- END ---