BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.72 RCW
to read as follows:
Any state or local initiative for which sufficient valid voter
signatures are submitted within the time period required must be
submitted to a vote of the people at the next election date. The
people are guaranteed the right to vote on any initiative that obtains
the required number of valid voter signatures in the required time
frame. Government officials, both elected and unelected, must
facilitate and cannot obstruct the processing of any initiative
petition and must facilitate and cannot obstruct the public vote of any
initiative. For local initiatives, government officials must, in all
circumstances, strictly comply with the requirements of this section
for any initiative regardless of its subject matter. The term "local
legislative authority" must be construed to include the people via
local initiative regardless of the subject matter of the ballot
measure. Citizens have just as much right to decide issues with local
initiatives as governments do. This section may not be construed in
any way to impede the right to legal review of the sufficiency of valid
voter signatures or postelection legal review; however, under no
circumstances may an initiative be prohibited from submission to the
people for a vote if sufficient valid voter signatures are submitted.

--- END ---