BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that certain chemicals
and chemical mixtures in the environment have the potential to harm
public health and may contribute to major adverse health outcomes such
as asthma, diabetes, obesity, and learning and behavioral problems.
Additionally, evidence indicates that citizens of the state are exposed
to many chemicals and chemical mixtures in the environment for which
the impacts on public health and the environment are not clearly
understood.
The legislature also finds that the department of health is the
state agency that is directed to protect public health. It is
therefore the intent of the legislature that the department of health
assess existing and developing scientific information and provide
updates to the legislature so as to provide current information in
which to better understand the potential implications for public health
from exposure to chemicals and chemical mixtures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall:
(1) Research, analyze, and evaluate priority chemicals and chemical
mixtures, including new and emerging chemicals, that may prove to be of
concern to public health, that are released from household products,
furnishings, or building materials, or found in food, drinking water,
soil, or air;
(2) Provide information to the legislature about priority chemicals
or mixtures of chemicals, including new and emerging chemicals,
released from household products, furnishings, or building materials,
or found in food, drinking water, soil, or air of importance to
protecting public health that should be further evaluated, restricted,
or substituted with a safer alternative; and
(3) Determine public health priorities and strategies for
preventing and reducing related adverse health outcomes from exposure
to priority chemicals or mixtures of chemicals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning June 30, 2014, and every two years thereafter, the
department shall inform the legislature about current ongoing
department research, analysis, and evaluation of: Priority chemicals;
public health priorities and strategies for preventing adverse health
outcomes from exposure to these priority chemicals and chemical
mixtures; and recommendations for possible actions to reduce exposure
to priority chemicals and prevent and reduce related adverse human
health outcomes. The recommendations may include chemical
restrictions, product notifications, requirements for safer
alternatives, and revisions to the department's statutory authority
necessary to achieve better protection of public health. The
department shall provide updated findings and recommendations to the
appropriate legislative committees every two years thereafter, as
required under RCW 43.01.036.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium
ending June 30, 2015, from the state toxics control account to the
department of health for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---