BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.86.010 and 1996 c 179 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agency relationship" means the agency relationship created
under this chapter or by written agreement between a ((licensee)) real
estate firm and a buyer and/or seller relating to the performance of
real estate brokerage services ((by the licensee)).
(2) "Agent" means a ((licensee)) broker who has entered into an
agency relationship with a buyer or seller.
(3) "Broker" means broker, managing broker, and designated broker,
collectively, as defined in chapter 18.85 RCW, unless the context
requires the terms to be considered separately.
(4) "Business opportunity" means and includes a business, business
opportunity, and goodwill of an existing business, or any one or
combination thereof when the transaction or business includes an
interest in real property.
(((4))) (5) "Buyer" means an actual or prospective purchaser in a
real estate transaction, or an actual or prospective tenant in a real
estate rental or lease transaction, as applicable.
(((5))) (6) "Buyer's agent" means a ((licensee)) broker who has
entered into an agency relationship with only the buyer in a real
estate transaction, and includes subagents engaged by a buyer's agent.
(((6))) (7) "Confidential information" means information from or
concerning a principal of a ((licensee)) broker that:
(a) Was acquired by the ((licensee)) broker during the course of an
agency relationship with the principal;
(b) The principal reasonably expects to be kept confidential;
(c) The principal has not disclosed or authorized to be disclosed
to third parties;
(d) Would, if disclosed, operate to the detriment of the principal;
and
(e) The principal personally would not be obligated to disclose to
the other party.
(((7))) (8) "Dual agent" means a ((licensee)) broker who has
entered into an agency relationship with both the buyer and seller in
the same transaction.
(((8) "Licensee" means a real estate broker, associate real estate
broker, or real estate salesperson, as those terms are defined in
chapter 18.85 RCW.))
(9) "Material fact" means information that substantially adversely
affects the value of the property or a party's ability to perform its
obligations in a real estate transaction, or operates to materially
impair or defeat the purpose of the transaction. The fact or suspicion
that the property, or any neighboring property, is or was the site of
a murder, suicide or other death, rape or other sex crime, assault or
other violent crime, robbery or burglary, illegal drug activity,
gang-related activity, political or religious activity, or other act,
occurrence, or use not adversely affecting the physical condition of or
title to the property is not a material fact.
(10) "Principal" means a buyer or a seller who has entered into an
agency relationship with a ((licensee)) broker.
(11) "Real estate brokerage services" means the rendering of
services for which a real estate license is required under chapter
18.85 RCW.
(12) "Real estate firm" or "firm" have the same meaning as defined
in chapter 18.85 RCW.
(13) "Real estate transaction" or "transaction" means an actual or
prospective transaction involving a purchase, sale, option, or exchange
of any interest in real property or a business opportunity, or a lease
or rental of real property. For purposes of this chapter, a
prospective transaction does not exist until a written offer has been
signed by at least one of the parties.
(((13))) (14) "Seller" means an actual or prospective seller in a
real estate transaction, or an actual or prospective landlord in a real
estate rental or lease transaction, as applicable.
(((14))) (15) "Seller's agent" means a ((licensee)) broker who has
entered into an agency relationship with only the seller in a real
estate transaction, and includes subagents engaged by a seller's agent.
(((15))) (16) "Subagent" means a ((licensee)) broker who is engaged
to act on behalf of a principal by the principal's agent where the
principal has authorized the ((agent)) broker in writing to appoint
subagents.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.86.020 and 1997 c 217 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ((licensee)) broker who performs real estate brokerage
services for a buyer is a buyer's agent unless the:
(a) ((Licensee has entered into)) Broker's firm has appointed the
broker to represent the seller pursuant to a written agency agreement
((with)) between the firm and the seller, in which case the
((licensee)) broker is a seller's agent;
(b) ((Licensee)) Broker has entered into a subagency agreement with
the seller's agent's firm, in which case the ((licensee)) broker is a
seller's agent;
(c) ((Licensee has entered into)) Broker's firm has appointed the
broker to represent the seller pursuant to a written agency agreement
((with both parties)) between the firm and the seller, and the broker's
firm has appointed the broker to represent the buyer pursuant to a
written agency agreement between the firm and the buyer, in which case
the ((licensee)) broker is a dual agent;
(d) ((Licensee)) Broker is the seller or one of the sellers; or
(e) Parties agree otherwise in writing after the ((licensee))
broker has complied with RCW 18.86.030(1)(f).
(2) In a transaction in which different ((licensees)) brokers
affiliated with the same ((broker)) firm represent different parties,
the ((broker)) firm's designated broker and any managing broker
responsible for the supervision of both brokers, is a dual agent, and
must obtain the written consent of both parties as required under RCW
18.86.060. In such ((a)) case, each ((licensee)) of the brokers shall
solely represent the party with whom the ((licensee)) broker has an
agency relationship, unless all parties agree in writing that ((both
licensees are)) the broker is a dual agent((s)).
(3) A ((licensee)) broker may work with a party in separate
transactions pursuant to different relationships, including, but not
limited to, representing a party in one transaction and at the same
time not representing that party in a different transaction involving
that party, if the ((licensee)) broker complies with this chapter in
establishing the relationships for each transaction.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.86.030 and 1996 c 179 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Regardless of whether ((the licensee)) a broker is an agent,
((a licensee)) the broker owes to all parties to whom the ((licensee))
broker renders real estate brokerage services the following duties,
which may not be waived:
(a) To exercise reasonable skill and care;
(b) To deal honestly and in good faith;
(c) To present all written offers, written notices and other
written communications to and from either party in a timely manner,
regardless of whether the property is subject to an existing contract
for sale or the buyer is already a party to an existing contract to
purchase;
(d) To disclose all existing material facts known by the
((licensee)) broker and not apparent or readily ascertainable to a
party; provided that this subsection shall not be construed to imply
any duty to investigate matters that the ((licensee)) broker has not
agreed to investigate;
(e) To account in a timely manner for all money and property
received from or on behalf of either party;
(f) To provide a pamphlet on the law of real estate agency in the
form prescribed in RCW 18.86.120 to all parties to whom the
((licensee)) broker renders real estate brokerage services, before the
party signs an agency agreement with the ((licensee)) broker, signs an
offer in a real estate transaction handled by the ((licensee)) broker,
consents to dual agency, or waives any rights, under RCW
18.86.020(1)(e), 18.86.040(1)(e), 18.86.050(1)(e), or 18.86.060(2) (e)
or (f), whichever occurs earliest; and
(g) To disclose in writing to all parties to whom the ((licensee))
broker renders real estate brokerage services, before the party signs
an offer in a real estate transaction handled by the ((licensee))
broker, whether the ((licensee)) broker represents the buyer, the
seller, both parties, or neither party. The disclosure shall be set
forth in a separate paragraph entitled "Agency Disclosure" in the
agreement between the buyer and seller or in a separate writing
entitled "Agency Disclosure."
(2) Unless otherwise agreed, a ((licensee)) broker owes no duty to
conduct an independent inspection of the property or to conduct an
independent investigation of either party's financial condition, and
owes no duty to independently verify the accuracy or completeness of
any statement made by either party or by any source reasonably believed
by the ((licensee)) broker to be reliable.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.86.031 and 1996 c 179 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
A violation of RCW 18.86.030 is a violation of RCW ((18.85.230))
18.85.361.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.86.040 and 1997 c 217 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless additional duties are agreed to in writing signed by a
seller's agent, the duties of a seller's agent are limited to those set
forth in RCW 18.86.030 and the following, which may not be waived
except as expressly set forth in (e) of this subsection:
(a) To be loyal to the seller by taking no action that is adverse
or detrimental to the seller's interest in a transaction;
(b) To timely disclose to the seller any conflicts of interest;
(c) To advise the seller to seek expert advice on matters relating
to the transaction that are beyond the agent's expertise;
(d) Not to disclose any confidential information from or about the
seller, except under subpoena or court order, even after termination of
the agency relationship; and
(e) Unless otherwise agreed to in writing after the seller's agent
has complied with RCW 18.86.030(1)(f), to make a good faith and
continuous effort to find a buyer for the property; except that a
seller's agent is not obligated to seek additional offers to purchase
the property while the property is subject to an existing contract for
sale.
(2)(a) The showing of properties not owned by the seller to
prospective buyers or the listing of competing properties for sale by
a seller's agent does not in and of itself breach the duty of loyalty
to the seller or create a conflict of interest.
(b) The representation of more than one seller by different
((licensees)) brokers affiliated with the same ((broker)) firm in
competing transactions involving the same buyer does not in and of
itself breach the duty of loyalty to the sellers or create a conflict
of interest.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.86.050 and 1997 c 217 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless additional duties are agreed to in writing signed by a
buyer's agent, the duties of a buyer's agent are limited to those set
forth in RCW 18.86.030 and the following, which may not be waived
except as expressly set forth in (e) of this subsection:
(a) To be loyal to the buyer by taking no action that is adverse or
detrimental to the buyer's interest in a transaction;
(b) To timely disclose to the buyer any conflicts of interest;
(c) To advise the buyer to seek expert advice on matters relating
to the transaction that are beyond the agent's expertise;
(d) Not to disclose any confidential information from or about the
buyer, except under subpoena or court order, even after termination of
the agency relationship; and
(e) Unless otherwise agreed to in writing after the buyer's agent
has complied with RCW 18.86.030(1)(f), to make a good faith and
continuous effort to find a property for the buyer; except that a
buyer's agent is not obligated to: (i) Seek additional properties to
purchase while the buyer is a party to an existing contract to
purchase; or (ii) show properties as to which there is no written
agreement to pay compensation to the buyer's agent.
(2)(a) The showing of property in which a buyer is interested to
other prospective buyers by a buyer's agent does not in and of itself
breach the duty of loyalty to the buyer or create a conflict of
interest.
(b) The representation of more than one buyer by different
((licensees)) brokers affiliated with the same ((broker)) firm in
competing transactions involving the same property does not in and of
itself breach the duty of loyalty to the buyer((s)) or create a
conflict of interest.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.86.060 and 1997 c 217 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a
((licensee)) broker may act as a dual agent only with the written
consent of both parties to the transaction after the dual agent has
complied with RCW 18.86.030(1)(f), which consent must include a
statement of the terms of compensation.
(2) Unless additional duties are agreed to in writing signed by a
dual agent, the duties of a dual agent are limited to those set forth
in RCW 18.86.030 and the following, which may not be waived except as
expressly set forth in (e) and (f) of this subsection:
(a) To take no action that is adverse or detrimental to either
party's interest in a transaction;
(b) To timely disclose to both parties any conflicts of interest;
(c) To advise both parties to seek expert advice on matters
relating to the transaction that are beyond the dual agent's expertise;
(d) Not to disclose any confidential information from or about
either party, except under subpoena or court order, even after
termination of the agency relationship;
(e) Unless otherwise agreed to in writing after the dual agent has
complied with RCW 18.86.030(1)(f), to make a good faith and continuous
effort to find a buyer for the property; except that a dual agent is
not obligated to seek additional offers to purchase the property while
the property is subject to an existing contract for sale; and
(f) Unless otherwise agreed to in writing after the dual agent has
complied with RCW 18.86.030(1)(f), to make a good faith and continuous
effort to find a property for the buyer; except that a dual agent is
not obligated to: (i) Seek additional properties to purchase while the
buyer is a party to an existing contract to purchase; or (ii) show
properties as to which there is no written agreement to pay
compensation to the dual agent.
(3)(a) The showing of properties not owned by the seller to
prospective buyers or the listing of competing properties for sale by
a dual agent does not in and of itself constitute action that is
adverse or detrimental to the seller or create a conflict of interest.
(b) The representation of more than one seller by different
((licensees affiliated with)) brokers licensed to the same ((broker))
firm in competing transactions involving the same buyer does not in and
of itself constitute action that is adverse or detrimental to the
sellers or create a conflict of interest.
(4)(a) The showing of property in which a buyer is interested to
other prospective buyers or the presentation of additional offers to
purchase property while the property is subject to a transaction by a
dual agent does not in and of itself constitute action that is adverse
or detrimental to the buyer or create a conflict of interest.
(b) The representation of more than one buyer by different
((licensees affiliated with the)) brokers licensed to the same
((broker)) firm in competing transactions involving the same property
does not in and of itself constitute action that is adverse or
detrimental to the buyers or create a conflict of interest.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.86.070 and 1997 c 217 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The agency relationships set forth in this chapter commence at
the time that the ((licensee)) broker undertakes to provide real estate
brokerage services to a principal and continue until the earliest of
the following:
(a) Completion of performance by the ((licensee)) broker;
(b) Expiration of the term agreed upon by the parties;
(c) Termination of the relationship by mutual agreement of the
parties; or
(d) Termination of the relationship by notice from either party to
the other. However, such a termination does not affect the contractual
rights of either party.
(2) Except as otherwise agreed to in writing, a ((licensee)) broker
owes no further duty after termination of the agency relationship,
other than the duties of:
(a) Accounting for all moneys and property received during the
relationship; and
(b) Not disclosing confidential information.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.86.080 and 1997 c 217 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In any real estate transaction, ((the broker's)) a firm's
compensation may be paid by the seller, the buyer, a third party, or by
sharing the compensation between ((brokers)) firms.
(2) An agreement to pay or payment of compensation does not
establish an agency relationship between the party who paid the
compensation and the ((licensee)) broker.
(3) A seller may agree that a seller's agent's firm may share with
another ((broker)) firm the compensation paid by the seller.
(4) A buyer may agree that a buyer's agent's firm may share with
another ((broker)) firm the compensation paid by the buyer.
(5) A ((broker)) firm may be compensated by more than one party for
real estate brokerage services in a real estate transaction, if those
parties consent in writing at or before the time of signing an offer in
the transaction.
(6) A ((buyer's agent or dual agent)) firm may receive compensation
based on the purchase price without breaching any duty to the buyer or
seller.
(7) Nothing contained in this chapter negates the requirement that
an agreement authorizing or employing a ((licensee)) broker to sell or
purchase real estate for compensation or a commission be in writing and
signed by the seller or buyer.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.86.090 and 1996 c 179 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A principal is not liable for an act, error, or omission by an
agent or subagent of the principal arising out of an agency
relationship:
(a) Unless the principal participated in or authorized the act,
error, or omission; or
(b) Except to the extent that: (i) The principal benefited from
the act, error, or omission; and (ii) the court determines that it is
highly probable that the claimant would be unable to enforce a judgment
against the agent or subagent.
(2) A ((licensee)) broker is not liable for an act, error, or
omission of a subagent under this chapter, unless ((the licensee)) that
broker participated in or authorized the act, error or omission. This
subsection does not limit the liability of a ((real estate broker))
firm for an act, error, or omission by ((an associate real estate)) a
broker ((or real estate salesperson)) licensed to ((that broker)) the
firm.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.86.100 and 1996 c 179 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise agreed to in writing, a principal does not
have knowledge or notice of any facts known by an agent or subagent of
the principal that are not actually known by the principal.
(2) Unless otherwise agreed to in writing, a ((licensee)) broker
does not have knowledge or notice of any facts known by a subagent that
are not actually known by the ((licensee)) broker. This subsection
does not limit the knowledge imputed to ((a real estate)) the
designated broker or any managing broker responsible for the
supervision of the broker of any facts known by ((an associate real
estate broker or real estate salesperson licensed to such)) the broker.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.86.110 and 1996 c 179 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The duties under this chapter are statutory duties and not
fiduciary duties. This chapter supersedes ((only the duties of the
parties under the common law, including)) the fiduciary duties of an
agent to a principal((, to the extent inconsistent with this chapter))
under the common law. The common law continues to apply to the parties
in all other respects. This chapter does not affect the duties of a
((licensee)) broker while engaging in the authorized or unauthorized
practice of law as determined by the courts of this state. This
chapter shall be construed broadly.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.86.120 and 2012 c 185 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The pamphlet required under RCW 18.86.030(1)(f) shall consist
of the entire text of RCW 18.86.010 through 18.86.030 and 18.86.040
through 18.86.110 with a separate cover page. The pamphlet shall be 8
1/2 by 11 inches in size, the text shall be in print no smaller than
10-point type, the cover page shall be in print no smaller than 12-point type, and the title of the cover page "The Law of Real Estate
Agency" shall be in print no smaller than 18-point type. The cover
page shall be in the following form:

The Law of Real Estate Agency

This pamphlet describes your legal rights in dealing
with a real estate firm or broker ((or salesperson)).
Please read it carefully before signing any documents.

The following is only a brief summary of the attached law:

Sec. 1. Definitions. Defines the specific terms used in the
law.

Sec. 2. Relationships between ((Licensees)) Brokers and the
Public. ((States)) Prescribes that a ((licensee)) broker who
works with a buyer or tenant represents that buyer or tenant--unless the ((licensee)) broker is the listing agent, a seller's
subagent, a dual agent, the seller personally or the parties
agree otherwise. Also ((states)) prescribes that in a
transaction involving two different ((licensees affiliated with
the same broker, the broker is a dual agent and each licensee))
brokers licensed to the same real estate firm, the firm's
designated broker and any managing broker responsible for the
supervision of both brokers, are dual agents and each broker
solely represents his or her client -- unless the parties agree
in writing that both ((licensees)) brokers are dual agents.

Sec. 3. Duties of a ((Licensee)) Broker Generally. Prescribes
the duties that are owed by all ((licensees)) brokers,
regardless of who the ((licensee)) broker represents. Requires
disclosure of the ((licensee's)) broker's agency relationship
in a specific transaction.

Sec. 4. Duties of a Seller's Agent. Prescribes the additional
duties of a ((licensee)) broker representing the seller or
landlord only.

Sec. 5. Duties of a Buyer's Agent. Prescribes the additional
duties of a ((licensee)) broker representing the buyer or
tenant only.

Sec. 6. Duties of a Dual Agent. Prescribes the additional
duties of a ((licensee)) broker representing both parties in
the same transaction, and requires the written consent of both
parties to the ((licensee)) broker acting as a dual agent.

Sec. 7. Duration of Agency Relationship. Describes when an
agency relationship begins and ends. Provides that the duties
of accounting and confidentiality continue after the
termination of an agency relationship.

Sec. 8. Compensation. Allows ((brokers)) real estate firms to
share compensation with cooperating ((brokers)) real estate
firms. States that payment of compensation does not
necessarily establish an agency relationship. Allows brokers
to receive compensation from more than one party in a
transaction with the parties' consent.

Sec. 9. Vicarious Liability. Eliminates the ((common law))
liability of a party for the conduct of the party's agent or
subagent, unless the principal participated in or benefited
from the conduct or the agent or subagent is insolvent. Also
limits the liability of a broker for the conduct of a subagent
((associated with a different broker)).

Sec. 10. Imputed Knowledge and Notice. Eliminates the common
law rule that notice to or knowledge of an agent constitutes
notice to or knowledge of the principal.

Sec. 11. Interpretation. This law ((replaces the)) establishes
statutory duties which replace common law fiduciary duties owed
by an agent to a principal ((under the common law, to the
extent that it conflicts with the common law)).

Sec. 12. Short Sale. Prescribes an additional duty of a firm
representing the seller of owner-occupied real property in a
short sale.

(2)(a) The pamphlet required under RCW 18.86.030(1)(f) must also
include the following disclosure: When the seller of owner-occupied
residential real property enters into a listing agreement with a real
estate ((licensee)) firm where the proceeds from the sale may be
insufficient to cover the costs at closing, it is the responsibility of
the real estate ((licensee)) firm to disclose to the seller in writing
that the decision by any beneficiary or mortgagee, or its assignees, to
release its interest in the real property, for less than the amount the
borrower owes, does not automatically relieve the seller of the
obligation to pay any debt or costs remaining at closing, including
fees such as the real estate ((licensee's)) firm's commission.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "owner-occupied real
property" means real property consisting solely of a single-family
residence, a residential condominium unit, or a residential cooperative
unit that is the principal residence of the borrower.

--- END ---