BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.16.010 and 2012 c 198 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be maintained as special funds, separate and apart
from all public moneys or funds of this state an unemployment
compensation fund and an administrative contingency fund, which shall
be administered by the commissioner exclusively for the purposes of
this title, and to which RCW 43.01.050 shall not be applicable.
(2)(a) The unemployment compensation fund shall consist of:
(i) All contributions collected under RCW 50.24.010 and payments in
lieu of contributions collected pursuant to the provisions of this
title;
(ii) Any property or securities acquired through the use of moneys
belonging to the fund;
(iii) All earnings of such property or securities;
(iv) Any moneys received from the federal unemployment account in
the unemployment trust fund in accordance with Title XII of the social
security act, as amended;
(v) All money recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund;
(vi) All money credited to this state's account in the unemployment
trust fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as
amended;
(vii) All money received from the federal government as
reimbursement pursuant to section 204 of the federal-state extended
compensation act of 1970 (84 Stat. 708-712; 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3304);
((and))
(viii) The portion of the additional penalties as provided in RCW
50.20.070(2) that is fifteen percent of the amount of benefits overpaid
or deemed overpaid; and
(ix) All moneys received for the fund from any other source.
(b) All moneys in the unemployment compensation fund shall be
commingled and undivided.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
administrative contingency fund shall consist of:
(i) All interest on delinquent contributions collected pursuant to
this title;
(ii) All fines and penalties collected pursuant to the provisions
of this title, except the portion of the additional penalties as
provided in RCW 50.20.070(2) that is fifteen percent of the amount of
benefits overpaid or deemed overpaid;
(iii) All sums recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund; and
(iv) Revenue received under RCW 50.24.014.
(b) All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or
assessed by a district court because of the violation of this title or
rules adopted under this title shall be remitted as provided in chapter
3.62 RCW.
(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, moneys available
in the administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special
account created under RCW 50.24.014, shall be expended upon the
direction of the commissioner, with the approval of the governor,
whenever it appears to him or her that such expenditure is necessary
solely for:
(i) The proper administration of this title and that insufficient
federal funds are available for the specific purpose to which such
expenditure is to be made, provided, the moneys are not substituted for
appropriations from federal funds which, in the absence of such moneys,
would be made available.
(ii) The proper administration of this title for which purpose
appropriations from federal funds have been requested but not yet
received, provided, the administrative contingency fund will be
reimbursed upon receipt of the requested federal appropriation.
(iii) The proper administration of this title for which compliance
and audit issues have been identified that establish federal claims
requiring the expenditure of state resources in resolution. Claims
must be resolved in the following priority: First priority is to
provide services to eligible participants within the state; second
priority is to provide substitute services or program support; and last
priority is the direct payment of funds to the federal government.
(d)(i) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys available in
the administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special
account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be expended as
appropriated by the legislature for: (A) The cost of the job skills or
worker retraining programs at the community and technical colleges and
administrative costs at the state board for community and technical
colleges; and (B) reemployment services such as business and project
development assistance, local economic development capacity building,
and local economic development financial assistance at the department
of commerce. The remaining appropriation may be expended as specified
in (c) of this subsection.
(ii) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, moneys available in the
administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special
account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be expended by the
department of social and health services as appropriated by the
legislature for employment and training services and programs in the
WorkFirst program, and for the administrative costs of state agencies
participating in the WorkFirst program. The remaining appropriation
may be expended as specified in (c) of this subsection.
(4) Money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a)
may only be expended, after appropriation, for the purposes specified
in this section and RCW 50.62.010, 50.62.020, 50.62.030, 50.24.014,
50.44.053, and 50.22.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.20.070 and 2007 c 146 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) With respect to determinations delivered or mailed before
January 1, 2008, an individual is disqualified for benefits for any
week he or she has knowingly made a false statement or representation
involving a material fact or knowingly failed to report a material fact
and, as a result, has obtained or attempted to obtain any benefits
under the provisions of this title, and for an additional twenty-six
weeks beginning with the first week for which he or she completes an
otherwise compensable claim for waiting period credit or benefits
following the date of the delivery or mailing of the determination of
disqualification under this section. However, such disqualification
shall not be applied after two years have elapsed from the date of the
delivery or mailing of the determination of disqualification under this
section.
(2) With respect to determinations delivered or mailed on or after
January 1, 2008:
(a) An individual is disqualified for benefits for any week he or
she has knowingly made a false statement or representation involving a
material fact or knowingly failed to report a material fact and, as a
result, has obtained or attempted to obtain any benefits under the
provisions of this title;
(b) An individual disqualified for benefits under this subsection
for the first time is also:
(i) Disqualified for an additional twenty-six weeks beginning with
the Sunday of the week in which the determination is mailed or
delivered; and
(ii) With respect to determinations delivered or mailed on or after
October 20, 2013, subject to an additional penalty of fifteen percent
of the amount of benefits overpaid or deemed overpaid;
(c) An individual disqualified for benefits under this subsection
for the second time is also disqualified for an additional fifty-two
weeks beginning with the Sunday of the week in which the determination
is mailed or delivered, and is subject to an additional penalty of
twenty-five percent of the amount of benefits overpaid or deemed
overpaid;
(d) An individual disqualified for benefits under this subsection
a third time and any time thereafter is also disqualified for an
additional one hundred four weeks beginning with the Sunday of the week
in which the determination is mailed or delivered, and is subject to an
additional penalty of fifty percent of the amount of benefits overpaid
or deemed overpaid.
(3) All penalties collected under this section must be expended for
the proper administration of this title as authorized under RCW
50.16.010 and for no other purposes.
(4) All overpayments and penalties established by such
determination of disqualification must be collected as otherwise
provided by this title.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.29.021 and 2011 c 4 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies to benefits charged to the experience
rating accounts of employers for claims that have an effective date on
or after January 4, 2004.
(2)(a) An experience rating account shall be established and
maintained for each employer, except employers as described in RCW
50.44.010, 50.44.030, and 50.50.030 who have properly elected to make
payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers
as described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to
make payments in lieu of contributions, based on existing records of
the employment security department.
(b) Benefits paid to an eligible individual shall be charged to the
experience rating accounts of each of such individual's employers
during the individual's base year in the same ratio that the wages paid
by each employer to the individual during the base year bear to the
wages paid by all employers to that individual during that base year,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c) When the eligible individual's separating employer is a covered
contribution paying base year employer, benefits paid to the eligible
individual shall be charged to the experience rating account of only
the individual's separating employer if the individual qualifies for
benefits under:
(i) RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b)(i) or (2)(b)(i), as applicable, and became
unemployed after having worked and earned wages in the bona fide work;
or
(ii) RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b) (v) through (x) or (2)(b) (v) through
(x).
(3) The legislature finds that certain benefit payments, in whole
or in part, should not be charged to the experience rating accounts of
employers except those employers described in RCW 50.44.010, 50.44.030,
and 50.50.030 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of
contributions, taxable local government employers described in RCW
50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make payments in
lieu of contributions, as follows:
(a) Benefits paid to any individual later determined to be
ineligible shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer((. However, when a benefit claim becomes
invalid due to an amendment or adjustment of a report where the
employer failed to report or inaccurately reported hours worked or
remuneration paid, or both, all benefits paid will be charged to the
experience rating account of the contribution paying employer or
employers that originally filed the incomplete or inaccurate report or
reports. An employer who reimburses the trust fund for benefits paid
to workers and who fails to report or inaccurately reported hours
worked or remuneration paid, or both, shall reimburse the trust fund
for all benefits paid that are based on the originally filed incomplete
or inaccurate report or reports)), except as provided in subsection (5)
of this section.
(b) Benefits paid to an individual filing under the provisions of
chapter 50.06 RCW shall not be charged to the experience rating account
of any contribution paying employer only if:
(i) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(1) after receiving
crime victims' compensation for a disability resulting from a nonwork-related occurrence; or
(ii) The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(2).
(c) Benefits paid which represent the state's share of benefits
payable as extended benefits defined under RCW 50.22.010(6) shall not
be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying
employer.
(d) In the case of individuals who requalify for benefits under RCW
50.20.050 or 50.20.060, benefits based on wage credits earned prior to
the disqualifying separation shall not be charged to the experience
rating account of the contribution paying employer from whom that
separation took place.
(e) Benefits paid to an individual who qualifies for benefits under
RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b) (iv) or (xi) or (2)(b) (iv) or (xi), as
applicable, shall not be charged to the experience rating account of
any contribution paying employer.
(f) With respect to claims with an effective date on or after the
first Sunday following April 22, 2005, benefits paid that exceed the
benefits that would have been paid if the weekly benefit amount for the
claim had been determined as one percent of the total wages paid in the
individual's base year shall not be charged to the experience rating
account of any contribution paying employer. This subsection (3)(f)
does not apply to the calculation of contribution rates under RCW
50.29.025 for rate year 2010 and thereafter.
(g) The forty-five dollar increase paid as part of an individual's
weekly benefit amount as provided in RCW 50.20.1201 and the twenty-five
dollar increase paid as part of an individual's weekly benefit amount
as provided in RCW 50.20.1202 shall not be charged to the experience
rating account of any contribution paying employer.
(h) With respect to claims where the minimum amount payable weekly
is increased to one hundred fifty-five dollars pursuant to RCW
50.20.1201(3), benefits paid that exceed the benefits that would have
been paid if the minimum amount payable weekly had been calculated
pursuant to RCW 50.20.120 shall not be charged to the experience rating
account of any contribution paying employer.
(i) Upon approval of an individual's training benefits plan
submitted in accordance with RCW 50.22.155(2), an individual is
considered enrolled in training, and regular benefits beginning with
the week of approval shall not be charged to the experience rating
account of any contribution paying employer.
(j) Training benefits paid to an individual under RCW 50.22.155
shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer.
(4)(a) A contribution paying base year employer, except employers
as provided in subsection (6) of this section, not otherwise eligible
for relief of charges for benefits under this section, may receive such
relief if the benefit charges result from payment to an individual who:
(i) Last left the employ of such employer voluntarily for reasons
not attributable to the employer;
(ii) Was discharged for misconduct or gross misconduct connected
with his or her work not a result of inability to meet the minimum job
requirements;
(iii) Is unemployed as a result of closure or severe curtailment of
operation at the employer's plant, building, worksite, or other
facility. This closure must be for reasons directly attributable to a
catastrophic occurrence such as fire, flood, or other natural disaster;
(iv) Continues to be employed on a regularly scheduled permanent
part-time basis by a base year employer and who at some time during the
base year was concurrently employed and subsequently separated from at
least one other base year employer. Benefit charge relief ceases when
the employment relationship between the employer requesting relief and
the claimant is terminated. This subsection does not apply to shared
work employers under chapter ((50.06 [50.60])) 50.60 RCW; or
(v) Was hired to replace an employee who is a member of the
military reserves or National Guard and was called to federal active
military service by the president of the United States and is
subsequently laid off when that employee is reemployed by their
employer upon release from active duty within the time provided for
reemployment in RCW 73.16.035.
(b) The employer requesting relief of charges under this subsection
must request relief in writing within thirty days following mailing to
the last known address of the notification of the valid initial
determination of such claim, stating the date and reason for the
separation or the circumstances of continued employment. The
commissioner, upon investigation of the request, shall determine
whether relief should be granted.
(5) When a benefit claim becomes invalid due to an amendment or
adjustment of a report where the employer failed to report or
inaccurately reported hours worked or remuneration paid, or both, all
benefits paid will be charged to the experience rating account of the
contribution paying employer or employers that originally filed the
incomplete or inaccurate report or reports. An employer who reimburses
the trust fund for benefits paid to workers and who fails to report or
inaccurately reported hours worked or remuneration paid, or both, shall
reimburse the trust fund for all benefits paid that are based on the
originally filed incomplete or inaccurate report or reports.
(6) An employer's experience rating account may not be relieved of
charges for a benefit payment and an employer who reimburses the trust
fund for benefit payments may not be credited for a benefit payment if
a benefit payment was made because the employer or employer's agent
failed to respond timely or adequately to a written request of the
department for information relating to the claim or claims without
establishing good cause for the failure and the employer or employer's
agent has a pattern of such failures. The commissioner has the
authority to determine whether the employer has good cause under this
subsection.
(a) For the purposes of this subsection, "adequately" means
providing accurate information of sufficient quantity and quality that
would allow a reasonable person to determine eligibility for benefits.
(b)(i) For the purposes of this subsection, "pattern" means a
benefit payment was made because the employer or employer's agent
failed to respond timely or adequately to a written request of the
department for information relating to a claim or claims without
establishing good cause for the failure, if the greater of the
following calculations for an employer is met:
(A) At least three times in the previous two years; or
(B) Twenty percent of the total current claims against the
employer.
(ii) If an employer's agent is utilized, a pattern is established
based on each individual client employer that the employer's agent
represents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect October 20, 2013.

--- END ---