BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.93.020 and 1998 c 257 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of this chapter is to accomplish litter control,
increase waste reduction, and stimulate all components of recycling and
composting throughout this state by delegating to the department of
ecology the authority to:
(((1))) (a) Conduct a permanent and continuous program to control
and remove litter from this state to the maximum practical extent
possible;
(((2))) (b) Recover and recycle waste materials related to litter
and littering;
(((3))) (c) Foster public and private recycling of recyclable
materials and composting of compostable materials;
(((4))) (d) Increase public awareness of the need for waste
reduction, recycling, ((and)) litter control, and composting; ((and
(5))) (e) Coordinate the litter collection efforts ((and
expenditure of funds for litter collection)) by other agencies
identified in this chapter; and
(f) Coordinate and expend funds collected under chapter 82.19 RCW
with priority given to products identified under RCW 82.19.020 and
solely for the purposes of waste reduction, recycling, composting, and
litter collection and control programs.
(2) It is further the intent and purpose of this chapter to: (a)
Create jobs for employment of youth in litter cleanup and related
activities ((and to)); (b) stimulate and encourage ((small, private))
recycling ((centers)); and (c) encourage proper and appropriate
composting. This program shall include the compatible goal of recovery
of recyclable materials to conserve energy and natural resources
wherever practicable. Every other department of state government and
all local governmental units and agencies of this state shall cooperate
with the department of ecology in the administration and enforcement of
this chapter. The intent of this chapter is to add to and to
coordinate existing recycling and litter control and removal efforts
and not terminate or supplant such efforts.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.93.180 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 963 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created an account within the state treasury to
be known as the (("))waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account((")). Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the waste reduction, recycling, and
litter control account shall be used as follows:
(a) Fifty percent to the department of ecology, for use by the
departments of ecology, natural resources, revenue, transportation, and
corrections, and the parks and recreation commission, for use in litter
collection programs, to be distributed under RCW 70.93.220. The amount
to the department of ecology shall also be used for a central
coordination function for litter control efforts statewide((,)); for
the ((biennial)) litter survey under RCW 70.93.200(8)((, and)); for
statewide public awareness programs under RCW 70.93.200(7); to support
employment of youth in litter clean up as intended in RCW 70.93.020;
and for litter pick up using other authorized agencies. The amount to
the department shall also be used to defray the costs of administering
the funding, coordination, and oversight of local government programs
for waste reduction, litter control, ((and)) recycling, and composting,
so that local governments can apply one hundred percent of their
funding to achieving program goals. The amount to the department of
revenue shall be used to enforce compliance with the litter tax imposed
in chapter 82.19 RCW;
(b) Twenty percent to the department: (i) For local government
funding programs for waste reduction, litter control, ((and)) recycling
activities, and composting activities by cities and counties under RCW
70.93.250, to be administered by the department of ecology; and (ii) to
create a competitive grant program to provide funding to qualified
local governments and nonprofit organizations for local or statewide
education programs designed to help the public with litter control,
waste reduction, recycling, and composting of primarily the products
taxed under chapter 82.19 RCW. Grants must adhere to the following
requirements: (A) No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars; (B)
grant recipients shall match the grant funding allocated by the
department by an amount equal to twenty-five percent of eligible
expenses. A local government's share of these costs may be met by cash
or contributed services; (C) the obligation of the department to make
grant payments is contingent upon the availability of the amount of
money appropriated for this subsection (1)(b); (D) grants are managed
under the guidelines for existing grant programs; and (E) unspent funds
from (a) and (c) of this subsection may be applied to the competitive
grant program; and
(c) Thirty percent to the department of ecology ((for waste
reduction and recycling efforts)) to: (i) Implement activities under
RCW 70.93.200 for waste reduction, recycling, and composting efforts,
except for the litter survey under RCW 70.93.200(8) and the public
awareness programs under RCW 70.93.200(7); (ii) provide technical
assistance to local governments for commercial business and residential
recycling and composting programs primarily for the products taxed
under chapter 82.19 RCW designed to educate the public about waste
reduction, litter control, and recyclable and compostable products and
programs; and (iii) increase access to waste reduction, composting, and
recycling programs, particularly for food packaging and plastic bags
and appropriate composting techniques.
(2) All taxes imposed in RCW 82.19.010 and fines and bail
forfeitures collected or received pursuant to this chapter shall be
deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account
and used for the programs under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Not less than five percent and no more than ten percent of the
amount appropriated into the waste reduction, recycling, and litter
control account every biennium shall be reserved for capital needs,
including the purchase of vehicles for transporting crews and for
collecting litter and solid waste. Capital funds shall be distributed
among state agencies and local governments according to the same
criteria provided in RCW 70.93.220 for the remainder of the funds, so
that the most effective waste reduction, litter control, ((and))
recycling, and composting programs receive the most funding. The
intent of this subsection is to provide funds for the purchase of
equipment that will enable the department to account for the greatest
return on investment in terms of reaching a zero litter goal.
(4) ((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the account. Additionally, during the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section is suspended.
(5) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the account. Additionally, during the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section is
suspended.)) Funds from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter
control account, collected under chapter 82.19 RCW, must be prioritized
for the products identified under RCW 82.19.020 solely for the purposes
of recycling, composting, and litter collection, reduction, and control
programs.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.93.200 and 1998 c 257 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
((In addition to the foregoing,)) The department of ecology shall
use the moneys from RCW 70.93.180 of the waste reduction, recycling,
and litter control account to:
(1) Serve as the coordinating agency between the various industry
organizations seeking to aid in the waste reduction, anti-litter,
((and)) recycling, and composting efforts;
(2) Serve as the coordinating and administrating agency for all
state agencies and local governments receiving funds for waste
reduction, litter control, ((and)) recycling, and composting under this
chapter;
(3) Recommend to the governing bodies of all local governments that
they adopt ordinances similar to the provisions of this chapter;
(4) Cooperate with all local governments to accomplish coordination
of local waste reduction, anti-litter, ((and)) recycling, and
composting efforts;
(5) Encourage, organize, and coordinate all voluntary local waste
reduction, anti-litter, and recycling campaigns seeking to focus the
attention of the public on the programs of this state to reduce waste,
control and remove litter, and foster recycling and composting;
(6) Investigate the availability of, and apply for funds available
from any private or public source to be used in the program outlined in
this chapter;
(7) Develop statewide programs by working with local governments,
payers of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control tax, and
industry organizations that are active in waste reduction, anti-litter,
((and)) recycling, and composting efforts to:
(a) Increase public awareness of and participation in recycling and
composting; and ((to))
(b) Stimulate and encourage local private recycling and composting
centers, public participation in recycling and composting, and research
and development in the field of litter control, and recycling, removal,
and disposal of litter-related recycling materials, and composting;
(8) Conduct a ((biennial)) statewide litter survey every five years
targeted at litter composition, sources, demographics, and geographic
trends; and
(9) Upon request of the legislature, provide a ((biennial)) summary
of all waste reduction, litter control, ((and)) recycling, and
composting efforts statewide including those of the department of
ecology, and other state agencies and local governments funded for such
programs under this chapter. ((This report is due to the legislature
in March of even-numbered years.))

--- END ---