BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds as follows:
(a) Over fifteen thousand individuals have been determined by the
department of social and health services' division of developmental
disabilities to be eligible for services but are currently not
receiving paid services or supports;
(b) There is not a significant difference between the division of
developmental disabilities case loads of those who receive and those
who do not receive services; and
(c) Most people with developmental disabilities live with their
parents, even into adulthood, and supporting and providing care by
parents can be a stressful activity especially as the parents
themselves age.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends that fairness and equity be
applied in cases between those who receive no paid services from the
division of developmental disabilities and those who do receive
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Within funds provided by the legislature for this purpose, the
department must expand the informing families building trust
communication project to provide information to individuals and
families on the no paid services case load about the developmental
disabilities system. The information should assist families in
planning as their children reach points of transitions. The department
must assist the developmental disabilities council to reach clients on
the no paid services case load and to assure that funds provided for
this purpose will be matched with medicaid funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Within funds provided by the legislature for this purpose, the
department must hire the number of case managers necessary to conduct
assessments to determine the level of needs of those who ask for
services and those who may appear eligible for medicaid personal care.

Sec. 4 RCW 71A.12.161 and 2009 c 312 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The individual and family services program for individuals
eligible to receive services under this title is established. This
program replaces family support opportunities, traditional family
support, and the flexible family support pilot program. The department
shall transfer funding associated with these existing family support
programs to the individual and family services program and shall
operate the program within available funding. The services provided
under the individual and family services program shall be funded by
state funding without benefit of federal match.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.
The rules shall provide:
(a) That eligibility to receive services in the individual and
family services program be determined solely by an assessment of
individual need;
(b) For service priority levels to be developed that specify a
maximum amount of dollars for each person per level per year;
(c) That the dollar caps for each service priority level be
adjusted by the vendor rate increases authorized by the legislature;
and
(d) That the following services be available under the program:
(i) Respite care;
(ii) Therapies;
(iii) Architectural and vehicular modifications;
(iv) Equipment and supplies;
(v) Specialized nutrition and clothing;
(vi) Excess medical costs not covered by another source;
(vii) Copays for medical and therapeutic services;
(viii) Transportation;
(ix) Training;
(x) Counseling;
(xi) Behavior management;
(xii) Parent/sibling education;
(xiii) Recreational opportunities; and
(xiv) Community services grants.
(3) In addition to services provided for the service priority
levels under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the department
shall provide for:
(a) One-time exceptional needs and emergency needs for individuals
and families not receiving individual and family services annual grants
to assist individuals and families who experience a short-term crisis;
and
(b) Respite services based on the department's assessment for:
(i) A parent who provides personal care in the home to his or her
adult son or daughter with developmental disabilities; or
(ii) A family member who replaces the parent as the primary
caregiver, resides with, and provides personal care in the home for the
adult with developmental disabilities.
(4)(a) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2014, and within funds
provided by the legislature for this purpose, the department must
provide respite care for four thousand individuals on the no paid
services case load.
(b) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2015, and within funds
provided by the legislature for this purpose, the department must
provide respite care for four thousand individuals on the no paid
services case load.
(c) Respite care provided under this subsection must be based on
need and caregiver stress. Funding for respite care may not exceed
four thousand dollars per individual per year. Funding is to be
provided in a flexible manner, but persons receiving respite care must
account for the use of the funds to their case manager the year
following the allocation. Allocation must be determined on a year-by-year basis.
(5) If a person has more complex needs, a family is experiencing a
more prolonged crisis, or it is determined a person needs additional
services, the department shall assess the individual to determine if
placement in a waiver program would be appropriate.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.88C.010 and 2012 c 217 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The caseload forecast council is hereby created. The council
shall consist of two individuals appointed by the governor and four
individuals, one of whom is appointed by the chairperson of each of the
two largest political caucuses in the senate and house of
representatives. The chair of the council shall be selected from among
the four caucus appointees. The council may select such other officers
as the members deem necessary.
(2) The council shall employ a caseload forecast supervisor to
supervise the preparation of all caseload forecasts. As used in this
chapter, "supervisor" means the caseload forecast supervisor.
(3) Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the
council is required for any decisions regarding employment of the
supervisor. Employment of the supervisor shall terminate after each
term of three years. At the end of the first year of each three-year
term the council shall consider extension of the supervisor's term by
one year. The council may fix the compensation of the supervisor. The
supervisor shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of
this section.
(4) The caseload forecast council shall oversee the preparation of
and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four members, the
official state caseload forecasts prepared under RCW 43.88C.020. If
the council is unable to approve a forecast before a date required in
RCW 43.88C.020, the supervisor shall submit the forecast without
approval and the forecast shall have the same effect as if approved by
the council.
(5) A councilmember who does not cast an affirmative vote for
approval of the official caseload forecast may request, and the
supervisor shall provide, an alternative forecast based on assumptions
specified by the member.
(6) Members of the caseload forecast council shall serve without
additional compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council
or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative
members of the council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means:
(a) The number of persons expected to meet entitlement requirements
and require the services of public assistance programs, state
correctional institutions, state correctional noninstitutional
supervision, state institutions for juvenile offenders, the common
school system, long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, and
adoption support;
(b) The number of students who are eligible for the Washington
college bound scholarship program and are expected to attend an
institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030.
(8) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the temporary
assistance for needy families and the working connections child care
programs as a courtesy.
(9) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the no paid
services case load portion of the department of social and health
services' division of developmental disabilities to assist the
legislature in developing respite needs and budget requirements for the
population of persons with developmental disabilities.
(10) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
provided in RCW 43.88.020 apply to this chapter.

--- END ---