BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.44.030 and 2012 c 55 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner,
law enforcement officer, professional school personnel, registered or
licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist,
employee of the department of early learning, licensed or certified
child care providers or their employees, employee of the department,
juvenile probation officer, placement and liaison specialist,
responsible living skills program staff, HOPE center staff, or state
family and children's ombudsman or any volunteer in the ombudsman's
office has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse
or neglect, he or she shall report such incident, or cause a report to
be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as
provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(b) When any person, in his or her official supervisory capacity
with a nonprofit or for-profit organization, has reasonable cause to
believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect caused by a person
over whom he or she regularly exercises supervisory authority, he or
she shall report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the
proper law enforcement agency, provided that the person alleged to have
caused the abuse or neglect is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the organization and coaches, trains, educates, or
counsels a child or children or regularly has unsupervised access to a
child or children as part of the employment, contract, or voluntary
service. No one shall be required to report under this section when he
or she obtains the information solely as a result of a privileged
communication as provided in RCW 5.60.060.
Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) shall limit a person's duty to
report under (a) of this subsection.
For the purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Official supervisory capacity" means a position, status, or
role created, recognized, or designated by any nonprofit or for-profit
organization, either for financial gain or without financial gain,
whose scope includes, but is not limited to, overseeing, directing, or
managing another person who is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the nonprofit or for-profit organization.
(ii) "Organization" includes a sole proprietor, partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, trust, association, financial
institution, governmental entity, other than the federal government,
and any other individual or group engaged in a trade, occupation,
enterprise, governmental function, charitable function, or similar
activity in this state whether or not the entity is operated as a
nonprofit or for-profit entity.
(iii) "Reasonable cause" means a person witnesses or receives a
credible written or oral report alleging abuse, including sexual
contact, or neglect of a child by another over whom the person
regularly exercises supervisory authority.
(iv) "Regularly exercises supervisory authority" means to act in
his or her official supervisory capacity on an ongoing or continuing
basis with regards to a particular person.
(v) "Sexual contact" has the same meaning as in RCW 9A.44.010.
(c) The reporting requirement also applies to department of
corrections personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe
offenders or the children with whom the offenders are in contact. If,
as a result of observations or information received in the course of
his or her employment, any department of corrections personnel has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect,
he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.
(d) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has
reasonable cause to believe that a child who resides with them, has
suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of making a report. For
the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the
following: Any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of
sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause death; any
single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than
one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep
bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or
unconsciousness.
(e) The reporting requirement also applies to guardians ad litem,
including court-appointed special advocates, appointed under Titles 11,
13, and 26 RCW, who in the course of their representation of children
in these actions have reasonable cause to believe a child has been
abused or neglected.
(f) The reporting requirement in (a) of this subsection also
applies to administrative and academic or athletic department
employees, including student employees, of institutions of higher
education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and of private institutions of
higher education.
(g) The report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no
case longer than forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to
believe that the child has suffered abuse or neglect. The report must
include the identity of the accused if known.
(2) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred
during childhood if it is discovered after the child has become an
adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe other children
are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the accused, the reporting
requirement of subsection (1) of this section does apply.
(3) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to the
proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and health
services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(4) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(5) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means, or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing as provided
in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for
appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation
reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement
agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and the
law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases,
where the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency
shall notify the department within twenty-four hours. In all other
cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within
seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law enforcement
agency.
(6) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under
subsection (5) of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the
victim requests, and the local office of the department, of the
decision to charge or decline to charge a crime, within five days of
making the decision.
(7) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(8) Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical
opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and
that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if returned home,
the department shall file a dependency petition unless a second
licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such expert
medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a
second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(9) Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7)
of this section shall not further disseminate or release the
information except as authorized by state or federal statute.
Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(10) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the name, address,
and telephone number of each person making a report of abuse or neglect
under this section. The department shall provide assurances of
appropriate confidentiality of the identification of persons reporting
under this section. If the department is unable to learn the
information required under this subsection, the department shall only
investigate cases in which:
(a) The department believes there is a serious threat of
substantial harm to the child;
(b) The report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that
has, or is about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or
(c) The department has a prior founded report of abuse or neglect
with regard to a member of the household that is within three years of
receipt of the referral.
(11)(a) For reports of alleged abuse or neglect that are accepted
for investigation by the department, the investigation shall be
conducted within time frames established by the department in rule. In
no case shall the investigation extend longer than ninety days from the
date the report is received, unless the investigation is being
conducted under a written protocol pursuant to RCW 26.44.180 and a law
enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney has determined that a longer
investigation period is necessary. At the completion of the
investigation, the department shall make a finding that the report of
child abuse or neglect is founded or unfounded.
(b) If a court in a civil or criminal proceeding, considering the
same facts or circumstances as are contained in the report being
investigated by the department, makes a judicial finding by a
preponderance of the evidence or higher that the subject of the pending
investigation has abused or neglected the child, the department shall
adopt the finding in its investigation.
(12) In conducting an investigation of alleged abuse or neglect,
the department or law enforcement agency:
(a) May interview children. The interviews may be conducted on
school premises, at day-care facilities, at the child's home, or at
other suitable locations outside of the presence of parents. Parental
notification of the interview must occur at the earliest possible point
in the investigation that will not jeopardize the safety or protection
of the child or the course of the investigation. Prior to commencing
the interview the department or law enforcement agency shall determine
whether the child wishes a third party to be present for the interview
and, if so, shall make reasonable efforts to accommodate the child's
wishes. Unless the child objects, the department or law enforcement
agency shall make reasonable efforts to include a third party in any
interview so long as the presence of the third party will not
jeopardize the course of the investigation; and
(b) Shall have access to all relevant records of the child in the
possession of mandated reporters and their employees.
(13) If a report of alleged abuse or neglect is founded and
constitutes the third founded report received by the department within
the last twelve months involving the same child or family, the
department shall promptly notify the office of the family and
children's ombudsman of the contents of the report. The department
shall also notify the ombudsman of the disposition of the report.
(14) In investigating and responding to allegations of child abuse
and neglect, the department may conduct background checks as authorized
by state and federal law.
(15) The department shall maintain investigation records and
conduct timely and periodic reviews of all founded cases of abuse and
neglect. The department shall maintain a log of screened-out
nonabusive cases.
(16) The department shall use a risk assessment process when
investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor. The department shall, within funds appropriated for this
purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to persons who are
determined not to require further state intervention.
(17) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect the law
enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making the
report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.
(18) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect involving
a child under the court's jurisdiction under chapter 13.34 RCW, the
department shall promptly notify the child's guardian ad litem of the
report's contents. The department shall also notify the guardian ad
litem of the disposition of the report. For purposes of this
subsection, "guardian ad litem" has the meaning provided in RCW
13.34.030.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.44.030 and 2012 c 259 s 3 and 2012 c 55 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner,
law enforcement officer, professional school personnel, registered or
licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist,
employee of the department of early learning, licensed or certified
child care providers or their employees, employee of the department,
juvenile probation officer, placement and liaison specialist,
responsible living skills program staff, HOPE center staff, or state
family and children's ombudsman or any volunteer in the ombudsman's
office has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse
or neglect, he or she shall report such incident, or cause a report to
be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as
provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(b) When any person, in his or her official supervisory capacity
with a nonprofit or for-profit organization, has reasonable cause to
believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect caused by a person
over whom he or she regularly exercises supervisory authority, he or
she shall report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the
proper law enforcement agency, provided that the person alleged to have
caused the abuse or neglect is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the organization and coaches, trains, educates, or
counsels a child or children or regularly has unsupervised access to a
child or children as part of the employment, contract, or voluntary
service. No one shall be required to report under this section when he
or she obtains the information solely as a result of a privileged
communication as provided in RCW 5.60.060.
Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) shall limit a person's duty to
report under (a) of this subsection.
For the purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Official supervisory capacity" means a position, status, or
role created, recognized, or designated by any nonprofit or for-profit
organization, either for financial gain or without financial gain,
whose scope includes, but is not limited to, overseeing, directing, or
managing another person who is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the nonprofit or for-profit organization.
(ii) "Organization" includes a sole proprietor, partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, trust, association, financial
institution, governmental entity, other than the federal government,
and any other individual or group engaged in a trade, occupation,
enterprise, governmental function, charitable function, or similar
activity in this state whether or not the entity is operated as a
nonprofit or for-profit entity.
(iii) "Reasonable cause" means a person witnesses or receives a
credible written or oral report alleging abuse, including sexual
contact, or neglect of a child by another over whom the person
regularly exercises supervisory authority.
(iv) "Regularly exercises supervisory authority" means to act in
his or her official supervisory capacity on an ongoing or continuing
basis with regards to a particular person.
(v) "Sexual contact" has the same meaning as in RCW 9A.44.010.
(c) The reporting requirement also applies to department of
corrections personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe
offenders or the children with whom the offenders are in contact. If,
as a result of observations or information received in the course of
his or her employment, any department of corrections personnel has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect,
he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.
(d) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has
reasonable cause to believe that a child who resides with them, has
suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of making a report. For
the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the
following: Any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of
sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause death; any
single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than
one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep
bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or
unconsciousness.
(e) The reporting requirement also applies to guardians ad litem,
including court-appointed special advocates, appointed under Titles 11,
13, and 26 RCW, who in the course of their representation of children
in these actions have reasonable cause to believe a child has been
abused or neglected.
(f) The reporting requirement in (a) of this subsection also
applies to administrative and academic or athletic department
employees, including student employees, of institutions of higher
education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and of private institutions of
higher education.
(g) The report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no
case longer than forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to
believe that the child has suffered abuse or neglect. The report must
include the identity of the accused if known.
(2) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred
during childhood if it is discovered after the child has become an
adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe other children
are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the accused, the reporting
requirement of subsection (1) of this section does apply.
(3) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to the
proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and health
services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(4) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(5) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means, or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing as provided
in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for
appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation
reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement
agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and the
law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases,
where the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency
shall notify the department within twenty-four hours. In all other
cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within
seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law enforcement
agency.
(6) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under
subsection (5) of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the
victim requests, and the local office of the department, of the
decision to charge or decline to charge a crime, within five days of
making the decision.
(7) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(8) Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical
opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and
that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if returned home,
the department shall file a dependency petition unless a second
licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such expert
medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a
second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(9) Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7)
of this section shall not further disseminate or release the
information except as authorized by state or federal statute.
Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(10) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the name, address,
and telephone number of each person making a report of abuse or neglect
under this section. The department shall provide assurances of
appropriate confidentiality of the identification of persons reporting
under this section. If the department is unable to learn the
information required under this subsection, the department shall only
investigate cases in which:
(a) The department believes there is a serious threat of
substantial harm to the child;
(b) The report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that
has, or is about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or
(c) The department has a prior founded report of abuse or neglect
with regard to a member of the household that is within three years of
receipt of the referral.
(11)(a) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department shall use one of the following discrete responses to reports
of child abuse or neglect that are screened in and accepted for
departmental response:
(i) Investigation; or
(ii) Family assessment.
(b) In making the response in (a) of this subsection the department
shall:
(i) Use a method by which to assign cases to investigation or
family assessment which are based on an array of factors that may
include the presence of: Imminent danger, level of risk, number of
previous child abuse or neglect reports, or other presenting case
characteristics, such as the type of alleged maltreatment and the age
of the alleged victim. Age of the alleged victim shall not be used as
the sole criterion for determining case assignment;
(ii) Allow for a change in response assignment based on new
information that alters risk or safety level;
(iii) Allow families assigned to family assessment to choose to
receive an investigation rather than a family assessment;
(iv) Provide a full investigation if a family refuses the initial
family assessment;
(v) Provide voluntary services to families based on the results of
the initial family assessment. If a family refuses voluntary services,
and the department cannot identify specific facts related to risk or
safety that warrant assignment to investigation under this chapter, and
there is not a history of reports of child abuse or neglect related to
the family, then the department must close the family assessment
response case. However, if at any time the department identifies risk
or safety factors that warrant an investigation under this chapter,
then the family assessment response case must be reassigned to
investigation;
(vi) Conduct an investigation, and not a family assessment, in
response to an allegation that, the department determines based on the
intake assessment:
(A) Poses a risk of "imminent harm" consistent with the definition
provided in RCW 13.34.050, which includes, but is not limited to,
sexual abuse and sexual exploitation as defined in this chapter;
(B) Poses a serious threat of substantial harm to a child;
(C) Constitutes conduct involving a criminal offense that has, or
is about to occur, in which the child is the victim;
(D) The child is an abandoned child as defined in RCW 13.34.030;
(E) The child is an adjudicated dependent child as defined in RCW
13.34.030, or the child is in a facility that is licensed, operated, or
certified for care of children by the department under chapter 74.15
RCW, or by the department of early learning.
(c) The department may not be held civilly liable for the decision
to respond to an allegation of child abuse or neglect by using the
family assessment response under this section unless the state or its
officers, agents, or employees acted with reckless disregard.
(12)(a) For reports of alleged abuse or neglect that are accepted
for investigation by the department, the investigation shall be
conducted within time frames established by the department in rule. In
no case shall the investigation extend longer than ninety days from the
date the report is received, unless the investigation is being
conducted under a written protocol pursuant to RCW 26.44.180 and a law
enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney has determined that a longer
investigation period is necessary. At the completion of the
investigation, the department shall make a finding that the report of
child abuse or neglect is founded or unfounded.
(b) If a court in a civil or criminal proceeding, considering the
same facts or circumstances as are contained in the report being
investigated by the department, makes a judicial finding by a
preponderance of the evidence or higher that the subject of the pending
investigation has abused or neglected the child, the department shall
adopt the finding in its investigation.
(13) For reports of alleged abuse or neglect that are responded to
through family assessment response, the department shall:
(a) Provide the family with a written explanation of the procedure
for assessment of the child and the family and its purposes;
(b) Collaborate with the family to identify family strengths,
resources, and service needs, and develop a service plan with the goal
of reducing risk of harm to the child and improving or restoring family
well-being;
(c) Complete the family assessment response within forty-five days
of receiving the report; however, upon parental agreement, the family
assessment response period may be extended up to ninety days;
(d) Offer services to the family in a manner that makes it clear
that acceptance of the services is voluntary;
(e) Implement the family assessment response in a consistent and
cooperative manner;
(f) Have the parent or guardian sign an agreement to participate in
services before services are initiated that informs the parents of
their rights under family assessment response, all of their options,
and the options the department has if the parents do not sign the
consent form.
(14) In conducting an investigation or family assessment of alleged
abuse or neglect, the department or law enforcement agency:
(a) May interview children. If the department determines that the
response to the allegation will be family assessment response, the
preferred practice is to request a parent's, guardian's, or custodian's
permission to interview the child before conducting the child interview
unless doing so would compromise the safety of the child or the
integrity of the assessment. The interviews may be conducted on school
premises, at day-care facilities, at the child's home, or at other
suitable locations outside of the presence of parents. If the
allegation is investigated, parental notification of the interview must
occur at the earliest possible point in the investigation that will not
jeopardize the safety or protection of the child or the course of the
investigation. Prior to commencing the interview the department or law
enforcement agency shall determine whether the child wishes a third
party to be present for the interview and, if so, shall make reasonable
efforts to accommodate the child's wishes. Unless the child objects,
the department or law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts
to include a third party in any interview so long as the presence of
the third party will not jeopardize the course of the investigation;
and
(b) Shall have access to all relevant records of the child in the
possession of mandated reporters and their employees.
(15) If a report of alleged abuse or neglect is founded and
constitutes the third founded report received by the department within
the last twelve months involving the same child or family, the
department shall promptly notify the office of the family and
children's ombudsman of the contents of the report. The department
shall also notify the ombudsman of the disposition of the report.
(16) In investigating and responding to allegations of child abuse
and neglect, the department may conduct background checks as authorized
by state and federal law.
(17)(a) The department shall maintain investigation records and
conduct timely and periodic reviews of all founded cases of abuse and
neglect. The department shall maintain a log of screened-out
nonabusive cases.
(b) In the family assessment response, the department shall not
make a finding as to whether child abuse or neglect occurred. No one
shall be named as a perpetrator and no investigative finding shall be
entered in the department's child abuse or neglect database.
(18) The department shall use a risk assessment process when
investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor.
(19) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect the law
enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making the
report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.
(20) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect involving
a child under the court's jurisdiction under chapter 13.34 RCW, the
department shall promptly notify the child's guardian ad litem of the
report's contents. The department shall also notify the guardian ad
litem of the disposition of the report. For purposes of this
subsection, "guardian ad litem" has the meaning provided in RCW
13.34.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires December
1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect December
1, 2013.

--- END ---