BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.48.086 and 2010 c 42 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After a final order is issued under RCW 49.48.084, if an
employer defaults in the payment of: (a) Any wages determined by the
department to be owed to an employee, including interest; or (b) any
civil penalty ordered by the department under RCW 49.48.083, the
director may file with the clerk of any county within the state a
warrant in the amount of the payment plus any filing fees. The clerk
of the county in which the warrant is filed shall immediately designate
a superior court cause number for the warrant, and the clerk shall
cause to be entered in the judgment docket under the superior court
cause number assigned to the warrant, the name of the employer
mentioned in the warrant, the amount of payment due on it plus any
filing fees, and the date when the warrant was filed. The aggregate
amount of the warrant as docketed becomes a lien upon the title to, and
interest in, all real and personal property of the employer against
whom the warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in a civil case
docketed in the office of the clerk. The sheriff shall proceed upon
the warrant in all respects and with like effect as prescribed by law
with respect to execution or other process issued against rights or
property upon judgment in a court of competent jurisdiction. The
warrant so docketed is sufficient to support the issuance of writs of
garnishment in favor of the state in a manner provided by law in case
of judgment, wholly or partially unsatisfied. The clerk of the court
is entitled to a filing fee which will be added to the amount of the
warrant. A copy of the warrant shall be mailed to the employer within
three days of filing with the clerk.
(2)(a) The director may issue to any person, firm, corporation,
other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the
state, a public corporation, or any agency of the state, a notice and
order to withhold and deliver property of any kind when he or she has
reason to believe that there is in the possession of the person, firm,
corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision
of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state, property that
is or will become due, owing, or belonging to an employer upon whom a
notice of assessment has been served by the department for payments or
civil penalties due to the department. The effect of a notice and
order is continuous from the date the notice and order is first made
until the liability out of which the notice and order arose is
satisfied or becomes unenforceable because of lapse of time. The
department shall release the notice and order when the liability out of
which the notice and order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable
by reason of lapse of time and shall notify the person against whom the
notice and order was made that the notice and order has been released.
(b) The notice and order to withhold and deliver must be served by
the sheriff of the county or by the sheriff's deputy, by certified
mail, return receipt requested, or by the director. A person, firm,
corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision
of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state upon whom
service has been made shall answer the notice within twenty days
exclusive of the day of service, under oath and in writing, and shall
make true answers to the matters inquired of in the notice and order.
Upon service of the notice and order, if the party served possesses any
property that may be subject to the claim of the department, the party
shall promptly deliver the property to the director. The director
shall hold the property in trust for application on the employer's
indebtedness to the department, or for return without interest, in
accordance with a final determination of a petition for review. In the
alternative, the party shall furnish a good and sufficient surety bond
satisfactory to the director conditioned upon final determination of
liability. If a party served and named in the notice fails to answer
the notice within the time prescribed in this section, the court may
render judgment by default against the party for the full amount
claimed by the director in the notice, together with costs. If a
notice is served upon an employer and the property subject to it is
wages, the employer may assert in the answer all exemptions provided
for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which the wage earner is entitled.
(c) As an alternative to the methods of service described in this
section, the department may electronically serve a financial
institution with a notice and order to withhold and deliver by
providing a list of its outstanding warrants, except those for which a
payment agreement is in good standing, to the department of revenue.
The department of revenue may include the warrants provided by the
department in a notice and order to withhold and deliver served under
RCW 82.32.235(3). A financial institution that is served with a notice
and order to withhold and deliver under this subsection (2)(c) must
answer the notice within the time period applicable to service under
RCW 82.32.235(3). The department and the department of revenue may
adopt rules to implement this subsection (2)(c).
(3) In addition to the procedure for collection of wages owed,
including interest, and civil penalties as set forth in this section,
the department may recover wages owed, including interest, and civil
penalties assessed under RCW 49.48.083 in a civil action brought in a
court of competent jurisdiction of the county where the violation is
alleged to have occurred.
(4) Whenever any employer quits business, sells out, exchanges, or
otherwise disposes of the employer's business or stock of goods, any
person who becomes a successor to the business becomes liable for the
full amount of any outstanding citation and notice of assessment or
penalty against the employer's business under this chapter if, at the
time of the conveyance of the business, the successor has: (a) Actual
knowledge of the fact and amount of the outstanding citation and notice
of assessment or (b) a prompt, reasonable, and effective means of
accessing and verifying the fact and amount of the outstanding citation
and notice of assessment from the department. If the citation and
notice of assessment or penalty is not paid in full by the employer
within ten days of the date of the sale, exchange, or disposal, the
successor is liable for the payment of the full amount of the citation
and notice of assessment or penalty, and payment thereof by the
successor must, to the extent thereof, be deemed a payment upon the
purchase price. If the payment is greater in amount than the purchase
price, the amount of the difference becomes a debt due the successor
from the employer.
(5) This section does not affect other collection remedies that are
otherwise provided by law.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.32.235 and 2009 c 562 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the remedies provided in this chapter the
department is authorized to issue to any person, a notice and order to
withhold and deliver property of any kind whatsoever when there is
reason to believe that there is in the possession of such person,
property which is or will become due, owing, or belonging to any
taxpayer against whom a warrant has been filed.
(2) The sheriff of the county where the service is made, or his or
her deputy, or any duly authorized representative of the department may
personally serve the notice and order to withhold and deliver upon the
person to whom it is directed or may do so by certified mail, with
return receipt requested.
(3)(a) The department is authorized to issue a notice and order to
withhold and deliver to any financial institution in the form of a
listing of all or a portion of the unsatisfied tax warrants filed under
this chapter and outstanding warrants under RCW 49.48.086 with the
clerk of the superior court of a county of the state, except tax
warrants subject to a payment agreement, which is not in default,
between the department and the taxpayer.
(b) As an alternative to the methods of service in subsection (2)
of this section, the department may serve the notice and order to
withhold and deliver authorized under this subsection electronically.
The remedy in this subsection (3) is in addition to any other remedies
authorized by law.
(c) No more than one notice and order to withhold and deliver under
this subsection (3) may be served on the same financial institution in
a calendar month.
(d) Notice and order to withhold and deliver under this subsection
(3) must include the federal taxpayer identification number of each
taxpayer.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, "financial institution" means
a bank, trust company, mutual savings bank, savings and loan
association, or credit union authorized to do business and accept
deposits in this state under state or federal law.
(f) The department may provide a financial institution relief from
a notice and order to withhold and deliver in the form provided under
this subsection (3) upon the request of the financial institution. The
department must consider the size, customer base, and geographic
location of the financial institution when considering whether to
provide relief. The department must serve any financial institution so
relieved under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Any person who has been served with a notice and order to
withhold and deliver under subsection (1) of this section must answer
the notice within twenty days, exclusive of the day of service. Any
person who has been served with a notice and order to withhold and
deliver under subsection (3) of this section must answer the notice
within thirty days, exclusive of the day of service. The answer must
be in writing, under oath if required by the department, and include
true answers to the matters inquired of in the notice. Any person
served under subsection (3) of this section may answer in aggregate
within thirty days, but must answer separately as to each taxpayer
listed and specify any property by taxpayer which is delivered. The
department must allow any person served electronically under subsection
(3) of this section to answer the notice and order to withhold and
deliver electronically in a format provided or approved by the
department.
(5) In the event there is in the possession of any person served
with a notice and order to withhold and deliver, any property which may
be subject to the claim of the department, such property must be
delivered immediately to the department of revenue or its duly
authorized representative upon demand. The department must hold the
property in trust for application on the indebtedness involved or for
return, without interest, in accordance with final determination of
liability or nonliability. Instead of delivering the property to the
department or the department's duly authorized representative, the
person may furnish a bond satisfactory to the department conditioned
upon final determination of liability.
(6) Should any person, having been served with a notice and order
to withhold and deliver, fail to answer the notice and order to
withhold and deliver within the time prescribed in this section or
otherwise fail to comply with the duties imposed in this section, the
department may bring a proceeding, in the superior court of Thurston
county or of the county in which service of the notice was made, to
enforce the notice and order to withhold and deliver. The court may
render judgment by default against such person for the full amount
claimed by the department in the notice and order to withhold and
deliver or may grant such other relief as the court deems just,
together with costs.
(7) For purposes of this section, "person" has the same meaning as
in RCW 82.04.030 and also includes any agency, department, or
institution of the state.

--- END ---