BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.16.210 and 1989 c 385 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall assess premiums, under the provisions of
this section, for certain horse racing employments licensed in
accordance with chapter 67.16 RCW. This premium assessment shall be
for the purpose of providing industrial insurance coverage for
employees of trainers licensed under chapter 67.16 RCW, including but
not limited to exercise riders, pony riders, and grooms, and including
all on or off track employment. ((For the purposes of RCW 51.16.210,
67.16.300, 51.16.140, 51.32.073, and 67.16.020 a hotwalker shall be
considered a groom.)) The department may adopt rules under chapter
34.05 RCW to carry out the purposes of this section, including rules
providing for alternative reporting periods and payment due dates for
coverage under this section. The department rules shall ensure that no
licensee licensed prior to May 13, 1989, shall pay more than the
assessment fixed at the basic manual rate.
(2) The department shall compute industrial insurance premium rates
((on a per license basis, which)) and these premiums ((shall)) may be
assessed at the time of each issuance or renewal of the license for
owners, trainers, and grooms in amounts established by department rule
for coverage under this section. Premium assessments shall be
determined in accordance with the requirements of this title, except
that assessments shall not be experience rated and shall be fixed at
the basic manual rate. However, rates may vary according to
((differences in working conditions at major tracks and fair tracks))
the risk insured, as determined according to rules adopted by the
department and the Washington horse racing commission.
(3) For the purposes of paying premiums and assessments under this
section and making reports under this title, individuals licensed as
trainers by the Washington horse racing commission shall be considered
employers. The premium assessment for a ((groom's license)) groom
shall be paid by the trainer responsible for ((signing the groom's
license application and shall be payable at the time of license
issuance or renewal)) hiring the groom and is payable as required by
the Washington horse racing commission.
(4) The fee to be assessed on owner licenses as required by this
section shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars. However, those
owners having less than a full ownership in a horse or horses shall pay
a percentage of the required license fee that is equal to the total
percentage of the ownership that the owner has in the horse or horses.
In no event shall an owner having an ownership percentage in more than
one horse pay more than a one hundred fifty-dollar license fee. The
assessment on each owner's license shall not imply that an owner is an
employer, but shall be required as part of the privilege of holding an
owner's license.
(5) Premium assessments under this section shall be collected by
the Washington horse racing commission and deposited in the industrial
insurance trust funds as provided under department rules.

--- END ---