BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.38.005 and 1989 c 429 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Under present physical conditions in the Yakima river basin
there is an insufficient supply of ground and surface water to satisfy
the present needs of the basin, and that the general health, welfare,
and safety of the people of the Yakima river basin depend upon the
conservation, management, development, and optimum use of all the
basin's water resources;
(b) ((Pursuant to P.L. 96-162,)) The future competition for water
among municipal, domestic, industrial, agricultural, and instream water
interests in the Yakima river basin will be intensified by continued
population growth, and by changes in climate and precipitation
anticipated to reduce the basin's snow pack and thereby reduce the
total water supply available to existing water users, instream flows,
and carryover storage;
(c) To address the challenges described in this subsection,
congress has enacted several bills to promote Yakima river basin water
enhancement, each of which was urged for enactment by this state, the
United States ((is now conducting)) has completed a study of ways to
provide needed waters through improvements of the federal water project
presently existing in the Yakima river basin, and federal, tribal,
state, and local cooperators have developed an integrated water
resource management plan for improving water supply, habitat, and
stream flow conditions in the Yakima river basin;
(d) As part of the Yakima river basin water enhancement project,
the United States department of the interior's bureau of reclamation is
now seeking funding to support implementation of the integrated water
resource management plan for the Yakima river basin, which was jointly
prepared by the Washington state department of ecology and the United
States bureau of reclamation and published in a final programmatic
environmental impact statement in March 2012;
(((c))) (e) The interests of the state will be served by developing
programs, in cooperation with the United States and the various water
users in the basin, that increase the overall ability to manage basin
waters in order to better satisfy both present and future needs for
water in the Yakima river basin;
(f) The interests of the state will also be served through
coordination of federal and state policies and procedures in order to
develop and implement projects within the framework of the integrated
water resource management plan for the Yakima river basin. The pace of
integrated plan implementation over the long term depends upon adequate
funding and is subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for
this purpose;
(g) The current real estate market provides opportunities to
acquire community forest lands that are useful for protecting and
enhancing watershed function at affordable prices;
(h) Although significant benefits are anticipated to result from
the implementation of the Yakima integrated plan, in light of its
substantial costs and the state's limited capacity to absorb them
within existing resources, there is a need to identify and evaluate
potential new state and local revenue sources to assist in paying the
state and local share of implementation costs.
(2) It is the purpose of this chapter, consistent with these
findings, to:
(a) Improve the ability of the state to work with the United States
and various water users of the Yakima river basin in a program designed
to satisfy both existing rights, and other presently unmet as well as
future needs of the basin;
(b) Establish legislative intent to promote timely and effective
implementation of the integrated plan in the Yakima river basin, and to
promote the aggressive pursuit of water supply solutions that provide
concurrent benefits to both instream and out-of-stream uses in the
Yakima river basin as rapidly as possible; and
(c) Take advantage of affordable real estate prices to acquire
community forest lands that are useful for protecting and enhancing
watershed function.
(3) The provisions of this chapter apply only to waters of the
Yakima river basin.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.38.010 and 1989 c 429 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Integrated plan" means the Yakima river basin integrated water
resource management plan developed through a consensus-based approach
by a diverse work group of representatives of the Yakama Nation,
federal, state, county, and city governments, environmental
organizations, and irrigation districts, which is to be implemented
consistent with congressional Yakima river basin water enhancement
project enactments and for which the final programmatic environmental
impact statement was made available for review through public notice
published in the federal register (77 FR 12076 (2012)).
(3) "Net water savings" means the amount of water that through
hydrological analysis is determined to be conserved and usable for
other purposes without impairing existing water rights, reducing the
ability to deliver water, or reducing the supply of water that
otherwise would have been available to other water users.
(((3))) (4) "Trust water right" means that portion of an existing
water right, constituting net water savings, that is no longer required
to be diverted for beneficial use due to the installation of a water
conservation project that improves an existing system. The term "trust
water right" also applies to any other water right acquired by the
department under this chapter for management in the Yakima river basin
trust water rights program.
(((4))) (5) "Water conservation project" means any project funded
to further the purposes of this chapter and that achieves physical or
operational improvements of efficiency in existing systems for
diversion, conveyance, or application of water under existing water
rights.
(6) "Water supply facility permit and funding milestone" means a
date prior to June 30, 2025, when required permits have been approved,
and funding has been secured to begin construction on one or more water
supply facilities designed to provide at least two hundred fourteen
thousand acre feet of water to be used for instream and out-of-stream
uses.
(7) "Yakima river basin water enhancement project" means a series
of congressional enactments, originally initiated by the United States
congress in 1979 under P.L. 96-162, with subsequent federal
implementing legislation being passed in 1984 under section 109 of P.L.
98-381 to promote fish passage improvements, and in 1994 under P.L.
103-434, as amended by P.L. 105-62 in 1997 and P.L. 106-372 in 2000, to
promote water conservation, water supply, habitat, and stream
enhancement improvements in the Yakima river basin.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.38 RCW
to read as follows:
The department is authorized to implement the integrated water
resource management plan in the Yakima river basin, through a
coordinated effort of affected federal, state, and local agencies and
resources, to develop water supply solutions that provide concurrent
benefits to both instream and out-of-stream uses, and to address a
variety of water resource and ecosystem problems affecting fish
passage, habitat functions, and agricultural, municipal, and domestic
water supply in the Yakima river basin, consistent with the integrated
plan.
(1) Authorized department actions include, but are not limited to:
(a) Accepting funds from any entity, public or private, as
necessary to implement the objectives of this chapter;
(b) Assessing, planning, and developing projects under the Yakima
river basin integrated water resource management plan, or for any other
action designed to provide access to new water supplies within the
Yakima river basin, consistent with the integrated plan and including
but not limited to: Enhanced water conservation and efficiency
measures, water reallocation markets, in-basin surface and groundwater
storage facilities, fish passage at existing in-basin reservoirs,
structural and operational modifications to existing facilities,
habitat protection and restoration, and general watershed enhancements
as necessary to implement the objectives of this chapter and the
integrated plan; and
(c) Entering into contracts to ensure the effective delivery of
water and to provide for the design and construction of facilities
necessary to implement the objectives of the integrated plan and this
chapter.
(2) Consistent with the integrated plan, the goals and objectives
of department actions authorized under this chapter include, but are
not limited to:
(a) Protection, mitigation, and enhancement of fish and wildlife
through improved water management; improved instream flows; improved
water quality; protection, creation, and enhancement of wetlands;
improved fish passage, and by other appropriate means of habitat
improvement, including the protection and enhancement of natural
wetlands, floodplains, and groundwater storage systems;
(b) Improved water availability and reliability, and improved
efficiency of water delivery and use, to enhance basin water supplies
for agricultural irrigation, municipal, commercial, industrial,
domestic, and environmental water uses;
(c) Establishment of more efficient water markets and more
effective operational and structural changes to manage variability of
water supplies and to prepare for the uncertainties of climate change,
including but not limited to the facilitation of water banking, water
right transfers, dry year options, the voluntary sale and lease of
land, water, or water rights from any entity or individual willing to
limit or forego water use on a temporary or permanent basis, and any
other innovative water allocation tools used to maximize the utility of
existing Yakima river basin water supplies, as long as the
establishment and use of these tools is consistent with the integrated
plan.
(3) Water supplies secured through the development of new storage
facilities or expansion of existing storage facilities made possible
with funding from the Yakima integrated plan implementation account,
the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account, and the
Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account must be
allocated for out-of-stream uses and to augment instream flows
consistent with the Yakima river basin integrated water resource
management plan. Water to be made available to benefit out-of-stream
uses under this subsection, but not yet appropriated, must be
temporarily available to augment instream flows to the extent that it
does not impair existing water rights and is consistent with the
integrated plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Yakima integrated plan implementation account is created in
the state treasury. All receipts from direct appropriations from the
legislature, moneys directed to the account pursuant to this chapter,
or moneys directed to the account from any other sources must be
deposited in the account. The account is intended to fund projects
using tax exempt bonds. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only as
provided in this section. Interest earned by deposits in the account
will be retained in the account.
(2) Expenditures from the account created in this section may be
used to assess, plan, and develop projects under the Yakima river basin
integrated water resource management plan or for any other actions
designed to provide access to new water supplies within the Yakima
river basin for both instream and out-of-stream uses, consistent with
the integrated plan and the authorities, goals, and objectives set
forth in section 3 of this act.
(3)(a) Funds may not be expended from the account for the
construction of a new storage facility until the department evaluates
the following:
(i) Water uses to be served by the facility;
(ii) The quantity of water necessary to meet the needs of those
uses;
(iii) The benefits and costs to the state of serving those uses,
including short-term and long-term economic, cultural, and
environmental effects; and
(iv) Alternative means of supplying water to meet those uses,
including the costs of those alternatives and an analysis of the extent
to which the long-term water supply needs are able to be met using
those alternatives.
(b) The department may rely on studies and information developed
through compliance with other state and federal requirements and other
sources. The department shall compile its findings and conclusions and
provide a summary of the information it reviewed.
(c) Before finalizing its evaluation under the provisions of this
subsection, the department shall make the preliminary evaluation
available to the public. Public comment may be made to the department
within thirty days of the date the preliminary evaluation is made
public.
(4) For water supplies developed under the integrated plan to
support future municipal and domestic water needs, the department shall
give preference to other entities in managing water service contracts.
Where the department determines that the management of such contracts
by other entities is not feasible or suitable, the department may enter
into water service contracts with applicants receiving water from the
program to recover all or a portion of the cost of developing water
supplies made possible with funding from the account created in this
section. The department may deny an application if the applicant does
not enter into a water service contract. Revenue collected from water
service contracts must be deposited into the Yakima integrated plan
implementation revenue recovery account created in section 6 of this
act. The department may adopt rules describing the methodology as to
how charges will be established and direct costs recovered for water
supply developed under the Yakima river basin integrated water resource
management plan implementation program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account
is created in the state treasury. All receipts from direct
appropriations from the legislature, moneys directed to the account
pursuant to this chapter, or moneys directed to the account from any
other sources must be deposited in the account. The account is
intended to fund projects using taxable bonds. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used only as provided in this section. Interest earned by
deposits in the account will be retained in the account.
(2) Expenditures from the account created in this section may be
used to assess, plan, and develop projects under the Yakima river basin
integrated water resource management plan or for any other actions
designed to provide access to new water supplies within the Yakima
river basin for both instream and out-of-stream uses, consistent with
the integrated plan and the authorities, goals, and objectives set
forth in section 3 of this act.
(3)(a) Funds may not be expended from the account for the
construction of a new storage facility until the department evaluates
the following:
(i) Water uses to be served by the facility;
(ii) The quantity of water necessary to meet the needs of those
uses;
(iii) The benefits and costs to the state of serving those uses,
including short-term and long-term economic, cultural, and
environmental effects; and
(iv) Alternative means of supplying water to meet those uses,
including the costs of those alternatives and an analysis of the extent
to which the long-term water supply needs are able to be met using
those alternatives.
(b) The department may rely on studies and information developed
through compliance with other state and federal requirements and other
sources. The department shall compile its findings and conclusions and
provide a summary of the information it reviewed.
(c) Before finalizing its evaluation under the provisions of this
subsection, the department shall make the preliminary evaluation
available to the public. Public comment may be made to the department
within thirty days of the date the preliminary evaluation is made
public.
(4) For water supplies developed under the integrated plan to
support future municipal and domestic water needs, the department shall
give preference to other entities in managing water service contracts.
Where the department determines that the management of such contracts
by other entities is not feasible or suitable, the department may enter
into water service contracts with applicants receiving water from the
program to recover all or a portion of the cost of developing water
supplies made possible with funding from the account created in this
section. The department may deny an application if the applicant does
not enter into a water service contract. Revenue collected from water
service contracts must be deposited into the Yakima integrated plan
implementation revenue recovery account created in section 6 of this
act. The department may adopt rules describing the methodology as to
how charges will be established and direct costs recovered for water
supply developed under the Yakima river basin integrated water resource
management plan implementation program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery
account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from direct
appropriations from the legislature, moneys directed to the account
pursuant to this chapter, or moneys directed to the account from any
other sources must be deposited in the account. The account is
intended to fund projects using revenues from water service contracts
as authorized in this chapter. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only as
provided in this section. Interest earned by deposits in the account
will be retained in the account.
(2) Expenditures from the account created in this section may be
used to assess, plan, and develop projects under the Yakima river basin
integrated water resource management plan or for any other actions
designed to provide access to new water supplies within the Yakima
river basin for both instream and out-of-stream uses, consistent with
the integrated plan and the authorities, goals, and objectives set
forth in section 3 of this act.
(3)(a) Funds may not be expended from the account for the
construction of a new storage facility until the department evaluates
the following:
(i) Water uses to be served by the facility;
(ii) The quantity of water necessary to meet the needs of those
uses;
(iii) The benefits and costs to the state of serving those uses,
including short-term and long-term economic, cultural, and
environmental effects; and
(iv) Alternative means of supplying water to meet those uses,
including the costs of those alternatives and an analysis of the extent
to which the long-term water supply needs are able to be met using
those alternatives.
(b) The department may rely on studies and information developed
through compliance with other state and federal requirements and other
sources. The department shall compile its findings and conclusions and
provide a summary of the information it reviewed.
(c) Before finalizing its evaluation under the provisions of this
subsection, the department shall make the preliminary evaluation
available to the public. Public comment may be made to the department
within thirty days of the date the preliminary evaluation is made
public.
(4) For water supplies developed under the integrated plan to
support future municipal and domestic water needs in the Yakima basin,
the department shall give preference to other entities in managing
water service contracts. Where the department determines that the
management of such contracts by other entities is not feasible or
suitable, the department may enter into water service contracts with
applicants receiving water from the program to recover all or a portion
of the cost of developing water supplies made possible with funding
from the account created in this section. The department may deny an
application if the applicant does not enter into a water service
contract. Revenue collected from water service contracts must be
deposited into the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue
recovery account created in this section. The department may adopt
rules describing the methodology as to how charges will be established
and direct costs recovered for water supply developed under the Yakima
river basin integrated water resource management plan implementation
program.

Sec. 7 RCW 90.38.900 and 1989 c 429 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The policies and purposes of this chapter shall not be construed as
replacing or amending the policies or the purposes for which funds
available under chapter 43.83B ((or)), 43.99E, or 90.90 RCW may be used
within or without the Yakima river basin.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.38.902 and 1989 c 429 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing in this chapter shall authorize the impairment of, or
operate to impair, any existing water rights.
(2) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit, impair,
waive, abrogate, or diminish:
(a) Any treaty or other rights of the Yakama Nation;
(b) Any powers, rights, or authorities conferred upon irrigation
districts under existing law;
(c) Any rights or jurisdictions of the United States, the state of
Washington, or other person or entity over waters in the Yakima river
basin.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 90.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2015, and by December 1st of every odd-numbered
year thereafter, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department,
in consultation with the United States bureau of reclamation, the
Yakama Nation, Yakima river basin local governments, and key basin
stakeholders, shall provide a Yakima river basin integrated water
resource management plan implementation status report to the
legislature and to the governor that includes: A description of
measures that have been funded and implemented in the Yakima river
basin and their effectiveness in meeting the objectives of this act, a
project funding list that represents the state's percentage cost share
to implement the integrated plan measures for the current biennium and
cost estimates for subsequent biennia, a description of progress toward
concurrent realization of the integrated plan's fish passage, watershed
enhancement, and water supply goals, and an annual summary of all
associated costs to develop and implement projects within the framework
of the integrated water resource management plan for the Yakima river
basin.
(2) The status report required in this section for December 1,
2021, must include a statement of progress in achieving the water
supply facility permit and funding milestone, as defined in RCW
90.38.010. If, after a good faith effort to achieve the water supply
facility permit and funding milestone, it appears that the milestone
cannot or may not be met, the department, in consultation with the
United States bureau of reclamation, the Yakama Nation, Yakima river
basin local governments, and key basin stakeholders, shall provide a
detailed description of the impediments to achieving the milestone,
describe the strategy for resolving the identified impediments, and, if
necessary, recommend modifications to the milestone.
(3) This section expires December 31, 2045.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 90.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to the appropriation of funding for the construction of
a water supply project proposed in the integrated plan with a cost of
greater than one hundred million dollars, the state of Washington water
research center shall review, evaluate, and prepare comments on the
cost benefit analysis prepared for the project by the department and
the United States bureau of reclamation.
(2) To the greatest extent possible, the center must use
information from existing studies, supplemented by primary research, to
measure and evaluate each project's benefits and costs.
(3) The center must measure and report the economic benefits of
each project subject to subsection (1) of this section, so that it is
clear the extent to which an individual project is expected to result
in increases in fish populations, increases in the reliability of
irrigation water during severe drought years, and improvements in
municipal and domestic water supply.
(4) The center may enter into agreements with other state
universities and with private consultants as needed to accomplish the
scope of work.
(5) The center may consult, as necessary, with the department of
ecology and the Yakima river basin water enhancement project work
group.
(6) No more than twelve percent of any appropriations provided for
the implementation of this section may be retained for administrative
overhead expenses.
(7) This section expires July 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 90.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) It is the intent of the legislature for the state to pay its
fair share of the cost to implement the integrated plan. At least
one-half of the total costs to finance the implementation of the
integrated plan must be funded through federal, private, and other
nonstate sources, including a significant contribution of funding from
local project beneficiaries. This section applies to the total costs
of the integrated plan and not to individual projects within the plan.
(b) The state's continuing support for the integrated plan shall be
formally reevaluated independently by the governor and the legislature
if, after December 31, 2021, and periodically thereafter, the actual
funding provided through nonstate sources is less than one-half of all
costs and if funding from local project beneficiaries does not comprise
a significant portion of the nonstate sources.
(2) The department shall deliver, consistent with the intent of
this section, a cost estimate and financing plan that addresses the
total estimated cost to implement the integrated plan and analyzes
various financing options. The cost estimate and financing plan must
include a description of state expenditures as of the effective date of
this section incurred implementing the integrated plan and proposed
state expenditures in the 2015-2017 biennium and beyond with proposed
financing sources for each project.
(3) In addition, the office of the state treasurer shall prepare
supplementary chapters to the cost estimate and financing plan for the
department that:
(a) Identifies and evaluates potential new state financing sources
to pay for the state's contribution towards the overall costs of the
Yakima integrated plan's implementation;
(b) Identifies and evaluates potential new local financing sources
to pay for a significant local contribution towards the overall costs
of the Yakima integrated plan's implementation;
(c) Considers the viability, and evaluates the advantages and
disadvantages of various financing mechanisms such as revenue bonds,
general obligation bonds, and other financing models;
(d) Identifies past, current, and anticipated future costs that
will be, or are anticipated to be, paid by nonstate sources such as
federal sources, private sources, and local sources; and
(e) Considers how cost overruns of projects associated with the
integrated plan could affect long-term financing of the overall
integrated plan and provides options for how cost overruns can be
addressed.
(4) The department may, in the sole discretion of the department,
contract with state universities or private consultants for any part of
the cost estimate and financing plan required under this section.
(5) The initial cost estimate and financing plan required by this
section must be provided to the governor and the legislature,
consistent with RCW 43.01.036, by no later than December 15, 2014, for
consideration in preparing the 2015-2017 biennial budget and future
budgets. The cost estimate and financing plan must be updated by
September 1st of each successive even-numbered year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 90.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department of natural resources is authorized to
purchase land to be held in the community forest trust under RCW
79.155.040 to serve the purposes of the community forest trust
including the protection of Yakima river basin functioning, without
complying with the requirements of RCW 79.155.030(1), 79.155.060, or
79.155.070, relating to the identification, prioritization, local
commitment, and financial contribution normally prerequisite to
nominating and acquiring community forest trust lands. The purchase
must be reviewed and approved by the board of natural resources. In
its evaluation of this acquisition pursuant to RCW 79.155.040(3), the
board is relieved from considering the criteria for identifying and
prioritizing land set forth in RCW 79.155.050. Once purchased, the
land must be managed by the department of natural resources in
consultation with the department of fish and wildlife. Any investment
in the land purchase with funds belonging to the common school trust
constitutes a loan from the irreducible principal of the common school
trust and may only be made if first determined to be a prudent
investment by the board of natural resources. An annual interest
payment on the loan of nine percent must be paid, with six percent
deposited into the common school construction account and three percent
deposited into the real property replacement account. Interest begins
to accrue on the date the land purchase is completed and is due and
payable July 1st following the completion of the state fiscal year.
The principal of the loan must be repaid in accordance with the
provisions of subsection (3) of this section.
(2) The land purchased under this authority must be managed under
a transitional postacquisition management plan during the period
between the date of purchase and the water supply facility permit and
funding milestone or until June 30, 2025, whichever is sooner. The
plan must be consistent with RCW 79.155.080(1), provided that the lands
acquired as community forest trust lands are not required to generate
financial support for their management as would otherwise be required
by RCW 79.155.020(2), 79.155.030(2)(d), and 79.155.080(3), and provided
further that the authority granted to the department to divest of the
property under RCW 79.155.080(4) does not apply to these lands. The
department of natural resources must develop the transitional
postacquisition management plan in consultation with the department of
fish and wildlife.
(a) The plan must ensure that the land is managed in a manner that
is consistent with the Yakima basin integrated plan principles for
forest land acquisitions, including the following:
(i) To protect and enhance the water supply and protect the
watershed;
(ii) To maintain working lands for forestry and grazing while
protecting key watershed functions and aquatic habitat;
(iii) To maintain and where possible expand recreational
opportunities consistent with watershed protection, for activities such
as hiking, fishing, hunting, horseback riding, camping, birding, and
snowmobiling;
(iv) To conserve and restore vital habitat for fish, including
steelhead, spring chinook, and bull trout, and wildlife, including
deer, elk, large predators, and spotted owls; and
(v) To support a strong community partnership, in which the Yakama
Nation, residents, business owners, local governments, conservation
groups, and others provide advice about ongoing land management.
(b) The department of natural resources, in consultation with the
department of fish and wildlife, must establish the Teanaway community
forest advisory committee that includes representatives from the
department of ecology, the local community, land conservation
organizations, the Yakama Nation, the Kittitas county commission, and
local agricultural interests.
(c) By June 30, 2015, the department of natural resources must
complete the transitional postacquisition management plan with a public
process that involves interested stakeholders, particularly residents
from Kittitas county, friends of the Teanaway, back country horsemen,
off-road vehicle and snowmobile users, a representative from Kittitas
field and stream, hikers and wildlife watchers, and ranchers who graze
cattle.
(3) After the water supply facility permit and funding milestone or
June 30, 2025, whichever is sooner, the land must be disposed of in the
following manner:
(a) If the water supply facility permit and funding milestone
conditions have been met, the land remains in the community forest
trust and the transitional postacquisition management plan must be
converted to a permanent postacquisition management plan with whatever
updates and amendments are periodically adopted. Under these
conditions, the remaining principal of any investment in the land
purchased with funds belonging to the common school trust must be
repaid to the real property replacement account.
(b) If the water supply facility permit and funding milestone
conditions have not been met, the board of natural resources must
decide between the following dispositions of the land:
(i) Deposit of the entire amount of land purchased into the
ownership of the common school trust for management or disposition for
the benefit of the common schools; or
(ii) Disposition under the terms of (a) of this subsection.

Sec. 13 RCW 84.33.140 and 2012 c 170 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When land has been designated as forest land under RCW
84.33.130, a notation of the designation must be made each year upon
the assessment and tax rolls. A copy of the notice of approval
together with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for
the land must, at the expense of the applicant, be filed by the
assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded.
(2) In preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002, for
taxes payable in 2003 and each January 1st thereafter, the assessor
must list each parcel of designated forest land at a value with respect
to the grade and class provided in this subsection and adjusted as
provided in subsection (3) of this section. The assessor must compute
the assessed value of the land using the same assessment ratio applied
generally in computing the assessed value of other property in the
county. Values for the several grades of bare forest land are as
follows:

LAND
GRADE OPERABILITY
CLASS VALUES
PER ACRE

1 $234

1 2 229

3 217

4 157

1 198

2 2 190

3 183

4 132

1 154

3 2 149

3 148

4 113

1 117

4 2 114

3 113

4 86

1 85

5 2 78

3 77

4 52

1 43

6 2 39

3 39

4 37

1 21

7 2 21

3 20

4 20

8 1

(3) On or before December 31, 2001, the department must adjust by
rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, the forest land values contained in
subsection (2) of this section in accordance with this subsection, and
must certify the adjusted values to the assessor who will use these
values in preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002. For the
adjustment to be made on or before December 31, 2001, for use in the
2002 assessment year, the department must:
(a) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1996, and June 30, 2001, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(b) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1995, and June 30, 2000, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(c) Adjust the forest land values contained in subsection (2) of
this section by a percentage equal to one-half of the percentage change
in the average values of harvested timber reflected by comparing the
resultant values calculated under (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(4) For the adjustments to be made on or before December 31, 2002,
and each succeeding year thereafter, the same procedure described in
subsection (3) of this section must be followed using harvester excise
tax returns filed under RCW 84.33.074. However, this adjustment must
be made to the prior year's adjusted value, and the five-year periods
for calculating average harvested timber values must be successively
one year more recent.
(5) Land graded, assessed, and valued as forest land must continue
to be so graded, assessed, and valued until removal of designation by
the assessor upon the occurrence of any of the following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove the designation;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership making the land exempt from ad
valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of forest land
designation continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or
devisee of a deceased owner, does not, by itself, result in removal of
designation. The signed notice of continuance must be attached to the
real estate excise tax affidavit provided for in RCW 82.45.150. The
notice of continuance must be on a form prepared by the department. If
the notice of continuance is not signed by the new owner and attached
to the real estate excise tax affidavit, all compensating taxes
calculated under subsection (11) of this section are due and payable by
the seller or transferor at time of sale. The auditor may not accept
an instrument of conveyance regarding designated forest land for filing
or recording unless the new owner has signed the notice of continuance
or the compensating tax has been paid, as evidenced by the real estate
excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the treasurer. The seller,
transferor, or new owner may appeal the new assessed valuation
calculated under subsection (11) of this section to the county board of
equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of equalization to
hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that:
(i) The land is no longer primarily devoted to and used for growing
and harvesting timber. However, land may not be removed from
designation if a governmental agency, organization, or other recipient
identified in subsection (13) or (14) of this section as exempt from
the payment of compensating tax has manifested its intent in writing or
by other official action to acquire a property interest in the
designated forest land by means of a transaction that qualifies for an
exemption under subsection (13) or (14) of this section. The
governmental agency, organization, or recipient must annually provide
the assessor of the county in which the land is located reasonable
evidence in writing of the intent to acquire the designated land as
long as the intent continues or within sixty days of a request by the
assessor. The assessor may not request this evidence more than once in
a calendar year;
(ii) The owner has failed to comply with a final administrative or
judicial order with respect to a violation of the restocking, forest
management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest
debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable rules under Title
76 RCW; or
(iii) Restocking has not occurred to the extent or within the time
specified in the application for designation of such land.
(6) Land may not be removed from designation if there is a
governmental restriction that prohibits, in whole or in part, the owner
from harvesting timber from the owner's designated forest land. If
only a portion of the parcel is impacted by governmental restrictions
of this nature, the restrictions cannot be used as a basis to remove
the remainder of the forest land from designation under this chapter.
For the purposes of this section, "governmental restrictions" includes:
(a) Any law, regulation, rule, ordinance, program, or other action
adopted or taken by a federal, state, county, city, or other
governmental entity; or (b) the land's zoning or its presence within an
urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110.
(7) The assessor has the option of requiring an owner of forest
land to file a timber management plan with the assessor upon the
occurrence of one of the following:
(a) An application for designation as forest land is submitted; or
(b) Designated forest land is sold or transferred and a notice of
continuance, described in subsection (5)(c) of this section, is signed.
(8) If land is removed from designation because of any of the
circumstances listed in subsection (5)(a) through (c) of this section,
the removal applies only to the land affected. If land is removed from
designation because of subsection (5)(d) of this section, the removal
applies only to the actual area of land that is no longer primarily
devoted to the growing and harvesting of timber, without regard to any
other land that may have been included in the application and approved
for designation, as long as the remaining designated forest land meets
the definition of forest land contained in RCW 84.33.035.
(9) Within thirty days after the removal of designation as forest
land, the assessor must notify the owner in writing, setting forth the
reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or owner may appeal
the removal to the county board of equalization in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(10) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal a copy of the notice
of removal with a notation of the action, if any, upon appeal, together
with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for the land
removed from designation must, at the expense of the applicant, be
filed by the assessor in the same manner as deeds are recorded and a
notation of removal from designation must immediately be made upon the
assessment and tax rolls. The assessor must revalue the land to be
removed with reference to its true and fair value as of January 1st of
the year of removal from designation. Both the assessed value before
and after the removal of designation must be listed. Taxes based on
the value of the land as forest land are assessed and payable up until
the date of removal and taxes based on the true and fair value of the
land are assessed and payable from the date of removal from
designation.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (5)(c), (13), or (14) of this
section, a compensating tax is imposed on land removed from designation
as forest land. The compensating tax is due and payable to the
treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the amount of this
tax. As soon as possible after the land is removed from designation,
the assessor must compute the amount of compensating tax and mail a
notice to the owner of the amount of compensating tax owed and the date
on which payment of this tax is due. The amount of compensating tax is
equal to the difference between the amount of tax last levied on the
land as designated forest land and an amount equal to the new assessed
value of the land multiplied by the dollar rate of the last levy
extended against the land, multiplied by a number, in no event greater
than nine, equal to the number of years for which the land was
designated as forest land, plus compensating taxes on the land at
forest land values up until the date of removal and the prorated taxes
on the land at true and fair value from the date of removal to the end
of the current tax year.
(12) Compensating tax, together with applicable interest thereon,
becomes a lien on the land, which attaches at the time the land is
removed from designation as forest land and has priority and must be
fully paid and satisfied before any recognizance, mortgage, judgment,
debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with which the land may
become charged or liable. The lien may be foreclosed upon expiration
of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner provided by
law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property taxes as
provided in RCW 84.64.050. Any compensating tax unpaid on its due date
will thereupon become delinquent. From the date of delinquency until
paid, interest is charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent
ad valorem property taxes.
(13) The compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section may not be imposed if the removal of designation under
subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other forest
land located within the state of Washington;
(b) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
or sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in
anticipation of the exercise of such power;
(c) A donation of fee title, development rights, or the right to
harvest timber, to a government agency or organization qualified under
RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those
sections, or the sale or transfer of fee title to a governmental entity
or a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW
64.04.130, exclusively for the protection and conservation of lands
recommended for state natural area preserve purposes by the natural
heritage council and natural heritage plan as defined in chapter 79.70
RCW or approved for state natural resources conservation area purposes
as defined in chapter 79.71 RCW, or for acquisition and management as
a community forest trust as defined in chapter 79.155 RCW. At such
time as the land is not used for the purposes enumerated, the
compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this section is
imposed upon the current owner;
(d) The sale or transfer of fee title to the parks and recreation
commission for park and recreation purposes;
(e) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located that disallows the
present use of the land;
(f) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(g) The creation, sale, or transfer of a conservation easement of
private forest lands within unconfined channel migration zones or
containing critical habitat for threatened or endangered species under
RCW 76.09.040;
(h) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34
RCW continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(13)(h); or
(i)(i) The discovery that the land was designated under this
chapter in error through no fault of the owner. For purposes of this
subsection (13)(i), "fault" means a knowingly false or misleading
statement, or other act or omission not in good faith, that contributed
to the approval of designation under this chapter or the failure of the
assessor to remove the land from designation under this chapter.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (13), the discovery that land
was designated under this chapter in error through no fault of the
owner is not the sole reason for removal of designation under
subsection (5) of this section if an independent basis for removal
exists. An example of an independent basis for removal includes the
land no longer being devoted to and used for growing and harvesting
timber.
(14) In a county with a population of more than six hundred
thousand inhabitants or in a county with a population of at least two
hundred forty-five thousand inhabitants that borders Puget Sound as
defined in RCW 90.71.010, the compensating tax specified in subsection
(11) of this section may not be imposed if the removal of designation
as forest land under subsection (5) of this section resulted solely
from:
(a) An action described in subsection (13) of this section; or
(b) A transfer of a property interest to a government entity, or to
a nonprofit historic preservation corporation or nonprofit nature
conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW 64.04.130, to protect or
enhance public resources, or to preserve, maintain, improve, restore,
limit the future use of, or otherwise to conserve for public use or
enjoyment, the property interest being transferred. At such time as
the property interest is not used for the purposes enumerated, the
compensating tax is imposed upon the current owner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 79.155
RCW to read as follows:
The state treasurer, on behalf of the department, must distribute
to counties for all lands acquired from private landowners for the
purposes of this chapter an amount in lieu of real property taxes equal
to the amount of tax that would be due if the land were taxable as open
space land under chapter 84.34 RCW except taxes levied for any state
purpose, plus an additional amount equal to the amount of weed control
assessment that would be due if such lands were privately owned. The
county assessor and county legislative authority shall assist in
determining the appropriate calculation of the amount of tax that would
be due. The county shall distribute the amount received under this
section in lieu of real property taxes to all property taxing districts
except the state in appropriate tax code areas the same way it would
distribute local property taxes from private property. The county
shall distribute the amount received under this section for weed
control to the appropriate weed district.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.84.092 and 2013 c 251 s 3 and 2013 c 96 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement
project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel
replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the
Cedar River channel construction and operation account, the Central
Washington University capital projects account, the charitable,
educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the cleanup
settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development
account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development
account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery
account, the common school construction fund, the county arterial
preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account,
the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the Interstate 405
express toll lanes operations account, the education construction fund,
the education legacy trust account, the election account, the energy
freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail
assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the freight mobility investment account, the freight
mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the
public health services account, the high capacity transportation
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher
education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the
highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the high
occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net
assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the
judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold
excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local
sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal justice
assistance account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster
reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the
Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry
operations account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the
recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program
account, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust
account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington
loan fund, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility
safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account,
the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account,
the state route number 520 corridor account, the state wildlife
account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll
bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account,
the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer
firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state economic
development commission account, the Washington state health insurance
pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving
administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund,
((and)) the Western Washington University capital projects account, the
Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated
plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated
plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal
school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, the state university permanent fund, and the state
reclamation revolving account shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 16 RCW 43.84.092 and 2013 c 251 s 4 and 2013 c 96 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement
project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel
replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the
Cedar River channel construction and operation account, the Central
Washington University capital projects account, the charitable,
educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the cleanup
settlement account, the Columbia river basin water supply development
account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development
account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery
account, the Columbia river crossing project account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account,
the department of licensing services account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities
community trust account, the drinking water assistance account, the
drinking water assistance administrative account, the drinking water
assistance repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital
projects account, the Interstate 405 express toll lanes operations
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the energy freedom account, the energy
recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight mobility
investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the public health services account, the high
capacity transportation account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the
highway safety fund, the high occupancy toll lanes operations account,
the hospital safety net assessment fund, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal
account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate
excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine
resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the natural
resources deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension
funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1
account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving
account beginning July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account,
the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital
construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle
account, the regional mobility grant program account, the resource
management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural
mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust
fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special
category C account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the
state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number
520 corridor account, the state wildlife account, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond
retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account),
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain
injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement
system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state economic development
commission account, the Washington state health insurance pool account,
the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration
account, the water pollution control revolving fund, ((and)) the
Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima
integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan
implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan
implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, the state university permanent fund, and the state
reclamation revolving account shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Section 15 of this act expires if the
requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Section 16 of this act takes effect if the
requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met.

--- END ---