BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.092 and 1991 c 199 s 703 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 1.16.030, the budget year of
each activated authority shall be the fiscal year beginning July 1st
and ending on the following June 30th. On or before the fourth Monday
in June of each year, each activated authority shall adopt a budget for
the following fiscal year. The activated authority budget shall
contain adequate funding and provide for staff sufficient to carry out
the provisions of all applicable ordinances, resolutions, and local
regulations related to the reduction, prevention, and control of air
pollution. The legislature acknowledges the need for the state to
provide reasonable funding to local authorities to carry out the
requirements of this chapter. The budget shall contain an estimate of
all revenues to be collected during the following budget year,
including any surplus funds remaining unexpended from the preceding
year. The remaining funds required to meet budget expenditures, if
any, shall be designated as "supplemental income" and shall be obtained
from the component cities, towns, and counties in the manner provided
in this chapter, except that the method for the determination of
supplemental income to be obtained from component cities, towns, or
counties as provided in this chapter for implementation and enforcement
of federal clean air laws and regulations must exclude consideration of
either the assessed valuation of property or population located east of
the Cascade mountain range and within a federally recognized Indian
reservation. The affirmative vote of three-fourths of all members of
the board shall be required to authorize emergency expenditures.

--- END ---