BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Because related geothermal resources may be present on
contiguous private, state, and federal lands within the state, there is
a need to provide greater conformity with the state's geothermal
resources statutes and the federal statutes defining geothermal
resources and clarify that ownership of geothermal resources resides
with the surface owner unless the interest is otherwise reserved or
conveyed.
(2) It is in the public interest to encourage and foster the
development of geothermal resources in the state, and the legislature
intends to align the state statutes defining geothermal resources with
current federal law with which developers are familiar, and clarify the
respective regulatory roles of state agencies.
(3) Geothermal resources suitable for energy development are
located at much greater depths than the aquifers relied upon for other
beneficial uses, but in the event that a geothermal well draws from the
same source as other uses, a coordinated and streamlined permitting of
geothermal development can better ensure that any interference with
existing water uses will be addressed and eliminated. It is the intent
of this act that no water uses associated with a geothermal well impair
any water use authorized through appropriation under Title 90 RCW.
(4) Changes to federal law in 2005 require a distribution of a
portion of geothermal energy revenues from leases on federal land
directly to the county in which the lease activity occurs, and
therefore it is appropriate that the additional distribution to the
state be provided for statewide uses relating to geothermal energy
assessment, exploration, and production.

Sec. 2 RCW 78.60.030 and 1974 ex.s. c 43 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
((For the purposes of this chapter, unless the text otherwise
requires, the following terms shall have the following meanings:)) The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Geothermal resources" ((means only that natural heat energy
of the earth from which it is technologically practical to produce
electricity commercially and the medium by which such heat energy is
extracted from the earth, including liquids or gases, as well as any
minerals contained in any natural or injected fluids, brines and
associated gas, but excluding oil, hydrocarbon gas and other
hydrocarbon substances)) includes the natural heat of the earth, the
energy, in whatever form, below the surface of the earth present in,
resulting from, or created by, or that may be extracted from, the
natural heat, and all minerals in solution or other products obtained
from naturally heated fluids, brines, associated gases and steam, in
whatever form, found below the surface of the earth, exclusive of
helium or oil, hydrocarbon gas or other hydrocarbon substances, but
including, specifically:
(i) All products of geothermal processes, including indigenous
steam, and hot water and hot brines;
(ii) Steam and other bases, hot water and hot brines resulting from
water, gas, or other fluids artificially introduced into geothermal
formations;
(iii) Heat or other associated energy found in geothermal
formations; and
(iv) Any by-product derived from them.
(b) "Geothermal resources" does not include heat energy used in
ground source heat exchange systems for ground source heat pumps.
(2) "Waste", in addition to its ordinary meaning, shall mean
"physical waste" as that term is generally understood and shall
include:
(a) The inefficient, excessive, or improper use of, or unnecessary
dissipation of, reservoir energy; or the locating, spacing, drilling,
equipping, operating or producing of any geothermal energy well in a
manner which results, or tends to result, in reducing the quantity of
geothermal energy to be recovered from any geothermal area in this
state;
(b) The inefficient above-ground transporting or storage of
geothermal energy; or the locating, spacing, drilling, equipping,
operating, or producing of any geothermal well in a manner causing, or
tending to cause, unnecessary excessive surface loss or destruction of
geothermal energy;
(c) The escape into the open air, from a well of steam or hot
water, in excess of what is reasonably necessary in the efficient
development or production of a geothermal well.
(3) "Geothermal area" means any land that is, or reasonably appears
to be, underlain by geothermal resources.
(4) "Energy transfer system" means the structures and enclosed
fluids which facilitate the utilization of geothermal energy. The
system includes the geothermal wells, cooling towers, reinjection
wells, equipment directly involved in converting the heat energy
associated with geothermal resources to mechanical or electrical energy
or in transferring it to another fluid, the closed piping between such
equipment, wells and towers and that portion of the earth which
facilitates the transfer of a fluid from reinjection wells to
geothermal wells: PROVIDED, That the system shall not include any
geothermal resources which have escaped into or have been released into
the nongeothermal ground or surface waters from either man-made
containers or through leaks in the structure of the earth caused by or
to which access was made possible by any drilling, redrilling,
reworking or operating of a geothermal or reinjection well.
(5) "Operator" means the person supervising or in control of the
operation of a geothermal resource well, whether or not such person is
the owner of the well.
(6) "Owner" means the person who possesses the legal right to
drill, convert or operate any well or other facility subject to the
provisions of this chapter.
(7) "Person" means any individual, corporation, company,
association of individuals, joint venture, partnership, receiver,
trustee, guardian, executor, administrator, personal representative, or
public agency that is the subject of legal rights and duties.
(8) "Pollution" means any damage or injury to ground or surface
waters, soil or air resulting from the unauthorized loss, escape, or
disposal of any substances at any well subject to the provisions of
this chapter.
(9) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(10) "Well" means any excavation made for the discovery or
production of geothermal resources, or any special facility, converted
producing facility, or reactivated or converted abandoned facility used
for the reinjection of geothermal resources, or the residue thereof
underground.
(11) "Core holes" are holes drilled or excavations made expressly
for the acquisition of geological or geophysical data for the purpose
of finding and delineating a favorable geothermal area prior to the
drilling of a well.
(12) A "completed well" is a well that has been drilled to its
total depth, has been adequately cased, and is ready to be either
plugged and abandoned, shut-in, or put into production.
(13) "Plug and abandon" means to place permanent plugs in the well
in such a way and at such intervals as are necessary to prevent future
leakage of fluid from the well to the surface or from one zone in the
well to the other, and to remove all drilling and production equipment
from the site, and to restore the surface of the site to its natural
condition or contour or to such condition as may be prescribed by the
department.
(14) "Shut-in" means to adequately cap or seal a well to control
the contained geothermal resources for an interim period.
(15) "By-product" means any mineral or minerals, not including oil,
hydrocarbon gas, or helium, which are found in solution or in
association with geothermal steam and that have a value of less than
seventy-five percent of the value of the geothermal resource or are
not, because of quantity, quality, or technical difficulties in
extraction and production, of sufficient value to warrant extraction
and production by themselves.

Sec. 3 RCW 78.60.040 and 1979 ex.s. c 2 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, geothermal resources
are found and hereby determined to be sui generis, being neither a
mineral resource nor a water resource and as such are ((hereby))
declared to be the private property of the holder of the title to the
surface land above the resource, unless the geothermal resources have
been otherwise reserved by or conveyed to another person or entity.
Nothing in this section divests the people of the state of any rights,
title, or interest in geothermal resources owned by the state.

Sec. 4 RCW 78.60.060 and 2003 c 39 s 40 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter is intended to preempt local regulation of the
drilling and operation of wells for geothermal resources but shall not
be construed to permit the locating of any well or drilling when such
well or drilling is prohibited under state or local land use law or
regulations promulgated thereunder. Geothermal resources, by-products
((and/or)), or waste products which have escaped or been released from
the energy transfer system ((and/or)) or a mineral recovery process
shall be subject to provisions of state law relating to the pollution
of ground or surface waters (Title 90 RCW), provisions of the state
fisheries law and the state game laws (Title 77 RCW), and any other
state environmental pollution control laws.
(2) Authorization for ((use of by-product water resources for all
beneficial uses)) a consumptive or nonconsumptive use of water
associated with a geothermal well, for purposes including but not
limited to power production, greenhouse heating, warm water fish
propagation, space heating plants, irrigation, swimming pools, and hot
springs baths, shall be subject to the appropriation procedure as
provided in Title 90 RCW, except for the following:
(a) Water that is removed from an aquifer or geothermal reservoir
to develop and obtain geothermal resources if the water is returned to
or reinjected into the same aquifer or reservoir; or
(b) The reasonable loss of water:
(i) During a test of a geothermal well; or
(ii) From the temporary failure of all or part of a system that
removes water from an aquifer or geothermal reservoir, transfers the
heat from that water, and reinjects that water into the same aquifer or
reservoir.
(3) The department and the department of ecology shall cooperate to
avoid duplication and to promote efficiency in issuing permits and
other approvals for these uses.
(4) Nothing in this act shall affect or operate to impair any
existing water rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The purpose of this chapter is to provide
for the allocation of revenues distributed to the state under section
35 of the Mineral Lands Leasing Act of 1920, as amended (30 U.S.C. Sec.
191), with respect to activities of the United States bureau of land
management undertaken pursuant to the Geothermal Steam Act of 1970 (30
U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq.) in order to accomplish the following general
objectives:
(1) Reduction of dependence on nonrenewable energy and stimulation
of the state's economy through development of geothermal energy.
(2) Mitigation of the social, economic, and environmental impacts
of geothermal development.
(3) Maintenance of the productivity of renewable resources through
the investment of proceeds from these resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) There is created the geothermal account
in the state treasury. All expenditures from this account are subject
to appropriation and chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) All revenues received by the state treasurer under section 35
of the Mineral Lands Leasing Act of 1920, as amended (30 U.S.C. Sec.
191), with respect to activities of the United States bureau of land
management undertaken pursuant to the Geothermal Steam Act of 1970 (30
U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq.) shall be deposited in the geothermal account
in the state treasury immediately upon receipt.
(3) Expenditures from the account may only be used as provided in
section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Distribution of funds from the geothermal
account created in section 6 of this act shall be subject to the
following limitations:
(1) Seventy percent to the department of natural resources for
geothermal exploration and assessment; and
(2) Thirty percent to Washington State University or its statutory
successor for the purpose of encouraging the development of geothermal
energy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 5 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---