BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to certify community
residential programs by providing requirements and oversight equivalent
to that of adult family homes, assisted living facilities, and nursing
homes by: (1) Establishing supported living certification requirements
and fees; and (2) authorizing civil fines, stop placements, conditions
on certifications, and specific plans of correction for supported
living providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must certify a community residential program if
the department finds that the program is in compliance with this
chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter. The department may
not certify a program if: (a) The applicant or a person affiliated
with the applicant has prior violations of this chapter relating to the
community residential program, or of any other law regulating
residential care facilities or programs within the past ten years that
resulted in revocation, suspension, or nonrenewal of a certification,
license, or contract with the department; or (b) the applicant or a
person affiliated with the applicant has a history of significant
noncompliance with federal, state, or local laws, rules, or regulations
relating to the provision of care or services to vulnerable adults or
to children. A person is considered affiliated with an applicant if
the person is listed on the certification applications as a partner,
officer, director, resident manager, or majority owner of the applying
entity, or is the spouse of the applicant.
(2) An applicant for community residential program certification
must be made on forms provided by the department.
(3) The department must adopt rules establishing community
residential program application fees, renewal fees, and certification
renewal dates. The rules must set the fees at a rate sufficient to
cover the costs of regulating community residential programs under this
chapter. Fees must be paid by the supported living provider.
(4) Applicants must provide proof of financial solvency as
requested by the department.
(5) The department must grant or deny applications for community
residential programs. A copy of the department's decision must be
provided to the applicant who has the right to contest denial or his or
her application for certification as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW by
requesting a hearing in writing within twenty-eight days after receipt
of the notice of denial.
(6) The department must adopt rules establishing procedures for the
transfer of certifications. Certification transfers may be permitted
if the community residential program: Has a change in ownership or
control of the program; has a change in the program's form of legal
organization; or enters into a dissolution or merger of the program
with another legal organization. A community residential program
seeking transfer of certification must be in compliance with the other
requirements of this chapter.
(7) A community residential program that has had its certification
denied, suspended, revoked, or not renewed may, in lieu of appealing
the department's action, surrender the certification. The department
may not issue a new certification to or contract with the provider, for
the purposes of providing care to vulnerable adults or children, for a
period of twenty years following the surrender of the certification.
The department's records must indicate that the provider surrendered
the community residential program certification without admitting the
violations after receiving notice of the department's denial,
suspension, revocation, or nonrenewal of the certification.

Sec. 3 RCW 71A.12.080 and 1988 c 176 s 208 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall adopt rules concerning the eligibility of
residents of residential habilitation centers for placement in
community residential programs under this title, subject to section 2
of this act; determination of ability of such persons or their estates
to pay all or a portion of the cost of care, support, and training; the
manner and method of licensing or certification and inspection and
approval of such community residential programs for placement under
this title; and procedures for the payment of costs of care,
maintenance, and training in community residential programs. The rules
shall include standards for care, maintenance, and training to be met
by such community residential programs, including standards providing
that clients be free from abuse or neglect by program employees.
(2) The secretary shall coordinate state activities and resources
relating to placement in community residential programs to help
efficiently expend state and local resources and, to the extent
designated funds are available, create an effective community
residential program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW
to read as follows:
A certified community residential program must have readily
available for review by the department, residents, and the public:
(1) A copy of its community residential program certification; and
(2) A copy of each inspection report received by the community
residential program from the department for the past six years.

Sec. 5 RCW 71A.12.270 and 2006 c 303 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to take one or more of the
enforcement actions listed in subsection (2) of this section when the
department finds that a provider of residential services and support
with whom the department entered into an agreement under this chapter
has:
(a) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this
chapter or the rules adopted under it;
(b) Failed or refused to cooperate with the certification process;
(c) Prevented or interfered with a certification, inspection, or
investigation by the department;
(d) Failed to comply with any applicable requirements regarding
vulnerable adults under chapter 74.34 RCW; ((or))
(e) Knowingly, or with reason to know, made a false statement of
material fact related to certification or contracting with the
department, or in any matter under investigation by the department; or
(f) Operated a community residential program without a
certification or under a suspended or revoked certification.
(2) The department may:
(a) ((Decertify)) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the
certification of a provider if the department has made a finding of
fraud, abuse, or neglect or that the community residential program is
otherwise not in compliance with this chapter;
(b) Impose conditions on a provider's certification status such as
correction within a specified time, training, and limits on the type of
clients the provider may admit or serve;
(c) Suspend department referrals to the provider by imposing stop
placement; or
(d) Require a provider to implement a plan of correction developed
by the department and to cooperate with subsequent monitoring of the
provider's progress((. In the event a provider fails to implement the
plan of correction or fails to cooperate with subsequent monitoring,
the department may impose civil penalties of not more than one hundred
fifty dollars per day per violation. Each day during which the same or
similar action or inaction occurs constitutes a separate violation));
(e) Impose civil penalties of at least one hundred dollars per day
per violation;
(f) Impose civil penalties of up to three thousand dollars for each
incident that violates community residential program laws or rules.
Each day upon which the same or substantially similar action occurs is
a separate violation subject to the assessment or a separate penalty;
or
(g) Impose civil penalties of up to ten thousand dollars for a
current or former licensed provider who is operating an uncertified
program.
(3) When the department orders stop placement, the community
residential program may not begin providing services to any person
until the stop placement order is terminated. The department may
approve readmission of a client to the program from a hospital, nursing
home, correctional facility, or residential habilitation center during
the stop placement. The department must terminate the stop placement
when: (a) The violations necessitating the stop placement have been
corrected; and (b) the program exhibits the capacity to maintain the
correction of the violations previously found deficient. If upon a
revisit the department finds new violations that the department
reasonably believes will result in a new stop placement, the previous
stop placement remains in effect until the new stop placement is
imposed.
(4) After a department finding of a violation for which a stop
placement has been imposed, the department must make an on-site revisit
within fifteen working days from the request for revisit, to ensure
correction of the violation. For violations that are serious or
recurring or uncorrected following a previous citation, and create
actual or threatened harm to one or more residents' well-being,
including violations of clients' rights, the department must make an
on-site revisit as soon as appropriate to ensure correction of the
violation. Verification of correction of all other violations may be
made by either a department on-site revisit or by written or
photographic documentation found by the department to be credible.
This subsection does not prevent the department from enforcing license
suspensions or revocations. Nothing in this subsection interferes with
or diminishes the department's authority and duty to ensure that the
provider adequately cares for residents, including to make departmental
on-site revisits as needed to ensure that the provider protects
clients, and to enforce compliance with this chapter.
(5) When determining the appropriate enforcement action or actions
under subsection (2) of this section, the department must select
actions commensurate with the seriousness of the harm or threat of harm
to the persons being served by the provider. Further, the department
may take enforcement actions that are more severe for violations that
are uncorrected, repeated, pervasive, or which present a serious threat
of harm to the health, safety, or welfare of persons served by the
provider. The department shall by rule develop criteria for the
selection and implementation of enforcement actions authorized in
subsection (2) of this section. Rules adopted under this section shall
include a process for an informal review upon request by a provider.
(((4))) (6) The provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW apply to
enforcement actions under this section((. Except for the imposition of
civil penalties)), except that: Orders of the department imposing
certification suspension, stop placement, or conditions for
continuation of a certification are effective immediately upon notice
and continue in effect pending a hearing; and the effective date of
enforcement actions shall not be delayed or suspended pending any
hearing or informal review for orders of the department imposing civil
penalties.
(((5))) (7) The enforcement actions and penalties authorized in
this section are not exclusive or exhaustive and nothing in this
section prohibits the department from taking any other action
authorized in statute or rule or under the terms of a contract with the
provider. Whenever possible, the department must assign a higher
priority to investigations of abuse and neglect stemming from alleged
employee misconduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW
to read as follows:
A community residential program account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from fees and civil penalties
imposed under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Only
the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures. The department shall use the community residential
program account to administer this chapter and to promote the quality
of life and care of clients receiving community residential services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a person is admitted to a residential habilitation center,
the department shall, within sixty days of that resident's admission,
develop an individual habilitation plan that includes a plan for
discharge of that resident back to the community.
(2) The department must use a person-centered approach in
developing a resident's discharge plan to assess the resident's needs
and identify services the resident requires to successfully transition
to the community. This approach must provide an opportunity for:
(a) Family-to-family mentoring provided by people who themselves
experienced moving a family member with developmental disabilities from
a residential habilitation center to the community;
(b) Participation by employees of the residential habilitation
centers. To strengthen continuity of care for residents leaving
residential habilitation centers, the department shall provide
opportunities for residential habilitation center employees to obtain
employment in state-operated living alternatives when appropriate for
a specific resident or residents and pursuant to appropriate collective
bargaining agreement;
(c) A choice of community living options and providers, consistent
with federal requirements, including offering to place, with the
consent of the resident or the resident's guardian, the resident on the
appropriate home and community-based waiver, as authorized under 42
U.S.C. Sec. 1396n, and provide continued access to services that meet
his or her assessed needs as authorized on the person's waiver;
(d) Residents and their families or guardians to visit state-operated living alternatives and supported living options in the
community;
(e) A right of return to a residential habilitation center for
residents leaving residential habilitation centers. This right must be
exercised within one year of the resident's move from the residential
habilitation center; and
(f) A plan for the provision of services that are in addition to
those that are provided by residential services providers and that are
necessary to meet the resident's assessed needs. These additional
services include:
(i) Medical services;
(ii) Nursing services;
(iii) Dental care;
(iv) Behavioral and mental health supports;
(v) Habilitation services; and
(vi) Employment or other day support.
(3) After discharge from a residential habilitation center,
residents continue to be eligible for services for which they have an
assessed need.
(4) The department must maximize federal funding for transitioning
residents using any federal grants available for this purpose.
(5) The department shall limit the ability of a state-operated
living alternative to reject clients.
(6) Savings achieved through efficiencies must be used to extend
services, including state-staffed crisis stabilization services and
respite services, to people with developmental disabilities living in
the community.

--- END ---