BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that current adopted
building codes provide adequate minimum performance standards for
construction in accordance with accepted standards of engineering,
fire, life safety, and energy efficiency. Every update to the code
imposes costs on consumers, builders, and local governments. Numerous
changes to multiple sections of multiple building codes every three
years create an unfunded mandate on local authorities that must
implement and enforce the building codes. The building codes created
by the international code council, inc. and the international
association of plumbing and mechanical officials that are adopted by
reference by Washington are copyrighted materials that must be
purchased by businesses and code enforcement officials. The cost to
purchase the 2012 additions of all the codes adopted by reference is
over four hundred dollars for one set. Whenever there is an update to
the code, builders, permitting officials, and code enforcement officers
must all purchase new codes and be retrained on the changes. The
legislature intends to reduce the burden on local governments,
businesses, and consumers by extending time requirements so that
substantial revisions to the building codes occur less frequently.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.27.074 and 1989 c 266 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state building code council shall:
(a) Adopt and maintain the codes to which reference is made in RCW
19.27.031 in a status which is consistent with the state's interest as
set forth in RCW 19.27.020. In maintaining these codes, the council
shall ((regularly)) review updated versions of the codes referred to in
RCW 19.27.031 and other pertinent information ((and shall amend the
codes as deemed appropriate by the council)). Substantial amendments
to the codes may be adopted no more frequently than every six years
except that the codes may be amended more frequently than every six
years to account for embodied energy as defined in RCW 19.27A.140 in a
building;
(b) Approve or deny all county or city amendments to any code
referred to in RCW 19.27.031 to the degree the amendments apply to
single-family or multifamily residential buildings;
(c) As required by the legislature, develop and adopt any codes
relating to buildings; and
(d) Propose a budget for the operation of the state building code
council to be submitted to the office of financial management pursuant
to RCW 43.88.090.
(2) The state building code council may:
(a) Amend the codes as deemed appropriate by the council;
(b) Appoint technical advisory committees which may include members
of the council;
(((b))) (c) Employ permanent and temporary staff and contract for
services; and
(((c))) (d) Conduct research into matters relating to any code or
codes referred to in RCW 19.27.031 or any related matter.
All meetings of the state building code council shall be open to
the public under the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW. All
actions of the state building code council which adopt or amend any
code of statewide applicability shall be pursuant to the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
All council decisions relating to the codes enumerated in RCW
19.27.031 shall require approval by at least a majority of the members
of the council.
All decisions to adopt or amend codes of statewide application
shall be made prior to December 1 of any year and shall not take effect
before the end of the regular legislative session in the next year.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.27A.045 and 1990 c 2 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state building code council shall maintain the state energy
code for residential structures in a status which is consistent with
the state's interest as set forth in section 1, chapter 2, Laws of
1990. In maintaining the Washington state energy code for residential
structures, beginning in 1996 the council shall review the Washington
state energy code every ((three)) six years except that the energy code
may be amended more frequently than every six years to account for
embodied energy as defined in RCW 19.27A.140 in a building. After
January 1, 1996, by rule adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, the
council may amend any provisions of the Washington state energy code to
increase the energy efficiency of newly constructed residential
buildings. Decisions to amend the Washington state energy code for
residential structures shall be made prior to December 1 of any year
and shall not take effect before the end of the regular legislative
session in the next year.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.27A.025 and 1991 c 122 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The minimum state energy code for new nonresidential buildings
shall be the Washington state energy code((, 1986 edition, as
amended)). The state building code council may, by rule adopted
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, amend that code's requirements for new
nonresidential buildings provided that:
(a) Such amendments increase the energy efficiency of typical newly
constructed nonresidential buildings; and
(b) Any new measures, standards, or requirements adopted must be
technically feasible, commercially available, and cost-effective to
building owners and tenants.
(2) In considering amendments to the state energy code for
nonresidential buildings, the state building code council shall
establish and consult with a technical advisory committee including
representatives of appropriate state agencies, local governments,
general contractors, building owners and managers, design
professionals, utilities, and other interested and affected parties.
(3) Decisions to amend the Washington state energy code for new
nonresidential buildings shall be made prior to December 15th of any
year and shall not take effect before the end of the regular
legislative session in the next year. Any disputed provisions within
an amendment presented to the legislature shall be approved by the
legislature before going into effect. A disputed provision is one
which was adopted by the state building code council with less than a
two-thirds majority vote. Substantial amendments to the code shall be
adopted no more frequently than every ((three)) six years.

--- END ---