BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.130 and 2006 c 190 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall prescribe the content of the driver
licensing examination and the manner of conducting the examination,
which shall include but is not limited to:
(a) A test of the applicant's eyesight and ability to see,
understand, and follow highway signs regulating, warning, and directing
traffic. If the director requires an applicant to be examined by a
competent vision authority, regarding nighttime visual acuity, the
director must only require that the competent vision authority verify
that, in his or her professional opinion, the applicant can see
adequately to safely operate a vehicle at night;
(b) A test of the applicant's knowledge of traffic laws and ability
to understand and follow the directives of lawful authority, orally or
graphically, that regulate, warn, and direct traffic in accordance with
the traffic laws of this state;
(c) An actual demonstration of the applicant's ability to operate
a motor vehicle without jeopardizing the safety of persons or property.
If the applicant is deaf or hearing impaired, the applicant may be
accompanied by an interpreter to assist the applicant during the
demonstration. The interpreter will be of the applicant's choosing
from a list provided by the department of licensing; and
(d) Such further examination as the director deems necessary:
(i) To determine whether any facts exist that would bar the
issuance of a vehicle operator's license under chapters 46.20, 46.21,
and 46.29 RCW; and
(ii) To determine the applicant's fitness to operate a motor
vehicle safely on the highways.
(2) If the applicant desires to drive a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle, he or she must qualify for a motorcycle endorsement under
RCW 46.20.500 through 46.20.515.

--- END ---