BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.08.125 and 2009 c 369 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the secretary of state shall maintain a statewide
voter registration database. This database must be a centralized,
uniform, interactive computerized statewide voter registration list
that contains the name and registration information of every registered
voter in the state.
(2) The statewide list is the official list of registered voters
for the conduct of all elections.
(3) The statewide list must include, but is not limited to, the
name, date of birth, residence address, signature, gender, and date of
registration of every legally registered voter in the state.
(4) A unique identifier must be assigned to each registered voter
in the state.
(5) The database must be coordinated with other government
databases within the state including, but not limited to, the
department of corrections, the department of licensing, the department
of health, the administrative office of the courts, and county
auditors. The database may also be coordinated with the databases of
election officials in other states.
(6) Authorized employees of the secretary of state and each county
auditor must have immediate electronic access to the information
maintained in the database.
(7) Voter registration information received by each county auditor
must be electronically entered into the database. The office of the
secretary of state must provide support, as needed, to enable each
county auditor to enter and maintain voter registration information in
the state database.
(8) The secretary of state has data authority over all voter
registration data.
(9) The voter registration database must be designed to accomplish
at a minimum, the following:
(a) Comply with the help America vote act of 2002 (P.L. 107-252);
(b) Identify duplicate voter registrations;
(c) Identify suspected duplicate voters;
(d) Screen against any available databases maintained by other
government agencies to identify voters who are ineligible to vote due
to a felony conviction, lack of citizenship, or mental incompetence;
(e) Provide images of voters' signatures for the purpose of
checking signatures on initiative and referendum petitions;
(f) Provide for a comparison between the voter registration
database and the department of licensing change of address database;
(g) Provide access for county auditors that includes the capability
to update registrations and search for duplicate registrations; and
(h) Provide for the cancellation of registrations of voters who
have moved out of state.
(10) The secretary of state may, upon agreement with other
appropriate jurisdictions, screen against any available databases
maintained by election officials in other states and databases
maintained by federal agencies including, but not limited to, the
federal bureau of investigation, the federal court system, the federal
bureau of prisons, and the bureau of citizenship and immigration
services.
(11) The database shall retain information regarding previous
successful appeals of proposed cancellations of registrations in order
to avoid repeated cancellations for the same reason.
(12) Each county auditor shall maintain a list of all registered
voters within the county that are contained on the official statewide
voter registration list. In addition to the information maintained in
the statewide database, the county database must also maintain the
applicable taxing district and precinct codes for each voter in the
county, and a list of elections in which the individual voted.
(13) Each county auditor shall allow electronic access and
information transfer between the county's voter registration system and
the official statewide voter registration list.
(14)(a) The director of the department of licensing shall, on or
before the tenth day of each month, prepare and transmit to the
secretary of state, in a format as prescribed by the secretary of
state, a complete list of all persons, including addresses, ages, and
other identifying information as prescribed by the secretary of state,
who hold a valid driver's license, driver's instruction permit,
identicard, intermediate license, or commercial driver's license.
(b) The secretary of state shall compare the official state voter
registration list maintained under subsection (1) of this section to
the list prepared under (a) of this subsection. Upon identifying any
registered voters that are not listed through a name and date of birth
comparison, the secretary of state shall suspend the voter registration
from the official state voter registration list. The secretary of
state shall send to the person at his or her last known voter
registration address a notice of the proposed cancellation and an
explanation of the requirements for provisionally and permanently
restoring the right to vote and reregistering. If the person does not
respond within thirty days, the voter registration must be canceled.
(c) The secretary of state shall, by March 1st of every year,
compose a report of the previous calendar year's voter registration
cancellations due to non-United States citizenship. The report must
identify the name of the voter and itemize all ballot measures and
races voted on by the voter as recorded by the secretary of state. All
reports must be made available on the secretary of state's web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning August 1, 2013, any person obtaining or renewing his
or her driver's license, driver's instruction permit, agricultural
driving permit, identicard, intermediate license, or commercial
driver's license shall show proof of his or her United States
citizenship or his or her lawful presence within the United States. An
original or renewal application must not be granted to any person who
does not provide verified proof of his or her United States citizenship
or his or her lawful presence within the United States. A person who
is a citizen or national of the United States, or who is a legal
permanent resident alien, must not be required to provide proof under
this subsection as long as the department has a record of the person's
status in compliance with subsection (4) of this section.
(2) A person may prove his or her citizenship by providing a valid,
unexpired United States passport or passport card, a certified copy of
a birth certificate, a consular report of birth abroad issued by the
United States department of state, a certificate of naturalization
issued by the department of homeland security, or a certificate of
citizenship.
(3) A person may prove his or her lawful presence within the United
States by providing documentation that he or she is an alien:
(a) Lawfully admitted for permanent or temporary residence in the
United States;
(b) With conditional permanent resident status in the United
States;
(c) Who has an approved application for asylum in the United States
or has entered into the United States in refugee status;
(d) Who has a valid nonimmigrant status in the United States;
(e) Who has a pending application for asylum in the United States;
(f) Who has a pending or approved application for temporary
protected status in the United States;
(g) Who has approved deferred action status; or
(h) Who has a pending application for lawful permanent residence or
conditional permanent resident status.
(4) The department shall maintain records of an applicant's status
as a United States citizen or as a noncitizen, including the type of
document provided and the expiration of the applicant's authorization
to lawfully be within the United States. The department shall make
such records available to the secretary of state and state and local
criminal justice agencies.
(5) The department shall verify the status of an applicant through
either the systematic alien verification for entitlements program or
through verification of the applicant's social security number with the
United States social security administration.

--- END ---