BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that start-up companies serve as one of the
strongest sources of new jobs in the United States and the state. The
legislature also finds that the survival of new businesses in the state
is hampered by the state's tax structure, particularly the business and
occupation tax which firms must pay even when they are not yet
profitable. It is the intent of the legislature to provide businesses
with a fifty percent credit against business and occupation tax owed
for the first five years of their operation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person engaged in an eligible new business in an
amount equal to fifty percent of the tax otherwise due under this
chapter after all other credits and deductions have been applied.
(2)(a) For the purposes of this section, "eligible new business"
means a business that:
(i) Has not been operating in Washington for longer than sixty
months. The date that a new business began operating in Washington,
for purposes of this section, is calculated from the date that a new
business first engages in business in Washington or engages in any
activity that generates gross income of the business from sources
within this state regardless of physical presence;
(ii) Has invested fifty thousand dollars or more in capital
investments; and
(iii) Has four or more full-time employees.
(b) "Eligible new business" does not include:
(i) A successor business;
(ii) A business that has been reincorporated, restructured,
reorganized, or transferred, or results from any of the foregoing,
unless the majority of the activities to be conducted after the
reincorporation, restructuring, reorganization, or transfer, calculated
by relative gross income, are significantly different from the
activities previously conducted;
(iii) A new branch location or other facility except by an existing
out-of-state entity first doing business in this state; or
(iv) A business that is substantially similar to a business
currently operated, or operated within the past five years, when the
majority of the beneficial ownership is the same.
(3) A new business must file an application, in a form and manner
required by the department, to qualify for the credit under this
section.
(4) For purposes of this section a business or business activities
are presumed to be "substantially similar" and not "significantly
different" if properly within the same industry group of the North
American industry classification system.
(5) The credit under this section does not apply to income
attributable to any period in which a business is operating in
Washington but has not registered with the department as required under
RCW 82.32.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2013.

--- END ---