BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.40.037 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 19 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than
one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly
retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for
every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be
applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment
with an employer for one full calendar month.
(b) The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will
accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit
reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the
retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.
(2) A retiree from plan 1, plan 2, or plan 3 who enters employment
with an employer at least one calendar month after his or her accrual
date may continue to receive pension payments while engaged in such
service for up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours of service in a
calendar year without a reduction of pension. For purposes of this
section, employment includes positions covered by annuity and
retirement income plans offered by institutions of higher education
pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400.
(3) A retiree who retires under the provisions of RCW 41.40.630(3)
may enter employment with the elections division of a county auditor as
defined in RCW 29A.04.025 at least one calendar month after his or her
accrual date at a rate of compensation not exceeding their rate at
retirement and continue to receive pension payments while engaged in
such service for up to sixty days without a reduction of pension.
(4) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under RCW
41.40.023(12), he or she terminates his or her retirement status and
becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the
period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and
receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again
retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180. However, if the
right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has
rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and
survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous
retirement shall be reinstated.
(((4))) (5) The department shall collect and provide the state
actuary with information relevant to the use of this section for the
select committee on pension policy.
(((5))) (6) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal
this section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a
contractual right to be employed for more than five months in a
calendar year without a reduction of his or her pension.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.40.630 and 2012 1st sp.s. c 7 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service
credit years who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.40.620.
(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty
service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant
to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially
reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT.
(a) Any member who has completed at least thirty service credit
years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and
to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions
of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this
subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent
per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age
at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.
(b) On or after July 1, 2008, any member who has completed at least
thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be
eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed
according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement
allowance reduced as follows:

Retirement
Age Percent
Reduction

55 20%

56 17%

57 14%

58 11%

59 8%

60 5%

61 2%

62 0%

63 0%

64 0%

Any member who retires under the provisions of this subsection is
ineligible for the postretirement employment provisions of RCW
41.40.037(2)(((d))) until the retired member has reached sixty-five
years of age, or when under the postretirement employment provisions of
RCW 41.40.037(3), the retired member has engaged in such service for
more than sixty days. For purposes of this subsection, employment with
an employer also includes any personal service contract, service by an
employer as a temporary or project employee, or any other similar
compensated relationship with any employer included under the
provisions of RCW 41.40.690(1).
The subsidized reductions for alternate early retirement in this
subsection as set forth in section 9, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 were
intended by the legislature as replacement benefits for gain-sharing.
Until there is legal certainty with respect to the repeal of chapter
41.31A RCW, the right to retire under this subsection is
noncontractual, and the legislature reserves the right to amend or
repeal this subsection. Legal certainty includes, but is not limited
to, the expiration of any: Applicable limitations on actions; and
periods of time for seeking appellate review, up to and including
reconsideration by the Washington supreme court and the supreme court
of the United States. Until that time, eligible members may still
retire under this subsection, and upon receipt of the first installment
of a retirement allowance computed under this subsection, the resulting
benefit becomes contractual for the recipient. If the repeal of
chapter 41.31A RCW is held to be invalid in a final determination of a
court of law, and the court orders reinstatement of gain-sharing or
other alternate benefits as a remedy, then retirement benefits for any
member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has
attained age fifty-five but has not yet received the first installment
of a retirement allowance under this subsection shall be computed using
the reductions in (a) of this subsection.
(c) Members who first become employed by an employer in an eligible
position on or after May 1, 2013, are not eligible for the alternate
early retirement provisions of (a) or (b) of this subsection. Any
member who first becomes employed by an employer in an eligible
position on or after May 1, 2013, and has completed at least thirty
service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible
to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to
the provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant
to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by five
percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years
between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

--- END ---