BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.30.010 and 2002 c 160 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the Washington state board of denturists.
(2) "Denture" means a removable full or partial upper or lower
dental appliance to be worn in the mouth to replace missing natural
teeth.
(3) "Denturist" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of denturism.
(4) "Department" means the department of health.
(5) "Practice of denturism" means:
(a) Making, placing, constructing, altering, reproducing, or
repairing a denture; ((and))
(b) Taking impressions and furnishing or supplying a denture
directly to a person or advising the use of a denture, and maintaining
a facility for the same;
(c) Making, placing, constructing, altering, reproducing, or
repairing all other nonorthodontic removable oral devices, excluding
devices intended to treat obstructive sleep apnea or to treat tempural
mandibular joint dysfunction; and
(d) Providing teeth whitening services, including making whitening
trays and providing whitening solutions determined to be safe for
public use.
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.30 RCW
to read as follows:
Prior to providing the services mentioned in RCW 18.30.010(5) (c)
and (d), a licensed denturist must provide documentation to the board
that he or she received training on providing the services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2014.

--- END ---