BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.93 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any city, code city, or county may, through its local
legislative authority, choose to regulate consumer access to retail
carryout bags consistent with the provisions of this section. Nothing
in this section requires a city, code city, or county to regulate
retail carryout bags.
(2) A city, code city, or county interested in regulating consumer
access to retail carryout bags may only do so by adopting the following
model ordinance:
"(1) A retail establishment in [city/county] may not provide a
single-use plastic carryout bag to any customer.
(2) A retail establishment in [city/county] that provides a paper
carryout bag with a manufacturer's stated capacity of one-eighth barrel
(882 cubic inches) or larger must collect a pass-through charge of at
least five cents for each paper carryout bag provided to customers. It
is a violation of this section for any retail establishment to pay or
otherwise reimburse a customer for any portion of the pass-through
charge. However, a retail establishment may not collect a pass-through
charge from anyone with a voucher or electronic benefits card issued
under the women, infants, and children (WIC) or temporary assistance
for needy families (TANF) support programs, or the federal supplemental
nutrition assistance program (SNAP, also known as basic food), or the
Washington state food assistance program (FAP).
(3) An establishment must indicate on the customer transaction
receipt the number of paper carryout bags provided and the total amount
of the pass-through charge.
(4) A violation of this section is a civil infraction under chapter
7.80 RCW.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Carryout bag" means a bag that is provided by a retail
establishment at the check stand, cash register, point of sale, or
other point of departure to a customer for the purpose of transporting
food or merchandise out of the establishment. Carryout bags do not
include:
(i) Bags used by customers inside stores to package bulk items such
as fruit, vegetables, nuts, grains, candy, greeting cards, or small
hardware items, such as nails and bolts, or to contain or wrap frozen
foods, meat, or fish, whether prepackaged or not, or to contain or wrap
flowers or potted plants, or other items where dampness may be a
problem, or to contain unwrapped prepared foods or bakery goods, or to
contain prescription drugs, or to safeguard public health and safety
during the transportation of prepared take-out foods and prepared
liquids intended for consumption away from the retail establishment; or
(ii) Newspaper bags, door-hanger bags, laundry dry cleaning bags,
or bags sold in packages containing multiple bags intended for use as
garbage, pet waste, or yard waste bags.
(b) "Paper bag" means a paper carryout bag that has a
manufacturer's stated capacity of one-eighth barrel (882 cubic inches)
or larger.
(c) "Pass-through charge" means a charge to be collected by a
retailer from its customer when providing recyclable paper bags and
retained by retailers to offset the cost of bags and other costs
related to the pass-through charge.
(d) "Retail establishment" means any person, corporation,
partnership, business venture, public sports or entertainment
facilities, government agency, street vendor or vendor at public events
or festivals or organizations that sell or provide merchandise, goods,
or materials including, without limitation, clothing, food, beverages,
household goods, or personal items of any kind directly to a customer.
Examples include but are not limited to: Department stores, clothing
stores, jewelry stores, grocery stores, pharmacies, home improvement
stores, liquor stores, convenience stores, gas stations, restaurants,
food vending trucks, farmers markets, and temporary vendors of food and
merchandise at street fairs and festivals. Food banks and other food
assistance programs are not considered retail establishments for the
purposes of this section.
(e) "Single-use plastic carryout bag" means any carryout bag made
from plastic or any material marketed or labeled as biodegradable or
compostable that is neither intended nor suitable for continuous reuse
as a carryout bag or that is less than 2.25 mils thick."
(3) A city, code city, or county adopting an ordinance consistent
with this section may amend the model ordinance provided in subsection
(2) of this section only to change the numbering or style to match the
style used in the other ordinances of the city, code city, or county.
(4) The language provided in subsection (2) of this section only
applies to retail establishments located in cities, code cities, or
counties choosing to adopt the model ordinance.
(5)(a) An ordinance adopted by a city, code city, or county
attempting to regulate consumer access to retail carryout bags that is
inconsistent with the model ordinance provided in subsection (2) of
this section is unenforceable and deemed void.
(b) A city, code city, or county that has adopted an ordinance
regulating consumer access to retail carryout bags prior to the
effective date of this section may continue to enforce the local
ordinance until January 1, 2014. After January 1, 2014, all cities,
code cities, and counties intending to regulate consumer access to
retail carryout bags must amend the existing ordinances to be
consistent with the model ordinance provided in subsection (2) of this
section.
(c) A city, code city, or county that has adopted an ordinance
regulating consumer access to retail carryout bags must provide a six-month period of time following the adoption date of the ordinance
before enforcing the ordinance to allow retailers to exhaust existing
inventory of retail carryout bags.
(6) The definitions included in the model ordinance in subsection
(2) of this section also apply to this section and sections 2 through
4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Any city or town ordinances regarding consumer access to retail
carryout bags must be consistent with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Any code city ordinances regarding consumer access to retail
carryout bags must be consistent with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.32 RCW
to read as follows:
Any county ordinances regarding consumer access to retail carryout
bags must be consistent with section 1 of this act.

--- END ---