BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 After years of eroding state support for
Washington's public postsecondary baccalaureate institutions, the
legislature intends to reassert the strong tradition of higher
education as a public good, recognizing that Washington's postsecondary
educational system was founded with a public mission and that a robust
public postsecondary educational system benefits Washingtonians
throughout the state. The legislature intends to reverse the recent
trends of underfunding public higher education and embark on a new
policy that simultaneously strives for open access and excellence in
Washington's public higher education system.
The legislature also recognizes that the individual and combined
success of the people of Washington, and in turn the vitality of
business across our state, rely overwhelmingly on the quality of the
state's higher education system. The legislature further recognizes
that by 2018 it is estimated that nearly seventy percent of jobs in
Washington will require some postsecondary education. Yet, the state
is currently investing less in its public baccalaureate institutions
than twenty years ago.
Therefore, the legislature finds that after years of compounding
cuts to Washington's public higher education system that have hurt
students, families, faculty, and the institutions, it is time to make
tuition affordable for all Washingtonians while simultaneously stopping
the disinvestment in our world-class colleges and universities. To do
this, the legislature intends to create an incentive funding structure
that encourages institutions to hold the line on tuition increases,
while also using data on existing performance metrics to help drive
student success throughout the postsecondary educational system. The
legislature does not intend to overburden the institutions with
additional reporting requirements, but intends for the institutions to
better use the existing reporting system in order to achieve the
state's overarching policy goals for higher education. Recognizing
that top-notch faculty and institutions must have the resources
necessary to maintain quality educational programs that will provide
tremendous value to the public and will keep Washington competitive for
decades to come, it is the intent of the legislature that any funding
appropriated for the incentive funding structure be appropriated in
addition to institutions' baseline biennial appropriations.
The legislature also intends to create a task force to begin work
on an incentive funding model based on the accountability monitoring
and reporting system established in chapter 10, Laws of 2011 1st sp.
sess.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
The educational achievement and tuition reduction incentive program
is established to provide new incentive funding to four-year
institutions of higher education that demonstrate improvement on
existing performance measures and to control resident undergraduate
tuition growth. The voluntary program includes, but is not limited to,
the following components:
(1) A system for allocating new state resources to institutions
based on an institution's:
(a) Performance under the incentive program; and
(b) Control of resident undergraduate tuition growth;
(2) Performance metrics based on the reporting requirements
established in RCW 28B.77.090;
(3) Measurement of each institution's performance in relation to
its own past performance in order to preserve each school's unique
mission; and
(4) Investment of unallocated incentive funds to the state need
grant program to expand access to low-income and underserved students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The office of financial management shall
convene a technical incentive funding model task force to design an
incentive funding model to support the incentive program created in
section 2 of this act. The model must incorporate the components of
the incentive program.
(2) The task force must include the following members:
(a) One representative from the student achievement council;
(b) One representative from the education data center created in
RCW 43.41.400; and
(c) One representative from each four-year institution of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(3)(a) The office of financial management shall submit a
preliminary report to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2013.
(b) The office of financial management shall submit a final report
containing an incentive funding model to support the incentive program
in section 2 of this act to the governor and appropriate committees of
the legislature by September 1, 2014.
(4) This section expires August 1, 2015.

--- END ---