BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The holder of a spirits retail license that is also a
participant in the responsible vendor program, created under RCW
66.24.630, may provide, free or for a charge, single-serving samples of
one-half ounce or less of spirits, and no more than a total of one and
one-half ounces in spirits samples per person, for the purpose of sale
promotion. Servers who provide spirit samples must hold a class 12
alcohol server permit. Sampling conducted under this section must be
conducted in accordance with rules established for sampling activities
in beer and wine specialty shops and grocery stores.
(2) Sampling activities under this section are subject to RCW
66.28.305 and 66.28.040 and the cost of sampling under this section may
not be borne, directly or indirectly, by any manufacturer, importer,
distiller, or distributor of spirits.

--- END ---