BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall establish
procedures for measuring client outcomes and delivery system attributes
for the community mental health service delivery system. The
department must make outcome measures publicly available in a form that
allows for comparison of outcomes and levels of improvement between
geographic regions of Washington.
(2) The following client outcomes must be monitored for the
community mental health service delivery system: (a) Improvements in
health status; (b) improved participation in employment and education;
(c) improved housing stability; (d) improved quality of life, including
measures of recovery and resilience; (e) improved access to treatment
and health outcomes, as measured by reduction in disparity in
population-based studies; (f) reduced criminal justice system
involvement; and (g) reduced avoidable utilization of hospital,
emergency room, and crisis services.
(3) The following delivery system attributes must be monitored for
the community mental health service delivery system: (a) Improvements
in level of reliance on evidence-based, research-based, and promising
practices; (b) reductions in boarding practices for crisis patients;
(c) instances of connection and cross-system collaboration with law
enforcement and criminal justice agencies; and (d) effectiveness in
engaging and monitoring health status of forensically involved mental
health patients released from incarceration or involuntary commitment
within the geographic region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By December 1, 2013, the department of
social and health services shall propose an incentive system that would
reward superior performance relating to client outcome measures and
delivery system attributes described in section 1 of this act, and
describe any legal or practical barriers that would need to be
addressed prior to implementation of such a system.

--- END ---