BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.300 and 1997 c 429 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall issue a final order that shall be based
exclusively on whether or not a state agency, county, or city is in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as
it relates to adoption or amendment of shoreline master programs, or
chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development
regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter
90.58 RCW.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the final
order shall be issued within one hundred eighty days of receipt of the
petition for review, or, if multiple petitions are filed, within one
hundred eighty days of receipt of the last petition that is
consolidated.
(b) The board may extend the period of time for issuing a decision
to enable the parties to settle the dispute if additional time is
necessary to achieve a settlement, and (i) an extension is requested by
all parties, or (ii) an extension is requested by the petitioner and
respondent and the board determines that a negotiated settlement
between the remaining parties could resolve significant issues in
dispute. The request must be filed with the board not later than seven
days before the date scheduled for the hearing on the merits of the
petition. The board may authorize one or more extensions for up to
ninety days each, subject to the requirements of this section.
(3) In the final order, the board shall either:
(a) Find that the state agency, county, or city is in compliance
with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates
to the adoption or amendment of shoreline master programs, or chapter
43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development regulations,
and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW; or
(b) Find that the state agency, county, or city is not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as
it relates to the adoption or amendment of shoreline master programs,
or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of plans, development
regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter
90.58 RCW, in which case the board shall remand the matter to the
affected state agency, county, or city. The board shall specify a
reasonable time not in excess of one hundred eighty days, or such
longer period as determined by the board in cases of unusual scope or
complexity, within which the state agency, county, or city shall comply
with the requirements of this chapter. The board may require periodic
reports to the board on the progress the jurisdiction is making towards
compliance.
(4)(a) Unless the board makes a determination of invalidity ((as
provided in)) under RCW 36.70A.302, a finding of noncompliance and an
order of remand shall not affect the validity of comprehensive plans
and development regulations during the period of remand.
(b) Unless the board makes a determination of invalidity, state
agencies, commissions, and governing boards may not determine a county,
city, or town to be ineligible or otherwise penalized in the acceptance
of applications or the awarding of state agency grants or loans during
the period of remand. This subsection (4)(b) applies only to counties,
cities, and towns that have: (i) Delayed the initial effective date of
the action subject to the petition before the board until after the
board issues a final determination; or (ii) within thirty days of
receiving notice of a petition for review by the board delayed or
suspended the effective date of the action subject to the petition
before the board until after the board issues a final determination.
(5) Any party aggrieved by a final decision of the hearings board
may appeal the decision to superior court as provided in RCW 34.05.514
or 36.01.050 within thirty days of the final order of the board.
Unless the board makes a determination of invalidity under RCW
36.70A.302, state agencies, commissions, or governing boards shall not
penalize counties, cities, or towns during the pendency of an appeal as
provided in RCW 43.17.250.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.17.250 and 1999 c 164 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever a state agency is considering awarding grants or loans
for a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to finance
public facilities, it shall consider whether the county, city, or town
requesting the grant or loan has adopted a comprehensive plan and
development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(2) If a comprehensive plan, development regulation, or an
amendment to either the plan or regulation adopted by a county, city,
or town has been appealed to the growth management hearings board under
RCW 36.70A.280, the county, city, or town may not be determined to be
ineligible or otherwise penalized in the acceptance of applications or
the awarding of state agency grants or loans during the pendency of the
appeal before the board or subsequent judicial appeals. This
subsection applies only to counties, cities, and towns that have: (a)
Delayed the initial effective date of the action subject to the
petition before the board until after the board issues a final
determination; or (b) within thirty days of receiving notice of a
petition for review by the board delayed or suspended the effective
date of the action subject to the petition before the board until after
the board issues a final determination.
(3) When reviewing competing requests from counties, cities, or
towns planning under RCW 36.70A.040, a state agency considering
awarding grants or loans for public facilities shall accord additional
preference to those counties, cities, or towns that have adopted a
comprehensive plan and development regulations as required by RCW
36.70A.040. For the purposes of the preference accorded in this
section, a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 is
deemed to have satisfied the requirements for adopting a comprehensive
plan and development regulations specified in RCW 36.70A.040 if the
county, city, or town:
(a) Adopts or has adopted a comprehensive plan and development
regulations within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040;
(b) Adopts or has adopted a comprehensive plan and development
regulations before ((submitting a request for a grant or loan)) the
state agency makes a decision regarding award recipients of the grants
or loans if the county, city, or town failed to adopt a comprehensive
plan and/or development regulations within the time periods specified
in RCW 36.70A.040; or
(c) Demonstrates substantial progress toward adopting a
comprehensive plan or development regulations within the time periods
specified in RCW 36.70A.040. A county, city, or town that is more than
six months out of compliance with the time periods specified in RCW
36.70A.040 shall not be deemed to demonstrate substantial progress for
purposes of this section.
(((3))) (4) The preference specified in subsection (((2))) (3) of
this section applies only to competing requests for grants or loans
from counties, cities, or towns planning under RCW 36.70A.040. A
request from a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040
shall be accorded no additional preference based on subsection (((2)))
(3) of this section over a request from a county, city, or town not
planning under RCW 36.70A.040.
(((4))) (5) Whenever a state agency is considering awarding grants
or loans for public facilities to a special district requesting funding
for a proposed facility located in a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040, it shall consider whether the county, city, or
town in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is located
has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040 and shall apply the standards in subsection
(2) of this section and the preference specified in subsection (((2)))
(3) of this section and restricted in subsection (((3))) (4) of this
section.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.155.070 and 2012 c 196 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To qualify for loans or pledges under this chapter the board
must determine that a local government meets all of the following
conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan; and
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into
consideration local employment and economic factors.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a comprehensive plan, including
a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040. A county, city, or town that has adopted
a comprehensive plan and development regulations as provided in RCW
36.70A.040 may request a grant or loan for public works projects. This
subsection does not require any county, city, or town planning under
RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a comprehensive plan or development regulations
before requesting ((or receiving)) a loan or loan guarantee under this
chapter ((if such request is made before the expiration of the time
periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040)). A county, city, or town
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 ((which)) that has not adopted a
comprehensive plan and development regulations within the time periods
specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited from receiving a loan or
loan guarantee under this chapter if the comprehensive plan and
development regulations are adopted as required by RCW 36.70A.040
before ((submitting a request for a loan or loan guarantee)) executing
a contractual agreement for financial assistance with the board.
(3) In considering awarding loans for public facilities to special
districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board must
consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is
located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) The board must develop a priority process for public works
projects as provided in this section. The intent of the priority
process is to maximize the value of public works projects accomplished
with assistance under this chapter. The board must attempt to assure
a geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. The board
must consider at least the following factors in assigning a priority to
a project:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.110, whether the
entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW
90.71.010;
(c) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(d) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(e) Whether the applicant's permitting process has been certified
as streamlined by the office of regulatory assistance;
(f) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007;
(g) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of loan money available;
(h) The number of communities served by or funding the project;
(i) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment,
compared to the average state unemployment;
(j) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement,
or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards, including the cost of
extending existing service to such a system;
(k) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.120, and
effective one calendar year following the development of model
evergreen community management plans and ordinances under RCW
35.105.050, whether the entity receiving assistance has been
recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the
evergreen community recognition program created in RCW 35.105.030;
(l) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth; and
(m) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(5) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments may
not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government applicant
must provide documentation of attempts to secure additional local or
other sources of funding for each public works project for which
financial assistance is sought under this chapter.
(6) Before November 1st of each even-numbered year, the board must
develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate
and house of representatives a description of the loans made under RCW
43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section during the
preceding fiscal year and a prioritized list of projects which are
recommended for funding by the legislature, including one copy to the
staff of each of the committees. The list must include, but not be
limited to, a description of each project and recommended financing,
the terms and conditions of the loan or financial guarantee, the local
government jurisdiction and unemployment rate, demonstration of the
jurisdiction's critical need for the project and documentation of local
funds being used to finance the public works project. The list must
also include measures of fiscal capacity for each jurisdiction
recommended for financial assistance, compared to authorized limits and
state averages, including local government sales taxes; real estate
excise taxes; property taxes; and charges for or taxes on sewerage,
water, garbage, and other utilities.
(7) The board may not sign contracts or otherwise financially
obligate funds from the public works assistance account before the
legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of public works
projects. The legislature may remove projects from the list
recommended by the board. The legislature may not change the order of
the priorities recommended for funding by the board.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section does not apply to loans made
under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section.
(9) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans are
exempted from subsection (7) of this section.
(10) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or recycling
facilities under this chapter, a city or county must demonstrate that
the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent with and necessary
to implement the comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by
the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.
(11) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may be funded under
this section only if the project is not in conflict with the action
agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.146.070 and 2008 c 299 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When making grants or loans for water pollution control
facilities, the department shall consider the following:
(a) The protection of water quality and public health;
(b) The cost to residential ratepayers if they had to finance water
pollution control facilities without state assistance;
(c) Actions required under federal and state permits and compliance
orders;
(d) The level of local fiscal effort by residential ratepayers
since 1972 in financing water pollution control facilities;
(e) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 70.146.110, whether the
entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW
90.71.010;
(f) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(g) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 70.146.120, and effective
one calendar year following the development and statewide availability
of model evergreen community management plans and ordinances under RCW
35.105.050, whether the project is sponsored by an entity that has been
recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the
evergreen community recognition program created in RCW 35.105.030;
(h) The extent to which the applicant county or city, or if the
applicant is another public body, the extent to which the county or
city in which the applicant public body is located, has established
programs to mitigate nonpoint pollution of the surface or subterranean
water sought to be protected by the water pollution control facility
named in the application for state assistance; and
(i) The recommendations of the Puget Sound partnership, created in
RCW 90.71.210, and any other board, council, commission, or group
established by the legislature or a state agency to study water
pollution control issues in the state.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 may not receive a grant or loan for water
pollution control facilities unless it has adopted a comprehensive
plan, including a capital facilities plan element, and development
regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040. A county, city, or town
that has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as
provided in RCW 36.70A.040 may request a grant or loan for water
pollution control facilities. This subsection does not require any
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a
comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting ((or
receiving)) a grant or loan under this chapter if such request is made
before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040.
A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 ((which)) that
has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations within
the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited from
receiving a grant or loan under this chapter if the comprehensive plan
and development regulations are adopted as required by RCW 36.70A.040
before ((submitting a request for a)) the department executes a
contractual agreement for the grant or loan.
(3) Whenever the department is considering awarding grants or loans
for public facilities to special districts requesting funding for a
proposed facility located in a county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040, it shall consider whether the county, city, or town
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the
proposed facility is located has adopted a comprehensive plan and
development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
effects of water pollution on Puget Sound may be funded under this
chapter only if the project is not in conflict with the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.70A.200 and 2011 c 60 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The comprehensive plan of each county and city that is planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall include a process for identifying and siting
essential public facilities. Essential public facilities include those
facilities that are typically difficult to site, such as airports,
state education facilities and state or regional transportation
facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, regional transit authority
facilities as defined in RCW 81.112.020, state and local correctional
facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and inpatient facilities
including substance abuse facilities, mental health facilities, group
homes, and secure community transition facilities as defined in RCW
71.09.020.
(2) Each county and city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process, or amend its
existing process, for identifying and siting essential public
facilities and adopt or amend its development regulations as necessary
to provide for the siting of secure community transition facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(3) Any city or county not planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall, not
later than September 1, 2002, establish a process for siting secure
community transition facilities and adopt or amend its development
regulations as necessary to provide for the siting of such facilities
consistent with statutory requirements applicable to these facilities.
(4) The office of financial management shall maintain a list of
those essential state public facilities that are required or likely to
be built within the next six years. The office of financial management
may at any time add facilities to the list.
(5) No local comprehensive plan or development regulation may
preclude the siting of essential public facilities.
(6) No person may bring a cause of action for civil damages based
on the good faith actions of any county or city to provide for the
siting of secure community transition facilities in accordance with
this section and with the requirements of chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd
sp. sess. For purposes of this subsection, "person" includes, but is
not limited to, any individual, agency as defined in RCW 42.17A.005,
corporation, partnership, association, and limited liability entity.
(7) Counties or cities siting facilities pursuant to subsection (2)
or (3) of this section shall comply with RCW 71.09.341.
(8) The failure of a county or city to act by the deadlines
established in subsections (2) and (3) of this section is not:
(a) A condition that would disqualify the county or city for
grants, loans, or pledges under RCW 43.155.070 or 70.146.070;
(b) A consideration for grants or loans provided under RCW
43.17.250(((2))) (3); or
(c) A basis for any petition under RCW 36.70A.280 or for any
private cause of action.

--- END ---