BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that certain
vendors who contract with the department of social and health services,
the department of early learning, or the health care authority engage
in the practice of strategic successorship, with the intent to restrict
or eliminate the ability of those agencies to collect overpayments
assessed against those vendors. In many instances, vendors who are
responsible for overpayments to the agencies dissolve a business and
then transfer its assets to one or more successor entities, which
subsequently seek to contract with those same agencies and serve the
same clients as the prior vendor-entity, but without satisfying the
overpayment obligation. The legislature finds that, through this
practice, certain vendors obstruct and impair the ability of the
agencies to collect legally established overpayments, which constitutes
a wrongful avoidance of liability to the state of Washington.
(2) To address this problem, the legislature intends to provide the
department of social and health services, the department of early
learning, and the health care authority with the authority to determine
that a successor entity is liable for a vendor overpayment, and to
enforce the liability against the successor entity. It is intended
that, under this new process, the agencies will apply the legal theory
of successor liability, as articulated under Cambridge Townhomes, LLC
v. Pacific Star Roofing, Inc., 166 Wn.2d 475, 209 P.3d 863 (2009) and
Hall v. Armstrong Cork, Inc., 103 Wn.2d 258, 261, 692 P.2d 787 (1984).
(3) The legislature further intends to provide those agencies named
in this section with the authority to assess and enforce a vendor
overpayment against a successor entity when an audit or other agency
review discovers that the overpayment could have been assessed against
the original vendor.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.20B.010 and 1987 c 75 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services.
(3) "License" means that exercise of regulatory authority by the
secretary to grant permission, authority, or liberty to do or to
forbear certain activities. The term includes licenses, permits,
certifications, registrations, and other similar terms.
(4) "Vendor" means an entity that provides goods or services to or
for clientele of the department and that controls operational
decisions.
(5) "Overpayment" means any payment or benefit to a recipient or to
a vendor in excess of that to which is entitled by law, rule, or
contract, including amounts in dispute.
(6) "Successor" means a person, business, corporation, partnership,
or other entity that receives or purchases all or part of the business
or property of another person, business, corporation, partnership, or
entity where: (a) There is an express or implied agreement for the
transferee to assume liability; (b) the transfer is a de facto merger
or consolidation; (c) the transferee is a mere continuation of the
transferor; or (d) the transfer of assets is for the fraudulent purpose
of escaping liability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.20B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may collect overpayments from a vendor or from
a vendor's successor when:
(a) The department has established a vendor overpayment as a final
debt under RCW 43.20B.675;
(b) The department has established a final vendor overpayment debt
on behalf of the department of early learning or the health care
authority; or
(c) The department is requested by the department of early learning
to collect an overpayment established under chapter 43.215 RCW and
Title 170 WAC.
(2) Where the department seeks to enforce an established vendor
overpayment liability against a successor, the department must serve a
notice of successor liability on the successor. The notice of
successor liability must: (a) Include a statement of the final debt
owed by the vendor; (b) state the specific reasons why the department
finds the entity to be a successor liable for the vendor's overpayment;
(c) cite to relevant statutory and regulatory provisions regarding
establishment of successor liability; (d) notify the entity of its
right to request an adjudicative proceeding; and (e) include a
statement that the debt may be collected in accordance with RCW
43.20B.675 through 43.20B.695 and this section.
(3) A notice of successor liability must be served in the manner
prescribed for the service of summons in a civil action or may be
served by certified mail, return receipt requested.
(4) An application for an adjudicative proceeding must be filed
with the secretary, or the secretary's designee, within twenty-eight
calendar days from the date of service of such notice and finding of
successor liability. The application must be written and served on the
secretary by registered or certified mail, or by personal service.
(5) If an application for an adjudicative proceeding is timely
filed, any collection action against the alleged successor entity is
stayed pending the final adjudicative order. The proceeding is
governed by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) If no application for an adjudicative proceeding is timely
filed, the notice and finding of successor liability becomes final and
the successor entity is liable for the amount claimed in the notice.
In addition, the department may charge the successor with any costs
associated with the collection of any final overpayment or debt
established against the successor.
(7) In consultation with the health care authority, the department
may adopt any rules it deems necessary in order to implement this
section.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.20B.675 and 1998 c 66 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the department determines that a vendor was overpaid by
the department for either goods or services, or both, provided to
department clients, except nursing homes under chapter 74.46 RCW, the
department will give written notice to the vendor. The notice will
include the amount of the overpayment, the basis for the claim, and the
rights of the vendor under this section.
(2) The notice may be served upon the vendor in the manner
prescribed for the service of a summons in civil action or be mailed to
the vendor at the last known address by certified mail, return receipt
requested, demanding payment within twenty days of the date of receipt.
(3) The vendor has the right to an adjudicative proceeding governed
by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and the rules
of the department. The vendor's application for an adjudicative
proceeding must be in writing, state the basis for contesting the
overpayment notice, and include a copy of the department's notice. The
application must be served on and received by the department within
twenty-eight days of the vendor's receipt of the notice of overpayment.
The vendor must serve the department in a manner providing proof of
receipt.
(4) Where an adjudicative proceeding has been requested, the
presiding or reviewing office will determine the amount, if any, of the
overpayment received by the vendor.
(5) If the vendor fails to attend or participate in the
adjudicative proceeding, upon a showing of valid service, the presiding
or reviewing officer may enter an administrative order declaring the
amount claimed in the notice to be assessed against the vendor and
subject to collection action by the department.
(6) Failure to make an application for an adjudicative proceeding
within twenty-eight days of the date of notice will result in the
establishment of a final debt against the vendor in the amount asserted
by the department and that amount is subject to collection action. The
department may also charge the vendor with any costs associated with
the collection of any final overpayment or debt established against the
vendor.
(7) The department may enforce a final overpayment or debt through
lien and foreclosure, distraint, seizure and sale, order to withhold
and deliver, or other collection action available to the department to
satisfy the debt due.
(8) Debts determined under this chapter are subject to collection
action without further necessity of action by a presiding or reviewing
officer. The department may collect the debt in accordance with RCW
43.20B.635, 43.20B.640, and 43.20B.680. In addition, a vendor lien may
be subject to distraint and seizure and sale in the same manner as
prescribed for support liens in RCW 74.20A.130.
(9) Chapter 66, Laws of 1998 applies to overpayments for goods or
services provided on or after July 1, 1998.
(10) When the department, the health care authority, or the
department of early learning discovers through an audit or other review
that a vendor overpayment should have been imposed against a vendor
that has ceased doing business, the department, the health care
authority, or the department of early learning may assess, establish,
and enforce the overpayment against another vendor that the department
determines is a successor as defined under RCW 43.20B.010.
(a) Before the vendor overpayment may be assessed, the department
must serve a notice of successor liability as described in section 3 of
this act.
(b) If the department establishes that the alleged successor entity
is indeed a successor entity, the department, the health care
authority, or the department of early learning may seek to establish
the overpayment against the successor entity as provided under RCW
43.20B.675.
(11) In consultation with the department of early learning, the
department may adopt any rules ((consistent with)) it deems necessary
in order to implement this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.05A.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 89 are each
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Assistance" means all programs administered by the authority.
(2) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Director" means the director of the Washington state health
care authority.
(4) "Overpayment" means any payment or benefit to a recipient or to
a vendor in excess of that to which is entitled by law, rule, or
contract, including amounts in dispute.
(5) "Vendor" means a person or entity that provides goods or
services to or for clientele of the authority and that controls
operational decisions.
(6) "Successor" means a person, business, corporation, partnership,
or other entity that receives or purchases all or part of the business
or property of another person, business, corporation, partnership, or
other entity where: (a) There is an express or implied agreement for
the transferee to assume liability; (b) the transfer is a de facto
merger or consolidation; (c) the transferee is a mere continuation of
the transferor; or (d) the transfer of assets is for the fraudulent
purpose of escaping liability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 41.05A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When the authority has established a vendor overpayment as a
final debt under RCW 41.05A.010 or establishes a final vendor
overpayment debt on behalf of another agency, the authority may collect
that debt from the vendor or from a successor.
(2) Where the authority seeks to enforce an established vendor
overpayment liability against a successor, the authority must serve a
notice of successor liability on the successor. The notice of
successor liability must: (a) Include a statement of the final debt
owed by the vendor; (b) state the specific reasons why the authority
finds the entity to be a successor liable for the vendor's overpayment;
(c) cite to relevant statutory and regulatory provisions regarding
establishment of successor liability; (d) notify the entity of its
right to request an adjudicative proceeding; and (e) include a
statement that the debt may be collected in accordance with RCW
41.05A.170 through 41.05A.220 and this section.
(3) A notice of successor liability must be served in the manner
prescribed for the service of summons in a civil action or may be
served by certified mail, return receipt requested.
(4) An application for an adjudicative proceeding must be filed
with the director, or the director's designee, within twenty-eight
calendar days from the date of service of such notice and finding of
successor liability. The application must be written and served on the
director by registered or certified mail, or by personal service.
(5) If an application for an adjudicative proceeding is timely
filed, any collection action against the alleged successor entity is
stayed pending the final adjudicative order. The proceeding is
governed by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) If no application for adjudicative proceeding is timely filed,
the notice and finding of successor liability becomes final and the
successor entity is liable for the amount claimed in the notice. In
addition, the authority may charge the successor with any costs
associated with the collection of any final overpayment or debt
established against the successor.
(7) The authority has authority to adopt any rules it deems
necessary in order to implement this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.05A.170 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 104 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) When the authority determines that a vendor was overpaid by the
authority for either goods or services, or both, provided to authority
clients, except nursing homes under chapter 74.46 RCW, the authority
shall give written notice to the vendor. The notice must include the
amount of the overpayment, the basis for the claim, and the rights of
the vendor under this section.
(2) The notice may be served upon the vendor in the manner
prescribed for the service of a summons in civil action or be mailed to
the vendor at the last known address by certified mail, return receipt
requested, demanding payment within twenty days of the date of receipt.
(3) The vendor has the right to an adjudicative proceeding governed
by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and the rules
of the authority. The vendor's application for an adjudicative
proceeding must be in writing, state the basis for contesting the
overpayment notice, and include a copy of the authority's notice. The
application must be served on and received by the authority within
twenty-eight days of the vendor's receipt of the notice of overpayment.
The vendor must serve the authority in a manner providing proof of
receipt.
(4) Where an adjudicative proceeding has been requested, the
presiding or reviewing ((office [officer])) officer shall determine the
amount, if any, of the overpayment received by the vendor.
(5) If the vendor fails to attend or participate in the
adjudicative proceeding, upon a showing of valid service, the presiding
or reviewing officer may enter an administrative order declaring the
amount claimed in the notice to be assessed against the vendor and
subject to collection action by the authority.
(6) Failure to make an application for an adjudicative proceeding
within twenty-eight days of the date of notice results in the
establishment of a final debt against the vendor in the amount asserted
by the authority and that amount is subject to collection action. The
authority may also charge the vendor with any costs associated with the
collection of any final overpayment or debt established against the
vendor.
(7) The authority may enforce a final overpayment or debt through
lien and foreclosure, distraint, seizure and sale, order to withhold
and deliver, or other collection action available to the authority to
satisfy the debt due.
(8) Debts determined under this chapter are subject to collection
action without further necessity of action by a presiding or reviewing
officer. The authority may collect the debt in accordance with RCW
41.05A.120, 41.05A.130, and 41.05A.180. In addition, a vendor lien may
be subject to distraint and seizure and sale in the same manner as
prescribed for support liens in RCW 74.20A.130.
(9) Chapter 66, Laws of 1998 applies to overpayments for goods or
services provided on or after July 1, 1998.
(10) When the health care authority discovers through an audit or
other review that a vendor overpayment should have been imposed against
a vendor that has ceased doing business, the authority may assess,
establish, and enforce the fine or civil penalty against another vendor
that the authority determines is a successor as defined under RCW
41.05A.010.
(a) Before the overpayment may be assessed, the authority must
serve a notice of successor liability as described in section 6 of this
act.
(b) If the authority establishes that the alleged successor entity
is indeed a successor entity, the authority or the department of social
and health services may seek to establish the overpayment against the
successor entity as provided in chapters 41.05A and 43.20B RCW.
(11) The authority may adopt any rules ((consistent with)) it deems
necessary in order to implement this section.

--- END ---