BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.962 and 2009 c 469 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in RCW 82.08.963, purchasers who have
paid the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 on machinery and equipment used
directly in generating electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, biomass
energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources, anaerobic
digestion, technology that converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust,
or landfill gas as the principal source of power, or to sales of or
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing
such machinery and equipment, are eligible for an exemption as provided
in this section, but only if the purchaser develops with such
machinery, equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating not
less than one thousand watts of electricity.
(b) Beginning on July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, the tax
levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of machinery and
equipment described in (a) of this subsection that are used directly in
generating electricity or to sales of or charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment.
(c) Beginning on July 1, 2011, through June 30, ((2013)) 2015, the
amount of the exemption under this subsection (1) is equal to seventy-five percent of the state and local sales tax paid. The purchaser is
eligible for an exemption under this subsection (1)(c) in the form of
a remittance.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.962, the following
definitions apply:
(a) "Biomass energy" includes: (i) By-products of pulping and wood
manufacturing process; (ii) animal waste; (iii) solid organic fuels
from wood; (iv) forest or field residues; (v) wooden demolition or
construction debris; (vi) food waste; (vii) liquors derived from algae
and other sources; (viii) dedicated energy crops; (ix) biosolids; and
(x) yard waste. "Biomass energy" does not include wood pieces that
have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; wood from old growth
forests; or municipal solid waste.
(b) "Fuel cell" means an electrochemical reaction that generates
electricity by combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence
of a catalyst.
(c) "Landfill gas" means biomass fuel, of the type qualified for
federal tax credits under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 29 of the federal
internal revenue code, collected from a "landfill" as defined under RCW
70.95.030.
(d)(i) "Machinery and equipment" means fixtures, devices, and
support facilities that are integral and necessary to the generation of
electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, biomass energy, tidal or wave
energy, geothermal resources, anaerobic digestion, technology that
converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust, or landfill gas as the
principal source of power.
(ii) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (A) Hand-powered
tools; (B) property with a useful life of less than one year; (C)
repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal
working order; (D) replacement parts that do not increase productivity,
improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of machinery and
equipment; (E) buildings; or (F) building fixtures that are not
integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that are
permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building.
(3)(a) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity by wind energy, solar energy, biomass energy, tidal or wave
energy, geothermal resources, anaerobic digestion, technology that
converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust, or landfill gas power if
it provides any part of the process that captures the energy of the
wind, sun, biomass energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources,
anaerobic digestion, technology that converts otherwise lost energy
from exhaust, or landfill gas, converts that energy to electricity, and
stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for entry into or
operation in parallel with electric transmission and distribution
systems.
(b) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity by fuel cells if it provides any part of the process that
captures the energy of the fuel, converts that energy to electricity,
and stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for entry into or
operation in parallel with electric transmission and distribution
systems.
(4)(a) A purchaser claiming an exemption in the form of a
remittance under subsection (1)(c) of this section must pay the tax
imposed by RCW 82.08.020 and all applicable local sales taxes imposed
under the authority of chapters 82.14 and 81.104 RCW. The purchaser
may then apply to the department for remittance in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. A purchaser may not apply for a
remittance under this section more frequently than once per quarter.
The purchaser must specify the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases for which the exemption is claimed. The purchaser
must retain, in adequate detail, records to enable the department to
determine whether the purchaser is entitled to an exemption under this
section, including: Invoices; proof of tax paid; and documents
describing the machinery and equipment.
(b) The department must determine eligibility under this section
based on the information provided by the purchaser, which is subject to
audit verification by the department. The department must on a
quarterly basis remit exempted amounts to qualifying purchasers who
submitted applications during the previous quarter.
(5) This section expires July 1, ((2013)) 2015.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.962 and 2009 c 469 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in RCW 82.12.963, consumers who have paid
the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 on machinery and equipment used
directly in generating electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, biomass
energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources, anaerobic
digestion, technology that converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust,
or landfill gas as the principal source of power, or to sales of or
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing
such machinery and equipment, are eligible for an exemption as provided
in this section, but only if the purchaser develops with such
machinery, equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating not
less than one thousand watts of electricity.
(b) Beginning on July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, the
provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of
machinery and equipment described in (a) of this subsection that are
used directly in generating electricity or to sales of or charges made
for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery
and equipment.
(c) Beginning on July 1, 2011, through June 30, ((2013)) 2015, the
amount of the exemption under this subsection (1) is equal to seventy-five percent of the state and local sales tax paid. The consumer is
eligible for an exemption under this subsection (1)(c) in the form of
a remittance.
(2)(a) A person claiming an exemption in the form of a remittance
under subsection (1)(c) of this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.12.020 and all applicable local use taxes imposed under the
authority of chapters 82.14 and 81.104 RCW. The consumer may then
apply to the department for remittance in a form and manner prescribed
by the department. A consumer may not apply for a remittance under
this section more frequently than once per quarter. The consumer must
specify the amount of exempted tax claimed and the qualifying purchases
or acquisitions for which the exemption is claimed. The consumer must
retain, in adequate detail, records to enable the department to
determine whether the consumer is entitled to an exemption under this
section, including: Invoices; proof of tax paid; and documents
describing the machinery and equipment.
(b) The department must determine eligibility under this section
based on the information provided by the consumer, which is subject to
audit verification by the department. The department must on a
quarterly basis remit exempted amounts to qualifying consumers who
submitted applications during the previous quarter.
(3) Purchases exempt under RCW 82.08.962 are also exempt from the
tax imposed under RCW 82.12.020.
(4) The definitions in RCW 82.08.962 apply to this section.
(5) This section expires June 30, ((2013)) 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2013.

--- END ---