BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.20.110 and 1988 c 176 s 910 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to provide additional funds for the coordination and
provision of community services for persons with developmental
disabilities or mental health services, the county governing authority
of each county in the state ((shall)) must budget and levy annually a
tax in a sum equal to the amount which would be raised by a levy of two
and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against the
taxable property in the county, or as such amount is modified pursuant
to subsection (2) or (3) of this section, to be used for such
purposes((: PROVIDED, That)). However, all or part of the funds
collected from the tax levied for the purposes of this section may be
transferred to the state of Washington, department of social and health
services, for the purpose of obtaining federal matching funds to
provide and coordinate community services for persons with
developmental disabilities and mental health services. In the event a
county elects to transfer such tax funds to the state for this purpose,
the state ((shall)) must grant these moneys and the additional funds
received as matching funds to service-providing community agencies or
community boards in the county which has made such transfer, pursuant
to the plan approved by the county, as provided by chapters 71.24 and
71.28 RCW and by chapter 71A.14 RCW, all as now or hereafter amended.
(2) The amount of a levy allocated to the purposes specified in
this section may be reduced in the same proportion as the regular
property tax levy of the county is reduced by chapter 84.55 RCW.
(3)(a) The amount of a levy allocated to the purposes specified in
this section may be modified from the amount required by subsection (1)
of this section as follows:
(i) If the certified levy is reduced from the preceding year's
certified levy, the amount of the levy allocated to the purposes
specified in this section may be reduced by no more than the same
percentage as the certified levy is reduced from the preceding year's
certified levy;
(ii) If the certified levy is increased from the preceding year's
certified levy, the amount of the levy allocated to the purposes
specified in this section must be increased from the amount of the levy
so allocated in the previous year by at least the same percentage as
the certified levy is increased from the preceding year's certified
levy. However, the amount of the levy allocated to the purposes
specified in this section does not have to be increased under this
subsection (3)(a)(ii) for the portion of a certified levy increase
resulting from a voter-approved increase under RCW 84.55.050 that is
dedicated to a specific purpose; or
(iii) If the certified levy is unchanged from the preceding year's
certified levy, the amount of the levy allocated to the purposes
specified in this section must be equal to or greater than the amount
of the levy so allocated in the preceding year.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "certified levy" means the
property tax levy for general county purposes certified to the county
assessor as required by RCW 84.52.070, excluding any amounts certified
under chapters 84.69 and 84.68 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 73.08.080 and 2005 c 250 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority in each county ((shall)) must levy,
in addition to the taxes now levied by law, a tax in a sum equal to the
amount which would be raised by not less than one and one-eighth cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value, and not greater than twenty-seven cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against the taxable
property of their respective counties, to be levied and collected as
now prescribed by law for the assessment and collection of taxes, for
the purpose of creating a veterans' assistance fund. Expenditures from
the veterans' assistance fund, and interest earned on balances from the
fund, may be used only for:
(a) The veterans' assistance programs authorized by RCW 73.08.010;
(b) The burial or cremation of a deceased indigent veteran or
deceased family member of an indigent veteran as authorized by RCW
73.08.070; and
(c) The direct and indirect costs incurred in the administration of
the fund as authorized by subsection (2) of this section.
(2) If the funds on deposit in the veterans' assistance fund, less
outstanding warrants, on the first Tuesday in September exceed the
lesser of the expected yield of one and one-eighth cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value against the taxable property of the county or
the expected yield of a levy determined as set forth in subsection (5)
of this section, the county legislative authority may levy a lesser
amount than would otherwise be required under subsection (1) or (5) of
this section.
(3) The direct and indirect costs incurred in the administration of
the veterans' assistance fund ((shall)) must be computed by the county
auditor, or the chief financial officer in a county operating under a
charter, not less than annually. Following the computation of these
direct and indirect costs, an amount equal to these costs may then be
transferred from the veterans' assistance fund to the county current
expense fund.
(((3))) (4) The amount of a levy allocated to the purposes
specified in this section may be reduced in the same proportion as the
regular property tax levy of the county is reduced by chapter 84.55
RCW.
(5)(a) The amount of a levy allocated to the purposes specified in
this section may be modified from the amount required by subsection (1)
of this section as follows:
(i) If the certified levy is reduced from the preceding year's
certified levy, the amount of the levy allocated to the purposes
specified in this section may be reduced by no more than the same
percentage as the certified levy is reduced from the preceding year's
certified levy;
(ii) If the certified levy is increased from the preceding year's
certified levy, the amount of the levy allocated to the purposes
specified in this section may not be less than the base allocation
increased by the same percentage as the certified levy is increased
from the preceding year's certified levy. However, the amount of the
levy allocated to the purposes specified in this section does not have
to be increased under this subsection (5)(a)(ii) for the portion of a
certified levy increase resulting from a voter-approved increase under
RCW 84.55.050 that is dedicated to a specific purpose; or
(iii) If the certified levy is unchanged from the preceding year's
certified levy, the amount of the levy allocated to the purposes
specified in this section must be equal to or greater than the base
allocation.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Base allocation" means the most recent allocation that was not
reduced under subsection (2) of this section.
(ii) "Certified levy" means the property tax levy for general
county purposes certified to the county assessor as required by RCW
84.52.070, excluding any amounts certified under chapters 84.69 and
84.68 RCW.

--- END ---