BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that maintaining
an accessible, high quality public postsecondary system has far-reaching benefits for the individual success of Washingtonians
throughout our state, as well as for a shared society as a whole.
Higher education not only opens the door to more jobs in today's
economy, it is also a key pillar of a working democracy and civilized
society.
(2) The legislature also finds that the state's declining
investment in its public institutions of higher education has
increasingly shifted the burden of the costs of undergraduate
postsecondary education to Washington students and families, who now
cover sixty-seven percent of costs through tuition. As undergraduate
resident tuition rates have skyrocketed in recent years, the state's
investments in student financial assistance have not kept pace with the
number of students qualifying for aid, a trend that has led to historic
rates of student loan debt throughout the state. The legislature
recognizes that the state now invests less in its public baccalaureate
institutions than it did twenty years ago. Since the 2007-2009
biennium, state funding for these public institutions has been cut by
forty-one percent. By the end of the 2011-2013 biennium, the state's
share of the cost of educating a student at public institutions of
higher education will have dropped from seventy-two percent a decade
ago to thirty-seven percent.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature to preserve broad access to
high quality postsecondary education opportunities throughout the state
and to begin to restore the funding balance between students and the
state.
(4) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to freeze
tuition increases for Washington resident undergraduate students for
the 2013-2015 biennium, provided that no less than two hundred twenty-five million dollars be appropriated and proportionally divided among
the six public baccalaureate institutions of higher education in
Washington state, for the purpose of offsetting revenue that would
otherwise be obtained by scheduled tuition increases.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 914 and 2012 c 228
s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning in the 2011-12 academic year, reductions or increases
in full-time tuition fees shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act for resident undergraduate students at community and
technical colleges. The governing boards of the state universities,
regional universities, and The Evergreen State College; and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including nonresident students, summer school students, and students in
other self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Except during the
2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the state board for community and technical
colleges may pilot or institute differential tuition models. The board
may define scale, scope, and rationale for the models.
(3)(a) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year and through the end
of the 2014-15 academic year, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, the governing boards of the state universities, the
regional universities, and The Evergreen State College may reduce or
increase full-time tuition fees for all students, including summer
school students and students in other self-supporting degree programs.
Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may exceed the fiscal
growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made for all or portions
of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or students; however,
during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, reductions or increases in
tuition must be uniform among resident undergraduate students.
(b) For the 2013-14 and 2014-15 academic years, if after accounting
for maintenance-level appropriations the sum of two hundred twenty-five
million dollars is appropriated from the general fund to be divided
among the state universities, the regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College in the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act,
each institution's full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduates
shall not exceed its 2012-13 academic year resident undergraduate
tuition levels.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Each governing board shall make public
its proposal for tuition and fee increases twenty-one days before the
governing board of the institution considers adoption and allow
opportunity for public comment. However, the requirement to make
public a proposal for tuition and fee increases twenty-one days before
the governing board considers adoption shall not apply if the omnibus
appropriations act has not passed the legislature by May 15th.
Governing boards shall be required to provide data regarding the
percentage of students receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and
the percentage of total costs of attendance paid for by aid.
(((c))) (d) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each
academic year, the state board for community and technical college
system shall consult with existing student associations or
organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the
impacts of potential tuition increases. The state board for community
and technical colleges shall provide data regarding the percentage of
students receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and the
percentage of total costs of attendance paid for by aid.
(4) Beginning with the 2015-16 academic year through the 2018-19
academic year, the governing boards of the state universities, regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College may set tuition for
resident undergraduates as follows:
(a) If state funding for a college or university falls below the
state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year 2011,
the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in (d) of
this subsection, reduce enrollments, or both;
(b) If state funding for a college or university is at least at the
level of state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year
2011, the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in
(d) of this subsection and shall continue to at least maintain the
actual enrollment levels for fiscal year 2011 or increase enrollments
as required in the omnibus appropriations act;
(c) If state funding is increased so that combined with resident
undergraduate tuition the sixtieth percentile of the total per-student
funding at similar public institutions of higher education in the
global challenge states under RCW 28B.15.068 is exceeded, the governing
board shall decrease tuition by the amount needed for the total per-student funding to be at the sixtieth percentile under RCW 28B.15.068;
and
(d) The amount of tuition set by the governing board for an
institution under this subsection (4) may not exceed the sixtieth
percentile of the resident undergraduate tuition of similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement program
through an interlocal agreement between a school district and a
community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through
28A.175.110.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose
of obtaining a high school diploma.
(8) Beginning in the 2019-20 academic year, reductions or increases
in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduates at four-year
institutions of higher education shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(9) The legislative advisory committee to the committee on advanced
tuition payment established in RCW 28B.95.170 shall:
(a) Review the impact of differential tuition rates on the funded
status and future unit price of the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program; and
(b) No later than January 14, 2013, make a recommendation to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding
how differential tuition should be addressed in order to maintain the
ongoing solvency of the Washington advanced college tuition payment
program.

--- END ---