BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that major
technological, economic, and demographic changes have increased the
demand for training and education to maintain a high quality,
competitive work force, and a well-educated populace to meet the
challenges of the twenty-first century. Therefore, the legislature
finds that there is increasing demand for postsecondary educational
opportunities for citizens of the state of Washington.
The legislature declares that the policy of the state of Washington
is to improve the access to, and the quality of, this state's
postsecondary educational system. The budgetary policy of the state is
to provide a level of fiscal commitment to the state's postsecondary
educational system commensurate with the responsibility of the state to
the educational and professional improvement of its citizens and work
force.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.10.776 and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the policy of the state of Washington that the ((essential
requirements level)) state budget ((calculation)) for institutions of
higher education include enrollment levels necessary to ((maintain, by
educational sector, the participation rate funded in the 1993 fiscal
year. The participation rate shall be based on the state's estimated
population ages seventeen and above by appropriate age groups)) meet
the demand for higher education in the state.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.10.778 and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington that((, for new
enrollments provided under RCW 28B.10.776, the essential requirements
level budget calculation for those enrollments shall)) the state
omnibus appropriations act must, each biennium, at a minimum, include
a funding level per full-time equivalent student that is equal to the
per-student rate assumed in the omnibus appropriations act for the last
fiscal year of the previous biennium ((for the instructional, primary
support, and library programs,)) plus ((an)) inflation ((factor. The
inflation factor should be equivalent to the inflation factor used to
calculate basic education in the common school system budget request
submitted by the governor)).
(2) As used in this section, "inflation" means the percentage
change in the implicit price deflator for personal consumption
expenditures for the United States as published for the most recent
twelve-month period by the bureau of economic analysis of the federal
department of commerce.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.10.784 and 2012 c 229 s 517 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((participation rate)) enrollment levels used to calculate
((enrollment)) state funding levels under RCW 28B.10.776 and
((28B.10.782)) 28B.10.778 shall be ((based on)) the fall enrollment
reported in the higher education enrollment report as maintained by the
((office of financial management, fall enrollment as reported in the
management information system of the state board for community and
technical colleges, and the corresponding fall population forecast by
the office of financial management. Formal estimates of the state
participation rates and enrollment levels necessary to fulfill the
requirements of RCW 28B.10.776 and 28B.10.782 shall be determined by
the office of financial management)) caseload forecast council as part
of its responsibility to develop and maintain student enrollment
forecasts for colleges and universities under RCW 43.62.050. ((Formal
estimates of)) The state ((participation rates and)) enrollment levels
required by this section shall be based on procedures and standards
established by a technical work group consisting of staff from the
student achievement council, the public four-year institutions of
higher education, the state board for community and technical colleges,
the fiscal and higher education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate, and the ((office of financial
management. Formal estimates of the state participation rates and))
caseload forecast council. The enrollment levels required by this
section shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and senate on or before November 15th ((of)) each
((even-numbered)) year. ((The student achievement council shall
periodically review the enrollment goals set forth in RCW 28B.10.776
and 28B.10.782 and submit recommendations concerning modification of
these goals to the governor and to the higher education committees of
the house of representatives and the senate.))

Sec. 5 RCW 43.88C.010 and 2012 c 217 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The caseload forecast council is hereby created. The council
shall consist of two individuals appointed by the governor and four
individuals, one of whom is appointed by the chairperson of each of the
two largest political caucuses in the senate and house of
representatives. The chair of the council shall be selected from among
the four caucus appointees. The council may select such other officers
as the members deem necessary.
(2) The council shall employ a caseload forecast supervisor to
supervise the preparation of all caseload forecasts. As used in this
chapter, "supervisor" means the caseload forecast supervisor.
(3) Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the
council is required for any decisions regarding employment of the
supervisor. Employment of the supervisor shall terminate after each
term of three years. At the end of the first year of each three-year
term the council shall consider extension of the supervisor's term by
one year. The council may fix the compensation of the supervisor. The
supervisor shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of
this section.
(4) The caseload forecast council shall oversee the preparation of
and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four members, the
official state caseload forecasts prepared under RCW 43.88C.020. If
the council is unable to approve a forecast before a date required in
RCW 43.88C.020, the supervisor shall submit the forecast without
approval and the forecast shall have the same effect as if approved by
the council.
(5) A councilmember who does not cast an affirmative vote for
approval of the official caseload forecast may request, and the
supervisor shall provide, an alternative forecast based on assumptions
specified by the member.
(6) Members of the caseload forecast council shall serve without
additional compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council
or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative
members of the council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means:
(a) The number of persons expected to meet entitlement requirements
and require the services of public assistance programs, state
correctional institutions, state correctional noninstitutional
supervision, state institutions for juvenile offenders, the common
school system, long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, and
adoption support;
(b) The number of students who are eligible for the Washington
college bound scholarship program and are expected to attend an
institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030;
(c) The number of students expected to enroll in an institution of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 in order to calculate
state funding as provided in RCW 28B.10.784.
(8) The caseload forecast council shall forecast the temporary
assistance for needy families and the working connections child care
programs as a courtesy.
(9) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
provided in RCW 43.88.020 apply to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.10.780 (Budget calculation -- Funding level) and 1993
sp.s. c 15 s 4; and
(2) RCW 28B.10.782 (Budget calculation -- Increased enrollment target
level -- Availability of information) and 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 5.

--- END ---