BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 101 RCW 82.14B.020 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Consumer" means a person who purchases a prepaid wireless
telecommunications service in a retail transaction.
(2) "Emergency services communication system" means a multicounty
or countywide communications network, including an enhanced 911
emergency communications system, which provides rapid public access for
coordinated dispatching of services, personnel, equipment, and
facilities for police, fire, medical, or other emergency services.
(((2))) (3) "Enhanced 911 emergency communications system" means a
public communications system consisting of a network, database, and on-premises equipment that is accessed by dialing or accessing 911 and
that enables reporting police, fire, medical, or other emergency
situations to a public safety answering point. The system includes the
capability to selectively route incoming 911 voice or data to the
appropriate public safety answering point that operates in a defined
911 service area and the capability to automatically display the name,
address, and telephone number of incoming 911 voice or data at the
appropriate public safety answering point. "Enhanced 911 emergency
communications system" includes the modernization to next generation
911 systems.
(((3))) (4) "Interconnected voice over internet protocol service"
has the same meaning as provided by the federal communications
commission in 47 C.F.R. Sec. 9.3 on January 1, 2009, or a subsequent
date determined by the department.
(((4))) (5) "Interconnected voice over internet protocol service
line" means an interconnected voice over internet protocol service that
offers an active telephone number or successor dialing protocol
assigned by a voice over internet protocol provider to a voice over
internet protocol service customer that has inbound and outbound
calling capability, which can directly access a public safety answering
point when such a voice over internet protocol service customer has a
place of primary use in the state.
(((5))) (6) "Local exchange company" has the meaning ascribed to it
in RCW 80.04.010.
(((6))) (7) "Place of primary use" means the street address
representative of where the subscriber's use of the radio access line
or interconnected voice over internet protocol service line occurs,
which must be:
(a) The residential street address or primary business street
address of the subscriber; and
(b) In the case of radio access lines, within the licensed service
area of the home service provider.
(((7))) (8) "Prepaid wireless telecommunications service" means a
telecommunications service that provides the right to use mobile
wireless service as well as other nontelecommunications services
including the download of digital products delivered electronically,
content, and ancillary services, which must be paid for in full in
advance and sold in predetermined units or dollars.
(9) "Private telecommunications system" has the meaning ascribed to
it in RCW 80.04.010.
(((8))) (10) "Radio access line" means the telephone number
assigned to or used by a subscriber for two-way local wireless voice
service available to the public for hire from a radio communications
service company. Radio access lines include, but are not limited to,
radio-telephone communications lines used in cellular telephone
service, personal communications services, and network radio access
lines, or their functional and competitive equivalent. Radio access
lines do not include lines that provide access to one-way signaling
service, such as paging service, or to communications channels suitable
only for data transmission, or to nonlocal radio access line service,
such as wireless roaming service, or to a private telecommunications
system.
(((9))) (11) "Radio communications service company" has the meaning
ascribed to it in RCW 80.04.010, except that it does not include radio
paging providers. It does include those persons or entities that
provide commercial mobile radio services, as defined by 47 U.S.C. Sec.
332(d)(1), and both facilities-based and nonfacilities-based resellers.
(((10))) (12) "Retail transaction" means the purchase of prepaid
wireless telecommunications service from a seller for any purpose other
than resale.
(13) "Seller" means a person who sells prepaid wireless
telecommunications service to another person.
(14)(a) "Subscriber" means, except as provided otherwise in (b) of
this subsection, the retail purchaser of telecommunications service, a
competitive telephone service, or interconnected voice over internet
protocol service.
(((11))) (b) The term "subscriber" does not include a consumer, as
defined in this section.
(15) "Switched access line" means the telephone service line which
connects a subscriber's main telephone(s) or equivalent main
telephone(s) to the local exchange company's switching office.

Sec. 102 RCW 82.14B.040 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.08.0289 in section 201 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
80.36.430 in section 301 of this act, and the 2013 amendments to RCW
43.20A.725 in section 302 of this act:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) The state enhanced 911 excise tax and the county enhanced 911
excise tax on switched access lines must be collected from the
subscriber by the local exchange company providing the switched access
line.
(((2))) (b) The state enhanced 911 excise tax and the county
enhanced 911 excise tax on radio access lines must be collected from
the subscriber by the radio communications service company, including
those companies that resell radio access lines, providing the radio
access line to the subscriber, and the seller of prepaid wireless
telecommunications service.
(((3))) (c) The state and county enhanced 911 excise taxes on
interconnected voice over internet protocol service lines must be
collected from the subscriber by the interconnected voice over internet
protocol service company providing the interconnected voice over
internet protocol service line to the subscriber.
(((4))) (d) The amount of the tax must be stated separately on the
billing statement which is sent to the subscriber.
(2)(a) The state enhanced 911 excise tax and the county enhanced
911 excise tax must be collected by the seller of a prepaid wireless
telecommunications service for each retail transaction occurring in
this state at the point of sale. Such tax must be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state under chapter 82.08 RCW. For
purposes of this subsection (2), the retail transaction occurs in this
state if it is sourced to this state under the provisions of RCW
82.32.520(3)(c).
(b) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.08 and 82.32 RCW
applicable to sales taxes are also applicable to the administration,
levy, collection, and remittance of the tax imposed under this
subsection (2).
(c) The department must transfer all tax proceeds remitted by a
seller under this subsection (2) as provided in RCW 82.14B.030.
(d) When practicable, the amount of the tax imposed under this
subsection (2) must be separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or
other similar document that is provided to the consumer by the seller.
When a separate disclosure to the consumer is not practicable, the
seller may prominently display a sign notifying consumers of the tax.

Sec. 103 RCW 82.14B.042 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.08.0289 in section 201 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
80.36.430 in section 301 of this act, and the 2013 amendments to RCW
43.20A.725 in section 302 of this act:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) The state and county enhanced 911 excise taxes imposed by this
chapter must be paid by the subscriber or consumer to the local
exchange company providing the switched access line, the radio
communications service company providing the radio access line, the
seller of prepaid wireless telecommunications service, or the
interconnected voice over internet protocol service company providing
the interconnected voice over internet protocol service line. Each
local exchange company, each radio communications service company, each
seller of prepaid wireless telecommunications service, and each
interconnected voice over internet protocol service company must
collect from the subscriber the full amount of the taxes payable. The
state and county enhanced 911 excise taxes required by this chapter to
be collected by a company are deemed to be held in trust by the company
until paid to the department. Any local exchange company, radio
communications service company, seller of prepaid wireless
telecommunications service, or interconnected voice over internet
protocol service company that appropriates or converts the tax
collected to its own use or to any use other than the payment of the
tax to the extent that the money collected is not available for payment
on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor((.));
(((2))) (b) If any local exchange company, radio communications
service company, seller of prepaid wireless telecommunications service,
or interconnected voice over internet protocol service company fails to
collect the state or county enhanced 911 excise tax or, after
collecting the tax, fails to pay it to the department in the manner
prescribed by this chapter, whether such failure is the result of its
own act or the result of acts or conditions beyond its control, the
company is personally liable to the state for the amount of the tax,
unless the company has taken from the buyer in good faith
documentation, in a form and manner prescribed by the department,
stating that the buyer is not a subscriber or consumer or is otherwise
not liable for the state or county enhanced 911 excise tax((.));
(((3))) (c) The amount of tax, until paid by the subscriber to the
local exchange company, the radio communications service company, the
interconnected voice over internet protocol service company, or to the
department, constitutes a debt from the subscriber to the company. Any
company that fails or refuses to collect the tax as required with
intent to violate the provisions of this chapter or to gain some
advantage or benefit, either direct or indirect, and any subscriber who
refuses to pay any tax due under this chapter is guilty of a
misdemeanor. The state and county enhanced 911 excise taxes required
by this chapter to be collected by the local exchange company, radio
communications service company, or interconnected voice over internet
protocol service company must be stated separately on the billing
statement that is sent to the subscriber((.)); and
(((4))) (d) If a subscriber or consumer has failed to pay to the
local exchange company, radio communications service company, seller of
prepaid wireless telecommunications service, or interconnected voice
over internet protocol service company the state or county enhanced 911
excise taxes imposed by this chapter and the company has not paid the
amount of the tax to the department, the department may, in its
discretion, proceed directly against the subscriber or consumer for
collection of the tax, in which case a penalty of ten percent may be
added to the amount of the tax for failure of the subscriber or
consumer to pay the tax to the company, regardless of when the tax is
collected by the department. Tax under this chapter is due as provided
under RCW 82.14B.061.
(2) The state and county enhanced 911 excise taxes collected on the
retail transaction of a prepaid wireless telecommunications service
under RCW 82.14B.040(2), must be paid and collected as provided in RCW
82.14B.040(2).

Sec. 104 RCW 82.14B.030 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.08.0289 in section 201 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
80.36.430 in section 301 of this act, and the 2013 amendments to RCW
43.20A.725 in section 302 of this act:
(1) The legislative authority of a county may impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of switched access lines in an
amount not exceeding seventy cents per month for each switched access
line. The amount of tax must be uniform for each switched access line.
Each county must provide notice of the tax to all local exchange
companies serving in the county at least sixty days in advance of the
date on which the first payment is due. The tax imposed under this
subsection must be remitted to the department by local exchange
companies on a tax return provided by the department. The tax must be
deposited in the county enhanced 911 excise tax account as provided in
RCW 82.14B.063.
(2) The legislative authority of a county may also impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of radio access lines: (a) By
subscribers whose place of primary use is located within the county in
an amount not exceeding seventy cents per month for each radio access
line; and (b) by consumers whose retail transaction occurs within the
county in an amount not exceeding seventy cents per retail transaction.
The amount of tax must be uniform for each radio access line. The
county must provide notice of the tax to all radio communications
service companies serving in the county at least sixty days in advance
of the date on which the first payment is due. The tax imposed under
this section must be remitted to the department by radio communications
service companies, including those companies that resell radio access
lines and sellers of prepaid wireless telecommunications services, on
a tax return provided by the department. The tax must be deposited in
the county enhanced 911 excise tax account as provided in RCW
82.14B.063.
(3)(a) The legislative authority of a county may impose a county
enhanced 911 excise tax on the use of interconnected voice over
internet protocol service lines in an amount not exceeding seventy
cents per month for each interconnected voice over internet protocol
service line. The amount of tax must be uniform for each line and must
be levied on no more than the number of voice over internet protocol
service lines on an account that are capable of simultaneous
unrestricted outward calling to the public switched telephone network.
(b) The interconnected voice over internet protocol service company
must use the place of primary use of the subscriber to determine which
county's enhanced 911 excise tax applies to the service provided to the
subscriber.
(c) The tax imposed under this section must be remitted to the
department by interconnected voice over internet protocol service
companies on a tax return provided by the department.
(d) The tax must be deposited in the county enhanced 911 excise tax
account as provided in RCW 82.14B.063.
(e) To the extent that a local exchange carrier and an
interconnected voice over internet protocol service company
contractually jointly provide a single service line, only one service
company is responsible for remitting the enhanced 911 excise taxes, and
nothing in this section precludes service companies who jointly provide
service from agreeing by contract which of them ((shall)) must remit
the taxes collected.
(4) Counties imposing a county enhanced 911 excise tax must provide
an annual update to the enhanced 911 coordinator detailing the
proportion of their county enhanced 911 excise tax that is being spent
on:
(a) Efforts to modernize their existing enhanced 911 communications
system; and
(b) Enhanced 911 operational costs.
(5) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all switched
access lines in the state. The amount of tax may not exceed twenty-five cents per month for each switched access line. The tax must be
uniform for each switched access line. The tax imposed under this
subsection must be remitted to the department by local exchange
companies on a tax return provided by the department. Tax proceeds
must be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911 account created
in RCW 38.52.540.
(6) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all radio access
lines used: (a) By subscribers whose place of primary use is located
within the state in an amount of twenty-five cents per month for each
radio access line; and (b) by consumers whose retail transaction occurs
within the state in an amount not exceeding twenty-five cents per
retail transaction. The tax must be uniform for each radio access
line. The tax imposed under this section must be remitted to the
department by radio communications service companies, including those
companies that resell radio access lines, on a tax return provided by
the department. Tax proceeds must be deposited by the treasurer in the
enhanced 911 account created in RCW 38.52.540. The tax imposed under
this section is not subject to the state sales and use tax or any local
tax.
(7) A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all
interconnected voice over internet protocol service lines in the state.
The amount of tax may not exceed twenty-five cents per month for each
interconnected voice over internet protocol service line whose place of
primary use is located in the state. The amount of tax must be uniform
for each line and must be levied on no more than the number of voice
over internet protocol service lines on an account that are capable of
simultaneous unrestricted outward calling to the public switched
telephone network. The tax imposed under this subsection must be
remitted to the department by interconnected voice over internet
protocol service companies on a tax return provided by the department.
Tax proceeds must be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911
account created in RCW 38.52.540.
(8) For calendar year 2011, the taxes imposed by subsections (5)
and (7) of this section must be set at their maximum rate. By August
31, 2011, and by August 31st of each year thereafter, the state
enhanced 911 coordinator must recommend the level for the next year of
the state enhanced 911 excise tax imposed by subsections (5) and (7) of
this section, based on a systematic cost and revenue analysis, to the
utilities and transportation commission. The commission must by the
following October 31st determine the level of the state enhanced 911
excise taxes imposed by subsections (5) and (7) of this section for the
following year.

Sec. 105 RCW 82.14B.200 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.08.0289 in section 201 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
80.36.430 in section 301 of this act, and the 2013 amendments to RCW
43.20A.725 in section 302 of this act:
(1) Unless a seller, local exchange company, radio communications
service company, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service
company has taken from the buyer documentation, in a form and manner
prescribed by the department, stating that the buyer is not a
subscriber, consumer, or is otherwise not liable for the tax, the
burden of proving that a sale of the use of a switched access line,
radio access line, or interconnected voice over internet protocol
service line was not a sale to a subscriber, consumer, or was not
otherwise subject to the tax is upon the person who made the sale.
(2) If a seller, local exchange company, radio communications
service company, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service
company does not receive documentation, in a form and manner prescribed
by the department, stating that the buyer is not a subscriber,
consumer, or is otherwise not liable for the tax at the time of the
sale, have such documentation on file at the time of the sale, or
obtain such documentation from the buyer within a reasonable time after
the sale, the seller, local exchange company, radio communications
service company, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service
company remains liable for the tax as provided in RCW 82.14B.042,
unless the seller, local exchange company, radio communications service
company, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service company
can demonstrate facts and circumstances according to rules adopted by
the department that show the sale was properly made without payment of
the state or county enhanced 911 excise tax.
(3) The penalty imposed by RCW 82.32.291 may not be assessed on
state or county enhanced 911 excise taxes due but not paid as a result
of the improper use of documentation stating that the buyer is not a
subscriber or consumer or is otherwise not liable for the state or
county enhanced 911 excise tax. This subsection does not prohibit or
restrict the application of other penalties authorized by law.

Sec. 201 RCW 82.08.0289 and 2007 c 6 s 1006 and 2007 c 6 s 1005
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.040 in section 102 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.042 in section 103 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.030 in section 104 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.200 in section 105 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
80.36.430 in section 301 of this act, and the 2013 amendments to RCW
43.20A.725 in section 302 of this act:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of((:
(a) Local service;
(b) Coin-operated telephone service; and
(c))) mobile telecommunications services, including any toll
service, provided to a customer whose place of primary use is outside
this state.
(2)(a) The definitions in RCW 82.04.065, as well as the
definition((s)) in this subsection, apply to this section.
(((a) "Local service" means ancillary services and
telecommunications service, as those terms are defined in RCW
82.04.065, other than toll service, provided to an individual
subscribing to a residential class of telephone service.))
(b) "Toll service" does not include customer access line charges
for access to a toll calling network.
(((c) "Coin-operated telephone service" means a telecommunications
service paid for by inserting money into a telephone accepting direct
deposits of money to operate.))

Sec. 301 RCW 80.36.430 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 968 are each
amended to read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.040 in section 102 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.042 in section 103 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.030 in section 104 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.200 in section 105 of this act, and the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.08.0289 in section 201 of this act:
(1) The Washington telephone assistance program shall be funded by
((a telephone assistance excise tax on all switched access lines)) the
legislature by means of a biennial general fund appropriation to the
department and by funds from any federal government or other programs
for this purpose. ((Switched access lines are defined in RCW
82.14B.020. The telephone assistance excise tax shall be applied
equally to all residential and business access lines not to exceed
fourteen cents per month. The department shall submit an approved
annual budget for the Washington telephone assistance program to the
department of revenue no later than March 1st prior to the beginning of
each fiscal year. The department of revenue shall then determine the
amount of telephone assistance excise tax to be placed on each switched
access line and shall inform local exchange companies and the utilities
and transportation commission of this amount no later than May 1st.
The department of revenue shall determine the amount of telephone
assistance excise tax by dividing the total of the program budget
funded by the telephone assistance excise tax, as submitted by the
department, by the total number of switched access lines in the prior
calendar year. The telephone assistance excise tax shall be separately
identified on each ratepayer's bill as the "Washington telephone
assistance program." All money collected from the telephone assistance
excise tax shall be transferred to a telephone assistance fund
administered by the department.))
(2) Local exchange companies shall bill the fund for their expenses
incurred in offering the telephone assistance program, including
administrative and program expenses. The department shall disburse the
money to the local exchange companies. The department is exempted from
having to conclude a contract with local exchange companies in order to
effect this reimbursement. The department shall recover its
administrative costs from the fund. The department may specify by rule
the range and extent of administrative and program expenses that will
be reimbursed to local exchange companies.
(3) The department shall enter into an agreement with the
department of commerce for an amount not to exceed eight percent of the
prior fiscal year's total revenue for the administrative and program
expenses of providing community service voice mail services. The
community service voice mail service may include toll-free lines in
community action agencies through which recipients can access their
community service voice mailboxes at no charge.
(((4) During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 biennia, the department
shall enter into an agreement with the WIN 211 organization for
operational support. During the 2011-2013 biennium, the department
shall provide five hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year for this
purpose.
(5) During the 2009-2011 biennium, the telephone assistance fund
shall also be used in support of the economic services administration
call centers and related operations.))

Sec. 302 RCW 43.20A.725 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 944 are each
amended to read as follows:
Subject to the enactment into law of the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.040 in section 102 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.042 in section 103 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.030 in section 104 of this act, the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.14B.200 in section 105 of this act, and the 2013 amendments to RCW
82.08.0289 in section 201 of this act:
(1) The department, through the sole authority of the office or its
successor organization, shall maintain a program whereby an individual
of school age or older who possesses a hearing or speech impairment is
provided with telecommunications equipment, software, and/or peripheral
devices, digital or otherwise, that is determined by the office to be
necessary for such a person to access and use telecommunications
transmission services effectively.
(2) The department, through the sole authority of the office or its
successor organization, shall maintain a program where
telecommunications relay services of a human or electronic nature will
be provided to connect hearing impaired, deaf-blind, or speech impaired
persons with persons who do not have a hearing or speech impairment.
Such telecommunications relay services shall provide the ability for an
individual who has a hearing or speech impairment to engage in voice,
tactile, or visual communication by wire or radio with a hearing
individual in a manner that is functionally equivalent to the ability
of an individual who does not have a hearing or speech impairment to
communicate using voice or visual communication services by wire or
radio subject to subsection (4)(b) of this section.
(3) The telecommunications relay service and equipment distribution
program may operate in such a manner as to provide communications
transmission opportunities that are capable of incorporating new
technologies that have demonstrated benefits consistent with the intent
of this chapter and are in the best interests of the citizens of this
state.
(4) The office shall administer and control the award of money to
all parties incurring costs in implementing and maintaining
telecommunications services, programs, equipment, and technical support
services according to this section. The relay service contract shall
be awarded to an individual company registered as a telecommunications
company by the utilities and transportation commission, to a group of
registered telecommunications companies, or to any other company or
organization determined by the office as qualified to provide relay
services, contingent upon that company or organization being approved
as a registered telecommunications company prior to final contract
approval. The relay system providers and telecommunications equipment
vendors shall be selected on the basis of cost-effectiveness and
utility to the greatest extent possible under the program and technical
specifications established by the office.
(a) To the extent funds are available under the then-current rate
and not otherwise held in reserve or required for other purposes
authorized by this chapter, the office may award contracts for
communications and related services and equipment for hearing impaired
or speech impaired individuals accessing or receiving services provided
by, or contracted for, the department to meet access obligations under
Title 2 of the federal Americans with disabilities act or related
federal regulations.
(b) The office shall perform its duties under this section with the
goal of achieving functional equivalency of access to and use of
telecommunications services similar to the enjoyment of access to and
use of such services experienced by an individual who does not have a
hearing or speech impairment only to the extent that funds are
available under the then-current rate and not otherwise held in reserve
or required for other purposes authorized by this chapter.
(5) The program shall be funded by ((a telecommunications relay
service (TRS) excise tax applied to each switched access line provided
by the local exchange companies. The office shall determine, in
consultation with the office's program advisory committee, the budget
needed to fund the program on an annual basis, including both
operational costs and a reasonable amount for capital improvements such
as equipment upgrade and replacement. The budget proposed by the
office, together with documentation and supporting materials, shall be
submitted to the office of financial management for review and
approval. The approved budget shall be given by the department in an
annual budget to the department of revenue no later than March 1st
prior to the beginning of the fiscal year. The department of revenue
shall then determine the amount of telecommunications relay service
excise tax to be placed on each switched access line and shall inform
local exchange companies and the utilities and transportation
commission of this amount no later than May 1st. The department of
revenue shall determine the amount of telecommunications relay service
excise tax to be collected in the following fiscal year by dividing the
total of the program budget, as submitted by the office, by the total
number of switched access lines in the prior calendar year, as reported
to the department of revenue under chapter 82.14B RCW, and shall not
exercise any further oversight of the program under this subsection
other than administering the collection of the telecommunications relay
service excise tax as provided in RCW 82.72.010 through 82.72.090. The
telecommunications relay service excise tax shall not exceed nineteen
cents per month per access line. The telecommunications relay service
excise tax shall be separately identified on each ratepayer's bill with
the following statement: "Funds federal ADA requirement." All
proceeds from the telecommunications relay service excise tax shall be
put into a fund to be administered by the office through the
department. During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the
funds may also be used to provide individualized employment services
and employment-related counseling to people with disabilities, and
technical assistance to employers about the employment of people with
disabilities. "Switched access line" has the meaning provided in RCW
82.14B.020)) the legislature by means of a biennial general fund
appropriation to the department for the purposes of the program.
(6) The telecommunications relay service program and equipment
vendors shall provide services and equipment consistent with the
requirements of federal law for the operation of both interstate and
intrastate telecommunications services for the hearing impaired or
speech impaired. The department and the utilities and transportation
commission shall be responsible for ensuring compliance with federal
requirements and shall provide timely notice to the legislature of any
legislation that may be required to accomplish compliance.
(7) The department shall adopt rules establishing eligibility
criteria, ownership obligations, financial contributions, and a program
for distribution to individuals requesting and receiving such
telecommunications devices distributed by the office, and other rules
necessary to administer programs and services consistent with this
chapter.

--- END ---