BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Leftover architectural paints are a waste management issue and
present environmental risks and health and safety risks, especially to
workers in the solid waste industry. During waste collection and
processing, wet paint can create spills and splashes and oil paint and
aerosol containers may rupture, releasing fumes hazardous to workers
and the remaining liquids contribute to leachate problems in landfills.
Many local governments provide collection sites or events for latex
paint in order to provide their residents with at least some disposal
options and to keep latex paint out of the solid waste stream. But
residents and small businesses need more convenient options for
disposal of architectural paint. Drying latex for disposal is
difficult for many residents and wastes latex paint that can otherwise
be reused or recycled. Local government special and moderate-risk
waste collection programs are heavily impacted by the cost of managing
unwanted architectural paints and these costs decrease the available
funds to address other hazardous and hard to handle materials.
(2) An estimated average of ten percent of architectural paint
purchased becomes leftover paint nationally. Current programs only
collect a fraction of the potential leftover paint for proper reuse,
recycling, or disposal. There is not a comprehensive statewide, end-of-life management plan for architectural paint, resulting in
significant missed opportunities to reduce, reuse, and recycle paint.
(3) It is in the best interest of Washington for paint
manufacturers to assume responsibility for development and
implementation of a cost-effective paint stewardship program that will:
Develop and implement strategies to reduce the generation of leftover
paint; promote the reuse of leftover paint; and collect, transport, and
process leftover paint for end-of-life management, including reuse,
recycling, energy recovery, and disposal. A paint stewardship program
will follow the paint waste management hierarchy for managing and
reducing leftover paint in the order as follows: Reduce consumer
generation of leftover paint; reuse; recycle; and provide for energy
recovery and disposal. Requiring paint manufacturers to assume
responsibility for the collection, recycling, reuse, transportation,
and disposal of leftover paint will provide more opportunities for
consumers to properly manage their leftover paint, provide fiscal
relief for local government in managing leftover paint, keep paint out
of the waste stream, and conserve natural resources.
(4) This chapter creates an architectural paint recovery program to
be enforced by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Architectural paint" or "paint" means interior and exterior
architectural coatings, sold in a container of five gallons or less.
"Architectural paint" or "paint" does not mean industrial, original
equipment, or specialty coatings.
(2) "Architectural paint stewardship assessment" or "assessment"
means the amount determined by a stewardship organization that must be
added to the purchase price of architectural paint sold in this state
to cover a stewardship organization's costs of administration,
education and outreach, collecting, transporting, and processing of the
leftover architectural paint managed through a statewide architectural
paint stewardship program.
(3) "Conditionally exempt small quantity generator" means a
dangerous waste generator whose dangerous wastes are not subject to
regulation under chapter 70.105 RCW, hazardous waste management, solely
because the waste is generated or accumulated in quantities below the
threshold for regulation and meets the conditions prescribed in WAC
173-303-070(8)(b), as it existed on the effective date of this section.
(4) "Conditionally exempt small quantity generator waste" means
dangerous waste generated by a conditionally exempt small quantity
generator.
(5) "Consumer" means any household, nonprofit, small business, or
other entity whose leftover paint is eligible under applicable laws and
regulations.
(6) "Covered entity" means any household or conditionally exempt
small quantity generator of oil based and latex architectural paint.
"Covered entity" also includes any regulated generator of latex
architectural paint only.
(7) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(8) "Distributor" means a person that has a contractual
relationship with one or more manufacturers to market and sell
architectural paint to retailers in Washington.
(9) "End-of-life" or "end-of-life management" means activities
including, but not limited to, collection, transportation, reuse,
recycling, energy recovery, and disposal for leftover architectural
paint.
(10) "Energy recovery" means the recovery of energy in a useable
form from mass burning or refuse-derived fuel incineration, pyrolysis,
or any other means of using the heat of combustion of solid waste that
involves high temperature (above twelve hundred degrees Fahrenheit)
processing.
(11) "Environmentally sound management practices" means policies
and procedures to be implemented by a stewardship organization to
ensure compliance with all applicable laws and rules to protect
workers, public health, and the environment, and also addresses such
issues as safe and environmentally sound management of architectural
paint from collection through final disposition, adequate
recordkeeping, tracking and documenting the fate of materials within
the state and beyond, and adequate environmental liability coverage for
professional services and for the operations of the contractors working
on behalf of a stewardship organization.
(12) "Final disposition" means the point beyond which no further
processing takes place and the paint has been transformed for direct
use as a feedstock in producing new products or is disposed of,
including for energy recovery, in permitted facilities.
(13) "Household hazardous waste" means waste that exhibits any of
the properties of dangerous waste that is exempt from regulation under
chapter 70.105 RCW, hazardous waste management, solely because the
waste is generated by households. Household hazardous waste may also
include other solid waste identified in the local hazardous waste
management plan prepared pursuant to chapter 70.105 RCW.
(14) "Leftover paint" means architectural paint not used and no
longer wanted by a consumer.
(15) "Moderate risk waste" means solid waste that is limited to
conditionally exempt small quantity generator waste and household
hazardous waste as defined in this chapter.
(16) "Paint retailer" means any person that offers architectural
paint for sale at retail in Washington.
(17) "Person" means any individual, business, manufacturer,
transporter, collector, processor, retailer, charity, nonprofit
organization, or government agency.
(18) "Population center" means urbanized areas or urban clusters as
defined by the United States census bureau to identify areas of high
population density and urban land use with populations of two thousand
five hundred or greater.
(19) "Producer" means a manufacturer of architectural paint that is
sold, offered for sale, or distributed in Washington under the
producer's own name or other brand name.
(20) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing waste
materials into usable or marketable materials for use other than
landfill disposal, energy recovery, or incineration. Recycling does
not include collection, compacting, repackaging, and sorting for the
purpose of transport.
(21) "Reuse" means any operation by which an architectural paint
product changes ownership and is used for the same purpose for which it
was originally purchased.
(22) "Sell" or "sale" means any transfer of title for
consideration, including remote sales conducted through sales outlets,
catalogues, or the internet or any other similar electronic means.
(23) "Stewardship organization" means a nonprofit organization
created by a producer or group of producers to implement a paint
stewardship program required under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All producers of architectural paint
selling in or into the state of Washington shall participate in an
approved Washington state paint stewardship plan for covered entities
through membership in and appropriate funding of a stewardship
organization.
(2) Producers not participating in a stewardship organization may
not sell architectural paint in or into Washington state.
(3) Paint retailers are prohibited from selling architectural paint
manufactured or distributed by a producer not in compliance with this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A stewardship organization representing
producers shall submit a plan for the implementation of a paint
stewardship program to the department for approval by January 1, 2015.
The plan must address the following:
(a) Describe how the program proposed under the plan will collect,
transport, recycle, and process leftover paint from covered entities
for end-of-life management, including reuse, recycling, energy
recovery, and disposal, using environmentally sound management
practices.
(b) Provide stewardship organization contact information and a list
of participating brands and producers under the program.
(c) Demonstrate sufficient funding for the architectural paint
stewardship program as described in the plan. The plan must include a
funding mechanism whereby each architectural paint producer remits to
the stewardship organization payment of an architectural paint
stewardship assessment for each container of architectural paint the
producer sells in this state. The plan must include a proposed budget
and a description of the process used to determine the architectural
paint stewardship assessment. The architectural paint stewardship
assessment must be added to the cost of all architectural paint sold to
Washington paint retailers and distributors, and each Washington paint
retailer or distributor shall add the assessment to the purchase price
of all architectural paint sold in this state. No fee may be charged
at the time of collection.
(d) To ensure that the funding mechanism is equitable and
sustainable, a uniform architectural paint stewardship assessment must
be established for all architectural paint sold in this state. The
architectural paint stewardship assessment must be sufficient to
recover, but not exceed, the costs of the architectural paint
stewardship program. The plan must require any surplus funds generated
from the funding mechanism be put back into the program to either
increase and improve program services or reduce the cost of the program
and the architectural paint stewardship assessment, or both.
(e) The proposed architectural paint stewardship assessment must be
reviewed by an independent auditor to ensure that such an assessment is
consistent with the budget of the paint stewardship program and the
independent auditor shall recommend an amount for the architectural
paint stewardship assessment to the department. The department is
responsible for the approval of the architectural paint stewardship
assessment based on the information provided in the plan and in the
auditor's report.
(f) Establish goals as practical to reduce the generation of
leftover paint, to promote the reuse and recycling of leftover paint,
for the overall collection of leftover paint, and for the proper end-of-life management of leftover paint. The goal for overall collection
of leftover paint must be based on current or historical household
hazardous waste program information from Washington state. The goals
may be revised by a stewardship organization based on the information
collected annually.
(g) Describe the reasonably convenient and available statewide
collection system required under section 5 of this act.
(h) Describe the criteria to be used for selecting collection
locations when there are multiple paint retail stores that want to
serve as collection sites in the same geographic area.
(i) Describe how leftover paint will be managed using
environmentally sound management practices in an economically sound
manner, including following the paint waste management hierarchy of:
Source reduction; reuse; recycling; energy recovery; and disposal.
(j) Describe the process for managing architectural paint
containers collected under the program, with an emphasis on recycling
containers, where practical.
(k) Describe education and outreach efforts to promote the paint
stewardship program. The education and outreach efforts must include
effective strategies for reaching all sectors of the population and
describe how the paint stewardship program will evaluate the
effectiveness of its education and outreach.
(l) Collection site procedural manuals for architectural paint
products, including training procedures and electronic copies of
materials that will be provided to collection sites to ensure the use
of environmentally sound management practices when handling leftover
architectural paint.
(m) A list of processors that will be used to manage leftover paint
collected by the stewardship organization and a list of potential
processors to be used for final disposition.
(2) A stewardship organization shall promote a paint stewardship
program and provide consumers, covered entities, and retailers with
educational and informational materials describing collection
opportunities for leftover paint statewide, the architectural paint
stewardship assessment used to finance the program, and promotion of
waste prevention, reuse, and recycling. These materials may include,
but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Signage that is prominently displayed and easily visible to the
consumer;
(b) Written materials and templates of materials for reproduction
by paint retailers to be provided to the consumer at the time of
purchase or delivery, or both; and
(c) Advertising or other promotional materials, or both, that
include references to the architectural paint stewardship program.
(3) Plans must be updated as needed when there are changes to the
current program. A new plan or amendment is required to be submitted
to the department for approval when:
(a) There is a change to the amount of the assessment;
(b) There is an addition to the products covered under the program;
or
(c) There is a revision of the product stewardship organization's
goals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A stewardship organization's program
plan required in section 4 of this act must also describe how the
program will provide for reasonably convenient and available statewide
collection of leftover paint from covered entities in urban and rural
areas of the state, including island communities.
(2) To ensure adequate collection coverage, the plan must use
geographic information modeling to determine the number and
distribution of collection sites based on the following criteria: At
least ninety percent of Washington residents must have a permanent
collection site within a fifteen mile radius; and one additional
permanent site must be established for every thirty thousand residents
of a population center distributed to provide convenient and reasonably
equitable access for residents within each population center, unless
otherwise approved by the department. For the portion of the
population that does not have a permanent collection location within a
fifteen mile radius, the plan must provide collection events no less
than once a year. Special consideration is to be made for providing
opportunities to island and geographically isolated populations.
(3) The program must utilize the existing government-owned
moderate-risk waste infrastructure when selecting collection sites
where cost effective, reasonably feasible, and mutually agreeable.
(4) The program must utilize existing paint retail stores as
collection sites where cost effective, reasonably feasible, and
mutually agreeable.
(5) The plan must provide the collection site name and location of
each site statewide in Washington accepting architectural paint under
the program. The collection coverage in subsection (2) of this section
must be met within the first year of the program, with the goal of
having collection sites operational as close to the start date as
possible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Each stewardship organization shall
submit a paint stewardship program plan in accordance with section 4 of
this act.
(2) Each stewardship organization shall develop and distribute a
collection site procedural manual to collection sites to ensure proper
management of architectural paints at collection locations.
(3) A stewardship organization shall implement the paint
stewardship plan by July 1, 2015, or three months after approval of a
paint stewardship program plan under section 4 of this act, whichever
comes later.
(4) A stewardship organization shall submit an annual report by
October 15th following the first year or partial year of operations and
every year thereafter, structured to be used as a basis for annual plan
review by the department. The report must be based on the requirements
outlined in section 9 of this act.
(5) A stewardship organization shall work with producers,
distributors, and retailers to provide consumers with educational and
informational materials describing collection opportunities for
leftover paint statewide and promotion of waste prevention, reuse, and
recycling of leftover paint.
(6) A stewardship organization shall pay an annual administrative
fee, described in section 7 of this act, in an amount sufficient to
cover only the department's cost of administering and enforcing a paint
stewardship program established under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department shall review the plan
within one hundred twenty days of receipt, and make a determination
whether or not to approve the plan. The department shall provide a
letter of approval for the plan if it provides for the establishment of
a stewardship program that meets the requirements of sections 4 and 5
of this act. If a plan is rejected, the department shall provide the
reasons for rejecting the plan to the stewardship organization. The
stewardship organization must submit a new plan within sixty days after
receipt of the letter of disapproval.
(2) When a plan or an amendment to an approved plan is submitted
under this section, the department shall make the proposed plan or
amendment available for public review and comment for at least thirty
days.
(3) The department shall actively supervise the conduct of a
stewardship organization in determination and implementation of the
architectural paint stewardship assessment specified in section 4(1) of
this act.
(4) Beginning April 1, 2014, and annually thereafter, the
department shall determine the department's costs required to be paid
by each stewardship organization sufficient to cover only the
department's costs of administering and enforcing paint stewardship
programs under this chapter. The total amount of yearly reimbursement
must not exceed the amount necessary to recover costs incurred by the
department in connection with the administration, oversight, and
enforcement of the requirements of this chapter. Any unspent money
from the previous twelve-month period must be retained in the paint
product stewardship account created in section 11 of this act and
applied to reduce the payments by stewardship organizations in the
following year.
(a) The department shall estimate the annual fee for the period of
July 1st through June 30th and notify each stewardship organization by
April 1st of the prior fiscal year. If there is more than one
stewardship organization implementing a paint stewardship program in
Washington, the fee will be divided equally between programs. The
department shall make the proposed annual fee, along with an accounting
of the costs, available for public review and comment for at least
thirty days.
(b) The department shall collect annual fees from each stewardship
organization by June 30, 2015, and annually thereafter.
(5) The department shall enforce this chapter.
(a) A civil penalty may be administratively imposed by the
department on any person who violates this chapter in an amount of up
to one thousand dollars per violation per day.
(b) A person who intentionally, knowingly, or negligently violates
this chapter may be assessed a civil penalty by the department of up to
ten thousand dollars per violation per day.
(c) Any person who incurs a penalty may appeal the penalty
prescribed under this section to the pollution control hearings board
created under chapter 43.21B RCW.
(6) By July 1, 2015, or upon the date the first plan is approved,
whichever date is earlier, the department shall post on its web site a
list of producers and their brands for which the department has
approved a plan pursuant to section 4 of this act. The department
shall update the list of producers and brands participating under an
approved program plan no less than once every six months based on
information provided to the department from a stewardship organization.
(7) A producer that is not listed on the department's web site
pursuant to this section, but demonstrates to the satisfaction of the
department that it is in compliance with this chapter, must be added to
the web site within fourteen days.
(8) The department shall review each annual report required
pursuant to section 9 of this act within ninety days of its submission
to ensure compliance with section 9(1) of this act.
(9) The department may request additional information from the
stewardship organization outside the annual reporting requirements in
section 9 of this act.
(10) The department may adopt rules as necessary for the purpose of
implementing, administering, and enforcing this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A producer or paint retailer may not
sell or offer for sale to any person in the state architectural paint
unless the producer or brand of architectural paint is participating in
an approved stewardship plan under this chapter. A retailer complies
with the requirements of this section if, on the date the architectural
paint was ordered from the producer or its agent, the producer of the
paint was listed on the department's web site as a producer
implementing an approved paint stewardship program plan. However, a
retailer may sell any paint purchased prior to the effective date of
this section.
(2) A paint wholesaler or a paint retailer that distributes or
sells architectural paint shall monitor the department's web site to
determine if the sale of a producer's architectural paint is in
compliance with this chapter.
(3) At the time of sale to a consumer, a producer, a stewardship
organization, or a paint retailer selling or offering architectural
paint for sale in Washington shall provide the consumer with
information regarding available end-of-life management options for
architectural paint collected through a paint stewardship program or a
brand of paint being sold under the program.
(4) A paint retailer that collects leftover architectural paint
must follow the collection site procedure manual developed by a
stewardship organization to ensure the use of environmentally sound
management practices when handling architectural paints at collection
locations.
(5) Neither a retailer of architectural paint, nor any other
retailer, is required to serve as a leftover paint collection facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) By October 15, 2016, and annually
thereafter, a stewardship organization shall submit to the department
a report describing the stewardship program that the stewardship
organization implemented during the previous fiscal year. The report
must include all of the following:
(a) A description of the methods the stewardship organization used
to reduce, reuse, collect, transport, recycle, and process leftover
paint statewide in Washington;
(b) The volume of latex and oil-based architectural paint collected
by the stewardship organization in the preceding fiscal year in
Washington;
(c) The total volume of leftover paint, by collection site,
collected by the stewardship organization in Washington;
(d) The volume of latex and oil-based architectural paint collected
by method of disposition, including reuse, recycling, energy recovery,
and disposal;
(e) A list of all processors through to final disposition that are
used to manage leftover paint collected by the stewardship organization
in the preceding year and the volumes each processor accepted and under
what disposition method;
(f) A list of all the producers participating in the plan;
(g) The total volume of architectural paint sold in Washington
during the preceding year based on the collected architectural paint
stewardship assessment by the stewardship organization;
(h) An independent financial audit of the paint stewardship program
implemented by the stewardship organization;
(i) The total cost of implementing the paint stewardship program
broken out by administrative, collection, transportation and
disposition, and communications costs;
(j) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the paint stewardship
program from year to year, and anticipated steps, if needed, to improve
performance throughout the state; and
(k) A summary of outreach and education activities undertaken and
samples of the educational materials that the stewardship organization
provided to consumers of architectural paint during the first year of
the program and any changes to those materials in subsequent years.
(2) All reports submitted to the department must be available to
the general public through the internet. Proprietary information
submitted to the department under this chapter is exempt from public
disclosure under RCW 42.56.270. The department may use and disclose
such information in summary or aggregated form that does not directly
or indirectly identify financial, production, or sales data of an
individual producer or stewardship organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Producers or stewardship organizations
acting on behalf of producers that prepare, submit, and implement a
paint stewardship plan pursuant to section 4 of this act and thereby
are subject to regulation by the department are granted immunity from
state laws relating to antitrust, restraint of trade, unfair trade
practices, and other regulation of trade and commerce, for the limited
purpose of planning and reporting on a paint stewardship program and
proposing and establishing the architectural paint stewardship
assessment required in section 4(1)(c) and (d) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The paint product stewardship account is
created in the state treasury. All receipts received by the department
from stewardship organizations must be deposited in the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used by the department only for
administering and enforcing paint stewardship programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This chapter is void if a federal law, or
a combination of federal laws, takes effect that establishes a national
program for the collection and recycling of architectural paint that
substantially meets the intent of this chapter, including the creation
of a funding mechanism for collection, transportation, recycling, and
proper disposal of all architectural paint in the United States.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Nothing in this chapter changes or limits
the authority of the Washington utilities and transportation commission
to regulate collection of solid waste, including curbside collection of
residential recyclable materials, nor does this chapter change or limit
the authority of a city or town to provide the service itself or by
contract under RCW 81.77.020.

Sec. 14 RCW 42.56.270 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and
financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked
social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant
to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes
with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
commerce:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW
43.330.050(8); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce or the office of the
governor in connection with the siting, recruitment, expansion,
retention, or relocation of that person's business and until a siting
decision is made, identifying information of any person supplying
information under this subsection and the locations being considered
for siting, relocation, or expansion of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of commerce based on
information as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, any work product
is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of commerce from a person connected with siting,
recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's
business, information described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be
available to the public under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information;
(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business;
(20) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained
by the University of Washington, other than information the university
is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information
relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such
information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in
loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to
result in private loss to the providers of this information; ((and))
(21) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by innovate Washington in
applications for, or delivery of, grants and loans under chapter 43.333
RCW, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably
be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this
information; and
(22) Proprietary information submitted to the department of ecology
under chapter 70.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 19 of this
act).

Sec. 15 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2010 c 210 s 7 and 2010 c 84 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW,
local health departments, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the parks and recreation
commission:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 76.09.170, 77.55.291, 78.44.250, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) A final decision by the department or director made under
chapter 183, Laws of 2009.
(d) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(f) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(g) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(h) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(i) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(j) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable
under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources'
appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).
(k) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of
public lands under RCW 76.06.180.
(l) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under
chapter 77.55 RCW.
(m) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are
reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.
(n) Decisions of a state agency that is an authorized public entity
under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of a
vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are
reviewable under RCW 79.100.120.
(o) Appeals from penalties imposed by the department of ecology
under chapter 70.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 19 of this
act).
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.))
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 16 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2010 c 210 s 8 and 2010 c 84 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW,
local health departments, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the parks and recreation
commission:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 76.09.170, 77.55.291, 78.44.250, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(i) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable
under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources'
appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).
(j) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of
public lands under RCW 76.06.180.
(k) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under
chapter 77.55 RCW.
(l) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are
reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.
(m) Decisions of a state agency that is an authorized public entity
under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of a
vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are
reviewable under RCW 79.100.120.
(n) Appeals from penalties imposed by the department of ecology
under chapter 70.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 19 of this
act).
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.))
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Section 15 of this act expires June 30,
2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Section 16 of this act takes effect June
30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 1 through 13 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---