BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.48.080 and 1995 c 170 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall regularly pay to the state treasurer the excise
taxes collected under this chapter, which shall be credited by the
state treasurer ((as follows: Ninety percent to the general fund and
ten percent)) to the aeronautics account ((in the transportation fund))
for state grants to airports and the administrative expenses associated
with grant execution and the collection of excise taxes under this
chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.42.090 and 1995 c 170 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
All moneys collected by the director from the aircraft fuel excise
tax as provided in RCW 82.42.020 shall be transmitted to the state
treasurer and shall be credited to the aeronautics account hereby
created in the ((transportation fund of the)) state treasury. Moneys
collected from the consumer or user of aircraft fuel from either the
use tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 or the retail sales tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and credited to
the state general fund.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.42.090 and 2013 c 225 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
All taxes, interest, and penalties collected under this chapter
must be deposited into the aeronautics account hereby created in the
state treasury. All taxes, interest, and penalties collected from the
consumer or user of aircraft fuel from either the use tax imposed by
RCW 82.12.020 or the retail sales tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 must be
deposited into the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1,
2015.

--- END ---