BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Carrier" means a:
(i) Health carrier as defined in RCW 48.43.005; and
(ii) Limited health care service contractor that offers limited
health care service as defined in RCW 48.44.035.
(b) "Provider" means:
(i) A health care provider as defined in RCW 48.43.005;
(ii) A participating provider as defined in RCW 48.44.010;
(iii) A health care facility, as defined in RCW 48.43.005; and
(iv) Intermediaries that have agreed in writing with a carrier to
provide access to providers under this subsection (1)(b) who render
covered services to enrollees of a carrier.
(c) "Provider compensation agreement" means any written agreement
that includes specific information about payment methodology, payment
rates, and other terms that determine the remuneration a carrier will
pay to a provider.
(d) "Provider contract" means a written contract between a carrier
and a provider for any health care services rendered to an enrollee.
(2) A carrier must file all provider contracts and provider
compensation agreements with the commissioner thirty calendar days
before use. When a carrier and provider negotiate a provider contract
or provider compensation agreement that deviates from a filed
agreement, the carrier must also file that specific contract or
agreement with the commissioner thirty calendar days before use.
(a) Any provider contract and related provider compensation
agreements not affirmatively disapproved by the commissioner are deemed
approved, except the commissioner may extend the approval date an
additional fifteen calendar days upon giving notice before the
expiration of the initial thirty-day period.
(b) Changes to previously filed and approved provider compensation
agreements modifying the compensation amount or related terms that help
determine the compensation amount must be filed and are deemed approved
upon filing if no other changes are made to the previously approved
provider contract or compensation agreement.
(3) The commissioner may not base a disapproval of a provider
compensation agreement on the amount of compensation or other financial
arrangements between the carrier and the provider, unless that
compensation amount causes the underlying health benefit plan to
otherwise be in violation of state or federal law. This subsection
does not grant the commissioner the authority to regulate provider
reimbursement amounts.
(4) The commissioner may withdraw approval of a provider contract
or provider compensation agreement at any time for cause.
(5) Provider compensation agreements are confidential and not
subject to public inspection under RCW 48.02.120(2), or public
disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW, if filed in accordance with the
procedures for submitting confidential filings through the system for
electronic rate and form filings and the general filing instructions as
set forth by the commissioner. In the event the referenced filing
fails to comply with the filing instructions setting forth the process
to withhold the compensation agreement from public inspection, and the
carrier indicates that the compensation agreement is to be withheld
from public inspection, the commissioner shall reject the filing and
notify the carrier through the system for electronic rate and form
filings to amend its filing to comply with the confidentiality filing
instructions.
(6) In the event a provider contract or provider compensation
agreement is disapproved or withdrawn from use by the commissioner, the
carrier has the right to demand and receive a hearing under chapters
48.04 and 34.05 RCW.
(7) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.46.243 and 2008 c 217 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, every contract
between a health maintenance organization and its participating
providers of health care services shall be in writing and shall set
forth that in the event the health maintenance organization fails to
pay for health care services as set forth in the agreement, the
enrolled participant shall not be liable to the provider for any sums
owed by the health maintenance organization. Every such contract shall
provide that this requirement shall survive termination of the
contract.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not
apply to emergency care from a provider who is not a participating
provider, to out-of-area services or, in exceptional situations
approved in advance by the commissioner, if the health maintenance
organization is unable to negotiate reasonable and cost-effective
participating provider contracts.
(3)(((a) Each participating provider contract form shall be filed
with the commissioner fifteen days before it is used.
(b) Any contract form not affirmatively disapproved within fifteen
days of filing shall be deemed approved, except that the commissioner
may extend the approval period an additional fifteen days upon giving
notice before the expiration of the initial fifteen-day period. The
commissioner may approve such a contract form for immediate use at any
time. Approval may be subsequently withdrawn for cause.
(c) Subject to the right of the health maintenance organization to
demand and receive a hearing under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW, the
commissioner may disapprove such a contract form if it is in any
respect in violation of this chapter or if it fails to conform to
minimum provisions or standards required by the commissioner by rule
under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4))) No participating provider, or insurance producer, trustee, or
assignee thereof, may maintain an action against an enrolled
participant to collect sums owed by the health maintenance
organization.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.46.030 and 2012 c 211 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any corporation, cooperative group, partnership, individual,
association, or groups of health professionals licensed by the state of
Washington, public hospital district, or public institutions of higher
education shall be entitled to a certificate of registration from the
insurance commissioner as a health maintenance organization if it:
(1) Provides comprehensive health care services to enrolled
participants on a group practice per capita prepayment basis or on a
prepaid individual practice plan and provides such health services
either directly or through arrangements with institutions, entities,
and persons which its enrolled population might reasonably require as
determined by the health maintenance organization in order to be
maintained in good health; and
(2) Is governed by a board elected by enrolled participants, or
otherwise provides its enrolled participants with a meaningful role in
policy making procedures of such organization, as defined in RCW
48.46.020(18)((,)) and 48.46.070; and
(3) Affords enrolled participants with a meaningful appeal
procedure aimed at settlement of disputes between such persons and such
health maintenance organization, as defined in RCW 48.46.020(17) and
48.46.100; and
(4) Provides enrolled participants, or makes available for
inspection at least annually, financial statements pertaining to health
maintenance agreements, disclosing income and expenses, assets and
liabilities, and the bases for proposed rate adjustments for health
maintenance agreements relating to its activity as a health maintenance
organization; and
(5) Demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner that its
facilities and personnel are reasonably adequate to provide
comprehensive health care services to enrolled participants and that it
is financially capable of providing such members with, or has made
adequate contractual arrangements through insurance or otherwise to
provide such members with, such health services; and
(6) Substantially complies with administrative rules and
regulations of the commissioner for purposes of this chapter; and
(7) Submits an application for a certificate of registration which
shall be verified by an officer or authorized representative of the
applicant, being in form as the commissioner prescribes, and setting
forth:
(a) A copy of the basic organizational document, if any, of the
applicant, such as the articles of incorporation, articles of
association, partnership agreement, trust agreement, or other
applicable documents, and all amendments thereto;
(b) A copy of the bylaws, rules and regulations, or similar
documents, if any, which regulate the conduct of the internal affairs
of the applicant, and all amendments thereto;
(c) A list of the names, addresses, members of the board of
directors, board of trustees, executive committee, or other governing
board or committee and the principal officers, partners, or members;
(d) A full and complete disclosure of any financial interests held
by any officer, or director in any provider associated with the
applicant or any provider of the applicant;
(e) A description of the health maintenance organization, its
facilities and its personnel, and the applicant's most recent financial
statement showing such organization's assets, liabilities, income, and
other sources of financial support;
(f) A description of the geographic areas and the population groups
to be served and the size and composition of the anticipated enrollee
population;
(g) A copy of each type of health maintenance agreement to be
issued to enrolled participants;
(h) A schedule of all proposed rates of reimbursement to
contracting health care facilities or providers, if any, and a schedule
of the proposed charges for enrollee coverage for health care services,
accompanied by data relevant to the formulation of such schedules;
(i) A description of the proposed method and schedule for
soliciting enrollment in the applicant health maintenance organization
and the basis of compensation for such solicitation services;
(j) A copy of the solicitation document to be distributed to all
prospective enrolled participants in connection with any solicitation;
(k) A financial projection which sets forth the anticipated results
during the initial two years of operation of such organization,
accompanied by a summary of the assumptions and relevant data upon
which the projection is based. The projection should include the
projected expenses, enrollment trends, income, enrollee utilization
patterns, and sources of working capital;
(l) A detailed description of the procedures and programs to be
implemented to assure that the health care services delivered to
enrolled participants will be of professional quality;
(m) A detailed description of procedures to be implemented to meet
the requirements to protect against insolvency in RCW 48.46.245;
(n) Documentation that the health maintenance organization has an
initial net worth of one million dollars and shall thereafter maintain
the minimum net worth required under RCW 48.46.235; and
(o) Such other information as the commissioner shall require by
rule or regulation which is reasonably necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
A health maintenance organization shall, unless otherwise provided
for in this chapter, file a notice describing any modification of any
of the information required by subsection (7) of this section. Such
notice shall be filed with the commissioner. With respect to provider
compensation; however, such notice shall be filed in compliance with
the requirements regarding provider compensation filing in chapter
48.43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 48.44.070 (Contracts to be filed with
commissioner) and 1990 c 120 s 9, 1965 c 87 s 2, & 1961 c 197 s 4 are
each repealed.

--- END ---