BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall conduct a municipal storm water control
pilot project within its existing authority to issue alternative
compliance plans to evaluate the net environmental effects of an
alternative approach to municipal storm water management and determine
if alternative approaches can satisfy the water quality requirements of
the state and federal clean water acts and have merit for greater
statewide application. The pilot project must be designed to meet the
following objectives:
(a) Add to the existing best available science base regarding storm
water management; and
(b) Address the existing paradoxical roadblock to accomplishing
superior environmental outcomes at lower costs created by an
interpretation of the clean water act that limits the allowance of
alternative compliance plans to instances when science supports the
desired outcome, but that prohibits the alternative projects required
to collect the necessary scientific data from being implemented.
(2) In conducting the pilot project required by this section, the
department must design an alternative approach to managing municipal
storm water that will serve in lieu of a standard phase I municipal
storm water permit as required by this chapter. The basis of the
alternative approach must include the premise that new development in
the pilot project area manages storm water to the existing condition
with the pilot project partner agreeing to mitigate the impacts of new
development and redevelopment projects through capital improvements.
(3) The terms negotiated for the pilot project serve as the only
required municipal storm water permitting for the participants to the
pilot project and is ratified and approved by the legislature as a
valid permit for compliance with this chapter.
(4) The department must work closely in developing the alternative
approach with the pilot partner. That partner must be chosen by the
department and must be a county subject to phase I storm water
permitting that has, prior to January 1, 2010, received a notice of
violation for noncompliance with municipal storm water permitting. The
department is excused of any obligations under this section if no
eligible pilot partner is willing to participate.
(5) The department and the other participants to the pilot project
are responsible for monitoring the effects on regional water quality of
the alternative compliance mechanisms comprising the pilot project.
The metrics and scope of the monitoring must be developed by the
department in a manner that best delivers information relevant to the
objectives of the pilot project.
(6) At the conclusion of the pilot project, the department must
deliver a report to the legislature consistent with RCW 43.01.036 that
summarizes the data collected under subsection (5) of this section and
makes recommendations as to whether the alternative compliance approach
had a beneficial effect on water quality in the pilot region, whether
a similar alternative compliance approach has applicability in other
jurisdictions, and whether the term of the pilot project should be
extended.
(7) This section is to be implemented under the existing authority
of the department to issue alternative compliance plans for storm water
management. Nothing in this section conveys new or additional
authority on the department.

--- END ---