BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
The department must, when providing grants, loans, or other
financial assistance to a unit of local government intended to aid in
the management, treatment, or control of storm water runoff, give
priority funding to activities or projects that are required by the
applicable operational state municipal storm water permit approved by
the department under chapter 90.54 RCW. The department may provide
funding for other storm water related projects only if additional
resources are available to the department after all requirements
mandated by the applicable current state municipal storm water permits
have been funded.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.48.290 and 1987 c 109 s 145 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to make and administer grants
consistent with this section within appropriations authorized by the
legislature to any municipal or public corporation, or political
subdivision within the state for the purpose of aiding in the
construction of water pollution control projects necessary to prevent
the discharge of untreated or inadequately treated sewage or other
waste into the waters of the state including, but not limited to,
projects for the control of storm or surface waters which will provide
for the removal of waste or polluting materials ((therefrom)).
(2) Grants ((so)) made by the department under this section shall
be subject to the following limitations:
(((1))) (a) No grant shall be made in an amount which exceeds the
recipient's contribution to the estimated cost of the project((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, the following shall be considered a part of
the recipient's contribution:
(((a))) (i) Any grant received by the recipient from the federal
government pursuant to section 8(f) of the Federal Water Pollution
Control Act (33 U.S.C. 466) for the project;
(((b))) (ii) Any expenditure which is made by any municipal or
public corporation, or political subdivision within the state as a part
of a joint effort with the recipient to carry out the project and which
has not been used as a matching contribution for another grant made
pursuant to this chapter((,)); and
(((c))) (iii) Any expenditure for the project made by the recipient
out of moneys advanced by the department from a revolving fund and
repayable to said fund.
(((2))) (b) No grant shall be made for any project which does not
qualify for and receive a grant of federal funds under the provisions
of the federal water pollution control act ((as now or hereafter
amended: PROVIDED, That)). However, this restriction shall not apply
to state grants made in any biennium over and above the amount of such
grants required to match all federal funds allocated to the state for
such biennium.
(((3))) (c) No grant shall be made to any municipal or public
corporation, or political subdivision for any project located within a
drainage basin unless the department shall have previously adopted a
comprehensive water pollution control and abatement plan and unless the
project is found by the department to conform with such basin
comprehensive plan((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the requirement for
a project to conform to a comprehensive water pollution control and
abatement plan may be waived by the department for any grant
application filed with the department prior to July 1, 1974, in those
situations where the department finds the public interest would be
served better by approval of any grant application made prior to
adoption of such plan than by its denial.
(((4))) (d) Recipients of grants shall meet such qualifications and
follow such procedures in applying for grants as shall be established
by the department.
(((5))) (e) Grants may be made to reimburse recipients for
expenditures made after July 1, 1967 for projects which meet the
requirements of this section and were commenced after the recipient had
filed a grant application with the department.
(3) Grants made by the department to address the management,
treatment, or control of storm water runoff must be prioritized in a
manner that is consistent with section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.48.285 and 2005 c 469 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to enter into contracts with any
municipal or public corporation or political subdivision within the
state for the purpose of assisting such agencies to finance the design
and construction of water pollution control projects, whether procured
through chapter 39.10 or 70.150 RCW, or otherwise, that are necessary
to prevent the discharge of untreated or inadequately treated sewage or
other waste into the waters of the state, including but not limited to,
systems for the control of storm or surface waters which will provide
for the removal of waste or polluting materials in a manner conforming
to the comprehensive plan of water pollution control and abatement
proposed by the agencies and approved by the department.
(2) Any such contract may provide for((:)) the payment by the
department to a municipal or public corporation or political
subdivision on a monthly, quarterly, or annual basis of varying amounts
of moneys as advances which shall be repayable by said municipal or
public corporation, or political subdivision under conditions
determined by the department.
(3) Contracts made by the department under this section shall be
subject to the following limitations:
(((1))) (a) No contract shall be made unless the department shall
find that the project cannot be financed at reasonable cost or within
statutory limitations by the borrower without the making of such
contract.
(((2))) (b) No contract shall be made with any public or municipal
corporation or political subdivision to assist in the financing of any
project located within a sewage drainage basin for which the department
shall have previously adopted a comprehensive water pollution control
and abatement plan unless the project is found by the department to
conform with the basin comprehensive plan.
(((3))) (c) The department shall determine the interest rate, not
to exceed ten percent per annum, which such advances shall bear.
(((4))) (d) The department shall provide such reasonable terms and
conditions of repayment of advances as it may determine.
(((5))) (e) The total outstanding amount which the department may
at any time be obligated to pay under all outstanding contracts made
pursuant to this section shall not exceed the moneys available for such
payment.
(((6))) (f) Municipal or public corporations or political
subdivisions shall meet such qualifications and follow such procedures
in applying for contract assistance as shall be established by the
department.
(4) In making such contracts the department shall give priority to
projects ((which)) that:
(a) Will provide relief from actual or potential public health
hazards or water pollution conditions and which provide substantial
capacity beyond present requirements to meet anticipated future demand;
and
(b) Are consistent with the prioritization policy outlined in
section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2012 2nd sp.s. c 7 s 920 and 2012 2nd
sp.s. c 2 s 6005 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship;
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150;
(xiii) During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, shoreline
update technical assistance;
(xiv) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, multijurisdictional
permitting teams;
(xv) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, actions for reducing
public exposure to toxic air pollution, and actions taken through the
family forest fish passage program to correct barriers to fish passage
on privately owned small forest lands; and
(xvi) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the department of
ecology's water quality, shorelands and environmental assessment,
hazardous waste, waste to resources, nuclear waste, and air quality
programs.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority:
(i) Remedial actions;
(ii) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(iii) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(iv) Funds for a program to assist in the assessment and cleanup of
sites of methamphetamine production, but not to be used for the initial
containment of such sites, consistent with the responsibilities and
intent of RCW 69.50.511; and
(v) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment.
(b) Funds for plans and programs shall be allocated consistent with
the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters
70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW, except that any applicant that
is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, along with any
project that is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget
Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, shall, except as conditioned by
RCW 70.105D.120, receive priority for any available funding for any
grant or funding programs or sources that use a competitive bidding
process. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account
may also be used for grants to local governments to retrofit public
sector diesel equipment and for storm water planning and implementation
activities.
(c) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department shall
partner with local communities and liable parties for cleanups. The
department is authorized to use the following additional strategies in
order to ensure a healthful environment for future generations:
(i) The director may alter grant-matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational, or habitat restoration opportunities that would
not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of vacant, orphaned, or abandoned property under RCW
70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;
(ii) The use of outside contracts to conduct necessary studies;
(iii) The purchase of remedial action cost-cap insurance, when
necessary to expedite multiparty clean-up efforts.
(d) To facilitate and expedite cleanups using funds from the local
toxics control account, during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium the
director may establish grant-funded accounts to hold and disperse local
toxics control account funds and funds from local governments to be
used for remedial actions.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) Except during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, one percent of the
moneys deposited into the state and local toxics control accounts shall
be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who may be
adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous
substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The
primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by
persons and organizations in the investigation and remedying of
releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances and to
implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management priorities.
No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed
annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from either
account which are not expended at the close of any biennium shall
revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation, or, after January 1,
2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound,
funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the
action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the local toxics control account to the state toxics
control account such amounts as reflect excess fund balance in the
account.
(9) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control
account may also be used for local government shoreline update grants
and actions for reducing public exposure to toxic air pollution;
funding to local governments for flood levee improvements; and grants
to local governments for brownfield redevelopment.
(10) All expenditures from either the state or local toxics control
accounts intended to address the management, treatment, or control of
storm water runoff must be prioritized in a manner that is consistent
with section 1 of this act.

--- END ---