BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the assessor is required by the provisions of this
title to send any assessment, notice, or any other information to
persons by regular mail, the assessor may instead provide the
assessment, notice, or other information electronically if the
following conditions are met:
(a) The person entitled to receive the information has authorized
the assessor, electronically or otherwise, to provide the assessment,
notice, or other information electronically; and
(b) If the assessment, notice, or other information is subject to
the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330, 84.08.210, or
84.40.340, the assessor must use methods reasonably designed to protect
the information from unauthorized disclosure. The provisions of this
subsection (1)(b) may be waived by a taxpayer. The waiver must be in
writing and may be provided to the assessor electronically. A waiver
continues until revoked in writing by the taxpayer. Such revocation
may be provided to the assessor electronically in a manner provided or
approved by the assessor.
(2) Electronic notice pursuant to this section will continue until
revoked in writing by the taxpayer. Such revocation may be provided to
the assessor electronically in a manner provided or approved by the
assessor.
(3) Electronic transmittal may be by electronic mail or other
electronic means reasonably calculated to apprise the person of the
information that is being provided.
(4) Any assessment, notice, or other information provided by the
assessor to a person is deemed to have been mailed by the assessor and
received by the person on the date that the assessor electronically
sends the information to the person or electronically notifies the
person that the information is available to be accessed by the person.
(5) This section also applies to information that is not expressly
required by statute to be sent by regular mail, but is customarily sent
by the assessor using regular mail, to persons entitled to receive the
information.
(6) Information compiled or possessed by the assessor for the
purposes of providing notice under this title, including but not
limited to taxpayer e-mail addresses, waivers, waiver requests, waiver
revocations, and passwords or other methods of protecting taxpayer
information as required in subsection (1)(b) of this section, are not
subject to disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

--- END ---