BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 For the purpose of providing funds to
finance the public school projects described and authorized by the
legislature in the capital appropriations acts for the 2013-2015 fiscal
biennium, and all costs incidental thereto, the state finance committee
is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of
Washington in the sum of four hundred seventy-five million dollars, or
as much thereof as may be required, to finance these projects and all
costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this section may be sold
at such price as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds
authorized in this section may be offered for sale without prior
legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized in section 1 of this act shall be deposited in the state
building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. These proceeds
shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this section
and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the bonds issued for the purposes of this section, and shall be
administered by the office of financial management subject to
legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The debt-limit general fund bond
retirement account shall be used for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act.
(3) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued for the purposes of section 1 of this
act the state treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues
received in the state treasury and deposit in the debt-limit general
fund bond retirement account an amount equal to the amount certified by
the state finance committee to be due on the payment date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Bonds issued under sections 1 through 3
of this act shall state that they are a general obligation of the state
of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state to
the payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and
shall contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and
interest as the same shall become due.
(2) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The legislature may provide additional means
for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and interest on
the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act, and sections 2 and 3 of
this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for the
payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and,
subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar
amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be
sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this section and ending
June 30, 2015, out of the several funds specified in this act.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Fiscal year 2014" or "FY 2014" means the period beginning July
1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2014.
(b) "Fiscal year 2015" or "FY 2015" means the period beginning July
1, 2014, and ending June 30, 2015.
(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
(3) Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any
portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is
not expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to
fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.
(4) The amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future
Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes only
and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts. "Prior
biennia" typically refers to the immediate prior biennium for
reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia in the case of
specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an estimate of what
may be appropriated for the project or program in the 2013-2015
biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero does not
necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide funding for
the project or program in the future.
(5) "Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless
the context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant
conditions and limitations applicable to appropriations.
Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended balances remaining
on June 30, 2013, from the 2011-2013 biennial appropriations for each
project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
School Security Improvement Grants (92000015)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for nonrecurring costs
associated with school facility safety projects as described in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(2) One-time grants to school districts to implement panic alarm
systems developed:
(a) In conjunction with the district's local law enforcement
agency; or
(b) By the superintendent of public instruction as a model policy.
(3) One-time grants to school districts to assist with installation
of security control mechanisms or systems. The superintendent shall
prioritize grant requests by establishing criteria including, but not
limited to, considering districts that receive state funds through the
school construction assistance program in FY 2014 or FY 2015.

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2013-2015 School Construction Assistance Program - Maintenance
(30000145)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,340,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for
completing inventory and building condition assessments for all public
school districts once every six years.
(2) $933,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for mapping the design of new
facilities and remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled, for
school construction projects funded through the school construction
assistance program.
(3) $250,000 of the common school construction account--state is
provided solely for the development of recommendations on how the
school construction assistance program can better support state policy
objectives to reform and improve public education. A report describing
the recommendations and their projected costs and benefits must be
submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September
1, 2014. The superintendent of public instruction must convene an
advisory group to assist in the development of these recommendations.
The advisory group must include representation from general classroom
teachers at various grade levels, teachers of subjects that require
specialized facilities such as science laboratories and vocational
facilities, school facility managers, school facility designers, and
other experts on the relationship between the quality and design of
educational facilities and student academic performance. The advisory
group must review and consider findings and recommendations in the 2009
joint legislative task force on school construction funding. The
recommendations must consider ways to provide financial assistance to
develop and improve educational facilities to support at least the
following policy objectives:
(a) Greater access and more effective instruction in science,
technology, engineering, and math;
(b) Class size reduction in grades K-3;
(c) Increased efficiency in the use of high-cost specialized school
facilities, such as the shared use of specialized facilities at skill
centers and community colleges;
(d) Simplifying the school construction assistance program by
scheduling multiple release dates each year;
(e) Improving web-based access by taxpayers to school capacity and
actual enrollment in order to understand possible opportunities to
increase efficiency through consolidation. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction must post this capacity and
enrollment information on its web site.
(4) Funds from this appropriation may be used to match federal
dollars provided by the office of economic adjustment for school
replacement facilities located on military bases.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
expedite the eligibility review, project approval process, and
contracting for any eligible grant under the school construction
assistance program to address the school construction emergency
resulting from the fire that destroyed the Crestline school in the
Evergreen School District.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $461,615,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,328,000
Common School Construction Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $534,443,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,022,299,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,556,742,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Allotments for appropriations in this
act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review
requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in
compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing
alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10
RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and
RCW 43.88.110.
(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget
notes or in the governor's budget document.
(3) The office of financial management and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction must expedite the allotment and
contracting process for projects funded in these appropriations that
are ready to begin and meet all other requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 State agencies, including institutions of
higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for
capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for
operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The amounts shown under the headings "Prior
Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for
informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval
of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate
prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia
in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an
estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the
2015-2017 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero
does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide
funding for the project or program in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of
the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond
appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the
appropriations contained in this act are seven million five hundred
thousand dollars for the 2013-2015 biennium, forty-eight million
dollars for the 2015-2017 biennium, and sixty-eight million dollars for
the 2017-2019 biennium and each biennium thereafter until the bonds are
retired, for a total estimated debt service costs of eight hundred
fifty-five million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

INDEX PAGE #

. . . . . . . . . . . . 4
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
--- END ---