BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that persons
purchasing long-term care insurance typically pay premiums for many
years before receiving coverage for benefits offered under the policy.
It is the intent of the legislature to protect policyholders from
unfair or deceptive billing practices that result in the unintentional
lapse of coverage due to nonpayment. The legislature finds that many
older policies do not provide adequate consumer protections and where
possible consumer protections should be added to the contract terms
retroactively as well as prospectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.84 RCW
to read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to protect insureds from
unintentional lapse by establishing standards for notification of a
designee to receive notice of lapse for nonpayment of premium at least
thirty days prior to the termination of coverage and to provide for a
limited right to reinstatement of coverage unintentionally lapsed by a
person with a cognitive impairment or loss of functional capacity, or
due to lack of appropriate billing notification to the insured. These
are minimum standards and do not prevent an insurer from including
benefits more favorable to the insured. This section applies to every
insurer providing long-term care coverage to a resident of this state,
which coverage is renewed on or after January 1, 2011.
(1) Every insurer shall permit an insured to designate at least one
additional person to receive notice of lapse or termination for
nonpayment of premium, if the premium is not paid on or before its due
date. The designation shall include the designee's full name and home
address.
(a) The notice shall provide that the contract or certificate will
not lapse until at least thirty days after the notice is mailed to the
insured's designee.
(b) Where a policyholder or certificate holder pays the premium
through a payroll or pension deduction plan, the insurer shall permit
the insured to designate a person to receive notice of lapse or
termination for nonpayment of premium within sixty days after the
insured is no longer on such a premium payment plan. The application
or enrollment form for contracts or certificates where the premium will
be paid through a payroll or pension deduction plan shall clearly
indicate the payment plan selected by the applicant.
(c) The insurer shall offer each insured in writing an opportunity
to change the designee, or update the information concerning the
designee, no less frequently than once in every twenty-four months.
(2) Every insurer shall provide a limited right to reinstate
coverage in the event of lapse or termination for nonpayment of
premium, if the insurer is provided proof of the insured's cognitive
impairment or loss of functional capacity, or if the lapse was due to
lack of appropriate billing notification to the insured, and
reinstatement is requested within the twelve months after the policy
lapsed or terminated due to nonpayment of premium.
(a) The standard of proof of cognitive impairment or loss of
functional capacity shall be no more restrictive than the benefit
eligibility criteria for cognitive impairment or loss of functional
capacity contained in the contract or certificate.
(b) Current good health of the insured shall not be required for
reinstatement if the request otherwise meets the requirements of this
section.
(c) The insured may demonstrate the lack of appropriate billing
notification when the insurer had prior knowledge of the insured's
change of billing address and failed to change the billing address to
reflect the new location, or the insurer should have reasonably known
of the billing address change when claims have been made for care at
the new residence.
(3) An insurer shall permit an insured to waive his or her right to
designate an additional person to receive notice of lapse or
termination for nonpayment of premium.
(a) The waiver shall be in writing, and shall be dated and signed
by the applicant or insured.
(b) No less frequently than once in every twenty-four months, the
insured shall be permitted to revoke this waiver and to name a
designee.
(4) Designation by the insured to receive notice of lapse or
termination for nonpayment of premium does not constitute acceptance of
any liability on the part of the designee for services provided to the
insured or applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.83 RCW
to read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to protect insureds from
unintentional lapse by establishing standards for notification of a
designee to receive notice of lapse for nonpayment of premium at least
thirty days prior to the termination of coverage and to provide for a
limited right to reinstatement of coverage unintentionally lapsed by a
person with a cognitive impairment or loss of functional capacity, or
due to lack of appropriate billing notification to the insured. These
are minimum standards and do not prevent an insurer from including
benefits more favorable to the insured. This section applies to every
insurer providing long-term care coverage to a resident of this state,
which coverage is issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1,
2014.
(1) Every insurer shall permit an insured to designate at least one
additional person to receive notice of lapse or termination for
nonpayment of premium, if the premium is not paid on or before its due
date. The designation shall include the designee's full name and home
address.
(a) The notice shall provide that the contract or certificate will
not lapse until at least thirty days after the notice is mailed to the
insured's designee.
(b) Where a policyholder or certificate holder pays the premium
through a payroll or pension deduction plan, the insurer shall permit
the insured to designate a person to receive notice of lapse or
termination for nonpayment of premium within sixty days after the
insured is no longer on such a premium payment plan. The application
or enrollment form for contracts or certificates where the premium will
be paid through a payroll or pension deduction plan shall clearly
indicate the payment plan selected by the applicant.
(c) The insurer shall offer each insured in writing an opportunity
to change the designee, or update the information concerning the
designee, no less frequently than once in every twenty-four months.
(2) Every insurer shall provide a limited right to reinstate
coverage in the event of lapse or termination for nonpayment of
premium, if the insurer is provided proof of the insured's cognitive
impairment or loss of functional capacity, or if the lapse was due to
lack of appropriate billing notification to the insured, and
reinstatement is requested within the twelve months after the policy
lapsed or terminated due to nonpayment of premium.
(a) The standard of proof of cognitive impairment or loss of
functional capacity shall be no more restrictive than the benefit
eligibility criteria for cognitive impairment or loss of functional
capacity contained in the contract or certificate.
(b) Current good health of the insured shall not be required for
reinstatement if the request otherwise meets the requirements of this
section.
(c) The insured may demonstrate the lack of appropriate billing
notification when the insurer had prior knowledge of the insured's
change of billing address and failed to change the billing address to
reflect the new location, or the insurer should have reasonably known
of the billing address change when claims have been made for care at
the new residence.
(3) An insurer shall permit an insured to waive his or her right to
designate an additional person to receive notice of lapse or
termination for nonpayment of premium.
(a) The waiver shall be in writing, and shall be dated and signed
by the applicant or insured.
(b) No less frequently than once in every twenty-four months, the
insured shall be permitted to revoke this waiver and to name a
designee.
(4) Designation by the insured to receive notice of lapse or
termination for nonpayment of premium does not constitute acceptance of
any liability on the part of the designee for services provided to the
insured or applicant.

--- END ---