BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The federal patient protection and
affordable care act of 2010, P.L. 111-148, as amended, prohibits the
imposition of any preexisting condition coverage exceptions in the
individual market for insurance coverage beginning January 1, 2014.
The affordable care act also extends opportunities for individuals to
enroll in comprehensive coverage in a health benefit exchange beginning
January 1, 2014. The legislature finds that some individuals may still
be barred from enrolling in the new comprehensive coverage options and
it is the intent of the legislature to continue some limited access to
the Washington state health insurance pool for a transitional period,
and to provide for modification to the pool to reflect changes in
federal law and insurance availability.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.41.060 and 2011 c 314 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall have the general powers and authority granted
under the laws of this state to insurance companies, health care
service contractors, and health maintenance organizations, licensed or
registered to offer or provide the kinds of health coverage defined
under this title. In addition thereto, the board shall:
(a) ((Designate or establish the standard health questionnaire to
be used under RCW 48.41.100 and 48.43.018, including the form and
content of the standard health questionnaire and the method of its
application. The questionnaire must provide for an objective
evaluation of an individual's health status by assigning a discreet
measure, such as a system of point scoring to each individual. The
questionnaire must not contain any questions related to pregnancy, and
pregnancy shall not be a basis for coverage by the pool. The
questionnaire shall be designed such that it is reasonably expected to
identify the eight percent of persons who are the most costly to treat
who are under individual coverage in health benefit plans, as defined
in RCW 48.43.005, in Washington state or are covered by the pool, if
applied to all such persons;
(b) Obtain from a member of the American academy of actuaries, who
is independent of the board, a certification that the standard health
questionnaire meets the requirements of (a) of this subsection;
(c) Approve the standard health questionnaire and any modifications
needed to comply with this chapter. The standard health questionnaire
shall be submitted to an actuary for certification, modified as
necessary, and approved at least every thirty-six months unless at the
time when certification is required the pool will be discontinued
before the end of the succeeding thirty-six month period. The
designation and approval of the standard health questionnaire by the
board shall not be subject to review and approval by the commissioner.
The standard health questionnaire or any modification thereto shall not
be used until ninety days after public notice of the approval of the
questionnaire or any modification thereto, except that the initial
standard health questionnaire approved for use by the board after March
23, 2000, may be used immediately following public notice of such
approval;
(d))) Establish appropriate rates, rate schedules, rate
adjustments, expense allowances, claim reserve formulas and any other
actuarial functions appropriate to the operation of the pool. Rates
shall not be unreasonable in relation to the coverage provided, the
risk experience, and expenses of providing the coverage. Rates and
rate schedules may be adjusted for appropriate risk factors such as age
and area variation in claim costs and shall take into consideration
appropriate risk factors in accordance with established actuarial
underwriting practices consistent with Washington state individual plan
rating requirements under RCW 48.44.022 and 48.46.064;
(((e))) (b)(i) Assess members of the pool in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter, and make advance interim assessments as may
be reasonable and necessary for the organizational or interim operating
expenses. Any interim assessments will be credited as offsets against
any regular assessments due following the close of the year.
(ii) Self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangements are subject
to assessment under this subsection only in the event that assessments
are not preempted by the employee retirement income security act of
1974, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq. The arrangements and the
commissioner shall initially request an advisory opinion from the
United States department of labor or obtain a declaratory ruling from
a federal court on the legality of imposing assessments on these
arrangements before imposing the assessment. Once the legality of the
assessments has been determined, the multiple employer welfare
arrangement certified by the insurance commissioner must begin payment
of these assessments.
(iii) If there has not been a final determination of the legality
of these assessments, then beginning on the earlier of (A) the date the
fourth multiple employer welfare arrangement has been certified by the
insurance commissioner, or (B) April 1, 2006, the arrangement shall
deposit the assessments imposed by this subsection into an interest
bearing escrow account maintained by the arrangement. Upon a final
determination that the assessments are not preempted by the employee
retirement income security act of 1974, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001
et seq., all funds in the interest bearing escrow account shall be
transferred to the board;
(((f))) (c) Issue policies of health coverage in accordance with
the requirements of this chapter;
(((g))) (d) Establish procedures for the administration of the
premium discount provided under RCW 48.41.200(3)(a)(iii);
(((h))) (e) Contract with the Washington state health care
authority for the administration of the premium discounts provided
under RCW 48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii);
(((i))) (f) Set a reasonable fee to be paid to an insurance
producer licensed in Washington state for submitting an acceptable
application for enrollment in the pool; and
(((j))) (g) Provide certification to the commissioner when
assessments will exceed the threshold level established in RCW
48.41.037.
(2) In addition thereto, the board may:
(a) Enter into contracts as are necessary or proper to carry out
the provisions and purposes of this chapter including the authority,
with the approval of the commissioner, to enter into contracts with
similar pools of other states for the joint performance of common
administrative functions, or with persons or other organizations for
the performance of administrative functions;
(b) Sue or be sued, including taking any legal action as necessary
to avoid the payment of improper claims against the pool or the
coverage provided by or through the pool;
(c) Appoint appropriate legal, actuarial, and other committees as
necessary to provide technical assistance in the operation of the pool,
policy, and other contract design, and any other function within the
authority of the pool; and
(d) Conduct periodic audits to assure the general accuracy of the
financial data submitted to the pool, and the board shall cause the
pool to have an annual audit of its operations by an independent
certified public accountant.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require or
authorize the adoption of rules under chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.41.100 and 2011 c 315 s 5 and 2011 c 314 s 15 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) The following persons who are residents of this state are
eligible for pool coverage:
(i) ((Any person who provides evidence of a carrier's decision not
to accept him or her for enrollment in an individual health benefit
plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 based upon, and within ninety days of
the receipt of, the results of the standard health questionnaire
designated by the board and administered by health carriers under RCW
48.43.018;
(ii) Any person who continues to be eligible for pool coverage
based upon the results of the standard health questionnaire designated
by the board and administered by the pool administrator pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section;
(iii) Any person who resides in a county of the state where no
carrier or insurer eligible under chapter 48.15 RCW offers to the
public an individual health benefit plan other than a catastrophic
health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 at the time of application to
the pool, and who makes direct application to the pool)) Any resident
of the state not eligible for medicare coverage or medicaid coverage,
and residing in a county where an individual health plan other than a
catastrophic health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 is not offered to
the resident at the time of application to the pool, whether through
the health benefit exchange operated pursuant to chapter 43.71 RCW or
in the private insurance market, and who makes application to the pool
for coverage prior to December 31, 2017;
(ii) Any resident of the state not eligible for medicare coverage,
enrolled in the pool prior to December 31, 2013, shall remain eligible
for pool coverage except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section through December 31, 2017;
(((iv))) (iii) Any person becoming eligible for medicare before
August 1, 2009, who provides evidence of (A) a rejection for medical
reasons, (B) a requirement of restrictive riders, (C) an up-rated
premium, (D) a preexisting conditions limitation, or (E) lack of access
to or for a comprehensive medicare supplemental insurance policy under
chapter 48.66 RCW, the effect of any of which is to substantially
reduce coverage from that received by a person considered a standard
risk by at least one member within six months of the date of
application; and
(((v))) (iv) Any person becoming eligible for medicare on or after
August 1, 2009, who does not have access to a reasonable choice of
comprehensive medicare part C plans, as defined in (b) of this
subsection, and who provides evidence of (A) a rejection for medical
reasons, (B) a requirement of restrictive riders, (C) an up-rated
premium, (D) a preexisting conditions limitation, or (E) lack of access
to or for a comprehensive medicare supplemental insurance policy under
chapter 48.66 RCW, the effect of any of which is to substantially
reduce coverage from that received by a person considered a standard
risk by at least one member within six months of the date of
application((; and
(vi) Any person under the age of nineteen who does not have access
to individual plan open enrollment or special enrollment, as defined in
RCW 48.43.005, or the federal preexisting condition insurance pool, at
the time of application to the pool is eligible for the pool
coverage)).
(b) For purposes of (a)(((v)))(iv) of this subsection (1), a person
does not have access to a reasonable choice of plans unless the person
has a choice of health maintenance organization or preferred provider
organization medicare part C plans offered by at least three different
carriers that have had provider networks in the person's county of
residence for at least five years. The plan options must include
coverage at least as comprehensive as a plan F medicare supplement plan
combined with medicare parts A and B. The plan options must also
provide access to adequate and stable provider networks that make up-to-date provider directories easily accessible on the carrier web site,
and will provide them in hard copy, if requested. In addition, if no
health maintenance organization or preferred provider organization plan
includes the health care provider with whom the person has an
established care relationship and from whom he or she has received
treatment within the past twelve months, the person does not have
reasonable access.
(2) The following persons are not eligible for coverage by the
pool:
(a) Any person having terminated coverage in the pool unless (i)
twelve months have lapsed since termination, or (ii) that person can
show continuous other coverage which has been involuntarily terminated
for any reason other than nonpayment of premiums. However, these
exclusions do not apply to eligible individuals as defined in section
2741(b) of the federal health insurance portability and accountability
act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-41(b));
(b) Inmates of public institutions and those persons who become
eligible for medical assistance after June 30, 2008, as defined in RCW
74.09.010. However, these exclusions do not apply to eligible
individuals as defined in section 2741(b) of the federal health
insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec.
300gg-41(b))((;
(c) Any person who resides in a county of the state where any
carrier or insurer regulated under chapter 48.15 RCW offers to the
public an individual health benefit plan other than a catastrophic
health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005 at the time of application to
the pool and who does not qualify for pool coverage based upon the
results of the standard health questionnaire, or pursuant to subsection
(1)(a)(iv) of this section)).
(3) When a carrier or insurer regulated under chapter 48.15 RCW
begins to offer an individual health benefit plan in a county where no
carrier had been offering an individual health benefit plan:
(a) If the health benefit plan offered is other than a catastrophic
health plan as defined in RCW 48.43.005, any person enrolled in a pool
plan pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(((iii))) (i) of this section in that
county shall no longer be eligible for coverage under that plan
pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(((iii))) (i) of this section((, but may
continue to be eligible for pool coverage based upon the results of the
standard health questionnaire designated by the board and administered
by the pool administrator. The pool administrator shall offer to
administer the questionnaire to each person no longer eligible for
coverage under subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section within thirty
days of determining that he or she is no longer eligible;
(b) Losing eligibility for pool coverage under this subsection (3)
does not affect a person's eligibility for pool coverage under
subsection (1)(a)(i), (ii), or (iv) of this section)); and
(((c))) (b) The pool administrator shall provide written notice to
any person who is no longer eligible for coverage under a pool plan
under this subsection (3) within thirty days of the administrator's
determination that the person is no longer eligible. The notice shall:
(i) Indicate that coverage under the plan will cease ninety days from
the date that the notice is dated; (ii) describe any other coverage
options, either in or outside of the pool, available to the person; and
(iii) describe the ((procedures for the administration of the standard
health questionnaire to determine the person's continued eligibility
for coverage under subsection (1)(a)(ii) of this section; and (iv)
describe the)) enrollment process for the available options outside of
the pool.
(((4) The board shall ensure that an independent analysis of the
eligibility standards for the pool coverage is conducted, including
examining the eight percent eligibility threshold, eligibility for
medicaid enrollees and other publicly sponsored enrollees, and the
impacts on the pool and the state budget. The board shall report the
findings to the legislature by December 1, 2007.))

Sec. 4 RCW 48.41.160 and 2007 c 259 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On or before December 31, 2007, the pool shall cancel all
existing pool policies and replace them with policies that are
identical to the existing policies except for the inclusion of a
provision providing for a guarantee of the continuity of coverage
consistent with this section. As a means to minimize the number of
policy changes for enrollees, replacement policies provided under this
subsection also may include the plan modifications authorized in RCW
48.41.100, 48.41.110, and 48.41.120.
(2) A pool policy shall contain a guarantee of the individual's
right to continued coverage, subject to the provisions of subsections
(4) ((and)), (5), (7), and (8) of this section.
(3) The guarantee of continuity of coverage required by this
section shall not prevent the pool from canceling or nonrenewing a
policy for:
(a) Nonpayment of premium;
(b) Violation of published policies of the pool;
(c) Failure of a covered person who becomes eligible for medicare
benefits by reason of age to apply for a pool medical supplement plan,
or a medicare supplement plan or other similar plan offered by a
carrier pursuant to federal laws and regulations;
(d) Failure of a covered person to pay any deductible or copayment
amount owed to the pool and not the provider of health care services;
(e) Covered persons committing fraudulent acts as to the pool;
(f) Covered persons materially breaching the pool policy; or
(g) Changes adopted to federal or state laws when such changes no
longer permit the continued offering of such coverage.
(4)(a) The guarantee of continuity of coverage provided by this
section requires that if the pool replaces a plan, it must make the
replacement plan available to all individuals in the plan being
replaced. The replacement plan must include all of the services
covered under the replaced plan, and must not significantly limit
access to the kind of services covered under the replacement plan
through unreasonable cost-sharing requirements or otherwise. The pool
may also allow individuals who are covered by a plan that is being
replaced an unrestricted right to transfer to a fully comparable plan.
(b) The guarantee of continuity of coverage provided by this
section requires that if the pool discontinues offering a plan: (i)
The pool must provide notice to each individual of the discontinuation
at least ninety days prior to the date of the discontinuation; (ii) the
pool must offer to each individual provided coverage under the
discontinued plan the option to enroll in any other plan currently
offered by the pool for which the individual is otherwise eligible; and
(iii) in exercising the option to discontinue a plan and in offering
the option of coverage under (b)(ii) of this subsection, the pool must
act uniformly without regard to any health status-related factor of
enrolled individuals or individuals who may become eligible for this
coverage.
(c) The pool cannot replace or discontinue a plan under this
subsection (4) until it has completed an evaluation of the impact of
replacing the plan upon:
(i) The cost and quality of care to pool enrollees;
(ii) Pool financing and enrollment;
(iii) The board's ability to offer comprehensive and other plans to
its enrollees;
(iv) Other items identified by the board.
In its evaluation, the board must request input from the
constituents represented by the board members.
(d) The guarantee of continuity of coverage provided by this
section does not apply if the pool has zero enrollment in a plan.
(5) The pool may not change the rates for pool policies except on
a class basis, with a clear disclosure in the policy of the pool's
right to do so.
(6) A pool policy offered under this chapter shall provide that,
upon the death of the individual in whose name the policy is issued,
every other individual then covered under the policy may elect, within
a period specified in the policy, to continue coverage under the same
or a different policy.
(7) All pool policies issued on or after January 1, 2014, must
reflect the new eligibility requirements of RCW 48.41.100 and contain
a statement of the intent to discontinue the pool coverage on December
31, 2017, under pool nonmedicare plans.
(8) Pool policies issued prior to January 1, 2014, shall be
modified effective January 1, 2013, consistent with subsection (3)(g)
of this section, and contain a statement of the intent to discontinue
pool coverage on December 31, 2017, under pool nonmedicare plans.
(9) The pool shall discontinue all nonmedicare pool plans effective
December 31, 2017.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.41.240 and 2012 c 87 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall review populations that may need ongoing access
to coverage through the pool, with specific attention to those persons
who may be excluded from or may receive inadequate coverage beginning
January 1, 2014, such as persons with end-stage renal disease or
HIV/AIDS, or persons not eligible for coverage in the exchange.
(2) If the review under subsection (1) of this section indicates a
continued need for coverage through the pool after December 31, 2013,
the board shall submit recommendations regarding any modifications to
pool eligibility requirements for new and ongoing enrollment after
December 31, 2013. The recommendations must address any needed
modifications to the standard health questionnaire or other eligibility
screening tool that could be used in a manner consistent with federal
law to determine eligibility for enrollment in the pool.
(3) The board shall complete an analysis of current pool assessment
requirements in relation to assessments that will fund the reinsurance
program and recommend changes to pool assessments or any credits
against assessments that may be considered for the reinsurance program.
The analysis shall recommend whether the categories of members paying
assessments should be adjusted to make the assessment fair and
equitable among all payers.
(4) The board shall report its recommendations to the governor and
the legislature by December 1, 2012.
(5) The board shall revisit the study of eligibility completed in
2012 with another review of the populations that may need ongoing
access to coverage through the pool, to be submitted to the governor
and legislature by November 1, 2015. The eligibility study shall
include the nonmedicare populations scheduled to lose coverage and
medicare populations, and consider whether the enrollees have access to
comprehensive coverage alternatives that include appropriate pharmacy
coverage. The study shall include recommendations to address any
barriers in eligibility that remain in accessing other coverage such as
medicare supplemental coverage or comprehensive pharmacy coverage, as
well as suggestions for financing changes and recommendations on a
future expiration of the pool.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect
January 1, 2014.

--- END ---