BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.44.050 and 2008 c 31 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each commissioner shall receive ninety dollars for each day or
portion thereof spent in actual attendance at official meetings of the
district commission, or in performance of other official services or
duties on behalf of the district, to include meetings of the commission
of his or her own district, or meetings attended by one or more
commissioners of two or more districts called to consider business
common to them, except that the total compensation paid to such
commissioner during any one year shall not exceed eight thousand six
hundred forty dollars. The commissioners may not be compensated for
services performed of a ministerial or professional nature.
Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
district as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to
the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
Any district providing group insurance for its employees, covering
them, their immediate family, and dependents, may provide insurance for
its commissioners with ((the same)) similar coverage. Each
commissioner shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses actually
incurred in connection with such business and meetings, including his
or her subsistence and lodging and travel while away from his or her
place of residence. No resolution shall be adopted without a majority
vote of the whole commission. The commission shall organize by
election of its own members of a president and secretary, shall by
resolution adopt rules governing the transaction of its business and
shall adopt an official seal. All proceedings of the commission shall
be by motion or resolution recorded in a book or books kept for such
purpose, which shall be public records.
The dollar thresholds established in this section must be adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management every five years,
beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index
during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or
duties while representing more than one of his or her districts.
However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation
if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

--- END ---