BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Scientific brain research indicates that music lessons help
children improve their language skills. Music can fundamentally shape
brains in ways that may enhance everyday tasks, including reading and
listening;
(b) Perhaps equally important, especially for young children, is
that music education provides opportunities for students to engage in
social interaction, play, creativity, and imagination; and
(c) Unfortunately, an increased emphasis on academic learning,
combined with budget constraints, has led schools to reduce or
eliminate music education for young children, especially in
high-poverty schools with limited resources.
(2) Therefore the legislature intends to take advantage of
innovative new curriculum in music education for young children and
provide support for its use in state-funded all-day kindergarten
classes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated specifically for this purpose,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate
grants for a music does matter program to support music education for
young children, with funding provided to schools with state-funded
all-day kindergarten programs under RCW 28A.150.315. If funds are not
sufficient to cover all kindergarten classes in schools with
state-funded all-day kindergarten, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction must allocate the funds first to schools with the
highest percentages of students qualifying for free and reduced-price
lunch.
(2) The music does matter grants must be used to purchase a
standards-based music curriculum designed for preschool, kindergarten,
and first grade classrooms that may be taught by regular classroom
teachers without special music training. Grant recipients must
implement the curriculum in state-funded all-day kindergarten classes.

--- END ---