BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that it has a
compelling interest in discovering and caring for the medical needs of
infants placed in out-of-home care who may be at risk of acquiring or
have acquired the human immunodeficiency virus. Therefore, it is the
intent of the legislature that infants who may be at risk for
contracting the human immunodeficiency virus are tested as soon as
possible after being placed in custody. This testing will enable the
infant's treating physician to begin any necessary treatment which may
in fact prevent the infant from ever acquiring the disease.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.315 and 2006 c 221 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a child is ordered removed from his or her home
pursuant to this chapter, the agency charged with his or her care may
authorize an evaluation and treatment for the child's routine and
necessary medical, dental, or mental health care, and all necessary
emergency care.
(2)(a) When an infant under one year of age is placed in out-of-home care under this chapter, the department or other supervising
agency shall request that the infant's treating physician test the
infant for human immunodeficiency virus, if the human immunodeficiency
virus status of the mother of the infant:
(i) Is known to be positive; or
(ii) Is unknown and the department has specific information
indicating that the mother is at increased risk of human
immunodeficiency virus infection, including, but not limited to, a
history of drug abuse.
(b) The department or other supervising agency shall follow the
treating physician's recommendations for any follow-up testing and
treatment for an infant who has tested positive for human
immunodeficiency virus under (a) of this subsection.
(c) Prior to requesting testing under (a) of this subsection, the
department shall request a parent's consent to test the infant. If a
parent objects to the test for any reason, including, but not limited
to, that it conflicts with their religious tenets and practices, the
department or other supervising agency shall, at the earliest possible
opportunity, request the court to order such testing.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.24.330 and 1988 c 206 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
No person may undergo HIV testing without the person's consent
except:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 7.70.065 for incompetent persons;
(2) In seroprevalence studies where neither the persons whose blood
is being tested know the test results nor the persons conducting the
tests know who is undergoing testing;
(3) If the department of labor and industries determines that it is
relevant, in which case payments made under Title 51 RCW may be
conditioned on the taking of an HIV antibody test; ((or))
(4) Pursuant to RCW 13.34.315 for infants placed in out-of-home
care under chapter 13.34 RCW; or
(5) As otherwise expressly authorized by this chapter.

--- END ---