BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) It is in the public interest of the citizens of Washington to
encourage the recovery and reuse of materials, such as metals, that
replace the output of mining and other extractive industries;
(2) It is desirable to reduce the volume of the solid waste stream
and resulting burdens on municipalities;
(3) Ensuring the proper handling and recycling of used small
rechargeable batteries prevents release of toxic materials into the
environment and removes from the waste stream materials that may
present safety concerns if mishandled;
(4) It is important to ensure that all entities supplying small
rechargeable batteries to users in Washington, whether as stand alone
units or as easily removable components of products, bear the same
battery stewardship obligations;
(5) Addressing certain existing and future barriers to
implementation of voluntary industry programs to collect and recycle
used small rechargeable batteries will facilitate these interests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Easily removable" means readily detachable by a consumer
without the use of tools or with the use of common household tools.
(3) "Free rider used small rechargeable battery" means a used small
rechargeable battery that under section 3 of this act must be covered
by a qualified program, but as to which no manufacturer or marketer of
the battery operated or participated in a qualified program at the time
the used battery was collected.
(4) "Multiparty program" means a Washington-only or multistate
program that collects used small rechargeable batteries regardless of
brand and has collected in Washington at least twenty thousand pounds
of these batteries in the last twelve months and does so in each year
thereafter, or is expected to collect at least twenty thousand pounds
of used small rechargeable batteries in Washington in its first year of
operation in Washington and each year thereafter.
(5) "Nonrechargeable battery" means a battery that is not designed
to be recharged for repeated use.
(6) "Participate" means to appoint an organization to act as an
agent to administer a qualified used small rechargeable battery
stewardship program and to have that appointment accepted by the
qualified program.
(7) "Person" means a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation,
nonprofit corporation or organization, limited liability company, firm,
association, cooperative, or other legal entity located within or
outside Washington.
(8) "Place of business" means a location at which a retailer sells
or offers for sale small rechargeable batteries or portable
rechargeable products to consumers.
(9) "Portable rechargeable product" means a product that is
packaged with or contains one or more easily removable small
rechargeable batteries at the time it is sold or offered for sale, and
is not a medical device as defined in RCW 19.210.010.
(10) "Portable rechargeable product manufacturer or marketer" means
every person that: (a) Manufactures or arranges for the manufacturing
of portable rechargeable products sold, offered for sale, or
distributed in Washington under a brand name it owns or licenses; (b)
packages or arranges for the packaging of portable rechargeable
products sold, offered for sale, or distributed in Washington under a
brand name it owns or licenses; (c) imports into the United States
portable rechargeable products that are sold, offered for sale, or
distributed in Washington under a brand name it owns or licenses; (d)
is a private label retailer; or (e) is not a retailer and otherwise
makes available to purchasers in Washington portable rechargeable
products.
(11) "Private label retailer" means a retailer who sells small
rechargeable batteries or portable rechargeable products under one or
more brand names it owns or licenses.
(12) "Qualified used small rechargeable battery stewardship
program" or "qualified program" means a program for the collection,
transportation, recycling, and disposal of used small rechargeable
batteries that has been approved by the department under section 5 of
this act. A qualified program may be either a retailer program or a
multiparty program, as those terms are defined in this section.
(13) "Rechargeable battery steward" means every small rechargeable
battery manufacturer or marketer, a portable rechargeable product
manufacturer or marketer, and a private label retailer.
(14) "Retailer" means every person who sells or offers to sell
small rechargeable batteries, or portable rechargeable products, at
retail through any means including, but not limited to, remote
offerings such as sales outlets, catalogs, or the internet, but does
not include any sale that is a wholesale transaction with a distributor
or manufacturer.
(15) "Retailer program" means a program operated by a single
retailer, without other sponsors, that collects used small rechargeable
batteries regardless of brand at multiple locations and has collected
at least five thousand pounds of these batteries in the United States
in the last twelve months and does so in each year thereafter, or is
expected to collect at least five thousand pounds of used small
rechargeable batteries in the United States in its first year of
operation and each year thereafter.
(16) "Small rechargeable battery" means one or more voltaic or
galvanic cells, electrically connected to produce electric energy and
designed to be recharged and weighing less than eleven pounds, or an
assembly of small rechargeable batteries in a container that has a
single positive and negative connection (commonly known as a battery
pack) that weighs less than eleven pounds, but does not include: (a)
A battery that is not easily removable or is not intended or designed
to be removed from the product, other than by the manufacturer; (b) a
battery that contains electrolyte as a free liquid; or (c) a battery or
battery pack that employs lead acid technology, unless the battery or
battery pack: (i) Is sealed; (ii) contains no liquid electrolyte; and
(iii) is intended by its manufacturer or marketer to power a hand-held
device or to provide uninterrupted backup electrical power protection
for stationary consumer products or stationary office equipment.
(17) "Small rechargeable battery manufacturer or marketer" means
every person that: (a) Manufactures or arranges for the manufacturing
of small rechargeable batteries sold, offered for sale, or distributed
in Washington under a brand name it owns or licenses; (b) packages or
arranges for the packaging of small rechargeable batteries for sale,
offering for sale, or distribution in Washington under a brand name it
owns or licenses; (c) imports into the United States small rechargeable
batteries that are sold, offered for sale, or distributed in Washington
under a brand name it owns or licenses; (d) is a private label
retailer; or (e) is not a retailer and otherwise makes available to
purchasers in Washington small rechargeable batteries, whether as
stand-alone items or otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, by January 1, 2014, any rechargeable battery steward who
has a reasonable basis to know that any of the small rechargeable
batteries or portable rechargeable products it manufactures or markets
are being sold or offered for sale in Washington by retailers who do
not operate a qualified program under section 5 of this act shall
either:
(a) Participate in a qualified multiparty program or retailer
program described in section 5 of this act; or
(b) Participate in a qualified multiparty program operated by
another person as described in section 12 of this act.
(2) This section does not apply to any telecommunications provider
who markets equipment under a brand it owns that uses small
rechargeable batteries that were manufactured by a participant in a
qualified used small rechargeable battery stewardship program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Any person offering used small
rechargeable battery recycling services in Washington shall comply with
this section.
(2) Any person offering used small rechargeable battery recycling
services in Washington shall: (a) Comply with all legal and regulatory
requirements applicable to the collection, storage, and transportation
of such batteries; and (b) ship all used small rechargeable batteries
it collects to lawfully permitted facilities that reuse the batteries
as rechargeable power sources, arrange for the reuse of the batteries
as rechargeable power sources, or reclaim constituents of the batteries
for reuse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Any person who seeks to have either a
retailer program or a multiparty program approved as a qualified
program must submit to the department a plan for that program that
meets the requirements of subsections (3) and (4) of this section. The
plan must be submitted to the department at least ninety days prior to
the date the person intends to begin operating the program as a
qualified program. A plan submitted for a retailer program must be
accompanied by a fee of three thousand dollars and that fee must be
deposited into the used battery stewardship account created in section
10 of this act. A plan submitted for a multiparty program must be
accompanied by a fee of five thousand dollars and that fee must be
deposited into the used battery stewardship account created in section
10 of this act.
(2) The department must acknowledge its receipt of any plan to
operate a qualified program within fourteen days of receipt.
(3) A retailer program plan or multiparty program plan submitted to
the department must contain the following:
(a) The name, address, and contact information for the operator of
the qualified program;
(b) A description of the qualified program that includes, along
with any other information that the submitting person believes fairly
describes the program, the identification of all sorting and
reclamation facilities to be used through final disposition for sorting
and reclamation of all used small rechargeable batteries collected;
(c) A certification that:
(i) All used small rechargeable batteries collected by the plan
will be handled by the submitting person in compliance with all
applicable laws and rules, and that any used small rechargeable
batteries shipped for reclamation by the plan submitter will be shipped
only to lawfully permitted facilities;
(ii) All contracts with service providers entered into by the
submitting person do or will upon their effective date require
compliance with all applicable laws and rules;
(iii) Any used small rechargeable batteries shipped for reclamation
by the service provider will be shipped only to lawfully permitted
facilities;
(iv) All return acceptance, recycling, and other handling services,
including postcollection transportation, will be provided free of
charge to consumers; and
(v) If the plan is approved by the department in accordance with
subsection (5) of this section, it will be implemented in accordance
with the approved plan until such time as the approved plan is amended
pursuant to subsection (8) of this section or terminated pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section;
(d) Identification of the locations that will be served by the
program where Washington residents may take used small rechargeable
batteries;
(e) The process and timeline under which the operator of the
qualified program will:
(i) Coordinate the solicitation of public comment on its draft
plan, including facilitating workshops and accepting verbal and written
testimony; and
(ii) Compile and review all public comments submitted on the draft
plan and make appropriate revisions to the plan before finalizing the
plan; and
(f) The mechanisms by which the program will handle inquiries from
consumers.
(4) In addition to meeting the requirements of subsection (3) of
this section, a multiparty program plan submitted to the department
must also contain the following:
(a) Identification of the small rechargeable battery manufacturers
and marketers and the portable rechargeable product manufacturers or
marketers that are currently participating, or plan to participate, in
the program, and the means by which the program operator will track
their participation;
(b) Retailer collection of used small rechargeable batteries at
multiple locations;
(c) Collection of used small rechargeable batteries from
governmental collection facilities;
(d) The provision of at least one used small rechargeable battery
collection site for each city or town with a population greater than
ten thousand; and
(e) Education and outreach activities to maximize collections,
including the offering of signage to retailers indicating the
retailer's support of the program.
(5) The department must approve any plan that includes all of the
applicable requirements specified in subsections (3) and (4) of this
section. If the department fails to notify the person submitting the
program plan within ninety days of receiving the plan that the program
plan is either: (a) Approved; or (b) denied on the basis that it is
incomplete, then the program is deemed an approved, qualified program.
(6) Upon receiving approval from the department as a qualified
program, the submitter of the qualified program plan must post on the
internet:
(a) Its program plan;
(b) A rechargeable battery collection site locator to assist
consumers in finding the nearest collection site;
(c) For a multiparty program, a current list of the small
rechargeable battery manufacturers and marketers and the portable
rechargeable product manufacturers or marketers that are currently
participating in the program; and
(d) Contact information for the program, indicating how small
rechargeable battery manufacturers and marketers, portable rechargeable
product manufacturers or marketers, and consumers may seek technical
assistance from the program.
(7) By March 1st of the year following approval of a qualified
program, and each year thereafter until the program is terminated, the
operator of a qualified multiparty or retailer program must:
(a) Pay to the used battery stewardship account established under
section 10 of this act an annual fee of five thousand dollars; and
(b) Make available on the internet and provide to the department a
report identifying:
(i) The program's funding and recycling success, including any
increase in total batteries collected each year, cost of the program
per pound of batteries collected, and the per capita cost of the
program;
(ii) The program's collections by county and battery chemistry;
(iii) The program's educational and outreach activities;
(iv) The small rechargeable battery manufacturers and marketers,
including private label retailers, and portable rechargeable product
manufacturers or marketers, that participate in the program;
(v) The mechanisms employed and the entities involved in the final
disposition of collected materials;
(vi) A description of the methods used to collect, transport, and
account for all used small rechargeable batteries collected, including
identification of all sorting and reclamation facilities used; and
(vii) The program's independently audited financial statement,
including a breakdown of program expenses such as collection,
recycling, education, and overhead. If a qualified program operating
in Washington is part of a program that also operates in jurisdictions
outside of Washington, funding information and audited financial
statements need not be reported on a Washington-specific basis, but
average costs of collection and overhead must be clearly stated.
(8) A qualified program plan may be amended by submitting to the
department a revised version of the qualified program plan showing
proposed amendments and an administrative fee in the amounts set forth
in subsection (1) of this section. Within sixty days of receipt, the
department shall approve the amended program plan, if the amended
program plan continues to address all of the requirements of subsection
(3) of this section and, if it is a multiparty program plan, subsection
(4) of this section, or shall inform the submitter with specificity of
any deficiencies and allow a reasonable period of time for submission
of revised amendments. If the department fails to notify the submitter
with specificity of a continuing failure to meet the applicable
requirements of subsection (3) or (4) of this section after receiving
a further revised version of the qualified program, then the revised
plan is deemed to be a qualified program plan. If at either the
submission or resubmission stage the department informs the submitter
of deficiencies, the unamended, previously approved, qualified plan
remains in effect until a revised plan is approved by the department,
unless the qualified plan is terminated by its operator.
(9) A program plan amendment must be submitted to the department if
there is an addition to the products covered under the qualified
program or there is a significant change in the operation of the
program. In the event of such a submission, the department's review
obligations as to revised portions of the plan are the same as those
set forth in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(10) A qualified program may be terminated by its operator at any
time after the operator gives six months' notice to the department and
to program participants of the proposed termination date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Nothing in this chapter prohibits a
governmental entity from recovering payment from a qualified program
for used small rechargeable batteries that have been collected by or on
behalf of that governmental entity or requires any qualified program
operator to pay any governmental entity for such batteries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Beginning July 1, 2014, no retailer may
sell or offer for sale in Washington:
(a) A small rechargeable battery unless it is marked with an
identification of the small rechargeable battery manufacturer or
marketer;
(b) A portable rechargeable product if the retailer has not
received from the portable rechargeable product manufacturer or
marketer written notification that the battery packaged with or
contained in the portable rechargeable product is marked with an
identification of the battery manufacturer or marketer; or
(c) A small rechargeable battery or portable rechargeable product
if the retailer has received written notice from the department or from
the operator of a qualified program that the manufacturer or marketer
of the battery or product does not comply with this chapter.
(2) No retailer having a place of business in Washington is obliged
to participate in a qualified used small rechargeable battery
stewardship program unless it is a private label retailer.
(3) Retailers that sell or offer to sell small rechargeable
batteries or portable rechargeable products to consumers in Washington,
whether through places of business or through nonretail outlets such as
catalogs, by mail, telephone, or the internet, shall inform consumers
of at least one qualified program that provides opportunities to return
used small rechargeable batteries for recycling in Washington.
(4) Any retailer that has a physical presence in Washington and is
operating or participating in a qualified program shall ensure that all
used batteries placed in any collection container located at the
retailer's facility are protected from short circuiting in accordance
with the applicable law, and shall take reasonable steps to prevent the
placement into any such container of materials other than properly
protected used small rechargeable batteries.
(5) A retailer may not require the operator of a qualified program
to pay the retailer for the costs associated with cooperating with that
program.
(6) An operator of a qualified program may not require a retailer
to pay a fee to participate in that operator's program.
(7) Any person who supplies to a retailer for sale a new small
rechargeable battery or new portable rechargeable product whose
manufacturer or marketer is not in compliance with section 3 of this
act shall, upon request by the retailer, designate a location to which
the retailer may ship the battery or product for further handling and
reimburse the retailer for all costs incurred by the retailer in
shipping the battery or product to the designated location.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 All activities undertaken by any qualified
program or a participant in such a program to establish and operate the
program, to coordinate that program with a program to collect used
electronic waste, or to coordinate with or participate in a program
described in section 12 of this act shall not be considered in
violation of any provision of chapter 19.86 RCW, the consumer
protection act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The department has the authority to
enforce all requirements of this chapter.
(2) If the department learns from a qualified program operator,
including retailer programs, that a person subject to a requirement
under section 3, 4, 7, or 12 of this act has failed to comply with this
act or failed to comply with a certification made pursuant to this act,
the department shall notify the person of the potential violation.
Unless the person comes into compliance within ninety days of receipt
of such a notification, demonstrates to the satisfaction of the
department that it is not subject to section 3, 4, 7, or 12 of this
act, or requests a hearing on its compliance to be conducted in
conformance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW,
the department shall include the person's name and other identifying
information (including, but not limited to, all brand names used by the
person) on a list that is made available to the public through the
internet of entities whose small rechargeable battery or portable
rechargeable product may not be sold in Washington.
(3) Any person who violates section 3, 4, or 12 of this act, or who
holds itself out as operating a qualified program when such a program
has not been approved by the department, is liable for a civil penalty
recoverable in a proceeding before the department in the amount of five
thousand dollars for the first violation, ten thousand dollars for the
second violation, and fifty thousand dollars for the third and each
subsequent violation. Any person who violates section 7 of this act is
liable for a civil penalty recoverable in a proceeding before the
department in the amount of one thousand dollars. For purposes of this
chapter, multiple consecutive days of the same failure to comply with
a requirement of this chapter are considered a single violation.
(4) At least ninety days prior to seeking to assess any penalty
authorized by subsection (3) of this section, the department shall
notify the alleged violator of the department's intention to seek a
penalty. No penalty is recoverable under subsection (3) of this
section if, within the ninety days of receipt of such a notice, the
recipient has come into compliance with this chapter. Any person that
incurs a penalty under this chapter may appeal the penalty by written
petition to the office of administrative hearings in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The used battery stewardship account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
payments made under section 5 (1), (7), and (8) of this act and
penalties levied under this chapter must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used solely by the department for
the purposes of fulfilling department responsibilities specified in
this chapter. Only the director of the department or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. Funds in the
account may not be diverted for any purpose or activity other than
those specified in this section. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The operator of a qualified used small
rechargeable battery stewardship program that incurs costs in excess of
five thousand dollars in collecting, handling, recycling, or properly
disposing in Washington of free rider used small rechargeable batteries
may bring a civil action or actions to recover costs, damages, and fees
as specified in subsection (2) of this section if the free rider used
small rechargeable batteries originated from a small rechargeable
battery manufacturer or marketer or portable rechargeable product
manufacturer or marketer who:
(a) Was required by section 3 of this act to operate or participate
in a qualified program, did not at the time the used battery was
collected participate in a qualified program, and was not covered by
the participation by another manufacturer in a qualified program; and
(b) Can reasonably be identified from a brand or marking on a used
small rechargeable battery or from other information.
(2) An action under subsection (1) of this section may be brought
against one or more small rechargeable battery manufacturers or
marketers or portable rechargeable product manufacturers or marketers.
In any such action, the plaintiff operator of a qualified program may
recover from a defendant small rechargeable battery manufacturer or
marketer or portable rechargeable product manufacturer or marketer the
costs the plaintiff incurred in collecting, handling, recycling, or
properly disposing of free rider used small rechargeable batteries
reasonably identified as having originated from the defendant small
rechargeable battery manufacturer or marketer or portable rechargeable
product manufacturer or marketer, plus an amount of damages equal to no
more than three times those costs, plus the plaintiff's attorneys' fees
and costs of litigation.
(3) An action to recover the costs specified in this section may be
brought in any superior or district court in the state, without regard
to the amount in dispute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Any person that operates a state or
multistate program in Washington for the stewardship of multiple brands
of used nonrechargeable batteries shall provide to all small
rechargeable battery manufacturers and marketers and portable
rechargeable product manufacturers or marketers subject to this chapter
the opportunity to participate in that person's program and shall
comply with the requirements of a multiparty program plan under section
5 (1) and (4) of this act. Such a person may impose on the small
rechargeable battery manufacturer or marketer or portable rechargeable
product manufacturer or marketer fees no greater than the share of the
total cost of the program of collecting, handling, and processing small
rechargeable batteries that is equal to a reasonable estimate of the
percentage that represents the share of sales of small rechargeable
batteries sold in Washington for which the small rechargeable battery
manufacturer or portable rechargeable product manufacturer would be
responsible under section 3 of this act, compared to the total number
of small rechargeable batteries sold in Washington as either individual
units or in portable rechargeable products. Any small rechargeable
battery manufacturer or marketer or portable rechargeable product
manufacturer or marketer who participates in such a program is deemed
to be in compliance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This chapter is void if a federal law, or
a combination of federal laws, takes effect that establishes a national
program for the collection and recycling of both used nonrechargeable
batteries and used small rechargeable batteries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This chapter may be known and cited as the
Washington small rechargeable battery stewardship act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 14 and 17 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Nothing in this chapter alters or limits
the authority of the utilities and transportation commission to
regulate collection of solid waste, including curbside collection of
residential recyclable materials, nor does this chapter alter or limit
the authority of a city or town to provide such services itself or by
contract under RCW 81.77.020.

--- END ---