BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Asbestos is a known human carcinogen that
causes painful, premature deaths due to diseases such as asbestosis,
mesothelioma, lung and gastrointestinal cancers, and other diseases and
cancers. Activities that can lead to the release of asbestos fibers
include installation, use, maintenance, repair, removal, and disposal
of asbestos-containing building materials.
Many people are unaware that asbestos-containing building materials
are still imported, sold, and used in the United States. Because few
regulations exist that require the disclosure of asbestos in building
materials, people can unknowingly be exposed to asbestos. Asbestos is
generally invisible, odorless, very durable, and highly aerodynamic.
Exposure can occur well after it has been disturbed and long distances
from where the asbestos release occurred.
The purpose of this chapter is to allow people to make informed
decisions regarding whether or not they purchase or use building
materials containing asbestos. More specifically, building materials
that contain asbestos must be clearly labeled as such by manufacturers,
wholesalers, and distributors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Asbestos" includes the asbestiform varieties of actinolite,
amosite (cummingtonite-grunerite), tremolite, chrysotile (serpentine),
crocidolite (riebeckite), anthophyllite, and any of these minerals that
have been chemically treated or altered. The chemical abstracts
service registry number for each is as follows: Asbestos (1332-21-4),
actinolite (13768-00-8), amosite (12172-73-5), tremolite (14567-73-8),
chrysotile (12001-29-5), crocidolite (12001-28-4), and anthophyllite
(17068-78-9).
(2) "Asbestos-containing building material" means any building
material to which asbestos is deliberately added in any concentration
or that contains more than one percent asbestos by weight or area as
determined using the United States environmental protection agency
method for the determination of asbestos in building materials,
EPA/600/R-93/116, July 1993.
(3) "Building material" includes materials designed for, or used
in, construction, renovation, repair, or maintenance of institutional,
commercial, public, industrial, or residential buildings and
structures. The term does not include automobiles, recreational
vehicles, boats, or other mobile means of transportation.
(4) "Consumer" means any person that acquires a building material
for direct use or ownership, rather than for resale or use in
production and manufacturing.
(5) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(6) "Person" means any individual, firm, public or private
corporation, association, partnership, political subdivision,
municipality, or government agency.
(7) "Retailer" means any person that sells goods or commodities
directly to consumers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Effective January 1, 2014, it is
unlawful to manufacture, wholesale, or distribute for sale an asbestos-containing building material that is not labeled as required by section
4 of this act or as required under federal law, 40 C.F.R. part 763,
subpart I, Sec. 173.171 (1994). The labeling requirement also applies
to stock-on-hand, meaning any asbestos-containing building material in
their possession or control after December 31, 2013, must be labeled.
Retailers that do not manufacture, wholesale, or distribute asbestos-containing building materials are exempt from this chapter.
(2)(a) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to asbestos-containing building materials that have already been installed,
applied, or used by the consumer.
(b) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to asbestos-containing building materials used solely for United States military
purposes.
(3) Any manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor may submit a
written request for an exemption from the labeling requirements of this
chapter, and the department may grant such an exemption if it
determines that the labeling requirements are technically infeasible or
create an undue economic hardship. Each exemption is in effect for a
period not to exceed three years from the date issued and is subject to
the terms and conditions prescribed by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A label must be placed in a prominent
location adjacent to the product name or description on the exterior of
the wrapping and packaging in which the asbestos-containing building
material is placed for storage, shipment, and sale.
(2) A label must also be placed on the exterior surface of the
asbestos-containing building material itself unless it is sold as a
liquid or paste, is sand or gravel, or an exemption is granted pursuant
to section 3(3) of this act.
(3) Asbestos-containing building materials must have a legible
label that clearly identifies it as containing asbestos. The
department may adopt rules regarding the implementation of this
chapter. At a minimum, the label must state the following:

CAUTION!

This product contains ASBESTOS which is known to cause cancer
and lung disease. Avoid creating dust. Intentionally removing
or tampering with this label is a violation of state law.

(4) It is unlawful for any person to remove, deface, cover, or
otherwise obscure or tamper with a label or sticker that has been
applied in compliance with this section, unless the asbestos-containing
building material is in the possession of the end user.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The provisions of this chapter may be
enforced by the department, local air authorities, or their designees.
(2) A person found in violation of this chapter is subject to the
penalties provided under RCW 70.94.431.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.94.431 and 1995 c 403 s 630 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 43.05.060 through 43.05.080 and
43.05.150, and in addition to or as an alternate to any other penalty
provided by law, any person who violates any of the provisions of this
chapter ((70.94 RCW)), chapter 70.120 RCW, chapter 70.-- RCW (the new
chapter created in section 7 of this act), or any of the rules in force
under such chapters may incur a civil penalty in an amount not to
exceed ten thousand dollars per day for each violation. Each such
violation shall be a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a
continuing violation, each day's continuance shall be a separate and
distinct violation.
Any person who fails to take action as specified by an order issued
pursuant to this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty of not
more than ten thousand dollars for each day of continued noncompliance.
(2) Penalties incurred but not paid shall accrue interest,
beginning on the ninety-first day following the date that the penalty
becomes due and payable, at the highest rate allowed by RCW 19.52.020
on the date that the penalty becomes due and payable. If violations or
penalties are appealed, interest shall not begin to accrue until the
thirty-first day following final resolution of the appeal.
The maximum penalty amounts established in this section may be
increased annually to account for inflation as determined by the state
office of the economic and revenue forecast council.
(3) Each act of commission or omission which procures, aids or
abets in the violation shall be considered a violation under the
provisions of this section and subject to the same penalty. The
penalties provided in this section shall be imposed pursuant to RCW
43.21B.300.
(4) All penalties recovered under this section by the department
shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the air pollution
control account established in RCW 70.94.015 or, if recovered by the
authority, shall be paid into the treasury of the authority and
credited to its funds. If a prior penalty for the same violation has
been paid to a local authority, the penalty imposed by the department
under subsection (1) of this section shall be reduced by the amount of
the payment.
(5) To secure the penalty incurred under this section, the state or
the authority shall have a lien on any vessel used or operated in
violation of this chapter which shall be enforced as provided in RCW
60.36.050.
(6) Public or private entities that are recipients or potential
recipients of department grants, whether for air quality related
activities or not, may have such grants rescinded or withheld by the
department for failure to comply with provisions of this chapter.
(7) In addition to other penalties provided by this chapter,
persons knowingly under-reporting emissions or other information used
to set fees, or persons required to pay emission or permit fees who are
more than ninety days late with such payments may be subject to a
penalty equal to three times the amount of the original fee owed.
(8) By January 1, 1992, the department shall develop rules for
excusing excess emissions from enforcement action if such excess
emissions are unavoidable. The rules shall specify the criteria and
procedures for the department and local air authorities to determine
whether a period of excess emissions is excusable in accordance with
the state implementation plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---