BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.74.150 and 2007 c 98 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to practice or in any manner hold
himself or herself out to practice physical therapy or designate
himself or herself as a physical therapist or physical therapist
assistant, unless he or she is licensed in accordance with this
chapter.
(2) This chapter does not restrict persons licensed under any other
law of this state from engaging in the profession or practice for which
they are licensed, if they are not representing themselves to be
physical therapists, physical therapist assistants, or providers of
physical therapy.
(3) The following persons are exempt from licensure as physical
therapists under this chapter when engaged in the following activities:
(a) A person who is pursuing a course of study leading to a degree
as a physical therapist in an approved professional education program
and is satisfying supervised clinical education requirements related to
his or her physical therapy education while under direct supervision of
a licensed physical therapist;
(b) A physical therapist while practicing in the United States
armed services, United States public health service, or veterans
administration as based on requirements under federal regulations for
state licensure of health care providers; and
(c) A physical therapist licensed in another United States
jurisdiction, or a foreign-educated physical therapist credentialed in
another country, performing physical therapy as part of teaching or
participating in an educational seminar of no more than sixty days in
a calendar year.
(4) The following persons are exempt from licensure as physical
therapist assistants under this chapter when engaged in the following
activities:
(a) A person who is pursuing a course of study leading to a degree
as a physical therapist assistant in an approved professional education
program and is satisfying supervised clinical education requirements
related to his or her physical therapist assistant education while
under direct supervision of a licensed physical therapist or licensed
physical therapist assistant;
(b) A physical therapist assistant while practicing in the United
States armed services, United States public health service, or veterans
administration as based on requirements under federal regulations for
state licensure of health care providers; and
(c) A physical therapist assistant licensed in another United
States jurisdiction, or a foreign-educated physical therapist assistant
credentialed in another country, or a physical therapist assistant who
is teaching or participating in an educational seminar of no more than
sixty days in a calendar year.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.74.180 and 2007 c 98 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
A physical therapist is professionally and legally responsible for
patient care given by assistive personnel under his or her supervision.
If a physical therapist fails to adequately supervise patient care
given by assistive personnel, the board may take disciplinary action
against the physical therapist.
(1) Regardless of the setting in which physical therapy services
are provided, only the licensed physical therapist may perform the
following responsibilities:
(a) Interpretation of referrals;
(b) Initial examination, problem identification, and diagnosis for
physical therapy;
(c) Development or modification of a plan of care that is based on
the initial examination and includes the goals for physical therapy
intervention;
(d) Determination of which tasks require the expertise and
decision-making capacity of the physical therapist and must be
personally rendered by the physical therapist, and which tasks may be
delegated;
(e) Assurance of the qualifications of all assistive personnel to
perform assigned tasks through written documentation of their education
or training that is maintained and available at all times;
(f) Delegation and instruction of the services to be rendered by
the physical therapist, physical therapist assistant, or physical
therapy aide including, but not limited to, specific tasks or
procedures, precautions, special problems, and contraindicated
procedures;
(g) Timely review of documentation, reexamination of the patient,
and revision of the plan of care when indicated;
(h) Establishment of a discharge plan.
(2) Supervision requires that the patient reevaluation is
performed:
(a) Every fifth visit, or if treatment is performed more than five
times per week, reevaluation must be performed at least once a week;
(b) When there is any change in the patient's condition not
consistent with planned progress or treatment goals.
(3) Supervision of assistive personnel means:
(a) Physical therapist assistants may function under direct or
indirect supervision;
(b) Physical therapy aides must function under direct supervision;
(c) The physical therapist may supervise a total of two assistive
personnel at any one time. The limitation in this subsection (3)(c)
does not apply to persons who are pursuing a course of study leading to
a degree as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant.

--- END ---