BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.12.630 and 2013 c 306 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
((In addition to any other authority which it may have,)) (1) The
department of licensing ((may)) must furnish lists of registered and
legal owners of motor vehicles only for the purposes specified in this
((section)) subsection to((:
(1)(a))) the manufacturers of motor vehicles, or their authorized
agents, to ((be used:
(i) To)) enable those manufacturers to carry out the provisions of
((the national traffic and motor vehicle safety act of 1966 (15 U.S.C.
Sec. 1382-1418), including amendments or additions thereto, respecting
safety-related defects in motor vehicles; or
(ii) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, in research activities,
and in producing statistical reports, as long as the personal
information is not published, redisclosed, or used to contact
individuals; or
(b) During fiscal year 2014, an entity that is an authorized agent
of a motor vehicle manufacturer,)) Titles I and IV of the anti car
theft act of 1992, the automobile information disclosure act (15 U.S.C.
Sec. 1231 et seq.), the clean air act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7401 et seq.),
and 49 U.S.C.S. Secs. 30101-30183, 30501-30505, and 32101-33118, as
these acts existed on January 1, 2014, or such subsequent date as may
be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of
this section. However, the department may only provide a manufacturer,
or its authorized agent, lists of registered or legal owners who
purchased or leased a vehicle manufactured by that manufacturer. Data
providers or authorized agents receiving information on behalf of one
manufacturer must not disclose this information to any other third
party.
(2) The department of licensing may furnish lists of registered and
legal owners of motor vehicles, only to the entities and only for the
purposes specified in this section, to:
(a) The manufacturers of motor vehicles, legitimate businesses, or
their authorized agents, for purposes of using lists of registered and
legal owner information to conduct research activities and produce
statistical reports, as long as the entity does not allow personal
information received under this section to be published, redisclosed,
or used to contact individuals((. The department must charge an amount
sufficient to cover the full cost of providing the data requested under
this subsection (1)(b). Full cost of providing the data includes the
information technology, administrative, and contract oversight costs));
(((2))) (b) Any governmental agency of the United States or Canada,
or political subdivisions thereof, to be used by it or by its
authorized commercial agents or contractors only in connection with the
enforcement of motor vehicle or traffic laws by, or programs related to
traffic safety of, that government agency. Only such parts of the list
as are required for completion of the work required of the agent or
contractor shall be provided to such agent or contractor;
(((3))) (c) Any insurer or insurance support organization, a self-insured entity, or its agents, employees, or contractors for use in
connection with claims investigation activities, antifraud activities,
rating, or underwriting;
(d) Any local governmental entity or its agents for use in
providing notice to owners of towed and impounded vehicles;
(e) A government agency, commercial parking company, or its agents
requiring the names and addresses of registered owners to notify them
of outstanding parking violations. Subject to the disclosure agreement
provisions of RCW 46.12.635 and the requirements of Executive Order 97-01, the department may provide only the parts of the list that are
required for completion of the work required of the company;
(((4))) (f) An authorized agent or contractor of the department, to
be used only in connection with providing motor vehicle excise tax,
licensing, title, and registration information to motor vehicle
dealers;
(((5))) (g) Any business regularly making loans to other persons to
finance the purchase of motor vehicles, to be used to assist the person
requesting the list to determine ownership of specific vehicles for the
purpose of determining whether or not to provide such financing; or
(((6))) (h) A company or its agents operating a toll facility under
chapter 47.46 RCW or other applicable authority requiring the names,
addresses, and vehicle information of motor vehicle registered owners
to identify toll violators.
(3) Personal information received by an entity listed in subsection
(1) or (2) of this section may not be released for direct marketing
purposes.
(4) Prior to the release of any lists of vehicle owners under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the department must enter into
a contract with the entity authorized to receive the data. The
contract must include:
(a) A requirement that the department or its agent conduct both
regular permissible use and data security audits subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(i) The data security audits must demonstrate compliance with the
data security standards adopted by the office of the chief information
officer.
(ii) When determining whether to conduct an audit under this
subsection, the department must first take into consideration any
independent third-party audit a data recipient has had before requiring
that any additional audits be performed. If the independent third-party audit is a data security audit and it meets both recognized
national or international standards and the standards adopted by the
office of the chief information officer pursuant to (a)(i) of this
subsection, the department must accept the audit and the audit is
deemed to satisfy the conditions set out in this subsection (4)(a). If
the independent third-party audit is a permissible use audit and it
meets recognized national or international standards, the department
must accept the audit and the audit is deemed to satisfy the conditions
set out in this subsection (4)(a); and
(b) A provision that the cost of the audits performed pursuant to
this subsection must be borne by the data recipient, as well as the
initial cost to set up the system to disburse the data to the data
recipient.
(5)(a) The department must collect a fee of twenty dollars per one
thousand individual registered or legal vehicle owners included on a
list requested by a private entity under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section. The department must prorate the fee when the request is for
less than a full one thousand records.
(b) In lieu of the fee specified in (a) of this subsection, if the
request requires a weekly, monthly, or other regular update of those
vehicle records that have changed, the department must collect a fee of
two cents per individual registered or legal vehicle owner record
provided to the private entity.
(c) The department must deposit any moneys collected under this
subsection to the department of licensing technology improvement and
data management account created in section 2 of this act.
(6) Where both a mailing address and residence address are recorded
on the vehicle record and are different, only the mailing address will
be disclosed. Both addresses will be disclosed in response to requests
for disclosure from courts, law enforcement agencies, or government
entities with enforcement, investigative, or taxing authority and only
for use in the normal course of conducting their business.
(7) If a list of registered and legal owners of motor vehicles is
used for any purpose other than that authorized in this section, the
manufacturer, governmental agency, commercial parking company,
((authorized agent,)) contractor, financial institution, insurer,
insurance support organization, self-insured entity, legitimate
business entity, toll facility operator, or ((their)) any authorized
agent((s)) or contractor((s)) responsible for the unauthorized
disclosure or use will be denied further access to such information by
the department of licensing.
(8) For purposes of this section, "personal information" means
information that identifies an individual, including an individual's
photograph, social security number, driver identification number, name,
address (but not the five-digit zip code), telephone number, or medical
or disability information. However, an individual's photograph, social
security number, and any medical or disability-related information is
considered highly restricted personal information and may only be
released under the circumstances described in subsections (1) and
(2)(b) and (c) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of licensing technology improvement and data
management account is created in the highway safety fund. All receipts
from fees collected under RCW 46.12.630(5) must be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
investments in technology and data management at the department.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

--- END ---