BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.41.010 and 2012 c 10 s 44 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a legend drug
whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the
body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the
practitioner.
(2) "Community-based care settings" include: Community residential
programs for the developmentally disabled, certified by the department
of social and health services under chapter 71A.12 RCW; adult family
homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW; and assisted living facilities
licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW. Community-based care settings do not
include acute care or skilled nursing facilities.
(3) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or
attempted transfer from one person to another of a legend drug, whether
or not there is an agency relationship.
(4) "Department" means the department of health.
(5) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order
for a legend drug and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the
proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging
necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.
(6) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.
(7) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a legend drug.
(8) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.
(9) "Drug" means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States
pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States,
or official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in human beings or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food, minerals or vitamins) intended to
affect the structure or any function of the body of human beings or
animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any article
specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection. It does not include
devices or their components, parts, or accessories.
(10) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means
the communication of prescription information by computer, or the
transmission of an exact visual image of a prescription by facsimile,
or other electronic means for original prescription information or
prescription refill information for a legend drug between an authorized
practitioner and a pharmacy or the transfer of prescription information
for a legend drug from one pharmacy to another pharmacy.
(11) "In-home care settings" include an individual's place of
temporary and permanent residence, but does not include acute care or
skilled nursing facilities, and does not include community-based care
settings.
(12) "Legend drugs" means any drugs which are required by state law
or regulation of the state board of pharmacy to be dispensed on
prescription only or are restricted to use by practitioners only.
(13) "Legible prescription" means a prescription or medication
order issued by a practitioner that is capable of being read and
understood by the pharmacist filling the prescription or the nurse or
other practitioner implementing the medication order. A prescription
must be hand printed, typewritten, or electronically generated.
(14) "Medication assistance" means assistance rendered by a
nonpractitioner to an individual residing in a community-based care
setting or in-home care setting to facilitate the individual's self-administration of a legend drug or controlled substance. It includes
reminding or coaching the individual, handing the medication container
to the individual, opening the individual's medication container, using
an enabler, or placing the medication in the individual's hand, and
such other means of medication assistance as defined by rule adopted by
the department. A nonpractitioner may help in the preparation of
legend drugs or controlled substances for self-administration where a
practitioner has determined and communicated orally or by written
direction that such medication preparation assistance is necessary and
appropriate. Medication assistance shall not include assistance with
intravenous medications or injectable medications, except prefilled
insulin syringes.
(15) "Person" means individual, corporation, government or
governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust,
partnership or association, or any other legal entity.
(16) "Practitioner" means:
(a) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician
or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, a
dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon
under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a
registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed
practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW, an optometrist under chapter
18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010,
an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter 18.57A RCW, a
physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW, a naturopath licensed
under chapter 18.36A RCW, a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW, or,
when acting under the required supervision of a dentist licensed under
chapter 18.32 RCW, a dental hygienist licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(b) A pharmacy, hospital, or other institution licensed,
registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct
research with respect to, or to administer a legend drug in the course
of professional practice or research in this state; and
(c) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a
physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery in any
state, or province of Canada, which shares a common border with the
state of Washington.
(17) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(18) "Biological product" has the same meaning as provided in 42
U.S.C. Sec. 262(i)(1), and means any of the following, when applied to
the prevention, treatment, or cure of a disease or condition of human
beings:
(a) A virus;
(b) A therapeutic serum;
(c) A toxin;
(d) An antitoxin;
(e) A vaccine;
(f) Blood;
(g) An allergenic product;
(h) A protein, other than a chemically synthesized polypeptide, or
an analogous product; or
(i) Arsphenamine, a derivative of arsphenamine, or any trivalent
organic arsenic compound.
(19) "Biosimilar product" means a biological product licensed by
the federal food and drug administration pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec.
262(k)(3)(A)(i).
(20) "Interchangeable" means, in reference to a biological product,
that the federal food and drug administration has determined that a
biosimilar product meets the safety standards set forth in 42 U.S.C.
Sec. 262(k)(4).

Sec. 2 RCW 69.41.120 and 2000 c 8 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
Every drug or biological product prescription shall contain an
instruction on whether or not a therapeutically equivalent generic drug
or interchangeable biosimilar product may be substituted in its place,
unless substitution is permitted under a prior-consent authorization.
If a written prescription is involved, the prescription must be
legible and the form shall have two signature lines at opposite ends on
the bottom of the form. Under the line at the right side shall be
clearly printed the words "DISPENSE AS WRITTEN". Under the line at the
left side shall be clearly printed the words "SUBSTITUTION PERMITTED".
The practitioner shall communicate the instructions to the pharmacist
by signing the appropriate line. No prescription shall be valid
without the signature of the practitioner on one of these lines. In
the case of a prescription issued by a practitioner in another state
that uses a one-line prescription form or variation thereof, the
pharmacist may substitute a therapeutically equivalent generic drug or
interchangeable biosimilar product unless otherwise instructed by the
practitioner through the use of the words "dispense as written", words
of similar meaning, or some other indication.
If an oral prescription is involved, the practitioner or the
practitioner's agent shall instruct the pharmacist as to whether or not
a therapeutically equivalent generic drug or interchangeable biosimilar
product may be substituted in its place. The pharmacist shall note the
instructions on the file copy of the prescription.
The pharmacist shall note ((the manufacturer of the drug
dispensed)) on the file copy of a written or oral prescription the
manufacturer of the drug dispensed or, if an interchangeable biosimilar
product is dispensed, the brand name or, if there is not a brand name,
the nonproprietary name, the strength, and the name of the manufacturer
or distributor of the product.
The pharmacist shall retain the file copy of a written or oral
prescription for at least the same period of time specified in RCW
18.64.245 for retention of prescription records.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.41.190 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 80 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a)(i) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any
pharmacist filling a prescription under a state purchased health care
program as defined in RCW 41.05.011(((2))) (21) shall substitute, where
identified, a preferred drug or biological product for any nonpreferred
drug or biological product in a given therapeutic class, unless the
endorsing practitioner has indicated on the prescription that the
nonpreferred drug or biological product must be dispensed as written,
or the prescription is for a refill of an antipsychotic,
antidepressant, antiepileptic, chemotherapy, antiretroviral, or
immunosuppressive drug, or for the refill of a
immunomodulator/antiviral treatment for hepatitis C for which an
established, fixed duration of therapy is prescribed for at least
twenty-four weeks but no more than forty-eight weeks, in which case the
pharmacist shall dispense the prescribed nonpreferred drug or
biological product.
(ii) In the case of a biological product, any pharmacist filling a
prescription for a specific biological product may substitute a
biosimilar product for the prescribed biological product only if the
federal food and drug administration has determined that the biosimilar
product is interchangeable with the prescribed biological product.
(b) When a substitution is made under (a) of this subsection, the
dispensing pharmacist shall notify the prescribing practitioner of the
specific drug and dose dispensed.
(c) If a pharmacist dispenses an interchangeable biosimilar product
that is not the biological product prescribed, the pharmacist shall
notify the patient or the patient's representative and the prescribing
practitioner. The notification to the prescribing practitioner must:
(i) Be transmitted in writing or electronically;
(ii) Identify the brand name or, if there is not a brand name, the
nonproprietary name, strength, and manufacturer or distributor of the
interchangeable biosimilar product dispensed to the patient; and
(iii) Be transmitted to the prescribing practitioner not later than
the third day after the date the interchangeable biosimilar product is
dispensed.
(2)(a) A state purchased health care program may impose limited
restrictions on an endorsing practitioner's authority to write a
prescription to dispense as written only under the following
circumstances:
(i) There is statistical or clear data demonstrating the endorsing
practitioner's frequency of prescribing dispensed as written for
nonpreferred drugs or biological products varies significantly from the
prescribing patterns of his or her peers;
(ii) The medical director of a state purchased health program has:
(A) Presented the endorsing practitioner with data that indicates the
endorsing practitioner's prescribing patterns vary significantly from
his or her peers, (B) provided the endorsing practitioner an
opportunity to explain the variation in his or her prescribing patterns
to those of his or her peers, and (C) if the variation in prescribing
patterns cannot be explained, provided the endorsing practitioner
sufficient time to change his or her prescribing patterns to align with
those of his or her peers; and
(iii) The restrictions imposed under (((a) of)) this subsection
(2)(a) must be limited to the extent possible to reduce variation in
prescribing patterns and shall remain in effect only until such time as
the endorsing practitioner can demonstrate a reduction in variation in
line with his or her peers.
(b) A state purchased health care program may immediately designate
an available, less expensive, equally effective generic product in a
previously reviewed drug class as a preferred drug, without first
submitting the product to review by the pharmacy and therapeutics
committee established pursuant to RCW 70.14.050.
(c) For a patient's first course of treatment within a therapeutic
class of drugs or biological products, a state purchased health care
program may impose limited restrictions on endorsing practitioners'
authority to write a prescription to dispense as written, only under
the following circumstances:
(i) There is a less expensive, equally effective therapeutic
alternative generic product or interchangeable biosimilar product
available to treat the condition;
(ii) The drug use review board established under WAC 388-530-4000
reviews and provides recommendations as to the appropriateness of the
limitation;
(iii) Notwithstanding the limitation set forth in (c)(ii) of this
subsection (2), the endorsing practitioner shall have an opportunity to
request as medically necessary, that the brand name drug or biological
product be prescribed as the first course of treatment;
(iv) The state purchased health care program may provide, where
available, prescription, emergency room, diagnosis, and hospitalization
history with the endorsing practitioner; and
(v) Specifically for antipsychotic restrictions, the state
purchased health care program shall effectively guide good practice
without interfering with the timeliness of clinical decision making.
Health care authority prior authorization programs must provide for
responses within twenty-four hours and at least a seventy-two hour
emergency supply of the requested drug or biological product.
(d) If, within a therapeutic class, there is an equally effective
therapeutic alternative over-the-counter drug available, a state
purchased health care program may designate the over-the-counter drug
as the preferred drug.
(e) A state purchased health care program may impose limited
restrictions on endorsing practitioners' authority to prescribe
pharmaceuticals to be dispensed as written for a purpose outside the
scope of their approved labels only under the following circumstances:
(i) There is a less expensive, equally effective on-label product
available to treat the condition;
(ii) The drug use review board established under WAC 388-530-4000
reviews and provides recommendations as to the appropriateness of the
limitation; and
(iii) Notwithstanding the limitation set forth in (e)(ii) of this
subsection (2), the endorsing practitioner shall have an opportunity to
request as medically necessary, that the drug or biological product be
prescribed for a covered off-label purpose.
(f) The provisions of this subsection related to the definition of
medically necessary, prior authorization procedures and patient appeal
rights shall be implemented in a manner consistent with applicable
federal and state law.
(3) Notwithstanding the limitations in subsection (2) of this
section, for refills for an antipsychotic, antidepressant,
antiepileptic, chemotherapy, antiretroviral, or immunosuppressive drug,
or for the refill of an immunomodulator antiviral treatment for
hepatitis C for which an established, fixed duration of therapy is
prescribed for at least twenty-four weeks by no more than forty-eight
weeks, the pharmacist shall dispense the prescribed nonpreferred drug
or biological product.
(4) If the federal food and drug administration makes available a
current list of biosimilar products determined by the federal food and
drug administration to be interchangeable with specific biological
products, the state board of pharmacy shall maintain on its web site a
link to the list.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 69.41 RCW
to read as follows:
If a pharmacist fills a prescription not covered under a state
purchased health care program, the following apply:
(1) If a pharmacist dispenses an interchangeable biosimilar product
that is not the biological product prescribed, the pharmacist shall
notify the patient or the patient's representative and the prescribing
practitioner. The notification to the prescribing practitioner must:
(a) Be transmitted in writing or electronically;
(b) Identify the brand name or, if there is not a brand name, the
nonproprietary name, strength, and manufacturer or distributor of the
interchangeable biosimilar product dispensed to the patient; and
(c) Be transmitted to the prescribing practitioner not later than
the third day after the date the interchangeable biosimilar product is
dispensed.
(2) A pharmacist who selects an interchangeable biosimilar product
to be dispensed under this section assumes the same responsibility for
selecting the interchangeable biosimilar product as the pharmacist does
in filling a prescription for the interchangeable biosimilar product
when prescribed by name. The prescribing practitioner is not liable
for a pharmacist's act or omission in selecting, preparing, or
dispensing an interchangeable biosimilar product under this section.

--- END ---