BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW
to read as follows:
The board of trustees of Western Washington University may offer
applied, but not research, doctorate level degrees in audiology subject
to review.

--- END ---